 Fed Officials Fed Bank of Chicago President Charles Evans, who voted in favor of reducing bond buying last month, said today that policy makers will shift their emphasis away from stimulus toward keeping interest rates near zero for a longer time.
 Qunar’s air ticketing record demonstrates growth momentum in its mobile reservations, which is encouraging, according to Henry Guo, an analyst at ABR Investment Strategy LLC who has buy ratings for both companies.
 LVMH is boosting investment in some of its smaller fashion brands and buying stakes in others to help offset slowing growth at Vuitton.
 Among new cars expected for this year, Hyundai will introduce the next-generation Sonata sedan and Kia will unveil the new Sorento sport utility vehicle, according to Shin Chung Kwan, a Seoul-based analyst at KB Investment & Securities Co, who has a buy rating on Hyundai’s stock.
 “Fuel switching to oil is expected to be limited due to capacity and efficiency restrictions, and at least one Japanese buyer is understood to have approached other players inquiring about possible cargo swaps,” WGI said.
 “In Japan, two major power utilities are understood to have submitted bids at or just above $19 per million Btu for about three cargoes, competing against buyers in the Mediterranean” Prices in North Asia are forecast to be little changed this week, according to three of four traders surveyed by Bloomberg News through Jan.
 Asian buyers are facing competition from Argentina and Spain for Atlantic cargoes, according to WGI.
 At least $2 billion of the buybacks will occur in 2014,Wilmington, Delaware-based DuPont said today in a statement.
 “With the addition of the buybacks, earnings guidance isin line with consensus,” Roberts, who recommends holding DuPontshares, said in a phone interview today.
 Deutsche Bank analysts led by Matthew O’Connor upgraded the shares to buy from hold on Jan.
 Last year it paid $17 billion to buy ProSiebenSat1’s SBS Nordic unit, which comprises TV networks in Norway, Sweden, Denmark and Finland.
 Showrooming Success Joly said the matching policy and price cuts haveeliminated the threat posed by so-called showrooming -- when ashopper looks at a product in a store and then buys at acompetitor’s website.
 said it will buy the rights to add 12 round-trip flights at Washington’s Ronald Reagan National Airport being shed by American Airlines as a condition for its merger with US Airways Group Inc.
 Michael Linenberg, a Deutsche Bank AG analyst, raised his rating on the shares late yesterday to buy from hold.
 The slot sale fulfills the government’s demand that buyers be airlines that would expand competition and offer more low fares.
 2 supplier, to international buyers including Electricite de France SA are suspended until the producer finishes mandatory port enhancements to avoid spills.
 24 to buy at least $6 billion of the local currency through the end of this month to prop it up and keep the nation’s current-account deficit under control.
 Turkish assets have faced selling pressure since mid-2013 as part of a wider rout in emerging markets triggered by the Federal Reserve’s plans to trim its monthly bond-buying program.
 Nidec increased 56 percent after the precision-motor manufacturer boosted its full-year profit forecast and announced a share buyback.
 Citi upgraded its shares to buy from neutral.
 The company raised its full-year net income forecast by 18 percent to 56 billion yen and said it will spend as much as 24 billion yen to buy back shares.
 subprime-mortgage securities are overpriced as investors misjudge a court ruling last month that will limit bondholders’ ability to force banks to buy back soured loans, according to hedge-fund manager Deepak Narula.
 The Deutsche Bank ruling represents a risk to values because it may prevent new suits seeking mortgage buybacks and “gives issuers leverage in more general settlements” by reducing the odds that some investors will object to the deals, Narula wrote.
 Hedge fund Fir Tree Partners said last week that it was offering to buy some of the securities and would seek to continue existing litigation over them.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne in November ordered an independent inquiry into events at the Co-Op Bank following Flowers’s arrest as part of a drugs probe after he was filmed buying crack cocaine by a UK.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Asian stocks fell as China’s factory-gate prices extended the longest streak of declines since the Asian financial crisis and Federal Reserve minutes showed officials saw diminishing benefits from bond buying.
 Fed officials saw diminishing economic benefits from their bond-buying program and voiced concern about future risks to financial stability during their last meeting, when they began to cut the pace of purchases.
 28-29 to consider the next step in their strategy of gradually reducing the pace of bond buying as the economy strengthens.
 sold $2 billion of bonds today to speed up stock buybacks, following through on plans for a record repurchase program announced last year at the operator of the world’s largest cargo airline.
 The Memphis, Tennessee-based company said buybacks under the accords should be done by the end of May.
 FedEx unveiled authorization in October for buying back as many as 32 million shares, its biggest ever, weeks before activist investor Daniel Loeb disclosed a stake in the company.
 “We believe the share repurchase program will be accretive to earnings, but believe the Street has already priced in the buyback,” said Becker, who rates FedEx as market perform.
 While Loeb alone probably didn’t spur the acceleration of buybacks, his voice would have added to the clamor, he said.
 “But it’s just one piece of new shareholder feedback that they would have weighed along with all the other shareholder feedback” The buyback follows through on FedEx’s comments in December that it planned additional share purchases.
 “The business can afford to have a bit more leverage there” FedEx sold $750 million each of 10- and 30-year debt and $500 million of 20-year notes to fund the accelerated share buybacks.
 One Canadian dollar buys 9181 US.
 The greenback fell versus most major peers today as lower-than-forecast job gains damped speculation the Fed will keep winding down the bond-buying it uses to spur economic growth.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Allianz Real Estate, the property investing arm of Europe’s largest insurer, plans to buy the Koe Galerie shopping mall in Dusseldorf from Blackstone Group LP, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Insurers are buying commercial property as a way to boost returns because low interest rates are eroding profit from bonds.
 The Fed will trim its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to its plan for a gradual withdrawal of stimulus from departing Chairman Ben S.
 Peso Plunge The Argentine currency dropped after Cabinet Chief Jorge Capitanich told reporters yesterday the central bank isn’t intervening in the peso’s decline, allowing the market, which is mostly closed to buyers of dollars, to adjust prices.
 The central bank decided last month to cut its monthly asset buying by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 A halt in the biggest buyer China’s purchases of DDGS will hurt prices of corn and reduce profits for ethanol producers such as Archer-Daniels-Midland Co.
 “China’s buying had been the driver for the surge in DDGS prices, and now with this ban, prices in the US.
 “There continues to be strong investor demand for new credits that will allow them to diversify their portfolios” Yield premiums on company debt last year fell to the least since 2008, as record-low Reserve Bank of Australia interest rates spurred investors hunting for higher yields to buy notes with longer maturities or ratings closer to junk.
 GPT’s unlisted funds last week agreed to buy A$12 billion of buildings held by CPA should Dexus win control of the trust.
 The central bank reduced monthly bond buying to $75 billion this month from $85 billion in part due to improvement in the labor market.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury 10-year note yields fell to the lowest level in two months as investors sought a haven from emerging-market turmoil even as the Federal Reserve announced plans for a second reduction in its bond-buying program.
 The Fed has undertaken three rounds of bond-buying since 2008 under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy.
 The team’s mission: top-notch analysis offering new peeks into human behavior that may also reveal ways to improve the company’s service for buyers and sellers.
 He’s also designing programs that comb through a customer’s purchasing history and predict what they might want to buy next.
 Chairman Charles Ergen on buying $1 billion in LightSquared Inc.
 The judge asked Kiser who he was working for when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 Ergen is accused of surreptitiously buying debt in LightSquared, the wireless broadband provider owned by Philip Falcone, to hijack its reorganization and gain control of its airwaves.
 Competitor Barred LightSquared has said that Ergen’s investment vehicle, SP Special Opportunities LLC, was prohibited from buying the debt because it’s a competitor, and that Kiser was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish when he caused SP to execute its purchases.
 He also once helped Ergen buy a ranch.
 Board Inquiry Kiser said he didn’t use money from Dish or EchoStar to buy the debt and didn’t reply when a member of Dish’s board asked whether Ergen may have made some large purchases in May 2012.
 He said he set up an entity, Bal Harbour, named after the South Florida village, to buy the debt.
 “All of my great creative naming would have been for naught” Ergen’s lawyers have said he had the right to buy the debt personally and that he didn’t want his name to be known because it could have driven up the price.
 SP Special Opportunities is part of a group of lenders that owns about $14 billion of $17 billion in debt issued by LightSquared’s main “LP” unit and backed Ergen’s proposal to buy the airwaves.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Australian homebuyers are borrowing at the fastest pace in four years amid record prices, straining debt levels already among the developed world’s highest as interest rates are set to climb.
 “With growth in credit flowing to investors, with the uplift in house prices that represents, that means buyers have to put a greater proportion of their salary into housing” Household debt was 105 percent of Australia’s gross domestic product in the second quarter of 2011, the highest level among the world’s 10 largest mature economies, according to the most recent comparison of the data by New York-based consulting firm McKinsey & Co.
 While Australian consumers are nowhere near as indebted as their Scandinavian counterparts, a rise in borrowing costs would stretch the ability to repay mortgages of buyers clamoring to get a foothold in an overheating housing market.
 With housing prices higher than they’ve ever been, recent buyers, particularly those purchasing for the first time, “are only just about keeping their heads above water with interest rates as low as they are,” North said.
 Rather than buy Christmas presents, consumers placed 10 billion kroner in high interest-rate accounts in December, he said in a Jan.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, which last week agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 Billionaire Nobutada Saji’s whiskey and soft-drinks company denied a report by India’s CNBC TV18 network yesterday that the Osaka-based company had offered to buy Scotch whisky maker Whyte & Mackay and valued it at less than $1 billion.
 Diageo Plc, the world’s biggest distiller, last year agreed to buy a controlling stake in United Spirits that would give it control of Whyte & Mackay.
 Loading programs are monthly schedules of crude shipments compiled by field operators to allow buyers and sellers to plan their supply and trading activities.
 Lojas Americanas SA, the Rio de Janeiro-based retailer that owns 62 percent of B2W, will buy at least 102 billion reais of shares at 25 reais each, according to a Jan.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP agreed to buy the Ortho Clinical unit of Johnson & Johnson for $415 billion, a deal that would shed the health-care products company’s only diagnostics division.
 You buy at-the-money calls, the stock goes down, you get nothing.
 Stock is easy to hedge, you just buy or sell stock.
 So a couple of these trades (two of the three EdF trades) are capped calls (or call spreads), where Libya buys a call struck at $100 and sells back a call struck at $140, limiting its upside and Goldman's risk.
 will continue to seek out innovative drugs to buy, particularly for cancer, shrugging off two previous deals totaling $78 billion in the last three years that failed to pay off for them.
 A 2009 deal to buy Medarex Inc.
 27 to buy the remaining OSK Ventures shares it doesn’t own at 58 sen apiece.
 proposes first and final dividend of 568 sen/shr * Brahim’s (BRAH MK): May partner ANA to provide halal meals for Middle Eastern airlines visiting Japan’s Haneda and Narita airports, the Edge reported, citing unidentified people familiar with the matter * Felda Global (FGV MK): Kumpulan Wang Persaraan (Diperbadankan) buys 22m Felda Global shares via open market on Dec.
 “Last year’s catastrophe activity was very light -- capital from traditional and alternative sources was available in abundance and buyers continued to retain more risk,” Amer Ahmed, chief executive officer of Allianz Re, said in an interview in Munich yesterday.
 “Last year was a good test in terms of how well our buying group protection works.
 Card-payment processor Cielo SA advanced to a two-month high after Banco BTG Pactual SA raised it to buy.
 The Ibovespa probably won’t rebound this year as concern that Brazil’s credit rating may be reduced discourages investors from buying stocks, according to Fernando Goes, an analyst at Clear Corretora.
 “If something pops up for which we believe there is the right price, the right quality of assets and if the activity where we want to expand is right for us, we will monitor and we will buy” Western European lenders, which own about three-quarters of banking assets in eastern Europe except Russia, have reduced investments in the region since it was hit by recession in 2009.
 said it expects the insurer to buy back $10 billion of stock during the next two years.
 AerCap Holdings NV agreed to buy AIG’s International Lease Finance Corp.
 The trial program, which has supporters in Congress, would reward brokers for making markets in less liquid stocks by widening the spread they earn when buying and selling shares.
 “It’s a really competitive space,” said Steve Sikes, manager of real assets at the Alaska Retirement Management Board, which is considering buying $150 million to $200 million of medical offices in what would be its first direct purchases of the properties.
 More than 975,000 Americans signed up in December to buy plans under the law, which guarantees health coverage to all residents and penalizes those who aren’t insured.
 2, making it the biggest buyer after publicly traded Ventas Inc, which acquired 72 such buildings in its April 2012 purchase of Cogdell Spencer Inc.
 Hospital Landlords More than 90 percent of about $1 trillion of health-care properties are still in the hands of hospitals and medical systems that may no longer want to be landlords, creating plenty of opportunities for institutional buyers, according to Hanson.
 Griffin-American, owner of health-care real estate in 30 states and the UK, buys stable, well-leased properties rather than buildings that need major renovations, Hanson said.
 “As you see the economic recovery broaden and improve, you see some of the more stable property types get left behind” The large pool of properties to buy gives medical office investors ample opportunities to generate more income, according to Hanson of Griffin-American.
 Morgan Stanley said in a note yesterday that the Deloitte agreement offered “buying opportunities” on certain Chinese Internet stocks including Baidu and Dangdang.
 Yields have climbed in the past six weeks as a Turkish government corruption probe added to investor concern that emerging-market assets are vulnerable as the Federal Reserve scales back its bond-buying program.
 The Fed will trim monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion, it said Jan.
 Kinder Morgan Energy Partners LP, the pipeline operator that’s buying US.
 law that makes domestic shipping more expensive left Californians buying oil from the Middle East instead.
 Kinder Morgan, the country’s second-largest natural gas pipeline operator by market value, agreed to buy APT New Intermediate Holdco LLC and State Class Tankers II LLC from private-equity firms Blackstone Group LP and Cerberus Capital Management LP for $962 million in cash.
 The ships Kinder Morgan is buying from American Petroleum Tankers are all booked for several years on long-term contracts, according to a Dec.
 “Volkswagen will probably continue to grow more dynamically in China than GM,” said Frank Schwope, a Hanover, Germany-based analyst with NordLB who recommends buying VW shares.
 “When you’re selling me something, you’re the salesman and I’m the customer, and I’m supposed to be the difficult one” Even with those restrictions, India is buying a fleet of US.
 arms export regulations and restrictions on transfers of military technology to the South Asian nation has been at the heart of the US-India relations since 2005, when the two countries improved ties and reached an agreement that allows India, a nuclear-weapons state, to buy reactors and nuclear material for its energy industry.
 Streamlining Processes During a 2012 visit to India, Panetta said the Pentagon was undertaking an effort to “streamline our bureaucratic processes and make our defense trade more simple, responsive, and effective” Panetta also said US-India ties would move beyond a seller-buyer relationship to “substantial co-production and, eventually, high-technology joint research and development” of weapons.
 India is buying 10 C-17 transport planes, valued at about $58 billion, making it the largest operator of the aircraft after the US.
 It’s also buying six Lockheed Martin Corp.
 Wind Mobile was expected to buy blocks in BC, Alberta and Ontario, said Dvai Ghose, a telecommunications analyst with Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 The bank reiterated its buy recommendation on the airline’s shares.
 Scott Siefers, an analyst at Sandler O’Neill & Partners LP who rates the stock buy, said today in a note.
 7 to buy the Chicago branches of Charter One Bank owned by RBS Citizens Financial Group.
 In November, the lender agreed to buy Quintillion Ltd, a Dublin-based hedge-fund administrator.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Brookfield Incorporacoes SA, Brazil’s worst-performing homebuilder in the past year, led gains in the country’s benchmark gauge after its controlling investor said it may buy back the outstanding shares and delist the stock.
 Hurwitz also will relinquish options to buy more than 1,300 Maxxam shares, received as part of his 2012 compensation package, to resolve a Delaware Chancery Court lawsuit filed by Arbiter Partners QP LP, according to court papers.
 He has an outperform rating on the stock, the equivalent of a buy recommendation.
 to buy a combined $400 million in debt from Chicago-based USG in 2008, during the housing slump.
 The creation of an industry powerhouse with about $23 billion in revenue doesn’t pose antitrust concerns because customers for marketing communication services and media-buying services can easily switch to other agencies, the European Commission said in an e-mailed statement today.
 The Fed decided at the December meeting to reduce its monthly bond-buying by $10 billion.
 Nomura has the chance to generate more fees by tapping those customers to buy mutual funds and manage the assets” Brokerage commissions jumped 45 percent in the quarter from a year earlier to 1214 billion yen, yesterday’s statement showed.
 While buying AirWatch will cut into profit initially, it will ultimately help VMware drive growth, and will speed up the adoption of mobile computing among corporations, wrote Abhey Lamba, a New York-based analyst at Mizuho Securities USA Inc, in a note after the purchase was announced.
 He rates the shares a buy.
 Lower Proceeds Wind Mobile was expected to buy blocks in BC, Alberta and Ontario, said Dvai Ghose, a telecommunications analyst with Canaccord Genuity Group Inc.
 Had it gone ahead, the auction rules would have allowed it to buy two of four blocks of spectrum in each region, while the Canadian incumbents would only have had access to one each.
 Without Wind, it’s more likely that Quebecor will buy spectrum outside of the French-speaking province, Phillip Huang, a Toronto-based analyst for Barclays Plc, said in a note to clients.
 Mizuho raised its rating on the stock to buy from underperform on the outlook a weaker yen will boost earnings.
 28-29 and will probably cut another $10 billion from their monthly bond-buying program, according to the median estimate of economists surveyed by Bloomberg this month.
 Yesterday, Elliott made a separate buyout offer for Riverbed Technology Inc.
 “Assuming no further tax increases targeting high-value properties, we anticipate five-year prime central London price growth of 231 percent” Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne announced a new capital-gains tax on overseas-based buyers of London homes last month.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Egyptian shares rose to a three-year high amid the heaviest trading in 16 months on EFG-Hermes Holding SAE’s stock buyback and before a referendum this week.
 9 it would buy back 1 billion pounds of its stock, paying investors 115 pounds a share in the first phase.
 He was arrested on suspicion of buying shares in Ocado Group Plc ahead of a public announcement about a partnership between the retailer and Morrison, the person said.
 “The only reason people buy tickets, T-shirts and TV subscriptions is because of what the guys are doing on the pitch,” he said.
 UBS AG upgraded the maker of generic drugs to buy from neutral, saying the company’s doxycycline medicine will send 2014 earnings higher than the average analyst estimate.
 Banco Santander SA, which considered buying branches from Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc two years ago, is among possible suitors for Clydesdale as the local economy picks up, said Above the Index Asset Management Pty, a shareholder in NAB.
 Santander, Spain’s largest lender, is among possible European buyers of Clydesdale, he said.
 “Clydesdale could attract a buyer if it can demonstrate ROE improvement,” Buonaccorsi said by phone.
 It’s still an attractive asset” Alice Macandrew, a spokeswoman for BSkyB, declined to comment on whether the company has been approached by a buyer or would consider a sale.
 The carrier already spent more than $10 billion to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year after it acquired UK.
 “It’s got to do something to shore up that market position, so maybe buying BSkyB will be a roll of the dice; they’ll say, ‘Let’s just go for it’” Vodafone and BSkyB are already partners, striking a deal to show Sky Sports content on mobile phones last year.
 Fox Stake Even if Vodafone or another buyer wants to do a deal, it all depends on Murdoch, who also owns stakes in cable companies across Europe through Fox, the TV and film company split off from News Corp.
 Murdoch “may still have his eye on buying them out to create his pan-European Sky network, but the hacking scandal hasn’t completely blown over in the UK,” Keane at Alpine Woods said.
 Apollo, the New York-based buyout firm run by Leon Black, last year agreed to buy Evo Banco from nationalized lender NCG Banco and FinanMadrid from state-owned Bankia group.
 in Moscow who cut his rating on Yandex to hold last month, ending two years in which he recommended buying.
 While 60 percent of the 25 analysts covering Yandex recommend buying the stock, it’s the lowest level since June 2012, the data show.
 “It makes sense that companies that have appreciated so much are seeing short interest increase,” Boris Vilidnitsky, an analyst at Barclays Plc in London who has the equivalent of a buy rating for Yandex, wrote in an e-mail yesterday.
 If Yandex decides to spend at last part of its cash with dividends or a new buyback, the stock will gain, UralSib’s Belov said.
 The company has purchased about half of the 12 million shares in a buyback program announced in March, he said on the call.
 surged 4 percent to HK$1044 after agreeing to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business for $23 billion.
 localities also scaled back refinancing as Detroit’s record bankruptcy filing in July and speculation that the Federal Reserve will curb its bond buying pushed borrowing costs to the highest in more than two years in September.
 to sell vacant properties as well as occupied space it would then lease back from buyers, according to a statement today.
 If the Sirius special committee accepts the offer, Liberty also may buy back more shares, Maffei said.
 “This looks like foreign investors are buying, as they gaze at cheap valuations,” Figen Ozavci, deputy chief executive officer at Meksa Yatirim in Istanbul, said by phone.
 It’s the first buyout at Forest for Chief Executive Officer Brent Saunders, who took over Oct.
 in London as Peel Hunt cut its recommendation to hold from buy.
 The remaining free cash will go to shareholders in the form of higher dividends and share buybacks, Wennink said.
 is buying digital thermostat maker Nest Labs for $32 billion as the Internet search company moves deeper into Web-connected devices.
 It’s seeking buyers for interests in oil and gas fields, in pipeline, fuel-refining and marketing assets from the US.
 While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 Prosecutors accused Litvak of misrepresenting sellers’ asking prices to buyers, or vice versa, keeping the difference for Jefferies.
 A year ago, BlackRock bought wind farms from REG and agreed on a five-year partnership that allows it to buy more plants from the developer.
 Proceeds last year were mostly used on dividend payouts to private-equity sponsors and to refinance debt rather than to help fund leveraged buyouts, as was the case before the financial crisis when PIKs were used for the takeovers of Energy Future Holdings Corp.
 Credit swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 last January to deliver a tough message: A decade after the fast-food giant’s groundbreaking promise to reduce medically important antibiotics fed to the animals it buys, the policy had glaring loopholes and questionable impact.
 Aurobindo will buy Actavis’s generic products, marketing authorizations and dossier license rights in France, Italy, Spain, Portugal, Belgium, Germany and the Netherlands, the Dublin-based drugmaker said in a statement.
 In August, Aurobindo agreed to buy a 57 percent stake in Silicon Life Sciences Pvt.
 They accused Oracle directors of violating legal duties to shareholders by backing the buyout.
 Shareholders properly raised questions about whether the buyout “was a legitimate deal and whether somebody could have gotten a better deal,” the judge said at a hearing.
 Chief Executive Officer Dave Goldberg wanted to buy out investors from his Internet company and attract new ones who wouldn’t balk at his aim to stay private, he steered clear of traditional startup financiers in the venture-capital community.
 The Bahrain-based firm is selling Leeds about 14 months after buying the soccer club as it prepares to begin making payments on $110 million of debt it restructured in May 2012.
 “We don’t see other buyers emerging” Any counterbidders would probably have to pay “significantly” more than 20 times Ebitda because closely held Suntory could always come back with an even higher offer, Melissa Earlam, a London-based analyst at UBS AG, said in a phone interview.
 Bazaarvoice’s lawyers said the merger represented no threat to competition because businesses are building their own ratings and reviews systems and can buy software from other competitors.
 Federal Reserve officials saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond-buying program and expressed concern about risks to financial stability when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases, according to minutes of their last meeting released today.
 The drug distributor was raised to overweight, an equivalent of buy, from equal-weight by Morgan Stanley.
 agreed to buy Cetera Financial Group from Donald Marron’s Lightyear Capital LLC for $115 billion as it seeks to build a network of brokers across the country.
 The acquisition marks at least the fourth purchase for Schorsch’s company in the past four months after announcing it would buy brokerages Summit Financial Services Group Inc.
 “The buyer approached us six to nine months ago and asked to make a preemptive bid,” Marron, 79, said in a phone interview.
 Lightyear Capital formed Cetera after buying the ING Advisor Network in 2010.
 drug distributer failed to win enough shareholder support to buy its German rival.
 24 to buy a 5001 percent stake held by family-owned investment firm Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH for 23 euros a share, and began an offer for the rest.
 “McKesson will remain committed to finding a partner to increase purchasing scale and the company’s strong balance sheet positions it well to pursue other strategic options and/or share buybacks,” David Larsen, an analyst with Leerink Partners, wrote in a note to clients.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 An acquisition would have allowed McKesson to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 lowered its rating on the stocks to neutral from buy based on their valuations.
 Sakhalin Energy also sold four shipments for March and April loading through direct negotiations with buyers, the two people said.
 “That would suggest that you should be buying bonds.
 It also further cuts ties between bank and insurance, said Kluis, who recommends investors buy the stock.
 The company is also in advanced talks to divest a hydroelectric power plant in India, two people familiar with the matter said, without naming a buyer.
 “Buyers have been waiting for something like this as a catalyst so they can start buying again” Prices have fallen since Uralkali withdrew from a trading venture with Belaruskali that controlled 40 percent of global exports.
 “In this deal, the Chinese buyers took 70 percent of what was negotiated last year together with Belarus, and Uralkali can sell additional volumes by rail on top of that,” Konstantin Yuminov, a Raiffeisenbank analyst in Moscow, said by phone.
 Buyers’ Rebate The contract allows the Chinese buyers a $20 rebate toward freight costs, said an official at Sinofert Holdings Ltd, a unit of China’s largest chemicals trader, who can’t be identified under company policy.
 upgraded the French chemicals maker to conviction buy from neutral, citing the possibility of merger and acquisition activity in the industry because of high levels of cash, and the company’s exposure to an economic recovery in Europe.
 Lipschultz played a leading role in the record $48 billion leveraged buyout of the former TXU Corp.
 The buyout was a bet that natural gas prices, which set the price of electricity in Texas, would continue to rise; instead, prices fell as the development of hydraulic fracturing created a surge in US.
 DS Smith, Shell DS Smith Plc gained 34 percent to 3451 pence as Berenberg Bank initiated coverage of the stock with a buy rating.
 13 announcement that it agreed to buy US.
 UBS AG lowered its recommendation on the shares to neutral from buy, saying it sees limited potential for further gains after last year’s rally.
 downgraded the stocks to neutral from overweight, saying investors can find better buying opportunities later.
 “It’s entirely possible that they have trained consumers to just buy Christmas presents at the last second, and weren’t prepared for the logistical issues,” Pachter said.
 Among those tracked by Bloomberg, 36 recommend buying Amazon shares and 11 have hold ratings, while none suggest selling the stock.
 “This is a leading e-commerce company taking huge amounts of share in what is still an incredibly large retail opportunity,” said Chad Bartley, an analyst at Pacific Crest Securities in Portland who has the equivalent of a buy rating.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Renesas Electronics Corp, the Japanese chip supplier to Apple Inc, is talking with unions to cut about 20 percent of its workforce through voluntary buyouts, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 The final number of buyouts may change depending on negotiations, and the company wants to conclude the reductions by March 2016, the person said.
 said owners of its new Genesis sedan will be able to use Google Inc’s Glass for “pre-drive” operations such as remote starts and route planning as automakers add more technology to lure buyers.
 central bank will curtail buying known as quantitative easing to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month.
 The Fed will continue to slow bond-buying in $10 billion increments until it stops altogether late this year as the economy strengthens and unemployment decreases, the median forecast of analysts surveyed by Bloomberg on Dec.
 employers seeing pension costs drop from a $76 billion peak, freeing up cash to spend or return to investors, as the Federal Reserve’s pullback on bond buying boosts interest rates.
 In-car technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers today, eclipsing performance measures such as horsepower, Accenture has said.
 “DRAM prices are going to continue to move higher,” said Van Hees, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 advised buying Thompson Creek Metals Co.
 Thompson Creek surged 19 percent after Bank of America raised its rating on the stock to buy from underperform.
 The stock has four buys, eight holds and four sell ratings from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Consumers have more confidence, they have started to buy more and open their wallets more,” Agnefjaell said today at a press conference at the Kungens Kurva store outside Stockholm.
 Aberdeen Asset Management Plc, Scotland’s largest fund company, agreed to buy Scottish Widows Investment in November for 560 million pounds from parent Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Sysco Corp’s agreement to buy US Foods for $35 billion to bolster its preeminence as a food distributor to restaurants across North America is under review by at least two states in addition to federal regulators.
 He advises buying NII shares.
 utility owner by market value, ended talks to buy a stake in two nuclear reactors under construction in South Carolina after Scana Corp.
 Santee Cooper had been seeking a buyer for as much as 10 percent of the project since 2011.
 The buying and selling of off-plan properties for a quick profit, known as flipping, was seen as a major cause of the crash.
 He maintained a buy rating andfair value of 365 ringgit for its parent DRB.
 IBM is trying to keep up as customers shift from buying their own computer servers to relying on the cloud, where data and applications are delivered online instead of being stored locally.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Dow Chemical Co, facing pressure from activist investor Third Point LLC to break itself in two, tripled a share buyback program to $45 billion and raised its dividend while posting better-than-expected fourth-quarter earnings and sales.
 “Margin expansion was particularly pronounced in performance plastics, but you saw margin expansion pretty much across the board,” Hassan Ahmed, a New York-based analyst at Alembic Global Advisors who recommends buying Dow shares, said today by phone.
 Growth in another 11 countries exceeded 10 percent, including a doubling of demand in the Netherlands that was propelled by buyers seeking to avoid a government surcharge taking effect in January.
 Aging Vehicles Vehicles on European roads have been in use for an average seven to eight years, unusually long for that market, prompting buyers to seek new models, Stephen Odell, head of Ford’s business in the region, said in an interview on Jan.
 Demand may be helped as an “unusually high number” of car leases expire this year, leaving consumers and corporate customers to decide whether to keep the model or buy a new one, Hauser said by phone.
 ElringKlinger AG added 46 percent after Exane BNP Paribas recommended buying the car-parts maker.
 downgraded the airline to neutral from outperform, meaning that investors should no longer buy the shares.
 The government has spent $21 billion in the past two crop years starting October 2011 buying rice from farmers at above-market rates.
 Yue Xiu Group agreed in November to buy a majority stake in Chong Hing Bank Ltd.
 “We think net buying by foreigners will continue in 2014, at about 8 or 9 trillion yen for the year,” said Shingo Kumazawa, a market analyst at Daiwa Securities Group Inc.
 “Supply and demand is a zero-sum game, so when foreigners actively buy, someone has to sell.
 Net Buyers Foreign investors were net buyers in all but one month in 2013, while domestic individuals were net sellers in every month except August, the data show.
 Foreign investors were net buyers every month during 2005, purchasing a net 103 trillion yen in equities for the year, as then-Prime Minister Junichiro Koizumi battled resistance from his own party and won a snap election in pursuit of postal reforms that proponents said would help revitalize the economy.
 Verso, based in Memphis, Tennessee, was in talks to buy NewPage in 2012.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, which formed an industrial real estate company in 2010, agreed to buy warehouses and development land in nine US.
 The Fed said after last month’s meeting that it will taper bond buying to $75 billion a month starting in January from $85 billion.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Bond buyers stung by the first losses in more than a decade can look to pension funds from companies such as Ford Motor Co.
 The plans were more willing to own stocks after the Fed dropped its target interest rate close to zero and pushed down yields to record lows with its bond buying to support the US.
 The selloff pushed up yields on the longest-maturing investment-grade company bonds, which pensions buy to fund future liabilities, by 082 percentage point last year to 533 percent.
 Risk Off As companies close those gaps, more of their plans are buying bonds, which allows them to match liabilities and eliminate the risk of potential deficits.
 Piling In Deutsche Bank AG forecasts that pensions will sell about $150 billion in equities this year to buy corporate bonds due in 10 years or more.
 The central bank will cut buying by $10 billion in each of the next six meetings before ending its stimulus in December at the latest, according to the median forecasts of 42 economists surveyed by Bloomberg on Jan.
 Now that they’re funded, they can buy long-dated bonds” to lock in gains from their equity stakes.
 That could pressure long-term returns” Short-term losses arising from an increase in yields may not deter pension funds as long as they can buy enough bonds to match their obligations as stricter regulations are enforced.
 Insurers are also poised to step up their bond buying as companies seek to offload plans.
 The Menlo Park, California-based company has improved advertisers’ ability to target its more than 1 billion members, according to Ross Sandler, an analyst at Deutsche Bank AG who has a buy rating on the stock.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore will stick to a licensing system that has made it one of the world’s most expensive places to buy a car, limiting vehicle ownership to encourage more people to use public transport.
 Purchasing Power Car buyers in Singapore must pay for excise and registration duties that more than double the vehicle’s market value.
 Rights in the trust can be sold to unidentified buyers at a price equal to the value of the principal invested, according to one investor who cited an offer presented by ICBC and asked to be identified only by his surname Chen.
 Among Shih’s first decisions after returning to the company was to buy a 156 percent stake in the online payments unit of Taipei-based PChome Online Inc, a Taiwanese website and e-commerce provider.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Etihad Airways PJSC, the third-largest Middle Eastern airline, said it’s looking for purchases in the Americas and China to round out its strategy of buying airline stakes that funnel traffic through its Abu Dhabi hub.
 Itau Unibanco Holding SA contributed the most to the gauge’s drop after the lender said it’s buying Corpbanca SA in Chile.
 The lender, Latin America’s biggest by market value, agreed to buy Corpbanca in a deal worth at least $22 billion in cash and stock.
 “We’ve seen a bunch of foreign investors running to buy the stock” Vale said in a regulatory filing on Dec.
 Fishman has been among the most aggressive at pushing price increases and buying back stock to boost return on equity.
 In October, Travelers’ board authorized an additional $5 billion in buybacks.
 jumped 59 percent after announcing a stock buyback and forecasting earnings above analysts’ estimates amid demand for construction equipment.
 “The market is volatile and it just feels like a lot of scared buyers are out there,” Sandy Villere III, a New Orleans-based fund manager at Villere & Co, said in a phone interview.
 is generally healthy” Villere said his firm is considering buying some technology, industry and retailer shares after raising cash to a maximum 15 percent at some of the funds at the end of last year.
 Caterpillar rallied 59 percent to $9129 after saying it will spend $10 billion buying back shares.
 pharmaceuticals company was raised to overweight, an equivalent of buy, from underweight by Morgan Stanley on expectations that cancer drugs will help Merck boost sales.
 said in a note to clients yesterday, reiterating a buy recommendation with a $29 price target.
 If you wanted to bet on a really serious meltdown of the global financial system, I guess buying Berkshire CDS at say 70 basis points running might be a cheap way to do it.
 But, you know, who are you buying it from? If you're expecting the sort of global meltdown that bankrupts Berkshire, your Berkshire CDS starts looking dicey.
 Better to buy gold or farmland or ammunition or Dogecoins1 More likely -- well, notice how close that $58 billion net notional is to Berkshire's $58 billion in derivative liabilities.
 Buying Berkshire CDS is a way to insure that insurance, as it were, though it raises the same "who are you buying it from" issue as a straight bet against Berkshire.
 (More practically, buying CDS is a way for banks to reduce CVA charges for capital purposes on their trades with Berkshire.
 Capital regulation doesn't care as much about the who-are-you-buying-it-from issue) So the CDS notional outstanding serves as a rough proxy for how interconnected Berkshire is with the rest of the financial system.
 “There are lots of interested and competent people when it comes to space around the globe,” Enders said, adding on MBDA, which has three investors, that Airbus won’t exit its minority holding and that, “if anything, we’re a buyer” Enders last month announced 5,800 job cuts resulting from a combination of the space and defense units of the former European Aeronautic, Defence & Space Co.
 21 it was aiming to buy a stake in Avio SpA’s space-propulsion business as part of a breakup of the Italian company by private equity firm Cinven Ltd.
 buy an aircraft-engine arm.
 Airbus would be interested in buying out either of its partners in MBDA should the opportunity arise, the CEO said.
 (DISH), may withdraw its $222 billionoffer to buy the wireless spectrum of Philip Falcone’sLightSquared Inc.
 He said that while LBAC, the Ergenentity offering to buy the spectrum, hasn’t yet withdrawn itsbid, it has the right to do so and is considering the move.
 Myer has clearly shown its hand” He cut his recommendation on both stocks to sell from buy.
 “We are unlikely to see major buy or sell decision before clarity emerges on those issues” Rajan has made the battle against consumer-price increases a priority since taking over the RBI in September.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Sunac China Holdings Ltd, the Chinese developer in which buyout firm Bain Capital LLC has a stake, expects to sell 28 percent more homes this year than in 2013 even as property curbs in major cities are tightened.
 The target was “cautious” as demand from rich buyers for luxury homes in big cities remained resilient amid government curbs, Sun said.
 I’m confident in the purchasing power of Chinese buyers” Shenzhen, Shanghai and Guangzhou raised minimum down payments for second homes to 70 percent last month.
 raised its rating on Ctrip to overweight, equivalent to buy, from neutral yesterday in a note.
 McKesson will buy majority owner Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH’s holding in Celesio for 2350 euros a share, the same price as its previous bid, the San Francisco-based company said yesterday in a statement.
 The deal revives a 4 billion-euro ($54 billion) deal that will boost McKesson profit and give it added clout in buying generic drugs for distribution.
 The remaining investors regularly force the buyer to pay a higher price than the original bid before selling their shares, resulting in a profit for the holdouts.
 24 to buy Haniel’s 5001 percent stake in Celesio for 23 euros a share and began a tender offer for the remaining publicly traded shares.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 A Celesio acquisition will allow McKesson to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 It’s seeking buyers for interests in oil and gas fields, in pipeline, fuel-refining and marketing assets from the US.
 Of the 29 analysts that cover the company, 14 recommend buying the shares, 14 have hold ratings and three advise selling the stock.
 Give or take1 You can buy a company and lever it more than 6 times, but not with (any) bank debt.
 One thing I did was build a very toy model of how much leverage is "allowed" in the typical buyout.
 If you buy a company and put no debt on it, then you finance it 100 percent with equity, tautologically enough.
 If you buy a company with 50 percent equity and 50 percent bank loans, then your purchase is financed .
 bank) exceeds 3x Ebitda or where total debt exceeds 4x Ebitda, and which says that "a leverage level after planned asset sales (that is, the amount of debt that must be serviced from operating cash flow) in excess of 6X Total Debt/EBITDA raises concerns for most industries" 2 What is going on here? First of all I assume that our buyout comes at an enterprise value to Ebitda ratio of about 102x, which I get from running Bloomberg MA on (1) all asset sales, company takeovers, going-privates, management buyouts, reverse mergers, tender offers and PE buyouts (the Bloomberg MA categories) (2) where target and acquirer are in the US.
 (Limiting it to just PE buyouts gets you a 967x multiple, so close enough) So, you know, a deal funded with 50 percent debt has 51x debt-to-Ebitda ratio (50 percent of 102x).
 8, is a rights offering to existing shareholders, who can buy one new share for every two they own from Jan.
 defense company won’t revive talks with the United Arab Emirates over the sale of Eurofighter Typhoon combat jets and will instead seek other buyers.
 A series of bids are in with other potential buyers, King said.
 F-16 combat jets should now be booked after the buyer agreed on terms with the Pentagon, which is overseeing foreign military sales deals.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Forest Laboratories Inc, maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda, will buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion, adding treatments for gastrointestinal ailments and cystic fibrosis.
 The deal “helps diversify Forest while advancing our strategy to create blockbuster therapeutic areas” TPG Investment TPG in November 2007 led a $13 billion leveraged buyout of Aptalis, then known as Axcan Pharma Inc, investing $335 million of equity, according to a filing.
 Interest-rates trading involves buying and selling products including US.
 have been among the most active of the non-bank firms buying the rights.
 Kloeckner & Co SE increased 37 percent to 1113 euros, its highest price since March, as Hauck & Aufhaeuser recommended investors buy shares in the steel trader.
 Of 12 analysts tracked by Bloomberg, 11 have buy recommendations on Even shares and one has a hold recommendation.
 advised buying shares of the maker of industrial-machinery equipment.
 That should start buying back gradually” Yesterday’s slump pushed the Nikkei Stock Average Volatility Index up 21 percent, the biggest jump in eight months.
 The interest rates on commonwealth debt may attract buyers, he said.
 While the commonwealth may place a sales tax-secured bond issue through the Puerto Rico Sales Tax Financing Corp, known by the Spanish acronym Cofina, “current market conditions for Puerto Rico debt issuances will require relatively high yields and a limited pool of specialized buyers,” Hitchcock said.
 Morgan Stanley has approached hedge funds and buyers of distressed debt to assess interest in a possible taxable Puerto Rico bond sale, according to three people with knowledge of the matter who requested anonymity because the conversations are private.
 It’s difficult to justify that it’s time to go out and buy emerging markets at the moment” Record Lows More than $940 billion has been erased from the value of emerging-market equities since the Fed signaled in May that it could start scaling back bond purchases that boosted demand for higher-yielding assets.
 Argentines will be able to buy dollars for savings in line with their income more than two years after first installing restrictions on foreign-currency purchases, he said today in Buenos Aires.
 28-29 and will probably cut another $10 billion from their monthly bond-buying program, according to the median forecast of economists surveyed by Bloomberg this month.
 agreed to buy majority owner Franz Haniel & Cie’s entire holding in the European company for 2350 euros a share.
 Rather than build their own 3-D printers, the companies would have a better shot of capturing that growth by buying Stratasys, BB&T Corp.
 Stratasys “would be an appealing little nugget to sort of fast-forward that process” While Stratasys would be a pricey purchase for a buyer with its stock near a record, the company is valued at a 33 percent discount to rival 3D Systems Corp, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Hewlett-Packard and Seiko Epson may decide it makes more sense to buy their way into the industry via a Stratasys takeover, said Lewis of BB&T.
 Michael Thacker, a spokesman for Palo Alto, California-based Hewlett-Packard, and Alastair Bourne, a representative for Nagano, Japan-based Seiko Epson, declined to comment when asked whether their companies would be interested in buying Stratasys.
 That still wouldn’t be as expensive for a buyer as 3D Systems.
 The company’s valuation still may give buyers pause, according to John Bichelmeyer, a money manager at Shawnee Mission, Kansas-based Kornitzer Capital Management Inc.
 That may not stop buyers eager to harness the company’s growth from making bids, he said.
 Capital Stage, Germany’s biggest solar-plant operator according to its website, would buy some of Prokon’s wind farms if they were available, he said.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- The Bank of Israel isn’t indifferent to developments in the exchange rate and is buying foreign currency to moderate the shekel’s appreciation, Bank of Israel Governor Karnit Flug said today.
 And today’s valuation gives it almost infinite opportunity” No Handle There are now at least 11 brokerages that advise selling Twitter shares, compared with six firms that rate it the equivalent of a buy.
 EmCare was owned by Canadian buyout firm Onex Corp.
 “It’s certainly enabled more people to buy new houses” Home values in the UK.
 Prime Minister David Cameron’s coalition government introduced a second phase of Help-to-Buy in October, enabling buyers with a down payment of as little as 5 percent to purchase a home valued as high as 600,000 pounds.
 The company had sales agreements with buyers for homes valued at 908 million pounds at the end of December, 41 percent more than a year earlier.
 Demand for Persimmon’s part-exchange program, where the builder acquires a buyer’s home as part of the deal, has continued to rise, Fairburn said.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Liquefied natural gas prices in Northeast Asia dropped as buyers in the region reduced demand for February cargoes to focus on March shipments, according to Energy Intelligence Group.
 Buyers from Japan, India and Thailand are looking to buy as many as 11 cargoes for January to April delivery, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Intensive gas users in the south of France have to buy part of their gas on the spot market and “the price spread has catastrophic consequences on industrial sites” in the region, said Daniel Marini, director of economic and international affairs at French chemical makers federation UIC.
 Investor Faith “Charlie’s whole philosophy is to keep his options open,” said Ryvicker, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Dish shares.
 Trading in the options gives the right to buy the underlying shares and profit when the stock rises.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- American consumers in 2013 were more upbeat than at any time in the previous six years as views on the economy, finances and the buying climate improved.
 Buying Climate All three components of the comfort index cooled last week, led by a drop in buying climate, which fell to minus 332 from a seven-month high of minus 318 as fewer people said now is a good time to make purchases.
 Between early November and Christmas, the buying climate rating rose 88 points and it’s 47 points higher than the average for the year.
 Consumers are also buying more cars.
 economy, personal finances and buying climate.
 “You do not need more QE to get people hired,” he said, referring to the Federal Reserve’s unprecedented program of buying assets.
 6 that industry and private-equity buyers might be among suitors for a minority stake in Alstom Transport, which makes trains, subway cars, trams and signaling systems.
 special committee on the largest technology leveraged buyout, Elan Corp.
 Deals Debevoise, Ropes & Gray on $29 Billion Deal for Aptalis Debevoise & Plimpton LLP and Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP were legal counsel to Forest Laboratories Inc, maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda, which agreed to buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion, adding treatments for gastrointestinal ailments and cystic fibrosis.
 Richardson GMP agreed in September to buy Macquarie Private Wealth Canada for C$132 million to expand its wealth-management partnership.
 The buyout funds would post a partly realized gain of at least 133 percent on their $1 billion equity investment, IPO filings show, based on the IPO price of $24.
 said it will buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion to add treatments for gastrointestinal ailments and cystic fibrosis.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP plans to buy about 100 million euros ($1362 million) of Dublin office space as Ireland recovers from Western Europe’s worst property crash, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 is the top bidder to buy the 9,000-square-meter (96,500-square-foot) Grand Mill Quay property in the Irish capital for as much as 60 million euros from the agency, one of the people said.
 Amid signs of a recovery, Ireland is becoming a magnet for international buyers.
 Google, based in Mountain View, California, already leases workspace at Grand Mill Quay, The company, which employs 2,500 people in Ireland, spent 227 million euros buying three other buildings on Dublin’s Barrow Street in 2011, it said in October 2012.
 The central bank said it would liquidate the company three months later after attempts to find a buyer failed, sparking what was then the largest Latin American default on dollar bonds in more than 10 years.
 A presidential decree would be required authorizing the swap and approving any purchase by an international company, should such a buyer emerge.
 29 to consider the next step in their strategy of gradually reducing the pace of the bond buying.
 The companies plan two capital increases of 370 million euros ($507 million) each, and CSAV will also seek to raise another $200 million to buy new ships.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Retail sales rose in December as frigid temperatures prodded Americans to buy discounted winter clothing and shop online for the holidays, capping what may have been the strongest quarter for consumer spending in three years.
 As consumers buy more, their confidence buoyed by lower unemployment and higher home values, they are turning to retailers such as Amazoncom Inc.
 A tie-up may provide ICL with a new source of potash nearer to buyers in India and China just as a government-appointed panel is leading a review of Israel’s natural-resources royalties and taxes.
 job creation bolstered speculation that the Federal Reserve won’t rush to slow its bond-buying program.
 Glencore Xstrata Plc dragged a gauge of mining companies higher as metal prices rose and Barclays Plc recommended buying the shares.
 Tullow Oil Plc jumped 76 percent as people familiar with the matter said that Norway’s Statoil ASA has studied buying the oil-and-gas explorer.
 18 that it would reduce the pace of bond buying amid faster-than-estimated economic growth.
 Bank of America raised its recommendation on shares of the engineering company to buy from neutral.
 Bancorp, the biggest bank in the Midwestern US, agreed to buy the Chicago branches of Citizens Financial Group Inc, according to a person with direct knowledge of the transaction.
 Bancorp was in talks with Citizens, the local subsidiary of Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc, about buying 100 branches.
 Ropes & Gray and Kirkland Provide Legal Counsel for Bob’s Deal Bain Capital LLC, the private-equity firm that oversees more than $70 billion in assets, agreed to buy furniture and bedding retailer Bob’s Discount Furniture Inc.
 The companies expect the buyout to be completed in the first quarter of 2014.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 “As long as there is a sizable rate hike tonight, more short covering in the lira should be expected,” he said, referring to traders buying the currency to exit bets the lira will fall.
 1 deal to buy the final stake from a union health-care trust, Elkann played an active role, keeping an open line with the hard-driving CEO from his office on the fourth floor of Fiat’s Lingotto headquarters.
 Sales more than tripled to 84 billion euros, thanks largely to buying a majority of Chrysler.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm run by Henry Kravis and George Roberts, agreed to buy a majority stake in Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc.
 KKR in September agreed to buy Mitchell International Inc.
 Chief Executive Officer Charles Li has said he wants to be in China, the biggest buyer of industrial metals, helping to create an “East Wing” for the LME by easing curbs for traders in China and changing contracts to attract Asian clients.
 and an affiliate of Primavera Capital Ltd, which together own 76 percent of Shanda Games, sent a nonbinding proposal to buy the company for $345 an ordinary share or $690 per American depositary share, Shanda Games said today in a statement.
 The board is reviewing the proposal and will form a special committee of independent directors to evaluate and negotiate the bid as well as consider “other strategic options” The proposed buyout would be financed with equity capital and third-party debt, Shanghai-based Shanda Games said.
 And it stopped violently” Demand for bullion as a preserver of wealth collapsed as the global economy showed signs of improving and central bank stimulus, led by the Federal Reserve, failed to ignite the runaway inflation that billionaire hedge fund manager John Paulson and other gold buyers anticipated.
 The rally accelerated after the Fed dropped interest rates close to zero in 2008 and began its unprecedented bond buying, which flooded the US.
 In April, the Bank of Japan started buying 75 trillion yen ($786 billion) of bonds a month to fuel lending and spending in the world’s third-biggest economy.
 The bill would cut funding for buying and developing new and upgraded weapons systems and defense technologies, though it would reverse benefit cuts for disabled veterans under the December budget deal.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- GPT Group shares jumped by the most in more than three months after its unlisted funds agreed to buy A$12 billion ($11 billion) of buildings should Dexus Property Group win control of a trust managed by Commonwealth Bank of Australia.
 “And it means GPT is then in a position to recommence a buyback, which is far more accretive to shareholders” Dexus Edge Yesterday’s deal gives the takeover proposal by Dexus and the Canadian fund a further edge over GPT’s, after CPA’s board and Commonwealth Bank both backed their bid last month.
 The Santa Clara, California-based maker of computer-chip equipment plans to buy a Japanese company this year and incorporate in the Netherlands.
 9, will be dedicated to the international impact of bond buying by the Fed.
 As the Fed moves toward the exit, Yellen will have to communicate how to end bond buying and raise the main interest rate from near zero without disrupting financial markets.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Japan, the world’s largest buyer of liquefied natural gas, received a spot cargo from Nigeria, ship-tracking data show.
 Tepco, as the company is known, is seeking to buy two spot cargoes each for February and March, two people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Emaar Properties PJSC, the developer of the world’s tallest skyscraper, jumped the most in more than four months after EFG-Hermes Holding SAE raised the stock to buy from neutral and boosted its price estimate by 68 percent.
 AB InBev, the world’s biggest beermaker, is buying back a business it sold to KKR in 2009 for $18 billion when it sought to cut debt following InBev NV’s $52 billion takeover of Anheuser-Busch Cos.
 agreed to buy bourbon maker Beam Inc.
 Baird & Co, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Cisco stock.
 Seattle-based Russell Investments Group, which buys and sells currencies for its own funds and other institutional investors, is advising its clients to avoid the fix where possible, according to Michael DuCharme, head of foreign-exchange strategy.
 Steger at MN Services, which trades about 200 billion euros of currency a year, said his firm no longer was using benchmarks when buying and selling securities.
 Conduct Code Unlike sales of stocks and bonds, which are regulated by government agencies, spot foreign exchange -- the buying and selling for immediate delivery as opposed to some future date -- isn’t considered an investment product and isn’t subject to specific rules.
 “But more quarters where they’re perceived to not be doing as well as either they’re expected or versus peers, the pressure builds” Fewer than 30 percent of analysts covering Goldman Sachs recommended buying the stock in each of the past two months, the lowest figure in a decade, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Yarbrough said the effects of the breach won’t last long term and recommends buying the shares.
 The companies hope to be in a position to drill a year after Paris-based Total exercises its option to buy the stake, Mark Abbott, managing director of Egdon, said in a telephone interview.
 by blazing a short-cut through the Amazon forest to link soybean farms in the interior to the Panama Canal and on to Asian buyers.
 Vanguarda Agro SA, Brazil’s second-biggest publicly traded soybeans and grain producer, is investing as much as 600 million reais to buy 100,000 hectares (247,100 acres) of farmland in Mato Grosso and the northern state of Para because of the the outlook for improved infrastructure, Vanguarda Chief Executive Officer Arlindo Moura said in a Nov.
 by another $500 million, bringing his total holdings in the iPhone maker to about $36 billion as he reiterated calls for a bigger stock buyback.
 Icahn, who became a billionaire by buying stakes in companies and then publicly pushing management and directors for changes to boost the stock, has been pressuring Apple since to return more cash to shareholders.
 $100 Billion Prior to Icahn’s involvement, Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook announced a plan for a total of $100 billion in dividends and buybacks.
 “We believe that by choosing not to increase the size of the repurchase program, the directors are actually performing a great disservice to the owners, especially smaller shareholders who may not be in a position to buy more stock themselves,” Icahn said in yesterday’s letter.
 The extra yield note buyers demand to own older, smaller junk bonds that trade infrequently has shrunk to an average 025 percentage point this month from more than 1 percentage point a year ago, according to Barclays Plc data.
 With Federal Reserve monetary policies suppressing interest-rate benchmarks for a sixth year, credit buyers are showing more concern that they’ll miss out on a continued rally than get stuck with debt that lost 26 percent during the market seizure in 2008.
 “Now we’re hearing more about people seeking out illiquid bonds” Fragile Market Such debt tends to be more vulnerable to price swings when market sentiment deteriorates, because there are fewer buyers to bid on it when investor withdrawals force money managers to sell.
 Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher, a former managing partner of a fund that bought distressed debt, said in a speech last week that he’d “have to hire Sherlock Holmes to find a single distressed company priced attractively enough to buy” Five years after the Fed started holding benchmark rates at about zero and pumping more than $3 trillion into the financial system to ignite growth, Fisher warned in the Jan.
 Credit swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 “Now Canada buys more iPhones than it sells BlackBerries,” James Kwok, the London-based head of currency management at Amundi Asset Management, which oversees the equivalent of $1 trillion, said in a Jan.
 24 to exercise options to buy Westgate Tower, a 20-story office building that’s under construction in the western part of the island, according to a statement to the Singapore stock exchange.
 The French state may also buy sharesin both sales, Peugeot said.
 “The cash inflow would reduce leverage and could buy thecompany some time,” Emmanuel Bulle, a Fitch Ratings senioranalyst, said in a statement today.
 Existing shareholders would be given theright to buy shares at the price that Dongfeng and France pay intheir reserved capital increase.
 Diavik Mine Gannicott also had expressed interest in buying Rio Tinto’s share of the Diavik mine after the world’s second-largest mining company said in March 2012 it was considering a sale.
 Chief Executive Officer Masayoshi Son is exploring a deal for Sprint to buy the majority of T-Mobile US Inc.
 “When you buy an Alfa Romeo, you make a strong statement.
 Suntory, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker, agreed to buy Beam for $16 billion including debt to create the world’s No.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Invesco Ltd, which has more than $767 billion under management, agreed to buy a 26-story office tower in San Francisco as the city retains its ranking as one of the most desirable global investment markets.
 San Francisco ranked third, behind London and New York, among the most-favored global office markets for overseas buyers, according to a survey by the Association of Foreign Investors in Real Estate.
 He rates the stock, which has risen 11 percent over the past year, a buy.
 “Demand and the purchasing power of buyers in Shanghai are still strong” Developers are competing for land in cities defined as first tier by the government as new-home prices jump.
 Prices in Shanghai jumped by 18 percent in December from a year earlier as local property curbs failed to deter buyers.
 Monster’s growth would be costly to buy, and any suitor would have to weigh the risk of betting on energy drinks at a time when health concerns about caffeine-rich products have spurred a US.
 “Certainly any buyer that wants to get into this category has to look at the regulatory environment and see that there are a lot more alarm bells going off about energy drinks.
 Those two things need to be weighed” Still, “a transaction like this would give a buyer a huge, huge base in the energy drink category,” he said.
 Takeover Price “Strategically, and from an attractiveness point of view, it certainly makes sense for Coca-Cola to be buying Monster,” Amit Sharma, a New York-based analyst at Bank of Montreal, said in a phone interview.
 Food and Drug Administration’s investigation into caffeine-rich products after reports of deaths will make buyers hesitant to pull the trigger, Mullarkey of Morningstar said.
 Coca-Cola may not be the only logical buyer.
 How Desperate? “If they haven’t bought it by now, who’s going to be buying it?” Terpolilli said in a phone interview.
 economy is on “solid footing” and that he would support continued cuts to the central bank’s bond buying program.
 offered to buy the company for about $13250 a share.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- The Bombay Bullion Association, a traders’ group, plans to buy a stake in the Multi Commodity Exchange of India Ltd.
 The association plans to buy 5 percent of MCX via a consortium led by the Universal Commodity Exchange Ltd, another Mumbai-based bourse, from Financial Technologies (India) Ltd, Mohit Kamboj, president of the group that represents about 1,000 jewelers and traders, said yesterday.
 Financial Technologies won’t like to comment on reports of Universal Commodity Exchange planning to buy its stake in MCX, the company said in a statement to the stock exchange today.
 New Entry The 28,980-euro CLA compact sedan, which was introduced last year, replaced the C-Class as the main entry-level Mercedes by focusing on aggressive styling to lure buyers from other brands.
 “The C-Class is and will continue to be the brand’s mainstream offering, appealing to the widest possible potential buyer base -- from junior execs to retirees,” said Tim Urquhart, an analyst with IHS Automotive in London.
 “The CLA is positioned more for a younger, image-conscious buyer” and won’t likely steal many customers from the C-Class.
 28-29, last month announced a reduction in its monthly bond-buying program, citing a recovery in the labor market.
 The maker of computer-networking equipment has been targeted by activist hedge fund Elliott Management Corp, run by billionaire Paul Singer, which will seek cost cuts, stock buybacks and other changes, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Investors and entrepreneurs are increasingly choosing initial public offerings over buyouts, with eight companies raising $361 million last year, the most since 2007, according to data from IVC Research Center.
 Other companies have resisted buyers.
 Companies, including commodities exporters, are buying the local currency as they prepare to pay about 430 billion rubles ($126 billion) next week in duties such as the mineral-extraction tax, Vladimir Miklashevsky, a strategist at Danske Bank A/S in Helsinki, said Jan.
 “To buy at these very high prices may not be a good idea; the market can make a quick correction to the downside” Food accounts for 175 percent of the consumer inflation basket.
 Construction Bank, based in Beijing, began an e-commerce platform in November 2012 that allows users to buy products including digital gadgets, cosmetics, books and food in addition to financial services.
 ‘Very Convenient’ Ning, a frequent user of Alibaba’s online retailer Taobao Marketplace, where she buys and sells clothes and makeup while studying finance at Hong Kong Baptist University, transfers her funds from an account at Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd.
 Annes, England, which advices energy buyers including East Midlands Trains Ltd.
 Nuclear Advantage It was also involved in the financial talks surrounding the takeover of struggling PVC producer Kem One SAS by buyout firm OpenGate Capital and Alain de Krassny.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd, the world’s most profitable lender, agreed to buy control of Standard Bank Group Ltd’s markets unit to expand in trading spanning commodities and interest rates to currencies.
 The option becomes available two years after the deal is completed and if ICBC takes up the right, Standard Bank can require the lender to buy the remaining stake.
 China also approved an 80 billion yuan ($132 billion) quota for investors in London to buy onshore assets, Osborne said at that time in a move aimed at bolstering the Asian nation’s efforts to internationalize the renminbi and helping London further its ambition to become Europe’s leading offshore yuan hub.
 Jefferies Group LLC cut its rating on Sina to hold from buy in a note dated Jan.
 Xcel Energy Inc’s Southwestern Public Service agreed to buy 250 megawatts of capacity from the project’s first phase under a 20-year contract.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Mercedes-Benz, the world’s third-largest maker of luxury autos, sliced into second-place Audi’s sales advantage in 2013 as its compact cars won new buyers.
 “It dropped the average age of the buyers of the previous entry-level Mercedes, the C-Class, by 10 years” Daimler rose as much as 08 percent and was trading up 02 percent at 6225 euros as of 11:19 am.
 Chairman Charlie Ergen buy $1 billion of LightSquared Inc.
 “We ask all to comply thoroughly with the stand-still instructions” South Korea is the world’s third-biggest buyer of corn, used in food, livestock feed and biofuel.
 Shareholders claim current and former top executives knew, or should have known, about shoddy accounting practices at Autonomy before buying the company for $103 billion in 2011.
 “The yen’s appreciation has been corrected, while consumers’ sentiment to buy homes and cars recovers,” Executive Vice President Katsuhiko Ota said today at a press conference in Tokyo.
 Shares Climb “This is going in the right direction,” Erich Hauser, a London-based analyst automotive analyst at International Strategy & Investment Group who recommends buying the shares.
 Last March, the company withdrew from discussions to buy a stake in electric-car maker Fisker Automotive Inc.
 French Funding President Francois Hollande said this week that the French state hadn’t been asked yet to buy a holding.
 “China is the single biggest swing factor right now,”said Alex Gauna, an analyst at JMP Securities in San Franciscowho has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 ‘Innovation Engine’ “If you want to do a global launch of a 4G handset thatgoes from no units to tens of millions of units in the firstquarter, no one can do it like Qualcomm,” said McKechnie, whohas the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- GDF Suez SA Chief Executive Officer Gerard Mestrallet said he hadn’t bid to buy Canadian oil and gas producer Talisman Energy Inc.
 China’s Market Indonesia, Vietnam, Pakistan and Bangladesh are among nations that may buy the fuel shipped from China, according to John Vautrain, the owner of Vautrain & Co, an energy consultant in Singapore.
 While China will export more of its lower-quality gasoline as it seeks to reduce pollution, the number of potential buyers is dwindling as other Asian countries also enforce rules aimed at keeping their environment clean, according to Vautrain.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm run by Henry Kravis and George Roberts, is nearing an agreement to buy Sedgwick Claims Management Services Inc.
 The buyout may be announced as soon as Jan.
 KKR in September agreed to buy Mitchell International Inc.
 The New York Post reported earlier today that KKR is close to an agreement to buy Sedgwick.
 surged 10 percent amid speculation investors were buying shares of the Japanese carmaker to cover short positions.
 BHP, which Citigroup raised to buy from neutral, climbed 29 percent to A$3789.
 Among stocks that declined, E-Mart slipped 45 percent to 253,000 won in Seoul after Deutsche Bank lowered its rating to hold from buy.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The two-stage separation agreement sees Tan buying 238 percent of ARMS from the Bakries, making him the largest shareholder with 476 percent.
 We are buyers of dips at these levels” The 10-year yield rose five basis points, or 005 percentage point, to 299 percent at 10:49 am.
 The government also intends to tap another state-owned company, NMDC Ltd, for 25 billion rupees via a special dividend or share buyback, and sell half of its 21 percent stake in Axis Bank Ltd.
 agreed to buy majority-owner Franz Haniel & Cie’s holding in the company.
 OUE agreed to buy the US.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker, agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 Fueled by a strong currency, Japanese companies embarked on an overseas buying spree that peaked with $1135 billion worth of deals announced that year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “Lloyds were swayed by political considerations” NBNK, created in 2010 to acquire bank assets, lost out to Co-Op Bank to buy 632 branches of Lloyds in 2012.
 The lender said in December it would review its governance structure after Paul Flowers, the former chairman of its banking unit, was allegedly caught by the Mail on Sunday newspaper buying illegal drugs.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- PAI Partners SAS, France’s largest private-equity firm, raised 14 billion euros ($19 billion) over 10 months for its sixth buyout fund, according to two people with knowledge of the situation.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 Arment rates the stock as neutral, while Tyerman has a buy recommendation.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 Bombardier also shared preliminary flight-test data with buyers of the plane, he said.
 “This makes it a real project, and that’s great for the city” Fourth-Tallest Time Warner intends buy its space at Hudson Yards.
 While it’s a small segment, some buyers need the capabilities of a pickup but don’t need a big one, Dave Sullivan, an industry analyst with AutoPacific Inc, said.
 The city wanted to buy out the swaps to avoid the risk of a lawsuit and to keep the casino taxes, one of its best sources of revenue, from being threatened by UBS and Bank of America.
 Russian companies have the right to make a mandatory buyout offer if they consolidate a stake of more than 95 percent.
 are learning that spending lots of money to buy patents is the easy part.
 InterDigital Inc, which has pending suits against Samsung and Nokia, tried to find a buyer in 2011 without luck and sold about 1,700 patents to Intel Corp.
 There aren’t many big patent buyers left, either.
 People over the age of 21 began buying marijuana for recreational use Jan.
 drug distributer failed to win enough shareholder support to buy its German rival.
 24 to buy a 5001 percent stake held by family-owned investment firm Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH for 23 euros a share, and began an offer for the rest.
 “McKesson will remain committed to finding a partner to increase purchasing scale and the company’s strong balance sheet positions it well to pursue other strategic options and/or share buybacks,” David Larsen, an analyst with Leerink Partners, wrote in a note to clients.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 An acquisition would have allowed McKesson to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Montreal is in talks to buy F&C Asset Management Plc, manager of the oldest UK.
 “Markets are in more of a correcting-mode than a buying-mode,” Otto Waser, chief investment officer at R&A Research & Asset Management AG in Zurich, said by telephone.
 Bidding for the unit has advanced to three firms, including Blackstone Group LP, and New York-based JPMorgan may pick a buyer within a few weeks, said one of the people, who requested anonymity because the process is private.
 ‘Significant Hit’ Forty lots valued at $900,000 failed to find buyers, Teitelbaum said.
 Across the US, new-home purchases dropped 7 percent in December from the previous month, suggesting that rising prices and mortgage rates discouraged buyers at the end of 2013, Commerce Department figures released yesterday showed.
 Louis, who has a buy rating on the stock, said in a telephone interview.
 new-home market, which is likely to be “sluggish” over the next six months, said Alex Barron, senior research analyst for Housing Research Center in El Paso, Texas, who has a buy rating on the company’s shares.
 Horton, which historically has built houses for first-time homeowners, has been targeting more move-up buyers who can pay higher prices, while using its large size to reduce costs and increase profitability.
 To encourage occupancy for the apartments -- and rebuild Detroit’s hollowed-out population -- Gilbert, along with other downtown companies, created a program that offers subsidies to anyone who wants to rent or buy housing in the area targeted for renewal.
 Ilitch himself will be exempt because he insisted on leasing instead of buying the arena from the city.
 ‘My Frenemy’ When Netanyahu “complained about the number of F-15s the Saudis would be buying or upgrading, I pointedly asked him, ‘When did Saudi Arabia ever attack Israel? How long would those planes continue to work without US.
 Netanyahu “replied acidly, ‘In the Middle East, the enemy of my enemy is my frenemy’” For his part, Saudi Arabia’s King Abdullah wanted to buy from the US.
 agreed to buy a Sulzer AG unit that makes coatings for machinery and airplane engines in a deal valued at 1 billion Swiss francs ($11 billion) to broaden its customer base.
 Kravis, 70, co-founded KKR as a leveraged-buyout firm in 1976 with his cousin George Roberts and their business partner Jerome Kohlberg, who left the company in 1987.
 SEO’s sponsors include buyout firms Carlyle Group LP, TPG Capital and Warburg Pincus LLC, as well as Goldman Sachs Group Inc, JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 6, meaning investors were prohibited from selling unless they held the same quantity of stock and buyers had to pay in cash.
 Airlines typically buy at a discount.
 The airline’s last narrow-body order came in July 2012, when United agreed to buy 150 Boeing Co.
 Recommendation Cut Scott Van Winkle, an analyst at Canaccord Genuity Inc, yesterday cut his recommendation on the stock to hold from buy, saying the Chinese market is large enough to significantly affect Nu Skin’s results and valuation.
 “At some point, we’re going to get to the point where we won’t be able to buy them anymore” Canada and Mexico have successfully challenged earlier versions of the label rule at the Geneva-based WTO, which in 2011 and 2012 said the standard unfairly harms meat sales to the US.
 Some ranchers see it giving them a buy-American edge, while packers say it drives up the cost of their product handling.
 of Springdale, Arkansas, in October said it stopped buying slaughter-ready Canadian cattle to avoid the expense of sorting by domestic or foreign origin.
 McLaughlin, who was most recently a partner at Hogan Lovells LLP, has experience representing banks and borrowers on the financing of cross-border private equity buyouts, European real estate acquisitions and restructurings.
 Schick, based in Baltimore, recommends buying the shares.
 Attorney Preet Bharara with selling the virtual currency to users of the Silk Road online bazaar, allowing them to buy and sell illegal drugs anonymously.
 Currency Pressure Even with adjustments for previously inflated data, export growth won’t significantly quicken, because a stronger yuan will put pressure on China’s exporters and emerging markets that buy the nation’s goods could be hurt by the US’s tapering of monetary stimulus, Hong Kong-based Lu of Bank of America said in a note today.
 A $10 billion stock buyback and a 51 percent dividend increase were announced on Dec.
 Demand for the ships would be unaffected because importing countries in Africa and South America don’t have enough refineries and would still buy US.
 5 it will buy 15 VLCCs from Maersk Tankers Singapore Pte.
 Ross, the founder of WL Ross & Co, has also raised $100 million to buy ships hauling coal, iron ore and grains, betting that accelerating growth in emerging markets will boost trade.
 Fed policy makers saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s record bond buying program and expressed concern over the potential for “excessive risk-taking in the financial sector,” according to minutes of their last meeting, when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases.
 The minutes released today didn’t describe a set schedule for the pace of asset-purchase reductions, although “a few” officials mentioned the need for a “more deterministic path” The Fed will probably taper asset buying in $10 billion increments over the next seven meetings before ending them in December, according to a Dec.
 We are buyers of dips at these levels” The Bloomberg US.
 rallied 18 percent as it agreed to buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion.
 SAP AG, the world’s biggest enterprise-software company, added 17 percent after UBS AG recommended investors buy the shares.
 The video flashes images of Cadillacs -- from tailfin-era cars to the recent SRX sport-utility vehicle -- as the lyric tells of buying an old Cadillac and smiling like he won the lottery.
 Macklemore, whose real name is Ben Haggerty, is a 30-year-old Seattle musician whose track “Thrift Shop,” about buying second-hand clothes and eschewing commercialism, reached No.
 Macklemore’s song talks about buying his Caddy from a “geezer” “He’s obviously done pretty well this year and he could really get any car that he wants,” Quillen said.
 “There’s definitely a resurgence of the Cadillac brand going on,” he said, noting that he’s seeing young buyers and more people trading BMWs and Lexus cars for ATSs.
 in Taipei to buy the bonds of Brazil, Russia, Turkey, the Philippines and Indonesia this month, he said.
 Diminishing Benefits Fed officials saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond buying program, according to the minutes of the Dec.
 Citi cut its rating on the stock to neutral from buy.
 Vietnam’s government says the economy will expand at the fastest pace since 2011 this year as exports jump and the state buys bad loans from banks.
 Low trading volumes have discouraged some investors from buying Vietnam stocks.
 “We are not helping people to buy flats or homes they cannot afford.
 Purchasers are seeking to buy homes costing about 160,000 pounds, below the national average of 247,000 pounds.
 Around three-quarters of mortgage applications are from outside London and southeast England, and more than 80 percent are from first-time buyers, according to the statement.
 announced a deal to buy Nokia’s mobile-phone unit after it succumbed to competition in smartphones.
 Job Cuts SSAB offered to buy Rautaruukki for 101 billion kronor ($156 billion) to cut costs amid falling steel prices and over capacity.
 Traders on the chats say they were merely matching buyers and sellers ahead of the fix to minimize losses by avoiding trades at a time when prices typically fluctuate the most.
 Following the collapse of a $47 billion buyout by Fairfax Financial Holdings Ltd.
 Tickets from American Airlines Inc, Grupo Aeromexico SAB and Avianca Holdings SA became harder to buy in bolivars late last year as investment banks from Bank of America Corp.
 “An affordable rate would allow us to buy a mid-range car to share with my son,” Mekali said in a Jan.
 However, it has been completely ineffective, as imports and domestic demand have grown nonetheless, often bypassing this ban” A partial removal “will buy the government some sympathy, as Algerians regain access again to credit for their purchases, and could boost somewhat domestic production,” Fabiani said.
 The government will compile a list of goods that consumers can buy using bank loans, Trade Minister Mustapha Benbada told reporters on Dec.
 Previously, investors had to buy and sell futures contracts at the same exchange, a process known as the vertical silo model.
 Yelp is succeeding at getting advertisers to buy their promotions in most US.
 The bank’s $85 billion monthly buying pace slowed to $75 billion this month.
 It’s the usual challenge of getting industrial companies to work together” At the news conference, Hollande said his government is considering buying Watchkeeper surveillance drones, which are built by Thales of France and used by the UK.
 military, while Britain may buy VBCI armored carriers built by France’s Nexter Systems SA.
 CRT initiated coverage of the stock with a buy rating and a $26 price target.
 The bankers’ retreat has opened the door to buyout firms, venture-capital funds, insurers and pension providers.
 The lira has fallen about 19 percent since the Fed first said on May 22 that it would start trimming its $85 billion monthly bond-buying program, the first step of which was agreed to last month.
 They didn’t properly assess the risks and didn’t include precautions in the agreement because they were under political pressure to buy the Austrian lender.
 “They acted in a ‘close your eyes and jump’ fashion, in an effort to buy Hypo Alpe at almost any price” ‘Buyer Regrets’ In the wake of the financial crisis, the deal turned into a disaster, causing the losses at BayernLB until 2009, when the unit was sold to the Austrian government for one euro.
 “M&A has long been pretty much a criminal-law-free zone but we see that this is now changing, especially when the buyer regrets the deal,” said Juergen Wessing, a criminal defense lawyer in Dusseldorf, Germany, who isn’t involved in the case.
 ‘Too Stupid’ Bavarian government officials criticized BayernLB after it lost a bid for another Austrian lender in 2006, and the then-state finance minister said the executives were “too stupid to buy a bank,” according to prosecutors.
 “I see now that the buy was a failed business decision, for which I do bear responsibility,” Kemmer said.
 “But I cannot see that I committed any crime” Prosecutors claim the men committed another crime when they agreed to buy an additional 33 percent stake in Hypo Alpe in November 2007 at the same share price they paid earlier.
 “I think they discounted at a higher rate than they expected,” Philip Terpolilli, an analyst at Longbow Research LLC who downgraded the stock to neutral from buy on Dec.
 who downgraded the stock to neutral from buy, wrote in a note to investors today.
 “While we continue to believe in the story longer term, we are moving to the sidelines until we have greater clarity on the company’s gross margin issues” SodaStream benefits from the so-called razor-blade model of retailing where profits rely on customers repeatedly buying complementary products such as carbonation cannisters and flavors.
 Fiat SpA rallied the most since April 2009 after agreeing to buy the rest of Chrysler Group LLC, enabling the Italian and US.
 Global equities soared by $96 trillion in 2013 as central-bank bond buying helped the US.
 CGG lost 3 percent to 1220 euros as UBS lowered its rating on the stock to neutral from buy and reduced its estimate for 2013 earnings before interest and taxes to $392 million from $504 million.
 F&C Asset Management Plc jumped 61 percent after Bank of Montreal agreed to buy the owner of the UK’s oldest investment fund for 708 million pounds ($12 billion).
 Litigation Ergen Group May Drop LightSquared Bid, Lenders’ Lawyer Says An entity owned by Charlie Ergen, chairman of Dish Network Corp, may withdraw its $222 billion offer to buy the wireless spectrum of Philip Falcone’s LightSquared Inc.
 He said that while LBAC, the Ergen entity offering to buy the spectrum, hasn’t yet withdrawn its bid, it has the right to do so and is considering the move.
 The bank has faced regulatory probes, investor lawsuits and criticism from lawmakers over claims it didn’t warn shareholders about spiraling losses at Merrill before they voted to buy the brokerage in January 2009.
 were among five buyers of 316 mortgage securitizations with a face value of $51 billion at the first auction last month.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Taylor Wimpey Plc, the UK’s second-largest homebuilder by market value, said sales climbed 7 percent last year as buyers took advantage of government programs to boost lending.
 Housing stimulus programs introduced by Prime Minister David Cameron’s coalition government have made it easier for buyers to borrow as the UK’s economic recovery boosts confidence.
 “It’s no longer a recovery led by affluent second-home buyers with high equity, or by government support of first-time buyers; most of our customer target groups are showing growth” More than 2,900 customers used Help-to-Buy to purchase homes from Taylor Wimpey last year, the company said today.
 The company announced a $500 million stock buyback in July.
 It stems from increases in the value of the company’s debt, on the theory it would be more expensive to buy it back.
 as a college student at Harvard University, experienced managers may be better prepared for startups, said Jeff Mariola, 59, who in October started Chicago-based Digital BrandWorks, which acquired an electronic commerce company, wwwbuyhappiercom.
 The retailer expects to return a further 300 million pounds of surplus cash in the year ahead, through either further quarterly special dividends or share buybacks.
 buy a stake in state-owned Dong Energy A/S after resistance to the deal prompted one of the ruling coalition’s three parties to quit.
 Poul Nyrup Rasmussen, a former Social Democrat premier, publicly urged Corydon to scrap the deal, calling Goldman a “shady partner” Goldman is buying the stake through its European merchant banking unit in a company named New Energy Investment Sarl.
 jumped the most in 2 1/2 months in Mumbai trading, after a report that Vodafone Plc was in early talks to buy a majority stake in its unlisted parent from the $100 billion Tata group.
 Vodafone is in discussions to buy out the Tata group’s 5945 percent stake in Tata Teleservices, a deal that would help it overtake Bharti Airtel Ltd.
 NTT Docomo’s stake of about 25 percent gives it first right to buy Tata’s controlling stake, the newspaper reported.
 “They have a lot of cash after last year’s deal with Verizon, but they have to decide if buying the airwaves and a debt-ridden carrier is worthwhile.
 The ABA said it should be narrower, focusing only on equity, and that buying debt a fund sells doesn’t qualify as ownership.
 The rule exempts investing in funds that only buy loans, such as securitizations of mortgages.
 CLOs aren’t excluded because most of them buy a small amount of securities in addition to loans.
 A simple creditor buys a bond, which pays a fixed interest and returns the principal at maturity.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 I wouldn’t like to go and invest in a block which is totally inland and then I have to start buying inland pipelines” Oil Theft Armed attacks mainly in the delta’s swamps and shallow waters reduced Nigeria’s oil output by 29 percent between 2006 and 2009, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Such fees, where a buyer agrees to compensate the seller for not closing a deal, are typically about 35 percent, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Baird & Co, raised his rating on Tesla to outperform, or buy, from neutral after the company gave the delivery figures.
 plans to buy an 18 percent stake in the utility for $15 billion, it said this month, sparking opposition in Denmark.
 Schroders Plc gained 12 percent after Barclays Plc advised investors to buy the stock.
 Schroders gained 12 percent to 2,636 pence after Barclays upgraded the asset-management company to overweight, a rating similar to buy, from underweight, which corresponds to a sell recommendation.
 They proposed buying at least an additional 264 percent plus one share, in an offer that could be extended to all 2371 million outstanding common shares, according to a prospectus published in Valor Economico newspaper on Dec.
 24, when Exame magazine reported the company was looking for a buyer, without saying how it got the information.
 The Bank of Japan, led by Abe’s hand-picked governor Haruhiko Kuroda, has been buying more than 7 trillion yen ($68 billion) of government bonds a month since April to try to end 15 years of deflation.
 “There are no short-term catalysts to justify adding to the name at current levels, and we perceive there is no real rush to buy it due to lack of top-line growth,” Conrads said in a phone interview.
 Barclays is giving advice "on value-boosting transactions -- such as spinoffs, splitoffs and carveouts -- to help deter activists," and working with companies "to pinpoint the factors driving poor performance, such as the company’s balance sheet, operating performance, or corporate structure" Are activists good for companies? Ooh gosh, let's debate that somewhere else3 But if you subscribe to the simple activist-shareholder model, in which activists (1) identify underperforming companies, (2) buy up those companies' (cheap) stock, (3) push the companies to improve, and then (4) reap (a portion of) the rewards of that improvement, what do you think about this development? It seems good, no? If banks are telling companies to make the governance and shareholder-value improvements that activists would have recommended, in order to fend off activists, then that seems like another positive result of shareholder activism.
 The maker of Smirnoff created a joint venture with Combs to buy DeLeon, London-based Diageo said today in a statement, without disclosing the purchase price.
 Schwartz said at the time that Diageo would consider making high-end tequila, buying a small brand that sells at a higher price than Cuervo, or finding a partner.
 He’s spending a combined $5 billion to buy Google Inc’s Motorola mobile-phone business and International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business.
 23, Lenovo agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business for $23 billion, including about $2 billion of cash and the rest coming in shares of Beijing-based Lenovo, the companies said.
 “Lenovo was strong in its home country in PCs, but the IBM buy gave them a global brand and a lot of access.
 In buying Motorola, they are buying a major brand, and a company that has established relationships with carriers” The Motorola deal, which creates the world’s No.
 English Lessons Lenovo’s growth in its home market have been underpinned by Chinese government procurement policies that encourage buying domestic products.
 “Google did not need to buy Motorola,” Greengart said.
 Greeted by higher premiums, less generous coverage and more paperwork, small businesses that offer health coverage to employees are choosing to renew existing plans rather than buy them through President Barack Obama’s program.
 David Allen, the CEO of Flatirons Practice Management, a medical billing company in Boulder, Colorado, said he tried using the state’s health exchange to buy a new policy for his employees and didn’t like what he found.
 said its specialty insurance unit agreed to buy the assets of MyAssist Inc, a personal-assistance and concierge service, from Noel Group.
 The central bank has undertaken three rounds of bond buying since 2008 under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy, swelling its balance sheet to a record $41 trillion.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The discoveries will ease ONGC’s struggle to increase oil and gas production in India from fields more than three decades old and reduce the energy import bill of a nation that buys almost 80 percent of its crude oil needs from overseas.
 “The weakness in new software is more of a cyclical issue that has recovery potential later in 2014 as the next gen console installed base continues to grow” Olson has an overweight rating on the shares, the equivalent of a buy rating.
 Toys “R” Us stands at the brink almost nine years after KKR & Co, Bain Capital LLC and Vornado Realty Trust took it over in a $66 billion 2005 leveraged buyout as competition intensifies from more diversified retailers such as Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 “Its capital structure has always been onerous and highly leveraged because of the legacy debt from the leveraged buyout” Toys “R” Us saw sales fall to $728 billion in the 39 weeks ended Nov.
 Bond Prices The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Cencosud’s bonds due in 2023 instead of US.
 of India, in December increased their holdings in the field by buying out Petroleo Brasileiro SA for $164 billion and pre-empting a third-party bid.
 Buyers Sought Shell, Europe’s largest oil company, is seeking buyers for its interest in the Houston-to-Houma crude oil pipeline in the US, fuel-refining and marketing assets in Australia and Norway, and for oilfields in Nigeria.
 Therefore, the SNB would have to buy a large amount of gold to meet the 20 percent requirement, were the initiative to be accepted, according to Jordan.
 The company agreed last month to buy AZ Electronic Materials SA, a specialty chemicals supplier to the electronics industry, for 16 billion pounds ($26 billion).
 Kim rates the shares a “buy” Franklin rose 03 percent to close at $5278 in New York.
 Client Deposits Franklin attracted $35 billion to its equity products in the quarter and $32 billion to hybrid vehicles that buy a mix of stocks and bonds.
 central bank might begin scaling back its asset-buying program.
 economic recovery increased after the Federal Reserve decided to slow the pace of its bond buying.
 If we had a pullback, this would be an opportunity for us to buy” $96 Trillion Global equities soared by $96 trillion in 2013 as central-bank stimulus helped the US.
 2, after Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent, reached an agreement to buy a 415 percent stake from a United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust.
 raised its rating on the lender of small, unsecured cash loans to buy from neutral.
 The probability of the rand extending its slide to 1150 per dollar this quarter is 51 percent, according to Bloomberg calculations based on prices of options to buy and sell the currency.
 Vodafone’s interest in ONO is seen as a strategic move, since the company already owns a mobile-phone network there, while Liberty Global’s interest would be more financial and such a buyout would depend on whether ONO would boost earnings, said Claire Enders, owner of Enders Analysis in London.
 “If Vodafone wants to buy ONO at any price they can and easily trump Liberty Global because Liberty is sensitive on price” Liberty shares increased 07 percent to $8196 as at 12:26 pm.
 Sweden, France Vodafone is seeking to expand into high-speed Internet and television, while Liberty Global has spent years buying cable companies in eastern Europe, Germany and Scandinavia.
 Liberty Global’s agreement to buy Utrecht-based Ziggo came after the Dutch company rejected an initial takeover, calling it “inadequate” In mid-December Ziggo said those talks had been revived.
 The Dutch company is seeking 37 billion euros of loans to finance its buyout, said a person with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be named because the discussions are confidential.
 Belgian Takeover? With Ziggo out of the way, Malone may also turn his attention to buying up the rest of Ziggo’s neighbor, Belgian cable operator Telenet Group Holding NV, in which Liberty Global already owns 58 percent.
 Separately, Liberty Global agreed to buy back shares worth $1 billion, which will be added to a two-year $35 billion stock repurchase program that’s under way.
 “We expect to see some more jumbo transactions next year and the bank market will support that,” HSBC’s Lipton said last week, adding that outbound buying activity from China will continue to drive growth in acquisition finance.
 Chinese Premier Li Keqiang’s so-called “going-out” strategy of buying foreign assets has encouraged the nation’s companies to expand overseas to help fuel economic growth.
 It will now buy $40 billion of Treasuries and $35 billion of mortgage bonds a month.
 6, buying as much as $15 billion of securities due from February 2036 to November 2043.
 Twenty one out of 23 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg recommend that investors buy the stock.
 Cynthia Meng, an analyst at Jefferies Group LLC, cut Sina to hold from buy in a note dated Jan.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 The retailer last month joined a group of institutional investors to buy 127 European shopping malls in a 2 billion-euro transaction, giving it more control of the sites around its domestic hypermarkets, its largest stores.
 Son “would likely look to convert substantial synergies into market-share gains, enabled by amplifying the innovative business practices” Loeb also disclosed an activist stake today in Dow Chemical Co, where he called for a share buyback and a spinoff of its petrochemicals business.
 The government had said AB InBev’s $201 billion bid to buy all of Modelo would give it too much control over the US.
 “Almost all the big cement producers are buying,” Executive Director Guo Jingbin said in an interview in Hong Kong yesterday.
 “Our direction will lean toward acquisitions in the next few years and we have sufficient funds” With the Chinese government seeking to limit new factories as part of a drive to reduce emissions and improve the environment, Anhui Conch and its rivals have to expand by buying assets.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Invesco Ltd, which has more than $767 billion under management, agreed to buy a 26-story office tower in San Francisco as the city retains its ranking as one of the most desirable global investment markets.
 San Francisco ranked third, behind London and New York, among the most-favored global office markets for overseas buyers, according to a survey by the Association of Foreign Investors in Real Estate.
 The EU opened an in-depth probe into the transaction last month, citing concerns that it may harm retail customers and mobile virtual network operators that buy wholesale services from network owners.
 European Case Joaquin Almunia, the EU’s antitrust chief, has repeatedly said the Brussels-based agency should keep the German deal, describing it is a “European case” He’s also examining Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s plan to buy Telefonica’s Irish unit, which will also merge two of the country’s operators.
 Hutchison won EU approval to buy wireless carrier Orange Austria, and merge it with its local unit, more than a year ago after it agreed to divest radio spectrum and offer network access to new rivals.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Wall Street may sell more than $20 billion a year of bonds backed by rental homes as investors become comfortable buying securities tied to loans to small landlords, according to Ryan Stark, a director who runs mortgage finance at Deutsche Bank AG.
 One loonie buys 9223 US.
 Amgen agreed to buy Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 X2 Resources, led by former Xstrata Plc Chief Executive Officer Mick Davis, is seeking to raise at least $3 billion from investors before it starts buying mines, people with knowledge of the plan said last week.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- A new rule forcing banks to sell a type of complex debt security created before the financial crisis is having a surprising effect: luring buyers to the market and driving up the prices of those bonds.
 One lender that planned to write down its holdings to almost zero is now seeking as much as 25 cents on the dollar, according to Mike Manning, co-founder of DealVector Inc, which runs an electronic system that connects buyers and sellers of the debt.
 Anchorage, which has been buying the debt since 2010, is considering adding more, one of the people said.
 Credit swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Taubman began PJT Capital LLC last year as part of his role as an individual adviser in Verizon Communication Inc’s $130 billion buyout of partner Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless, the largest US.
 Bart Mosley, co-president of Trident Municipal Research, and Fitterer at Wells Capital Management said Jefferson County’s experience shows investors will buy the debt even as Orr’s proposal would pay some unsecured creditors about 20 cents on the dollar.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 7 to buy the Chicago branches of Charter One Bank owned by RBS Citizens Financial Group.
 The statement means AT&T can’t offer to buy Vodafone or a stake of 30 percent or more in the company for the next six months, according to UK.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- China’s military will stop buying foreign-branded vehicles as part of a campaign to promote frugality and reduce waste, the Xinhua News Agency reported.
 China is pressuring bureaucrats and the military to buy locally branded cars to cut lavish spending of taxpayers’ money.
 is buying policy bank notes, which are relatively safe and offer “decent” yields amid higher corporate risk, Rui Hai Wang, Shanghai-based head of fixed income, said in a Jan.
 Bernanke would raise the possibility that the central bank might scale back its bond-buying program if growth picked up.
 In 2005, Gross suspected a housing bubble had formed and during a yoga session, it occurred to him to send analysts posing as homebuyers into the field to test his theory.
 The decision to buy intermediate-term US.
 In April, Gross said he was buying Treasury Inflation-Protected Securities, or TIPS, a bet that money printing by the world’s central banks would push up consumer prices.
 recommended buying the stocks.
 earlier this month withdrew from an agreement to buy LNG from Woodside’s proposed Browse LNG venture in Australia after delays to the project.
 The Japanese companies, which reached a deal in 2012 to buy a 147 percent stake in Browse for $2 billion, will continue to work with Woodside to jointly sell LNG from the development to the Asian market, the Australian oil producer said when announcing the withdrawal.
 proposed to buy the company for $690 per ADR.
 Forty-six Chinese companies have announced buyout deals to withdraw from US.
 ‘Million Arthur’ Shanda Games, which licenses titles such as Sega Networks’ “Chain Chronicle,” has been expanding into mobile games with titles such as “Million Arthur” In July, Shanda Games agreed to buy two units of its parent company for $8115 million to improve its cost structure.
 The company requested information on Latvia’s telecommunications operator Lattelecom SIA “as we know there will be privatization, it doesn’t mean we will buy it, we’re not even close to this decision, but want to study the opportunity, what the price is, what the company is like,” Shamolin said.
 21 that Sistema was seeking to buy the paper producer, citing the Karelia regional administration’s press office.
 may buy part of the government’s stake in the nation’s biggest refiner for as much as 50 billion rupees ($812 million), helping Finance Minister Palaniappan Chidambaram narrow the budget deficit.
 28-29 and will probably cut another $10 billion from their monthly bond-buying program, according to the median estimate of economists surveyed by Bloomberg this month.
 The bank, which operates in six Midwestern states, announced in October that it would buy Camco Financial Corp.
 and Baidu for China’s 618 million Internet users, half of whom buy goods and services online.
 Wynn, was the buyer of the Francis Bacon triptych that fetched $1424 million last year to become the most expensive artwork at auction, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Acquavella Galleries, through spokeswoman Bettina Prentice, declined to comment on the identity of the buyer, which was first reported by The New York Times.
 At Tesla’s flagship store in a Beijing mall populated by high-end boutiques such as Van Cleef & Arpels and Mulberry, hotelier Kevin Chen says he’s interested in buying the Model S to bump up his green credentials.
 She declined to provide specific figures, saying buyers need to pay a 250,000 yuan deposit to reserve a car.
 As CEO of Strauss, he oversaw a global expansion which included buying coffee makers in Brazil and a prepared-salad company in the US.
 Those deals propelled Strauss to become Israel’s largest food maker and the sixth-biggest buyer of green coffee in the world.
 Until a new concession agreement is reached, Exxon, Shell, BP and Total will buy Murban crude from Adnoc under six-month contracts that will replace some of the oil they would have taken as equity partners, the people said.
 Apple’s App Store is the digital marketplace for buying games, productivity tools, picture-taking and social-networking tools and other software for the iPhone and iPad.
 Credit-default swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Debt Refinancing Caesars, based in Las Vegas, was purchased in a 2008 buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 Whether it buys Revel or not, it needs to restructure by the end of 2015” A purchase of Revel by Caesars might reshape New Jersey’s gambling industry should the company be forced to sell or close an existing property.
 Signs of a sustained economic pickup fueled bets the Fed will continue to reduce bond-buying that has spurred fund flows to emerging markets.
 28-29, downsized its monthly debt-buying program in January by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 Philadelphia Fed President Charles Plosser said the economy is on a “firmer footing” and the decision to lower its bond-buying program was a step in the right direction.
 offered 993 cents on the dollar today to buy the lowest-ranked portion of a deal issued in November at par by Blackstone Group LP’s Invitation Homes, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they aren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Investment firms have spent $20 billion the past two years buying as many as 200,000 homes to lease, according to Jade Rahmani, an analyst with Keefe Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- The largest buyout funds, which fell out of favor after the 2008 financial crisis, have made a comeback after accounting for half of the capital gathered last year, according to London-based data provider Preqin Ltd.
 Mega funds, counted as those with more than $45 billion in assets, raised $85 billion of the $169 billion collected by leveraged buyout funds last year, the data show.
 It is the first time since 2008 that such funds accounted for half of the capital raised by firms to invest in buyouts.
 Apollo said yesterday it raised $184 billion for its buyout fund, making it the largest pool gathered since the financial crisis.
 Carlyle collected $13 billion last year for its sixth buyout fund, and Silver Lake raised $103 billion.
 At its meeting this week, the Fed may add cuts to its monthly $75 billion bond-buying program, according to a Bloomberg News survey.
 “I think it’s more short term, but people are looking at it” Kroton Educacional SA, Brazil’s largest operator of for-profit colleges, is planning to buy Anhanguera Educacional SA for 5 billion reais in an all-stock transaction that would create the world’s biggest education company.
 Ziggo, which fell as much as 67 percent today, is seeking 37 billion euros of loans to finance its buyout, said a person with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be named because the discussions are confidential.
 European cable and fixed-line assets are attracting buyers, with Vodafone Group Plc acquiring Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for more than $10 billion in October -- beating an offer from Liberty Global -- to bolster its fixed-line business in Germany.
 “It’s a disciplined offer by Liberty,” said Marc Hesselink, an analyst at ABN Amro Bank NV, who recommends buying Ziggo.
 Separately, Liberty Global agreed to buy back shares worth $1 billion, which will be added to its two-year $35 billion stock repurchase program already under way.
 Ergen is accused of surreptitiously buying LightSquared debt and blocking attempts to reveal who was behind the purchases.
 He has said he was buying on his own, personal account, and made no “false representations” about the purchases.
 He has called the suit an attempt to derail his offer to buy LightSquared’s assets.
 Slim, AT&T Falcone was never able to find out who was buying, alternately asking if it could be Ergen, Mexican billionaire Carlos Slim or AT&T Inc, Friedman said.
 Rachel Strickland, a lawyer for Ergen, said her client started buying the debt before anyone could have known that LightSquared would file for bankruptcy.
 “He helped him buy his ranch” LightSquared filed for bankruptcy in May 2012, listing assets of $448 billion and debt of $229 billion, after the Federal Communications Commission blocked the company’s service, saying it might interfere with civilian and military global-positioning-system navigation equipment.
 Telkom Chief Executive Officer Sipho Maseko and human resources officials approved the 6 million-rand ($538,000) loan, which was used to buy company stock, Schindehutte said in an interview last week.
 Using the loan to buy company shares would deliver a “huge show of confidence” to the market, he said in an e-mail.
 Disciplinary Hearing Maseko was unable to buy the stock, the CEO said in a separate e-mail on Oct.
 said it asked suspended Chief Financial Officer Jacques Schindehutte to repay a 6 million rand ($555,000) loan used to buy shares because the transaction breached the terms of the Companies Act.
 Telkom, Africa’s biggest fixed-line phone operator, lent Schindehutte the cash in late September so he could buy stock, Chief Executive Officer Sipho Maseko said on Nov.
 Chubb also announced a plan to buy back as much as $15 billion worth of stock.
 buyout firm Apollo Management International LLP.
 Fosun International will buy the stake in the insurer with its own funds, Secretary of State for Finance Manuel Rodrigues told reporters in Lisbon yesterday.
 Fosun International, the investment arm of China’s biggest closely held industrial group, is seeking to diversify its holdings overseas and won the approval in July to buy French resort operator Club Mediterranee SA with Axa Private Equity, which has since been spun off from AXA SA and is now called Ardian.
 In November 2011, refiner China Petrochemical Corp, known as Sinopec Group, agreed to buy 30 percent of the Brazilian unit of Galp Energia SGPS SA, Portugal’s biggest oil company.
 “I suspect that overseas investment, Chinese or otherwise, is certainly pushing prices up, but from a vendor’s perspective, I’m ecstatic” Such buying by locally resident Chinese and those from mainland China is inflating housing bubbles in and around Sydney, where prices in some suburbs have surged as much as 27 percent in the past year.
 Many of the neighborhoods with the biggest price gains “are areas that are popular with Chinese buyers,” said Andrew Wilson, senior economist at real estate data firm Australian Property Monitors.
 Elsewhere in Chatswood, 90 percent of developer Mirvac Group’s ERA high-rise apartment building sold to ethnic Asian buyers, most of them Chinese, according to John Carfi, head of the residential division.
 Billbergia Pty, a closely held developer in Sydney, reported selling as much as 85 percent of its apartment project in the western suburb of Rhodes last year to Chinese buyers, even before beginning construction.
 ‘Material Driver’ “Anecdotally, Chinese buying has been a material driver of new-apartment purchasing activity in the last 12 to 18 months,” Scott Ryall, head of Australia research at CLSA Asia-Pacific Markets in Sydney, wrote in a report in September.
 “This is a significant potential tailwind for Australian property prices” By law, non-resident foreigners can only buy new homes, with exceptions to buy existing properties granted on a case-by-case basis.
 While many Chinese immigrants buying in Australia pay cash, they take out mortgages for second or third properties to take advantage of tax rules, said Ray Chan, managing director of Sydney-based real estate broker Henson Properties, 95 percent of whose clients are from China.
 “I agree to some extent that Chinese buyers are pushing up prices, but it’s good to have a bit of Asian investment to stimulate the market,” Chen said.
 Squeezed Out Some buyers are finding themselves squeezed out.
 In a showroom in the nondescript suburb of Macquarie Park in October, architect Warwick Mann and his father didn’t register for the sale of one- and two-bedroom apartments listed for almost A$1 million and found themselves trying to get attention from agents busily catering to scores of Asian buyers.
 The 378 units all sold in four hours, three-quarters of them to Chinese buyers, according to real estate broker CBRE Group Inc, which marketed the development.
 In Hong Kong, the most unaffordable housing market among 360 cities in a survey released this month by Belleville, Illinois-based urban development consultancy Demographia, home prices have doubled since 2009, driven in part by an influx of wealthy buyers from the mainland.
 In Vancouver, where 15 percent of the population speaks a Chinese dialect as a first language and which is the second-most unaffordable housing market in the survey, ethnic Chinese are the largest group of foreign buyers, according to auction house Sotheby’s.
 Mainland property hunters were the top overseas buyers of residential property in Singapore as of August, government data showed.
 The US, Australia and Canada were the most favored of 15 countries among Chinese home buyers last year, according to a report yesterday from SouFun Holdings Ltd, China’s biggest real estate website owner, which surveyed 15 million members.
 Instant Messaging At Billbergia’s Village Quay apartment complex in Rhodes, the company sold a quarter of its units to buyers directly from the mainland and about 60 percent to Australia-resident Chinese, operations manager John Fitzgerald said.
 Billbergia began using Chinese microblog Weibo and instant messaging application WeChat in 2012 to reach Chinese buyers, both in Australia and on the mainland, rather than rely only on print advertising, Fitzgerald said.
 “Chinese are very hesitant to buy without some form of advice or comfort from someone they know and trust,” Fitzgerald said.
 “These social networking platforms, where we can post about our projects, allow them to talk about them and share the experiences they’ve had with us” Broker McGrath’s China desk received about 250 inquiries from Chinese-speaking potential buyers, about 15 percent of them overseas, from its September start through late December, according to Davey Hong, who runs Chinese sales.
 ‘More Confident’ Opening the Chinese desk has made buyers “feel more confident when dealing with us, as our job is to assist them in understanding the buying process and property information better,” Hong said.
 Mainland buyers seeking newly built investment properties usually travel to Australia in groups, Hong said.
 Those buying for their children are often referred by friends or family living in the area, and those buying more expensive properties, typically more than A$6 million, use buyers’ agents, he said.
 When buying as investments, mainland purchasers prefer new construction with good rental potential, said Grace Yeung, who set up Sydney-based GBE Property Investments as a division of realty marketer Golden Berg Enterprises Pty, in May to match Chinese buyers with Australian sellers.
 Such homes “won’t attract buyers,” she said, because of their feng shui, which translates as “wind and water” and requires harmony in the physical environment according to Chinese beliefs about energy and design.
 Foreign buyers are boosting demand, according to Cameron Kusher, senior research analyst at RP Data.
 “There’s a bit of ego buying,” said Chan of Henson Properties, who helped broker the sale of Altona, an eight-bedroom, waterfront mansion in Point Piper, to an undisclosed buyer from China for A$52 million in March.
 “They buy for name, they buy for prestige, so in a lot of the auctions, a lot of the major sales, they do pay a little bit more” Lifestyle Choice Dominique Corbett, founder of Brisbane-based property agency Corbett & Co, traveled to Shanghai for the annual Top Marques exhibition featuring private planes, vintage cars, and jewelry to exhibit listings in Brisbane and the Gold Coast in Queensland state and introduce China’s wealthy to cities outside Sydney and Melbourne.
 In addition to connecting Chinese buyers to properties, Tu’s offerings range from finding schools to recommending dining and golf facilities to offering a business address for immigrants until they establish themselves.
 “There’s a sense of loss, and the next thing they need is the lifestyle, to feel at home” Surging demand and rising prices are frustrating even some Chinese buyers.
 “I’m buying for investment.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- New home registrations in London last year rose to the highest in at least 26 years as the government supported lending and Asian buyers sought properties in overseas markets.
 Two-thirds of new London homes sold before completion are being purchased by Southeast Asian buyers, according to Land Securities Group Plc, the UK’s largest real estate investment trust.
 The number of new home buyers age 55 or more rose to 259% last year from 208 percent in 2012, it said.
 Riverbed, which is focused on technology for managing data networks and more digestible for a buyer, has a better shot of drawing competing bids than Compuware, which was more of a conglomerate, said MKM Partners LLC.
 Elliott offered to buy San Francisco-based Riverbed last week, two months after revealing a more than 10 percent stake in the company.
 If a strategic buyer could offer good value, it might be a good fit” Riverbed could attract interest from large enterprise software companies such as IBM or network-equipment makers such as Juniper and San Jose, California-based Cisco Systems Inc, according to Hendi Susanto, an analyst at Gabelli.
 In a statement today, Elliott said it had amassed a 62 percent stake in Juniper and will seek cost cuts, stock buybacks and other changes at the $13 billion company.
 Riverbed may make more sense as a target for private-equity buyers, who would find its free cash flow and the chance to cut costs and boost margins appealing, said Ives of FBR.
 “It kind of screams financial buyer,” Ives said.
 “All of a sudden you cut costs, take the company into the body shop, next thing you know a few years later, it’s a much healthier company with better growth and more efficiency” Strategic buyers may hesitate to pursue Riverbed because of its focus on wide-area-network data transferring, an industry which is expanding slower than the cyber-security or cloud-based software areas that have attracted M&A interest recently, Ives said.
 While Susanto of Gabelli estimated Riverbed could be valued at $25 a share in a sale this year, Keith Moore of MKM said competing bids may be closer to about $21 a share for private-equity suitors and about $23 for strategic buyers.
 Compuware “was a conglomeration of all kinds of businesses that needed to be unwound, and it wasn’t a company that was going to be easy to find one buyer for,” Moore said.
 He rates Boeing shares a buy.
 jumped 51 percent after the Xinhua News Agency cited the People’s Liberation Army as saying the military must buy domestic-brand vehicles.
 Muni yields will rise as the Federal Reserve begins curbing its bond buying this month, say Michael Zezas, chief muni strategist at Morgan Stanley and Tom Weyl, director of muni research at Barclays Plc.
 oil and gas engineer, agreed to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG for $32 billion to expand foreign and fuel-product business.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Nomura Holdings Inc, Japan’s top manager of initial public offerings in 2013, expects debut share sales will almost double to 1 trillion yen ($96 billion) this year as buyout funds recoup investments amid a stock rally.
 Japanese stocks are the best performers in the developed world over the past year, giving companies more reason to go public and buyout firms such as Bain Capital LLC and Cerberus Capital Management LP encouragement to choose IPOs to cash in on investments.
 Salling, have the right to buy the remaining 19 percent that Maersk holds in the two units after five years, the company said today.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Lixil Group Corp, the Japanese company that agreed to buy bathroom-fixture makers American Standard Brands and Grohe Group last year, is studying another overseas acquisition to boost revenue from emerging markets.
 Since Fujimori joined the company in June 2011, Lixil has spent $53 billion buying companies in the US.
 Fujimori said he almost pulled out of early negotiations to buy Grohe after disagreeing on price and will always keep the option of walking away from an acquisition.
 13 it agreed to buy Beam, the maker of Jim Beam and Canadian Club liquor, for $16 billion including debt.
 The government has said other possible buyers for Isagen include Charlotte, North Carolina-based Duke Energy Corp.
 17-18 meeting of its Federal Open Market Committee, which announced plans to start trimming monthly bond buying to $75 billion from $85 billion starting this month.
 After investing in or buying 30 companies in the past four years, UCWeb has at least 1 billion yuan ($165 million) in cash and plans to adjust its target for spending this year as it expands globally, Chief Executive Officer Yu Yongfu said in an interview.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Investors poured $1 billion into funds that buy floating-rate debt in the first full week of the new year, Bank of America Corp.
 Canadian Dollar The S&P 500 also ended the session little changed yesterday as minutes from the Federal Reserve’s December meeting fueled speculation that cuts to the central bank’s bond buying program may be accelerated.
 Officials saw diminishing economic benefits from asset purchases, according to the minutes of the meeting, where the Fed decided to reduce buying by $10 billion starting this month.
 Other teams can sign them by paying the club a transfer fee, effectively buying them out of their contract.
 Utilities have to buy carbon allowances to cover emissions produced by power plants.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Goldcorp Inc, the world’s second-largest miner of the metal, made an unsolicited offer to buy Osisko Mining Corp.
 Goldcorp’s offer is the largest unsolicited or hostile bid for a gold company since Eldorado Gold Corp’s A$329 billion ($299 billion) attempt to buy Andean Resources Ltd.
 ‘Salary Gains’ “Obviously prices are high, abusive, but people buy,” said de Freitas.
 Abercrombie investor Engaged Capital urged the company in December to start searching for a new CEO and consider selling itself to private-equity buyers.
 It’s further support for the notion that Abercrombie is becoming more shareholder friendly” Siegel has a buy rating on the shares.
 The Federal Reserve will probably keep scaling back bond buying at a two-day meeting starting today, according to a Bloomberg survey this month.
 Dental benefits provider Odontoprev SA advanced as Grupo BTG Pactual recommended buying the stock.
 Tallest Skyscraper Dubai’s DFM General Index added 32 percent as Emaar Properties PJSC, the developer of the world’s tallest skyscraper, jumped after EFG-Hermes Holding SAE raised the stock to buy.
 Bankruptcy Judge Shelley Chapman in Manhattan to reject Ergen’s $1 billion claim against the company, saying he wasn’t eligible to buy the debt.
 Around the same time, Falcone and his colleagues were trying to figure out who was behind the fund buying the debt.
 Harbinger and LightSquared claim that rival companies such as Englewood, Colorado-based Dish were barred from buying the debt.
 Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser, who advised Ergen on the purchases, told the court last week that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or its chairman when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 Ergen said he heard from Kiser that Dish wasn’t eligible to buy the debt, removing a possible conflict.
 Dugan reviewed internal e-mails in which Falcone speculated or stated that Ergen was the anonymous buyer.
 In one, Falcone told a reporter Ergen was buying the debt.
 It says that Italy, Australia and Turkey, three of the top international partners buying the aircraft, have 31, 27 and 10 companies, respectively, working on the F-35, according to the report.
 in New York, who rates the shares the equivalent of a buy and owns none, said today in a phone interview.
 Schlumberger, which has 33 buy, five hold and one sell recommendation from analysts, rose 15 percent to $8991 at 10:53 am.
 BASF SE rose 28 percent after UBS AG recommended buying the shares.
 UBS upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, saying “robust” earnings growth will resume.
 Societe Generale cut the retailer’s rating to hold from buy, saying expansion in the Asia-Pacific region might take time to materialize.
 Rizvi Traverse Management LLC and other investors are seeking to buy the stock, which isn’t traded publicly, from employees and early shareholders, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the deal is private.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Allianz SE is struggling to buy properties as competition from sovereign-wealth funds and other insurers drives up prices.
 Norway’s $820 billion fund started buying real estate in 2011 with plans to make it 5 percent of holdings.
 Real estate is “an asset class that insurers are trying to get deeper into, so buyers need to be careful,” Seidl said.
 The insurer made its first Italian investment in June and it’s nearing a deal to buy a 50 percent stake in a shopping center in northern Italy.
 He plans to seek approval from the company’s board this year to buy stock in a listed company in one of the countries that share the euro.
 Abdelnour helped JPMorgan set up a joint-venture securities firm in China, establish a locally-incorporated bank, and buy a stake in a trust and guarantee company.
 Prior to that, he spent 10 years at Bankers Trust where he was a managing director in the Merchant Banking Group, focusing on acquisitions, leveraged buyouts and private equity.
 “Ctrip normally faces competition pressure only on the hotel booking side from Qunar, but Qunar’s surging air-ticket booking volume in this statement is a surprise,” Henry Guo, an analyst at ABR Investment Strategy LLC who has buy ratings for both companies, said by phone yesterday from San Francisco.
 Reserve Bank India Governor Raghuram Rajan warned of a breakdown in global policy coordination after the Fed reduced its bond-buying for a second meeting, weakening emerging-market currencies from the rupee to the Turkish lira.
 Negotiations with potential buyers won’t conclude before the end of June, according to a company slide presentation today.
 The shares, which have 19 buy ratings and nine holds from analysts, have fallen 72 percent this year.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp’s talks to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 6 it was in exclusive talks through the end of the month with Wing Hang’s biggest investors to buy the company, which has a market value of HK$36 billion ($46 billion).
 Deals Weil Advises Providence Equity in Cox Enterprise Stake Purchase Cox Enterprises Inc, the Atlanta-based media holding company, agreed to buy back a 25 percent stake in AutoTrader Group from Providence Equity Partners, restoring its full ownership of the e-commerce business.
 UBS AG’s analyst Peter Gastreich raised his rating the company to buy from neutral.
 Dreamliners and then call new bids to buy planes with more than 250 seats amid a boom in domestic traffic.
 From Singapore to Vietnam, carriers in Southeast Asia are buying new aircraft as about 600 million people -- or the combined population of the US, Germany and Brazil -- fly more.
 Boeing and Airbus Group NV, the world’s two biggest planemakers, both count on Asian airlines to buy more aircraft in the next two decades as economic growth in the region enables more people to take flights.
 The Jakarta-based carrier agreed to buy 230 Boeing 737 planes in 2012 and ordered 234 planes from Airbus in March.
 Nickel Asia’s pay factor -- the amount of metal content paid by buyers and which is correlated to metal recovery -- is 15 percent, while Indonesian companies get as much as 25 percent, he said.
 Philippine producers may seek to renegotiate the pay factor, said Adviento, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Out of 46 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg, 25 rate HSBC a buy, 18 a hold and three a sell.
 A $10 billion stock buyback and a 51 percent dividend increase were announced on Dec.
 shares climbed above the buyout offer from its majority owner Liberty Media Corp, signaling that investors expect the bidder to sweeten its offer.
 ‘Ludicrous’ Offer Consumer advocate Ralph Nader, founder of Public Citizen Inc, said today that Malone’s offer to buy out Sirius at $368 is “ludicrous” and urged activist investor Carl Icahn to “take notice and interest” “I am sure that I along with other shareholders in Sirius XM will be interested in a legal challenge to John Malone’s company for lowballing Sirius XM’s shareholder value,” Nader said in a statement.
 If the Sirius special committee accepts the offer, Liberty also may buy back more shares, Maffei said.
 International Entertainment agreed to buy a 70 percent stake in Sun City Gaming Promotion Co, it said in a statement to the Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Montagu Private Equity LLP is in exclusive talks to buy the Rexam Plc units offering prescription retail products and devices, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 Rexam, the world’s biggest drinks-can maker, said in June it had received interest from potential buyers for the health-care unit, which has more than 3,000 staff and 15 factories on three continents and makes packaging for pharmaceuticals.
 The company sealed the 640 million-euro sale of parts of its water technologies business to New York-based AEA Investors last year and is also seeking a buyer for its baggage and package handling technology business.
 Market Siemens is buying back as much as 4 billion euros of shares as Kaeser seeks to engender investor confidence.
 Colorado residents with a photo identification showing they are at least 21 may buy as much as one ounce of pot in a single transaction, while those from out of state can get a quarter ounce, Postlethwait said.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Oi rallied the most since October 2008 on speculation that the phone company may buy some assets from Tim Participacoes SA.
 The worst start to a year for Thai stocks since at least 1988 spurred Aberdeen Asset Management Plc to buy after valuations fell to the lowest levels in 18 months.
 AmTrust will acquire assets tied to Tower’s commercial insurance operations, the New York-based buyer said in a separate statement today.
 Unlike sales of stocks and bonds, which are regulated by government agencies, spot foreign exchange -- the buying and selling for immediate delivery as opposed to some future date -- isn’t considered an investment product and isn’t subject to specific rules.
 The buyer and financing terms weren’t disclosed.
 also considered buying Elan, people with knowledge of the matter told Bloomberg News in July.
 Laurie Hurley, a spokeswoman for Jazz, didn’t respond to a phone call or e-mail asking whether the company has been approached by buyers.
 More Acquisitions Jazz is more likely to continue buying undervalued assets than to sell itself, according to Gene Mack, a New York-based analyst at Brean Capital LLC.
 For acquirers, the tax benefits alone probably wouldn’t offset the price it would take to buy Jazz, he said.
 It can’t just be for the Irish tax rate” Beyond the favorable tax rate, Jazz’s product portfolio, growth and margins are appealing for buyers, Irina Rivkind, a New York-based analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald, said in an e-mail.
 The country, which imports almost all of its coal requirements, has more than doubled purchases from the US, where a shale boom has encouraging buyers to switch to gas, driving down coal demand.
 Tohoku Electric plans to expand the use of tenders and the spot market for buying coal, according to Enomoto.
 Galeries Lafayette is in advanced talks to buy House of Fraser, the Financial Times reported last month.
 BC Partners agreed to buy the Stockholm-based TV, telephone and broadband operator in July 2011 from US.
 buyout firms Carlyle Group LP and Providence Equity Partners Inc.
 Coupon Credits Qunar’s clients will be able to buy domestic air tickets through Weixin and earn as much as 10 yuan ($165) in coupon credits, according to 86Research.
 Capital’s Hou has a buy rating on Ctrip, saying the recent price drop has already reflected concern profit margin will decline, while the company increases investment in new businesses including hotel and park ticketing.
 8 on speculation that Alibaba may buy a stake.
 The company, whose shares have gained 74 percent this year, has 14 buy, five hold and one sell recommendation from analysts.
 shares to $20 from $17 following the court decision and reiterated its buy rating on the stock, according to a Jan.
 American consumers in 2013 were more upbeat than at any time in the previous six years as views on the economy, finances and the buying climate improved, another report today showed.
 Steptoe has more than 500 lawyers and other professionals in offices in Brussels, London, Los Angeles, Phoenix and Washington  Deals Suntory to Buy Beam in $16 Billion Deal to Gain Maker’s Mark Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP is advising Suntory Holdings Ltd, the closely held Japanese whiskey and beer maker that agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 The AMP Capital unit of Austrlia’s largest life insurer and pension manager owns a stake in Melbourne Airport and in November agreed to buy 11 schools in Victoria state from Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc.
 Loeb’s Third Point LLC pushed for an initial public offering of the entertainment assets last year after buying a stake in Sony.
 “Loan growth and NIM remain constrained and revenue guidance was reduced, so share buybacks and expense management remain key to achieving estimates,” Jason Arnold, an analyst with RBC Capital Markets, said today in a note.
 Total SA also has 20 percent and, like CNPC, has agreed to buy cargoes from the project.
 The French company will ship the LNG to Asia and Europe, while Novatek’s trading arm, Novatek Gas & Power, will buy cargoes to supply Asia, Mikhelson said.
 Manufacturers are pushing into high-performance vehicles that yield bigger margins to capitalize on the willingness of buyers to spend more money on vehicles with a more dynamic image.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Gentium SpA’s board was sued by shareholders seeking to stop Jazz Pharmaceuticals Plc from buying the rare-disease drug developer because they claim the $1 billion deal is “hopelessly flawed” The plaintiffs also sued Jazz, alleging that the tender offer to acquire Gentium for $57 a share was designed to ensure the sale on terms that were “preferential” to Gentium’s board and Jazz.
 Jazz, which is based in Dublin, agreed last month to buy Villa Guardia, Italy-based Gentium in a tender offer that will expire on Jan.
 The dollar bloc got hurt more” The Czech and Hungarian policy makers joined Poland’s central bank chief in dismissing the impact of the Fed reducing the scale of its bond buying.
 Buick sales in China rose 16 percent last year to 809,918 while in the US, where 42 percent of buyers were new to GM, deliveries increased 14 percent to 205,509, Detroit-based GM said today in an e-mailed statement.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Murat Ulker, the Turkish billionaire who controls Godiva chocolates, said he has at least $500 million in cash for acquisitions this year after buying DeMet’s Candy Co.
 Yildiz Holding is seeking to sell a yacht marina at Pendik, near Istanbul, to a local buyer.
 analyst Michael Dudas raised the gold producer’s rating to buy from neutral with a 12-month price target of $38 a share.
 who has a buyrating on CSX, said in a telephone interview.
 Rail Renaissance CSX Chief Executive Officer Michael Ward said on aconference call he expects earnings growth in the first half ofthis year to be “flat to slightly down” John Larkin, an analyst at Stifel Nicolaus & Co, cut hisrating on the stock to hold from buy, citing little potential inreturns over the next year.
 Apparently, it is a service provided by some banks and dealers to big investors who need to sell, or buy, or sell and then buy, a bunch of securities all at once.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Audi AG, the world’s second-biggest maker of luxury cars, reported an 83 percent increase in 2013 sales as the A3 and its sport-utility vehicles attracted buyers.
 “The Asian, Middle Eastern, European and American buyers of protein always want to know what the opportunities are, they don’t want to leave stones unturned” Bega Options Saputo will pay a maximum A$960 cash a share on the condition it gains more than 90 percent of Warrnambool, the Montreal-based company said Dec.
 regulators required that buyers be low-cost carriers in order to expand competition and cheaper fares.
 “If you are a utility who wanted some shale exposure, you could get an expanded utility platform and a very nice shale platform” Extracting Gas Mike Banas, a spokesman for NiSource, said the Merrillville, Indiana-based company doesn’t comment on speculation, when asked whether it’s been approached by buyers or is considering a sale.
 20 after Mergermarket, citing unidentified people, said that Dominion is in “advanced stages” of raising more than $10 billion in debt to buy a publicly traded Midwest utility company.
 For TransCanada or Calgary-based Enbridge, which each have market values exceeding $30 billion, buying NiSource would be a “pretty easy way to get a quick, relevant foothold” in the Utica shale, though the rich valuation could be a hurdle, KeyBanc’s Ridzon said.
 Less Appealing NiSource also has an electric utility, which won’t appeal to buyers as much as its gas business, according to Bill Bunn, a Cincinnati-based money manager at Fort Washington Investment Advisors Inc, which owns NiSource bonds.
 28-29, last month said it would reduce its monthly bond-buying program, citing a recovery in the labor market.
 He didn’t set out to buy the Seahawks, considered by odds makers a slight underdog to the Broncos in the Feb.
 Local politicians approached Allen to buy the team when it threatened to move to California.
 Credit Suisse lowered the health-care company to neutral from outperform, meaning that it no longer recommends buying the stock.
 and SharesPost Inc, which flourished by letting early investors of closely held companies buy and sell shares, wound down their exchanges when Facebook insiders no longer needed the services and companies like Twitter Inc.
 And only accredited investors -- such as large institutions and wealthy individuals -- will be eligible to buy stakes, limiting the pool of potential shareholders.
 In a statement announcing the venture in March, Nasdaq and SharesPost said the new venue “will provide improved access to liquidity for early investors, founders and employees while enabling the efficient buying and selling of private company shares” Nelson Griggs, the senior vice present of Nasdaq’s global client group, said his firm wants to give closely held companies more flexibility.
 buyout firm prepares to sell, according to three people with knowledge of the situation.
 The potential buyers haven’t decided to make an offer for the business, which could fetch about 3 billion pounds ($49 billion), they said.
 While Arle is soliciting bids for Expro, the London-based buyout firm sees an initial public offering as bringing the highest valuation, two of the people said.
 oil and gas engineer, agreed earlier this month to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG for $32 billion to expand foreign and fuel-product business.
 Seriously you could call them right now and be like "lunch at Le Cirque at one, you're buying?" and they'll say "yes I certainly am" Their clients with only a million dollars to invest cannot do this.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Australia’s natural-gas buyers are poised to pay more even as supply more than doubles in the next five years because higher prices in Asia are spurring exports.
 Prices in Australia and Japan, the biggest LNG buyer, are converging once liquefaction and shipping costs of A$5 to A$6 are included, according to the Grattan Institute, a Melbourne-based research group.
 One gas buyer isn’t waiting for the government to act on supply.
 Of the 21 analysts who rate the shares, five recommend buying, 12 say hold, and four say sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 F&C Asset Management Plc jumped to a 5 1/2-year high as analysts predicted that Bank of Montreal’s offer to buy the company may attract a counterbid.
 Bank of Montreal agreed to buy the manager of the oldest UK.
 The question for the institutions is whether the accounting issue would be a problem for them” Land Rights The company will sell American depositary shares and plans to use the proceeds to buy more land rights, build new warehouses, expand its distribution and make acquisitions, according to the filing.
 Formerly known as 360buy Jingdong Inc, the company was renamed JDcom this month, according to its filing.
 BOJ Purchases The central bank has been buying more than 7 trillion yen of government bonds every month since April, keeping the nation’s borrowing costs at the lowest globally． Economy Minister Akira Amari told reporters in Tokyo today the BOJ is steadily conducting its monetary policy and that the Group of 20 nations understand Japan’s easing isn’t targeted at foreign exchange rates.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- The slump in business-jet sales since the 2008 global recession probably will last into 2016 as corporate buyers wait for their businesses to rebound, Rockwell Collins Inc.
 The equities measure declined 18 percent this month as emerging-market currencies tumbled, a Chinese manufacturing gauge contracted and the Federal Reserve slowed its pace of bond buying.
 downgraded the world’s largest distiller to neutral from buy, citing continued challenges to growth in emerging markets.
 Swedbank AB raised its recommendation on the drugmaker to buy from neutral, citing a number of phase-three treatment studies that will help it expand its product offering in the next six to 18 months.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 6 as it reduces its bond buying.
 It will buy $40 billion of Treasuries and $35 billion of mortgage bonds a month.
 6, buying as much as $15 billion of securities due from February 2036 to November 2043.
 “While there is certainly a window of opportunity for significant rain, it’s progressively narrowing” The loss of pastures normally used to feed cattle forced ranchers to buy more feed.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat SpA, the Italian carmaker that’s buying US.
 1 that it secured full control in a $435 billion agreement to buy the remaining 415 percent stake from the US.
 There is less urgency in taking the next step to find a third partner after buying Chrysler “gave us the credentials to be at the table” with the other leading global automakers, Marchionne said.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- German offices, shops, warehouses and hotels valued at 308 billion euros ($42 billion) changed hands in 2013, the most since 2007, as buyers sought to increase returns amid low interest rates and sellers took advantage of rising prices.
 agreed to pay less than $200 million to buy Intel Corp’s Internet-television startup, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 TV Programming Intel, the world’s largest chipmaker, began looking for a buyer for its TV business last year.
 said it is maintaining its buy call for Puncak Niaga for now, though could later lower its fair value from 522 ringgit to 387 ringgit in a worst case scenario if the government pays less than expected for its assets, analyst Kong Heng Siong wrote in a report today.
 Shoppers Biggest The biggest takeovers of 2013 were in retail, led by Loblaw Cos’s July bid to buy Shoppers Drug Mart Corp, Canada’s largest drug-store chain, for $13 billion including debt, the data show.
 “Right now in Canada there are a lot of assets for sale in the energy sector, there are just not a lot of buyers,” Dougal Macdonald, president and managing director at Morgan Stanley Canada Ltd, said in a Dec.
 Some of the logjam will clear up and those assets may finally get sold” The largest energy deal was Fortis Inc’s bid to buy Tucson, Arizona-based power company UNS Energy Corp.
 “Not only have strategic buyers been making acquisitions outside of Canada, but a lot of our pension funds have as well,” RBC’s Buzzi said.
 buyout shops.
 The South Asian country will buy about 95 million metric tons of crude from Iran in the year ending March 2015, RK.
 India plans to buy 11 million tons of Iranian crude this financial year after the European Union eased its sanctions on insuring cargoes following a six-month accord in November between the Persian Gulf state, the US.
 And only accredited investors -- such as largeinstitutions and wealthy individuals -- will be eligible to buystakes, limiting the pool of potential shareholders.
 In a statement announcing the venture in March, Nasdaq andSharesPost said the new venue “will provide improved access toliquidity for early investors, founders and employees whileenabling the efficient buying and selling of private companyshares” ‘Complete Control’ Nelson Griggs, the senior vice present of Nasdaq’s globalclient group, said his firm wants to give closely held companiesmore flexibility.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- China bought a record amount of iron ore, crude oil and coal last year, indicating that demand from the world’s biggest buyer of raw materials remained resilient amid slowing economic growth.
 Selling long-dated S&P 500 puts is perhaps the best-known example, though he'll buy big chunks of bank warrants too if the situation calls for it.
 Fed Outlook Fed officials saw diminishing economic benefits from their bond-buying program, according to the minutes of the Federal Open Market Committee’s Dec.
 central bank said in December it will cut its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $75 billion starting January.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 lowered its recommendation on the technology-outsourcing company to neutral from overweight, similar to buy.
 Pacific Investment Management Co’s Bill Gross, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, said the Fed is on course to end its bond buying this year even with slower job growth.
 When the NSE sought clarification from billionaire Mukesh Ambani’s Reliance Industries regarding a newspaper report that the owner of the world’s largest refining complex was looking to buy a stake owned by Petroliam Nasional Bhd in a $20-billion Venezuela venture, the company said Jan.
 17 to verify a newspaper report that the country’s top mobile-phone carrier was buying a rival operator.
 Taxpayer guarantees allowing people with minimal deposits to buy homes costing as much as 600,000 pounds “cannot make sense,” he said.
 SolarCity installs rooftop solar systems for customers who typically pay little to nothing up front and sign long-term contracts to buy the power.
 Fed Minutes Also today, Fed officials saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond-buying program and voiced concern about risks to financial stability, according to minutes of their last meeting.
 auto sales industrywide increased 76 percent in 2013 to 156 million, even as sales in December fell short of analysts’ estimates after cold weather may have kept some buyers from dealers’ lots.
 A “cocktail of converging factors,” including too much excess reinsurance capital, has fueled a soft buyers’ market with dropping prices, Willis Re, the reinsurance brokerage of Willis Group Holdings Plc, said in an e-mailed report two days ago.
 Investors continued to pour money into equities even as the Fed announced plans to reduce the pace of bond buying, amid a faster-than-estimated expansion of US.
 dollar strengthens to below $125 against the euro and buys 120 yen.
 Mulligan alleged that officers James Nichols and John Miller stopped him as he was walking in the Eagle Rock area of Los Angeles, where he says he had gone to legally buy tetrahydrocannabinol, or THC, the active ingredient of marijuana, for use as a sleep aid.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 More Brazilians are buying smartphones, while providers like Telefonica’s Vivo brand and America Movil SAB’s Claro unit are pushing data services to boost revenue, according to the companies’ financial reports.
 are among logical buyers that may need to offer at least $22 billion to convince Super’s founders to sell, said Malayan Banking Bhd.
 “Super offers any potential buyer solid brands, an integrated ingredients and manufacturing chain, and an extensive marketing reach in Southeast Asia,” Yeo said in an e-mail.
 would probably have to pay more than S$5 a share to buy or take control of Super, said Maybank’s Koh.
 All the possible buyers named by Maybank have a history of targeting assets in Southeast Asia.
 Asahi in 2011 laid out plans to buy assets across Southeast Asia as part of 2015 revenue goals, while Kirin failed in an effort to buy the food and drinks unit of Singapore’s Fraser & Neave Ltd.
 this week agreed to buy Beam Inc, which makes Jim Beam and Maker’s Mark whiskey, for $16 billion.
 Any food and drinks company looking to improve its Southeast Asian distribution -- a difficult and time-consuming task -- could consider buying Super, Andrew Chow, a Singapore-based analyst at UOB, said by phone.
 Super may be more likely to buy assets than be acquired, said Yeo, the DBS analyst.
 New Draw Mercedes said 75 percent of buyers of its new CLA, which starts at $29,900, were new to the brand.
 mortgage rates fell, decreasing borrowing costs for homebuyers as investors weighed whether the economy is strong enough for the Federal Reserve to make more cuts to its stimulus.
 “That does add doubt as to whether the Fed will be removing stimulus as quickly as expected just a few weeks ago” Fed policy makers have said they will gradually reduce the pace of bond buying as the economy strengthens.
 Shell is seeking buyers for its interest in the Houston-to-Houma crude oil pipeline in the US, and may sell fuel-refining and marketing assets in Australia and Norway, and oilfields in Nigeria.
 The fund began buying the debt of Eike Batista’s Brazilian energy company, now called Oleo & Gas Participacoes SA, in the second quarter of 2012.
 That eased political criticism of Obamacare while increasing the chance that those who buy the new exchange plans will be sicker and generate higher medical costs.
 Fed policy makers have said they will gradually reduce the pace of bond buying as the economy strengthens.
 Okuliar, who was a managing director and head of leveraged capital markets at UBS in London, will start at Carlyle next month and work out of New York, the Washington-based buyout firm said today in an e-mailed statement.
 Europe’s cable and broadband assets are in demand as buyers including billionaire John Malone and Vodafone use acquisitions to bolster offerings of combined phone, TV and Internet services.
 Louis who rates Chevron shares a buy, said in a telephone interview.
 Concentrating Attention The latest blowout may refocus attention on safety issues in the Gulf, though, “I don’t think there’s going to be wholesale change” to regulations, said Luke Lemoine, an analyst at Capital One Southcoast in New Orleans, who rates Rowan shares the equivalent of a buy and owns none.
 German buyers accounted for 80 percent of deals, including Deutsche Wohnen AG’s acquisition of rival GSW Immobilien AG’s 60,000 units.
 “This will increase the likelihood that more people will consider buying a property in 2014, therefore supporting housing demand” The mortgage lender said monthly price movements can be “volatile” and reiterated a forecast that home values will increase between 4 percent and 8 percent this year.
 At least $2 billion of the buybacks will occur in 2014, Wilmington, Delaware-based DuPont said today in a statement.
 “With the addition of the buybacks, earnings guidance is in line with consensus,” Roberts, who recommends holding DuPont shares, said in a phone interview today.
 Rental bonds are providing a new source of capital to landlords, after private-equity firms, hedge funds and other investors went on a $20 billion buying spree in the last two years to purchase as many as 200,000 homes to lease, according to Jade Rahmani, a housing analyst with Keefe Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 Increasing Regulation Representative Mark Takano, a California Democrat whose district was hit hard by the foreclosure crisis, said Congress should hold hearings to weigh regulating the new securities, because they’re helping increase the competitive advantage investors have over ordinary home buyers.
 Macquarie analysts wrote that BlackPearl and other energy producers may attract foreign buyers amid a depreciation in the Canadian dollar.
 and JPMorgan Chase & Co, already regularly act as buyers and sellers in the interest-rate swap market and would be willing traders on new platforms.
 Javelin narrowed its plans after swap buyers said the original version would cause too many types of trades to occur on the platforms.
 Talks between Uralkali and a group of Chinese buyers are expected to continue next week, Argus FMB Potash said in a report today.
 It’s only been since 2011 or so that firms who buy up patents to seek royalties, known by the pejorative “troll,” have been going after the users of products made by well-known companies like Google and Adobe, Rao said.
 “I wouldn’t be buying their products if they didn’t step in to protect me” Fighting ‘Trolls’ If a company proves its product doesn’t infringe a patent, then all of its customers are off the hook.
 He has a buy recommendation on the stock with a price estimate of 120 rubles ($358).
 “It has a lot of potential due to its fantastic footprint in Russia, low valuation, and efficient management” Bank of America reiterated its buy recommendation on the stock and a 12-month target price at 146 rubles, analysts led by Olga Veselova in Moscow said in a Jan.
 To make finding coverage easier and control insurance costs, the law set up government-run exchanges in each state where most consumers can buy plans from private companies with the help of tax credits.
 The budget documents indicate that the Navy planned to buy four vessels in 2015, and then two each year in 2016, 2017, and 2018.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Korea Gas Corp, the world’s largest commercial buyer of liquefied natural gas, received a spot cargo from Nigeria, ship-tracking data show.
 It was the world’s largest buyer in 2012 after Japan with imports of 3677 million metric tons, according to the industry-funded International Group of Liquefied Natural Gas Importers.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 “There are all these market sectors where women are almost the only buyers.
 She has a buy recommendation on the stock and expects CTC Love to focus on female viewers 18 to 35 years old.
 SeaWorld, which sold shares to the public following a 2009 buyout by the Blackstone Group LP, said on Jan.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs Group Inc, which was the top underwriter of initial public offerings last year, expects new listings in South Africa to jump for the first time in three years as private-equity buyers sell investments.
 “One of the key themes remains how to buy into Africa and South Africa is the platform.
 South African companies are well-managed and transparent” making them attractive targets for foreign buyers, he said.
 Splitting off the newspapers would give Gannett a stronger stock currency to buy more local TV stations, FBR & Co.
 daily newspapers, including the Tallahassee Democrat and Indianapolis Star, agreed in June to buy Belo for about $15 billion, and assume $715 million in debt, to help reduce its dependence on the shrinking print-news business.
 Maximizing Value Even with the stock gains since buying Belo, Gannett’s enterprise value of $8 billion is just 58 times its projected 2014 earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, Lenta plans to sell shares in London next month, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 “If you are tired of an old wife, you may buy a new one, but let’s see what happens,” Galitskiy said on the call in reference to Lenta.
 gained the most in more than four months as Bank of America Merrill Lynch recommended investors buy the stock after the Dubai-based builder secured a contract.
 “We’re interested in buying projects that are alreadyproducing,” Uribe said.
 and Yunfeng Capital said they will buy a majority stake in the firm.
 “Some funds took the opportunity to accumulate stock they like because the buying is quite selective” China’s economy grew 77 percent in the fourth quarter from a year earlier, slowing from 78 percent the previous quarter while beating an estimate for a 76 percent expansion, data from the National Bureau of Statistics this week showed.
 cut its rating on the stock to hold from buy.
 Alibaba, the owner of China’s biggest e-commerce business, and Yunfeng Capital said they will buy a majority stake in the firm for HK$133 billion to enter the drug-data industry.
 has cut prices for American manufacturers, buyers in Australia are being charged more than twice as much as they paid over the past decade as more of the fuel is exported to Asia, Wood Mackenzie Ltd, an energy research company, said this month.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Marketo Inc, whose technology helps companies create and track online advertising campaigns, may be the next target in the biggest buying spree for Internet-based software makers since 2007.
 agreed to buy Responsys Inc.
 In Demand ExactTarget and Eloqua Inc, an e-marketing technology company that Oracle agreed to buy in 2012, had other potential suitors, according to regulatory filings.
 “Those guys didn’t all get a chance to buy those assets.
 It’s not like they’re going to go away and not buy anything else” Marketo stands out as an appealing target because of its foothold in Internet-based marketing technology as more businesses devote advertising dollars to e-mail, mobile and social-media campaigns, Tillman said.
 Jim Dever, a spokesman for Walldorf, Germany-based SAP, said the company doesn’t comment on speculation when asked whether it would be interested in buying Marketo.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Alcatel-Lucent SA is in talks to sell its enterprise business to potential buyers including Unify GmbH & Co.
 Second-Round Bids The potential buyers are preparing second-round bids, with a decision possible between this month and March, the people said.
 Part of the enterprise business was already sold in 2011, when Permira Advisers LLP agreed to buy the Genesys call-center software unit for $15 billion.
 That will help lower one of the main hurdles to Indian solar investment: the risk cash-strapped state utilities buying the power will default, leaving plants unable to service debt, said Vineet Mittal, managing director of the country’s biggest photovoltaic developer, Welspun Energy Ltd.
 to find alternate buyers if a state-run distribution company defaults.
 “The auction houses have the buyers at the top end of the market.
 The buyer was Roman Abramovich, the Art Newspaper reported.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury 10-year note yields fell to the lowest level in two months as investors sought a haven from emerging-market turmoil even with the Federal Reserve forecast to announce a second reduction in its bond-buying program.
 Guys are buying Treasuries on the back of that” The yield on the benchmark 10-year note fell four basis points, or 004 percentage point, to 271 percent at 1:15 pm.
 The Fed, which buys Treasuries maturing in four to 30 years, said last month it will keep the benchmark rate target at a range of zero to 025 percent as long as the jobless rate remains above 65 percent and inflation is in check.
 Denso in September said it will buy a 50 percent stake in ADASENS Automotive GmbH, an image-recognition technology company.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Dassault Systemes SA, a French developer of 3D design software, agreed to buy US.
 The debt is attracting buyers in search of higher yields amid signs the global economy is on the mend and as returns in investment-grade assets remain subdued.
 People who buy them will use a remote or a USB controller to play a game, said Bill Dickey, a senior manager in the TV division.
 Alaska may sell part of its stake in the project to a number of LNG buyers, allowing it to reduce what it owes for the liquefaction facility, Balash said.
 Japan removed certain rules that had restricted share buybacks by REITs and curbed their mergers and acquisitions after the 2008 global financial crisis, Yeung said.
 The remaining concentrate is shipped to Spain and Asian buyers.
 9 report, initiating coverage as a buy with a target price of 350 ringgit.
 Previously, investors had to buy and sell futures contracts at the same exchange, a process known as the vertical silo model.
 “People are buying things like the Jawbone Up because that’s the only game in town,” Tim Alessi, director of new product development at LG, said in an interview.
 The gauge’s 14-day relative strength index fell to 1991, the lowest level since October 2008 and below the 30 threshold that some traders use as a signal to buy.
 28-29, in December announced a reduction of $10 billion in its monthly bond-buying program to $75 billion, citing a recovery in the labor market.
 He rates Solazyme the equivalent of a buy with a 12-month price target of $14.
 The company has enlisted model Kate Upton and actresses Hannah Simone and Genesis Rodriguez to plug its 3-in-1 ProGlide Styler and issued a “Body Shaving 101” information sheet, which notes that “men often lack guidance when it comes to shaving below the neck” Mecum said “people care more about growing out the upstairs and trimming back the downstairs” Yet he doesn’t plan to buy the product.
 China’s expanding wealth has made the country the world’s largest buyer, surpassing India, as imports reached an all-time high.
 Furnaces that can process more than 450 tons a year were at full capacity from April to June, melting mined metal, scrap jewelry and ingots at 1,000 degrees Celsius (1,832 degrees Fahrenheit) into the higher purities and smaller sizes favored by Asian buyers.
 The central bank in December said it would cut the pace of bond buying to $75 billion a month from $85 billion.
 As debt buying and record-low interest rates from the US.
 The government lifted a ban on bullion trading and opened the Shanghai Gold Exchange in 2002, making buying easier for investors in the most-populous nation.
 3 lost a court battle with the federal government over the mobile-phone carrier’s request for a judicial review of a decision to limit the amount of wireless spectrum the nation’s largest carriers were allowed to buy in an upcoming auction, the Globe and Mail reported.
 The company’s new, more unified portfolio of ad tools will make it easier for companies to buy and manage promotions across Yahoo’s websites, said Senior Vice President Scott Burke, who also spoke onstage.
 Had it gone ahead, the auction rules would have allowed Verizon as a new entrant to buy up to two of four blocks of spectrum in each region, which would have forced the three Canadian incumbents to fight for the remaining two blocks.
 While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 Fed Bank of Boston President Eric Rosengren, the only dissenter against a Fed decision to taper bond-buying, said policy makers should avoid hurting the economy and cut stimulus “only very gradually” Fed View “This recovery has already been too slow, and we do not want premature tightening of monetary policy to delay the return to more normal economic conditions,” Rosengren said in a speech in Hartford, Connecticut.
 As Fed vice chairman, Yellen backed Bernanke’s efforts to steer the economy through its most severe crisis since the 1930s with record-low interest rates and three rounds of bond buying that have swelled Fed assets to $402 trillion.
 It owns the rights to the drug outside of Asia, Pruzanski said, and could seek a partner or buyer.
 Taobao Marketplace, one of the main platforms that link buyers and sellers on Alibaba, will bar from Jan.
 Users can now buy vouchers from resellers recommended by BTC China, which will be credited into their accounts with the exchange for Bitcoin trading, according to the company’s website.
 Loans may increase as much as 15 percent this year if companies start buying and selling more assets, which have declined in value during the commodity slump, Citigroup estimates.
 Goldcorp Inc, the world’s second-largest gold miner, this month bid to buy Osisko Mining Corp.
 Ergen’s lawyers have said the billionaire had the right to buy the debt personally and didn’t want his name to be known because it could have driven up the price.
 Dish Treasurer Jason Kiser, who advised on the debt purchases, testified last week that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or Ergen when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 Kiser said that after lawyers advised him rival companies couldn’t buy the debt, he was acting for Ergen personally.
 “Uncertainty surrounds the outlook for the sector, but with an attractive business model and valuation, combined with a strong management record, we retain our buy rating” on LVMH, said Christopher Walker, an analyst at Nomura International Plc.
 Smaller Brands LVMH is boosting investment in some of its smaller fashion brands and buying stakes in others as it seeks to reposition Vuitton.
 soared the most since its initial public offering after saying it will cut 15 percent of its staff and buy a popular mobile developer for $527 million.
 The company agreed to buy UK-based NaturalMotion Ltd.
 Citigroup raised its rating on the company to buy from neutral as the brokerage turned bullish on the mining sector for the first time in three years.
 Buyout Provision Sherwood in February denied a motion by Ratner, Fales and four other investors to intervene in the case, while allowing them to argue their claim that a provision allowing the buyout of investors who voted against the proposal for $100 was illegal.
 Sherwood later declared the buyout provision legal, a ruling that the dissenters have appealed.
 It had been buying $85 billion of assets each month to December.
 recommended buying the shares.
 recommended buying the shares, which have risen 10 percent in 2014.
 agreed to buy Weyerhaeuser Co’s residential real estate unit in a deal valued at about $27 billion.
 The bond-buying program has swelled the Fed’s balance sheet to more than $4 trillion.
 Aveva Group Plc soared 65 percent 2,261 pence, its largest increase in almost six months, as UBS AG upgraded the stock to buy from neutral, citing better value.
 SAP Upgrade SAP AG gained 17 percent to 6255 euros after UBS raised its rating on the German maker of enterprise-resource-planning software to buy from neutral.
 Twenty-five of 43 analysts recommend buying Deutsche Bank, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Federal Reserve, whose incoming chairman Janet Yellen takes charge this month, said after its latest meeting that it would begin trimming monthly bond buying, known as quantitative easing, by $10 billion to $75 billion in January.
 “We expect another hidden equity injection by Etihad, which could potentially buy Air Berlin’s maintenance unit, again for an excessive price as happened with Air Berlin’s loyalty program,” said Alexandre Daniel, a fixed-income analyst at Berenberg in Hamburg.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- JPMorgan Asset Management has been buying South Korean electronics and auto stocks in recent weeks, saying concern that the won’s strength will erode exports is overblown after valuations fell to eight-year lows.
 “By investing in education you’re actually creating a better business environment, you’re increasing the potential income of consumers who will be able to buy products and services” Agrarian Economy Siemens’ South Africa unit says it spends 1 percent of its annual sales on social welfare initiatives and 95 percent of that goes into education.
 In October, activist Daniel Loeb’s Third Point LLC disclosed a stake in Nokia and predicted the company is likely to pay a special dividend or do a stock buyback after the Microsoft deal.
 The Pretoria-based company gave the CFO a 6 million-rand ($555,000) loan to buy shares in the company while he was being probed for misconduct.
 Lawsky convened the hearings a day after federal prosecutors indicted a prominent figure among Bitcoin entrepreneurs, Charlie Shrem, for alleged money laundering linked to Silk Road, a Bitcoin-driven website allegedly used buying for drugs and other illicit goods.
 This month, Total SA of France agreed to buy a 40 percent stake in the Gainsborough Trough in eastern England in which IGas has a 145 percent holding.
 Credit-default swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Debt Refinancing Caesars, based in Las Vegas, was purchased in a 2008 buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 Whether it buys Revel or not, it needs to restructure by the end of 2015” A purchase of Revel by Caesars might reshape New Jersey’s gambling industry should the company be forced to sell or close an existing property.
 Horton, which historically has built houses for first-time buyers, has been targeting more move-up buyers who can pay higher prices, while using its large size to reduce costs and increase profitability.
 Iron ore climbed 15 percent in the second half of 2013 as China, the world’s biggest buyer, boosted stockpiles to the highest in more than a year.
 “With mills reporting ample inventory cover, nearing 45 days, we expect buying to remain light and some further downside in spot prices” Iron ore for May delivery on the Dalian Commodity Exchange fell 01 percent to close at 879 yuan ($145) a ton.
 middle-market buyout fund stakes, they said.
 Liberty Global attempted to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG, a German cable company, and was outbid by Vodafone Group Plc.
 The Federal Reserve yesterday reduced its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion, citing an improving labor market and faster economic growth.
 Analysts Fred Speirs and Eva Quiroga said that Kering, a French retailer, may not buy out the remaining shares of Puma.
 28-29 and will cut another $10 billion from their $75 billion monthly bond-buying program, according to the median forecast of economists surveyed by Bloomberg this month.
 Those changes stem from increases in the value of the firm’s debt, on the theory that it would be more expensive to buy back the securities.
 The backdrop is a collapse in orders from farmers in India, one of the largest buyers of fertilizer, as the country tries to stave off a fiscal crisis and junk rating by cutting subsidies.
 and Morocco’s OCP Group so it can focus elsewhere, said Guryev, whose billionaire father, also Andrey, began buying fertilizer assets in the late 1990s.
 “We have very flexible production technology and can avoid having to overload markets” with the cheaper mono-ammonium and diammonium phosphate fertilizers India typically buys, he said.
 “Even if you have a good job, it’s very likely you can’t afford to buy a place in the city” Calling income inequality “the defining challenge of our time,” US.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP and Latham & Watkins LLP worked on Carlyle Group LP’s agreement to buy the Ortho Clinical unit of Johnson & Johnson for $415 billion.
 (CHTR) offered to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Africa’s largest economy relies on foreigners buying stocks and bonds to fund the gap.
 “We are talking to prospective buyers for three projects,” Chairman A.
 Before winning elections in September, Solberg said she would try to ease lending standards to help more first-time buyers access to the housing market.
 The company has a growing business in the French West Indies and Caribbean and agreed to buy Orange SA’s Dominican Republic unit in November last year for $14 billion after reaching a deal for fixed-line operator Tricom SA in the country a month earlier.
 India, Asia’s third-largest economy, in 2012 permitted foreign airlines to buy as much as 49 percent stakes in local carriers, reversing a decade-old rule and luring investments from Malaysia’s AirAsia Bhd.
 In November 2000, they teamed up to buy 40 percent in state-run carrier Air India that government was divesting.
 Eight analysts say the stock is a buy, 22 call it a hold and four give it a sell rating, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC, the private-equity firm run by Leon Black, completed raising its next buyout fund at $184 billion, making it the largest pool gathered since the financial crisis.
 The firm, which attracted commitments from investors amid profitable sales, has gathered the industry’s largest buyout fund since 2008, when markets seized up during the global financial crisis.
 Blackstone Group LP previously held that distinction, raising $162 billion for its main buyout fund at the beginning of 2012.
 “On my side of the aisle, Republicans need to resist the temptation to buy the misleading narrative that TPA would simply give away the store to the Obama administration,” Senator Jeff Flake, an Arizona Republican who supports fast track, said during a Dec.
 Why is Carl Icahn turning his attention from small situations where he can amass big, sometimes controlling, stakes and exert his will, to big brand-name companies such as Apple and EBay where he has to win public relations campaigns through nothing more than the force of his arguments and the careful editing of his tweets? (And where one obvious activist tool -- pushing the company to sell itself, or trying to buy it himself -- is pretty unrealistic.
 Nobody's gonna buy Apple, and even EBay, at a $70 billion market cap, would be a lot to swallow) I don't know.
 The Bank of Japan offered to buy 900 billion yen ($86 billion) in government bonds from market today.
 Should bond buying by the Federal Reserve be reduced, it makes sense that its support of the stock market would be taken away, Gundlach said today on a conference call with investors.
 Treasuries could backfire if there’s any economic weakness, and be cautious with funds that have been buying junk bonds and shorting government debt, according to Gundlach.
 Irish Developers Bank of Ireland and IBRC’s predecessor, Anglo Irish Bank Corp, combined to lend more than 200 million euros ($273 million) to a group of Irish developers to buy and refurbish the Shelbourne in 2004, CoStar Finance reported last month.
 Moelis advised on $134 billion in transactions last year, including working with HJ Heinz Co’s board committee on the ketchup maker’s buyout by Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 homebuilder by market value, sold 19 percent more homes in the first half of its fiscal year as buyers took advantage of government programs to boost lending.
 homebuilders are benefiting from programs introduced by Prime Minister David Cameron’s coalition government to make it easier for property buyers to borrow money as the economy recovers from a recession.
 While the Peruvian stock market will probably be volatile until there are more signs of sustained economic growth, Frisancho said he is advising clients that they should start buying stocks now if they can tolerate the price swings.
 “Despite all the volatility in the index, consumer demand and the economy continue growing” Edwin Paz, a trader at Provalor SAB in Lima, said he’s beginning to recommend buying some mining stocks as declining copper and zinc inventories could lead to an increase in prices.
 Rojas said he has been buying shares in machinery company Ferreycorp SAA as a recovery in mining will increase demand for its products and services.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc, the microblogging service that went public last year, agreed to buy 900 patents from International Business Machines Corp.
 “Volkswagen will probably continue to grow more dynamically in China than GM,” said Frank Schwope, a Hanover, Germany-based analyst with NordLB who recommends buying VW shares.
 and some wholesale buying patterns,’ Arfaei said in a note to clients.
 “This makes them a more global company, which is even more interesting for an IPO,” Gerardo Copca, a Metanalisis analyst with a buy recommendation on Alfa, said by telephone.
 Freed from the need to buy Shuanghui’s Campofrio holdings, Sigma would only have to spend about 116 million euros more for the remaining shares after buying a stake of more than 45 percent for about 310 million euros in 2013, Santander analysts led by Luis Miranda said in a Dec.
 “They could use it to buy another company or invest in another project” Bolanos estimated before the Shuanghui agreement that Alfa would raise about 114 billion pesos ($871 million) in a Sigma IPO.
 “The geographic diversification is attractive, and Campofrio is well positioned to benefit from the European recovery,” Julio Cesar Martinez, an analyst at Signum Research with a buy recommendation on Alfa, said by phone from Mexico City.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Adam Bregman, a 28-year-old Florida attorney who lives with his mom, said he hopes 2014 is the year he finally buys a home of his own.
 Following last year’s jump in prices that rivaled gains during the housing boom, Yellen will guide the winding down of the Fed’s bond-buying program that influenced mortgage rates for five years.
 “Mortgage rates will decide when we buy a house and what kind we can get,” said Bregman, who has been living in his childhood home in Boca Raton for two years to save money for a down payment.
 Bernanke, 60, told Congress he was preparing to reduce the bond-buying program.
 Stiff Standards The success of Bregman and other first-time buyers will largely determine the strength of the housing market this year, Swonk said.
 “So far, first-time buyers have been missing from the housing recovery,” Swonk said.
 “They need to come into the market in greater numbers because they have to buy properties before sellers can move up” Home prices probably will rise about 53 percent in 2014, half the pace of 2013, according to the Realtors association.
 14 confirmation hearing that she’ll maintain the bond-buying program until a “strong recovery” convinces her to end it.
 Bregman, the Florida lawyer, is a motivated homebuyer -- he’s planning to get married at the end of May.
 “Just about everyone I know is either living with their parents or living four to an apartment to try to save some money” He plans to live in a rental home for a few months after his marriage and then buy a place in July or August.
 Every time mortgage rates go up, the size of the house the couple can buy shrinks because their financing costs increase.
 Bigger Hurdles Bregman also faces the toughest mortgage standards in more than a decade, which have kept some of his generation from buying their first home, said Chris Low, chief economist of FTN Financial in New York.
 The average credit score for borrowers in early 2013 was about 757 on a scale from 300 to 850, according to mortgage buyer Fannie Mae.
 “This time around, first-time buyers have bigger hurdles to overcome than their parents,” Low said.
 2 Audi’s sales advantage last year as its compact cars won new buyers.
 Google earlier this month said it was spending $32 billion in cash to buy Nest Labs Inc, the digital thermostat maker led by former Apple Inc.
 Google, which had $587 billion in cash at the end of last quarter, said earlier this week it’s buying artificial-intelligence company DeepMind Technologies Ltd.
 Bank of America’s analysts also favor Saudi Arabia’s equities and started covering Jarir Marketing Co, which owns and operates the Jarir Bookstore retail chain, with a buy recommendation.
 While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 He’s accused of misrepresenting the asking price from sellers of residential mortgage-backed securities to buyers and vice versa, keeping the difference for Jefferies, Connecticut US.
 claims Merrill Lynch International didn’t reveal the true nature of a “highly unusual” deal in which the Portuguese company agreed to buy shares in Saipem SpA that were being sold on behalf of BlackRock Inc, according to Amorim’s documents from a London court hearing today.
 Amorim agreed to buy 150,000 Saipem shares on Jan.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Mick Davis, the former chief executive officer of Xstrata Plc, is seeking to raise at least $3 billion from investors before he starts buying mines for his X2 Resources, according to people with knowledge of his plans.
 Cash buyers and a dearth of homes coming on the market are more than making up for a lack of mortgage lending, which has dropped 90 percent since the Celtic Tiger era.
 “Activity in the property market has also been supported by increasing demand from cash buyers” More than half of home buyers are using cash in the absence of mortgages, according to Sherry FitzGerald data for the year through September.
 Paying Cash At the Allsop auction, about half of the bidders paid with cash as they fought to buy about 26 million euros of Irish real estate, mostly from receivers acting for banks, according to Robert Hoban, Allsop’s director of auctions.
 The cash market is finite” The rise of cash buyers in Ireland is a sign that the market has turned, according to Michael Shaoul, chief executive officer of Marketfield Asset Management LLC, which oversees about $19 billion.
 “One of the things that turns markets around is that you get prices down to a low enough level that a different kind of buyer is willing to step in to purchase the asset,” Shaoul said.
 “It’s cash buyers who turned this market around and it’s cash buyers who you’re going to rely on to support the market” Irish REITS Marketfield is one of the biggest investors in Bank of Ireland and Irish real estate investment trusts, Green REIT Plc and Hibernia REIT Plc.
 Others buying Irish property are looking for financing overseas rather than relying on Irish banks.
 The key is to see what their contracted sales trend would be this year” Lee changed her recommendation on the shares from a buy in November.
 The equity measure sank 1 percent yesterday as Fed policy makers said they will cut monthly bond buying by another $10 billion to $65 billion.
 Shares earlier rose as much as 75 percent after the company said yesterday it will spend as much as 125 billion yen buying back as many as 10 million shares.
 “The more clicks it gets, the more revenue it generates,” Boris Vilidnitsky, an analyst at Barclays Plc in London who has the equivalent of a buy rating for Yandex, said by phone yesterday.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, plans to sell shares in London next month, with a possible secondary listing in Moscow, two other people familiar with the matter said.
 Barclays Plc upgraded its rating on the asset manager to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from underweight.
 in San Francisco who has a buy rating on the stock and doesn’t own it.
 “When we cross the 3 percent threshold, that does bring some buyers in.
 Fed Bets The central bank will pare buying by $10 billion in each of its next meetings before ending the program late this year as the economy strengthens and joblessness decreases, according to the median forecast of economists surveyed by Bloomberg Dec.
 “There are a lot of very upset buyers,” he said.
 “Elevators have no interest in buying our grain right now,” McRae said yesterday by telephone.
 “It reiterates our decisiveness to act if needed” Fed Minutes In the US, minutes from the Federal Reserve’s December meeting showed officials saw declining economic gains from its monthly bond-buying program.
 Breaking up Dow would help unlock shareholder value, Hassan Ahmed, a New York-based analyst at Alembic Global Advisors who recommends buying the shares, said in a note today.
 Share Buyback Third Point also urged Dow to consider “a meaningful share buyback” to offset shares that will one day be issued to Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 mortgage rates fell to a two-month low, cutting borrowing costs for homebuyers prior to a Federal Reserve move to further scale back stimulus measures that have helped keep loans inexpensive.
 The Federal Open Market Committee said yesterday it will trim its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses fell 87 percent in December from the previous month as abnormally cold weather in much of the US.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Pantheon, the private-equity firm owned by Affiliated Managers Group Inc, won the bidding for about $500 million in buyout fund stakes that are being sold by the Teachers’ Retirement System of the State of Illinois, said two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Pantheon, based in London, is among a growing number of investors that buy secondary stakes in buyout funds as pension plans such as Illinois Teachers’ seek to cut down on the number of managers they use and their investments in certain strategies.
 “This process, which involves consultation with affected companies and other stakeholders is ongoing and he will make further announcements when appropriate” In 2011, China Investment Corp, the nation’s sovereign wealth fund, agreed to buy 25 percent of Shanduka for 2 billion rand.
 He’ll need to show growth prospects after activist hedge fund Elliott, run by billionaire Paul Singer, said earlier this month that it’s amassed a 62 percent stake in Juniper and is seeking cost cuts and buybacks.
 Activist investors have historically avoided taking stakes in network-equipment companies because of the volatility of their business, so Jana’s appearance alongside Elliott adds pressure on Juniper to return more money to shareholders, said Bill Choi, an analyst with Janney Montgomery Scott in New York, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Elliott said Juniper could cut $200 million in operating costs and buy back $25 billion in stock immediately and an additional $1 billion in 2015.
 Kheradpir declined to comment on Elliott’s proposals and said he expects to announce a plan in the next few weeks that will address costs and buybacks.
 Investor Engaged Capital LLC urged the company in December to start searching for a new CEO and consider selling itself to private-equity buyers.
 “It’s hard to say that anyone is a hero in this environment, but the strong parts of this are on the operational side” Siegel recommends buying the shares.
 NISA, a government program that started this month, lets investors buy as much as 1 million yen of stocks and other securities without paying taxes on dividends and capital gains for five years.
 auto loans unit for $115 billion and agreed at the time that an IPO would be one way for the buyers of the shares to exit their investment.
 “We want to offer them the possibility to buy new products and access their banking information online” The stores already carry a range of goods, such as DVD players, “Angry Birds” plush toys and spicy tamarind candy.
 “If I like it a lot, then I’ll buy it” Blockbuster’s Peak In the US, DVD rentals are increasingly seen as a relic of a bygone era.
 “The completion of this deal will remove the share price overhang on the stock” Kwan has a buy rating on the stock with a target price of HK$2950.
 “Given today’s slump, it seems that there are buyers” at a lower price, he said.
 Vattenfall’s decision to exit via an accelerated bookbuilding “suggests the government’s plans to find a strategic buyer for the company remain on hold, so there is no takeover story on the horizon,” Bram Buring, a Prague-based analyst at Wood & Co, said in a note today.
 Pacific Investment Management Co’s Bill Gross, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, said the Fed is on course to end its bond buying this year even with jobs growth at the slowest pace since January 2011.
 in October said the software provider “is well positioned to record sector leading revenue in an improving demand scenario” and upgraded the company to buy.
 The carrier, which had a near-monopoly in Australia’s non-budget domestic aviation market for a decade after the 2001 collapse of Ansett Holdings Ltd, is struggling to defend its market share as Virgin buys smaller rivals, adds business-class seats and builds airport lounges to compete.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Ziggo NV is reorganizing most of its debt as it seeks to raise 37 billion euros ($51 billion) of loans to help finance its leveraged buyout by John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc.
 Bond Offers Ziggo offered to buy back 750 million euros of 3625 percent bonds due March 2020 at 1015 cents on the euro, according to the filing.
 The company has the right to buy back the senior secured bonds in March at 10306 cents on the euro.
 The Federal Reserve announced after the December meeting that it would begin trimming monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $75 billion this month as the US.
 Citigroup upgraded its rating on the company to buy from neutral.
 Morgan Stanley upgraded the UK’s largest publicly traded water supplier to overweight, a rating similar to buy, from equal weight.
 Some of the VA’s buying was made outside standardized purchasing contracts without required justifications, the Government Accountability Office said earlier this month.
 “Veterans and the government are at an increased risk for problems associated with product efficacy and quality” when the buying takes place outside contracts that follow purchasing regulations, Miller said in an e-mail.
 Legs, Ribs The data obtained by Bloomberg shows a wide range of costs and diversity in the VA buying: $3,555 for eye tissue from Johnson & Johnson, more than $27,000 on leg bones from Medtronic Inc.
 DZ lowered its rating on the insurer to sell from buy, saying its forecast for 2014 operating profit may disappoint because of a lower contribution from its asset-management operations.
 Chief Executive Officer Evan Greenberg, who typically shunned share repurchases as he focused on expansion and buyouts, said the authorization of additional buybacks won’t halt his commitment to growth.
 Ace, the insurer with operations in more than 50 countries, said in November that it would target $15 billion in buybacks through the end of 2014.
 The Zurich-based insurer announced this month it would buy a majority stake in Thailand’s Siam Commercial Samaggi Insurance PCL.
 “If we find opportunities -- which we’re always on the hunt for, organically or through acquisition -- to deploy that capital at a rate of return favorable to shareholders, we will do that as opposed to a buyback,” the CEO said.
 Southwest agreed to purchase slots for 27 daily round trips, while JetBlue will buy rights for 12 round trips and acquire eight pairs now being leased from American, the airlines said today in statements.
 The buyer of slots for five additional round trips hasn’t been disclosed.
 Justice Department’s requirement that buyers be airlines that would expand competition and offer more low fares.
 Louis who recommends buying its shares, said in an interview.
 Michael Linenberg, a Deutsche Bank AG analyst, raised his rating on JetBlue shares late yesterday to buy from hold.
 Market research shows women influence most buying decisions, while men make up the bulk of spectators at the pivotal exhibitions where new vehicles are unveiled and scrutinzed.
 BlackRock, the world’s largest asset manager, joins a growing list of public market investors that are buying stakes in private companies.
 The billionaire has used funds from insurance units including Geico to buy stocks and make acquisitions.
 Gross’s comment, coming a year after he said the real was a better use of cash than buying junk bonds, shows how investors are losing confidence in President Dilma Rousseff as economic growth slows and Brazil lifts its interest rate above 10 percent to contain inflation.
 Largest Investment Senrigan started to buy Sundance shares in 2011 and the company was once one of its largest investments, said a person with knowledge of the matter in April last year.
 His betting service is one of various emerging business models tied to horse racing that also include funds that buy and sell horses -- offering alternatives to traditional investments such as equities, bonds or even gold, which dropped 28 percent last year.
 Money is flowing back into racehorses, known as bloodstock, because of greater interest from buyers such as Qatar’s royal family and improvements in the global economy, Singh said.
 For some buyers, it’s also about prestige, said William Sporborg, managing director of Breeding Capital, a Newmarket, UK-based fund that sells young thoroughbreds to racing stables.
 Social Climbing “You get a lot closer to high society by buying a horse than buying a football club,” said Sporborg, who has raised 12 million pounds ($20 million) to invest in horses in three funds since 2006.
 Michael Iavarone, a former penny stock broker on Wall Street who bought champion racehorse Big Brown, announced plans in 2008 to raise $100 million for a hedge fund to buy and sell racehorses.
 Revenue from buying and selling commodities at the 10 biggest banks fell 18 percent to $4 billion in the first nine months of 2013, Coalition Ltd, a researcher in London, said this month.
 If Netflix can gain 6 million subscribers or more worldwide annually, revenue should be sufficient to fund growth and make it hard for competitors to catch up, said Tony Wible, an analyst at Janney Montgomery Scott LLC in Philadelphia who recommends buying the stock.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, Lenta plans to sell shares in London next month, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 “If you are tired of an old wife, you may buy a new one, but let’s see what happens,” Galitskiy said on the call in reference to Lenta.
 Magnit plans to improve purchasing terms by about 1 percent this year and may study acquisitions as tougher competition pushes smaller retailers to seek buyers, he also said.
 “We not only build software to run in our data centers, but we also license software to our customers and partners so they can run data centers” Open Compute is pushing hardware makers to develop computers, chips, racks and other components that buyers will be able to use as building blocks.
 Given the penalties, developers are now offering sweeteners to entice buyers.
 “Many people would be attracted to buy because they think it’s a good price, but the market is a long way from getting heated again” Builders New World Development Ltd.
 Record-low mortgage rates, a shortage of new supply and an influx of mainland Chinese buyers have propelled prices above levels reached in 1997, which marked the start of the city’s last major property crash.
 The former British colony is the most expensive city to buy a home, according to a Savills survey published in September that included New York, London and Tokyo.
 The affordability ratio, which measures the proportion a homebuyer has to pay monthly on a mortgage relative to income, stands at just over 60 percent, close to a 14-year high, according to calculations by London-based property broker Knight Frank LLP.
 “The few months after the last measures have been a period of adjustment for both buyers and sellers,” said Ricky Poon, Hong Kong-based director of residential sales at Colliers International.
 Developers are also rushing sales of luxury properties, which have been hit hardest by the government curbs because many buyers were wealthy mainland Chinese who now face the extra 15 percent tax, while tighter mortgage rules imposed by the central bank raised down-payment requirements for more expensive homes.
 Southwest agreed to purchase slots for 27 daily roundtrips, while JetBlue will buy rights for 12 round trips andacquire eight pairs now being leased from American, the airlinessaid today in statements.
 The buyer of slots for five additionalround trips hasn’t been disclosed.
 Justice Department’s requirementthat buyers be airlines that would expand competition and offermore low fares.
 Vitol agreed in 2011 to buy the bulk of Shell’s downstream business in 14 African countries, alongside Africa-focused private equity firm Helios Investment Partners LLP, for about $1 billion.
 Australia’s Macquarie Capital agreed in August to buy 45 percent of Singapore’s Helios Terminal Corp.
 The Gunawan family, which controls the lender known as Bank Panin, is resisting Mizuho’s demand for a board seat should it buy ANZ’s holding, valued at about $520 million, said the people, who asked not to be named as the talks are private.
 Mitsubishi UFJ in July offered to buy a majority stake in Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya for $56 billion.
 Sumitomo Mitsui struck a deal to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion in May.
 Research firms, such as Prescience Point, study a company’s financial statements and try to profit by borrowing shares and selling them with the aim of buying the stock back at a lower price and pocketing the difference.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, Southeast Asia’s second-largest lender, will spend about 18 billion yuan ($298 million) buying new shares in Bank of Ningbo Co.
 to buy the Hong Kong-based bank in what would be its largest acquisition.
 OCBC will buy no more than 2075 million shares and Ningbo Development will subscribe to 1585 million shares at 885 yuan each, Bank of Ningbo said.
 Imperial Tobacco Group Plc added 19 percent as the brokerage recommended that investors buy the shares.
 Goldman Sachs downgraded the stock to neutral from conviction buy after the company reported its financial results yesterday.
 Goldman Sachs upgraded the maker of Davidoff cigarettes to conviction buy from neutral, saying the stock’s recent decline provides a buying opportunity.
 The daily moving average convergence-divergence, or MACD, which provides buy and sell signals, indicates that the short-term momentum behind the lira’s depreciation is diminishing.
 “With our salaries, we can’t take a mortgage or buy an apartment.
 Policy makers saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond-buying program and expressed concern about risks to financial stability when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases, a record of the Federal Open Market Committee’s Dec.
 “The board can take the offers seriously, if we’re sure whatever we’re going to buy will happen” San Miguel, which started making beer eight years before the Philippines declared independence from Spain in 1898, has boosted revenue fivefold to $20 billion in five years.
 Japan’s Kirin Holdings Co, which holds about 48 percent of the San Miguel Brewery unit, hasn’t offered to buy the remaining stake, Ang said.
 “If I really want the share price to fly, all I need to do is just buy back” stock, he said.
 “The price of San Miguel is low, but if you are not selling like me, I should be very happy because I will have more opportunity to buy.
 Shareholders who have no patience can sell and buy something else.
 Three large investors have offered to buy part of that stake in SMC Global, which accounts for a quarter of the Philippines’ generation capacity, he said.
 “Once capital markets start closing, the company may be forced to sell its assets at a discount” Beverage Deals A month into 2014, big beverage companies have already spent almost three times as much buying competitors as they did all of last year.
 13 it agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 San Miguel isn’t in talks to buy a stake in broadcaster GMA Network Inc, Ang said, declining to elaborate.
 Ang offered to buy at least 30 percent of GMA, the Philippine Daily Inquirer reported on Jan.
 The government has spent $21 billion in the past two crop years starting October 2011 buying rice from farmers at above-market rates.
 He’ll need to show growth prospects after activist hedge fund Elliott, run by billionaire Paul Singer, said earlier this month that it’s amassed a 62 percent stake in Juniper and is seeking cost cuts and buybacks.
 Activist investors have historically avoided taking stakes in network-equipment companies because of the volatility of their business, so Jana’s appearance alongside Elliott adds pressure on Juniper to return more money to shareholders, said Bill Choi, an analyst with Janney Montgomery Scott in New York, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Elliott said Juniper could cut $200 million in operating costs and buy back $25 billion in stock immediately and an additional $1 billion in 2015.
 Kheradpir declined to comment on Elliott’s proposals and said he expects to announce a plan in the next few weeks that will address costs and buybacks.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Hedge-fund manager David Einhorn is joining billionaire investors including Warren Buffett and Carl Icahn to wager on the long-term prospects of traditional energy, buying stakes in two global oil explorers.
 12 court ruling, 24 recommend investors buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Cameron is much further through this process,” said Gruber, who rates Cameron shares a buy, Weatherford the equivalent of a hold, and owns neither.
 Congo’s government paid $150 million to buy it back last year, according to le Soft, a Kinshasa-based newspaper.
 Midcontinent gasoline climbed to a 12-week high relative to New York futures as buyers from Texas purchased more of the fuel.
 The Federal Reserve announced yesterday that it will trim its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to its plan for a gradual withdrawal from departing Chairman Ben S.
 Fed officials judged that the “efficacy” of their record bond-buying program was waning, according to a record of last month’s meeting released yesterday.
 Seventeen of 28 analysts recommend investors buy the stock, eight say hold and the rest sell.
 “The next two years are critical for the development of Pandora’s long-term revenue trajectory and royalty rates,” wrote Terry, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 in January 2013 to buy 98 percent of Aviva Plc and CIMB Group Holdings Bhd’s Malaysian insurance joint venture for 18 billion Malaysian ringgit.
 are among buyers in the nation.
 The stock has 18 buys, 6 holds and 1 sell.
 Japan deliveries jumped in the quarter, helped by the new Fit and the rush buying before the sales tax rise in April.
 Home Secretary Theresa May proposed more than 50 amendments to her own legislation, including one aimed at terrorists that will allow the government to revoke someone’s citizenship if they gained it through naturalization, and their behavior has been “seriously prejudicial to the vital interests of the UK” The opposition Labour Party claimed the clause was an attempt to buy off rebels.
 Consumer Confidence The Fed’s decision to taper its bond buying bodes well for banks because an improving economy could spur more confidence among consumers and businesses to borrow, Gerard Cassidy, an RBC Capital Markets analyst also based in Portland, said in a phone interview.
 For the first time since the crisis, bond buyers showed more confidence in financial firms than in industrial companies.
 Bond buyers boosted their confidence in bank debt as lenders built deposits to record highs of $974 trillion and bolstered capital cushions to meet regulations designed to avert another banking crisis.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 “If they continue to execute, you should see nice upside,” said Herbert, who recommends buying the shares.
 The chemical maker, facing pressure from activist investor Third Point LLC, also tripled a share buyback program and raised its dividend.
 “The auction houses have the buyers at the top end of the market.
 The buyer was Roman Abramovich, the Art Newspaper reported.
 At its meeting this week, the Fed may add cuts to its monthly $75 billion bond-buying program, according to a Bloomberg News survey.
 “That’s part of what’s feeding into the problems for emerging markets” Bond Buying The Fed’s decision to maintain the pace of bond buying during 2013 helped the S&P 500 jump 30 percent last year.
 agreed to buy the company.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Colleen Brady never had much interest in owning stocks until she received an e-mail offering the chance to buy shares last month in the initial public offering of movie-theater owner AMC Entertainment Holdings Inc.
 “I go there with my kids all the time, they have this great snack bar and I can buy my tickets in advance,” said Brady, 43, a Freehold, New Jersey, mother of two.
 “My husband said to invest in what you know” She did, buying $500 worth at the same $18 per-share price that fund managers paid, through a San Francisco company called Loyal3 Holdings Inc.
 Investment bankers also market their deals to fund managers who can buy millions of shares ahead of the offering.
 Online Advertising Individuals can buy IPO shares through brokerage firms such as Fidelity Investments, though these typically require large account balances -- $500,000 in Fidelity’s case, depending on the type of deal.
 AMC sale’s was marketed to the movie chain’s customer loyalty plan, called Stubs, and members could buy from $100 of stock to as much as $2,500 of shares.
 Loyal3 also allows retail investors to buy and sell shares of public companies, such as Amazoncom Inc.
 Eleven banks offered 18 billion euros to buy EDF’s power and Exeltium, which needs to refinance that in 2014, is seeking new terms from the utility in coming months, Roncato says.
 of Nigeria to buy lenders’ bad debts.
 Lebanon is considering buying 10 to 12 A-29 Super Tucano attack planes from Embraer as the Mideast country modernizes its armed forces, Estado reported, without saying where it got the information.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Keppel REIT, the second-biggest office property trust in Asia excluding Japan, is seeking buyers for its 30-story Prudential Tower in Singapore’s financial district, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 The REIT may approach Keppel Land Ltd, its biggest shareholder, to buy Keppel Land’s stake in the city’s Marina Bay Financial Centre Tower 3, she said.
 While the strengthening economy has supported the case for the Fed’s pullback from bond buying and caused Treasuries to suffer their first losses since 2009 last year, the decrease in US.
 The statement means AT&T cannot bid to buy a stake of 30 percent or more in the European operator for the next six months, according to UK.
 Meijer Inc, a Grand Rapids, Michigan-based family-owned retailer, agreed to buy the remaining 1,200 tickets to today’s National Football League playoff game between the Colts and Kansas City Chiefs at Lucas Oil Stadium in Indianapolis and distribute them to local military families, Colts owner Jim Irsay said on Twitter.
 “We’re pleased to offer these,” Meijer said on Twitter about buying the remaining Colts tickets.
 In 2011 it made its largest investment in the sector, leading a $72 billion leveraged buyout of Samson Resources Co, a Tulsa, Oklahoma-based natural gas producer.
 “The ones that you can buy one and one and get to two, I know it’s a cliché.
 has been targeted by activist hedge fund Elliott Management Corp, which will seek cost cuts, stock buybacks and other changes at the networking-gear maker.
 Cost Recommendations The company could cut $200 million in annual operating costs and buy back $25 billion in stock immediately and an additional $1 billion in 2015, Elliott said in a presentation of its proposals.
 Marshall, who rates Juniper a strong buy, said that is about double the average of companies he covers.
 8, the fund offered to buy Riverbed for $19 a share, valuing the business at $308 billion.
 The shares were already trading at their highest level in 22 months before Elliott’s announcement, bolstered by options buying last week.
 Massachusetts Model The pattern of enrollment when Massachusetts opened the state insurance exchange that is the model for Obamacare’s online marketplaces suggests younger and healthier people will be the most likely to wait until the deadline to buy insurance, Mendelson said.
 In focus groups, young people were open to buying insurance once they learned plans could be found on the exchanges for $100 a month or less, with subsidies.
 Public Unaware Sixty-nine percent of uninsured adults aren’t aware that subsidies are available to buy insurance, according to a study conducted last month by the research firm PerryUndem for Enroll America.
 agreed to buy airwaves from Verizon Wireless for about $24 billion in cash as part of a spectrum swap that will give both companies more network capacity in areas where they need it.
 “This is a big transaction for T-Mobile, but there are still additional pieces of low-band spectrum it can buy to complete the portfolio,” said Walt Piecyk, an analyst at BTIG LLC in New York.
 I’ll take it” Jaffe has a buy rating on the stock.
 Bayer is in the process of buying Norwegian drugmaker Algeta ASA for $29 billion, according to a statement from the Oslo-based company yesterday.
 and becoming one of the world’s biggest buyers of green coffee.
 German investment funds are buying commercial property as a way to boost returns amid low interest rates.
 Bankruptcy Judge Steven Rhodes yesterday rejected part of a $285 million financing package from Barclays Plc that was to pay for improved municipal services and buy out a swaps contract with UBS AG and Bank of America Corp.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 China, the world’s biggest consumer of nickel and aluminum, buys much of its nickel ore and bauxite from Indonesia.
 The Fed begins reducing its bond buying this month.
 “This growth trajectory is better than we had anticipated,” Brett Hundley, a Richmond, Virginia-based analyst for BB&T Capital Markets who recommends buying the shares, said in a report today.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- BlackBerry Ltd’s biggest investor, Fairfax Financial Holdings Ltd, is buying an additional $250 million in convertible bonds issued by the smartphone maker, a vote of confidence in new leader John Chen’s turnaround plan.
 Fairfax, based in Toronto, is buying the bonds as part of an option from an earlier agreement and expects the transaction to be completed by Jan.
 Maxim Group LLC raised it to buy from hold on Jan.
 Marks & Spencer Group Plc rose 26 percent as Exane BNP Paribas advised investors to buy the shares.
 Marks & Spencer advanced 26 percent to 4932 pence after Exane raised the shares to outperform from underperform, meaning investors should buy the stock.
 A gunpowder painting by New York-based Chinese artist Cai sold for HK$22 million while works by Andy Warhol, Jenny Holzer and Quinn also found buyers, showing that Asian collectors are broadening their tastes.
 “The sale proved that Asian buyers cannot be reduced to one mainstream taste,” Isaure del Viel Castel, head of mid-season sales contemporary and modern, fine art department at Sotheby’s, said in a telephone interview after the sale.
 Asian buyers in search of top modern and contemporary works will still need to look to London or New York.
 “We view the pullback as an especially good buying opportunity” Chief Executive Officer Ajay Banga, 54, is upgrading technology as MasterCard competes with larger rival Visa Inc.
 “Apple buys smaller technology companies from time to time, and we generally do not discuss our purpose or plans,” Kristin Huguet, a spokeswoman for Apple, said to confirm the SnappyLabs acquisitions.
 Clothing retailer Lojas Renner SA climbed after Banco BTG Pactual raised its recommendation to buy.
 Brewer Ambev SA added 32 percent to 1733 after Morgan Stanley raised its recommendation on the stock to buy.
 Italy’s biggest phone company will buy back the hybrid bonds, sold last year and due in 2073, on March 3 at 101 percent of the principal amount of the securities plus interest due, the Milan-based company said today in a statement.
 The Fed announced last month that it would slow its $85 billion-a-month bond-buying program by $10 billion in January, potentially reducing capital flows into emerging economies.
 The group included Temasek Holdings and buyout firm JW Childs Associates LP.
 Sales of CLOs have lagged behind the amount sold last year at this time as managers of the funds, which buy junk loans and help finance leveraged buyouts, await clarification on their treatment under the Volcker Rule.
 “They will give people a better chance to buy homes and a better chance to keep those homes, and they will force mortgage lenders and servicers to compete by offering better rates and customer service, not by tricking and trapping people.
 Potential buyers include the owners of the four major broadcast networks: CBS Corp, 21st Century Fox Inc, Comcast Corp’s NBCUniversal and Walt Disney Co, which owns ESPN and would air the games on its ABC network.
 Technology buyers are increasingly storing data and software on cloud-computing networks, rather than onsite, limiting their need for servers, mainframes and other hardware.
 “We have demand for the coal at Evraz’s steel mills, but it’s even more important for a project of such size to market the coal in Russia and internationally” Raspadskaya Plans The company is also working to increase output at its Raspadskaya unit, where it doubled its stake to 82 percent in 2012 by buying out management.
 and other investors joined the buying spree.
 Institutional buyers purchased 8,208 foreclosed homes in Riverside and San Bernardino counties in 2013, said John Husing, an economist whose firm, Economics & Politics Inc, focuses on the Inland Empire area that covers Riverside and San Bernardino counties.
 Some of Takano’s constituents have complained the investors are making it harder to buy properties.
 Rubel, who is based in New York, and Hugel are among 22 analysts who recommend buying Boeing, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Interest-rates trading involves buying and selling products including US.
 agreed to buy a 20 percent stake in Chinese premium car distributor Zhongsheng Group Holdings Ltd.
 Indian Oil, which has an accord to buy 24,000 barrels a day from Iran in the year ending March 31, halted purchases after importing in the first quarter of the fiscal year.
 The nation’s biggest refiner won’t resume buying until insurance is available, said a person with direct knowledge of the matter, asking not to be identified before an announcement.
 The South Asian nation planned to buy 11 million tons of Iranian crude this fiscal year after the European Union eased its sanction on insuring cargoes following a six-month accord between the Persian Gulf state, the US.
 The company plans to buy 4 million tons from Iran this financial year and increase purchases next year, he said.
 Essar Oil Ltd, which operates India’s second-biggest refinery, also buys crude from Iran.
 “We’ve decided to refrain from buying until the insurance issue is fully resolved.
 PulteGroup has focused on increasing house prices and managing spending as rising mortgage rates cut into homebuyer demand by making purchases more expensive.
 dropped 7 percent in December from the previous month, suggesting that rising prices and mortgage rates discouraged buyers, Commerce Department figures showed earlier this week.
 Officials saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond-buying program, according to the minutes, which didn’t describe a set schedule for the pace of reductions, although “a few” officials mentioned the need for a “more deterministic path” The Fed announced after the December meeting that it would begin trimming monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $75 billion this month as the US.
 recommended buying the shares.
 company to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 “Opportunistic funds like KKR are coming back and funds like Blackstone and Carlyle are continuing to buy,” Gerard said.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Clarion Partners LLC, a real estate owner overseeing almost $30 billion, made millions buying Manhattan office buildings and towers in Seattle and Houston after the US.
 markets were seen as less risky bets than suburbs and drew the bulk of investment until downtown yields became so unattractive that buyers began seeking opportunities further afield, Wang said.
 Investor migration from cities makes sense after a 32 percent jump in downtown office prices since 2010 pushed up costs for tenants as well as buyers, Fasulo said.
 ‘Beaten Down’ Suburban offices were “beaten down” in the multiyear focus on downtown assets and should gain favor in 2014 as the Federal Reserve raises interest rates and scales back its bond-buying program, known as tapering, New York-based analysts at BMO Capital Markets led by Richard Anderson wrote in a Jan.
 Higher loan costs will erode returns and lead more buyers to seek opportunities away from cities, Wang said in the interview.
 The Radnor, Pennsylvania-based firm had been unable to find buyers for its asset-backed securities in the midst of the financial crisis.
 Altice and billionaire John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc are among investors buying cable and broadband assets in regions such as Europe as data usage grows.
 The company has a growing business in the French West Indies and Caribbean and agreed to buy Orange SA’s Dominican Republic unit in November for $14 billion after reaching a deal for fixed-line operator Tricom SA in the country a month earlier.
 last year for $16 billion and is nearing a deal to buy Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV, people with knowledge of the matter have said.
 Altice was asked if it wanted to buy Royal KPN NV’s Belgian unit, BASE, before the Dutch owner canceled the sale, Goei said.
 agreed to buy ING Securities Investment & Trust Co.
 ConEdison Solutions owns and operates them and Honda is buying the electricity under a long-term contract.
 A growing number of industrial and commercial customers are using electricity generated locally and buying less from utilities.
 The patents cover shopping cart technology, in which buyers store their intention to purchase an item on a computer network, then buy it and can later view the shopping history.
 Fiat SpA shares surged 16 percent after the carmaker agreed to buy the remaining stake in Chrysler Group LLC that it doesn’t already own.
 rose the most in almost five months in Hong Kong trading amid speculation traders who had bet on the shares’ decline were buying them back after the company called its 2013 performance “solid” The world’s largest supplier of clothes and toys to retailers rose 96 percent to close at HK$1078 in Hong Kong, the biggest gain since Aug.
 will spend as much as 125 billion yen ($12 billion) buying back shares after Christmas shoppers shunned its Wii U console and games featuring Mario and Zelda.
 The world’s largest maker of video-game machines will buy back as many as 10 million shares, or about 78 percent of outstanding shares, the Kyoto, Japan-based company said in a statement yesterday.
 “Nowadays people want to play everything on smartphones and tablets, it doesn’t have to be a game-only device” The Nintendo buyback follows the September death of Hiroshi Yamauchi, who ran the company for 53 years and had a stake of about 11 percent.
 “That won’t merit shareholders, that’s why we decided on the buyback,” Iwata said yesterday.
 Potential buyers include SoftBank Corp.
 Hitachi in October 2012 agreed to buy Horizon Nuclear Power, which proposes to build as many as six new nuclear reactors at two UK.
 Deposit-taking institutions are bracing for higher interest rates and seeking ways to retain deposits as the Federal Reserve slows its monthly bond buying and the US.
 Mulligan claims in court papers he went to visit a licensed medical marijuana dispensary in Eagle Rock to buy gel caps containing tetrahydrocannabinol, the active ingredient of marijuana.
 The partnership would be a defensive move against BT Group Plc, the former phone monopoly which has spent billions buying sports broadcasting rights, threatening Sky and potentially making “quadruple-play” bundles more popular, the people said, asking not to be named because the talks are private.
 Mortgage Rates Borrowing costs for prospective buyers have climbed since US.
 Higher prices, along with borrowing costs, have made purchases more difficult for some buyers.
 The losers will be buyers of cans, cars and all the goods made from metals.
 Brookfield Incorporacoes SA rallied amid speculation the homebuilder buy back its outstanding shares and delist the stock.
 The homebuilder could buy back its stock and delist it from the country’s stock exchange, Brazilian website InfoMoney said, citing sources it didn’t name.
 Fed Policy Stocks may suffer as the Fed tapers its bond-buying program this year, according to Tim Hartzell, who helps manage about $425 million as chief investment officer at Houston-based Sequent Asset Management.
 Still, profits on loans are constrained by interest rates kept low by the BOJ’s bond buying.
 Mizuho, which lags behind Mitsubishi UFJ and Sumitomo Mitsui in Southeast Asian takeovers, is facing a deadlock in talks to buy a stake in PT Bank Pan Indonesia, people familiar with the matter said last week.
 Berkshire agreed to buy the assets of MyAssist Inc, a concierge and personal-assistant service, from Noel Group, according to a statement today from a unit of Buffett’s Omaha, Nebraska-based company.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers today -- more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures like horsepower and speed -- according to a December study by consulting firm Accenture.
 He frequently highlights his willingness to retain managers after buying companies and empowers them to run their operations as they see fit.
 That’s made Berkshire a buyer of choice for many closely held businesses.
 In 2010 the company agreed to buy offices from PNC Financial Services Group Inc.
 sold Valhalla, New York-based USI to Onex Corp, the Canadian buyout firm, in 2012 for $23 billion.
 The company is talking to the city about buying the volunteer fire department new equipment.
 The Fed announced in December it would scale back on its monthly bond-buying program to $75 billion, a decrease of $10 billion.
 Bank of America raised its recommendation to buy from neutral, citing potential for increased earnings amid a restructuring.
 The maker of personal computers is committed to returning cash to shareholders through dividends and buybacks, the brokerage said.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- L’Oreal SA Chief Executive Officer Jean-Paul Agon said buying Nestle SA’s stake of about 29 percent in the world’s largest cosmetics maker would make sense, sending shares in both companies higher.
 Sanofi would consider buying back the holding if it were to become available, CEO Chris Viehbacher said in October.
 No Blackouts The Colts’ game today against the Kansas City Chiefs sold out yesterday after Meijer Inc, a Grand Rapids, Michigan-based superstore, agreed to buy the remaining 1,200 tickets.
 Green Bay season-ticket holders were offered a chance to buy tickets throughout the playoffs during the third week of November, with the money applied to next season if the team failed to reach the postseason or didn’t play at home, according to the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel.
 “In Green Bay, a lot of it has to do with season ticket holders opting not to buy when they had their chance,” Matcovich said.
 Japanese stocks were the best performers in the developed world over the past year, encouraging buyout firms such as Bain and Cerberus Capital Management LP to recoup investments through first-time share sales.
 Skylark delisted from the Tokyo bourse in 2006, following a 295 billion-yen management buyout led by Nomura’s principal finance unit and CVC Capital Partners Ltd, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 To convince motorists, it offered to buy back its Manza sedan at 60 percent of the purchase price after three years.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 He rates Smith & Wesson a buy.
 who has a buy rating and $27 price estimate on the stock.
 “We ask all to comply thoroughly with the stand-still instructions” South Korea, the world’s third-biggest buyer of corn, used in food, animal feed and biofuel, destroyed 65 million chickens and ducks in the previous outbreak spanning December 2010 through May 2011, government data show.
 raised the drugstore chain to buy.
 Avianca Brasil Chief Executive Officer Jose Efromovich said today in Sao Paulo that the airline is still in talks with the plane maker to buy about 30 aircrafts.
 Perez said that while he was “very satisfied” with the government’s economic reforms, he was concerned that “protectionist rules” forcing China’s state-owned enterprises to buy domestically produced equipment could drive foreign companies away.
 As part of a campaign to promote frugality and reduce waste, the military will stop buying foreign-branded vehicles, the Xinhua News Agency reported Jan.
 Luis Willard, an analyst with Corporativo GBM SAB, said Walmex’s selloff, driven in part by a 13 percent drop in same-store sales last year, has created a buying opportunity.
 must pay for the 150,000 Saipem shares it agreed to buy from Merrill in January 2013, Judge Nicholas Hamblen said today in London, granting the bank’s request for an early ruling without trial.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- While young consumers may not be as passionate about cars as their parents, most still plan to buy or lease one within the next three years, according to a new study.
 Only 8 percent of consumers born between 1977 and 1994 said they will never buy a vehicle, according to the survey by Deloitte LLP.
 Mark Fields, Ford’s chief operating officer, said this week that automakers need to understand younger buyers, also known as millennials, “in a whole new way” “When they do buy cars, millennials expectations of car ownership could parallel their expectations of technology, where upgrading every two years is the norm,” Fields said Jan.
 to buy a stake in Dong Energy A/S might be renegotiated after local pension funds tried to raise a counter-bid.
 Goldman is trying to buy an 18 percent stake in state-controlled Dong, which needs fresh equity after losing money on failed natural gas bets.
 2 that the new buyers and the government have agreed to seek an IPO when “conditions are right” The Bloomberg IPO Index climbed 64 percent last year, the biggest jump in 14 years, pushed by gains in Twitter Inc.
 Jens Thomsen, a credit analyst at Jyske Bank A/S who recommends investors buy Dong’s bonds, said he expects the Goldman deal to go through.
 Cold weather may have kept buyers from dealer lots at the end of the industry’s best year since 2007.
 mortgage rates rose to the highest since September, increasing borrowing costs for homebuyers as prices climbed across the country.
 While a jump in mortgage rates since May has slowed demand, buyers drove up prices for a limited supply of properties that included fewer discounted foreclosures.
 “Homes which were previously sold at a heavy discount are no longer fetching a fraction of their value; this is probably causing the index to overstate home price appreciation” Contracts to buy previously owned homes rose 02 percent in November, the first increase in six months, after a 12 percent drop in October that was larger than initially reported, the National Association of Realtors said on Dec.
 The Fed is still easing as long as it’s buying bonds, which will continue to dilute the US money supply in contrast with a tightening euro-area balance sheet, said Merk.
 “Affordability issues will help put the brakes on many markets that saw huge appreciation rates, like California and the Southwest, creating volatility that could potentially cause whiplash for homebuyers and sellers,” he said in a statement today.
 “At the same time, we expect more homes to be available this year as more sellers enter the market and more homes get built, and a decline in investor competition should make for a more hospitable market for many buyers” The increase from October was the smallest since January 2012, when prices fell 02 percent, according to the FHFA.
 Rising prices combined with a jump in mortgage rates from near-record lows in May have caused some homebuyers to hold back.
 “My dream is to earn a bit more every month and go back to Shanxi to raise a child,” said Wu, adding that if he got a raise this year he could buy a new mobile phone or some clothes during the Chinese New Year holiday.
 In the US, minutes from the Federal Reserve’s December meeting showed officials saw declining economic gains from its monthly bond-buying program.
 The Finnish company has received interest from other potential buyers in the past, people familiar with the matter said.
 Genel Energy added 35 percent to 1,117 pence as HSBC Holdings Plc upgraded its rating on the shares to overweight, similar to a buy, from neutral.
 Bruce Campbell, a fund manager with StoneCastle Investment Management Inc, said investors should buy a basket of marijuana companies instead of trying to pick a winner out of a group of small, thinly traded stocks.
 Federal Reserve’s decision to taper its bond-buying program crimps demand for emerging-market assets.
 We returned to a good level of investment activity, completing four major investments” Scandlines, Bestinvest The company spent 247 million pounds buying stakes in companies in the period, compared with 81 million pounds in the first half.
 It spent several hundred thousand dollars researching Chinese wine-buyers and planned to boost gift sales with trophy products similar to its $168,000 bottle of 2004 Penfolds Cabernet Sauvignon released in 2012, Dearie said in March.
 The company said in July it would destroy stock, discount older bottles and take costs for onerous grape-buying contracts and holding an excess of low-valued bulk wine.
 There was a “significant acceleration” in innovation during the fourth quarter, wrote Heath Terry, an analyst at Goldman Sachs who recommends buying the shares.
 The company has the equivalent of 11 sell ratings, 11 holds and six buys from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Huge Opportunities “The opportunities with Twitter are huge,” Rob Sanderson, an analyst who has a buy rating on the stock at Stamford, Connecticut-based MKM Partners LLC, said in a phone interview.
 “DRAM prices are going to continue to move higher,” said Van Hees, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Claims Denied CommonWealth has denied Corvex and Related’s claims of conflicts of interest and has said it is focusing on buying office buildings in US.
 and Daimler AG are considering buying a stake in Kamaz held by former Troika Dialog Group owners, Interfax reported, citing Rostec General Director Sergey Chemezov.
 A drop in the buying-climate gauge that sent it to a two-month low was offset by rebounding attitudes on the current state of the economy.
 “Our recommendations stand, particularly as we do not see an end to the lira depreciation pressures in the coming weeks” Turkish assets have been falling since mid-2013 as part of a wider rout in emerging markets triggered by Federal Reserve plans to trim its $85 billion monthly bond-buying program, with policy makers agreeing on the first reduction last month.
 recommended buying shares in the world’s biggest mining company.
 BHP Billiton rose 38 percent to 1,860 pence after Citigroup upgraded the shares to buy from neutral.
 Berenberg Bank lowered its rating on the product-inspection company to hold from buy, saying that earnings per share will miss analysts’ estimates in 2014 if miners and oil producers reduce their capital spending.
 Vodafone last year agreed to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 75 billion euros to add to its fixed-line network in Germany.
 Merck would buy products in the categories of vitamins and supplements, cold and allergy and pain relievers, Udit Batra, chief executive officer of the consumer health-care division, said in an interview at the company’s Darmstadt, Germany headquarters.
 “In order to build your business you need to keep your eyes and ears open to buy small brands that consumers already like that are not being focused on,” he said.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s sinking real and quickening inflation are helping the country’s biggest bitcoin brokerage drum up buyers for the virtual currency.
 Business Acceptance Most buyers in Brazil are interested in Bitcoin as an investment, Batista said.
 Volatility is a concern for Bitcoin buyers, Batista said.
 New York-based Blackstone invested or committed $33 billion for distressed European mortgages and properties in 2013, while Apollo raised $54 billion to buy mainly nonperforming loans in Europe, according to a Nov.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Automakers offer stretched versions of their models for China, where buyers prefer to be chauffeured and seek more back-seat comfort.
 14, are contending with fresh accusations they misled buyers of mortgage-backed securities, rigged markets or turned a blind eye to suspicious activity by customers.
 Federal Reserve began a two-day policy meeting to discuss further cuts to its monthly bond buying that has helped propel global equities higher.
 Europe’s third-biggest oil producer will buy a 40 percent stake in two exploration areas held by Dart Energy Ltd, Paris-based Total said today in a statement.
 In that case, the offer was turned down and other buyers didn’t materialize.
 Elliott is seeking costs cuts, stock buybacks and other changes at the company.
 “We continue to believe other strategic and financial buyers could enter the Riverbed bidding process over the coming months, as it remains a core strategic asset within the broader technology food chain,” Daniel Ives, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets & Co, wrote in a report today.
 Verizon, based in New York, announced the deal to buy out Vodafone’s 45 percent stake in September.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- PineBridge Investment LLC and OAO Sberbank are recommending investors buy Russian real-estate companies and retailers on prospects the industries will benefit from rising incomes in the world’s biggest country.
 in recommending buying Russian consumer equities amid the cheapest valuations among developing nations.
 Apple faces calls for a bigger stock buyback from Icahn, and Microsoft recently said it will allow ValueAct Capital Management LLC President Mason Morfit to join its board.
 He is proposing that the company commit to buying back at least $50 billion worth of shares in fiscal 2014, something that Apple is recomending investors vote against.
 The European Union is encouraging airlines to buy cleaner fuels with a cap on greenhouse gas emissions.
 “We prefer not to have the currency risk of buying euro-denominated assets,” he said.
 “We’re willing to give up a little bit of upside to go out and buy some insurance for the portfolio,” Peter Sorrentino, a senior portfolio manager who helps manage about $148 billion at Huntington Asset Advisors in Cincinnati, said in a Jan.
 The statement means AT&T can’t offer to buy Vodafone or a stake of 30 percent or more in the company for the next six months, according to UK.
 It acquired Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for more than $10 billion in October and is seeking to buy Grupo Corporativo ONO SA, the Spanish cable operator that is preparing for an initial public offering, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Today’s statement “buys them some time,” he said.
 takeover rules, AT&T’s statement means it can’t offer to buy Vodafone or a stake of 30 percent or more in the company for the next six months, except under certain conditions.
 Those include Vodafone’s board agreeing that AT&T’s statement is ignored, another company offering to buy Vodafone, or authorities deciding that there has been a material change of circumstances.
 He was sentenced to three years in prison, although the sentence was reduced after he agreed to make controlled cocaine buys in a separate investigation.
 Chief Executive Officer Stephen Schwarzman, who led a push by private-equity firms to expand beyond leveraged buyouts, said last month he has “aggressive plans” to grow further.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul then sell them, and return the funds with a profit after about 10 years.
 government supplier announced it would buy back more of its stock and forecast higher sales of business jets.
 In October, activist Daniel Loeb’s Third Point LLC disclosed a stake in Nokia and predicted the company is likely to pay a special dividend or do a stock buyback after the Microsoft deal.
 JSW, owned by Sajjan Jindal, is seeking to buy Stemcor assets and has submitted a second-round bid, Seshagiri Rao, joint managing director of the nation’s third-largest steelmaker, said today in Mumbai.
 agreed to buy NuPathe Inc.
 13, the last trading day before Endo said it had agreed to buy the company.
 Nomura is also expanding its asset management operations abroad, saying this month that it will buy ING Groep NV’s Taiwanese investment unit, becoming the first Japanese asset manager to operate in the market.
 Here: Regulators are investigating whether traders exploited the murky pricing around residential mortgage-backed securities from around 2009 through 2011 to buy or sell the investments at artificially depressed or inflated values, the people close to the inquiry said.
 It is generally illegal for traders to misrepresent to investors aspects of a transaction that are important enough to affect the decision to buy or sell.
 So what aspects of a mortgage-backed security "are important enough to affect the decision to buy or sell"? A conventional answer would be something like "the creditworthiness of the underlying borrowers, the values of the homes used as collateral, etc" And there've been lots of lawsuits about banks that misrepresented those sorts of things in the pre-crisis period and have gotten in bad trouble1 But in 2009 that was sort of a dumb answer.
 Who's to say what a thinly traded busted subprime security is "worth"? What mattered was the price at which banks were willing to buy or sell those securities.
 If you knew in 2009 that a bank would buy a security at 50 and sell it at 52, then that tells you more about what it was "worth" -- in 2009 -- than your deep credit analysis of the borrowers and the house prices and so forth.
 China Demand China, the world’s biggest buyer of raw materials, increased iron-ore imports 10 percent last year, peaking at a monthly record in November as demand held up amid slowing economic growth.
 China is the biggest buyer of iron ore, representing about 60 percent of global demand.
 24 it agreed to buy the 5001 percent stake in Celesio held by Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH, a family-owned investment company, for 23 euros a share, and begin a tender offer for the remaining publicly traded shares at the same price.
 Some Bitcoin enthusiasts are buying and holding the currency, betting that it will hit new heights.
 The partners at his fund have pooled personal assets, not those of the hedge fund, to buy Bitcoins.
 Teva said last week it agreed to buy NuPathe Inc.
 “We always want to buy technology,” he said.
 “I would use these recent small declines to buy the bonds as the debate is only white noise,” Jens H.
 Bombardier said the valuation was based on list prices for typically equipped aircraft, from which buyers get discounts.
 and Airbus SAS planes, struggled to find buyers.
 yesterday raised its rating for the company to buy from reduced as it predicted that earnings would almost double in 2014.
 Banorte, which begantelling investors to buy the securities on Jan.
 Mexico had kept the sales tax along the border lower thanthe rest of the nation for decades to give consumers incentiveto buy products at home rather than cross into Texas,California, Arizona and New Mexico, where the rates are lowerIn the Caribbean and Pacific coast states, the lower tax ratehad been used to entice tourists to spend at stores, hotels andrestaurants.
 Last year it struggled to find buyers for its Dea oil and gas unit, having previously been forced to scrap a sale of gas fields in Egypt.
 Last year, founder Leonard Riggio, 72, announced his intention to buy the company’s stores and website.
 Sumitomo Mitsui President Koichi Miyata said in an interview last month that the banking arm stopped selling JGBs after reaching the minimum it needs and that it may start buying again once returns increase.
 -- joining Charter’s bid or buying assets from Charter after a deal, said people with knowledge of the company’s thinking, who asked not to be named discussing confidential matters.
 initiated coverage of the stock with a buy recommendation.
 Deliveries to Europe, which buys a quarter of its gas from Russia, were halted twice in freezing weather in the past decade over disputes with Ukraine about prices and transit terms.
 LCI, owned by New York-based Libra Group, entered the helicopter market in 2012 when it committed to spend as much as $400 million to buy a fleet of Finmeccanica SpA AgustaWestland choppers.
 LCI has placed helicopters with operators including Malaysia’s Weststar Aviation Services, in which KKR agreed to buy a stake of about $200 million last year, and Avincis Group, parent of Bond Offshore Helicopters.
 over the past decade, is telling clients to ignore Wall Street’s biggest banks and buy emerging markets.
 That could lead to consumers buying more goods, he said.
 As investors including billionaire George Soros and Bill Gates buy Spanish stocks, the main share index has risen 23 percent in the past six months, with banking stocks some of the biggest gainers.
 Bancorp rate it a buy, and Atlantic Equities LLP’s Richard Staite has the equivalent of a sell with a price target lower than the current level.
 3 report with a buy rating.
 BPCL sold about 18 percent more fuel than it processed in the year ended March 31, buying from rivals or overseas to fill the gap.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Wild Flavors GmbH owner Hans-Peter Wild and buyout firm KKR & Co.
 Wild Flavors, which competes with companies such Germany’s Symrise AG and Switzerland’s Givaudan SA, would allow a buyer to tap a consumer trend toward more natural raw materials used in the company’s concentrates, colorings and ingredients for confectionary, ice cream and baked goods.
 There is some rotational buying” Borrowing Costs Shares traded on the mainland climbed after China’s money-market rates fell for a second day.
 Bank first offered to buy larger peer Men’s Wearhouse for $23 billion.
 3 it lowered its poison pill threshold to 10 percent, meaning Men’s Wearhouse can only buy 10 percent of Jos.
 new home sales probably slowed for a second month in December, according to a Bloomberg survey, as colder weather and snowstorms kept some buyers away.
 The central bank, which has pledged to continue buying bonds until the labor market has “improved substantially,” will probably trim bond purchases in $10 billion increments over the next six meetings before announcing an end to the program no later than December, according to a Bloomberg survey.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- SSAB, a Swedish steelmaker, offered to buy Finnish rival Rautaruukki Oyj for 101 billion kronor ($156 billion) to cut costs and improve competitiveness.
 Oman Investment Fund also agreed to buy a stake for HK$3875 million.
 In June, a group of Li companies including Power Assets agreed to buy Dutch waste processor AVR Afvalverwerking BV for 9437 million euros ($13 billion).
 “Long-term, if you were an outlier it would be the wrong place to be” Pork Buyers Almost 60 of the world’s largest pork buyers such as McDonald’s Corp.
 Investor Accord Bank of America has agreed to pay $500 million to settle securities law claims by investors who said they were misled into buying Countrywide’s mortgage-backed securities.
 “Many of our key customers are prioritizing their internalization and ATS businesses ahead of their exchange-based market-making business,” the company wrote in its final quarterly report before the ICE acquisition in November, referring to the practice of trading firms matching buyers and sellers internally or trading on alternative venues other than exchanges.
 Traders on the chats say they were merely matching buyers and sellers ahead of the fix to minimize losses by avoiding trades at a time when prices typically fluctuate the most.
 Sharp will also continue seeking partners to buy a stake in itself, President Kozo Takahashi told reporters in Osaka yesterday.
 The company’s liquid-crystal display unit also turned profitable in the period on rising sales after selling shares to potential LCD buyers including Samsung Electronics Co, the world’s biggest TV maker.
 Technology companies formed Rockstar to buy bankrupt Nortel’s patents in 2011.
 The homebuilder has focused on increasing house prices and managing spending as rising mortgage rates cut into homebuyer demand by making purchases more expensive.
 agreed to buy the Motorola Mobility mobile-phone business from the owner of the world’s largest search engine for $291 billion.
 DNB ASA upgraded the shares to buy from hold, saying earnings growth at the second-largest truckmaker will become stronger in the second half of 2014.
 Societe Generale SA downgraded the the luxury-clothing maker controlled by buyout firm Permira Advisers LLP.
 to hold from buy.
 The promotional sales are concerning because SodaStream depends not just on the initial sale of the soda machine, but benefits from the so-called razor-blade model of retailing, where profits rely on customers repeatedly buying complementary products such as carbonation cannisters and flavors.
 A cheaper price may imply an impulse buy, rather than a loyal customer who will continue to use the machine, Terpolilli said.
 18 decided to cut monthly bond buying to $75 billion from $85 billion beginning this month.
 Dental benefits provider Odontoprev SA rose as Grupo BTG Pactual recommended buying the stock.
 Hargreaves Lansdown Plc gained 16 percent to 1,508 pence after Morgan Stanley raised its recommendation on the shares to overweight, similar to buy, from equal weight, citing the potential for higher earnings in 2014 and 2015.
 Research firms, such as Prescience Point, study a company’s financial statements and try to profit by borrowing shares and selling them with the aim of buying the stock back at a lower price and pocketing the difference.
 Investors should buy LKQ shares after the decline today, Stifel Nicolaus said in a research report.
 He previously ran food company Strauss Group Ltd, where he oversaw a global expansion that included buying coffee makers in Brazil and a prepared-salad company in the US.
 She has the equivalent of a buy rating on AT&T shares and is neutral on T-Mobile.
 “It’s still a bargain to buy pork and chicken compared to beef,” Quiter said.
 Japan, Canada and Mexico were the biggest buyers.
 The Swiss watch industry’s growth rate has sputtered as China, which buys more than a quarter of Swiss watches, gets tougher over the use of luxury goods as bribes and illegitimate gifts.
 One Canadian dollar buys 9181 US.
 The greenback fell yesterday versus most major counterparts as lower-than-forecast job gains damped speculation the Fed will keep winding down the bond-buying it uses to spur economic growth.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Marriott International Inc, the owner of such brands as the Ritz-Carlton and Renaissance, would consider buying more hotel-management companies after its acquisition of South Africa’s Protea Hospitality Holdings, Chief Executive Officer Arne Sorenson said.
 “We are open to buying more operators for reasons such as adding a new brand, for lack of distribution or because of the economics of a deal,” Sorenson said in an interview yesterday at the Americas Lodging Investment Summit in Los Angeles.
 agreed to buy airwaves from Verizon Wireless for about $24 billion.
 analyst Brian Lee cut the stock to sell from buy, saying the company’s valuation may contract as earnings decline.
 T-Mobile agreed to buy airwaves from Verizon Wireless for about $24 billion in cash as part of a spectrum swap that will give both companies more network capacity in areas where they need it.
 Morgan Stanley raised the maker of the Watchman heart implant to overweight, or buy, from equal weight, or hold.
 REITs that buy mortgage debt tumbled last year after struggling to navigate Federal Reserve policies, leaving them exposed to investors prepared to push for changes.
 The Santa Monica, California-based firm primarily buys government-backed home loan bonds, which suffered their first annual loss last year in almost two decades.
 Anworth has already repurchased at least 28 million shares in the fourth quarter and last month announced board approval to buy back as many as 5 million more.
 REITs buy property-linked assets and are exempt from taxes as long as they pay out 90 percent of their earnings in dividends.
 ‘Fed Signals’ The companies started plunging in May as investors speculated that the Fed would slow its debt-buying program as the economy started to strengthen.
 Goldstein called Ulm repeatedly, urging him to buy back stock, even after Javelin’s board authorized Oct.
 Repurchasing Shares “There are lots of things to consider and plan for when you buy back shares of a REIT,” said Ulm.
 Bulldog, a name picked to characterize the firm’s tenacity, typically buys closed-end funds, which have a limited number of shares outstanding that can trade above or below a company’s net asset value.
 ‘Meaningful Value’ The firm is committed to buying back stock while it’s trading at a discount, which “can generate meaningful shareholder value without increasing risk,” President Gary Kain said on an Oct.
 “There is no management team that can justify why purchasing a mortgage-backed security today is a better investment than buying their stock back at 75 percent or 80 percent of book value,” he said.
 climbed 18 percent as it agreed to buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion.
 “There seems to be a fairly wide consensus that stimulus should be gradually taken out” Fed officials saw diminishing economic benefits from the central bank’s bond buying program, according to the minutes of the meeting, when they took the first step to cut the pace of purchases.
 Participants also were “concerned about the marginal cost of additional asset purchases arising from risks to financial stability” citing the potential for “excessive risk-taking in the financial sector” The central bank is trimming monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $75 billion this month.
 Forest Laboratories climbed 18 percent to $6930 after it agreed to buy Aptalis, a closely held company whose shareholders include investment firm TPG Capital, to expand in gastrointestinal and cystic fibrosis treatments.
 “If you look at Next, a significant proportion of the earnings growth has been due to the share buyback” Next has handed back about 30 percent more to shareholders since 2010, the year Bolland took the top post at M&S, in the form of buybacks and dividends.
 Next said last week that it was suspending its buyback program because the shares had risen above the level it’s prepared to pay.
 who recommends buying the shares, said in a Jan.
 The developer is negotiating the sale of Pacific Century Place in the Chinese capital with no binding agreement having been reached, the Hong Kong-based company said in a statement yesterday, without identifying the buyer.
 Pacific Century said in October it was approached by potential buyers for its stake in the development.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Empresa de Telecomunicaciones de Bogota SA, the city-owned phone company, has no plans to seek a partner or buyout for at least two years as it adds television and mobile service, Chief Executive Officer Saul Kattan said.
 Documents for the business, which includes wealthy clients in France, have been sent to potential buyers and it may be sold in parts, though no sale is guaranteed, they said.
 HSBC said in July it would keep its Monaco private bank after reviewing interest to buy the unit.
 Lloyds Banking Group Plc, Britain’s biggest mortgage lender, sold its international private-banking business in May to Swiss wealth manager Union Bancaire Privee, which agreed to buy ABN Amro Bank NV’s Swiss private-banking business for an undisclosed sum in 2011.
 We need better economic numbers and we need earnings to follow that” Traders are buying record amounts of options that pay off if the calm that is blanketing markets proves temporary.
 “Banks’ margins were already under pressure and the current turmoil will further deteriorate margins, not to mention the impact of a possibly very strong downturn in the economy” Turkiye Halk Bankasi AS is rated buy by 26 of 29 analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, while Yapi ve Kredi Bankasi AS, a privately held bank of a similar market value to Halkbank, is rated buy by five, hold by 22 and the equivalent of sell by two analysts.
 to $3 billion, adding to one of his biggest holdings as he continues to push the iPhone maker to buy back more stock.
 Icahn, who has become a billionaire by buying stakes in companies and then publicly pushing for changes to boost the stock, has been pressuring Apple to return cash to shareholders for the past five months.
 Prior to Icahn’s involvement, Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook announced a plan for a total of $100 billion in dividends and buybacks.
 Apple Board Apple’s board is “doing great disservice to shareholders by not having markedly increased its buyback,” Icahn wrote in of his tweets.
 Apple then recommended investors vote against Icahn’s proposal that the company commit to buying back at least $50 billion worth of shares in fiscal 2014.
 GM is putting more emphasis on retail sales rather than discounted models for bulk buyers.
 The industry used to exceed 16 million sales per year “only by way of very heavy incentives to get people to buy cars,” Casesa said.
 Sales in December fell short of analysts’ estimates as cold weather may have kept buyers from dealers’ lots.
 1 it had reached a $435 billion deal with a union trust to buy all Chrysler stock that the Turin, Italy-based company doesn’t already own.
 “Car shoppers have forgiven or forgotten that the Cherokee had a stalled launch and they’re buying it in big numbers” For the year, Chrysler Group sales rose 9 percent to 18 million, as car sales increased 11 percent while truck deliveries expanded 83 percent.
 Big companies can play an important role in fostering startups in the world’s third-largest economy, said Nobuyuki Idei, the former Sony chief executive officer who helped Isayama promote his fund.
 Sesa Sterlite will be the natural buyer, Jigar Mistry, a Mumbai-based analyst with HSBC Holdings Plc, wrote today in a report.
 Agarwal in March 2012 offered 170 billion rupees ($28 billion) to buy the Indian government’s remaining stakes in Udaipur, Rajasthan-based Hindustan Zinc and Balco.
 In 2010, Vedanta’s plan to buy Anglo American Plc’s Skorpion zinc mine in Namibia through Hindustan Zinc failed after the Indian government didn’t ratify the deal.
 Analysts remain bearish on the stock, with only 3 out of 43 recommending buying it, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 I think there’s some of that” Stepping in after BlackBerry scrapped an attempt to sell itself, Chen has described his new employer as “in the game for the long term” Whether he ultimately finds a buyer, as he did at Sybase, or puts the company in position to remain independent, he’s shifting the perception of the smartphone maker.
 American ordered 130 of the current-version A320 series planes to be leased, and agreed to buy directly another 130 of the upgraded A320neo versions.
 “Investors will take the pain for now and at the margin I’d expect investors to be buying back into the periphery,” he said, referring to the region’s nations with the highest debt and deficits.
 The SEC is investigating the transaction in the US, where investors may buy Gold Fields via American depositary receipts.
 Rogers and its main competitor, BCE Inc, are vying to buy TV programming and repackage it for online and mobile sale.
 Target will provide 30-day free trials to customers who buy some electronics and entertainment items the week of Jan.
 The company announced a $500 million stock buyback in July.
 It stems from increases in the value of the company’s debt, on the theory it would be more expensive to buy it back.
 It’s only been since 2011 or so that firms who buy up patents to seek royalties, known by the pejorative “troll,” have been going after the users of products made by well-known companies like Google and Adobe, Rao said.
 “I wouldn’t be buying their products if they didn’t step in to protect me” If a company proves its product doesn’t infringe a patent, then all of its customers are off the hook.
 30 it will crack down on practices that led to overpriced deals, including investors colluding with companies to drive up valuations by making high bids with no plans to actually buy the stock.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Lindsay Corp, a manufacturer of irrigation equipment that farmers use to conserve water and energy, plans to buy back $100 million to $150 million in stock and said the company would double its dividend.
 Goldman’s European merchant banking unit is seeking to buy an 18 percent stake in state-controlled Dong, a utility in need of new equity after losing money on failed natural gas bets.
 Fed policy makers will meet this month to consider the next step in their strategy to gradually reduce the pace of bond buying as the economy strengthens.
 The Fed’s bond buying has kept borrowing costs at historic lows, adding support to a housing rebound that’s also been driven by a tight supply of properties for sale.
 took its fight to buy Jos.
 3 said it lowered its so-called poison pill’s threshold to 10 percent, meaning Men’s Wearhouse can only buy 10 percent of Jos.
 Sanofi, which owns about 16 percent of Regeneron, retains the ability to buy as much as 30 percent of the company.
 Boost Earnings Sanofi is buying the Alnylam stake for about $80 a share, a 21 percent premium over Alnylam’s closing share price of $6621 on Jan.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, plans to sell shares in London next month, with a possible secondary listing in Moscow, two other people familiar with the matter said “I expect to see total issuance closer to $10 billion this year because investor interest in the emerging-market asset class will remain low until after the summer and Russia has some tough economic issues to deal with,” Chris Weafer, senior parter at London-based Macro Advisory, said by e-mail on Jan.
 job creation fueled speculation the Federal Reserve won’t rush to trim bond buying.
 Tullow rallied 63 percent last week after people familiar with the matter said that Norway’s Statoil ASA has studied buying the oil-and-gas explorer.
 “The market’s been down for a while, and today people are buying back in.
 Comcast also is near a deal to buy cable systems in New York City, New England and North Carolina from Charter Communications Inc, if Charter succeeds in its takeover bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday.
 At Franklin, he ran a global bond fund and said he was the first mutual-fund investor to buy securities issued by Mexico after it defaulted and restructured its debt.
 The year after Kohli’s 2008 pummeling, he started buying residential mortgage-backed securities that don’t have the backing of the US.
 He sells Treasury futures and buys interest-rate swaps, which generally exchange fixed-rate interest payments for floating-rate ones, to minimize interest-rate risk.
 For the past 25 years, anytime there was a stressful situation at work, Kohli said he would tell his wife they should buy a bookstore.
 Der Spiegel magazine reported earlier that Hertha will use the funds from New York-based KKR to repay the bulk of its 37 million euros of loans and buy back marketing, television and catering rights.
 Investors from insurers and pension funds to buyout firms last year spent the most on German offices, stores and warehouses since 2007, broker Savills Plc estimates.
 In December, Blackstone agreed to buy three warehouse properties in Germany for about 100 million euros, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 Apartment values climbed to the highest since at least 2003 in the third quarter, according to the VDP Association of German Pfandbrief banks, even as buyout firms made fewer acquisitions.
 The firm expects to be a net buyer of commercial real estate in 2014, and has been a net seller of homes since 2012.
 “We do our leasing work, we stabilize the asset and then we move it in a couple of years” Many of the properties targeted by private-equity firms are legacies of a two-year buyout boom that ended in 2007, when investors bought overpriced assets with small down payments, Wende said.
 Last year, buyout firms accounted for about 6 percent of all investments in the market, compared with as much as 50 percent in the years leading up to the financial crisis, Savills estimates.
 Nations are being drawn by low yields before the Fed further reduces its $85 billion monthly bond-purchase program after deciding to trim its buying by $10 billion at its most recent meeting Dec.
 The rates are used by banks to determine the cost of borrowing for businesses, home-buyers and students.
 ThyssenKrupp AG added 15 percent after Swedish steelmaker SSAB AB offered to buy Finland’s Rautaruukki Oyj to cut its costs and improve competitiveness.
 The arrests of the sons of three government ministers amid a widening graft probe and the Federal Reserve’s decision to cut its $85 billion-a-month bond-buying program are threatening growth and political stability in an economy that has grown 5 percent annually under Recep Tayyip Erdogan’s decade-long premiership.
 “Sellers will rather wait around for higher multiples than what buyers will be willing to pay” Enterprise valuations of Turkish companies may shrink by as much as 30 percent this year, from an average of 12 times earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and amortization in 2013, said Basak Vardar, a corporate finance partner at Deloitte’s Turkey unit, in a news conference Jan.
 BlackRock Inc, the world’s biggest money manager, said late last year it’s seizing an opportunity to buy Turkish stocks after the turmoil drove down prices.
 last year tried to buy the company for about $3 billion, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Fiat rose the most in almost five years in Milan trading after Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent, struck an accord to buy a 415 percent stake from a United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Itau Unibanco Holding SA, Latin America’s biggest bank by market value, agreed to buy control of Chile’s Corpbanca for at least $22 billion in cash and stock.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Corpbanca’s $800 million bonds due 2018 instead of US.
 The merged bank will have 66 percent in Banco Corpbanca Colombia and will offer to buy the remaining stake for $894 million.
 There, Marchionne struck a deal to buy the 415 percent stake in Chrysler held by the UAW trust.
 Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler will pick up much of the tab for the stake buy, protecting Fiat’s cash reserves and sending the Italian company’s stock up 16 percent yesterday.
 It would cost Kamuloni 60 percent of his monthly security-guard salary of 15,000 kwacha ($3493) to buy a 50-kilogram (110-pound) bag of corn flour, enough to feed his family for a month.
 The family can no longer afford to eat three meals a day, and Kamuloni now buys only 1-kilo flour bags, he said.
 3 it planned to buy 150,000 tons of white corn from South Africa in addition to 150,000 tons from Zambia.
 For one, the plan now is activated if someone buys 10 percent of the shares, instead of 20 percent previously.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- South African Airways is in talks to buy a stake in Senegal Airlines as the continent’s biggest carrier seeks to counter expansion strategies at competitors Ethiopian Airlines Enterprise and Kenya Airways Ltd.
 The carmaker will issue as many as 241 million shares, including an overallotment of 2325 million shares, for 1,120 yen each and use the proceeds to buy back preferred stock held by companies that rescued the Tokyo-based carmaker, according to a filing yesterday.
 He has a “buy” rating on the company.
 Billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison agreed in June to buy O2, Ireland’s No.
 iPhones won over high-end handset buyers and models from cheaper Chinese producers lured budget customers.
 Last year, in what Peltz called a Plan A, he urged PepsiCo to buy Mondelez and spin off PepsiCo’s beverages business.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- The record pace of buybacks at America Movil SAB, billionaire Carlos Slim’s mobile-phone company, is likely to slow as acquisitions pick up and earnings stagnate.
 The buybacks helped keep America Movil shares from sinking in 2013, even after regulatory threats wiped out more than 20 percent of the stock’s value earlier in the year.
 America Movil has to substantially reduce buybacks “unless they’re willing to temporarily move outside of their debt ceiling,” she said.
 A press official for America Movil declined to comment on whether the company would continue aggressive buybacks and whether it would seek to buy part or all of Tim.
 The company spent about $14 billion on buybacks in 2012 and about $39 billion in 2011.
 While a spinoff may have tax advantages, a sale may fetch a higher valuation because strategic buyers that see cost-cutting opportunities would offer a premium, he said.
 China Accord “Although we believe conditions are supportive for record potash demand, achieving such levels will largely depend on consistent buyer engagement,” it said in today’s statement.
 Canpotex Ltd, the offshore marketing agent for Potash Corp, Mosaic and Agrium, agreed to sell 700,000 tons of potash to buyers in China in the first half of this year, according to a Jan.
 “It’s just a matter of time before the market caps of Hitachi and Canon flip,” said Nobuyuki Fujimoto, senior market analyst at SBI Securities Co, Japan’s biggest online brokerage.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Less than a month into 2014, big beverage companies have already spent almost three times as much buying competitors as they did all last year.
 Coming on the heels of the slowest year for alcoholic beverages deals in almost two decades, beermaker Anheuser-Busch InBev NV announced it would spend $58 billion to buy back Korea’s Oriental Brewery.
 The Japanese company offered to buy India’s United Spirits Ltd.
 Diageo failed to buy the Jose Cuervo brand from Mexico’s Beckmann family, its owners, saying in December 2012 that they were unable to agree on the price.
 It agreed to an option to buy back the maker of Cass beer five years later at pre-agreed terms of 11 times earnings before interest, taxation, depreciation and amortization, according to people familiar with the 2009 transaction.
 “All institutional investors we’ve met have told us it’s great we’re doing this in Prague because they have a lot of clients who want to buy a new Czech stock” Trading in Prague is dominated by shares of banks and energy companies, with no brewer currently listed.
 in Toronto, unlikely to buy the shares unless the price dips.
 Homeowners will get solar systems with SunPower panels at little to no upfront cost by agreeing to buy the electricity through long-term contracts, the San Jose, California-based company said today in a statement.
 Without the buyout, sales advanced 46 percent, higher than the gain in the global chocolate confectionery market, it said, citing Nielsen.
 consumers omitted PCs from their holiday shopping lists while buyers in Asia opted for smartphones and tablets.
 Growth in the PC market has become dependent on consumers and businesses replacing existing machines, rather than wooing new buyers.
 Enterprise demand is being driven in part by Microsoft Corp’s plan to end support for its 13-year-old Windows XP operating system in April, compelling businesses to buy new PCs along with software upgrades.
 The underwriter, Goldman Sachs Group Inc, kept some of the stake, according to a person familiar with the sale who asked not to be identified as buyer names aren’t made public.
 agreed to buy businesses making equipment used to grow cell lines and purify DNA from Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc.
 Thermo Fisher, the world’s biggest supplier of lab testing equipment by market value, agreed to sell the businesses in November to help get European regulatory approval for its $136 billion deal to buy Life Technologies Corp, which makes genetic testing and mapping equipment.
 Waertsilae also said that talks to buy all of the company are no longer active.
 The Finnish company has received interest from other potential buyers in the past, they said.
 The British company teamed up with Daimler AG to buy Germany’s Tognum AG in 2011 to gain the world’s second-biggest manufacturer of high-speed diesel engines for the marine, energy and defense industries.
 The owner of John Barras and Flaming Grill pub chains will start buying more pubs in the second half of the fiscal year, according to the statement.
 The loyalty card, which has been rolled out only to the Fayre & Square brand, spanning 150 pubs, will allow the pub company to keep track of what its guests buy and how often they visit.
 Ponce has already been charged with buying shares in the holding companies at below market prices and selling them back at inflated prices between 2009 and 2011.
 China Media Capital and the management team of Star China, owner of three 24-hour Mandarin-language TV networks, are buying Fox’s 47 percent stake in the venture, the companies said yesterday in a statement.
 Full repayment may be possible by the end of 2015, said ING’s Ploegh, who recommends clients buy the shares.
 Low borrowing costs and government incentives are fueling demand for property in Britain, where Acadametrics said a “universal recovery is really taking hold” The Bank of England has responded by curtailing mortgage aid to head off a potential bubble even as the government continues its plan to help first-time buyers.
 Finance Minister Bjarne Corydon has said Denmark must back the deal to avoid “gambling” with Dong’s future after some lawmakers questioned the bid and a former prime minister called Goldman a “shady partner” “We want to buy shares to defend our stake in Dong if the finance committee approves the agreement with Goldman, ATP and PFA,” Gert Vinther Joergensen, chief financial officer of Syd Energi A/S, said by phone.
 2 that the new buyers and the government have agreed to seek an IPO when “conditions are right” Syd Energi, a power company based in Esbjerg, has said it will invest 450 million kroner in connection with Goldman’s injection to maintain its current 35 percent stake in Dong.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Azimut Holding SpA, Italy’s largest independent asset manager, is interested in buying a fund unit from a bank to expand distribution and attract client investments.
 Fund Fees The average buyer can expect total fees, including up-front sales commissions, to equal about 35 percent of their investment, Jason Wilson, managing director of Incapital’s financial-services division, said in an interview.
 “They’re up against a more difficult comparison this year,” Philip Terpolilli, an Independence, Ohio-based analyst at Longbow Research who downgraded the stock to neutral from buy on Dec.
 who downgraded the stock to neutral from buy, wrote in a note to investors yesterday.
 “While we continue to believe in the story longer term, we are moving to the sidelines until we have greater clarity on the company’s gross margin issues” SodaStream benefits from the so-called razor-blade model of retailing where profits rely on customers repeatedly buying complementary products such as carbonation cannisters and flavors.
 video-game maker was rated buy in new coverage by CRT Capital Group LLC.
 Twitter now has the equivalent of 11 sell ratings, 11 holds and six buys from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Facebook, LinkedIn Twitter isn’t delivering the same results as Facebook and LinkedIn, according to a survey of advertising buyers by the Cowen analysts.
 who has a buy rating on the stock.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Telkom SA SOC Ltd, Africa’s largest fixed-line operator, has received a proposal that would see $3 billion spent on buying and expanding its mobile infrastructure, South African-based BusinessTech reported, citing a document it obtained.
 An unidentified southeast Asian company wants to buy as many as 1,600 Telkom mobile towers with a plan to build another 8,400 towers, the news website said today.
 Apple typically buys lesser-known startups, then shuts down the services and integrates the technology into future products.
 Capstone executives, based around the world, have worked on deals such as the buyout of retailer Dollar General Corp, which returned more than four times KKR’s money, as well as investments in Energy Future Holdings Corp.
 Private-equity firms, which earn most of their money by buying companies and selling them three to six years later at a profit, have increased their use of consultants and operational executives as industrywide returns have declined.
 Lithuania, which relies on Gazprom for all its natural gas, is battling to reduce prices it says are at least a quarter more than other European buyers pay.
 “Investors are doing follow-up buying in technology stocks after Infosys’ results due to higher conviction about improvement in their business,” ICICI Securities’ Dharia said.
 (SIRI), thesatellite-radio company weighing a buyout offer from LibertyMedia Corp, said it surpassed its target for subscriber growthlast year.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- PPF Group NV, the Czech financial group controlled by billionaire Petr Kellner, said its buyout offer for all outstanding shares of Telefonica Czech Republic AS will be based on 305625 koruna a share, at which the stock was purchased from Spain’s Telefonica SA.
 PPF agreed to buy a controlling stake in Telefonica Czech for about $34 billion from Spain’s Telefonica, returning the country’s biggest phone company to local ownership after eight years.
 Raymond James boosted the Duluth, Georgia-based insurer to strong buy from outperform while raising the price target to $51 from $46.
 Because firms have until 2018 to comply, they don’t need to raise capital immediately and can meet the new requirements by delaying share buybacks or dividend increases.
 Chief Executive Officers are buying new machinery and investing in real estate as a US.
 “They bought themselves a major enhancement to their franchise in Texas and an option in California,” said Todd Vencil, an analyst with Sterne, Agee & Leach Inc, who has a buy rating on Martin Marietta and a neutral rating on Texas Industries.
 The board also approved $4 billion of share buybacks from asset-sale proceeds, of which $500 million was repurchased in the third quarter, according to a Nov.
 It’s still a buying opportunity” Spanish 10-year yields dropped five basis points, or 005 percentage point, to 377 percent at 4:30 pm.
 “That’s why we are buying the stock at these levels” The PIC, a manager of South African civil-servant pension funds that’s also the continent’s biggest money manager, raised its stake in the maker of Panado painkillers and Corenza cold medicine to 22 percent last month from 19 percent.
 “I wouldn’t be shocked if our next move in emerging markets was to be a buyer before this year is out” The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index advanced 30 percent last year as the MSCI Emerging Markets Index lost 5 percent amid concerns that higher interest rates could derail growth.
 that failure to meet obligations to buy clean electricity by March 31 would lead to the daily penalty.
 Calgary-based Canadian Natural put the holding up for sale in March and said at the time it would sell or partner with a buyer that has LNG expertise.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Barclays Plc and UBS AG are telling investors to buy Bezeq shares even as the Israeli government says a planned shakeup of the telecommunications industry may cost the company more than half a million customers.
 Analysts are split on Bezeq’s stock, with five recommending to buy, five to sell, and three to hold, according to a Bloomberg survey.
 Alpha Investment Partners Ltd, a unit of Singapore-based Keppel Land Ltd, is among overseas firms interested to buy in Japan.
 I am very optimistic” J-REITs Buying J-REITs were among the biggest property buyers in 2013 as a 36 percent gain in the Tokyo Stock Exchange REIT Index made it easier to sell equity.
 Mori Trust Sogo REIT Inc, which invests in office and commercial properties, in April acquired a building in Shibuya that houses the flagship store of Swedish retailer Hennes & Mauritz AB for 32 billion yen, with an estimated net operating income of 136 billion yen, according to a statement.
 CLSA Capital Partners, which has $26 billion under management including real estate, is also seeking to buy, said Tokyo-based Hirotaka Uchiyama, head of Japan for Fudo Capital, manager of CLSA’s Asian real estate investment funds.
 28-29, in December announced a reduction of $10 billion in its monthly bond-buying program to $75 billion, citing a recovery in the labor market.
 Interest-rates trading involves buying and selling products including US.
 Signs of a sustained economic pickup fueled bets the Fed will continue to reduce bond-buying that has spurred fund flows to emerging markets.
 28-29, downsized its monthly debt-buying program in January by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- AerCap Holdings NV’s $5 billion deal last month to buy International Lease Finance Corp.
 I don’t think you’ll see a lot more consolidation, it’s hard to do” AerCap’s agreement to buy Los Angeles-based ILFC from insurer American International Group Inc, which gets a 46 percent stake in the merged business, will create a lessor with 1,329 planes, narrowing the gap to General Electric Co-owned market leader Gecas, which has 1,635 aircraft.
 spent $11 billion to buy Oaktree Capital Group LLC’s Jackson Square Aviation, and Babcock & Brown Aircraft Management sold a 50 percent stake to Canada’s Onex Corp.
 “We now have clarity with a blue-chip buyer, which contrasts with a murkiness before” Avolon, controlled by private equity firms including Oak Hill Capital, Cinven Ltd.
 and CVC Capital Partners Ltd, is looking at a timeframe of two years or so for going public or finding a buyer, Higgins said.
 OUE Ltd, the Singapore developer that last year agreed to buy California’s tallest building, is weighing investments in New York and Miami as it branches into the US.
 Property companies in Hong Kong and Singapore, the most-expensive Asian cities to buy a luxury residence, are venturing overseas as governments enact tighter lending restrictions and local mortgage rates are set to rise.
 Hong Kong has raised the minimum mortgage down payment six times since 2010 and imposed taxes including a doubling of the stamp duty on deals of more than HK$2 million ($258,000) in February, plus an extra 15 percent levy on non-resident buyers.
 “The motivation for Asian buyers to seek investments in the US.
 London Homes Oxley, a Singapore-based property developer, plans to build 3,400 homes in London after buying the 40-acre (16-hectare) Royal Wharf site at the Royal Docks on the banks of the River Thames from Ballymore Properties Holdings Ltd.
 The buyback plan is the company’s first since 2007 as Chief Executive Officer Barry Zyskind seeks to regain Wall Street’s confidence.
 “We have never sold any shares and, on the contrary, have been buyers of the stock” AmTrust’s board in 2007 authorized repurchasing as many as 3 million shares.
 Nyfix, SuperFeed, Wombat and Metabit will be offered to potential buyers through presentations in the second half of this month, said one of the people, who asked not to be named because the matter is private.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 31 federal contractor, said it would buy the parent of Beechcraft Corp; and No.
 “When you buy a company, you reduce your overhead costs across both companies,” Friel said.
 “You also buy your way into other markets” Election Issue The ongoing spending cuts required by sequestration could become an issue in this fall’s congressional elections, said Loren Thompson, a defense analyst with the Lexington Institute, an Arlington, Virginia-based research organization.
 Investors should buy UBS AG, while Morgan Stanley and Credit Suisse Group AG were given hold ratings, analysts including Andrew Lim wrote in a note today that began coverage of the five firms.
 Schamis, a former managing director at buyout firm JC.
 “Investors that buy into the new bond would benefit if there’s any improved tone from Moody’s on Jan.
 Goldman Sachs downgraded Europe’s second-biggest semiconductor maker to neutral from buy.
 “Companies need name recognition to attract European buyers.
 They’ll recognize Petrobras, BNDES, but they won’t be willing to buy high-yield names” ‘Offers Value’ Caracas-based multinational Corporacion Andina de Fomento, which provides international financial services to support economic development in Latin America, issued 275 million Swiss francs ($303 million) of securities due 2024 earlier this week.
 central bank decided at its December gathering to begin cutting its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $75 billion.
 Fed policy makers, who start a two-day meeting today, will probably cut another $10 billion from their monthly bond-buying program, according to the median estimate of economists surveyed by Bloomberg this month.
 Cebu Air, majority owned by JG Summit Holdings Inc, will buy the 40 percent Tiger Air owns in Southeast Asian Airlines Inc, Tiger Air said in a statement to the Singapore stock exchange today.
 Tiger Air will nominate Cebu Air to buy the remaining 60 percent stake in Southeast Asian from other shareholders, the airline said in the statement.
 “There does not seem to be tangible evidence to validate negative claims targeted at the company thus far” Tong, based in New York, recommends buying the shares, citing strong cash flow.
 That’s prompted acquisitions such as network-equipment maker Cisco Systems Inc’s deal in October to buy Sourcefire Inc.
 The financial engineering that the activist alludes to is just not available” Engine Capital still may win the support of enough shareholders to get its board slate elected, and management could respond by buying back stock or paying a dividend, Damas said.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar is buying oil and gas fields from Brazil to the Congo as the biggest liquefied natural-gas producer sees fewer energy developments at home.
 QPI also teamed up with Centrica Plc in April to buy gas fields in Canada from Suncor Energy Inc.
 “Qatar is buying stuff because they’ve got money to spend: It’s called diversification,” Tom James, a Dubai-based managing director at Navitas Resources Ltd, an adviser on energy and commodity markets, said today in a telephone interview.
 Qatar used income from rising LNG sales in the past few years to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, the UK’s second-biggest bank, and Volkswagen AG, Europe’s largest automobile maker.
 said it failed to gain support from enough shareholders to enable it to buy the German drug wholesaler.
 Hess will continue to seek a buyer for the unit while pursuing the spinoff, which may occur this year, said Dennis Moynihan, a company spokesman.
 The business may be worth $2 billion, although a competitor seeking to re-brand the outlets might pay less, said Gheit, who rates Hess shares a buy and owns none.
 The company agreed last month to pay $290 million to buy out its partners in Hess Wilco Holdings, in which it held a 44 percent stake.
 After the separation, the unit would buy 75 to 80 percent of its fuel from third parties under long-term contracts, with the rest bought on spot markets.
 “Logitech’s operating result was clearly above marketexpectations,” Andreas Mueller, an analyst at ZuercherKantonalbank AG in Zurich with a buy rating on the stock, wrotein a note to clients today.
 Chevron is working with Jefferies Group LLC to find buyers for at least four natural gas and crude oil pipeline operations, said two of the people, who asked not to be named because the process is private.
 It’s also seeking buyers for a gas storage facility in West Texas, a crude oil terminal close to the Gulf of Mexico, and at least one of its pipelines in Louisiana, this person said.
 The Fed cut its bond-buying for a second meeting, paring stimulus that had increased demand for riskier assets.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 The borrowings have been used to finance some of the biggest buyouts in history including the purchase of Energy Future Holdings Corp.
 CLOs, a type of collateralized debt obligation that pool high-yield, high-risk loans and slice them into securities of varying risk and returns, were the largest buyers of leveraged loans in the third quarter, with a 52 percent market share, according to the New York-based LSTA.
 solar-panel manufacturer, began building a 22-megawatt power plant in West Texas before lining up a buyer for the electricity.
 “It is unusual for a project like this to be built purely on spec, without a buyer identified,” Molchanov said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 While pot prices doubled after people waited in line to buy legal marijuana earlier this month in Colorado, retailers that previously supplied only medical marijuana face rising costs from licensing and compliance requirements, according to Brooke Gehring, owner of Patients Choice of Colorado, a four-shop chain.
 The buying and selling of off-plan properties for a quick profit, known as flipping, was seen as a major cause of the crash.
 Speculation Fodder In Dubai, buyers usually put down a deposit of about 10 percent on off-plan homes and make additional payments as construction proceeds, with a final sum due when the property is delivered.
 The Land Department raised the transaction fee to 4 percent from 2 percent and the United Arab Emirates Central Bank imposed restrictions on the value of mortgages made available to foreign buyers.
 “Don’t look at buying property as though you’re buying shares on the stock market,” Bin Mejren said.
 “If you buy a property here, hold on to it, because by 2020 the city will be entirely different from what it’s today” To contact the reporter on this story: Dana El Baltaji in Dubai at delbaltaji@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Andrew Blackman at ablackman@bloombergnet; Andrew J.
 The stock has gained 21 percent since the drugmaker said in July that it would buy Irish drug company Elan for $86 billion.
 8 after announcing it will buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion.
 Greg Barnes, an analyst at TD Securities Inc, raised his rating for Cameco to a buy from a hold and increased his price target to C$31 from C$22.
 The stock has 14 buys, five holds and one sell, with a 12-month average price target of C$2589, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The CGL deal will help ICA cut debt while lightening its investment obligations in future penitentiary projects, said McGoey, who has a buy recommendation on the shares.
 “Producing the vehicle in Chattanooga would help VW balance capacity utilization for this plant, which so far only relies on the Passat model” Schwarz recommends buying VW shares.
 Buyback, Dividend Delta last year began a share buyback program and reinstated a dividend after a decade-long break.
 Clinton Group wrote a letter to Violin’s board last month telling the company that it should seek to sell itself to a strategic buyer.
 He said that he doesn’t know the identity of potential buyers and added that the manufacturer received offers of more than $700 million prior to its September IPO.
 “We’re not ruling anything out” Discovery will increase its stake in Societe Television Francaise 1’s Eurosport to 51 percent from 20 percent, with a possibility to buy the rest of it should TF1 exercise a put option over the remaining 49 percent, the companies said in a joint statement yesterday.
 Following a number of takeovers in past years, including buying BBC Worldwide out of its joint venture in Animal Planet in 2010, Zaslav said Discovery would invest in existing businesses and look “opportunistically for additional assets” Shares Rise Shares in Societe Television Francaise rose as much as 61 percent in Paris trading and were 32 percent higher at 1480 euros as of 9:27 am.
 The gains have been fueled by a BOE pledge to hold its key interest rate at 05 percent, an improving economy, and the government’s help-to-buy program for first-time buyers, raising economists’ concern that the combination of measures is too much.
 The program enables buyers to take out a loan with a down payment of as little as 5 percent on all homes valued up to 600,000 pounds.
 “This is no longer a recovery led by affluent second homebuyers with high equity or by government support of first time buyers,” said Pete Redfern, chief executive officer of High Wycombe, England-based Taylor Wimpey Plc, the UK’s second-biggest homebuilder by market value.
 “Interest rates are very low and house prices are rising which is increasing buyer interest.
 now confronts a new challenge: preventing higher insurance rates and a dearth of mechanics equipped to repair its body from deterring buyers.
 Ford is betting buyers will accept what it estimates will be a 10 percent jump in costs to insure the pickup in return for improved fuel economy, towing and payload.
 Truck Loyalty Even if the F-150’s residuals fall, which would make it more costly for buyers to lease the truck or dent the value of a pickup that’s traded in, Ford’s broader risks are limited, said Dominique.
 The stalemate drew the attention of the French government last year, with Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg seeking a buyer for the plant.
 Why don’t they just go and rob a bunch of French banks and they could end up buying Goodyear? They’re crazy.
 Hogan said last week that he’s also looking for purchases in the Americas -- as well as China -- to round out a strategy of buying stakes to help funnel traffic through the Abu Dhabi hub.
 Investors have expressed interest in buying a stake in the lender, Deputy Economy Minister Fernando Jimenez Latorre said last week.
 to find a buyer, people said last month.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Montreal agreed to buy F&C Asset Management Plc, the manager of the oldest UK.
 Authentic Brands agreed to buy Juicy’s intellectual property for $195 million, Fifth & Pacific said in a statement Oct.
 organic food company, said it will buy Tilda Ltd, which produces Basmati rice, for about 217 million pounds ($357 million) including cash and shares to expand its business.
 Among its revamped venues, the Wheatsheaf at Borough Market is proving a hit with hip music and a garden where customers can smoke, buy drinks from a VW van and order mussels.
 analyst Jacob Steinfeld wrote yesterday in a research report, cutting the bonds to neutral from the equivalent of buy.
 rates when repatriated for dividends and buybacks.
 The results were boosted by Pfizer’s stock buyback programs.
 The company said it plans to buy back another $5 billion shares in 2014.
 “You can buy these global pharma franchises that have great pipelines and are well managed for half the multiples that you pay for” Gilead Sciences Inc.
 “That may have triggered short sellers to cover their short positions, driving up the stock price” ETF Slides In a short sale, an investor borrows a security and sells it, expecting to profit from a decline by buying it back at a lower price.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, the Japanese whiskey and soft-drinks company controlled by billionaire Nobutada Saji, offered to buy out the entire Whyte & Mackay business from United Spirits Ltd, CNBC TV18 reported today, citing people it didn’t identify.
 The Osaka-based company, which last week said it’s buying US.
 13 agreed to pay $16 billion to buy Beam Inc, to gain brands such as Maker’s Mark whiskey and create the world’s third-largest premium spirits company.
 Vivian Imerman, a former chief executive officer of Whyte & Mackay who had earlier expressed interest in buying back the unit, has not submitted a formal bid, CNBC said.
 After starting up PetroTiger in Colombia in 2007, Sigelman joined a group of investors to buy the Atlantic, Gulf & Pacific Co.
 Sergio Marchionne, Chief Executive Officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent Fiat SpA, struck a deal with workers earlier this month to buy a 415 percent stake of the carmaker from the trust.
 21 that Apple is at the “beginning of a new cycle of growth and innovation” She has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 “Apple products were a holiday gift of choice,” said Brian Marshall, an analyst at ISI Group, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 One question investors are asking is whether the iPhone’s hefty price tag in China will hold down sales, said Walter Piecyk, an analyst at BTIG LLC in New York, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Icahn, who has been pressuring the company to boost its buyback plan, last week revealed that he had increased his stake in Apple to about $36 billion and reiterated a call for a $50 billion share repurchase in fiscal 2014.
 Last February, company founder Leonard Riggio, 72, who is also the chain’s chairman and largest shareholder, announced his intention to buy Barnes & Noble’s website and physical stores.
 Liberty made a $17-a-share, or about $1 billion, buyout bid for Barnes & Noble in May 2011 before withdrawing and buying a 17 percent stake for $204 million and securing two board seats.
 “The store business is still extremely profitable,” said Tinker, who recommends buying the shares.
 title insurer, rose in New York trading after Janney Capital Markets recommended investors buy the stock to profit from a recovering housing market.
 Owners in Gassled, Norway’s gas-pipeline network, have said they would refuse to buy stakes in Polarled from the oil companies building it after the country’s new government maintained plans to cut the tariffs operators can charge for gas transportation by as much as 90 percent.
 Accumulators commit investors to buy securities at preset prices for a specified time.
 Memos for the sale of the French supplier of antioxidants and pet-food additives will be sent next week, with buyout firm PAI Partners SAS and Naturex of France among interested parties, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the plans are private.
 Rohatyn plans to give investors in two CVCI funds the option to sell their holdings to other buyers, who would provide fresh capital for new deals, said one of the people.
 CVCI Stakes Rohatyn, which is interviewing advisers to manage the sales process, is exploring a deal in response to increasing market demand to buy private-equity holdings through the secondary market, said one of the people familiar with the matter.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Groupe Lactalis SA, the maker of President brand cheeses, agreed to buy Indian dairy producer Tirumala Milk Products Pvt.
 Carlyle, the world’s second-biggest buyout firm, invested $22 million in the Indian company in 2010.
 New Buy UBS AG gave it a new buy recommendation earlier this week with a 12-month share-price estimate of $110, and Deutsche Bank AG reiterated a buy rating.
 India’s cabinet in October approved a proposal by Abu Dhabi-based Etihad Airways to buy a 24 percent stake in Jet, paving the way for the first share sale by a carrier in the Asian nation to a foreign airline since restrictions were eased.
 Diageo, the maker of Johnnie Walker whisky and Smirnoff vodka, agreed last year to buy a controlling stake in Mallya’s United Spirits.
 Canadian consumers, who took advantage of low interest rates and led the recovery by buying houses and cars, now face record levels of debt as a share of income.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd, the world’s most profitable lender, agreed to buy control of Standard Bank Group Ltd’s markets unit to expand in trading spanning commodities and interest rates to currencies.
 The option becomes available two years after the deal is completed and if ICBC takes up the right, Standard Bank can require the lender to buy the remaining stake.
 China also approved an 80 billion yuan ($132 billion) quota for investors in London to buy onshore assets, Osborne said at that time in a move aimed at bolstering the Asian nation’s efforts to internationalize the renminbi and helping London further its ambition to become Europe’s leading offshore yuan hub.
 “These officers absolutely didn’t do anything wrong” Mulligan, 54, testified at trial about the “pure fear” he experienced the night in May 2012 when he was trying to run from the two officers, who he said took him to a motel against his will after he went to buy some cannabis gel caps at a medical marijuana dispensary.
 company to buy as much as $10 billion a year in generic drugs for distribution, compared with $6 billion to $7 billion on its own.
 24 it agreed to buy the 5001 percent stake in Celesio held by Franz Haniel & Cie GmbH, a family-owned investment company, for 23 euros a share, and begin a tender offer for the remaining publicly traded shares at the same price.
 Since Walgreen Co’s 2012 deal to buy 45 percent of Alliance Boots, the owner of the largest UK.
 Lingering Penalty Natalie Neyer, a spokeswoman for Metro Bank, the buyer of the notes and a unit of Harrisburg-based Metro Bancorp Inc, declined to comment.
 is buying for $32 billion, Dorsey said.
 The buyout firms have asked investment banks to submit proposals next week on possibilities for the business which may include an initial public offering or trade sale, the people said.
 to what was the country’s biggest buyout in eight years.
 Google said yesterday that it’s buying Nest Labs Inc, the digital thermostat maker led by Tony Fadell, a former Apple senior vice president, for $32 billion in cash.
 “Google has done extraordinarily well with the technology behind a lot of different things, including Android and search,” said Ben Schachter, an analyst with Macquarie Securities, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 “They’re already delivering amazing products you can buy right now,” Page wrote yesterday in a statement.
 6 it was in exclusive talks with Wing Hang’s biggest shareholders to buy the bank in what would be its largest acquisition, surpassing the $28 billion OCBC paid in 2001 for Keppel Capital Holdings Ltd.
 If you want to buy something online with your Visa card for $1,000, Visa (and some banks) does that work, but it doesn't explicitly charge you a fee.
 Bitcoin is quite a bit better yet: If you buy something using Bitcoins, neither the buyer nor the seller normally pays any transaction fees2 Instead, the transaction is processed by the network of Bitcoin miners, who do the work of confirming transactions -- plus some extra cryptographic makework! -- in exchange for some Bitcoins.
 One is that this isn't a transaction fee, in that it isn't paid by the buyers or sellers.
 I'm mostly interested in the way that Bitcoin has found a way to compensate transaction processors without charging a fee directly to the buyers or sellers.
 That's neat, but I'm not sure it means that there's no cost to the buyers or sellers.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Oando Plc, a Nigerian oil producer and fuel retailer, raised $163 billion to buy ConocoPhillips’s assets in the country as foreign energy explorers retreat.
 GDF Chief Executive Officer Gerard Mestrallet said at a press conference in Paris that GDF hadn’t bid to buy the Canadian oil and gas producer.
 While drip coffee has won a following, the company’s hot espresso drinks haven’t caught on and many franchisees balked at remodeling costs and buying $13,000 espresso machines.
 Pushing coffee is “probably a good idea if they can get their customer to buy more of it,” said Peter Saleh, a New York-based analyst at Telsey Advisory Group.
 “It’s entirely possible that they have trained consumers to just buy Christmas presents at the last second, and weren’t prepared for the logistical issues,” Pachter said.
 Among analysts tracked by Bloomberg, 36 recommend buying Amazon shares and 11 have hold ratings, while none suggest selling the stock.
 That’s because refiners outside North America typically buy oil based on the price of Brent crude, a North Sea grade that last year cost an average of almost $11 a barrel more than West Texas Intermediate, the US.
 added 24 percent after agreeing to buy digital-thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 28-29, last month announced a reduction in its monthly bond-buying program, citing a recovery in the labor market.
 was boosted to buy from neutral by Goldman Sachs.
 added 24 percent to $1,14940, an all-time high, after saying it will buy Nest Labs.
 As Miami home prices are the highest since 2008, the extra yield investors demand to buy Miami general obligations rather than benchmark munis has decreased, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Schroeder, who hasn’t held the city’s debt for several years, said he would consider buying should its finances improve further.
 The company cited improving revenue, mostly from rebounding property values as overseas buyers pile in.
 The rebound is being led by overseas residents who flocked to the city to buy discounted condos after the property crash and have since financed new construction, said Peter Zalewski, owner of Condo Vultures LLC, a Miami-based brokerage and consulting firm.
 This time, buyers are putting up cash deposits to fund the building before completion, instead of developers relying on bank loans.
 “It’s occurring simply because of the Latin American buyers and the European buyers, who are willing to put down cash,” Zalewski said.
 Cash Payments Foreigners paying cash made up at least 75 percent of the buyers at BrickellHouse, a 374-unit downtown high-rise slated to open this year, said Harvey Hernandez, who is overseeing the project as chairman of Miami-based Newgard Development Group.
 Henry Pino, founder of Miami-based developer Strategic Properties, said 95 percent of buyers at his two planned condo projects are international investors paying cash.
 “Carriage fees are an ongoing area of contention,” King, who recommends buying DirecTV shares, wrote in an e-mail.
 Yelp, the service for online restaurant and business reviews, is succeeding at getting advertisers to buy their promotions in most US.
 Fiat, which gained full control of Chrysler earlier this week after buying the remaining 415 percent holding, intends to decide on details of a merger on Jan.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- The Ibovespa rebounded from a two-week low, paring a weekly drop as Oi SA rallied on speculation that the phone company may buy some assets from Tim Participacoes SA.
 Concern has waned that companies won’t be able to repay bank loans used to finance a boom in leveraged buyouts before the financial crisis, according to Barclays Plc.
 Their estimate excludes Dallas-based Energy Future Holdings Corp, the subject of the largest leveraged-buyout in history, which has signaled it may need to file for bankruptcy protection.
 Credit swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Ergen is accused of surreptitiously buying LightSquareddebt and blocking attempts to reveal who was behind thepurchases.
 He has said he made no “falserepresentations” about the purchases and has called the suit anattempt to derail his offer to buy LightSquared’s assets.
 In 2008, Dish sought to buy spectrum of the satellitecommunications company DBSD North America.
 The small-cap measure has gotten a boost from rule changes that require investors to have existing stock holdings before participating in IPOs and allow insurers to buy shares of smaller companies.
 who rates the company the equivalent of buy, said today in an phone interview.
 upgraded the French carmaker to outperform, similar to a buy rating, from market perform.
 Citigroup upgraded its rating on the company to buy from neutral.
 Spain’s rental market is growing as government-spending cuts, a 26 percent jobless rate and subdued mortgage lending make home buying more difficult.
 “With this latest cold wave coming in, all guns are blazing, people are buying gas anywhere they can find it, and that includes southern Alberta,” said Martin King, an analyst with FirstEnergy Capital Corp.
 Chief Executive Officer Hubert Joly, in a bid to stop customers from defecting to online rivals such as Amazoncom Inc, has piled on discounts and made permanent a policy of matching competitors’ prices to cut down on the practice known as “showrooming,” when shoppers use Best Buy stores to scout products they later buy online elsewhere.
 A 12-bottle lot of Romanee-Conti 1978 sold to a Chinese buyer for HK$3675 million ($474,000) at Christie’s in Hong Kong on Nov.
 The format is aimed at clients buying wines valued at below 1,000 pounds a case and the company plans to hold 12 online-only auctions in 2014, six in the US.
 “We hope to be able to have the first patient in phase three in the summer” Novartis AG is considering whether to buy the rights to the product from Illkirch, France-based Transgene, which stands to get as much as 700 million euros ($951 million) from the deal.
 surged the most on the Nikkei 225 Stock Average amid speculation investors were buying shares to cover short positions.
 While it’s not easy for shares to rise, investors are buying when they fall” Futures on the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index added 01 percent today.
 “The drop in foreign buying of Japanese stocks set the tone this morning for the Tokyo market” Foreign investors sold a net 287 billion yen in Japanese shares in the week ended Jan.
 Goldman Sachs raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, and boosted its target price to 570 yen from 485 yen.
 Aer Lingus Group Plc, Ireland’s second-biggest airline, carried 96 million passengers in 2013, similar to the year-earlier tally, according to a statement from the Dublin-based company, which Ryanair has been prevented from buying by antitrust regulators after building up a 30 percent stake.
 Pension funds and insurance companies like to buy long-dated securities to match their liabilities while utilities can align the debt with their industrial assets.
 “Times come round when 100-year bonds make sense because that’s what investors want to buy,” said Bill Blain, a strategist at Mint Partners Ltd.
 “People are looking for long-dated assets because the repayments that are made over the life of the bond help match the buyer’s liabilities” As part of its fundraising this week, EDF issued $54 billion of hybrid notes in dollars, euros and pounds, one year after selling $85 billion of the securities combining elements of debt and equity, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 middle-market buyout fund stakes, they said.
 27 told customers that they can sell their rights to unidentified buyers to recoup the principal.
 “Many other shareholders, they want to buy more, so it’s not difficult” PetroVietnam Fertilizer shares dropped 07 percent to 46,200 at the close in Ho Chi Minh City.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Clariant AG plans to sell a South African-based business supplying chemicals for treating water and is in talks with potential buyers, according to two people with knowledge of the situation.
 AECI said in a e-mailed statement that it has identified the water treatment process, equipment and chemicals industry as a strategic growth area and is evaluating “opportunities to advance its footprint in this sector on an on-going basis” A buyer of Clariant’s South African water business may use the asset to expand in the African market for treating industrial waste water, tapping growth in the local mining industry.
 BNP is also in talks with Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc to buy the British lender’s equity derivatives and retail structured products unit.
 auto task force that helped rebuild the Detroit-based automaker, has said activist investors may push for more dividend payouts or stock buybacks.
 Hayman Capital In September, the company announced an effort to buy almost half of the United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust’s preferred shares, which paid a 9 percent annual interest, and replacing it with a bond offering.
 Brian Johnson, an auto analyst for Barclays Plc, has said that GM has sufficient cash and liquidity to pay an annual dividend of 40 cents a share and repurchase stock in addition to buying back remaining common shares owned by the Canadian government and a union health-care trust.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Eduardo Eurnekian agreed to buy Eike Batista’s stake in a semiconductor venture as the Argentine billionaire expands in Latin America’s largest economy.
 Too often, luxury companies adopt a one-size-fits-all approach to design, distribution and communication when the people who buy high-end goods are increasingly heterogeneous, Bain said today in a study of about 10,000 luxury consumers, “A standard approach cannot work any more,” said Bain, which conducted the study with broker Redburn Partners and researcher Millward Brown.
 They like to shop in multibrand stores, feel more comfortable buying big brands and are very price sensitive, Bain said.
 Zynga is the latest merchant to accept Bitcoins, which can be used to buy virtual items in games.
 Victoria’s Secret Stores LLC has signed up with Gyft, an app that lets users buy gift cards with Bitcoins.
 The virtual currency can also be traded without being tracked, potentially reducing banking-transaction fees and making it an attractive tender for those seeking to buy and sell via the Web or in stores.
 Rising mortgage rates and advances in home prices may be leading to caution among prospective homebuyers, which may prove temporary, according to Jeffrey Mezger, chief executive officer of homebuilder KB Home in Los Angeles.
 “During the last half of the year, higher mortgage rates, higher home prices and lower consumer confidence due to uncertainty in Washington triggered a pause among homebuyers who are now being more cautious as they consider their purchase,” he said during a Dec.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Banks are considering an overhaul of London’s century-old gold benchmark used by miners, jewelers and central banks to buy, sell and value the precious metal, according to a person with knowledge of the process.
 Representatives of the five member banks spend from a few minutes to more than an hour on the telephone discussing buying and selling gold.
 London time, firms declare how many bars of gold they want to buy or sell at the current spot price, based on orders from clients as well as their own account.
 The price is increased or reduced until the buy and sell amounts are within 50 bars, or about 620 kilograms, of each other, at which point the fixing is agreed on.
 Traders relay shifts in supply and demand to clients during the calls and take fresh orders to buy or sell as the price changes, according to the website of London Gold Market Fixing Ltd, where results are published.
 It will continue in the fixings until a buyer for its seat is found, a person familiar with the plan said at the time.
 Huang rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 The firm has sought to entice investors through buybacks and dividends, returning $11 billion to shareholders in 2012 and the first nine months of 2013, more than double the combined total of Citigroup, Bank of America and Morgan Stanley.
 “It’s just a different philosophy” Tax Fuel While the town would find demand for long-term debt among investors such as mutual funds, it doesn’t need those buyers because the state’s tax levels stoke individual investors’ appetite for tax-free debt, Mansour said.
 (And you might use the savings to hedge those cash flows, by buying credit default swaps on him or whatever) That's pretty sensible.
 If you buy an option for $10 million, based on Black-Scholes pricing, then in theory you should make $10 million over the life of the option, plus maybe some reasonable bid/ask or profit margin.
 Money saved would buy dairy products for distribution to the poor -- another way to reduce inventories.
 in 2007 to start a hedge fund, he considered buying delinquent mortgages to profit from the US.
 Sherr’s One William Street Capital Management LP, a $27 billion investment firm, is starting a fund to buy non-performing loans, or NPLs, tied to delinquent borrowers who haven’t yet lost their homes to foreclosure, according to a letter to investors obtained by Bloomberg.
 HUD offers the loans at a significant discount to the unpaid principal balance with the expectation that buyers will try to modify the loan terms or take other actions to prevent neighborhoods from being swamped with vacant homes.
 He named the investment firm after the former address of Lehman’s headquarters in New York with plans to buy mortgages, credit-default swaps and other bonds.
 The firm weighs buying soured debt or foreclosed homes to turn into rentals depending on the location.
 “There are certain areas where we may might want to buy a house, where we may not be able to necessarily get the NPL,” said Vranos, who founded Ellington in 1994.
 The Bank of Japan is buying more than 7 trillion yen ($67 billion) of government bonds each month as Abe and BOJ Governor Haruhiko Kuroda strive to end 15 years of deflation and hit a target of 2 percent inflation.
 While Rutledge publicly stresses that Charter doesn’t need to buy other operators to grow, Time Warner Cable is a very attractive target, he said.
 He convinced Cablevision that buying Bresnan would be an efficient way to add subscribers, as well as giving it more leverage when negotiating with TV programmers over licensing fees, according to a person familiar with the deal.
 Pengrowth Energy added 64 percent to C$717, the highest close in 16 months, after Aaron Bilkoski, analyst at TD Securities, raised his rating for the stock to buy from hold.
 Pengrowth has seven buys, nine holds and four sells, data collected by Bloomberg show.
 “We are being very judicious about who we select,” to buy in Nigeria, Amegashie said.
 OSX is already seeking buyers for its other two platforms after the oil fields where Batista planned to deploy the ships failed to produce crude.
 He rates Medtronic as outperform, which is equivalent to a buy rating.
 The pair had used the cards to buy merchandise at such national chains as Wal-Mart Stores Inc, Best Buy Corp.
 The law set up government-run insurance exchanges where Americans can buy private health plans with the help of federal tax credits.
 “Utilities are really starting to buy a lot of distillate because of regional natural gas shortages,” Tom Finlon, director of Energy Analytics Group Ltd, said by phone from Jupiter, Florida.
 Goldcorp, the world’s second-largest producer of the metal, dropped 1 percent after offering to buy Osisko for about C$26 billion ($238 billion) in cash and shares.
 Goldcorp, Osisko Goldcorp slumped 1 percent to C$2504 after it made an unsolicited offer to buy Osisko in a deal that would add 10 million ounces of gold reserves and make it the largest producer in Quebec.
 Ben Cherniavsky, analyst with Raymond James Ltd, lowered his rating for the stock from “strong buy” to “outperform,” the equivalent of a buy.
 “We are due for a correction,” said Peter Sorrentino, who helps manage about $148 billion at Huntington Asset Advisors in Cincinnati and is buying options to protect against a decline in the stock market.
 Thornburg Investment Management Inc’s Jason Brady is buying bonds more aggressively, while Huntington Asset Advisors’ Sorrentino is selling call options, a bet stock gains will be limited, to finance the purchase of protective puts.
 The firm may also look to make money by buying and selling securities related to potential European Central Bank moves to fight deflation.
 It rallied 25 percent in 2013 as the European Central Bank pledged to keep interest rates low for a prolonged period and the Federal Reserve’s decision to slow the pace of its bond-buying program increased investors’ confidence in the US.
 17 stock price, thanks to options he received to buy shares at what is now a deep discount.
 They let Slim buy shares for $636 apiece, less than half Times Co’s $1522 close last week in New York trading.
 That gives Slim $894 in potential profit for each of the 159 million shares he’s allowed to buy.
 Rather than hurry to sell off businesses for cash amid the chaos of the global financial crisis, the company made the deal with Slim, giving it breathing room it used to eventually find buyers for units such as Aboutcom and the Boston Globe.
 Daunting Task The company still faces a daunting task in vying for subscribers and advertising dollars, and only one out of nine analysts who cover the stock recommends buying it, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 received a buyout offer from activist fund manager Elliott Associates LP, valuing the computer-networking company at more than $3 billion.
 The proposal should prompt an effort to find other potential buyers, Jesse Cohn, a portfolio manager at Elliott, wrote in the letter.
 Eric Martinuzzi, an analyst at Lake Street Capital Markets, called Elliott’s bid “fair” in a report today and lowered his recommendation to hold from buy after the stock’s jump.
 Activist funds generally buy shares in companies and try to force corporate management and directors to make changes that boost investor returns.
 First Investment Elliott started buying Riverbed shares in September and is the second-largest investor, behind Fidelity Management & Research Co, according to Bloomberg data.
 We believe the end to easy monetary policy comes probably first quarter of 2015” Central banks have sought to bring their economies out of a recession since the 2008 financial crisis by buying sovereign bonds and flooding banks with cheap cash, driving debt yields lower and increasing demand for equities.
 The German manufacturer is still looking for a buyer for a factory in France and its 91 percent stake in Aleo Solar AG, Denner said.
 CRH Plc and Tullow Oil Plc rose at least 2 percent after analysts advised investors to buy the shares.
 UBS AG upgraded the construction-materials maker to buy from neutral.
 HSBC Holdings Plc upgraded both the oil-and-gas companies to overweight, a rating similar to buy, from neutral.
 Of 32 analysts covering the company, 14 rate the stock buy, with nine rating it hold, and nine recommending investors sell Akzo.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Warburg Pincus LLC, one of the world’s largest private-equity firms, agreed to buy a majority stake in asset-management company Source for an undisclosed sum.
 The Fed starts a two-day meeting today at which policy makers are predicted to lower their $75 billion monthly bond-buying program by $10 billion, according to a Bloomberg survey of economists.
 “The ruble’s decline had an especially strong effect on the retailers, since it has a negative impact on the consumers’ buying power” The ruble declined 55 percent this month and touched a five-year low 348620 per dollar yesterday.
 Dixy’s weakness this month presents a buying opportunity, VTB Capital analysts led by Moscow-based Maria Kolbina said in an e-mailed note.
 The Micex Index advanced an average 77 percent during the Fed’s first two rounds of bond buying, and fell 06 percent in periods of no stimulus, the biggest difference of 46 emerging and developed markets tracked by Bloomberg.
 That probably drew buyers, Bank of Nova Scotia and Dhanlaxmi Bank Ltd.
 “At this point it looks like the estimates have almost fully baked in success” Other analysts called today’s stock drop a buying opportunity.
 “We’re buyers” Earlier, the company reported fourth-quarter earnings that topped analysts’ estimates.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- FedEx Corp, the world’s largest cargo airline, sold $2 billion of bonds in three parts to accelerate a share-buyback program.
 Proceeds from the sale will fund the buyback, the Memphis, Tennessee-based company said today in a regulatory filing.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The number of apartments for sale in Tallinn fell by almost 50 percent in the past three years while transactions nearly doubled, meaning buyers are willing to pay more than they initially planned when they find the right property, said Sooman of Pindi.
 “Also, some increase in supply is expected in coming years, which should slow down the price growth” Though more home purchases are funded from the buyer’s own resources, “it is important that banks don’t relax their mortgage terms, like the interest margin, down payment size and standards of creditworthiness,” Jaak Tors, head of the Estonian central bank’s financial stability department, said by e-mail.
 to sell vacant properties as well as occupied space it would then lease back from buyers, according to a statement today.
 I'll move right along to the other SEC complaint, which was, they had some clients who had to sell some bonds, and they had other clients for whom they wanted to buy those same bonds: Throughout the financial crisis, as Western’s clients demanded account liquidations and as rating agency downgrades caused certain securities to be ineligible for certain of its client accounts, Western was required to sell non-agency mortgaged backed securities and similar assets into a sharply declining market.
 But it looks weird if you do that without a price check: How do you decide what price the one client sells at and the other buys at? So Wamco dutifully went off and sold the bonds to independent dealers at whatever price the dealer bid, then bought them back for its buyer clients at whatever price the dealers offered: In its dealings with most counterparties, the sale and the repurchase were separate arms-length transactions.
 That was good for clients! It was just better for some clients than for others: By avoiding exposing the cross traded securities to the market, Western saved market costs totaling approximately $124 million, but, because Western arranged to cross the securities at the bid price, it allocated the full benefit of these savings to its buying clients.
 And doing the cross-trading wrong, as opposed to right, saved buying clients $12 million while costing selling clients roughly zero.
 (Doing it wrong, or right, in both cases involved selling at the bid; doing it right would also involve buying at the ask) That's not a reason not to enforce the law, of course.
 With its cheaper plans and buyout offers to customers that switch from other carriers, T-Mobile has added more than 2 million monthly subscribers in the past three quarters, compared with Verizon’s 34 million.
 The 200 is Chrysler’s bid to field a model that can woo buyers in the mid-size auto segment, standing up to stalwarts such as Toyota Motor Corp’s Camry, Honda Motor Co’s Accord and Nissan Motor Co’s Altima.
 Marchionne Stays Marchionne, who earlier this month reached a $435 billion deal to buy the rest of Auburn Hills, Michigan-based Chrysler, needs a hit to continue to lift the automaker back to relevance in the US.
 Chrysler also is still battling the perception among buyers that its cars don’t measure up.
 “It’s going to have to be markedly better than what buyers in that segment have seen before,” Tynan said.
 “It’s going to have to be a lot better to get Camry, Fusion, Elantra and Accord buyers to notice, which is not an easy task” Eddy, the Ohio dealer, said that while Chrysler cars have improved under Marchionne, buyers’ “perception level” is slowing climbing.
 “They were going to buy off Bridgestone, then look for another anchor investor,” Eric Musau, an analyst at Nairobi-based Standard Investment Bank Ltd, said by phone.
 The French network-equipment maker is in talks to sell its enterprise business to potential buyers including Unify GmbH, a venture of Gores Group LLC and Siemens AG, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 upgraded the French carmaker to outperform, similar to a buy rating, from market perform, citing its strong engineering and product range and its investment in new technology.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Gigante plans to use the proceeds to help pay off loans it used last year to buy the 50 percent it didn’t already own of Office Depot de Mexico SAB from joint-venture partner Office Depot Inc, according to a regulatory filing today with the Mexican stock exchange.
 Yue Xiu Group agreed in November to buy a majority stake in Chong Hing Bank Ltd.
 central bank tapered its quantitative easing today as it announced plans to trim monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion, deepening investor unease over slowing growth and a dependence on external capital flows in emerging markets.
 Eyes now turn to the Fed, which announced in Washington today it will lop another $10 billion from its monthly bond buying to $65 billion.
 Bill Gross, chief investment officer at Pacific Investment Management Co, recommended avoiding the run-up in risk by buying US.
 “He was managing his own investments and all that, but he was pretty sharp, so after buying a couple of Bugattis and picking them up in Europe, he wanted a little more of the excitement of being at work and interacting with other people” Finnish Roots Pasi Matti Hamalainen was born on May 18, 1967, in Helsinki.
 Asset Purchases Draghi told delegates that another option for the ECB to consider is buying bank bonds.
 Leveraged buyouts will be allowed for “specialized entities” to acquire stressed companies, it said.
 Cold weather may have kept buyers off of US.
 The Fed said in December it will cut its monthly debt buying by $10 billion to $75 billion starting January amid signs of an improvement in the labor market.
 Relational has amassed a 155 percent stake in SPX since it began buying the shares in December 2012.
 SPX that month ended talks to buy rival Gardner Denver Inc.
 Policy makers set up an asset-management company to buy soured loans from banks in July.
 16 note to clients, reiterating the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Thirteen of 20 analysts have a buy recommendation on the shares.
 Macquarie, which has an existing trading business in oil and gas, power and coal, has been expanding that business in the past years, buying a stake in British metals-warehousing company Scale Distribution last year.
 advisedinvestors to buy the lender’s shares.
 The Fed announced plans inDecember to reduce the pace of bond buying amid faster-than-estimated economic growth.
 Bank of America climbed 47 percent to $1641Keith Horowitz, an analyst with Citigroup, raised the lender to buyfrom neutral, saying the company will benefit from a recoveringeconomy.
 Michael Morris, an analyst with GuggenheimSecurities LLC, raised his recommendation on the world’s largestentertainment company to buy from neutral.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Gazprom’s biggest drop in six months is a buying opportunity after the world’s biggest producer of natural gas increased exports to Europe to a record last year, Sanford C.
 “We think that’s a buying opportunity” Valuations in the S&P 500 increased by the most since the financial crisis last year as 460 stocks rose, more than any year since at least 1990.
 The Fed starts reducing this month a bond-buying program that has stoked demand for emerging-market and other higher-yielding assets.
 In April, Alibaba agreed to buy an 18 percent stake in Sina Corp’s Weibo, China’s largest Twitter-like service.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Korea Gas Corp, the company that buys the most liquefied natural gas globally, last month purchased spot cargoes to be delivered by March to meet South Korea’s winter demand.
 The Navy’s decision to buy more Boeing aircraft depends on the wear and tear of its older fighter jets, and whether it projects an unmanageable shortfall of tactical aircraft on its aircraft carriers a decade from now.
 Australia also plans to buy 12 Growlers.
 Other countries also could buy Super Hornets as they plan to replace their Lockheed F-16 aircraft with newer jets, Gibbons said.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- OMV AG, the biggest central European energy company, is seeking to buy more assets off Norway as Statoil ASA becomes more selective in its investments and other producers cut the size of their operations, pushing down prices.
 “It might be becoming a little bit of a buyer’s market,” Bernhard Krainer, OMV’s general manager for Norway, said in an interview in Sandefjord today.
 Alibaba and Yunfeng Capital said they would buy a controlling stake in Citic 21CN for HK$133 billion ($171 million).
 Alibaba, through wholly owned Perfect Advance Holding Ltd, has agreed to buy 44 billion Citic 21CN shares at 30 Hong Kong cents each, taking a 543 percent stake, Citic 21CN said in a filing to Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday.
 Yunfeng, a private equity firm co-founded by Alibaba Chairman Jack Ma, will buy a 298 percent stake in Perfect Advance before the share sale is completed, according to the statement.
 The buyers will seek a waiver from Hong Kong rules that require purchasers of a majority stake in company to make a buyout offer for all outstanding shares, Citic 21CN said.
 “People are looking for buying opportunities, but they do need a good story” Manufacturing Data China’s manufacturing purchasing managers’ index was at 51 for December, the National Bureau of Statistics and China’s logistics federation said yesterday in Beijing.
 that could involve teaming up with a corporate buyer, people familiar with the matter said.
 Bright Food isn’t in any talks to buy United Biscuits, spokesman Pan Jianjun said in a phone interview.
 The buyout firms are working with banks including JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 JetBlue’s 17-hour shutdown that began yesterday was designed to buy time to get jets and crews into place after storms lashed the Northeast US.
 builder and buyer of solar farms, plans to purchase as much as 250 megawatts of US.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Pacific Rubiales Energy Corp, Latin America’s largest non-state-owned oil producer, said it expects to generate as much as $14 billion from the sale of infrastructure assets to reduce debt and buy back shares.
 The company, which is also considering another overseas listing, intends to use proceeds of the sales to reduce debt to about $3 billion and help fund a share buyback program.
 Pacific is in negotiations to sell its Papua New Guinea assets this year, and will push forward with a share buyback plan, Pantin said.
 “We have been authorized for a 10 percent buyback of the company by the board” The company is also taking a look at Mexico after Congress approved broad guidelines to open the country’s oil industry to competition in December.
 Deutsche Bank boosted its price target on the solar-energy company by 29 percent to 40 euros a share from 31 euros and maintained its buy rating.
 The company may use the funds to pursue share buybacks or to increase its dividend.
 The BOJ’s buying of more than 7 trillion yen of JGBs a month helped keep 10-year note yields at 0615 percent today, lower than 268 percent for similar-maturity US.
 Analysts such as Group and Fadi Chamoun at BMO Capital Markets said they expect the company to distribute cash to shareholders in 2014 by buying back stock.
 The announcement caused Volkswagen’s stock to surge as short sellers raced to buy shares borrowed in a bet that VW would fall.
 Add a lack of must-haves in fashion and shoppers who preferred to buy via mobile devices, and the holiday season was more coal in the stockings than presents under the tree for many retailers.
 He was in stores observing shopping habits: Customers would go right to the doorbusters retailers use to get people inside their stores, and leave without buying anything else, he said.
 “I don’t even buy in the store until I look online anymore, even if I plan to buy something in the store,” said Zipper, who starts prowling the Web in October for the first signs of upcoming deals.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 “It no longer considers JGB investments as one of its sources of income” Still, Sumitomo Mitsui President Koichi Miyata said in an interview last month that the banking arm stopped selling JGBs after reaching the minimum it needs and that it may start buying again once returns increase.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Saudi Arabian Oil Co, the world’s largest crude exporter, will buy a $2 billion stake in S-Oil Corp, South Korea’s third-largest oil refiner.
 The state-owned producer, known as Saudi Aramco, will buy almost all of Hanjin Energy Co’s stake in S-Oil, according to an S-Oil official who asked not to be identified because of internal policy.
 The purchase was earlier reported by the Maeil Business Newspaper, which cited S-Oil Chief Executive Officer Nasser Al-Mahasher saying Aramco will buy Hanjin’s entire stake.
 “Some of these companies may also elect to put themselves up for sale” ‘Darwinism Is Alive’ Many miners may not find buyers.
 “There’s not that many ready buyers” ‘Lot of Sense’ Deals with low-to-no premiums such as mergers of equals “could make a lot of sense,” because they give companies a way to transform their businesses, reduce costs and strengthen balance sheets, said Matthew Hind, the Toronto-based head of Canadian metals and mining investment banking for Credit Suisse.
 17 agreement to buy PMI Gold Corp.
 said it agreed to buy Halifax, Nova Scotia-based Brigus Gold Corp.
 “China is the single biggest swing factor right now,”said Alex Gauna, an analyst at JMP Securities in San Franciscowho has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 ‘Innovation Engine’ “If you want to do a global launch of a 4G handset thatgoes from no units to tens of millions of units in the firstquarter, no one can do it like Qualcomm,” said McKechnie, whohas the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Cash Flow Directories businesses have been attractive to buyout firms for their traditionally steady cash flow, with KKR & Co.
 buying France Telecom SA’s PagesJaunes SA in 2006.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP agreed in 2012 to buy a majority stake in AT&T Inc’s Yellow Pages directory division for about $950 million.
 He recommends buying Roche shares.
 Roche executives showed no inclination to alter a policy toward repaying debt that brought the company to an 11 percent ratio of net debt-to-assets at the end of last year, the first time it’s hit its target of below 15 percent since buying California biotechnology company Genentech in 2009.
 first-time homebuyers climbed to the highest in more than six years in December as the economy improved and people took advantage of the government’s Help-to-Buy mortgage program, LSL Property Services Plc said.
 Prime Minister David Cameron’s efforts to stimulate the economy through homebuilding are bearing fruit as buyers take up the government’s offer to provide equity loans of up to 20 percent of a newly built home’s value.
 “First-time buyers are returning to the market in their droves,” LSL Director David Newnes said in the statement.
 “There is a greater array of deals on offer to buyers with just a small deposit saved, and schemes like Help to Buy are providing vital support” The average down payment for a first-time buyer in December declined 36 percent to 26,533 pounds from a year earlier, LSL said.
 28-29, last month announced a reduction in its monthly bond-buying program, citing a recovery in the labor market.
 The maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda said it will buy Aptalis Pharma for $29 billion, adding treatments for gastrointestinal ailments and cystic fibrosis.
(Corrects to identify Esopus as sole buyer of intellectual property and customer list in fourth paragraph of story published yesterday) Jan.
 The sale involved a unit that owned spectrum to broadcast mobile television service in Hong Kong, the company said, without identifying the buyer.
 The group tumbled last week, led by Argentina’s peso, amid concern the Federal Reserve will persist with a reduction in the pace of bond buying.
 downgraded the third-biggest landlord of German homes to neutral from buy, citing its rally since Goldman upgraded the stock to buy on July 24.
 “The concern over some of the refinery issues we’ve seen as a result of the brutally cold climate across the continent has led to buying in the refined products,” said Andrew Lebow, a senior vice president at Jefferies Bache LLC in New York.
 The Fed will trim its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to its plan for a gradual withdrawal of stimulus from departing Chairman Ben S.
 While these pricing systems probably can’t be dismantled, there are “things you can regulate to mitigate their impact on market structure,” Concannon, whose firm provides offers to buy and sell securities on the New York Stock Exchange and dozens of other venues globally, said during an interview.
 Exchanges started paying to encourage electronic trading firms to provide standing orders to buy and sell.
 21, before his deal to buy NYSE Euronext closed.
 The Fed cut the pace of monthly bond buying for a second straight meeting, saying it will reduce purchases by another $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to a plan for a gradual withdrawal from its unprecedented monetary easing.
 Underscoring why bond buyers are concerned that they may be disadvantaged, home-loan servicers have been able to settle US.
 Investors’ Complaints For the private mortgage-bond market to revive as government programs get scaled back, the industry must come together to address investors’ complaints about loan servicing and the process by which sellers can be forced to buy back bad loans that fail to match their promised quality, said Eric Kaplan, a managing director at Shellpoint Partners LLC, the lender backed by mortgage-bond pioneer Lewis Ranieri.
 Hedge fund Fir Tree Partners said today in a statement distributed by PR Newswire that it was seeking to buy some of the securities covered by the agreement and would seek to continue litigation over them.
 recommended buying the stock.
 Third Point, the hedge fund led by billionaire Loeb, took a stake in the firm, calling for a share buyback and a spinoff of its petrochemicals business to improve profitability.
 aluminum producer to overweight, a recommendation similar to buy, from neutral.
 The oil and gas company was raised to buy from neutral at SunTrust Robinson Humphrey Inc, which said Chesapeake has leading positions in three of the best US.
 13 it agreed to buy Beam, the maker of Jim Beam and Canadian Club liquor, for $16 billion including debt.
 Fueled by a strong currency, Japanese companies embarked on an overseas buying spree that peaked with $1135 billion worth of deals announced in 2012, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Brian Mulligan, 54, testified about the “pure fear” he experienced the night in May 2012 when he was trying to run from two police officers who he said took him to a motel against his will after he went to buy some cannabis gel caps at a medical marijuana dispensary in the Eagle Rock neighborhood.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers today -- more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed -- according to a study that consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 Ford said that 94 percent of the 2014 model vehicles it has sold have been equipped with Sync and that three quarters of its buyers would recommend the system to other car buyers.
 Stiritz said in November that he was willing to take part in a leveraged buyout of the company that would reward shareholders.
 Robert Chapman, founder of hedge fund Chapman Capital LLC in Manhattan Beach, California, said in a phone interview that Ramey’s status as a consultant for Stiritz may presage a buyout.
 “The most obvious transaction at hand would be taking Herbalife private” Ramey had recommended buying Herbalife shares and said they may rise to $115 in the next 12 months, the highest of seven analysts’ target prices for the company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- India’s state-owned companies are paying the biggest dividends in at least three years, a buy signal for the country’s third-largest money manager as the government extracts higher payouts to pare its budget deficit.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Visa repurchased 55 million shares in the quarter at an average price of $19956 and had $42 billion remaining for buybacks as of Dec.
 cut its recommendation to the equivalent of hold from buy.
 In addition to acquiescing to demands about pay and diversity, the company also instituted in 2013 one of the largest dividend and buyback programs among US.
 Cisco became the market leader in set-top boxes by buying Scientific Atlanta for $68 billion in 2006.
 “At the moment there is probably not a lot of interest from buyers,” said Wiktor Bielski, a commodities analyst at VTB Capital in London.
 A Chinese bank or an emerging-markets player would be a more likely buyer than a traditional Western bank” Setting Prices In private meetings last year, the US.
 “We remain fully committed to our precious metals business” Fixing Process Deutsche Bank will continue in the fixings until a buyer for its seat is found, said the person familiar with the plan.
 The firms then declare how many bars they wish to buy or sell at that price, based on orders from clients as well as their own account.
 The talks continue until the buy and sell amounts are within 50 bars, or about 620 kilograms, of each other.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Minmetals Development Co, a Chinese importer and exporter of metals and minerals, plans to buy iron-ore assets for 99 billion yuan ($164 billion) from its controlling shareholder, state-controlled China Minmetals Corp.
 Minmetals is buying the assets amid a 22 percent rally in iron-ore prices from a low in May as China boosted stockpiles to the highest level in a year and economic growth rebounded.
 “The issues faced by the company can be addressed without the need for a full rights issue or franchise damaging disposals,” said James Shuck, an analyst at UBS in London, with a buy rating on RSA.
 declined in the fourth quarter as higher borrowing costs and tight credit blocked many first-time buyers.
 Rising real estate values and mortgage rates that jumped from near-record lows are making homes more expensive, while strict lending standards reduce the pool of potential buyers.
 “The number of first-time buyers are just not there, and the few who are there are getting balanced out by a person who is being foreclosed on, so there’s no net increase in homeowners,” Lawrence Yun, chief economist for the National Association of Realtors, said yesterday in telephone.
 “And tight underwriting standards are keeping renters in their current renting situation” Contracts to buy previously owned houses fell in December by the most since May 2010, the Realtors group reported.
 First-time buyers accounted for 27 percent of completed purchases last month, down from 30 percent a year earlier.
 said it will buy a stake in the logistics-center operator.
 China South Rally China South City surged 61 percent to HK$349 after Tencent said it will spend HK$15 billion ($193 million) to buy a stake in the Chinese logistics center operator to boost its e-commerce business.
 soared the most since its initial public offering after saying it will cut 15 percent of its staff and buy a popular mobile developer for $527 million.
 The company agreed to buy UK-based NaturalMotion Ltd.
 One technique Elliott has repeated: making a takeover offer for a targeted company to flush out higher-paying buyers.
 8 to buy Riverbed Technology Inc.
 The proposal, which helpfully included a draft merger agreement of about 78 pages, should prompt an effort to find other potential buyers, Jesse Cohn, a portfolio manager, wrote in a letter.
 Non-AT&T customers will be able to buy data servicesthrough OnStar or purchase it directly from AT&T, Chan saidCustomers will be able to turn on 4G for short periods, such afamily vacation, she said.
 Profitability will remain “good” even as part of the targeted savings may flow to customers through lower prices, he said, keeping a buy recommendation on the stock.
 “It’s going to be a tough, challenging, a long and winding road, but the ingredients of Lanxess are good” Lanxess decided against buying chemical maker Taminco in 2011 because it wasn’t prepared to meet private-equity owner CVC Capital Partners Ltd’s asking price, a person familiar with the matter said at the time.
 Investors are buying bonds to fund growth of clean energy promoted by governments from the US.
 Some investors can’t buy junk-rated debt because there are “fixed guidelines” they have to observe, Castelo Branco said.
 He rates the shares a buy with a target price of 67 pesos.
 “There’s an expectation that the BOJ will expand monetary stimulus within the year,” said Nobuyuki Fujimoto, senior market analyst at SBI Securities Co, Japan’s biggest online brokerage.
 Upper Limit The Japanese central bank is approaching the upper limit of its target for buying bonds, raising prospects it will need to expand the scope of its stimulus program to support the economy before a sales-tax increase in April.
 “With earnings season about to begin in earnest, we’ll see a lot of buying in anticipation of companies posting strong results” More than 520 companies on the Topix report earnings next week, with about 640 filing results the period after, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Nomura raised its rating on the shares to buy, saying the company looks undervalued.
 Goldman Sachs raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, while boosting its price target to 1,430 yen from 970 yen.
 Bank of America’s Merrill Lynch unit cut its rating on the stock to underperform from buy.
 Sidani wants to buy more in Kazakhstan after shares of phone provider Kcell JSC advanced 64 percent in London since an initial public offering in December 2012.
 “It’s not as though there’s a void at the top,” said Lakner, who has a buy rating on the shares.
 Meijer Inc, a Grand Rapids, Michigan-based family-owned retailer, agreed to buy the remaining 1,200 tickets to tomorrow’s National Football League playoff game between the Colts and Kansas City Chiefs at Lucas Oil Stadium in Indianapolis and distribute them to local military families, Colts owner Jim Irsay said on Twitter.
 “We’re pleased to offer these!” Meijer said on Twitter about buying the remaining Colts tickets.
 Teams in danger of a local television blackout have in the past bought unsold tickets or reached agreements with sponsors to buy them.
 The NFL said that teams would have to buy back playoff tickets at 100 percent of face value.
 The Fed announced plans in December to reduce the pace of bond buying amid faster-than-estimated economic growth.
 American consumers in 2013 were more upbeat than at any time in the previous six years as views on the economy, finances and the buying climate improved.
 Jefferies Group LLC analyst Randal Konik upgraded the clothing retailer to buy from hold.
 rose 23 percent to $1473 after Konik raised his rating to buy from hold.
 In addition to the dividend, payable in March, the company plans to return capital through a $150 million stock buyback and additional debt financing.
 “We encourage our fellow shareholders to continue to press this board and management team to act urgently and return significant additional capital in 2014” Sotheby’s board has authorized the share buyback primarily as part of a new policy to offset annual employee stock dilution, with approximately $25 million of shares being repurchased by the end of 2014, it said in the statement.
 withdrew from an agreement to buy liquefied natural gas from Woodside Petroleum Ltd’s Browse venture in Australia after delays to the project.
 Asian Market The Japanese companies, which reached a deal in 2012 to buy a 147 percent stake in Browse for $2 billion, will continue to work with Woodside to jointly sell LNG from the venture to the Asian market, according to the statement.
 The firm has sought to entice investors through buybacks and dividends, returning $11 billion to shareholders in 2012 and the first nine months of 2013, more than double the combined total of Citigroup, Bank of America and Morgan Stanley.
 Parkmead will use the funds to develop existing assets as well as to buy other companies or fields, it said in a statement in London today.
 18 that it would slow the pace of bond buying.
 insurer was raised to buy from hold by analysts at Deutsche Bank AG.
 Credit Suisse, which rates both companies outperform, advised buying hospital stocks on any weakness.
 The information management firm said it will buy Stream Global Services Inc.
 Warren Buffett bought $5 billion of Goldman preferred in September 2008 at a yield of 10 percent (when those Series Bs were trading at around 9 percent), and he got at-the-money warrants to buy Goldman common stock as part of the deal.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Morgan Stanley is approaching hedge funds and buyers of distressed debt to gauge interest in a possible Puerto Rico bond sale to boost the island’s cash flow, according to three people with knowledge of the matter.
 Puerto Rico bonds are luring hedge funds and buyers of speculative-grade corporate and sovereign debt after the island’s securities posted their biggest annual decline since 1999.
 raised it to the equivalent of buy.
 Retailer Via Varejo SA rose 38 percent to 2490 reais after JPMorgan and Credit Suisse Group AG both rated the stock the equivalent of buy in new coverage.
 Sawiris is circling Telecom Italia again after his offer to buy a stake in the phone company for at least 2 billion euros ($27 billion) was rebuffed more than a year ago.
 “Dish faces little competition for the H Block and should be able to buy another block of national spectrum at below-market prices,” Walt Piecyk, an analyst with BTIG LLC in New York, said in an interview.
 With other major prospective buyers sitting out this round, Dish’s strategy in the new FCC auction is a topic of speculation among analysts and consultants.
 “Does Charlie end up buying every license in the auction? Or does he buy 95 percent of them and everybody else buys one or two?” Coleman Bazelon, a Washington-based principal for the Brattle Group, said in an interview.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Baidu Inc, China’s largest search engine company, rose after Maxim Group LLC raised it to buy, helping Chinese shares in the US.
 “This is the reason why some people are buying China CDS” AXA manages 550 billion euros ($750 billion) globally.
 “The key theme that developed through 2013 was investors’ willingness to buy into the European recovery dream.
 added 08 percent to 1,231 pence as Deutsche Bank AG raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold, describing its price-to-earnings multiple as undemanding.
 Natixis lowered its rating on the producer of Remy Martin cognac to neutral from buy after Frederic Pflanz resigned as chief executive officer last week.
 Edenred dropped 55 percent to 2295 euros after Natixis downgraded the shares to neutral from buy.
 John Wood Group Plc slid 38 percent to 652 pence after Deutsche Bank AG cut its rating on the shares to hold from buy, citing a lack of possible factors for gains and limited potential for earnings to grow in the next year.
 funds may consider buying a 20 percent stake in the lender.
 SMA Solar Technology AG rallied 14 percent after Deutsche Bank AG recommended buying the shares.
 Deutsche Bank upgraded the solar-energy company to buy from hold, saying recent share declines are a buying opportunity.
 UBS lowered its rating to neutral from buy, citing limited potential for gains as growth is unlikely to accelerate.
 “A lot of institutions are mandated to only hold Aussie stocks so they have to get out and buy something else,” Esho said.
 The decision means Oi may have to buy out non-controlling investors, who argued the transaction favored Oi’s biggest owners.
 Right now, Oi couldn’t afford to buy part of Tim if it became available, said Alex Pardellas, an analyst at CGD Securities in Rio de Janeiro.
 “Oi would have to raise another round of capital” to buy part of Tim, Pardellas said by telephone.
 agreed to buy majority owner Franz Haniel & Cie’s stake in the company.
 Now they are taking profits” Emerging-market currencies tumbled amid concern the Fed will persist with a reduction in the pace of bond buying.
 drug distributor, agreed to buy Franz Haniel’s stake in the company for 2350 euros a share.
 The American company will now reach that level by buying convertible bonds held by hedge fund Elliott Management Corp.
 It was acquired as part of Berkshire’s buyout of MidAmerican Energy Holdings Co, an electric-and-gas utility.
 -- owner of brands including Century 21 and Coldwell Banker -- worked to service debt from its 2007 leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC, Peltier looked to buy.
 “We’re still such a fragmented industry” Realogy has been buying, too.
 Fewer CEOs plan to buy firms or pursue partnerships this year, the survey said, with 10 percent considering such actions compared with 30 percent in 2013.
 The Fed will probably reduce its bond buying in $10 billion increments over the next seven meetings before ending the program in December 2014, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg in December.
 You have to be worried about buying stuff and having it called” Default Swaps Elsewhere in credit markets, the cost of protecting corporate bonds from default in the US.
 Credit swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 He recommends buying Qualcomm shares.
 People want to buy up” Qualcomm is predicting that emerging markets will grow about 20 percent compared with a gain of about 6 percent in developed regions, he said.
 “The state can’t stand by and ignore threats to national security -- the situation needs immediate intervention to maintain order” Communications Curbs The legislation would force anyone buying a mobile-phone SIM card to provide passport identification and halt Internet access to those distributing messages deemed illegal by the authorities.
 The Fed said last month that it will take the first steps to reducing the pace of bond buying as the labor market improves.
 “Investors will keep the overweight for equities but buy some insurance for that overweight to protect against the higher volatility” Equity Risk The Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility Index, or VIX, averaged about 142 a day last year, the lowest reading since 2006, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 ‘Critical Test’ The Fed has quadrupled its assets since 2008 with bond buying designed to reduce borrowing costs and boost economic growth, helping send the S&P 500 up 30 percent last year, the biggest increase since 1997.
 “This year will be a critical test of how reliant investors are on the Fed’s asset buying,” Sternberg said.
 “This will make 2014 the most important year since 2008, when large-scale asset buying began” Volatility will remain low in 2014 as markets have shown the ability to withstand negative events and there are fewer catalysts on the calendar that can drive investor concerns, according to derivative strategists at Deutsche Bank AG.
 Deliveries fell 14 percent in Thailand in 2013 and may decline 10 percent this year, as government rebates to encourage first-time vehicle buyers ended and economy slowed amid political instability, according to Kyoichi Tanada, Toyota’s Thailand chief.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Affin Holdings Bhd, Malaysia’s smallest banking group by market value, agreed to buy most of Hwang-DBS (Malaysia) Bhd’s investment banking assets for 136 billion ringgit ($409 million) after the death of its founder.
 Having enjoyed a discount rate for platinum group metals from an Anglo unit for 21 years, in return for marketing duties, Johnson Matthey is buying supplies on the spot market this year.
 Deutsche Bank AG gained 09 percent after Equinet AG recommended buying the stock.
 27, as the European Central Bank pledged to keep interest rates low for a prolonged period and after the Federal Reserve’s decision to slow the pace of its bond-buying program increased investors’ confidence in the US.
 Equinet raised its recommendation to buy from hold, saying litigation risks are reduced and the impact of remaining legal cases shouldn’t be significant for the lender’s earnings.
 Analysts including Citigroup Inc’s Keith Horowitz had upgraded the firm to a buy in anticipation of lower expenses.
 We want to hang on to that” Abil, as the bank is known, took a 46 billion-rand ($407 million) impairment on the unprofitable Ellerines in October and risks another 800 million-rand writedown this year, Chief Financial Officer Nithia Nalliah said in November, adding that a trade buyer with retail expertise may be best suited to run the business.
 The company will keep divesting assets after sales worth about $65 billion over the past 18 months, according to Heath Jansen, a London-based analyst at Citigroup Inc, who advises buying the stock.
 “Late 2013 we heard a repeated refrain from clients, which was: ‘I’ll buy more periphery in the new year,” London-based Jellinek said.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, the owner of China’s biggest e-commerce business, and Yunfeng Capital said they will buy control of Citic 21CN Co.
 Alibaba, through wholly owned Perfect Advance Holding Ltd, has agreed to buy 44 billion Citic 21CN shares at 30 Hong Kong cents each, taking a 543 percent stake, Citic 21CN said in a filing to Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday evening.
 Yunfeng, a private equity firm co-founded by Alibaba Chairman Jack Ma, will buy a 298 percent stake in Perfect Advance before the share sale is completed, according to the statement.
 The buyers will seek a waiver from Hong Kong rules that require purchasers of a majority stake in company to make a buyout offer for all outstanding shares, Citic 21CN said.
 auto task force that helped rebuild the Detroit-based automaker, has said activist investors may push for more dividend payouts or stock buybacks.
 Hayman Capital In September, the company announced an effort to buy almost half of the United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust’s preferred shares, which paid a 9 percent annual interest, and replacing it with a bond offering.
 Brian Johnson, an auto analyst for Barclays Plc, has said that GM has sufficient cash and liquidity to pay an annual dividend of 40 cents a share and repurchase stock in addition to buying back remaining common shares owned by the Canadian government and a union health-care trust.
 The French state may also buy shares in both sales, Peugeot said.
 life insurers will use cash for acquisitions rather than share repurchases after buybacks helped drive a rally last year, Deloitte LLP said in its 2014 industry outlook.
 “Stock buybacks, which were an important part of the capital allocation story for 2013, may not be quite as appealing,” Boris Lukan, a principal at Deloitte, said in an interview.
 “Publicly held carriers have been bolstering their share price by allocating excess capital to initiate stock buybacks,” Deloitte said in the report.
 “With the rise in stock prices, we have seen some management teams become more price sensitive in their buyback activity,” he wrote.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Verisk Analytics Inc, the supplier of data to insurers and banks, agreed to buy EagleView Technology Corp.
 With Dow Chemical, the firm’s largest current investment, Loeb is pushing Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Andrew Liveris to hire advisers for a strategic review of the benefits of a petrochemical spin off and to boost its share buybacks, amid criticism of the company’s share performance.
 Daiichi Sankyo lost 43 percent to 1,703 yen after it was downgraded to neutral from buy at Mizuho.
 Its rating was raised to buy from neutral at Ichiyoshi Research Institute Inc.
 “We won’t buy more JGBs,” Takahiro Mitani, president of the Government Pension Investment Fund, which manages 124 trillion yen in assets, said in an interview in Davos, Switzerland.
 The shareholders in Britain’s oldest buyout firm tried to cheat Geoff Arbuthnott out of his stake for 5 percent of its real value, he said in court documents made available today in London on the first day of trial in the case.
 Its chairman, James Gordon Bonnyman, and 16 other shareholders said Arbuthnott tried to blackmail them into buying his shares at an inflated price.
 ‘Increasingly Disengaged’ Charterhouse, Britain’s oldest buyout firm, manages about 8 billion euros ($11 billion) and more than doubled investors’ pledges under Bonnyman’s leadership between 1990 and 2010.
 Charterhouse was formed in a management buyout from HSBC Holdings Plc in 2001.
 upgraded the motor insurer to buy.
 Numis raised the Cardiff, England-based company to buy from add, saying it is well positioned to increase its market share given that its profit margin is higher than those of most of its peers.
 agreed to buy 60 percent of NuGeneration Ltd, the British nuclear venture that plans to build three atomic reactors.
 “We view the pullback as an especially good buyingopportunity” Chief Executive Officer Ajay Banga, 54, is upgradingtechnology as MasterCard competes with larger rival Visa Incfor deals with card-issuing banks.
 While investors shouldn’t buy more bonds at current prices, the threshold for a so-called debtor-in-possession financing conversion implies an enterprise value of just $360 million, Christopher Buck, a debt analyst at Barclays, said in a report to clients after Oleo & Gas Participacoes SA announced a debt-to-equity swap proposal on Dec.
 oo, according to the buyout firm’s website.
 downgraded the stock to neutral from overweight, meaning that investors should no longer buy the shares.
 economy prompts the Fed to reduce the amount of dollars it prints to buy bonds -- a policy that has restrained the greenback.
 Chief Executive Officer Jamie Dimon, 57, is whittling down the firm’s list of legal woes that include allegations it misled buyers of mortgage bonds, rigged markets and turned a blind eye to suspicious activity by customers.
 “They look for every dislocation, and they have cash” Growing Influence Property and casualty insurers buy munis and other bonds to back obligations to policyholders and generate income.
 CNA Financial Corp, the New York-based company’s insurance subsidiary, said in July that it was buying state and local debt.
 Loss Forecast Barclays predicts munis will lose 145 percent this year as yields rise amid scaled-back bond buying the Fed.
 The stock has rallied 33 percent in the past two sessions, the biggest two-day advance since September 2006, after Bank of America raised its rating on the stock to buy from underperform.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 China, Russia, and Mexico have been particularly important for P&G’s growth, said Dibadj, who has an outperform rating on the shares, the equivalent of a buy.
 He has an overweight rating on the shares, the equivalent of a buy.
 who recommends buying the shares, said by phone today.
 “Intacta over the next two years will prove to be the single most important earnings driver for Monsanto,” said Cox, who recommends buying the shares.
 Navy preliminary instructions to buy 32 of its troubled Littoral Combat Ships instead of the 52 previously planned, according to defense officials.
 CICC raised its 12-month target price to HK$1150 from HK$930 while maintaining its buy rating on the stock.
 Phosagro went on to buy out minority owners of Apatit and plans to do the same at unit OAO Phosagro-Cherepovets.
 Potash Plunge The company may borrow about $200 million from a bank for the Phosagro-Cherepovets buyout, Guryev said.
 agreed to buy Barrick Gold Corp’s Kanowna assets in Australia for A$75 million ($66 million) as the world’s biggest gold miner focuses on lower-cost operations.
 “This uncertainty will reduce the confidence of major overseas buyers in the reliability of Argentina to deliver soybeans” To be sure, the prospect of a bumper global soybean crop this year may tempt farmers to the marketplace, said Julio Calzada, director of economic studies at Rosario Grains Exchange.
 Anglo American Plc gained 55 percent after UBS AG advised investors to buy the shares.
 UBS upgraded the stock to buy from neutral, citing a recent losses and a dividend yield of 41 percent.
 Credit Suisse Group AG upgraded the shares to outperform, the equivalent of buy, from neutral.
 cut its rating to hold from buy.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- India scrapped a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from Anglo-Italian company AgustaWestland following a 15-month corruption investigation and said it’s preparing for an arbitration fight it is seeking to avoid.
 India’s arms-buying has been affected by officials’ sensitivities over corruption scandals in previous purchases, including one that helped drive the ruling Congress Party to defeat in 1989 elections.
 Li’s PCCW agreed in 2008 to buy the shares of Pacific Century Premium it didn’t own for HK$285 apiece, or HK$264 billion ($340 million), a bid that was rejected by minority investors.
 Pacific Century Premium said in October it was approached by potential buyers for its stake in Pacific Century Place in Beijing.
 unit agreed in December to buy Telstra Corp’s Hong Kong mobile-phone business for $243 billion.
 The two Saks stores announced today are the first of six or seven that Hudson’s Bay said it would open after announcing it was buying the New York-based luxury retailer for $24 billion in July.
 Cadillac Fairview Cadillac Fairview CEO John Sullivan approached Baker about buying the store and opening a Saks, Cadillac spokeswoman Janine Ramparas said in an e-mail.
 Fiat rose the most in almost five years in Milan trading after Sergio Marchionne, chief executive officer of Chrysler and its Italian parent, struck an accord to buy a 415 percent stake from a United Auto Workers retiree health-care trust.
 have all said they’re interested in buying flight rights from American, now the largest US.
 All four facilities are popular with business travelers who typically buy the most-expensive tickets.
 “In the short term, time deposits are providing a more attractive return even compared with equities,” said Masassya, 46, who expects foreign outflows to continue in the first quarter as the Fed cuts its bond buying program.
 In December, United cut 200 jobs in its airport operations and cargo divisions after 900 voluntary buyouts earlier in 2013.
 The company should benefit from the March release of “Titanfall,” a title that will be exclusive at first to Microsoft’s Xbox consoles and personal computers, said Michael Pachter, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles who recommends buying the stock.
 Glorious Property surged as much as 40 percent after the buyout plan was announced, the biggest intraday gain since the shares debuted in October 2009, and closed 33 percent higher.
 Federal Reserve’s plans to dial back its bond-buying program, which investors speculate could lead to higher Treasury yields.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 The company, which said last month it was buying the US.
 “Was it a good buy? In hindsight, considering everything that’s happened, my opinion is yes,” said Erin-Michael Gill, managing director of MDB Capital Group, an IP-focused investment bank based in Santa Monica, California.
 Riley & Co, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 He has an overweight rating on the shares, the equivalent of buy.
 The company should benefit from the March release of “Titanfall,” a title that will be exclusive at first to Microsoft’s Xbox consoles and personal computers, said Michael Pachter, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles who recommends buying the stock.
 Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd, the nation’s biggest listed lender, fell 09 percent after agreeing to buy a controlling stake in a unit of Standard Bank Group Ltd.
 “Women are becoming more independent, becoming richer, and so are buying for themselves” Men accounted for 90 percent of China’s high-end purchases in 1995, according to industry consultant Bain & Co.
 ‘Fashion Addicts’ “Luxury buying by Chinese women is driven by jobs and peer pressure,” said Yan, whose collection also includes bags from Louis Vuitton and Saint Laurent Paris.
 Although Chinese customers are the world’s biggest luxury buyers by nationality, accounting for 29 percent of high-end purchases last year, mainland sales have slowed as Chinese shoppers now buy more than two-thirds of their items overseas, according to Bain.
 Refocusing on women’s fashion can help luxury-goods makers counter the overseas-buying trend, Bernstein’s Ortelli said.
 “You can postpone the buying of a watch or piece of jewelry,” Ortelli said.
 “But if you have an important dinner today, you don’t go to Hong Kong to buy your dress” ‘Own Money’ Still, ready-to-wear apparel has its drawbacks.
 The demand slump has prompted automakers including Suzuki Motor’s local unit to offer discounts to win buyers.
 “As a key buyer in the Cambodian garment industry, we will continue to encourage all relevant parties to renew negotiations and to come to a mutually agreeable solution to this conflict,” Hennes & Mauritz said in an e-mailed statement.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Aberdeen Asset Management Plc is buying US.
 After Congress reached a deal over 2014 funding and the Federal Reserve announced plans to taper its bond buying program, IMF Managing Director Christine Lagarde said the fund will raise its forecast for US.
 and help consumers buy food at Kroger Co.
 Potential buyers include the owners of the four major broadcast networks: CBS Corp, 21st Century Fox Inc, Comcast Corp’s NBCUniversal and Walt Disney Co, which owns ESPN and would air the games on its ABC network.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Anheuser-Busch InBev NV, the world’s biggest brewer, is seeking to buy South Korea’s Oriental Brewery Co.
 As part of its 2009 agreement AB InBev has the right to buy back the asset at pre-agreed terms this year.
 agreed to buy bourbon maker Beam Inc.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm run by Henry Kravis and George Roberts, said fourth-quarter profit more than doubled as appreciation in its buyout holdings fueled paper gains and its funds sold investments at a profit.
 The firm agreed to buy landscape-maintenance company Brickman Group Ltd, insurance-technology company Mitchell International Inc.
 KKR also sold its remaining stake in retailer Dollar General Corp, a 2007 buyout that returned more than 45 times KKR’s money for one of its most profitable investments.
 Blackstone Group LP’s buyout holdings climbed 12 percent in the latest quarter, Carlyle Group LP’s appreciated 9 percent and the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index of large US.
 The value of a private-equity firm’s buyout holdings affects economic net income because the metric relies on quarterly “mark-to-market” valuations of those investments.
 Assets Increase Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit after about 10 years.
 KKR’s assets under management rose to $943 billion from $902 billion at the end of the third quarter as the firm raised more money, including for its 11th North America buyout fund, its first real estate fund and a pool to invest in special situations.
 Or Valeant may opt to buy Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, which would be a better fit, said Aegis Capital Corp.
 Actavis opted to instead buy Warner Chilcott Plc, allowing the company to shift its domicile from the US.
 While other private-equity firms also have expressed interest in buying the second-largest grocery chain in the US, they are more interested in cherry-picking assets, people familiar with the situation have said.
 Cerberus would buy the entire company, the people said.
 Cerberus, which owns the Albertsons chain of grocery stores, has been talking to Safeway for months about buying pieces of the retailer or the whole business, said the people.
 and Leonard Green & Partners LP about buying some or all of the grocery chain, people have said.
 Safeway felt obligated to tell shareholders that it was discussing a sale because management had announced plans to buy back shares, one of the people said, and if it had gone through with the repurchase and a sale eventually happened, shareholders could have sued for tendering shares and missing a takeover premium.
 If no deal is completed, Safeway will proceed with a share buyback, according to its fourth-quarter earnings conference call this month.
 Reuters reported earlier that Safeway is in advanced talks with Cerberus to buy the entire company.
 “Investors don’t necessarily dislike EM assets, they just dislike the price, and once the price adjusts they’re willing to buy,” Marshall Gittler, head of global foreign-exchange strategy at IronFX Financial Services Ltd.
 Most suits are legitimate, said Robert Berman, chief executive officer of CopyTele Inc, a Melville, New York-based company that buys patents and has about three dozen suits pending.
 has agreed to buy palm oil only from suppliers who can prove they don’t damage rain forests, the strongest move yet by a public food manufacturer to stop the practice, according an environmental group that pressured the maker of Corn Flakes and Rice Krispies.
 “We buy sustainably sourced palm oil, and where it’s not available we buy the green certificates to cover it” Such certificates, purchased from certified palm oil producers and traded on specialized exchanges, allow companies to claim they have supported the sustainable production of palm oil, according to trading platform GreenPalm.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Canadian Natural Resources Ltd, the nation’s second-largest natural gas producer, agreed to buy Devon Energy Corp’s conventional assets in Canada for C$313 billion ($286 billion) to boost output.
 20 it was seeking a buyer for the Canadian assets as well as holdings in the US.
 “There was a fair amount of skepticism on the company’s ability to sell the assets at a decent price,” wrote Hanold, who rates Devon a buy and doesn’t own the stock.
 Record crops in Canada, the world’s top canola grower and second-largest wheat exporter, are overwhelming the country’s rail system, creating a shortage of grain cars and slowing shipments to foreign buyers.
 The Supreme Court reversed a lower-court decision that had insulated pharmaceutical companies from liability, which had cost drug buyers as much as $35 billion a year, according to the Federal Trade Commission.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc, seeking a bigger slice of the more than $15 billion auto-advertising market, said households with users of its service were twice as likely to buy a new car as the average US.
 The car-buying data “moves the conversation from ‘why Twitter?’ to ‘how should we use Twitter?’” Jeffrey Graham, ad research director at Twitter, said in a telephone interview.
 Fed Stimulus The Fed has already decided to slow the pace of its asset-purchase program twice, reducing its monthly buying of bonds to $65 billion from $85 billion in 2013.
 Icahn indicated he will drop his shareholder proposal asking Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, citing recent repurchases and the opposition of a proxy-advisory firm.
 Unlock Cash Icahn said in December he would seek a vote to push Apple to buy back more stock and unlock cash held by the Cupertino, California-based company, which had $159 billion in cash and marketable securities as of Dec.
 The maker of Nerf and Transformers toys said it will return cash to shareholders through share buybacks and dividends and is looking to cut unprofitable business lines.
 and to buy at Stifel Nicolaus & Co.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore sales to China from Australia’s Port Hedland climbed 27 percent in January from a year earlier as miners increased output and the biggest buyer boosted inventories to the highest level in 16 months.
 Folks are looking to buy on the dips” Stocks Rebound The S&P 500 rallied 23 percent this week, its best of the year.
 growth has strengthened and that only a “notable change in the outlook” for the economy would prompt policy makers to slow the pace cuts to the monthly bond-buying program.
 gained the most since July 2012 after the title insurer defused a fight with activist investors by naming new directors and announcing plans to buy back more than 8 percent of its shares.
 The buyback helps Chief Executive Officer Matthew W.
 The company is seeking bids to buy 5,000 oil tank cars with improved safety standards.
 Takeda Pharmaceutical Co, Japan’s largest drugmaker, is the most popular stock in the first weeks of a tax-free investment program as buyers favor less-volatile shares amid the biggest equity slump among developed markets.
 4 amid concern about the Fed’s bond-buying cuts, China’s economic slowdown and volatility in developing markets.
 Peugeot Gains PSA Peugeot Citroen advanced 45 percent to 1202 euros after Goldman Sachs added the company to its conviction-buy list.
 Bayerische Motoren Werke AG rose 3 percent to 8445 euros after the New York-based bank recommended buying the stock.
 The world’s largest cosmetics company agreed to buy back 8 percent of its shares from Nestle SA for 6 billion euros.
 Morgan Stanley cut its rating on the French network supplier to equal weight from overweight at Morgan Stanley, meaning that it no longer recommends buying the stock.
 The Federal Reserve’s second reduction of monthly bond-buying added to investor uncertainty.
 Harper’s energy policy is informed by convictions that global demand for oil is surpassing supply, market forces override politics and the western world would rather buy energy from stable democracies like Canada.
 Platinum Equity LLC will buy 70 percent of Sensis for A$454 million, Telstra said Jan.
 “Maybe there’s no longer these reasons” Stocks Fall Reduced Federal Reserve bond-buying, political crises from Thailand to Turkey and disappointing earnings reports at Apple Inc.
 29 that it will buy $65 billion a month in bonds, down another $10 billion.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Imerys SA, a French building-materials company, agreed to buy Amcol International Corp.
 CEO, who secured a deal to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Roberts’s ambitions partly explain why he tried to buy Disney in 2004 and why he put the Comcast name on the GE building after acquiring NBCUniversal from General Electric Co.
 In a bid to outfox Malone, Roberts worked with Bill Gates, then Microsoft Corp’s CEO, to buy up a bloc of supervoting shares owned by the company’s late founder.
 “Brian Roberts is once again making a bold move to buy Time Warner Cable,” he said.
 Net debt is expected to drop toward $25 billion by the end of fiscal 2014, enabling a possible share buyback, according to a UBS AG note today.
 The price of the steelmaking raw material climbed 15 percent in the second half of last year as China, the world’s biggest buyer, boosted stockpiles to the highest in more than a year.
 It buys a little time until the harvest or until there’s a deeper measure” Since the move, the central bank bought $30 million in the foreign-currency market and $801 million from deposits banks already had in the monetary authority, according to a bank official who isn’t authorized to speak publicly on the matter.
 The Federal Open Market Committee said last week it will trim monthly buying to $65 billion, its second $10 billion reduction.
 The law proposes giving the mines minister the right “to designate any mineral, mineral products or form of petroleum for local beneficiation,” and decide what percentage must be made available to processors after taking into account “national developmental imperatives” ‘Prolong Uncertainty’ It would also give the state the right to buy a further 30 percent stake in new energy projects at market-related prices.
 Lanxess AG rose 18 percent after Berenberg Bank advised investors to buy the stock.
 Lanxess advanced 18 percent to 4902 euros after Berenberg upgraded the chemicals maker to buy from hold, saying it expects a strong recovery in the company’s earnings because of improving demand and a drop in capital expenditure.
 The crossover, the fourth of five new compact models designed to boost volume by luring younger buyers, is critical to maintaining that momentum.
 The GLA will cost buyers 29,300 euros ($40,000) in Germany.
 “It’s an attractive group that could end up being buyers for decades” To counter the new Mercedes model, Ingolstadt-based Audi will roll out the Q3 in the US.
 While earnings are improving, investors are seeking further evidence that that the company can deliver sustained revenue growth before they buy more of the stock, said Bill Kreher, an analyst at Edward Jones & Co.
 raised $22 billion in its first bond sale after agreeing to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “In the event the deal doesn’t go through, they still just want to have the cash on hand” The all-stock transaction to buy Time Warner Cable “is not expected to have a material impact on Comcast’s credit protection measures,” Fitch Ratings analysts led by David Peterson wrote in a report.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Comcast Corp’s agreement last week to buy Time Warner Cable for $425 billion marks a “seismic” shift for the pay-TV industry, he said.
 Lenovo agreed to buy the phone business for $29 billion last month.
 agreed to buy the phone business for 544 billion euros ($75 billion).
 “Volkswagen could definitively afford to buy the rest of Scania,” said Tim Schuldt, a Frankfurt-based analyst with Equinet AG.
 The carmaker started buying stock in the Swedish manufacturer in 2000, and acquired majority voting control in March 2008.
 VW, as part of the profit and loss transfer agreement reached last year with MAN, is required by law to offer to buy out the German truckmaker’s remaining owners.
 An investor wanting to buy the remaining shares in a Swedish company in which it already has a holding must make a public offer to all minority owners who can then accept or reject it, Rolf Skog, head of the Swedish Securities Council, said by phone today.
 That eliminates one of the main investment hurdles the industry faced: the risk that cash-strapped state utilities buying the power would default, leaving plants unable to sell their output elsewhere.
 At 55 rupees, the plants could find alternate buyers, including industrial and commercial consumers who pay the highest rates for power.
 In India, investors from Goldman to Morgan Stanley have led about $2 billion of private-equity buyouts, project and company acquisitions in the renewable industry since 2010, according to Bloomberg New Energy Finance.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- CBS Corp, owner of the most-watched television network, reported fourth-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates, helped by new programming agreements, and accelerated its stock buybacks by $15 billion.
 CBS said today it will buy back a total of $2 billion shares in the current quarter.
 Mining Output Iron ore sales to China from Australia’s Port Hedland climbed 27 percent in January from a year earlier as miners increased output and the biggest buyer boosted inventories to the highest level in 16 months.
 made a bid to buy Michael Foods Group Inc, the processing and distribution business controlled by Goldman Sachs Group’s private-equity arm, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 The Minnetonka, Minnesota-based company was acquired by Goldman from buyout firm Thomas H.
 “It’s very difficult to buy good equipment in India,” said Thakur, who trains near the Himalayan mountains.
 “They’ll take a broader look at the economy, not just at payrolls,” he said, as a “broad consensus” at the Fed favors cutting monthly bond buying by $10 billion at each policy meeting.
 The central bank has said it will keep buying bonds until the outlook for the labor market has “improved substantially” The Fed also repeated that the benchmark interest rate is likely to be kept near zero until “well past the time” the unemployment rate declines below 65 percent.
 Fink said the worst start of the year for emerging-market equities since 2009 is providing a buying opportunity.
 Investors should buy Indonesian stocks because of the country’s expanding economy and a debt-to-gross-domestic-product ratio that’s lower than most of the countries in Europe, Fink said.
 regulators and is working to get approval to buy Motorola from Google Inc.
 In addition to the Motorola acquisition to boost smartphones, the company agreed to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion to add corporate customers.
 Yang last month said the plan to buy the IBM server business, which was announced Jan.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc’s $16 billion plan to buy out the local partners in its Indian unit won government approval, six months after the South Asian nation ended limits on foreign ownership in the sector.
 Besides buying out its local partners, Vodafone is among eight companies bidding on Indian airwaves this week, including the renewal of permits slated to lapse in November in India’s two largest cities.
 “The fact that central banks have really agreed to keep policy stimulative should give investors a little bit of reassurance that they’re not going to undo the recovery that’s taken place” Fed Stimulus Fisher, an opponent of added stimulus who votes on policy this year, said he’ll remain a strong advocate of tapering the purchase of bond buying.
 The stock climbed 13 percent on May 24, the day a person familiar with the negotiations said it was close to buying Bausch & Lomb.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP, the world’s second-biggest manager of alternative assets such as private-equity funds and real estate, agreed to buy the industrial-packaging business of Illinois Tool Works Inc.
 Illinois Tool will use the proceeds to help finance a planned buyback of about 50 million shares by year-end to offset the dilution of per-share earnings, the company said in a separate statement.
 Last month, the firm agreed to buy the Ortho Clinical unit of Johnson & Johnson for $415 billion with the intent of operating the blood-diagnostics business as an independent entity.
 and private-equity firm Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC to buy rental-car business Hertz Corp.
 That year, it struck a $49 billion deal for DuPont Co’s auto-paint unit and a $35 billion buyout of United Technologies Corp’s Hamilton Sundstrand industrial unit.
 The companies expect the buyout to close in the middle of the year.
 Deal Multiple When asked on a conference call yesterday at what price HudBay might consider selling its stake, HudBay Chief Executive Officer David Garofalo said the company is “a buyer at this price and if somebody overpays, we will tender” Not everyone views HudBay’s offer as too low.
 trumped his bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, agreeing to buy the second-largest cable company in a $45 billion deal.
 overplayed its hand in negotiations with Comcast to buy Time Warner Cable in a joint takeover.
 Sirius Shares Liberty Media Corp, another Malone unit, offered to buy Sirius XM last month and the billionaire will continue to pursue the purchase of remaining shares, said Keith Moore, an analyst at MKM Partners.
 Homebuilder Brookfield Incorporacoes SA rallied after saying its corporate parent will offer to buy all outstanding shares for as much as 160 reais each to take it private.
 The business model is (1) buy stock, (2) move stock, so you could see why doing it in the reverse order would not be especially profitable.
 I like that confidence3 1 According to his court filing, Einhorn was buying Micron stock from July 2 through Nov.
 Apply that over five trading days of buying (34 million shares) and you get like $12 million of extra costs.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in the maker of Keurig coffee brewers, sending the shares surging.
 Coca-Cola is buying the 167 million newly issued shares for about $7498 apiece, the companies said yesterday in a statement.
 “The company faces significant competitive challenges that we believe will impact its margins over the next 12 months” In a short sale, a trader sells borrowed assets to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back later and pocket the price difference.
 has offered to buy out rivals’ customers from their contracts and introduced cheaper international calling plans, and AT&T Inc.
 Its holding in Paris-based L’Oreal, the world’s largest cosmetics company, will be cut to 233 percent from 294 percent after a 6 billion-euro ($82 billion) buyback by the Paris-based maker of Maybelline mascara.
 Deals Orrick, Darrois Villey Advise on L’Oreal’s Nestle Deal Orrick Herrington & Sutcliffe LLP advised L’Oreal SA, the world’s largest cosmetics maker, on its agreement to buy back 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA for 6 billion euros ($82 billion), the first sale of shares by the Swiss company after four decades of ownership.
 Wachtell, Latham on Mallinckrodt $13 Billion Pain-Drug Deal Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz advised Mallinckrodt Plc, the drugmaker spun off by Covidien Plc last year, on an agreement to buy Cadence Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 They write a put to Pemex, under which they pay Pemex if oil prices go down, and they hedge that by buying puts or selling futures in the market, and they make money on those hedges if oil prices go down.
 The more big price moves there are, the worse off you are: Your option and its hedge will be mismatched, and you will have to sell more when prices go down and buy more when prices go up.
 Convertible arbitrage investors are in the business of (1) buying options and (2) hedging in the underlying stock; they make money when there is a lot of volatility.
 employers added fewer jobs than forecast last month, raising speculation the Federal Reserve may slow the pace of reduction in bond buying amid signs of uneven economic growth.
 The still-unused program allows the ECB to buy bonds of indebted nations and has been credited with helping to calm record borrowing costs.
 Lenovo agreed to buy Motorola’s handset unit from Google Inc.
 Evonik Industries AG climbed 07 percent to 2820 euros after Exane started coverage of the chemical maker with an outperform rating, similar to a buy recommendation.
 The ball club has argued the current deal with Comcast, which has offered to buy the network, is unprofitable and hurts the team’s long-term prospects.
 Comcast, which claims to be owed more than $100 million, has said that it wants to buy the network’s assets or equity, saying it has substantial value.
 The Astros called the involuntary bankruptcy filing a power grab by the cable giant with the intent of stripping them of their value and buying the network on the cheap.
 The world’s largest commercial buyer of liquefied natural gas is offering 10-year notes at a yield of about 145 basis points more than Treasuries, according to a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified because the terms aren’t set.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 recommended investors buy Russian exporters as the ruble slumps.
 Price Estimate Bank of America reiterated its buy recommendation on Russia’s biggest oil companies, including OAO Rosneft, OAO Lukoil, OAO Gazprom Neft and preferred stocks of OAO Surgutneftegas, according to the report.
 Bank of America reiterated its recommendation to buy Yandex and competitor Mailru, while keeping a neutral rating on CTC Media Inc, Russia’s only traded television company.
 led a group of companies that agreed in 2012 to buy license rights to Kodak’s digital-imaging portfolio for about $527 million.
 Vevo is seeking to develop blocks of programming for TV networks rather than trying to buy a cable network, Caraeff said.
 to find a buyer, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 and European regulators, management believes there is less risk for buyers and has begun contacting other drugmakers to gauge their interest in a deal, said two of the people, who asked not to be named because the Morrisville, North Carolina-based company’s plans are private.
 The stock was upgraded to outperform at Credit Suisse, while UBS raised its rating to buy.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Kennedy Wilson Europe Real Estate Plc plans to raise about 750 million pounds ($125 billion) selling shares on the London Stock Exchange, and will use some of the proceeds to buy European properties.
 The company has agreed to buy two portfolios with 40 office, industrial and retail properties in the UK, valued at about 223 million pounds, it said.
 Investors have already agreed to buy about 685 million pounds worth of the shares to be sold, according to the statement.
 The company will keep a majority stake in Forbes even if it bids with a partner and may offer the Forbes family the opportunity to buy back shares in the company, one of the people said.
 “Its media value is very strong, so for some buyers a higher price may not make a difference,” Doctor said.
 Fosun International, the Shanghai-based conglomerate controlled by billionaire Guo Guangchang, has been on a buying spree.
 who rates the shares a buy.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Rosneft, Russia’s largest oil company, plans to develop its drilling arm RN-Burenie and buy more rigs to counter the rising cost of oilfield services.
 “We will develop RN-Burenie, we will modernize it, we will buy new rigs,” Chief Executive Officer Igor Sechin said.
 “Any time you have a company like Apple come in and invest in your area, especially with this type of operation, it’s significant,” said Smith, who triumphed late last year when Apple spent $114 million to buy the factory.
 Wide Spreads While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 “That primary customer of theirs, which is the mid to low-end consumer, has been extra cautious” Russo, who recommends buying the shares, said the weather last month was unusually harsh and likely kept diners from venturing out for fast food.
 “I have three watches, but probably 300 pairs of shoes,” said Oshodi, a 38-year-old buyer for fashion brands in London.
 “It’s such a big investment, I’d rather just buy one and hold it.
 And buy more shoes” After 2013 marked the slowest sales growth since the global financial crisis, companies from Audemars Piguet to Richard Mille have said they are targeting women, seeking to secure new customers from a segment that only accounts for 35 percent of sales at the moment.
 Diamonds and movie stars like Portman aren’t enough to entice women to buy a watch, said James Dowling, co-author of “The Best of Time: Rolex Wristwatches” Women are more likely to buy a dress or shoes to display status, while watches are still “such a guy thing” Dowling said the industry needs more women in leadership to figure out their feminine marketing, a point made by Johann Rupert, the billionaire who controls Cartier-maker Cie.
 No woman will ever buy that’” Bejeweled Watches One exception is Nayla Hayek, the chairwoman of Swatch Group AG.
 That would buy about 1,000 pairs of Manolo Blahnik Cetto pumps, according to the current retail prices.
 Redshaw, 41, who resigned from Barclays in London after more than eight years at the company, is buying and selling European Union permits for his own account from his home in the southeast of the capital, he said by phone, declining to provide further details.
 ‘Rationalize’ Discrepancies “How should we rationalize the discrepancies in regulatory treatment between a dark pool and an exchange, given that they are expected to perform the same generalized function: serving as a place to match buyers and sellers?” Stein said in her speech to the TraderForum 2014 Equity Trading Summit.
 Wilmar will buy 52 billion rupees ($84 million) of new shares in India’s largest refiner at 2008 rupees apiece, it said yesterday in a statement.
 Wilmar and Shree Renuka’s controlling holders will then offer to buy as much as another 26 percent of the expanded share capital for 2189 rupees each.
 Managing Director Addy Loudiadis, agreed to buy a UK.
 “Macro-economic and demographic factors are set to drive demand and Rothesay Life expects there to be further long term expansion in pension insurance buyouts and buy-ins,” the London-based company said in the statement.
 28, Obama endorsed setting the federal minimum at $1010 an hour, saying an increase would “help families” and “give businesses customers with more money to spend” Business groups aren’t buying that argument.
 Three made the pledge today as it acknowledged receipt of a statement of objections listing the European Commission’s concerns with its plans to buy O2 Ireland.
 Billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison agreed in June to buy O2, Ireland’s No.
 agreed to buy an 833 stake percent in September.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Statoil ASA, Europe’s second-largest natural-gas supplier, will merge its gas- and oil-trading units as differences in buying and selling the two commodities fade and competition increases.
 The Norwegian company plans to combine its gas-trading operations with a liquids division that buys and sells crude, condensate, refined products and gas liquids from May 1, Eldar Saetre, Statoil’s executive vice president for marketing, processing and renewable energy, said in an interview.
 Applied Materials is seeking to capture more market share after agreeing to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 Traders who stand ready to buy or sell shares as needed -- known as “market makers” -- are paid rebates by the exchange, while those on the other side of the transaction -- the “takers” -- pay a fee.
 Proponents of the maker-taker system say it has lowered costs for investors and eased buying and selling of shares.
 BlackRock agreed in January 2013 to buy two REG wind plants as part of a longer-term partnership.
 He has an outperform rating on the shares, the equivalent of a buy.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- AGL Energy Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest electricity retailer, agreed to buy New South Wales state-owned power plants for A$151 billion ($137 billion), setting up a clash with the competition regulator.
 The assets are drawing interest from private-equity firms that specialize in buying a group of companies from buyout firms, known as secondary direct deals, the people said.
 The parallel processes have drawn the ire of potential buyers for Mauser, according to one of the people familiar with the situation.
 agreed to buy Aurora Oil & Gas Ltd.
 Late Cloud “SAP is thinking more optimistically about growth of its core than we are,” Rick Sherlund, a Nomura Securities analyst who recommends buying SAP shares, said in a Feb.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Romania, using record-low interest rates to rebuild a housing market devastated by the economic crisis, is forcing homebuyers like Vlad Popescu to abandon cheap euro-denominated mortgages in the name of financial stability.
 Romania is providing $42 billion in loan guarantees to first-time homebuyers such as Popescu.
 “My monthly payments went up by 300 lei, but they’re fixed now and I don’t expect any significant changes in the next few years” Hungarian Troubles The changes come after hundreds of thousands of homebuyers in neighboring Hungary took out Swiss-franc loans, only to be hurt by a slump in their own currency.
 The revised government program is intended to protect leu-earning home buyers against exchange-rate swings, such as when the leu plunged 12 percent against the euro at the end of 2008, driving up euro-denominated loan payments.
 “Local developers are buying land and building tailor-fit houses for the program.
 Yesterday’s rally was unjustified because the company’s plans are aimed at raising capital instead of reforming the state-controlled energy producer, said Jefferies, which cut its recommendation on Sinopec’s stock to hold from buy.
 The aim is to boost earnings opportunities for market makers that facilitate trading, spurring them to buy and sell more shares and create conditions that would persuade more startups to go public.
 Brian Conroy of Fidelity Capital Markets contends that in the absence of evidence linking the narrow price increment with a drop in IPOs, widening the difference between bids and asks will only make buying stocks more expensive for investors.
 Larger technology companies are also buying businesses and growing faster than they used to, Vasudevan said.
 have been on a buying spree, providing alternatives to an IPO.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 Bidding was global and wealthy new buyers from China, Middle East and Russia helped push up prices for historic, blue-chip and emerging art stars.
 Prices include buyer’s premium; estimates do not.
 “Comcast is probably a better buyer for Time Warner Cable shareholders,” Witcher said in a phone interview.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Mubadala Development Co, owned by the government of Abu Dhabi, received bids from GDF Suez and a unit of Veolia Environnement SA to buy cooling operations in the emirate, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Bank of America Merrill Lynch is at an advanced stage in evaluating the bids and a buyer could be chosen soon, according to one of the people.
 Companies in China, the world’s biggest copper consumer, are seeking to take advantage of commodity price declines to buy assets overseas.
 A deal valued at $5 billion would be almost the largest mining-related acquisition by a Chinese buyer, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, second only to the $12 billion purchase of a stake in Rio Tinto Group completed by Chinalco in partnership with Alcoa Inc.
 WTI also rose on speculation that the Federal Reserve would trim its bond buying more slowly after durable-goods orders dropped in December.
 “More than half the buying last week was short covering,” said Tim Evans, an energy analyst at Citi Futures in New York.
 Exane BNP Paribas raised the bookmaker to outperform, similar to a buy rating, from neutral, saying the stock has fallen too far on investor concern that the UK.
 Plane makers are betting that a rise in corporate profit will drive a rebound in sales as buyers look beyond cost cuts to expand their activities.
 Even so, Perry said the pipeline for deals in Turkey and South Africa remains strong and that some buyers may even see a benefit in investing in a dollar-denominated asset.
 The stock, which is down 59 percent this year, has 20 buy and four hold recommendations from analysts.
 The Calgary-based company announced a share buyback yesterday of as much as C$1 billion and raised its dividend 15 percent, after a 54 percent boost last year.
 “We believe the market would prefer to see a higher dividend rather than a share buyback,” Phil Skolnick, a New York-based analyst for Canaccord Genuity Group Inc, wrote in a note to investors today.
 The plan takes care of most of Elliott’s demands, according to Marshall, who recommends buying the shares.
 The buyout is part of Chief Executive Officer Timotheus Hoettges’s strategy to broaden Deutsche Telekom’s reach in eastern Europe.
 The T-Mobile stake was part of a 12 billion-euro leveraged buyout of Czech phone company Radiokomunikace AS by Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 Deutsche Telekom may also consider buying out minority shareholders in Hungary and Slovakia, he said.
 Telefonica’s Strategy Leigers said Deutsche Telekom doesn’t have concrete plans for more buyouts.
 Bonventre said he was one of two employees who spent decades managing the investment advisory unit’s account with JPMorgan Chase & Co, where Madoff held customer money instead of using it to buy securities.
 Tyerman, who rates Air Canada as buy, said fares will have to rise because carriers typically need to find more revenue and cut expense to recover from a “cost shock” Fourth Quarter Fourth-quarter profit excluding some costs and gains totaled C$3 million, or 1 cent a share, the company said.
 Air Canada said the currency derivatives allow it to buy US.
 In December, new-home prices in the country’s first-tier cities rose more than 15 percent, led by Guangzhou and Shenzhen in the south, as local property curbs failed to deter buyers.
 car buyers’ purchasing decisions.
 Europe’s largest mobile-phone operator said it spent 19 billion pounds ($32 billion) buying frequencies at yesterday’s sale.
 Also, an investment fund controlled by Ergen, who at one point offered to buy LightSquared airwaves for $22 billion, would suffer worse treatment if it opposes the plan than if it votes in favor.
 “If Chinese demand is sustained, it will be a long-term bullish factor” Gold for immediate delivery sank 28 percent last year to end a 12-year rally as the Fed decided in December to trim monthly bond buying.
 Liu estimates that China’s demand topped 1,400 tons in 2013 as the association’s data probably does not include government purchases and buying by financial institutions.
 Elizabeth Warren of Massachusetts and Sherrod Brown of Ohio have said they won’t back a plan unless it guarantees affordable loans for most buyers.
 They are pushing Democrats friendly to their cause to hold out for a measure that would ease credit for home buyers in all income groups and help for low-income renters in multifamily homes.
 Reaching agreement on the future of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy mortgages and package them into bonds, has been one of the central challenges of Washington’s response to the 2008 credit crisis.
 Bill Gross, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, said he “continues to buy” US.
 “Emerging markets are stabilizing and equities are positive, and that has taken some of the safe-haven buying out of Treasuries,” said Larry Milstein, managing director in New York of government-debt trading at RW.
 Gross’s View “I continue to buy and Pimco continues to buy what we think are the safest positions,” Gross, founder of Pacific Investment Management Co, said during an interview on Bloomberg Television’s “Market Makers” with Erik Schatzker and Stephanie Ruhle.
 “Front-end Treasuries -- buy four- to five-year Treasures.
 The New York-based company agreed to buy a group of ValueClick Inc.
 Last month, it introduced the Twist variant of the Nano, equipped with features such as power steering to upgrade its image and win back urban buyers.
 headed for a record high in Shanghai trading after saying it had teamed up with TPG Capital to buy Chindex International Inc, in a deal valuing the hospital operator at $369 million.
 “We believe that new partners and committed financing are needed to achieve the next phases of these plans, including new facilities in our current service locations as well as significant geographic expansion”  The buyers are offering $1950 a share, 14 percent more than the stock’s closing price on Feb.
 Medical Equipment Fosun will buy as much as $1937 million of shares in Chindex and spend another $45 million to acquire a further 30 percent of Chindex Medical Ltd, a unit that distributes medical equipment and instruments, the drugmaker said in a separate statement.
 The company, which emerged from bankruptcy a year ago following a leveraged buyout from real estate developer Sam Zell, is hiving off its newspapers to focus on its more lucrative broadcast television properties.
 The company had hired advisers to evaluate interest from buyers, people with knowledge of the process said last year.
 War Chest News Corp, publisher of the Wall Street Journal, serves as both a model for Tribune’s spinoff proposal and a potential buyer for some of its newspapers.
 Bimbo, the owner of the Entenmann’s brand, has spent about $34 billion to buy at least four companies since 2009: Sara Lee Corp’s North American bakeries, George Weston Ltd’s US.
 ‘Challenging Scenario’ Nine of 16 analysts have a sell rating on Mexico City-based Bimbo, four have a buy rating and three recommend to hold the stock.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- L’Oreal SA, the world’s largest cosmetics maker, agreed to buy back 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA for 6 billion euros ($82 billion), the first sale of shares by the Swiss company after four decades of ownership.
 Nestle intends to use the cash proceeds to start a share buyback program, it said.
 In addition to buying back shares, the Vevey, Switzerland-based company is examining acquisitions and may look at areas including skincare, according to a person familiar with the situation.
 The CEO said the amount of shares L’Oreal agreed to buy from Nestle is the level that affords the maximum accretion for the Bettencourt family below the one-third threshold that typically triggers a mandatory share offer.
 Nestle could use proceeds to buy back 4 percent of its own stock, said Patrick Hasenboehler, an analyst at J.
 The buyback will be financed exclusively with cash and issuance of commercial paper and won’t require the sale of its stake in French pharmaceuticals maker Sanofi, the cosmetics company said.
 Kazakhstan’s central bank devalued the tenge as reduced bond buying by the Fed sparks capital outflows from emerging markets and the currency of its main trading partner weakens.
 The Philippine peso fell the most among Asian currencies, retreating from a one-month high, on speculation the central bank took advantage of the recent rally to buy dollars and boost foreign reserves.
 The former associate director, Nicos Stephanou, who testified against Contorinis in exchange for leniency, said he passed inside tips to the fund manager about Cerberus Capital Management LP’s bid to buy grocer Albertson’s Inc.
 Property scams run rife with buildings often painted with warnings such as “This House is Not for Sale” to avoid conmen selling homes to unsuspecting buyers or “Beware of 419,” referring to the Nigerian fraud code.
 The central bank devalued the tenge by about 19 percent as reduced bond buying by the US.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Etihad Airways PJSC said it will decide within 30 days whether to buy a stake in ailing Italian airline Alitalia SpA as the Abu Dhabi flag carrier continues its streak of purchases to funnel traffic through the Middle East.
 buy its low-end server business this year for $23 billion.
 By reducing the amount of stock in circulation by about 17 percent in the last four years, the buybacks have helped increase earnings per share even as revenue drops.
 Leverage Increases IBM has been rewarding shareholders with dividend increases and share buybacks, raising its quarterly payout to 95 cents from 65 cents in 2011, Bloomberg data show.
 FirstRand is seeking to restart its expansion plans in Africa after three deals to buy assets in Zambia, Ghana and Nigeria failed in as many years.
 and Templeton Asset Management that shares are cheap and will lure buyers.
 Hartford authorized buybacks of as much as $2 billion this year and next, and said it plans to repay $656 million of debt.
 Hartford said it spent $118 million on buybacks in January.
 The agency put in place more than 60 rules seeking to have most swaps guaranteed at central clearinghouses, which accept collateral from buyers and sellers, and traded on execution facilities or other exchanges.
 Hedge Funds Potential buyers of non-performing loans, tied to delinquent borrowers who haven’t yet lost their homes to foreclosure, include hedge-fund firms such as Ellington Management Group LLC and One William Street Capital Management LP.
 Hana Bank, part of the Hana Financial Group, has the largest bank network in the Asian nation after buying Korea Exchange Bank in 2012, Akbank said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Gun World co-owner Joseph Ferrero is telling customers it’s their last chance to buy some semiautomatic handguns including a 40-caliber Smith & Wesson M&P or a 9 mm Ruger LC9 because “California has effectively banned” them.
 Supreme Court, which in 2008 upheld individuals’ right to own handguns, calling them the “quintessential self-defense weapon” ‘Safe’ Handguns “It comes to the point where we will only be selling revolvers,” said Ferrero, whose website advertises the last chance to buy select models as more fall off the state’s list of “safe” handguns.
 One law that didn’t survive was Chicago’s ban on firearm transfers and sales within the city, which a federal judge found unconstitutional because it allowed residents to own guns while making it illegal to buy them.
 Microstamp Tracing Microstamps allow police to identify a gun’s owner if it was sold in a state that requires handgun registration; otherwise, federal authorities can trace it back to the first retail buyer, according to the mayors’ group.
 Harris didn’t provide sufficient evidence that 10 days are needed for a background check or as a “cooling off” period, particularly if the buyer already owns a gun, the judge said.
 foreclosure auctions in the last two years by buying as many as 200,000 single-family homes.
 Hedge funds, private-equity and real-estate investment trusts, which have raised more than $20 billion to buy rental homes, are getting opportunities to buy soured home-loan debt as banks face new regulations that make it more expensive to hold.
 That’s down from the fourth quarter 2009 peak of 97 percent  Investors buying NPLs to increase their rental portfolios is a cause for alarm because they stand to profit by pushing people out of their homes, said Kevin Stein, associate director of the California Reinvestment Coalition, a San Francisco-based tenant and consumer advocacy group.
 “They shouldn’t be in the business of buying distressed loans for the purpose of foreclosing on people” Altisource Residential, which bought 13,500 delinquent loans last year, resolved about 288 in the fourth quarter.
 Wayne Hughes, announced a joint venture in September to buy distressed mortgages.
 Hughes brought together a group of executives from his company Public Storage to begin buying homes in early 2012.
 Bayview Asset Management, a Coral Gables, Florida-based mortgage investment company backed by Blackstone, has been the largest buyer of NPLs sold at HUD auctions, spending $147 billion since 2012, according to data from the sales.
 Deferred Maintenance “The longer the borrower is in a house that’s non-performing, the amount of deferred maintenance just grows and grows and grows,” said Jon Daurio, co-founder of Kondaur Capital Corp, which started buying delinquent loans in 2007.
 Caesars, which was taken private in a 2008 leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital, has about $24 billion in debt.
 Chief Executive Officer Michael Johnson, who earlier this month rewarded shareholders by boosting Herbalife’s buyback, is working to expand sales of vitamins, skin creams and meal-replacement shakes while fending off Ackman’s accusations.
 Adjusted profit per share in the current year will be $585 to $605, reflecting the buyback, up from a previous forecast of $545 to $565, Herbalife said yesterday.
 3 increased its share buyback plan by 50 percent to $15 billion and announced a sale of $1 billion of convertible bonds.
 Prime Minister Manmohan Singh’s government in 2012 permitted foreign airlines to buy as much as 49 percent in local carriers, reversing a decade-old ban on such investments.
 CD&R, based in New York, is one of the industry’s oldest private-equity firms and specializes in buying unwanted or underperforming divisions of larger corpoations.
 Rhone Capital, also based in New York, specializes in mid-market leveraged buyouts, recapitalizations and partnership financings, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Potential buyers have asked banks to line up about $13 billion in debt for the acquisition, which would leverage the business to about 65 times earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, according to one of the people familiar with the situation.
 The country’s low-sulfur crude is prized by Japanese buyers as a cleaner-burning fuel for power generation.
 Yang Jianbo was Everbright’s head of global markets overseeing the firm’s own money when faulty software sent out buy orders worth as much as 234 billion yuan ($39 billion) on Aug.
 The software used by Everbright’s proprietary-trading desk, which specializes in high-frequency trades, sent 26,082 unintended buy orders in just two seconds on Aug.
 over the past two years and is interested in buying Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drugs business, people with knowledge of the matter said last week.
 “Our ability to recoup the difference via external funding has been impacted by the drop in PT Bumi Resources share price” Bumi Plc was founded in 2011 as financier Nathaniel Rothschild agreed to buy stakes in two Indonesian coal producers including the Bakries’ PT Bumi Resources.
 The two-part transaction involves the family buying back 292 percent of Bumi Resources, the biggest Indonesian coal exporter, from ARMS.
 Meanwhile, ARMS’s Chairman Samin Tan buys 238 percent of ARMS from the Bakries for $223 million.
 The revised terms mean the Bakries will buy back 254 percent of Bumi Resources, leaving ARMS with 38 percent.
 The world’s biggest diamond producer plans to jettison a process that allocates gems to buyers in proportion to their business plans.
 It will instead emphasize buyers’ track record in making purchases at previous sales events, the Anglo American Plc unit said in e-mailed comments this week.
 “The more a sightholder buys from De Beers today, the more it will receive in the future” As well as simplifying its sightholder application process, De Beers will change the criteria it demands from its customers, increasing the focus on financial strength and transparency, according to the company.
 Varda Shine, former CEO of De Beers’ trading arm, said last year that the company wanted customers who added more value, rather then buyers who speculated on rising prices.
 Generally speaking, there are two ways that a bank could find itself doing a trade: By paying for it, or by being paid for it6 In the first type of trade, the bank is looking to buy something.
 It is buying a service, and the service costs it money.
 You buy stock, you pay a commission.
 You buy call options, you pay the bid/offer spread.
 (Also the fact that Lehman hedged the trade; the slides say, "The desk has hedged with 10-year OTC options" If Lehman was buying these puts for its own purposes, it presumably wouldn't hedge -- those purposes would be, in effect, to hedge something else) This doesn't mean that Buffett literally came to Lehman saying, "here is a trade I want to do, will you do it for me? I will pay you" "Customer facilitation" often means something more like, Lehman salespeople came out to Omaha, proposed this trade to Buffett, talked him into it, and then charged him a nice profit for it7 By the way, how nice is this profit? It's $165 million on a $1 billion notional, or 165 percent of notional.
 This is sort of a degenerate case of the other two though: Even smart hedge funds who think that they're buying cheap from their bank also understand that their bank is charging them a spread.
 “There’s not a lot of activity aside from optimism to buy ahead of tomorrow’s job reports,” Brian Huen, a fund manager with Red Sky Capital Management Ltd, which oversees C$230 million ($207 million), said by phone from Toronto.
 analyst Richard Gray gave the stock a new buy rating with a 12-month target price of C$13 a share.
 El Economista, a Spanish newspaper, reported today that Telefonica was in talks to buy Iusacell, citing unnamed sources familiar with the matter.
 “Apple’s still a great place to work, but they’re not experiencing the uber-growth they once did,” said Brian Marshall, an analyst at ISI Group in San Francisco who has a buy rating on Apple stock.
 "But wait," you say, "aren't these high frequency traders buying the answer sheet before the exam? Isn't that the sort of thing that gets you sent to prison for 15 years?" Well, only sometimes, is the answer.
 Of the 18 analysts covering the company’s New York shares, 10 have a hold recommendation, seven recommend buying and one has a sell rating.
 Telstra is buying spectrum in its push for greater dominance in Australia’s A$24 billion ($21 billion) mobile market as it prepares to hand over more-profitable fixed lines to a national fiber network.
 The activist started buying the stock and asked for board representation in October, after Ariad shares plunged on regulators’ concerns over the safety of its cancer drug, Iclusig.
 “We do not intend to dip into our reserve to pay dividend” Prime Minister Manmohan Singh’s government plans to seek 25 billion rupees from NMDC via a special dividend or a share buyback, two Finance Ministry officials with direct knowledge of the matter said in January.
 KKR & Co, the private-equity firm run by Henry Kravis and George Roberts, may buy a majority stake in the UniCredit and Intesa pool, La Repubblica earlier reported.
 The buyback plan marked the company’s first since 2007.
 We haven’t given it a name” Iran will curtail use of existing buy-back contracts, he said.
 The buy-back deals require companies to pay for oil and gas exploration and recover their investment from production at a pre-arranged rate of return.
 Guaranty Trust, which also operates in six West African countries, agreed to buy Fina Bank in July, subject to regulatory approval in Nigeria, Kenya, Rwanda and Uganda.
 Machinery manufacturer Industrias Romi SA jumped the most since 2007 after Banco Itau BBA SA raised it to the equivalent of buy.
 It bought $17 billion in January, after buying $630 million the previous month, bringing its reserves to a record $832 billion.
 The central bank decided last month to reduce its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Rakuten Inc, the Japanese online retailer controlled by billionaire Hiroshi Mikitani, plummeted in Tokyo trading after announcing it will buy the Viber Internet messaging and calling service for $900 million.
 “We understand the strategic role to help merchants communicate with consumers through mobiles, but are not sure Rakuten needed to buy Viber for that” Matthew downgraded the stock to underperform, or sell, from buy and said “direct monetization of the Viber business is likely to take a long time” Viber will provide a distribution channel for Rakuten’s digital products, Mikitani said at a briefing in Tokyo on Feb.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The sale of $9 billion in 30-year Treasury Inflation Protected Securities yesterday drew bids 234 times the amount of securities on offer, the weakest since October 2001 amid stagnant inflation and as the Fed reduces its bond buying.
 19 signaled policy makers will probably continue to reduce the bond-buying program they use to help support the economy.
 The Fed is buying $65 billion of Treasury and mortgage debt a month after cutting the amount by $10 billion in January and again in February.
 NLMK buys 55 million to 6 million tons of iron-ore pellets from Metalloinvest Holding Co.
 Dallas Fed President Richard Fisher said policy makers should keep cutting bond-buying even as winter weather slows growth.
 Fisher said he would favor trims in bond buying at each Fed meeting unless he sees “something truly frightening” in the nation’s economy.
 Bernanke, scaling back bond-buying under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy in “measured steps” The central bank has cut its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage debt to $65 billion, from $85 billion last year, citing economic improvement.
 The buying is designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and fuel growth.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, will close down two funds targeting individual investors in a setback to private-equity firms’ efforts to attract money from individuals and eventually the $4 trillion market for 401(k) retirement plans.
 Central Park Group plans to allocate money from the pool to funds run by Carlyle, the second-largest alternative-asset manager, including to the firm’s leveraged-buyout funds, according to regulatory filings.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Outerwall Inc, owner of the Redbox DVD rental dispensers, rose to a record after saying it will buy back more than 20 percent of its stock.
 “They’re buying back a lot of their stock, and come tomorrow, you’re going to see huge demand for their shares,” Michael Pachter, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles, said yesterday.
 “You don’t have many companies with more than 20 percent of their shares being available for buyback in such a short period” Pachter has an outperform rating on the stock.
 The new buyback represented about 22 percent of the total shares outstanding, based on the company’s market value of $162 billion yesterday.
 in 2013, started out this year in the lead with record January sales as carmakers broaden their lineups to bring in younger buyers.
 Several of the firms looked into buying Telesat in 2011, when the Ottawa-based satellite owner ran a failed auction, the people said.
 The company is probably already priced for a sale, limiting any premium a buyer would be willing to pay, the people said.
 The German telecommunications provider “has no reason” to buy the remaining stake, Magyar Telekom’s Chairman Kerstin Gunther said in an interview from the capital city today.
 In July, the company agreed to buy out Vivendi SA’s controlling stake.
 Funds that buy shares in the less-developed nations posted inflows of $407 million in the first six weeks of 2014, while $21 billion was pulled from emerging markets, EPFR Global data show.
 19, even as slower China growth and the Federal Reserve’s plan to trim bond buying weighed on developing and developed-nation gauges.
 Federal Reserve pledging to buy fewer bonds and the global economy gathering steam, the safe bet going into 2014 was to avoid debt markets in favor of equities.
 That added to concern growth in the Asian nation, which buys everything from Chile’s copper to South Korea’s cars, is losing momentum just as a high-yield trust in China threatened to default.
 Fifty-three of 104 assembly members voted against Lone Star’s offer to buy the government-backed railway and logistics company, according to a Dec.
 The Federal Reserve will release minutes tomorrow of its January meeting, when it decided to cut bond-buying a second time.
 The lenders are moving cash out of government bonds and increasing loans as the central bank buys sovereign debt to stoke inflation and stimulate the world’s third-largest economy.
 Stock Buyback Mitsubishi UFJ will buy back 390 billion yen of preferred shares in April and cancel the stock, it said in a statement.
 Mitsubishi UFJ, led by President Nobuyuki Hirano, is spearheading an expansion abroad by Japanese banks as they look to more profitable loan markets.
 “The market is looking for some certainty now” Shell, Europe’s largest oil company, flagged last year that it would “eventually” sell the 23 percent holding, raising speculation this may trigger approaches from potential buyers.
 Woodside faces growing pressure to make an acquisition of as much as $5 billion and may consider buying InterOil Corp.
 Itau agreed to buy Unibanco for about 267 billion reais in 2008, the biggest Brazilian banking-industry deal.
 operator of betting shops to buy from neutral, citing recent declines in the share price.
 Jefferies maintained its buy rating and raised its share-price forecast by 34 percent to HK$660, saying it expects the company’s revenue from online games to increase this year.
 L’Oreal shares have been buoyed by speculation it may buy back some or all of Nestle’s 29 percent holding in the maker of Maybelline mascara even as sales slow in western Europe and North America.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, the Chinese e-commerce company said to be preparing for an IPO, offered to buy the shares of AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 A share buyback to be funded from the proceeds will be announced “soon,” the company said.
 Nestle experienced “material negative pricing” in Europe from passing on lower ingredient costs to consumers buying its Moevenpick ice cream and pet food.
 He is one of five analysts with that recommendation, while 14 say buy and one says sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 29, CGI said it was renewing a plan to buy back as many as 218 million shares, or 10 percent of the public float.
 “The cheapest opportunity in the world is to buy back their own stock right now,” Brandon Snow, a fund manager at CI Investments Inc’s Cambridge Advisors unit, said in a telephone interview from Toronto.
 Share Buybacks A lack of share buybacks in the fourth quarter also was disappointing, according to Joseph Greff, a New York-based analyst at JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “And Starwood didn’t mention buyback activity in the first quarter to date, so we presume it hasn’t purchased stock so far this year either,” Greff wrote in a note to investors after results were released.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- More than 200 apartments at Battersea Power Station will be offered only to buyers in London as developers respond to criticism that too many new homes in the British capital are going to overseas investors.
 capital sold before completion were purchased by southeast Asian buyers, Land Securities Group Plc said last year.
 buyers, according to the company.
 to stop giving buyers living abroad the first chance to buy London homes sold before they’re built “It is important that homes are not exclusively marketed abroad before the UK,” Mayor of London Boris Johnson said at the time.
 The firm, already the largest allocator in hedge funds, is setting its sights on buying stakes in the money managers.
 Since the start of 2013, the fund had the option to buy back the revenue share at a pre-determined price, which it exercised in full on Feb.
 with Richard Fuld, said last week that Blackstone is seeing opportunities to buy stakes in firms with $3 billion to $4 billion in assets, at valuations of 45 times to 5 times cash flow.
 Goldman Sachs in 2007 raised $1 billion to buy minority pieces in hedge-fund firms.
 “The greatest irony of the Obama administration is that the one industry that he may not have really liked to see healthy has become the healthiest industry in the United States” Expanding Collections Brian Malte, senior policy director of the Washington-based Brady Campaign to Prevent Gun Violence, said gun-rights groups “demonized” Obama during the 2008 and 2012 presidential campaigns, leading many gun owners to buy more firearms.
 “We see the percentage of households owning guns declining,” he said, “and that indicates that those who already own guns are buying more of them” Other factors may also be driving gun demand, including Supreme Court decisions striking down gun restrictions, a spread of laws allowing people to carry concealed weapons and the increasingly popularity of sport shooting, said Mike Bazinet, spokesman for the National Shooting Sports Foundation, a trade organization that represents gun and ammunition manufacturers.
 Since then, the gun-buying fever has somewhat ebbed, according to FBI data on background checks.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Maurice “Hank” Greenberg’s Starr Investment Holdings agreed to buy MultiPlan Inc, a manager of claims for large health-care insurers, from two private equity firms.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Millennium & Copthorne Hotels Plc agreed to buy the Novotel New York Times Square hotel for $2736 million to expand in one of the world’s most popular tourist markets.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Continental AG agreed to buy Veyance Technologies Inc.
 A French minority shareholders’ association, ADAM, said separately in a letter to Thierry Peugeot this week that Dongfeng, the French state and the Paris-based carmaker’s founding family may be considered as acting together in their proposal, potentially triggering a mandatory offer to buy out the other stockholders.
 The company hasn’t specified the size of the potential stakes Dongfeng and the French state may buy, though it said they may acquire stock first and then further shares would be sold to current investors under “the preferred scenario” Other alternatives are being considered, Peugeot said.
 The yield difference between five- and 30-year Treasuries was at almost at the most in a month amid speculation the Fed will keep reducing its bond-buying.
 The bond-buying was designed to put pressure on long-term borrowing costs and spur growth.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Anxin-China Holdings Ltd, a provider of safety-monitoring services in China, agreed to buy a maker of elevator-security systems for HK$13 billion ($167 million) in cash to expand its range of operations.
 Bank Clothiers Inc, which agreed to buy the Eddie Bauer brand in deal valued at about $825 million.
 Japan Industrial, founded in 2002, is a private equity firm that buys units of large Japanese companies.
 Stratec Biomedical AG climbed 35 percent after HSBC Holdings Plc advised investors to buy the shares.
 HSBC Holdings Plc raised its rating on the medical-analysis equipment maker to overweight from neutral, meaning investors should buy the shares.
 Germany’s largest steelmaker received European Union approval to buy back the Terni steel mill in Italy and the VDM alloy unit from Outokumpu Oyj.
 Mexico’s imminent energy industry opening means the country will become an important player, with the additional supply contributing to a “buyers’ market” for energy companies looking for new contracts, Betancourt said.
 5 as Fed Chair Janet Yellen said she would continue her predecessor’s approach toward the central bank’s bond-buying program and Chinese imports surged in January.
 Rhoen-Klinikum AG gained 15 percent to 2341 euros, its highest price since at least 1998, after Warburg Research GmbH raised its rating on the healthcare operator to buy from hold.
 Deutsche Bank cut its rating to hold from buy, saying the shares don’t reflect the bank’s projection for slowing sales and earnings growth.
 The company plans to buy a stake in a neighboring plot controlled by Angela Leong, SJM’s executive director and a Macau legislator, to triple the size of the resort, Chief Executive Officer Ambrose So had said.
 Discounts of 15 percent to 20 percent are “the starting point” for contract talks, according to Herbert, who is based in San Francisco and rates Boeing as buy.
 Prime Minister Manmohan Singh also eased aviation investment rules in September 2012, allowing foreign airlines to buy as much as 49 percent stake in local carriers.
 Bank of America Merrill Lynch last month recommended investors buy Arabtec’s stock, revising its price estimate to 36 dirhams from 198 dirhams.
 Comcast last week proposed buying Time Warner for about $452 billion in stock.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- 3M Co, the manufacturer whose products range from electronics to dental braces, authorized a $12 billion stock buyback, and the shares jumped in late trading.
 The company didn’t specify how much stock-repurchase authority was left on a $75 billion buyback announced in February 2013.
 is focused on finding a joint-venture partner for its chip-manufacturing business after failing to attract a buyer for the division, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The company has unsuccessfully sought a buyer for the division since at least last year, one of the people said.
 That transition has lessened the need for corporate customers to buy their own server hardware, crimping IBM’s revenue in that market.
 The Financial Times reported earlier this week that IBM was seeking a buyer or partner for the division.
 December Sales Then after sales fell 6 percent in December, Charney again pointed to the center, saying in a company statement that it caused so much distraction that executives failed to buy enough of its best-selling items.
 Shorting refers to the practice of selling borrowed shares in hopes of profiting by buying them back later at a lower price and keeping the difference.
 Beder recommends buying the retailer’s shares.
 He has a buy recommendation on the company.
 Mortgages used to buy homes historically default less than replacement loans, partly because of the greater vigor employed by lenders in underwriting the first category of debt, the New York-based ratings firm said today in a report.
 A slowing of the Federal Reserve’s debt buying and an improving economy has driven the average rate on typical 30-year mortgages to 45 percent from a record low 347 percent in December 2012, according to Mortgage Bankers Association data.
 “Rhodium is back on the up, and industrial buying has really driven prices,” said Jonathan Butler, a precious metals strategist at Mitsubishi Corp.
 An ounce of rhodium buys about 076 ounce of platinum, compared with a ratio of 064 on Dec.
 Efforts to refinance Materis started in 2012 when Paris-based Wendel extended its debt maturity and first tried to find a buyer for its aluminates division Kerneos.
 Bank Clothiers Inc, the retailer resisting a merger with Men’s Wearhouse Inc, said it will buy the Eddie Bauer brand for cash and new shares, and buy some of its own stock at an 18 percent premium to reward shareholders.
 The buyer “has been engaged in an intensive process over the last two years to identify and review high-potential acquisition candidates” Jos.
 A month later, Men’s Wearhouse offered to buy the smaller chain for $55 a share in a tactic known as a Pac-Man defense, where a target thwarts being taken over by instead bidding for its suitor.
 Facebook agreed this week to buy text-messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 5 to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc, a company developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, short interest on the stock has fallen.
 in Ramat Gan, Israel who has a buy rating on the stock, said in a Feb.
 SodaStream and Pepsi spokesmen declined to comment on the buyout speculation.
 While he would “absolutely love” to buy a rival bank there, settling for pieces of other firms means he can avoid regulatory snares.
 In December he agreed to buy 21 Texas branches from Citigroup Inc.
 regional banks, spooked by crisis-era deals gone awry and a regulatory review holding up M&T Bank Corp’s merger with Hudson City Bancorp Inc, are buying pieces of rivals to sidestep pitfalls of acquiring whole firms.
 OneWest Bank FSB, backed by billionaires John Paulson and George Soros, will file for an initial public offering if it can’t find a buyer, people familiar with the situation said in January.
 While he wouldn’t rule out buying another bank, more attractive opportunities include poaching employees from competitors or taking over niche businesses, like lease financing, he said.
 Olson has an overweight rating on the stock, the equivalent of buy.
 The trading surge is part of a bond-market evolution that Morgan Stanley strategists led by Sivan Mahadevan say is allowing debt buyers to maneuver without Wall Street’s biggest banks using their own money to buy and sell in bigger blocks.
 Investors including Western Asset Management Co’s Michael Buchanan saw the outflows as a buying opportunity.
 “We were buyers on days of weakness,” Buchanan, who oversees $127 billion of credit investments at Western Asset in Pasadena, California, said in a Feb.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Mitsui Mining & Smelting Co, Japan’s biggest zinc producer, raised annual charges to overseas buyers by as much as 70 percent as consumption increases in China.
 Shanghai Premium The premium suppliers charge buyers in Shanghai for immediate delivery of zinc rose 38 percent to $1725 a ton in February from a year earlier, according to data from Metal Bulletin.
 “Strong growth should remain during the next quarters,” said the Paris-based analyst, who has a buy recommendation on the shares.
 The venues operate as central counterparties for every buy and sell order executed by their members, who post collateral, reducing the threat from a trader defaulting.
 offered to buy the shares this week.
 The pre-buyout rallies add to investor concern that the market for Chinese shares trading in the US.
 At least 35 Chinese companies have announced buyout deals to withdraw their US.
 The buyout group proposed to pay a 22 percent premium to the Jan.
 They will invest $236 billion by subscribing to new shares in GLP’s local subsidiary and $163 million through buying new shares in GLP, the Singapore-listed company said in an e-mailed statement.
 “These contract awards reinforce those views” Colman maintained his outperform rating for the stock, the equivalent of a buy, with a C$950 12-month price target.
 The stock has nine buys and one hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Nintendo Co’s founding Yamauchi family wants to sell its holdings in the world’s biggest maker of video-game machines as the company set terms for a 1142 billion-yen ($11 billion) share buyback.
 Nintendo announced plans for the buyback as President Satoru Iwata seeks new hit products after the Wii U console flopped with consumers.
 “The corporate bias towards dividends and buybacks” has to change before any significant rebound in mergers and acquisitions, Bok told analysts today in Boca Raton, Florida during an industry conference sponsored by Credit Suisse Group AG.
 In 2007, four dollars were spent on M&A for every one spent on dividends and buybacks in the US.
 (FRX)’s shares that cost $255 million to buy last week more than doubled in value to $6 million today after Actavis Plc agreed to buy the drugmaker.
 less than a year after buying control of Sprint Corp, the country’s third-largest wireless operator.
 The Astros called the involuntary bankruptcy a power grab by Comcast that’s intended to strip the network of its value and buy it on the cheap, according to court filings.
 Comcast has said it wants to buy the network.
 approval to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility phone unit and International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business, people familiar with the two deals said.
 BTG said it upgraded Itau to buy from neutral after the “stunning” results.
 Itau said last week it agreed to buy a controlling stake in Corpbanca for at least $22 billion to expand in Chile.
 London-based Montagu entered into exclusive talks with Rexam to buy the units, Bloomberg News reported last month, citing three people familiar with the matter.
 3 Washington Post article, had been trying for more than a month to resolve a defect on the federal website that prevented her from receiving the subsidy to which she says she’s entitled to buy insurance.
 Fed Policy The central bank said last week that it will press on with a second reduction to its monthly bond buying, by $10 billion to $65 billion, citing an improvement in the labor market.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Coronation Fund Managers Ltd’s small-cap fund is buying Hosken Consolidated Investments Ltd.
 Hewlett-Packard, based in Palo Alto, California, is facing shareholder lawsuits claiming current and former top executives knew, or should have known, about shoddy accounting practices at Autonomy before buying the company.
 Greenko plans to buy two more hydro projects totaling 10 megawatts from Lanco Hydro Power Ltd.
 rose the most since 2010 after announcing a $150 million stock buyback and posting fourth-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates.
 The share repurchase plan is twice the size of the last last buyback program, which was announced in August 2012.
 I would still think sterling is a buy on dips” The pound has strengthened 12 percent in the past year, the best performer of 10 developed-nation currencies tracked by Bloomberg Correlation-Weighted Indexes.
 Goldman Vehicle Goldman, which will buy the stake through its European merchant banking unit in a company named New Energy Investment Sarl, agreed to buy the stake after a “very, very detailed due diligence process where every stone has been turned here at the company,” Poulsen said.
 2 the new buyers and the government have agreed to seek an IPO when “conditions are right” “Goldman does have some capabilities in addressing capital markets that the government doesn’t,” Gert Vinther Joergensen, chief financial officer of Syd Energi, said last week in an interview.
 title insurer, agreed to buy Interthinx Inc.
 home and auto insurer, rallied the most in the 81-company Standard & Poor’s 500 Financials Index after authorizing the firm’s biggest stock buyback since 2006.
 dropped 46 percent as it agreed to buy Aurora Oil & Gas Ltd.
 CIBC analyst Arnold Van Graan upgraded the shares to sector outperform, the equivalent of buy, from sector perform, the equivalent of hold.
 Russia’s finance ministry will buy foreign currency equivalent to 35 billion rubles ($98 million) daily from Feb.
 Rostelecom set a buyout ratio for minorities who didn’t support spinning off the company’s mobile assets into a joint venture at 278 percent of the tendered amount, it said in a statement today.
 Deals Kirkland, Latham Advise on $32 Billion Carlyle Deal Kirkland & Ellis LLP advised Carlyle Group LP, the world’s second-biggest manager of alternative assets such as private-equity funds and real estate, on its agreement to buy the industrial-packaging business of Illinois Tool Works Inc.
 Suntory Beverage, which agreed in September to buy the Lucozade and Ribena drink brands from GlaxoSmithKline Plc for 135 billion pounds ($225 billion), plans to sell 4287 million cases of soft drinks domestically this year, 3 percent more than in 2013, it said in a January statement.
 The parent company agreed last month to buy US.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, said today it had an 114 percent margin on earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization last year, topping the 112 percent Ebitda margin of Russia’s retail industry leader Magnit.
 “If they price at Magnit’s levels, there won’t be anyone willing to buy the shares,” Ekaterina Iliouchenko, a money manager at Union Investment in Frankfurt, who oversees about $350 million in Eastern European assets, said by phone on Jan.
 Deals Davis Polk & Latham on Smith & Nephew $17 Billion Deal Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP advised Smith & Nephew Plc, which agreed to buy ArthroCare Corp.
 It may also prompt current tenants to stop paying rents or buying their beer from Punch, he said.
 Vale SA, the world’s largest iron-ore producer, gained after Morgan Stanley recommended buying the shares.
 Citigroup cut the owner of the Zara chain to neutral from buy and lowered its 2015 pre-tax earnings estimate by 3 percent, citing negative foreign exchange effects.
 Morgan Stanley upgraded the owner of the Food Lion supermarkets to overweight, similar to a buy rating, from equal weight, saying it will perform better than its European peers on its ability to generate sustainable free cash flow.
 Goldman Sachs raised the German builder controlled by Spain’s Actividades de Construccion & Servicios SA to buy from neutral, citing its recent performance lagging its peers and the possibility of a share buyback.
 The jeweler known for its charm bracelets announced its biggest ever share buyback after fourth-quarter profit beat estimates.
 Pandora will buy back as much as 24 billion kroner ($440 million) of stock in 2014, the Glostrup-based company said today as it reported a 76 percent increase in net income for the final three months of 2013.
 Deals Skadden Arps Advises France’s Imerys on $16 Billion Amcol Deal Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP is advising Imerys SA, a French building-materials company, which agreed to buy Amcol International Corp.
 18 that it would buy New York-based Forest Laboratories for about $25 billion in a deal that will transform it into a developer of brand-name drugs.
 Coca-Cola’s agreement to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 “But, we doubt it will” SodaStream shares had plunged since the New York Post reported July 9 that the company was struggling to attract buyout interest.
 PepsiCo, the world’s largest snack-food maker, denied on June 6 a report in the Israeli newspaper Calcalist that it was in talks to buy SodaStream for more than $2 billion, while Coca-Cola declined to comment on the same day after Globes daily said it would also bid for SodaStream.
 OAO Alrosa slid 32 percent to 3454 rubles following a Kommersant report OAO Rosneft seeks to cut the price of gas assets it agreed to buy from the nation’s biggest diamond producer for $14 billion.
 Fed policy makers reduced the pace of bond buying for a second straight meeting on Jan.
 For example, to get into a good school, many parents pay a large “sponsorship fee” or buy an apartment in the area.
 Almost 45 percent said they would feel less burdened with a girl as there would be no pressure to buy a house.
 One’s Enough “These days, you have to send children to kindergarten, buy them all sorts of snacks and stuff,” said the tanned and small-built farmer with pronounced wrinkles around his eyes.
 Lenta IPO Fed policy makers reduced the pace of bond buying for a second straight meeting on Jan.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, said today it plans to sell shares in London, according to a regulatory filing.
 among the potential buyers, said two people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 1 alternative-investment pick for 2014, with a third of millionaires surveyed saying they plan to buy this year.
 “Sophisticated, high-net-worth investors are much more concerned about losses” Collectibles ranked as the third-most-popular alternative-investment choice this year, with 20 percent of millionaires saying they planned to buy, followed by private equity at 19 percent and precious metals at 16 percent.
 Such properties have also attracted international buyers.
 That gives you more liquidity” Self-storage properties are among commercial real estate investments wealthy individuals are buying, Kaminsky of Morgan Stanley said.
 A potential buyer of $150 million worth of loans, Truman Capital LP, sued the company in the same court four months later for failing to complete the sale.
 Loan Servicers Nationstar has been among the buyers, with Tampa, Florida-based Walter Investment Management Corp.
 Lawsky, New York’s top financial regulator, from buying the rights to service about $39 billion in loans from Wells Fargo & Co.
 Earlier Cases Shareholders have claimed in earlier cases that current and former top executives knew, or should have known, about shoddy accounting practices at Autonomy before buying the company for $103 billion in 2011.
 Earnings Season Group of 20 finance ministers and central bankers meeting in Sydney this weekend will seek to minimize volatility as the Fed slows its bond-buying program.
 RBC Capital Markets upgraded the data storage company to outperform from sector perform, citing an improving PC market and the possibility share buybacks will boost the shares this year.
 G Asset Management proposed buying 51 percent of the company, valuing the maker of the Nook e-reader at $22 a share.
 Jefferies Group LLC raised its rating on the shares to buy from hold.
 Carlyle, like peers Blackstone Group LP and KKR & Co, has diversified its business beyond traditional leveraged buyouts to bolster assets dedicated to real estate and credit investments, reducing reliance on volatile LBO earnings.
 Conway said seven Carlyle funds, including its 2006 European buyout and 2008 Asian buyout funds, exceeded their performance thresholds during the quarter, allowing the firm to start accruing carried interest, or its slice of investment profits.
 GAAP Results Together, all of Carlyle’s funds from which it can collect a slice of profits -- which in addition to buyouts include real estate, energy and certain Global Market Strategies pools -- appreciated 6 percent in the quarter and 20 percent in 2013.
 The value of buyout holdings at private-equity firms affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric depends on quarterly mark-to-market valuations of those investments.
 Blackstone, KKR Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle that lasts about 10 years.
 buyout fund, the largest pool dedicated to US.
 leveraged buyouts since the financial crisis.
 The firm is committing more than $1 billion of equity to its $415 billion buyout of Johnson & Johnson’s blood diagnostics unit, just under $1 billion to its $32 billion acquisition of Illinois Tool Works Inc’s industrial-packaging business and $400 million to its purchase of a minority stake in hair-products maker Vogue International, he said on the call.
 agreed in October to buy most assets of Edison’s bankrupt wind unit.
 Wright has a buy on the stock.
 UrtheCast will be able to charge about the same, and more for video, said Ofir, who has a buy on the stock.
 “People may end up buying Digital Globe imagery, Skybox videos and then UrtheCast videos because it’s a different angle or it’s a different time of day,” Ofir said, with videos of natural disasters a likely staple.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Pandora A/S, the Danish jeweler known for its charm bracelets, announced its biggest ever share buyback after fourth-quarter profit beat estimates, helped by a Christmas offering that included reindeer and snowflake designs.
 Pandora will buy back as much as 24 billion Danish kroner ($440 million) of stock in 2014, the Glostrup-based company said today as it reported a 76 percent increase in net income for the final three months of 2013.
 The buyback is “the big news today” and “signals that the management of the company is confident that they will create a substantial cash flow this year,” Jesper Christensen, an analyst at Alm.
 The 2014 buyback marks a step up from the 700 million kroner that Pandora spent repurchasing shares last year, the first time it did so.
 “Comcast is the best possible buyer for Time Warner,” said Paulson, a billionaire who was one of 2013’s top-performing hedge-fund managers.
 “Charter was really always too small to buy Time Warner or too small to offer fair value” Holding out for a better offer than Charter’s $13250-a-share bid allowed New York-based Time Warner Cable to deliver an almost 70 percent gain for shareholders since the end of May.
 “Buying interest after transaction and secondary market performance should be good” Monetary Stimulus The extra yield investors demand to buy emerging-market debt over Treasuries fell two basis points to 341 basis points.
 Investors are also buying on dips after shares fell so much recently” Futures on the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index climbed 04 percent.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Senior Housing Properties Trust agreed to buy two 15-story medical-office buildings in downtown Boston’s Seaport District for about $113 billion.
 That could force them to make an offer to buy out other stockholders under French law.
 Saab expects to complete a deal this year with Brazil for the sale of 36 Gripen NG, or next generation models, on top of 60 single-seat jets that Sweden is buying.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Novartis AG agreed to buy CoStim Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Gains have come as corporate earnings nearly doubled and the Fed, which has kept its record lending rate at near zero percent since December 2008, implemented three rounds of bond buying.
 AMG buys stakes in money-management firms and provides them with distribution and back-office help.
 AMG in December agreed to buy a majority interest in SouthernSun Asset Management LLC, a Memphis, Tennessee-based firm that runs the $$779 million SouthernSun Small Cap Fund.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The bond buying was designed to curb long-term borrowing costs and spur growth.
 surged the most in more than four years after spending C$233 million ($210 million) to buy airwaves in a government spectrum auction that positions the company to become Canada’s fourth national wireless operator.
 Quebecor, which began offering mobile-phone service in Quebec after buying spectrum in the last auction in 2008, is poised to emerge as a challenger to Rogers Communications Inc, Telus Corp.
 The Conservative-led government, which won power in September, promised before elections to look into raising the amount banks can lend to borrowers to 90 percent of a property’s value, in part to ease access for first-time buyers.
 showed the biggest net selling since February 2009 as the Federal Reserve prepared to scale back its bond buying, according to Treasury Department data released today.
 Securities and Exchange Commission, would give investors and employees of closely held companies a place to buy and sell shares while letting corporations avoid the disclosure and compliance requirements that come with being publicly traded.
 The German manufacturer, which took full control of Munich-based MAN last year, today said it is offering to pay 67 billion euros ($92 billion) to buy the rest of Sweden’s Scania to increase integration and squeeze out more costs.
 May Improve Earnings Sale of the company’s holdings in the plants may help Duke improve its earnings if the proceeds are used to buy back shares, Hugh Wynne, a New York-based analyst for Sanford C.
 ALL Partnership Cosan, which signed a partnership with ALL in 2009, abandoned a plan in August to buy a 567 percent stake in the company, saying negotiations “ended without the transaction coming to fruition” Rumo is Cosan’s logistics company, transporting sugar by rail from growing regions to the Port of Santos, where it operates the world’s biggest export terminal and warehouses, according to the company’s website.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 It was the most active buyer of drug companies over the past three years, making $144 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Forest said last month it reached an agreement to buy Aptalis Pharma Inc.
 A block of 5,000 options betting on a 28 percent jump in Forest’s shares that cost $255 million to buy last week more than doubled in value to $6 million today after Actavis agreed to buy the drugmaker.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Danske Bank S/A is planning to seek a buyer for about 600 residential properties around Ireland as Denmark’s biggest lender retreats from the country after a real estate crash, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 The original owners bought the properties as investments, or buy-to-let homes, before defaulting on their debts, the person said.
 Danske Chief Executive Officer Thomas Borgen is among chief executives of foreign banks seeking buyers for Irish properties after suffering losses during the country’s real estate crash.
 are buying up Irish property as they wager on a recovery in prices.
 Kennedy-Wilson agreed to buy a Dublin housing development from London-based Lloyds for more than 80 million euros ($109 million).
 The firm paid about 86 cents on the dollar for the hotel outside Dallas, while buying the mortgage on the 22-story office building for about 75 percent of the investment by the previous owner, according to people with knowledge of the transactions.
 In October, Viva Aerobus agreed to buy 52 Airbus Group NV A320 jets with a list value of $51 billion to replace its fleet of Boeing Co.
 29 that it will trim its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion, sticking to its plan for a gradual withdrawal from departing Chairman Ben S.
 It has undertaken three rounds of bond buying since 2008 under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy, swelling its balance sheet to a record $41 trillion.
 offered to buy the shares of the Chinese online map content provider it doesn’t already own.
 A unit of Baidu, the biggest web search engine in China, agreed last month to acquire a remaining stake in the group-buy website Nuomicom held by Renren.
 Basir is seeking growth from farmers by setting aside as much as 2 trillion rupiah to buy a mid-size lender to merge with unit PT Bank Rakyat Indonesia Agroniaga.
 agreed to buy Emeritus Corp.
 Rusal, the largest aluminum producer, said new rules on warehousing threaten to worsen a supply shortfall, helping drive up the premiums buyers pay for swift delivery to 50 percent of the market price.
 The proposed fund may start buying aluminum at the market price in July or August, and sell it back to Rusal at the same price after seven years, Soloviev said.
 They argued that pooling and servicing agreements for most of the trusts required Countrywide to buy back modified loans, according to Kapnick’s ruling.
 There’s no evidence to suggest that the language in the agreements doesn’t require the repurchase of modified loans, and the trustee could have hired an expert to examine the provisions that address the buyback of such loans, the judge said.
 “While Triaxx has claimed in the past that these claims alone could be worth $31 billion across the trusts, the economic value of such buybacks is likely to be smaller” The exclusion could be another factor that delays the timing of payouts from the settlement while possibly increasing them on certain deals, the analysts said.
 Yesterday, the company agreed to sell 14 million acres in a Midwestern natural gas field to an undisclosed buyer for $14 billion.
 ‘Too Expensive’ Microsoft agreed to buy the phone business for 544 billion euros ($74 billion) in September, seeking to gain ground from Google and Apple, whose operating systems dominate in mobile devices.
 The stock, which has declined 43 percent this year, has 20 buy and four hold recommendations from analysts.
 agreed in October to buy most assets of bankrupt Edison Mission.
 Theyhave criticized the government’s program to boost rural incomesby buying rice at above-market rates, which cost taxpayers $21billion in the past two crop years starting October 2011.
 One Canadian dollar buys 9065 US.
 “With the change of habits to buying online, demand has surged, so regardless of whether or not the economy grows, this movement is forcing stores to change” Slowing Economy Still, a slowing economy probably will hinder investments, said Angela Di Franco, a partner at Sao Paulo-based Levy & Salomao Advogados.
 Quebecor surged 8 percent after spending C$233 million ($210 million) yesterday to buy spectrum in four provinces.
 agreed to buy mobile-messaging company WhatsApp Inc.
 The firm has increased stock investments and hired James Lee from Barclays Plc to help buy assets from banks, a person familiar with the matter said last month.
 Apollo is one of the most active buyout firms in exiting investments as markets have risen, selling assets worth $58 billion in the fourth quarter.
 Apollo last month also closed its eighth buyout fund with $184 billion.
 said their buyout portfolios gained 12 percent, 9 percent and 84 percent, respectively.
 Apollo’s carried interest in the fourth quarter fell 45 percent to $5268 million from a year earlier, when the firm earned what is known as a “catch-up” of entitled profits following gains in its sixth buyout fund, which held companies such as LyondellBasell and real estate brokerage Realogy Holdings Corp.
 Apollo, like its competitors, has sought investment opportunities outside of traditional leveraged buyouts to raise more money and reduce their reliance on private-equity earnings, which can be volatile.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle that lasts about 10 years.
 Buy Aussie Morgan Stanley recommends investors buy the Aussie versus the euro amid a divergence in inflation outlooks, central bank policy and stretched positioning.
 “The nearest risk is tomorrow’s speech by the new head of the Federal Reserve Yellen, which can shed some light on the Fed’s plans regarding stimulus tapering and spur a re-evaluation of the risks behind emerging markets” The Fed pressed ahead with scaling back stimulus in January, cutting its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $65 billion.
 OAO Rosneft, which was lifted to buy at Goldman analysts including Geydar Mamedov in a report today, advanced 06 percent to 24741 rubles in Moscow, while OAO Lukoil, Russia’s biggest non-state crude producer, added 06 percent to 1,98750 rubles.
 “Given the strike and how long the strike was going to take to resolve and how much it will cost them at the end of the day, we thought we should sell out of it” The fund is buying Grindrod Ltd.
 Woodside, which signed an initial agreement earlier this month to buy a quarter of Israel’s biggest natural gas field for as much as $26 billion, said today it will pursue growth while returning cash to holders.
 Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA slipped 34 percent to 856 euros as Societe Generale SA downgraded the stock to hold from buy, cutting its earnings estimates for 2014 and 2015 because of the bank’s reliance on emerging markets for revenue.
 Smith & Nephew Plc added 11 percent to 886 pence after agreeing to buy ArthroCare Corp.
 Leisure Travel While major airlines covet businesses-travelers who are more likely to buy a business or first-class seat, Spirit courts leisure-travelers and those who might not otherwise be able to afford to fly.
 Starting last year, most power utilities need to buy the majority of their permits in almost-daily sales.
 The improving economy will probably spur some factories to buy permits to meet compliance needs just as supplies shrink, according to Russel Mills, the Midland, Michigan-based Dow Chemical’s director of global climate change policy.
 chemical maker is facing a shortage in the eight years through 2020 and is poised to buy permits, Mills said, adding that some companies have probably hoarded allowances because of the reduction in handouts.
 HeidelbergCement, the world’s third-largest cement producer, may have to buy permits in the period, said Rob van der Meer, its director of EU public affairs in Brussels.
 ArcelorMittal, the emitter with the biggest 2012 permit surplus, may incur additional costs to buy allowances to comply with rules through 2020, the Luxembourg-based company said in its annual report, without providing details.
 The emissions trading system already means that even the most energy efficient steel plants will have to buy about 30 percent of their allowances by 2020, Himpe said.
 Polluters should consider buying permits in the next two years to match expected levels of output as prices are poised to gain, said Steve Waygood, the chief responsible-investment officer at Aviva Plc in London, which holds ArcelorMittal shares.
 The plant doesn’t have a long-term buyer for its power and sells at spot prices into the regional US.
 agreed last October to buy most of Edison Mission’s assets.
 He began buying the dollar-based warrants for his Franklin Templeton funds in 2006, and had acquired 14 percent of all the securities by August 2013.
 Benmosche has warned employees against buying homes in the New York area as he weighs shifting some jobs to lower-cost areas.
 He has a buy rating on the stock.
 Viking, based in Greenwich, Connecticut, also added to its investment in Facebook Inc, buying 139 million shares of the Menlo Park, California-based company to own a stake valued at $1 billion as of Dec.
 Goldman Sachs, based in New York, said in 2011 it has made more direct investments in closely held Russian businesses than any foreign bank, buying stakes in 15 companies totaling more than $1 billion since 2007.
 (AEP), which buys 55 million tons ofcoal a year, sees the fuel accounting for less than 50 percentof its capacity in 2016, down from 65 percent in recent yearsThe company abandoned plans for a $940 million upgrade at itsBig Sandy plant in Kentucky, where coal is a powerful economicand political force, and will instead convert one unit tonatural gas.
 StLouis-based Ameren decided to exit the power generation businessin the state, and said a year ago it wanted to find a buyer forits five Illinois coal plants.
 As a condition for buying the plants, Dynegy appealed tothe Illinois Pollution Control Board for a delay in arequirement to install a scrubber to largely eliminate sulfur-dioxide emissions on a separate plant in Newtown.
 ‘‘While we remain admirers of the management and the business model, we think that Henkel’s prospects over the next 12-18 months are now reflected in a share price which has outperformed the other staples companies,’’ London-based Canaccord Genuity analyst Eddy Hargreaves said in a note to clients as he cut his recommendation to hold from buy.
 “They’ve had multiple acquisitions at the height of the crisis and it takes years to integrate those into their systems” Bank of America and Wells Fargo both saw their capital plans pass the Fed’s stress tests last March, clearing them to buy back shares.
 Carriers are offering cheaper plans and buyout offers to customers who switch providers.
 Of 19 analysts tracked by Bloomberg, 15 still recommend buying SoftBank shares.
 Nomura maintained a buy rating in a Jan.
 Sales of condominiums and co-ops jumped 27 percent in the fourth quarter, setting a record for year-end transactions, as the prospect of rising interest rates and prices spurred buyers, appraiser Miller Samuel Inc.
 Fake Seller Litvak is also accused of telling some buyers that the bonds in Jefferies’s inventory were being offered for sale by a third-party seller that didn’t exist.
 While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 “They obviously had a major setback in October, but there have been buyback and takeover rumors” FDA Ruling Shares of the Cambridge, Massachusetts-based company gained 18 percent to $813 yesterday.
 The buyers raised $188 billion of acquisition loans, the data show.
 The company agreed to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility phone unit for $291 billion on Jan.
 approval to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility phone unit and International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server business, people familiar with the two deals said.
 “It goes with the territory in terms of entering the Washington regulatory scene to beef up your presence here with lobbyists and others” Lenovo Chief Executive Officer Yang Yuanqing is spending a combined $5 billion to buy Motorola and the server business in a bid to move beyond the shrinking personal-computer industry and become a global technology player.
 as the most scrutinized foreign buyers of American assets, the panel said in its annual report to Congress.
 That review means CFIUS staff is familiar with the company’s operations and its track record after buying the IBM business, said Mahinka, who isn’t involved in the deals.
 In addition, they’re buying low-end, consumer-oriented businesses.
 Alestra and Axtel have met several times to discuss a purchase, and while Alestra remains interested, it has no imminent plans to buy the company, said the person with knowledge of the negotiations.
 Companies such as Taylor Wimpey Plc and Barratt Developments Plc, which spent years climbing back from a 2007 housing-market crash, saw share prices soar by around 60 percent on average for a second straight year as an improving economy, a surge in lending and government support for buyers combined to lift sales and profit.
 “We’re going to get buffeted around by potential interest-rate rises” While Britain’s rebound will lift confidence and buying power, it will also put pressure on the Bank of England to raise a benchmark interest rate that has stayed near a record low since March 2009.
 Deep Hole Britain’s housing bubble, driven by loose credit and speculation on buy-to-rent properties, burst in the second quarter of 2007, causing the Bloomberg UK.
 “You’ve got to be buying stocks with some unique characteristics or a good valuation story behind them, because going carte blanche and buying the sector is not something we want to be doing” England needs 250,000 new homes a year to satisfy demand, according to Shelter, a homeless charity.
 Companies that want to increase homebuilding volume may find it tougher going in 2014 as buyers are slowed by concerns about interest rates and the future of government programs like Help to Buy.
 BOE Retreats The BOE’s decision to withdraw Funding for Lending for homebuyers underlined the strength of a housing market, where the average cost of a property has climbed to 176,491 pounds, according to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 While the central bank stepped back, Cameron’s government increased its efforts to back homebuyers by introducing the second phase of the Help to Buy plan in September, three months earlier than planned.
 Smurfit will look for acquisitions in the Americas and Eastern Europe and will return capital to shareholders in the absence of suitable buyout opportunities, he said.
 upgraded the world’s largest distributor of disposable tableware and food packaging to buy from underperform, a rating equivalent to sell.
 Commonwealth securities have traded at speculative-grade levels since at least September, luring buyers such as hedge funds.
 Buyer Chatter “The chatter is there are willing hedge fund buyers at double-digit yields,” said Chris Alwine, head of munis at Valley Forge, Pennsylvania-based Vanguard, which oversees $130 billion in local debt.
 Unlike some mutual funds, hedge funds typically aren’t restricted from buying junk debt.
 “There could be a bit of a relief because folks may not have wanted to buy a bond prior to the downgrade,” Bill Delahunty, director of muni research in Boston at Eaton Vance Management, which oversees about $25 billion of local debt.
 We're not buying as many houses or cars.
 “It’s a combination of that and thinking, ‘If I’m a good trader, I can go to the buy-side and get compensated on a percentage basis’” Citadel, Vulcan Uberto Palomba, Goldman Sachs’s co-head of emerging markets trading for Europe, the Middle East and Africa, and Jonathan Tipermas, who led Goldman Sachs’s dollar swaps-trading desk, are leaving for Citadel LLC.
 and Morgan Stanley were the other buyers, according to statements from the Dutch State Treasury Agency.
 jumped 99 percent to 2,170 yen after the provider of delivery services said it would buy back as much as 10 billion yen, or 153 percent, of its shares.
 last week agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain for about $125 billion and to help the company develop a system for producing single-serve cold drinks.
 The yield reached 261 percent in December, the highest in 28 months, as the Fed announced plans to start reducing the amount of bonds it buys and accelerating growth in the UK.
 Stock gains also improved their funding levels, allowing them to buy bonds to meet their long-term liabilities.
 On the other hand, the buyers -- the potential buyers, these things are very hypothetical at this stage, but they seem to be the sorts of squonky hedge funds that do capital relief trades -- are probably making out very nicely on the trade, so it's customer service in that sense.
 If you buy this stuff, you know what you're getting into.
 The BJP and Congress will buy out the regional parties” The increasing importance of regional parties will hamper “the efficacy of nationwide policy making, regardless of the political complexion of the eventual central government,” Moody’s analyst Rahul Ghosh said in a statement on Feb.
 Bank Clothiers Inc, proposed to buy the Eddie Bauer brand.
 “Folks are looking to buy on the dips.
 Federal Open Market Committee officials have twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, lowering bond buying to $65 billion in February from $85 billion last year.
 Bank, which has been resisting a merger with Men’s Wearhouse, said it will buy the Eddie Bauer brand for an enterprise value of $825 million.
 The buyer is a Beijing advertising company, according to a Hong Kong stock exchange filing from Birmingham yesterday, which gave the purchaser’s name in only Chinese.
Here's a weird chart: Herbalife was up more than 5 percent from the previous close in the morning, on decent earnings and news of a big stock buyback financed by a $1 billion convertible bond offering.
 It then faded and was down as much as 35 percent, as the market sold off and as people started feeling a bit more tepid about the buyback.
 Remember, as we discussed yesterday, that it bought that stock in the form of forward transactions: Herbalife enters a forward with its banks, which enter into swaps with the hedge funds buying the convertible.
 *** Quick Interlude on Convertible Arbitrage: Convertible hedge funds buy convertible bonds and sell short the underlying stock.
 As the stock goes down, your delta goes down, and you buy back some of the stock you shorted.
 Notice that you're buying when the stock goes down and selling when it goes up.
 The more the stock bounces around, the more you get to buy low and sell high, while always keeping your price risk hedged.
 *** OK, back from the interlude! Remember, the point was, Herbalife is buying some $686 million of stock from hedge funds, via these forward/swap transactions.
 In my post yesterday, I guessed that Herbalife would be buying about $590 million worth of stock, so I was almost $100 million too low.
 I assumed that Herbalife wanted to buy as much stock as it efficiently could.
 I assumed that convertible arbitrage hedge funds were going to buy 100 percent of the convertible.
 Assumption 1 was wrong; the convertible priced at the cheap end (for buyers -- expensive for Herbalife), with a 2 percent coupon and 25 percent conversion premium, suggesting that the convertible was not especially popular with investors.
 That leaves 116 million shares underlying the convertible, so if my other assumptions were right, Herbalife would be buying 75 percent of 116 million, or 87 million shares, or $600 million worth.
 So they had to buy back almost 3 million shares.
 They know that they and their friends need to buy back 3 million of those shares.
 Hedge funds made about $229 a share -- a little under $7 million -- by buying in the last hour, pushing up the price, and selling at the closing price.
 But they were buying stock, so the higher the closing price the more they were paying for the stock (and the less accretive the buyback).
 On balance I guess you'd prefer to buy the stock back cheaper, but this doesn't seem like an awful result for them.
 not especially well disclosed? The press release announcing the deal says "The Forward Transactions are generally expected to facilitate privately negotiated derivative transactions between the Forward Counterparties and holders of the Convertible Notes, including swaps, relating to the common shares by which holders of the Convertible Notes will establish short positions relating to the common shares and otherwise hedge their investments in the Convertible Notes concurrently with, or shortly after, the pricing of the Convertible Notes" That doesn't tell you that hedge funds will actually be buying shares at the end of the day, and in droves, as part of their hedge.
 I thought it was more likely that the hedge funds would be neither buying nor selling in the market -- just shorting their delta to Herbalife via swaps -- and the press release didn't tell me much one way or the other.
 The company completed a 114 billion-yen ($11 billion) share buyback Feb.
 “You can buy a lot and buy early,” Voss said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG’s private-equity group is seeking $1 billion for its next fund that will buy investors’ stakes in private-equity funds, according to two people familiar with the situation.
 Deutsche Bank joins a number of private-equity investors in raising bigger secondary vehicles as pensions and financial institutions divest buyout fund stakes at a record pace.
 Investors are buying Latin American hotels as economic and infrastructure improvements boost demand from travelers.
 Representatives for Occidental, Playa Hotels and AMResorts, which is backed by buyout firm Bain Capital LLC, couldn’t immediately comment when contacted by Bloomberg News.
 “Not many people are buying the car so they have to try even the smallest countries in the world” As part of its pledge to support Bhutan’s plans to electrify its fleet, Nissan will supply quick chargers and Leaf cars for the government fleet and as taxis, according to a statement by the Yokohama, Japan-based automaker yesterday.
 in its bid to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, is “still interested in wisely acquiring subscribers,” Chief Executive Officer Tom Rutledge said.
 He declined to comment specifically on Comcast’s $452 billion agreement to buy Time Warner Cable.
 cable company through acquisitions and offered to buy Time Warner Cable for $37 billion.
 Charter is now considering buying some of the 3 million subscribers Comcast plans to sell following the acquisition, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 In addition to buying customers from Comcast, another possibility for Charter is merging with Cox Communications, a closely held firm that ranks behind Time Warner Cable in subscribers.
 With the deal, Lenovo, the world’s largest personal-computer maker continues a buying spree of US.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- The Wall Street bankers behind Comcast Corp’s $452 billion bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, a surprise end-run around veteran media dealmaker John Malone, drew from experience on some of the past decades’ biggest deals, including the RJR-Nabisco buyout made famous in “Barbarians at the Gate” Bankers James B.
 He had a role as an individual adviser in Verizon Communication Inc’s $130 billion buyout of partner Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless, the largest US.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Sumitomo Mitsui Banking Corp, a unit of Japan’s second-biggest bank by market value, is seeking to buy about 10 billion yen ($99 million) of senior housing properties before taking its health-care real estate investment trust public.
 The retailer, acquired by TPG and Leonard Green in a $3 billion buyout in 2011, estimates revenues increased 9 percent to $24 billion in the year ended Feb.
 It’s in talks with potential buyers outside Turkmenistan for its Caspian Sea gas, the CEO said, declining to name any.
 The central bank also decided to press on with a second reduction of $10 billion to its monthly bond buying.
 Comcast raised $22 billion in its first bond sale after agreeing to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Last month, PPG said it plans to spend $3 billion to $4 billion on acquisitions and share buybacks in the next 18 to 24 months.
 “We would expect the disposal target to be raised in due course” The sale follows Vitol’s 2011 agreement to buy the bulk of Shell’s downstream business in 14 African countries, alongside Africa-focused private-equity firm Helios Investment Partners LLP, for about $1 billion.
 They have a reputation for being cheap buyers.
 Brooks said it would “look terrible” if the company was seen to be “buying off” Clifford, according to the notes of the meeting.
 The stock, which has 12 buy and five hold recommendations from analysts, has gained 06 percent this year.
 Traders buying bullish options are probably betting shoppers will return to the retailer, according to Matthew Lockridge, a Dallas-based fund manager at Westwood Management Corp.
 in New York says that investors should err on the side caution and assume that the company puts its buyback program on hold while it counts the cost of upgrading its payment systems following the cyber attack.
 “We expect the company to suspend its buyback, a key support for the stock, indefinitely,” Landes wrote in a Jan.
 In January, the nation scrapped a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from AgustaWestland following a 15-month corruption investigation.
 to buy arms.
 Rules Relaxed The country is also buying eight P-8I maritime surveillance aircraft made by Chicago-based Boeing Co.
 He sold warrants to buy shares of General Growth to Brookfield, the company’s largest shareholder, as part of an agreement that ended his quest to have the mall owner sell itself, according to a regulatory document filed in January 2013.
 PSA Peugeot Citroen advanced 45 percent after the New York-based bank recommended buying the stock.
 Total mergers and acquisitions are “set to accelerate” this year because companies have “firepower” of $23 trillion and cash-financed acquisitions and buybacks can boost earnings per share, according to a Jan.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Property developers in Hong Kong and Singapore will extend the biggest declines among global peers as government curbs deter buyers in Asia’s most expensive housing markets, according to AMP Capital Investors.
 “I wouldn’t buy developers at this stage as governments’ housing policies are working against them” Naeimi predicted further stock declines of as much as 15 percent and said he prefers US.
 satellite-TV provider, rose yesterday after the company announced a $35 billion stock buyback and beat analysts’ sales estimates for the fourth quarter.
 “When VIX spikes, the speculators who provided liquidity will cover their shorts” Last year’s 24 percent drop in the VIX created profitable trades against volatility, prompting speculators to short VIX futures and buy the VelocityShares Daily Inverse VIX Short-Term ETN that rises in value as stock swings narrow.
 said it plans to buy a quarter of the Leviathan off-shore gas field for as much as $26 billion.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- AECI Ltd, South Africa’s biggest explosives and chemicals maker, agreed to buy a water-treatment unit from Clariant AG for 409 million rand ($367 million) to expand in the region and tap demand for treating industrial waste water.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Legal & General Group Plc agreed to buy Global Index Advisors Inc.
 He bought four businesses in 2013, including Lucida Ltd, a bulk annuity buyout firm, and Cofunds Holdings Ltd, an electronic savings portal.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Immofinanz AG agreed to buy 18,000 German homes from a Deutsche Bank AG fund and Prelios SpA, allowing the Austrian developer to proceed with a plan to spin off its residential property unit.
 Buwog may buy more German homes after it becomes independent, Daniel Riedl, the company’s chief executive officer, said at a press conference in Vienna today.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Freddie Mac sold $1 billion of securities in the government-controlled mortgage-finance company’s largest offering of bonds whose buyers share in its risks from homeowner defaults.
 “We are pleased with the investor interest and demand for this product as more investors are buying the bonds,” Donna Corley, a Freddie Mac senior vice president, said in the statement.
 “We plan regular and consistent issuances this year so that the amount of risk transferred to private investors will increase over time” More than 65 investors participated in the deal, including at least 20 new buyers, the company said.
 Bahrain, Kuwait, and Qatar also may buy Typhoons which BAE makes in partnership with Airbus Group NV and Finmeccanica SpA.
 The company, which last year announced a 1 billion-pound share buyback, has spent 270 million pounds and will accelerate transactions with the Saudi pricing accord agreed, Lynas said.
 They have criticized the government’s program to boost rural incomes by buying rice at above-market rates, which cost taxpayers $21 billion in the past two crop years starting October 2011.
 PT Pertamina, Indonesia’s state-owned oil and gas company, signed a 20-year contract in December to buy LNG from Cheniere, which plans to build a second export terminal in Corpus Christi, Texas.
 22 as a rout in emerging-market currencies spurred concern the global economic recovery is faltering, while the Federal Reserve went on slowing the pace of its bond buying.
 Banco Espirito Santo SA upgraded its rating on the shares to buy from neutral.
 Schaeffler, jointly owned by Maria-Elisabeth Schaeffler and her son Georg Schaeffler, is still struggling to reduce debt from an attempt spearheaded by Geissinger to buy a limited stake in Continental that backfired amid the global recession of 2008.
 central bank signaled its asset-buying program could be trimmed if the economy showed sustained improvement.
 The outlook from Mobius, a consistent advocate of emerging markets who’s been investing in the countries for more than 40 years, contrasts with that of Jim O’Neill, who created the BRIC moniker for the four largest developing economies and said this week that the rout created a buying opportunity.
 “We are looking but actually not buying at this stage.
 “Today’s update, a decent 2013 coupled with an upbeat outlook for 2014, provides the confidence to buy into the discount” The stock, which lost 14 percent in December and 63 percent in January, has rallied 94 percent this month.
 Readying IPOs As Spain overcomes an economic slump, more companies are preparing stock offerings and foreign investors are buying assets in the euro region’s fourth-largest economy.
 for two months in November after announcing it would buy the Arlington-based lender on Jan.
 regional lender, are avoiding bids for entire companies and just buying units or branches.
 The unit, Direct Principal Investments, provides $25 million to $75 million in funding for leveraged buyouts and companies seeking to grow or restructure, according to HSBC’s website.
 lender, in September agreed to sell its emerging-markets buyout unit to the Rohatyn Group to comply with new curbs on bank investments.
 The producer of Sara Lee products said buying Canada Bread will help strengthen its presence in the Americas.
 The company last year won an auction to buy bankrupt Hostess Brands Inc’s Beefsteak bread brand and in 2011 agreed to acquire Sara Lee Corp’s North American bakeries for $675 million.
 He backed talks between Etihad Airways PJSCand Alitalia SpA aimed at determining whether the Persian Gulfcarrier would buy a stake in Italy’s ailing airline.
 Dubai’s Emirates agreed to buy 50 more A380s in November, bringing the number of superjumbos it has ordered to 140, half the entire backlog for the plane.
 Carry trades, in which investors buy long-dated bonds and finance those purchases with short-term borrowing, are probably increasing with a steeper yield curve, he said.
 It cut the buying to $65 billion, from $75 billion, in its second $10-billion reduction in as many meetings.
 “Rising stockpiles in Japan and China indicate shippers are struggling to find buyers,” said JSC’s Shigemoto.
 “There’s some talk out there to have keep-what-you-have continue for three more years” The policy affects only Americans who buy insurance coverage for themselves, a market of about 19 million people in 2012, according to US.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Seven of 19 analysts recommend investors buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Slim, the world’s second-richest person according to data compiled by Bloomberg, owns stock warrants giving him the right to buy 159 million Times Co.
 Rather than hurry to sell off businesses for cash amid the chaos of the global financial crisis, the company got breathing room it used to eventually find buyers for units such as Aboutcom and the Boston Globe.
 “The main positive surprise comes on the cash front, with net debt reduction higher than what consensus had forecast,” Thomas Besson, a Paris-based analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux who recommends buying the shares, said by phone.
 The company hasn’t specified the size of the potential stakes Dongfeng and the French state may buy.
 Christine Fox, who is acting deputy defense secretary, has told the Navy to plan to buy 32 of the ships instead of the 52 originally intended.
 The company agreed last year to buy Elkhorn Holdings, a Wyoming-based provider of construction services for midstream oil and gas facilities in the US.
 “We will continue to look for growth opportunities” Saputo, Canada’s biggest milk processor, spent a total of about $536 million in the last six months buying Australia’s Warrnambool Cheese & Butter Factory Co.
 Gecas may buy aircraft portfolios as other investors in the leasing industry opt to exit their stakes, Liu said.
 “You have to be very disciplined to buy,” he said.
 jumped 37 percent for the biggest gain since October after agreeing to buy Devon Energy Corp’s oil and natural-gas fields.
 Earlier this month, it agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Waterbury, Vermont-based Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 who recommends buying Coca-Cola’s stock.
 in Cape Town, who has a buy rating on the stock, said by phone on Feb.
 Still, only 22 percent of analysts rate the stock a buy, compared with 47 percent at Nedbank, South Africa’s fourth-biggest bank, 40 percent for FirstRand and 28 percent at Standard Bank, the largest African lender.
 “We’ve been buying” Barclays Africa shares for the last two weeks, Verster said.
 Lessor BOC Aviation is among potential customers standing by if some 737 buyers postpone orders.
 “This creates risk that economic dislocation in emerging markets could pressure aircraft demand and potentially even bring the cycle to an end,” said Nadol, who rates Boeing shares the equivalent of a buy.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Dun & Bradstreet Corp, a provider of business data and risk-management services, was sued by the company that acquired its small business credit-monitoring branch in 2010 over a spurned buyout offer.
 Demand for linkers has increased as central banks globally dropped interest rates to record lows following the financial crisis and the Federal Reserve, the Bank of Japan and the Bank of England flooded the world with money by buying bonds.
 Currency depreciation adds to price pressure by making foreign goods more expensive to buy.
 “Customers believe a bottom in potash prices has been reached and are now exhibiting improved confidence in their buying decisions,” Mosaic Chief Executive Officer Jim Prokopanko said today in the Plymouth, Minnesota-based company’s fourth-quarter earnings statement.
 Fertilizer buyers were delaying purchases because of concern that prices would continue to decline, Prokopanko said in September.
 5 (Bloomberg) –- Morgan Stanley cut its collateralized loan obligation forecast by as much as 27 percent to $55 billion as issuance slowed last month because of questions about the Volcker Rule’s impact on the funds that finance buyouts.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest manager of alternative assets such as real estate and private-equity funds, raised an initial $14 billion to buy stakes in hedge-fund firms, Vice Chairman Tom Hill said.
 New York-based Blackstone is seeing opportunities to buy stakes at valuations of 45 to 5 times cash flow, he said.
 A glut of palm oil, used in candy, biofuels and detergents, and slowing economic growth among Asian and European buyers have weighed on prices since the start of last year.
 is leaning toward implementing a stock buyback this year, a nod to the needs of US.
 “Certainly before the year is out, maybe sooner than later, we will do a buyback,” Harrison said yesterday in a telephone interview from Calgary.
 investors would rather have a buyback than a dividend” No decisions have been reached on the amount of a stock-repurchase plan, and a buyback wouldn’t necessarily rule out a dividend boost, Harrison said.
 29 he is “not a fan of sitting on idle cash” “There might be a case made for a modest increase in the dividend, and a little more aggressive buyback,” Harrison said.
 We need to make some decisions rather quickly there” Canadian Pacific may be able to buy back as much as 3 percent to 5 percent of its stock a year, said Scott Group, an analyst at Wolfe Research in New York.
 “My sense if that they are going to come out with a very large buyback, and I’m guessing it will be a multi-year buyback” Harrison, 69, was hired in 2012 after Ackman engineered a boardroom coup to oust then-CEO Fred Green, and his efforts to improve efficiency are bearing fruit.
 and the Peugeot family, which controls the Paris-based auto producer, may be considered as acting together in the proposal, potentially triggering an offer to buy out minority stockholders, the association, known as ADAM, said in a letter sent yesterday to Supervisory Board Chairman Thierry Peugeot.
 Fed Stimulus The Fed has already decided to slow the pace of its asset-purchase program twice, reducing its monthly buying of bonds to $65 billion from $85 billion.
 “As a given stock trades lower, investors may start to hedge less aggressively, while others come in to buy calls to position for a bounce, resulting in a decrease in skew” Implied Moves Patricia Persico, a spokeswoman for Cliffs, declined to comment on the options trading as well as Casablanca’s proposal.
 The gauge slid 18 percent in January as investors weighed cuts to the Fed’s bond-buying program, China’s economic slowdown and volatility in emerging markets.
 “Fighting is in Malakal” The country’s low-sulfur crude is prized by Japanese buyers as a cleaner-burning fuel for power generation.
 The increase was the first by a fuel distributor in the Buenos Aires area since the devaluation and occurred 10 days after the government said Shell Argentina’s Chief Executive Officer Juan Jose Aranguren attempted to interfere in the currency exchange market by buying dollars at a higher rate than the market was selling.
 Western Exchange “ICE is now the first western exchange to buy an exchange out here,” said Bill Herder, Singapore-based executive director of the Futures Industry Association in Asia.
 The company will also consider allowing non-Gulf nationals to buy its shares.
 SodaStream Speculation SodaStream climbed to $3757 after Coca-Cola Co’s decision to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 4 as Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen said she would continue her predecessor’s approach toward the central bank’s bond-buying program.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, will peddle the industry’s fastest growth and highest profitability as it sells shares in a London initial public offering.
 Finance strategy under Uebber, who has been CFO since late 2004, has included winning a 9 billion-euro ($124 billion) credit line from 40 banks last year and buying stakes in partners such as Beijing Automotive Group Co’s carmaking unit and electric-auto producer Tesla Motors Inc.
 DNB ASA, Norway’s largest bank, sold loans it had made to Genco to undisclosed buyers, according to spokesman Thomas Midteide.
 Then it would have to determine if enough of its customers would trade in Bitcoins when they’re more accustomed to using post offices to buy money orders and stamps and send packages.
 Bernanke, scaling back bond-buying under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy in “measured steps” Yellen testified to the House Financial Services Committee, delivering the first semi-annual report on monetary policy since she was sworn in as Fed chief last week.
 The buying is designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and fuel growth.
 Investors buying the steepener notes are betting that a slow US.
 The Fed will keep short-term rates low for the foreseeable future, while long-term rates will rise on more demand for mortgage lending and the Fed’s phasing out of its asset-buying program, he said.
 Commonwealth securities have traded at yields consistent with speculative-grade bonds since at least September, luring buyers such as hedge funds.
 Dan Solender, director of munis at Lord Abbett & Co, and Chad Farrington, head of muni research at Columbia Management Investment Advisors, also said they would consider buying.
 List Forming “We are on the list of potential buyers,” Black said at a breakfast with reporters today in New York.
 The new obligations would probably have to yield from 8 percent to 9 percent to attract enough buyers, said Black, Farrington and Solender.
 soared 36 percent after Actavis Plc agreed to buy it for about $25 billion.
 rose 22 percent on plans to buy mobile-messaging startup WhatsApp Inc.
 MTS’s strategy doesn’t imply that the company will buy MTS India from its parent AFK Sistema, Dubovskov said.
 TPGRE I contains 10 deals representing $23 billion of equity that came from the firm’s main buyout funds and separate accounts with institutional clients such as New Jersey’s state pension fund and Ivanhoe Cambridge, the real estate arm of the Canadian pension fund Caisse de Depot et Placement du Quebec.
 TPG seeks to buy property assets and companies at discounts to underlying net asset values, according to the presentation.
 Fed meeting minutes released yesterday signaled little chance of a pause in the central bank’s bond-buying cuts, and showed “a few” officials said “it might be appropriate to increase the federal funds rate relatively soon” The US.
 11 congressional testimony she would scale back bond-buying in “measured steps” and said only a “notable change” in economic prospects would prompt a slowing in the pace.
 29 at its last policy meeting to reduce monthly bond buying to $65 billion, from $75 billion, in the second straight $10 billion cut.
 The buying was designed to cap long-term borrowing costs and fuel economic growth.
 Woking, UK-based McLaren began selling cars for retail buyers in 2011, starting with the MP4-12C road car, which Kelley Blue Book estimates to sell for about $240,000 and above, followed by the convertible MP4-12C spider and its top-of-the line P1.
 Other dreamers, such as the Instagram guys, could be persuaded to buy into Facebook's dream.
 offered to buy the shares this week.
 The pre-buyout rallies add to investor concern that the market for Chinese shares trading in the US.
 At least 35 Chinese companies have announced buyout deals to withdraw their US.
 The buyout group proposed to pay a 22 percent premium to the Jan.
 Recouped Investment Investors in the China Credit Trust product recouped their principal after selling their rights to unidentified buyers days before the Jan.
 Trusts are the least likely part of the financial system to have systemic risks because buyers are supposed to shoulder risks themselves, according to the statement.
 The ACA set up government-run insurance exchanges where Americans can buy private health plans with the help of federal tax credits and expanded eligibility in Medicaid.
 Of 89 offered lots, 10 failed to find buyers, Sotheby’s said.
 Demand from new wealthy buyers in China, Russia and other emerging markets is boosting prices for classic works, said Helena Newman, Sotheby’s worldwide head of the Impressionist and modern art department.
 The prices include buyer’s premium; the estimates do not.
 The announcement caused Volkswagen’s stock to jump as short sellers raced to buy shares to repay borrowed stock in bets that VW would fall.
 Mitsubishi Estate began investigating the construction after one of the buyers informed the Tokyo-based developer that there were some postings on the Internet about the defect on Dec.
 “We sincerely apologize for causing great inconvenience to the potential buyers and Mitsubishi Estate,” Kajima said in a statement.
 Alcoa will seek a buyer for the Anglesea coal mine and power station that supplies about 40 percent of the Port Henry smelter’s power, the company said.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Eastern Europe’s economic growth picked up pace last quarter as a recovery strengthened in the euro area, which buys the bulk of the region’s locally made goods, and consumers spent more.
 That will reduce its requirement for carbon permits, which power producers buy to offset their emissions.
 Carbon futures have risen on speculation a European Union plan to postpone sales of some allowances will drive factories and utilities to buy more.
 Overseas funds have sold $297 million of local shares this year, after buying $20 billion worth of equities in 2013, the most in Asia after Japan, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Forcing projects to buy local equipment raises costs and may compromise quality, said Rahul Gupta, director at Rays Power Experts Pvt, a solar plant contractor.
 trade finance, which helped lower borrowing costs for projects buying First Solar panels.
 China Life jumped 58 percent to HK$2285 after UBS raised the stock to buy from neutral, while Credit Suisse rated it outperform from neutral.
 agreed to buy a majority stake.
 agreed to buy SmileMakers from Staples Inc, adding a provider of toys to dentists, doctors and teachers.
 The company agreed to buy Oriental Trading in 2012, adding to retail operations that include jewelers and See’s Candies.
 The company also seeks to increase free cash flow -- money a company can spend on dividends, paying down debt or buying back shares -- to between 13 billion euros and 16 billion euros a year by 2015.
 raised the commodity producer to buy from neutral.
 has agreed to buy power from the two projects, enough for about 170,000 homes, for 20 years, according to the statement.
 “There’s no need to buy the land.
 From buying a digital-thermostat developer to selling a mobile-phone business, Google has executed more deals than any company in the world over the past three years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg through January, up from 13th place in the three years prior.
 Big Bets Google agreed last month to buy digital-thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 Facebook had also been in talks to buy DeepMind when Google swept in, The Information reported.
 The iPhone maker has only taken part in 12 deals in the past three years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, and has been sending cash back to shareholders in the form of dividends and buybacks.
 Russian stocks reversed an earlier advance as OAO Rostelecom dropped after a report that the country’s biggest fixed-line phone operator may reduce its minority buyout ratio.
 Customers who paid more to buy profitable corn now demand less expensive soybean seeds.
 About three months after the spinoff, Anadarko offered to buy Kerr-McGee’s oil and natural gas assets for $18 billion.
 Rival EnergyAustralia Holdings Ltd, controlled by HongKong-based CLP Holdings Ltd, in July agreed to buy the MountPiper and Wallerawang power stations from the New South Walesgovernment.
 (ORG) agreed to buy powercompany Eraring Energy from the state.
 The 21st Century Business Herald newspaper reported yesterday that Tencent may buy a stake in JDcom, citing an unidentified person from an investment bank.
 Home buyers have backed away since the Hong Kong government imposed its toughest property curbs last February to damp an asset bubble.
 The rebound in uranium demand may fuel takeovers as buyers try to get ahead of rising prices, Bank of Nova Scotia said.
 Fission, which has signed non-disclosure agreements with potential buyers, has a promising discovery in that area and will probably be acquired within two years, Raymond James Financial Inc.
 Why not buy Denison right now?” Sadowski said.
 19 when asked if the C$92 billion company is considering buying Denison or Fission.
 Randhawa said Fission has signed non-disclosure agreements with three potential buyers, including one in China.
 “Our investors don’t want us selling with uranium at $35 a pound, but at the same time we don’t control the people who are buyers” Wyoming Project Ur-Energy Inc, valued at $180 million, is among the smaller exploration companies that could be acquired, Sadowski of Raymond James said.
 “For someone to come in and buy Ur-Energy at this level would be certainly accretive based on how much that facility is going to be cranking out over the next several years” Ur-Energy is focused on “building the company, not selling it,” Chief Executive Officer Wayne Heili said in a phone interview Feb.
 recommended buying the shares.
 Goldman Sachs raised the shares to buy from neutral, saying the German owner of Australia’s largest construction company may announce a buyback when it reports its full-year results on Feb.
 “If this trial succeeds, their chances of becoming the main player there will be very good,” said Sabina Podval, an analyst at Leader in Tel Aviv who recommends buying Kamada shares.
 Four US-based analysts now recommend investors buy the shares.
 “It shows that Bidvest is getting involved early to bring change in the company” CFR, Chile’s biggest drugmaker, called off its 128 billion rand ($12 billion) cash and stock offer to buy Adcock on Feb.
 Federal Reserve would continue reducing its monthly bond buying.
 and UBS AG told central bank officials at the 2012 meeting that they discussed their positions ahead of key benchmarks and matched buyers and sellers ahead of the fix to avoid trading then.
 According to a Bank of England summary of the meeting compiled in July 2012, there had been “a brief discussion on extra levels of compliance that many bank trading desks were subject to when managing client risks around the main set-piece benchmark fixings” During the discussion, traders said they used chat rooms to match buyers and sellers ahead of the fix to avoid trading at one of the most volatile periods of the day, the people said.
 China is moving away from government stockpiling of cotton as a way to aid farmers, which tightened supplies available to domestic mills forced to buy more from overseas.
 The buyer was art dealer David Nahmad, who also bought the record Burri for 47 million pounds the previous night at Christie’s.
 Burri’s Friend “I’ve been buying Burri for 50 years,” Nahmad said, exiting the New Bond Street salesroom.
 Home-Price Decline House prices in Singapore, ranked the most-expensive city to buy a luxury home in Asia after Hong Kong, slid in the fourth quarter for the first time in almost two years, trimming annual gains to the smallest since 2008.
 3, the buying power of the currency will rise in the year’s second half as trade strengthens between Mexico and the US, said Juan Carlos Alderete, a foreign-exchange strategist at Grupo Financiero Banorte SAB.
 The debt has traded at yields consistent with speculative-grade bonds since at least September, luring buyers such as hedge funds.
 Dan Solender, director of munis at Lord Abbett & Co, and Chad Farrington, head of muni research at Columbia Management Investment Advisors, also said they would consider buying.
 List Forming “We are on the list of potential buyers,” Black said at a breakfast with reporters yesterday in New York.
 The new obligations would probably have to yield from 8 percent to 9 percent to attract enough buyers, said Black, Farrington and Solender.
 The Fed has already decided to slow the pace of its asset-purchase program twice, reducing its monthly buying of bonds to $65 billion from $85 billion in 2013.
 Macquarie Capital Markets analyst David Doyle recommended buying OceanaGold and Detour shares in a note today.
 The government spent $21 billion buying the grain from the two crop years starting October 2011.
 The stakes of mixing are higher when gene-altered and organic products come into contact because of the purity demanded by non-biotech buyers -- and with more products under development, including vegetables and fruits, intermingling is becoming a bigger worry, Mallory-Smith said.
 The 2009 court order cost him $500,000 when his buyer slashed the acreage of gene-altered beets it wanted, he said.
 “I grow modified beets because that’s why my buyers want” For Kleeger and Still, the issue is about preserving value.
 Verizon is set to complete a $130 billion buyout of its wireless joint venture with Vodafone Group Plc in a deal partly funded by September’s record bond sale.
 The Buckinghamshire, England-based uranium processor is also offering to buy back its 500 million euros of 5375 percent notes due 2015 to manage its debt maturities.
 While broader demand for personal computers is declining, gamers and other users of expensive add-in cards are buying desktop machines that use Nvidia’s GeForce chips.
 Silver Lake Management, which was founded in 1999 and manages more than $20 billion in assets, also joined with Michael Dell to buy computer-maker Dell Inc.
 is in talks to buy retailer Eddie Bauer, the Wall Street Journal reported, citing unidentified people familiar with the matter.
 To customers, he said: “I can assure you that we are outraged too” While T-Mobile has offered BlackBerry’s Q10 and Z10 since they were introduced last year, the carrier began removing the device maker’s products from its stores in September, requiring buyers to have the phones shipped to them instead.
 said it plans to buy a quarter of the field for as much as $26 billion.
 Extra Yield Investors receive about 35 percentage points of extra yield when buying 30-year benchmark munis rather than those maturing in two years, exceeding the five-year average spread of 33 percentage points, Bloomberg data show.
 “For years these trolls have extorted payments from small businesses and held back the growth of our economy, but those easy paydays must come to an end,” Gary Shapiro, president of the Consumer Electronics Association said in a statement, using a pejorative for those who buy patents solely to seek royalties.
 is set to place an order for its first operational F-35s after buying three test jets, he said.
 Credit-default swaps, which typically fall as investor confidence improves and rise as it deteriorates, pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 “I believe that Assured’s expertise and creativity are very important to the functioning of the entire tax-exempt bond community and that this will become increasingly clear as Detroit and Puerto Rico are resolved” Ross Stake Ross agreed to buy about 107 million shares of Assured’s stock, then worth $250 million, in February 2008, and he committed as much as $750 million in additional capital to the insurer.
 SAP is also courting new types of software buyers with its Hana data-processing technology, designed to quickly analyze large volumes of information.
 communications regulator is considering restrictions on television-station owners controlling more than one property in a market, a strategy that’s helped fuel an $11 billion station buying spree.
 Diverse Voices Sinclair in July proposed buying seven stations affiliated with Walt Disney Co’s ABC network from the Allbritton family and said it expected FCC and Justice Department approval by the end of 2013.
 The FCC in December approved deals for buyers Gannett Co.
 Schroder also declined to comment on whether White Plains, New York-based Bunge has gotten any interest from potential buyers.
 government securities fell as the minutes said several policy makers favored cutting monthly bond-buying by $10 billion at each meeting.
 Several Fed officials said that in “the absence of an appreciable change in the economic outlook, there should be a clear presumption in favor of continuing to reduce the pace” of the Fed’s bond-buying, the minutes of the Federal Open Market Committee’s Jan.
 It has resorted to purchases and partnerships, winning an auction for Brazil’s Libra field in October and buying a stake in gas discoveries in Papua New Guinea in December.
 and one of the first analysts to advise clients to buy when stocks were bottoming after the 2008 financial crisis, said in a phone interview Feb.
 The central bank last week said it will press on with a second reduction to its monthly bond buying, by $10 billion to $65 billion, citing improvement in the labor market.
 Dongfeng Motor Group Co, a carmaker in negotiations to buy a stake in PSA Peugeot Citroen, rose 21 percent to HK$1154 before being suspended from trading pending an announcement.
 Penney, declined to comment on the timing, interested buyers or potential proceeds.
 Possible buyers, including an unnamed hotel chain, are in talks to purchase parcels that should start generating cash in three to six months, Karahan said.
 made its boldest move yet to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, nominating a full slate of board members as it seeks to usher the second-largest US.
 Even if Charter successfully installs a majority of the board, the new directors have the duty to vote in the best interests of Time Warner Cable’s shareholders and may not necessarily agree to Charter’s buyout terms.
 cable company, has examined buying some of Time Warner Cable’s markets, including New York City, New England and Charlotte, North Carolina, should Charter successfully complete a deal, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 The chart’s cloud refers to the area between the first and second leading span lines on the chart and is used to show an area where buy or sell orders may be clustered.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury 10-year notes fell for a second week in the first back-to-back losses this year amid bets the Federal Reserve will push on with bond-buying cuts, viewing the strength of the economy as being masked by harsh weather.
 note and bond sales fell to a four-month low amid the outlook for further reductions in Feb bond-buying.
 Bernanke, scaling back bond-buying under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy in “measured steps” It was her first report to Congress since being sworn in as Fed chief on Feb.
 The buying is designed to cap long-term borrowing costs and fuel growth.
 ‘Mother Nature’ Fed Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher said yesterday policy makers should keep reducing bond-buying even as winter weather slows growth.
 “Current levels aren’t sustainable for home buyers” Torun is also the chairman and chief executive of the construction firm Torunlar Gayrimenkul Yatirim Ortakligi AS.
 4 as investors assessed when the Federal Reserve will announce the third reduction to its monthly bond-buying program.
I'm a dork so my reaction to the news that Herbalife is doing a billion-dollar convertible bond offering to fund its stock buyback was, "hmm, how do you borrow Herbalife stock?" Because some things to think about convertibles are: A lot of the buyers of convertibles are convertible arbitrage hedge funds that will buy the convertible and sell short some of the underlying stock.
 Also it can buy back a lot of stock, which was really its goal.
 The way it works is that Herbalife enters into a five-year prepaid forward contract with one or more of its underwriters -- Bank of America Merrill Lynch, Credit Suisse, HSBC and Morgan Stanley -- to buy back some of the shares underlying the convertible.
 (Five years because the convertible matures in August 2019, so really five and a half years) Let's say that's 9 million of the 12 million shares underlying the convertible1 Herbalife gives the banks the money now -- say it's about $590 million2 -- but it gets its shares in five years3 Because the forward is prepaid, Herbalife gets to take the shares out of its share count for earnings-per-share purposes now, so for accounting it's as though it had done the buyback right now.
 If that sounds like an odd deal, it's because it is4 The banks then enter into five-year swaps with the hedge funds buying the bonds5 So the bank in substance owes Herbalife 9 million shares and is owed 9 million shares by the hedge funds.
 I sort of made up that 9 million shares, but it's meant to represent the theoretical hedge ratio of the convertible: The hedge funds have models to tell them how many shares they need to short to hedge this convertible, and my guess is that the answer is around 9 million6 There's also a capped call, about which the less said the better, and the more said the footnotier7 In brief, Herbalife is effectively raising the conversion price of the bonds by entering into an option with the banks, which the banks need to hedge by buying even more shares.
 So Herbalife is raising $1 billion and using the bulk of it on immediate stock buybacks, some of which comes from market sellers but most of which comes in synthetic form from the hedge funds buying the convertible.
 In five years, if the convertible is in the money (the stock is above $83ish), the hedge funds convert it, get 12 million shares, deliver 9 million of them to the banks to close out their swaps; then the banks deliver them to Herbalife to close out the forward, everyone is happy8 If the convertible is out of the money, the hedge funds get their $1 billion back, use it to buy 9 million shares (for much less than $1 billion), deliver the shares to the banks, who deliver them to Herbalife, and the hedge funds keep the rest of the money.
 Why do this? For one thing, Herbalife gets to do a giant gob of buyback all at once: "They certainly have plenty of cash flow to fund a buyback effort, but by taking on debt that gives them the ability to accelerate the effort," as one analyst puts it.
 They're buying 9 million shares or whatever at today's price, and retiring the shares for earnings purposes today.
 For another thing, normally when companies offer convertible bonds, their stock goes down, because hedge funds are selling short to hedge the convertibles they're expecting to buy.
 On this deal, though, no one is selling to hedge the convertible -- Herbalife is, in effect, buying from anyone who wants to sell.
 In fact people are buying: The banks are buying some for the capped call, and depending on the exact structure, banks or hedge funds might be buying to hedge the forward too.
 from this?10 I don't know; the point of this is mostly "aren't convertible bond deals weird?" The expanded buyback is a sign of confidence from Herbalife, obviously, and the four-bookrunner convertible deal is at least supposed to be a sign that BofA Merrlll, Credit Suisse, HSBC and Morgan Stanley share in the company's enthusiasm, or at least its belief that it is not an illegal pyramid scheme that will go to zero in the near future.
 On the other hand, though, among the possible stories of "someone spends a billion dollars to buy Herbalife stock," this seems like the most benign for Ackman.
 Unlike a lot of theorized share purchase transactions -- Carl Icahn doing a tender offer, for instance, or William Stiritz doing a leveraged buyout, or even just Herbalife buying back a whole lot of shares on the open market -- this transaction doesn't actually reduce the number of shares that are physically outstanding11 And while those sorts of transactions would make stock borrow more expensive and squeeze short sellers, this one won't.
 And could you blame them if they were a little tempted to source some extra shares by writing swaps to outright short sellers? After all, that would both increase the size of their trade and get their client -- Herbalife -- what it wants, in the form of a bigger buyback.
 That's just the most logical number of shares to buy back -- the delta of the convertible.
 Smaller numbers are very possible, if, for instance, some non-hedge investors buy the convertible, or if Herbalife just doesn't want to buy back that much.
 In that case, either the banks would buy back the remaining 3 million shares themselves and give the hedge funds 9 million shares of swaps, or else the banks would do 12 million shares of swaps and the hedge funds would buy the 3 million "extra" shares that they don't need to hedge.
 Of course if the stock is up maybe it's because the shorts have been squeezed and the borrow is cheaper? Anyway, they haven't yet disclosed how many shares they are buying in this transaction so this is all somewhat speculative.
 7 In the capped call, Herbalife buys an option from the banks that mirrors the option in the convertible -- so, say, it's a call option on 12 million shares at a strike price of around $83, same as the convertible.
 Actually it's the same trade except that, in addition to whatever else is going on, the issuer also sells the stock underlying the convertible, as well as buying it back on a forward basis.
 It's a way to create borrow for hedge funds to hedge their convertibles, for companies that don't want to actually buy back stock.
 less well than the buyback version.
 There is a thing called a "Happy Meal convertible offering" In my experience, that term is used by bankers to refer to the sort of deal that Herbalife is doing here: Issue a convertible, buy back some or all of the underlying stock in convenient swap format, and maybe do a capped call on top of it (not critical to the "Happy Meal" concept but typically goes along with it).
 She is considering buying Godrej shares.
 “At that point, I might be a strong buyer of Godrej” Godrej Consumer shares now trade at more than 26 times forward earnings, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 They can also sell points to carriers and retailers and then buy airline seats and other rewards at a discount, pocketing the difference.
 and Liberty Global Plc the right to buy his stakes should he decide to sell.
 He will also have the right of first refusal to buy Malone’s 87 million Class B shares in the European cable company, according to a separate filing today.
 trumped his bid for Time Warner Cable Inc, agreeing to buy the second-largest cable company in a $45 billion deal.
 It may also prompt current tenants to stoppaying rents or buying their beer from Punch, he said.
 The Dubai-based carrier agreed to buy another 50 A380s in November, bringing the number of superjumbos it has ordered to 140, half the entire backlog for the plane.
 More Seats Amedeo was formed yesterday out of Doric, whose business model was managing A380 assets after finding investors to buy planes from airlines in so-called sale and leaseback transactions.
 Gallo is one of nine analysts who recommend selling the stock, compared with four who say buy and 17 who rate the stock as hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 leveraged buyout fund TPG Capital may raise as much as $126 billion in a London initial public offering.
 For buyers who yearn for sophistication but are hooked on $249 sofas, they offer a bit of originality without breaking the bank.
 “We have customers who have said to us that they will buy an Ikea sofa for the first time, so it’s just like Apple, if you have value in the ecosystem, it creates more value for everyone,” Pennington said while displaying textiles in the company’s Stockholm showroom.
 And, she said, “it’s cheaper than buying a new sofa” “We don’t want people to throw their sofas away, we want them to keep them and to reuse them and decorate with textiles,” Pennington said.
 Ikea’s business is built around the idea of buying and transporting products in bulk and using its size to keep costs down.
 The extra yield buyers require over benchmark municipal debt on general obligations maturing in January 2022 has averaged about 3 percentage points since August, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Bernanke, policy makers united behind a strategy to gradually wind down bond buying that has expanded the Fed’s balance sheet to $41 trillion.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Outerwall Inc, owner of the Redbox DVD dispensers, rose as much as 11 percent in extended trading after saying it will buy back $350 million of its stock.
 “They’re buying back a lot of their stock, and come tomorrow, you’re going to see huge demand for their shares,” said Michael Pachter, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles.
 “You don’t have many companies with more than 20 percent of their shares being available for buyback in such a short period,” said Pachter, who has an outperform rating on the stock, the equivalent of buy.
 and Europe, are technically in the buy zone, so the scene is set for rebounds,” said Hiroichi Nishi, an equities manager in Tokyo at SMBC Nikko Securities Inc, a unit of Japan’s second-biggest lender.
 The company is in talks to sell its Japanese personal-computer business to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc, according to a person with knowledge of the situation, who asked not to be identified before a public announcement.
 While Telus has focused on expanding its wireless subscriber base and its Internet-based TV service, BCE also is a major TV and radio broadcaster, after buying CTV, Astral Media Inc.
 The EU opened an in-depth probe into the transaction in December, citing concerns that it may harm retail customers and mobile virtual network operators that buy wholesale services from network owners.
 Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Three Ireland also got objections this month over its plan to buy Telefonica SA’s Irish operations.
 Some of the biggest names in the industry are keen to buy assets at the same time as the world’s largest producers including Rio Tinto Group are shunning unwanted mines.
 Former chief executive officers Mick Davis of Xstrata Plc and Barrick Gold Corp’s Aaron Regent are plotting a return to the business by buying mining projects, backed by private funds.
 While buyout firms have increasingly targeted mining since 2012, only about 14 percent of the almost $10 billion raised in the last two years has been deployed, according to data compiled by Bloomberg Industries.
 Lower Prices While valuations remain depressed, potential buyers are attracted by signs that the bottom might be near.
 For the right assets at the right price, it’s a really excellent time to buy” Ex-JPMorgan Bankers Last month Citigroup Inc.
 The bank cited rising optimism that demand for raw materials from China, the biggest buyer, will remain resilient.
 “2014 is a great time to be buying assets,” Paul Gait, a mining analyst at Sanford C.
 “Mining is still unloved” X2 Resources, led by Davis and a team of former Xstrata executives, is seeking to raise at least $3 billion from investors before it starts buying mines, people with knowledge of the plan said last week.
 “Banks have already exceeded 90 percent of their full-year estimates and I think they’ll beat the targets” The lenders are moving cash out of government bonds and increasing loans as the central bank buys sovereign debt to stoke inflation and stimulate the world’s third-largest economy.
 BTG said it upgraded Itau to buy from neutral after the “stunning” fourth-quarter results.
 Itau said last week it agreed to buy a controlling stake in Corpbanca for at least $22 billion to expand in Chile.
 inMinneapolis who rates Tesla a buy, boosted her target price onthe shares to $325 today from $200.
 Munich Re, led by Chief Executive Officer Nikolaus von Bomhard, 57, announced plans last year to buy back 1 billion euros of stock by a shareholders’ meeting scheduled for April 30.
 For example, tougher lending criteria could constrain credit and intensify already falling prices in an area, or they could cause buyers to shift to lower-cost regions, and spur the overheating, the authors of the report said.
 Ocwen expanded in recent years by buying rights from banks retreating from an almost $10 trillion market, and Moody’s Investors Service cited that growth last month in affirming the company’s credit rating at four levels below investment grade.
 Ocwen agreed last month to buy servicing from Wells Fargo on about 184,000 loans, or roughly 2 percent of the lender’s residential-servicing portfolio, according to a statement.
 Five years after Brazil first started auctioning the contracts to buy power from wind farms, the delay highlights the challenges the government is facing in diversifying from dams, which account for two-thirds of national supply.
 18 to support the share price and said today it may buy back as many as 5 million more.
 To get there, VW needs to buy out Scania’s other investors, who this month asked for an independent auditor to examine whether ownership of the company by VW and MAN poses a conflict of interest.
 The German automaker started buying stock in the Swedish manufacturer in 2000 and acquired majority voting control in March 2008.
 As part of an agreement with MAN to take full control, VW is required by law to offer to buy out the German truckmaker’s remaining owners.
 Between 10 percent and 20 percent of current Cayenne buyers might switch to the Macan, Mueller said.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- CBS Corp, owner of the most-watched television network, reported quarterly profit that beat estimates, helped by programming deals, and accelerated its stock buybacks by $15 billion.
 Significant Increase CBS said yesterday it will buy back a total of $2 billion shares in the current quarter.
 said last week Violin Memory has attracted buyout interest, and has said the company should seek to sell itself.
 The fiscal 2015 request, to be released on March 4, will include funds to buy 26 of the Air Force’s model, six of the Marine Corps’ short-takeoff and vertical-landing jets and two of the Navy’s version for aircraft carriers, according to the officials familiar with the plans who asked not to be identified because the budget hasn’t been made public.
 10 interview that its F-35 program is “going to continue to grow and become a larger part of our portfolio” While the budget request will be down from the 42 fighters the Pentagon had projected it would buy next year, it’s an increase from the 29 the Defense Department requested and Congress approved for the current fiscal year.
 6 on money-laundering charges after allegedly selling Bitcoin to undercover police officers who told them the digital currency would be used to buy stolen credit-card numbers.
 “Contributions from Canaccord’s nondomestic platforms were very strong and more than offset weaker-than-expected results from Canaccord’s domestic platform,” said Graham Ryding, a TD Securities analyst who upgraded the stock to buy from hold.
 Eric Raynal isn’t buying it.
 Jefferies Group LLC analyst Randal Konik said in an e-mailed research note yesterday that the stock is still a “compelling” buying opportunity, reasserting the investment bank’s $21 target price.
 is considering buying full control of medical devices maker Biosensors International Group Ltd, said two people with knowledge of the deliberations.
 It could be the second-largest buyout by a Chinese private equity firm in the past decade, based on Biosensors’s market capitalization, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 participated in that buyout.
 raised UniCredit SpA to buy from neutral and Intesa Sanpaolo SpA, the country’s second-largest lender, to neutral from underweight, analyst Azzurra Guelfi said in an e-mailed report from London today.
 Chief Executive Officer Marco Dunand said last month a deal worth as much as $1 billion could be completed by the end of March, without naming the buyer.
 Mercuria, which was founded in 2004 and is now the fourth-largest independent commodity trader, has been seeking a strategic partner to buy a stake of 10 percent to 20 percent for more than a year.
 The Geneva-based trading house is simultaneously in exclusive negotiations to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities unit, said one of the people.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Credit Agricole Assurances and partner private equity firm Ardian Sarl are poised to buy a majority stake in Vinci SA’s parking-lot division in a deal valuing the business at 196 billion euros ($27 billion).
 Lemarie has a buy rating on the stock.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- American Express Co, the biggest credit-card issuer by purchases, climbed as much as 23 percent as analysts recommended buying the stock after the firm forecast a jump in small businesses that accept its products.
 Ocwen expanded in recent years by buying rights from banks retreating from an almost $10 trillion market.
 Among the buyers have been Ocwen, Nationstar Mortgage Holdings Inc.
 The two previous sales flopped because buyers were discouraged by the floor price that was as much as triple the current amount.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- GCL-Poly Energy Holdings Ltd, the world’s biggest maker of polysilicon, plans to buy a 68 percent stake in Hong Kong-listed Same Time Holdings Ltd.
 GCL-Poly will buy 360 million new Same Time shares at HK$4 each, and will seek a waiver from the rule requiring it to make a buyout offer, according to a joint filing yesterday by the two companies to the Hong Kong stock exchange.
 The lenders previously proposed splitting up LightSquared while Mast had offered to buy part of it in exchange for debt.
 LightSquared has sued Ergen and SPSO for the way they bought the company’s debt before another Ergen entity made a $22 billion offer to buy its wireless spectrum, claiming they sought to hijack the reorganization.
 LightSquared has said SPSO couldn’t buy its debt because it acted for Dish and Ergen.
 Kleinwort Benson will buy 91 percent after Fosun Group, AQTON SE, the investment vehicle of German entrepreneur Stefan Quandt, and entities affiliated with Timothy C.
 less than a year after buying control of Sprint Corp, the country’s third-largest wireless operator.
 The shares, which have 16 buy, two hold and two sell recommendations from analysts, have gained 3 percent this year.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- SAS Group, the Nordic region’s largest airline, is selling shares potentially valued at 35 billion Swedish kronor ($537 million) to buy new Airbus planes and cut its dependence on banks.
 SAS said in June it will buy 12 new Airbus long-range jets valued at $33 billion to upgrade aging aircraft with more efficient models, seeking delivery of eight A350-900s and four A330-300s starting in 2015.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Meriton Pty, Australia’s biggest apartment developer, plans to double its debt this year from about A$300 million ($268 million) to buy land amid record low interest rates and soaring demand for apartments.
 Chinese Demand Meriton sells between 12 percent and 15 percent of its apartments to overseas buyers, most of them Chinese, according to the company.
 shareholder Elliott Management Corp, which is pushing for changes at the network-equipment maker, said it has the “overwhelming” support of investors for its cost-cut and stock-buyback plans.
 Elliott is pushing for Juniper to cut $200 million in operating costs and buy back $25 billion in stock immediately and an additional $1 billion in 2015.
 Buying Land While the gaming industry has pushed for Las Vegas-style gambling in Florida since the 1970s, lawmakers revived the debate in 2011, when Genting began buying more than $400 million of real estate for its Resorts World Miami project.
 Last month, he rejected a proposal to buy out the swaps for $165 million, saying it was too costly.
 *Says move part of commitment to better represent diversity of its customer base *NOTE: Earlier today, Sky News reported Lloyds CEO will next week pledge targets for women executives, lending to small and medium-sized businesses, first-time house-buyers *NOTE: Jan.
 While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 to advise it on potential buyers for the medical nutrition unit, Reuters said yesterday, citing people familiar with the matter.
 Zell, 72, nicknamed “the grave dancer” for buying distressed properties left for dead in the 1990s, sold his Equity Office Properties Trust in 2007 for $39 billion as the commercial real estate market was peaking.
 CommonWealth has denied Corvex and Related’s claims of conflicts of interest and has said it is focusing on buying office buildings in US.
 The delay will force Eneva to buy electricity from other generators in Brazil’s North to meet its contractual obligations after spot prices surged because of a drought.
 That, combined with rising interest rates and cost overruns, prompted UBS AG analysts led by Lilyanna Yang to cut their rating on the stock to hold from buy.
 Jump Start The patents have many potential applications for buyers eager to break into the growing alternative-fuels market, said Blair Jacobs, a patent lawyer with McDermott Will & Emery in Washington.
 The assets would let the buyer revive the Fisker brand in the world’s biggest auto market, which is struggling to reduce some of the globe’s worst air pollution.
 It would make sense for Wanxiang to buy Fisker after acquiring the battery-maker, said Shifley.
 Wilmington Watching The duel is being watched in Wilmington, Delaware, where Fisker spent $20 million in 2010 to buy the abandoned GM plant.
 Low-income shoppers have been buying mostly necessities even as more well-heeled consumers shell out for bigger-ticket items such as appliances and cars.
 “Our customers simply don’t have the money to buy basic necessities between pay checks” Support from Wal-Mart helped Democrats push through the last increase in the wage floor after the party won control of both chambers of Congress in the 2006 midterm elections.
 Since 2008, when its African private equity team was formed, the lender has invested more than $700 million across the continent and may invest as much as $300 million in three companies this year, Peter Baird, head of the buyout unit, said in a Feb.
 “In terms of preferred exit routes, we’ll be creative and thoughtful, but like everyone else, we generally like trade buyers with cash” In Africa, the bank has private equity investments in companies including Nigeria’s GZ Industries Ltd, which makes aluminum cans, Union Bank of Nigeria Plc, Tanzania’s Export Trading Group, Botswanan retailer Choppies Enterprises Ltd.
 3 that mining mergers and acquisitions will probably increase this year, led by more than $10 billion of privately funded deals, after 2013 saw the fewest buyouts in seven years.
 AngloGold Chief Executive Officer Srinivasan Venkatakrishnan said in an interview in Cape Town yesterday the sale process is “ongoing,” without identifying the buyer or giving a price.
 While buyout firms have increasingly targeted mining since 2012, only about 14 percent of the almost $10 billion raised in the last two years has been deployed, according to data compiled by Bloomberg Industries.
 Users can also buy coupons and enjoy group discounts just like on Groupon Inc.
 Singh’s administration earlier this month approved Vodafone’s $16 billion plan to buy out the local partners in its Indian unit, six months after the South Asian nation ended limits on foreign ownership in the sector.
 Non-bank lender Pepper Australia Pty, buyout firm Archer Capital Pty and regional lenders Bank of Queensland Ltd.
 buyout firms last month asked investment banks to submit proposals for divesting Healthscope through an initial public offering or a sale, people familiar with the matter said Jan.
 to what was the country’s biggest buyout in eight years.
 17 statement issued after reports that Nestle had tried to buy the maker of Ferrero Rocher chocolates.
 “If Nestle can buy them at the right price and integrate them, and they have all this cash, it makes lots of sense, whether it’s Merck or something else” Kelley Dougherty, a spokeswoman for Whitehouse Station, New Jersey-based Merck, said the company doesn’t comment on deal speculation.
 Even so, Nestle isn’t the type of company to just buy back shares forever, and it will probably seek a sizeable deal eventually that it can finance in part through a sale of the rest of the L’Oreal stake, said Stent of Exane BNP Paribas.
 Six of 36 analysts recommend buying Commerzbank shares, the lowest proportion since May last year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Commerzbank sold 710 million euros of non-performing commercial real estate loans in Spain as part of its asset reduction plan, the company said last week, without identifying the buyers.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Offers to buy Spanish homes fell short of the asking prices by 23 percent on average last year, damping expectations that the nation’s residential values have reached bottom, according to Idealistacom.
 “Nobody knows how many homes are up for sale in Spain or where they are situated” Further Decllines Aceytuno estimates prices will fall a further 5 percent or 6 percent in the first half as high unemployment and a drought in mortgage financing prevent Spaniards from buying homes.
 He began buying in October 2011 after Westway’s largest holder offered to buy components of its business, and he sold when the deal became public, they said.
 He “used this information” to buy shares.
 Smith & Nephew Plc climbed 11 percent to 886 pence after agreeing to buy Austin, Texas-based ArthroCare Corp.
 after Actavis Plc, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, agreed to buy Forest for about $25 billion.
 is seeking bids to buy 5,000 oil tank cars with improved safety standards following a series of spills and explosions related to hauling crude by railroad.
 While BNSF doesn’t currently own any tank cars for customer use, the purpose of buying them is to “kick-start the transition” to the safer cars, Butler said.
 to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases and a proxy-advisory firm criticized his efforts as micromanagement.
 The billionaire as recently as last week publicly urged the company to buy back more stock, after saying in December he would seek a shareholder vote to unlock funds held by Cupertino, California-based Apple, which had $159 billion in cash and marketable securities as of Dec.
 Last year, Apple also appeased hedge-fund manager David Einhorn by boosting its dividend and increasing buybacks.
 Icahn became a billionaire by buying stakes in companies and then publicly pushing management and directors for changes to boost the stock.
 “Keep buying Tim! You still have $145 billion cash,” Icahn wrote.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 took a step closer to becoming Canada’s next national wireless operator after spending C$233 million ($210 million) to buy airwaves across the country in an auction that netted the Canadian government a record C$527 billion.
 “Possibly it would involve a name change -- Canadacor” Quebecor, which began offering mobile-phone service in Quebec after buying spectrum in the last auction in 2008, is poised to emerge as a challenger to Rogers Communications Inc, Telus Corp.
 front-month gas probably will drop to as low as 55 pence by the end of next month because it’s been more profitable for utilities to buy renewable power after output from wind turbines jumped, said Nick Campbell, a risk manager at Inspired Energy in Lancashire, England.
 “The winter can have a sting in its tail” and unplanned outages at production facilities may crimp supply, said Craig Lowrey, a consultant at UX Energy Services in Ipswich, England, which buys energy for clients including Tata Motor Ltd’s Jaguar Land Rover unit.
 Ramon Ang, the billionaire chief of San Miguel, said last month he’s received several bids of as much as $6 billion for its 51 percent stake in the brewery unit, and that Kirin hasn’t offered to buy the remaining stake.
 Comcast, which plans to buy New York-based Time Warner Cable Inc.
 is buying rights for 20 pairs and Virgin America Inc.
 Becker’s outperform rating makes her one of nine analysts who recommend buying the shares, while six say hold and three say sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “As the mayor of a village north of Timbuktu recently told me, they still come in town to the market and buy goods, then they go back to the bush,” Colonel Herve Pierre, head of the French force in Gao, said at the main base at the airport.
 Verso was purchased by Apollo Global Management LLC for $16 billion in a leveraged buyout in 2006 and had $127 billion of total debt at the end of September, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Newark, New Jersey-based company expanded its Japan business by buying two life insurers from AIG in 2011.
 The Federal Reserve began scaling back its bond-buying efforts as the economy improved, helping send the yield on the 10-year Treasury to 303 percent on Dec.
 Exxon shares hit an all-time high last December as Murti raised his rating to buy.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Allianz SE, Europe’s biggest insurer, is buying 833 percent of FC Bayern Muenchen AG to deepen relations with Germany’s most successful soccer club.
 Allianz will buy the stake for 110 million euros ($150 million) via a capital increase, the Munich-based insurer said in a statement on its website yesterday.
 luxury-handbag maker, also is going to Hudson Yards, agreeing last year to buy 750,000 square feet at the first tower under construction.
 Thousands of foreigners will see what Aeroflot is and they’ll buy its tickets in the future” Yandex will see a boost in revenue from the Olympics due to more advertising during the games, according to Maksim Yurin, the social-media and marketing director at Moscow-based advertising agency Red Keds.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Leveraged-buyout firms led by billionaire Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC, seeing fewer bargains in acquiring companies, are loading up on high-risk debt being abandoned by the world’s biggest banks.
 Apollo’s credit unit has swelled to $103 billion in assets from about $4 billion in seven years, first by buying loans from banks hurt by the 2008 financial crisis and now by benefiting from regulations designed to prevent a repeat of that event.
 Still, private-equity firms see an opportunity to offset a buyout market that has shrunk 80 percent in six years, looking especially at Europe, where banks have sold more than $11 trillion of assets since the end of 2011, according to the European Banking Authority.
 Fewer Deals The shift comes as buyout deals are drying up.
 The number of global transactions has been sliding since 2010, including a 14 percent drop last year, as higher prices made it a better time for private-equity firms to sell than buy.
 Apollo was co-founded in 1990 by Black, Joshua Harris and Marc Rowan, all of whom worked at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc, where Michael Milken was pioneering the use of high-yield junk bonds in leveraged buyouts.
 Apollo’s growth in credit jumped after Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc’s September 2008 failure, to $151 billion at the end of that year, from $44 billion in 2006, as the firm took advantage of frozen markets to buy corporate loans at steep discounts.
 that was bought by KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs for $48 billion in the biggest buyout ever.
 Apollo was the ninth largest global manager of CLOs, which buy junk loans, at the end of June based on $9 billion of assets, according to Moody’s, while raising its first European pool last year.
 AT&T Bid AT&T agreed to pay a breakup fee of about $6 billion in cash and assets when it tried to buy T-Mobile in 2011.
 The Frankfurt-based bank set a March 2 deadline for buyers to submit indicative bids for the remaining property loans in Spain, named “Project Octopus,” said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 Investment in European property debt is set to rise to 40 billion euros this year as funds such as Apollo Global Management LLC and Cerberus Capital Management LP buy loans cheaply and financing for purchasing them becomes more readily available, Cushman & Wakefield said.
 Chief Executive Officer Aubrey McClendon, agreed to buy 56,000 acres of drilling leases from Exxon Mobil Corp.
 29, without identifying the buyer.
 film studio, surpassed fourth-quarter profit estimates and made the biggest increase to its stock-buyback fund in seven years.
 “This was the result of a strategy that has served us very well, not just last year, but for the past five years” Stock Buybacks The company added $5 billion to its stock repurchase fund, the most since 2007, after budgeting $4 billion a year for buybacks since 2011.
 Kurnos, who is based in Boca Raton, Florida, has a buy rating on the shares.
 Marubeni, a Tokyo-based trading company, announced in August that it would buy about 25 percent of Mainstream, becoming the company’s second-largest shareholder.
 “If Total and Eni don’t go and buy unbranded nuts and bolts from China, then we won’t be in competition with China” Gas Deposits Iran holds the world’s largest natural gas reserves and fourth-biggest oil reserves, after Venezuela, Saudi Arabia and Canada, according BP Plc.
 Securities and Exchange Commission, would give investors and employees of closely held companies a place to buy and sell shares while letting corporations avoid the disclosure and compliance requirements that come with being publicly traded.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-largest oil producer, plans to buy a quarter of Israel’s biggest natural gas field for as much as $26 billion under a revised agreement as demand rises in the Middle East.
 “Any time you can buy your way into a big pile of gas it’s not necessarily a bad thing,” Andrew Williams, a Melbourne-based analyst at RBC Capital Markets, said today by phone.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Herbalife Ltd, the nutrition company hedge fund manager Bill Ackman has accused of being a pyramid scheme, boosted its share buyback by 50 percent to $15 billion and announced a $1 billion sale of convertible bonds.
 The buyback comes on the same day that Ackman’s Pershing Square Management LP repeated allegations about unethical practices among Herbalife’s distributors.
 “They certainly have plenty of cash flow to fund a buyback effort, but by taking on debt that gives them the ability to accelerate the effort,” Rommel Dionisio, a New York-based analyst for Wedbush Securities, said in a phone interview.
 LULAC Meeting The initial buyers of Herbalife’s notes, due in 2019, will be Bank of America Corp, Credit Suisse Group AG, HSBC Holdings Plc and Morgan Stanley, the nutrition company said today in a statement.
 The former buyback program of $1 billion had an available balance of $653 million.
 Collective trusts differ from other trusts that cater to single buyers such as institutional investors.
 Yields on commonwealth securities have traded at speculative-grade levels since at least September, luring buyers such as hedge funds and investors in distressed debt.
 It also has what I submit is the best reason to go around saying things like "Facebook is buying WhatsApp at a valuation of $42 per user," which is a correlation matrix followed by this: The key variable in explaining differences in value across companies is the number of users.
 While the value side of you may be telling you that you cannot pay dividends or buy back stock with users (you need cash flows), remember that the pricing game is not about what you or I think makes sense but what traders care about.
 Frequent sealed-bid batch auctions to buy and sell stocks seems to me like not the worst idea to replace the continuous limit order book, and here is an article about an academic who is proposing them.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Apache Corp, seeking to reduce debt and fund a share buyback, agreed to sell its Argentine energy assets to state-run YPF SA for $800 million in cash.
 While Telus has focused on expanding its wireless subscriber base and its Internet-based TV service, BCE also is a major TV and radio broadcaster, after buying CTV, Astral Media Inc.
 The world’s largest alternative-asset manager is among investors buying distressed properties in the Chicago area after private-equity and hedge-fund firms helped send property values surging in hard-hit markets such as Phoenix and Atlanta.
 Chicago trailed some other markets for attracting investor interest because Illinois is a judicial foreclosure state, meaning home repossessions require approval by a court, slowing down the process, and there were fewer opportunities to buy distressed real estate in bulk, Ramella said.
 Now that values in other areas have bounced back so much, buying there isn’t as attractive and investors have turned to other areas, such as Chicago, for better pricing, Ramella said.
 Areas such as Phoenix and Las Vegas were among the first markets to come back after the housing bust as private-equity funds and other buyers sought bargain prices.
 In the Chicago region, investors weren’t a big part of the buying market in 2012 and the early part of 2013, Smith said.
 Demand Rebounding Sales demand is rebounding as buyers take advantage of low mortgage rates before expected increases as the Federal Reserve unwinds its stimulus program aimed at reducing borrowing costs.
 Business Backbone McClelland said MACK buys about 30 houses a month and that plenty of supply remains for the company to expand.
 CIM is poised to buy 2 California Plaza, an office tower in downtown Los Angeles that’s the largest asset in the auction.
 Montclair Plaza CIM also is buying Montclair Plaza, a shopping center in the Southern California city of the same name, GlobeStcom reported two days ago.
 Auctions are “an efficient way to get rid of a lot assets in one fell swoop” Other buyers from the CWCapital auction include Starwood, which said last month that it paid $191 million for seven office properties and four retail centers.
 Blackstone also has been an active buyer of office buildings in Orange County during the past year.
 Daiwa Chief Financial Officer Mikita Komatsu said last week that the Tokyo-based company has no plans to buy back shares and has yet to decide whether to increase dividends.
 L’Oreal could also buy shares and take them out of the market, which its shareholders would like because it would increase the value of their existing holdings, some of the people said.
 Sanofi Stake Meanwhile, French pharmaceuticals producer Sanofi has said it would consider buying back some of L’Oreal’s 89 percent stake in the drugmaker if it were to become available.
 L’Oreal could use cash from a sale to buy back its shares from Nestle, two of the people said.
 Were L’Oreal to buy the stake, it could return some of the stock to shareholders, two of the people said.
 He rates the shares buy.
 Labeling advocates say identifying GMOs is needed so that consumers who distrust the technology can avoid buying food containing those ingredients.
 14 freezing temperatures kept prospective buyers at home last month, sending sales down 33 percent from December, which also saw a decline in transactions.
 “It went through a several-year period where it was focused on things other than its core business, and it has, I think, just refocused itself” He rates the company a buy.
 The deal “will put CNO in a better position to bolster its already robust share repurchase program” CNO announced in December it would buy back as much as $300 million in securities.
 Palmer has a buy rating on the stock.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Senior Housing Properties Trust agreed to buy two 15-story medical-office buildings in downtown Boston’s Seaport District for about $113 billion.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Rakuten Inc, the Japanese online retailer controlled by billionaire Hiroshi Mikitani, is buying the Viber Internet messaging and calling service for $900 million as it moves into social networking.
 “Investors may also buy the stock as the declines in the sector earlier in the year makes it a buying opportunity” The iShares China Large-Cap ETF, the largest Chinese exchange-traded fund in the US, declined 05 percent last week to $3440, while the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index added 08 percent amid optimism economic growth in the US.
 started coverage with a buy rating, setting a price target of $40 that implies a 34 percent surge from its Feb.
 7 to $6503 in New York after Deutsche Bank AG lifted the social entertainment website to buy from hold.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- German Defense Minister Ursula von der Leyen fired two senior staff members and established a review process on buying weapons, such as drones, helicopters and transport planes.
 “That being said, the one-week improvement comes amidst a buying climate for the median household which remains challenging at best” Other reports today showed more Americans than forecast filed claims for unemployment benefits last week and retail sales fell in January by the most since 2012.
 Personal Finances The measure of consumers’ personal finances rose to 3 from 12 the prior week, while the index gauging whether it’s a good time to buy improved to minus 407 from minus 41.
 economy, personal finances and buying climate.
 Electricity producers in Japan, the world’s second-biggest buyer of thermal coal, may pay $88 a metric ton for annual supplies starting April 1, according to the median estimate of five analysts in a Bloomberg News survey.
 Japan has increased buying of fossil fuels after the Fukushima disaster led to the shutting of the nation’s nuclear plants.
 Japan is the biggest buyer of Australian thermal coal, importing 776 million tons in the year ended June, according to a December report from the Bureau of Resources and Energy Economics in Canberra.
 Her appearance follows the Federal Open Market Committee’s decision in January to taper the Fed’s monthly bond buying to $65 billion.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 Sichuan Swellfun Co, the Diageo unit making the white spirit called baijiu, will focus on selling more to walk-in customers and online buyers, James Rice, Swellfun’s managing director, said in an interview.
 “There is still a consumer there for high quality products in China, and we want to be right there” To target more mass-market buyers, the company also introduced cheaper products such as a 98 yuan white spirit under a different brand, he said.
 High-end gift buying took a hit in the first four days of the period, with sales of expensive alcoholic drinks falling about 70 percent in some supermarkets in Fuzhou, eastern China, according to the report, which cited the Ministry of Commerce.
 Moutai will start a new marketing company to serve retail buyers instead of relying on government sales, China Daily reported Feb.
 “If you get the financing done, you buy Puerto Rico more time to retire debt and give its economy a chance to stabilize and grow,” said Guy Davidson, who manages $30 billion of local bonds as director of munis at AllianceBernstein in New York.
 That has lured buyers such as hedge funds, which are asking that the island raise enough money to meet its needs for two years, two people with knowledge of the preliminary talks said last week.
 Fund Room “If they get a deal done and it buys them some time, we have room to add” the bonds, said Lyle Fitterer, head of tax-exempt fixed income in Menomonee Falls, Wisconsin, at Wells Capital Management.
 “We could buy it, and it wouldn’t be something that would put us over our limit, not only in terms of Puerto Rico exposure, but also our high-yield exposure,” he said.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 “If you look at the balance of trade that our clients are doing, they’re buying,” Gary Dugan, the chief investment officer in Asia and the Middle East for Coutts, which counts Queen Elizabeth II among its clients, said in a interview yesterday in Dubai.
 Jim O’Neill, the former chairman of Goldman Sachs Asset Management who created the BRIC moniker for the largest emerging markets, said the losses are a buying opportunity.
 Mark Mobius, who oversees more than $50 billion as chairman of Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said last week his firm is holding off from buying as it expects the sell-off to continue.
 “India will come out of the slowdown in six months,” Sampath Reddy, the chief investment officer at Bajaj Allianz Life Insurance Co, which manages $6 billion and has been buying shares of capital-goods companies, said in an interview yesterday.
 Moody’s is offering to buy as much as 265 million of the New Delhi-based company’s shares for 2,000 Indian rupees ($3219) each, a 287 percent premium to their closing level today on the National Stock Exchange of India, the New York-based firm said in a statement distributed by Business Wire.
 Foreigners have sold a net $146 million of Indian stocks this year, after buying $20 billion worth of equities in 2013, the most in Asia after Japan, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 agreed to buy Emeritus Corp.
 Corporate landlords have raised more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 homes in the past two years, creating a new institutional asset class out of the traditional mom-and-pop business of single-family rentals, according to Jade Rahmani, an analyst with Keefe Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 “We anticipate increasing that buying cadence now that our deal is closed” Starwood Waypoint controls more than 6,700 homes and non-performing loans, focused in Florida and Texas, with a total value of almost $11 billion, according to Beasley.
 Credit Line Starwood has been buying $60 million of homes and non-performing loans a month, a pace Beasley said he expects to accelerate when the company closes on a $500 million line of credit.
 home prices climbed 24 percent since bottoming in March 2012, around the time corporate investors started buying in large numbers, according to the S&P/Case-Shiller index of prices in 20 US.
 Blackstone Group LP’s Invitation Homes, the largest single-family rental landlord with more than 41,000 properties, slowed its buying pace as the cost of houses rose, Blackstone President Tony James said last week.
 agreed to buy it for $452 billion.
 The company expanded its stock-buyback plan by $15 billion.
 Activist investor Icahn dropped his campaign urging the company to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after Apple stepped up repurchases and a proxy-advisory firm criticized his efforts as micromanagement.
 In life settlements, AIG buys insurance policies from individuals and pays premiums until they die, when the company collects the payout.
 The carmaker started buying stock in the Swedish manufacturer in 2000, and acquired majority voting control in March 2008.
 “Refiners continue to be profitable in most markets, especially now that they can buy raw sugar at a discount in the physical market and sell whites at a premium,” said Leonardo Bichara Rocha, a senior economist at the International Sugar Organization in London.
 Just 19 of the world’s countries account for 95 percent of all buyers of white sugar in break-bulk, according to RCMA data.
 That’s helping put pressure on prices because most of the importers that had been buying have sufficient inventory, the ISO’s Bichara Rocha said.
 That allows refiners to lock in profit because it takes two to three months from the time they buy raw sugar before the refined sweetener is delivered to customers, said Tom McNeill, a director at Green Pool.
 Neste Oil dropped 44 percent to 1490 euros after Nordea Bank AB cut Finland’s only oil refiner to hold from buy, meaning it no longer recommends buying the stock.
 Teppei Kobayashi, a spokesman for Kawasaki Heavy, declined to comment on who would buy the engine.
 lowered the maker of food-processing equipment to neutral from buy, citing the stock’s valuation.
 Houlie is also buying shares in Impala Platinum Ltd, Pallinghurst Resources Ltd.
 Julius Baer is targeting 57 billion francs to 72 billion francs of Merrill Lynch assets after it agreed in 2012 to buy non-US.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, is close to an agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Actavis was the most active buyer of drug companies over the past three years, making $144 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Forest said last month it reached an agreement to buy Aptalis Pharma Inc.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Commerzbank AG is sounding out buyers for a group of Spanish loans named “Project Octopus” as it seeks to sell about 5 billion euros ($68 billion) of debt linked to commercial real estate in the country.
 Investment in European property debt is set to rise to 40 billion euros this year as funds such as Apollo Global Management LLC and Cerberus Capital Management LP buy debt cheaply and financing for purchasing debt becomes more readily available, Cushman & Wakefield said.
 bank that gets about three-quarters of earnings from Asia, is seeking buyers for PrimeCredit Ltd, a Hong Kong consumer finance business, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 “The buyers are domestic investors, mainly pension funds” Eight of the 10 stocks that have posted year-to-date gains are financial companies.
 Produce Buying Co, the biggest buyer of cocoa in Ghana, rose 63 today percent to 17 pesewas.
 who recommends buying the shares, said in an e-mail.
 18 that it was buying the unit as part of its expansion in the UK.
 to buy back $50 billion of stock this year was opposed by an influential proxy-voting service, which said such a motion would “micromanage” how the company uses capital.
 28, taking buybacks to more than $40 billion in the past 12 months.
 “Keep buying Tim! You still have $145 billion cash,” Icahn said in a message on his Twitter Inc.
 The Federal Open Market Committee has twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, cutting bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion.
 Warburg who recommends buying SGL stock.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Smith & Nephew Plc agreed to buy ArthroCare Corp.
 Smith & Nephew suspended its share buyback because of the acquisition.
 Motorola Mobility, which Lenovo agreed to buy for $291 billion last month, received a formal complaint in May in which the European Commission, the EU’s antitrust regulator, said it suspects the company is abusing its dominant position by “seeking and enforcing” injunctions against Apple in Germany based on its patents that are essential for products to comply with industry technical standards.
 He stashed the $300 he was allowed to buy in January in his Buenos Aires home and did the same on the first day of February.
 More than 12 years after Argentina restricted withdrawals and converted dollar savings into pesos amid an economic crisis that led to a $95 billion default, 91 percent of those who qualify to buy foreign currency from the government are paying a 20 percent surcharge to keep the cash.
 Argentines have applied to buy and take home $223 million since President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner opened up dollar purchases Jan.
 Wealthiest 20% The tax agency has received 480,644 requests to buy foreign currency since the government allowed the wealthiest Argentines to purchase dollars for savings at the official exchange rate for the first time in 18 months.
 Juan Pablo Las Heras, 32, a manager at an agriculture company, said he was buying $300 at a local branch of Madrid-based Banco Santander SA in downtown Buenos Aires to spend on a holiday abroad.
 “I’m buying here because it’s cheaper than buying on the black market,” Las Heras said.
 If you’re earning enough to qualify to buy, why would you want pesos? They’re not worth anything” Cabinet Chief Jorge Capitanich on Jan.
 “It’s very selfish to stash money under the mattress when you could buy a government security,” he said in an interview on the C5N television network.
 Patients who buy the excluded drugs pay full retail price and were told about the updated formulary in August, Express Scripts spokesman Brian Henry said by e-mail.
 Deutsche Telekom, Hrvatski’s majority owner, is interested in buying Telekom Slovenije, Handelsblatt reported on Feb.
 agreed to buy the media provider for $452 billion, combining the two largest US.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 “Evaluation of these results is ongoing” In Latin America, the company has expanded into Colombia by agreeing to buy a 30 percent interest in the Guajira Offshore 3 Block last month, it said today.
 It has faster decision-making and is buying planes more quickly” Saudia aims to build a “strong hub” in Jeddah while tapping a large domestic market that leading Persian Gulf airports in Dubai, Doha and Abu Dhabi lack, Al-Molhem said.
 “Given the compounding nature of total returns, you can very quickly trail your benchmark by a significant amount in those instances” The speculative ratings may limit buyers for Puerto Rico because some funds require managers to purchase investment-grade obligations.
 Mining companies in North-Western province have also shown interest in buying a stake in the rail company as has the state, Kavindele said by phone from Lusaka, Zambia’s capital.
 The medium-term profit and cash goals “look a bit generic, and not that different from what they had targeted earlier on,” Erich Hauser, a London-based analyst at International Strategy & Investment Group who recommends buying Renault stock, said by phone.
 The partner also builds vehicles with Peugeot, Europe’s second-biggest carmaker, and is considering buying a stake in the Paris-based competitor.
 Yields Climb Hedge funds and other alternative investors have been buying commonwealth debt since at least September, when yields soared on the securities on concern that it may struggle to repay its obligations.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Goldleaf Jewelry Co, a Chinese jewelry retailer with gold mining investments, plans to buy US.
 agreed in 2008 to buy $400 million of debt from USG as the cash-strapped company struggled with frozen credit markets and dwindling wallboard demand.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Mallinckrodt Plc, the drugmaker spun off by Covidien Plc last year, agreed to buy Cadence Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 “Vestas has moved away from being a company that everyone feared wouldn’t be able to dictate its own future,” Jacob Pedersen, an analyst at Sydbank A/S who has a buy rating on the stock, said in a phone interview from Aabenraa, Denmark.
 Credit-default swaps pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities or the cash equivalent should a borrower fail to adhere to its debt agreements.
 jumped 37 percent to 110 yen in Tokyo after the world’s biggest camera maker announced plans to buy back 50 billion yen of its shares.
 The brokerage cut its rating on the stock to underperform from buy.
 Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch downgraded the maker of computers and handsets to underperform from buy, citing concern about the time it will take to turn around Motorola Mobility.
 regulators and is working to get approval to buy Motorola from Google Inc.
 Forest Laboratories surged 28 percent after Actavis Plc agreed to buy the maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda.
 While the Fed has started slowing the pace of its bond buying, the Bank of Japan boosted lending programs today.
 Actavis, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, is buying Forest for about $25 billion in a deal that will transform it into a developer of brand-name drugs.
 Snowstorms last week from the South to the Northeast helped reduce homebuyer traffic to its slowest pace since April.
 surged the most in more than four years amid speculation its majority owner, Deutsche Telekom AG, may seek to boost its stake in the Hungarian company after buying out its Czech unit.
 Deutsche Telekom, which owns 59 percent of Magyar Telekom, agreed to pay 828 million euros ($11 billion) to buy the 392 percent stake of the Czech unit it didn’t already own from Falcon Group, the seller said in a statement today.
 “The company has unparalleled advantages in the sector it operates in,” said Li, who recommends buying Hydoo shares.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake for about $125 billion.
 The central bank last month said it will press on with a second reduction to its bond-buying program.
 Coca-Cola agreed to buy 167 million newly issued shares in the maker of Keurig coffee brewers for about $7498 each, aiming to introduce a system for producing single-serve cold drinks.
 Last week, Bank of Montreal agreed to buy the company for 708 million pounds ($12 billion).
 German prosecutors say Ecclestone paid a BayernLB official $44 million to ensure that CVC was the final buyer.
 They were made to ensure the stake was sold “to a buyer acceptable to Mr.
 The gauge will help investors calculate the cost of buying and selling securities in Europe using pricing data from Xtrakter, which MarketAxess bought in March and last year monitored more than 69,000 bonds.
 One Canadian dollar buys 9065 US.
 Risk reversals measure the premium on options contracts to sell Canadian dollars versus buying US.
 Federal Reserve has cut its monthly bond-buying by $10 billion at each of its last two meetings, to $65 billion.
 disappointment relatively easily might suggest that people have still just looked at this pull-back in dollar/CAD and used it as a buying opportunity, still on the assumption that the US.
 upgraded Genting Singapore to buy today and raised its price target to S$162 because of the planned overseas investment.
 Billionaire activist investor Carl Icahn, who has been pressuring the company to boost buybacks, last month called for a $50 billion repurchase in fiscal 2014.
 Icahn wrote in a tweet that Apple should “keep buying” and that the stock is undervalued.
 In April, before Icahn’s involvement, Cook announced a plan for a total of $100 billion in dividends and buybacks.
 Crashworthiness and vehicle safety is a top consideration factor for people who buy Hondas, Accavitti said, citing data from Strategic Vision, a consumer researcher in San Diego.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Quebec will move to shield businesses from hostile takeovers and buy direct stakes in oil and mining projects to nurture homegrown companies, Finance Minister Nicolas Marceau said.
 Anyone attempting to buy a Quebec-based company through a hostile bid would not be allowed to exercise voting rights attached to the shares it owned after the offer was announced.
 Coca-Cola agreed earlier this month to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 fell 19 percent after agreeing to buy a mine from Goldcorp Inc.
 They were really dumb! That last block quote is more or less right: Backdating was a way to incentivize employees, it was extremely common, it got a lot of legal and auditor buy-in.
 Trade barriers could raise prices on imported panels and hurt developers such as SolarCity Corp, which buy them to satisfy booming demand for rooftop photovoltaic systems.
 Chinese manufacturers responded by buying some solar cells from Taiwan, allowing them to avoid most of the duties.
 During the last trade dispute, Sunnova briefly refused to buy SolarWorld modules for customers, a tactic that Berger may revive.
 Chief Executive Officer Tom Ward, agreed to buy all of Royal Dutch Shell Plc’s assets in Kansas.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries declined before reports this week on jobs and manufacturing that economists said will show growth is strong enough for the Federal Reserve to further reduce its bond-buying.
 “There’s a reluctance for participants to buy higher prices,” said Tom Tucci, managing director and head of Treasury trading in New York at CIBC World Markets Corp.
 Even though the Fed is cutting the amount of bonds it buys as the economy improves, Brady said he recently scooped up the securities as yields approached a two-year high of 3 percent.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Private-equity and hedge funds are accumulating shipping debt at the fastest pace since they began buying the risky loans from banks two years ago, raising prospects of the firms eventually owning the vessels.
 to undisclosed buyers, spokesman Thomas Midteide said.
 The bank is only talking to buyers in the industry, not financial firms, because “they pursue a different investment strategy,” he said.
 to buy five container ships for more than $190 million, Gregory Zikos, Costamare’s chief financial officer, said in a September interview.
 “Quite a few of the funds that are buying these loans are not familiar with shipping, they are newcomers and some may doubt how fast they can manage to climb the learning curve,” Karatzas said by phone Feb.
 satellite-TV provider, said it will buy back $35 billion of stock after fourth-quarter sales exceeded analysts’ estimates on stronger than expected US.
 Investors borrow shares to short in expectations of a price decline, hoping to buy them cheaper at a later date and cash in the difference, or to hedge another position.
 Of 21 analysts tracked by Bloomberg covering TUI, 13 recommend investors buy the shares, with four advising to hold them and four to sell them, according to data collected by Bloomberg.
 “People want to buy the dips now because the market made a bottom after Feb.
 Any softness will be taken down with the weather-related justification and only when we are in warmer times will the Fed look at this data” Federal Open Market Committee officials have twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, lowering bond buying to $65 billion in February from $85 billion last year.
 The company reported better-than-estimated quarterly profit, helped by programming deals, and expanded its stock buybacks by $15 billion.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- India has put off a final agreement to buy 126 Rafale combat planes worth more than $11 billion from Dassault Aviation SA to the next fiscal year as the government has almost exhausted its annual defense budget for purchases.
 Antony said India’s Central Bureau of Investigation is in the final stages of its probe into allegations of corruption in a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from AgustaWestland.
 Chinese manufacturers responded by buying some solar cells from Taiwan, allowing them to avoid most of the duties.
 Prudential has said using capital for deals and buybacks can help it meet the ROE goal.
 Fixed-income yields climbed last year and stocks gained as the economy improved and the Federal Reserve began scaling back its bond-buying efforts.
 agreed in October to buy Oberhausen, Germany-based Oxea from Advent International for about $2 billion in October, highlighting a renewed interest from Gulf oil and petrochemical producers in making acquisitions.
 30, has sold assets and refinanced obligations since borrowing to buy and build resorts such as CityCenter in Las Vegas before the 2008 financial crisis.
 “Some funds are trying to buy relatively safer bets after heavy selling pressure in strong sectors” A report tomorrow will probably show US.
 As soon as you say that, the mortgage company will say it’s not suitable for lending” A property that can’t be mortgaged loses 70 percent of its potential buyers, Fell said.
 A home that becomes uninsurable, and therefore only available to cash buyers, loses as much as 20 percent of its value, according to Richard Sexton, a director at property appraisal firm esurv.
 Insurance Deal Homeowners in areas with a high flood risk have been able to buy insurance with no cap on its cost as part of the deal reached between insurers and the government in 2000.
 car sales in recent months as cold weather kept buyers from dealer lots hasn’t changed Credit Suisse’s forecast of 16 million units this year.
 China is the second-largest buyer, with 125 billion yen, and Thailand third with 6 billion yen.
 Nestle halted purchases, renegotiated a contract with its supplier then resumed buying the palm oil after adjustments were made.
 The buyout firm hasn’t made a final decision or appointed banks, they said.
 TUI management and RIU Group will buy some shares, pushing the stake held by the Spanish hotel partner to 8 percent from 6 percent, the Hanover-based company said today.
 Mangold will buy some TUI stock alongside Joussen and Chief Financial Officer Horst Baier.
 It’s also expected to raise premiums by as much as 25 percent for employers and individuals who buy their own insurance, according to a 2011 estimate by Congress’ Joint Committee on Taxation.
 of China has received inquiries from potential foreign buyers for its in-development C919 model, the nation’s first large passenger plane, as it seeks to break Boeing Co.
 Licensed Goods “I spent two hours in line to buy a licensed Olympic hat, and when I got in, I was told they were out of hats,” Ekaterina Gundareva, an events organizer who came to Sochi to see the Games, said by phone yesterday.
 The New York-based firm, which started its analyst survey program in 2008, uses complex mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities.
 “At some point they may be 5 or 6 percent because the market perception of that risk is going to come down to reality, and realize that it’s not really a 10 percent risk -- it’s more like a 5 percent risk” The power-purchase deals that anchor the investments are as reliable as the buyers’ credit, said Ravi Gupta, a senior member of KKR’s infrastructure team.
 Contract Crucial KKR agreed in November to buy six solar farms in California and Arizona with Google Inc.
 Japanese investors are wary of buying overseas debt offering such low yields after concerns that the Chinese economy is slowing and the impact from US.
 “Spreads on Samurai have fallen to unattractive levels, and it will be difficult for Japanese investors to buy at the kind of rates offered by JPMorgan and GE in future” Spread ‘Unattractive’ Nakatani, who has invested in GE Capital’s debt in the past, said he didn’t buy the Norwalk, Connecticut-based company’s notes this time because the spread was “unattractive” He doesn’t invest in US.
 “Following the emerging-market shock, and possibility of spreads widening for overseas names, there appears to have been a feeling that there wasn’t a need to rush to buy GE Capital’s Samurai this time,” said Yusuke Ueda, a Tokyo-based credit analyst at Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Jefferies Group LLC reasserted its “buy” recommendation on Manchester United even as the English soccer champion’s shares hover around a 12-month low and the team struggles with its worst-ever Premier League campaign.
 You can buy things at a more favorable price because people need your capital more,” he said.
 economy is “not a rocket ship, but we are seeing good signs in the hotel business, in particular,” said Gray, who led Blackstone’s $265 billion leveraged buyout of Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc.
 “This will get retailers to spend more on security, which is good for VeriFone and Ingenico,” Luria said in an interview “These hacks will encourage retailers to buy more new chip-enabled terminals” For retailers, options include beefing up efforts to stave off phishing attacks, accelerating a move to credit cards with chips embedded, rather than magnetic strips, and encrypting data as it moves from checkout terminals to remote servers.
 It then agreed to buy Motorola Mobility for $291 billion in cash and stock, adding a brand established in the US.
 may see a 10 percent sales jump in China this year, matching its top-range forecast for industrywide growth in the nation, where consumers are buying more cars and the company plans 19 new or refreshed vehicles.
 of Japan agreed to buy a minority stake in Squse Inc, a Kyoto-based maker of robotic hands, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore stockpiles in China, the world’s biggest buyer, climbed to a record as traders increased imports to use the steel-making raw material as collateral for credit and domestic demand remained weak.
 “With inventory build being evidenced on the back of higher imports, this will act as a buffer to buyers in the coming months,” it said.
 Two days later, Sabah newspaper said Bank Asya was being investigated for buying $2 billion shortly before Dec.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC, one of the oldest private-equity firms, agreed to buy Ashland Inc’s water-technologies unit for about $18 billion to operate as a stand-alone business.
 Ashland’s net after-tax proceeds will be about $14 billion and will be used to fund a $135 billion buyback plan, replacing a program with $450 million remaining, the Covington, Kentucky-based company said in a separate statement.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Lloyds Banking Group Plc plans to boost lending to small- and medium-sized businesses by more than 1 billion pounds ($16 billion) this year and offer mortgages to more than 80,000 first-time home buyers.
 The Anglo American unit said earlier this month that it will put greater emphasis on buyers’ track records in making purchases at previous sales events known as sights.
 Investors including Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest buyout firm, Brookfield Office Properties Inc.
 and Land Securities Group Plc, the UK’s largest real estate investment trust, are looking for well-worn office buildings from the 1980s and early 1990s to buy and refurbish as rising demand and a shortage of prime space in the City lifts prices and rents.
 ‘Relentless’ Demand The prospect of higher rents is attracting buyers, especially from abroad, for prime office space in the City.
 “It appears we have a new potential buyer enter the market every week” GIC Pte of Singapore in December bought Blackstone’s 50 percent stake in London’s Broadgate office complex, most of which was constructed in the 1980s.
 The most-tweeted ad was a commercial from Allstate Corp’s Esurance unit featuring actor John Krasinski offering Twitter users a chance to win $15 million, the amount the auto insurer said it saved by buying its spot after the game concluded.
 ‘Land Grab’ Exchanges, which profit when buyers are matched with sellers, are carving up a shrinking pie.
 “An ECN is all about market structure and making markets more efficient for clients, and Bill was integral to that” NYSE and Nasdaq OMX Group Inc, scrambling to keep up with the market’s switch to electronic trading, began buying up the original ECNs.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Hines Global REIT plans to buy 25 Cabot Square in the Canary Wharf financial district from Morgan Stanley, Property Week reported late today without saying where it got the information.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc, the microblogging service that went public last year, agreed to buy 900 patents from International Business Machines Corp.
 cut its rating on the stock to underperform from buy.
 The measure has lost 08 percent this year as the Fed began pruning its stimulus-related asset buying.
 It also announced it will cut asset-buying by the same amount in February to $65 billion.
 Daimler rose 37 percent to 6553 euros after Goldman Sachs called it a preferred stock and reiterated its conviction-buy rating.
 The firm will focus on opportunities to buy and build infrastructure that services horizontal wells, which exploration companies are increasingly drilling to unearth shale oil and gas, Lewellyn said.
 EnCap Flatrock, an affiliate of buyout firm EnCap Investments LP, has committed to an initial $100 million investment in Tall Oak and may invest as much as another $400 million over time, Lewellyn said.
 “Jazztel is getting quite expensive but it could still make sense for Orange to buy it” Cable IPO A move by Orange, Spain’s third-largest wireless carrier -- behind Telefonica SA and Vodafone Group Plc -- would underscore rising demand for landline assets that are needed to offer combined broadband, TV and wireless packages.
 With net debt of 296 billion euros as of June 30 and a negative outlook from Standard & Poor’s and Fitch Ratings, Orange has refrained from major acquisitions since a $2 billion buyout of its Egyptian unit in 2012.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP, the Washington-based private-equity firm, is planning about $25 billion of debt financing for its buyout of Illinois Tool Works Inc’s industrial-packaging unit, according to a person with knowledge of the deal.
 Carlyle agreed to purchase Illinois Tool’s industrial packaging business for $32 billion, expecting to complete the buyout in the middle of this year, according to the statement.
 buyout fund it closed in November, the firm said.
 On May 18, the country will vote whether to buy 22 Saab AB Gripen jets in a purchase valued at 31 billion Swiss francs ($347 billion).
 Verizon will shift about 2,200 of the employees to nearby offices, while the remaining 3,000 can apply for different jobs, relocate elsewhere in the country or take a buyout package.
 “There’s better performance from cash and carry and we look at this positively,” the analyst, who recommends buying the shares, said today.
 said it plans to buy a quarter of the site for as much as $26 billion.
 AIG boosted its quarterly dividend by 25 percent to 125 cents a share and authorized another $1 billion in stock buybacks yesterday as it posted fourth-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates.
 Benmosche has warned employees against buying homes in the New York area as he weighed moving jobs, people familiar with the matter said last year.
 Etihad said yesterday it will decide by early March whether to buy a stake in Alitalia SpA of Italy to add to a portfolio of investments already spanning Australia to Ireland.
 jumped 83 percent after the credit-card company announced a share buyback.
 Aeon Financial jumped 83 percent to 2,537 yen after saying it will buy back as many as 12 million shares within a year for 25 billion yen.
 Market Making SecondMarket Inc, which runs a Bitcoin investment fund for accredited investors, announced it would buy Bitcoins, partly in response to the Mt.
 “Forest presented an extraordinarily unique opportunity to create a new kind of company,” Bisaro, 53, said after his Dublin-based company announced yesterday it was buying Forest, the New York-based maker of the Alzheimer’s drug Namenda and the blood-pressure pill Bystolic.
 In January, he ticked off the hurdles in an interview with Bloomberg News: Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, with its strong Israeli heritage, would resist a foreign buyer, while Mylan Inc’s leadership wanted to stay independent, he said.
 After the deal to buy Warner Chilcott was announced in May, moving the company’s headquarters to Dublin, Ireland, Bisaro and other executive received a $115 million payout in early-vested stock and retention bonuses that otherwise would have been taxed by the US.
 Federal Reserve officials said they would soon have to modify their year-old commitment to keep their benchmark interest rate near zero until unemployment falls below 65 percent, according to minutes released yesterday of their January meeting, where they also decided to press on with a second cut of $10 billion to the central bank’s bond buying.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Bank’s poison pill, staggered board and reported interest in buying Eddie Bauer, there may be too many hurdles, said FBN Securities Inc.
 A month later, Men’s Wearhouse offered to buy the smaller chain for $55 a share in a tactic known as a Pac-Man defense, where a target thwarts being taken over by instead bidding for its suitor.
 It’s held preliminary talks to buy the outdoor clothing retailer from private-equity owner Golden Gate Capital, said one of the people.
 Bank buy Men’s Wearhouse as part of its October offer.
 Bank have slipped 5 percent this week to $5340 yesterday as investors showed disappointment that the company may be opting to buy Eddie Bauer rather than to sell itself to Men’s Wearhouse.
 It’s going to come down to price and deciding which is the buyer and which is the seller, he said.
 The family has so far been unable to find a buyout partner due to concerns about Morrison’s slow sales growth and the size of the deal, said two of the people, who asked not to be named because the talks are private.
 A buyout of Morrison would exceed 7 billion pounds and require a group of funds to work together, said two of the people.
 A buyout “is a credible outcome,” Mike Dennis, an analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald, said in a note.
 “Potential buyers will likely be nervous of whether the business is fundamentally broken” Morrison trails peers in sales of online groceries, which it only began to offer on Jan.
 They argued that pooling and servicing agreements for most of the trusts required Countrywide to buy back modified loans, according to Kapnick’s ruling.
 Argentina’s central bank, which controls the currency by buying and selling dollars in the spot market daily, allowed the peso to drop 12 percent on Jan.
 This company at some stage is going to be in very good shape, just maybe not this year” The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Cencosud’s bonds due in 2023 instead of Treasuries swelled 079 percentage point since Argentina devalued the peso to 379 percentage points on Feb.
 They argued that pooling and servicing agreements for most of the trusts required Countrywide to buy back modified loans, according to Kapnick’s ruling.
 It hasn’t yet seen any buying opportunities among state-owned firms seeking to unload assets as they cut debt, he said.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Telekom AG, fresh from a string of acquisitions, plans to become the market leader in all of its central and eastern European markets by 2018 as it buys assets and upgrades networks.
 Deutsche Telekom has returned to buying assets outside its home country as Chief Executive Officer Timotheus Hoettges bets on a rebound in demand from the Baltic Sea to Crete.
 The German company agreed this week to buy out minority shareholders of its Czech unit for $11 billion.
 Bonn-based Deutsche Telekom also offered to buy an additional 10 percent stake in Hellenic Telecommunications Organization SA from Greece, people familiar with the talks said last month.
 Deutsche Telekom is adding landlines in countries including Poland and the Czech Republic through its agreement in November to buy Warsaw-based GTS Central Europe.
 “You are buying not because of a crisis here, but because there is a desire to boost competition in the economy” Geopolitical considerations send Israel’s credit risk higher than it would be otherwise, though short-term crises, such as foundering peace talks or even war, historically tend to have a short-term impact on the economy, he said.
 “We have an enormous client base at BNY Mellon, who are all buying and selling securities.
 There’s no reason why they shouldn’t buy and sell with us” The company, which had $276 trillion of assets under its custody at the end of 2013, is preparing to expand its securities business in the region after opening a unit in Tokyo in November to provide fixed-income and equities investment services for institutional clients.
 The Fed trimmed its monthly debt buying this year to $65 billion from $85 billion and has pledged to gradually reduce the purchases as the job market improves.
 bailout in 2012, posted fourth-quarter profit that beat analysts’ estimates as the company lifted its dividend and authorized $1 billion of share buybacks.
 He rates AIG the equivalent of a buy.
 The buyback announced today adds to about $400 million left under a $1 billion repurchase authorized last year.
 AIG turned to Schiphol, Netherlands-based AerCap after an earlier agreement fell apart when the would-be buyers failed to deliver funds.
 In September, the company agreed to buy Thingsoft, an online game development studio based in Seoul, South Korea, that helped develop the FIFA Online 1 title.
 The buying spree isn’t over, Mahoney said today.
 consumers buy more of the precious stones, according to De Beers, the biggest producer.
 De Beers is betting that increased sales in the world’s two largest markets will counter weakness in India, where volatility in the rupee has reduced consumers’ buying power.
 The telecommunications operator pulled out of the race to buy Vivendi SA’s stake in Morocco’s Maroc Telecom in June.
 An exit is in the cards” The 15 percent stake could later be sold to a strategic buyer, which may include Televisa, Dineen said.
 “The model involves Chinese financing with Chinese solar panels and a commitment from us” to buy them, Froneman said.
 Sibanye last year agreed to buy a majority stake in the Cooke operations of Gold One International Ltd, which is owned by Chinese consortium BCX Gold.
 Options include higher dividend payments, stock buybacks, or building factories in markets such as North America and China, where capacity is strained.
 Colak's broker required him to rectify that by borrowing (or buying) and delivering the stock, but instead there'd be a whole 'nother flurry of option writing and they'd never deliver the stock, leaving Colak, as they say, "naked short": He'd sold the stock without arranging to borrow it first2 Here is a fun statistic: Respondents sold approximately $800 million worth of call options and purchased at least $12 billion worth of common stock in over 20 issuers.
 agreed to buy rival Ceradyne Inc.
 “The operational performance of the business stands up incredibly well versus all of our direct competition,” Robertshaw said, when asked whether the company had been approached by potential buyers.
 He is advising investors to buy shares of software exporters and drugmakers.
 The initial buyers of Herbalife’s notes, due in 2019, will be Bank of America Corp, Credit Suisse Group AG, HSBC Holdings Plc and Morgan Stanley, Herbalife said Feb.
 Inland Diversified had other buyout offers, Barry Lazarus, president and chief operating officer, said in a telephone interview.
 27, federal prosecutors indicted a prominent figure among Bitcoin entrepreneurs, Charlie Shrem, for alleged money laundering linked to Silk Road, a Bitcoin-driven website allegedly used for buying drugs and other illicit goods.
 Oman agreed in 2012 to buy 12 of the jets.
 airlines move toward buying larger, more-efficient planes to replace 600 to 800 50-seat jets, Chief Executive Officer Frederico Curado has said.
 The company has said it was the victim of fraud by Autonomy’s management and employees who manipulated its finances to mislead investors and potential buyers.
 “Why would someone risk buying stocks if government bonds offer returns of 12 percent?” Brazil will raise the target rate to 12 percent by the end of 2015, according to the median forecast in a central bank survey of economists published today.
 buying No.
 “SoftBank does not need T-Mobile to achieve a Sprint turnaround” Son, who rose from scorned minority schoolboy to world’s 46th-richest person as of yesterday, became chairman of Sprint after spending $216 billion to buy control last year.
 So far, official Washington isn’t buying Son’s plan.
 The wind-farm market is becoming a buyers’ market” By connecting projects before the cut-off date, developers can choose to receive the existing subsidies or wait for the new system.
 Some currently opt for tradable green certificates, which utilities buy to meet clean-energy targets.
 The Federal Open Market Committee has twice reduced the size of the monthly asset-purchase program, cutting bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion.
 The door-to-door delivery service was upgraded to buy at Nomura, which also boosted its target price to 560 yen.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Home Habit Brewers have been suffering as consumers increasingly choose to drink at home, which is less profitable for producers, and buy cheaper brands.
 The brewer said it will hold capital expenditure at about $250 million a year and invest in structures to deliver cost savings through efficient buying of goods and services.
 SABMiller said it is also targeting consumers buying cheaper beers, with brews such as Ciucas in Romania and De Klok in the Netherlands.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Brookfield Incorporacoes SA, Brazil’s worst-performing homebuilder in the past year, surged to the highest since October as its biggest shareholder offered to buy the stock it doesn’t own and delist the company.
 Wm Morrison Supermarkets Plc jumped 49 percent after a report said bankers are putting together a financing deal to support a buyout.
 Marks & Spencer Group Plc rose 1 percent after Jefferies Group LLC recommended buying the stock.
 Jefferies raised its rating on the clothing retailer to a buy from hold, saying the company’s new Website is one of the best in the industry.
 it won’t enter buyout talks, has been looking at other acquisitions including retailer Eddie Bauer, people familiar with the matter said.
 Bank has had preliminary talks about buying Eddie Bauer from owner Golden Gate Capital, one of the people said.
 Bank buy Men’s Wearhouse as part of an unsolicited $23 billion bid in October.
 Bank also raised antitrust concerns about any merger between the two companies even though it had previously offered to buy Men’s Wearhouse.
 3 said it lowered its poison pill threshold to 10 percent, meaning Men’s Wearhouse can buy only 10 percent of Jos.
 agreed to buy Emerald Agribusiness Group Pty, gaining full control of the Australian company’s storage facilities and an export terminal in Victoria state as it seeks to expand its global grain business.
 She recommends buying the shares.
 RAG is in the process of buying stakes in small to medium-sized companies, known as the Mittelstand, Mueller said.
 The body will consider buying “half or a small majority” of individual companies, he said.
 The foundation isn’t interested in further investment in chemical companies and therefore won’t look at buying a stake in Lanxess AG, Mueller said.
 Wind Parks The foundation has been approached about buying wind parks of the insolvent clean-power developer Prokon Regenerative Energien GmbH and the body could cooperate on the project with Steag GmbH, in which Evonik still holds a minority.
 “We continue to believe that the most likely eventuality for Nestle disposing of the stake is for L’Oreal itself to acquire the stake via a conventional buyback,” said analysts at Exane BNP Paribas, adding that they believe Nestle will formally announce its intentions on the stake in early April at the meeting of shareholders.
 L’Oreal could also buy shares and take them out of the market, which its shareholders would like because it would increase the value of their existing holdings, some of the people said.
 L’Oreal may buy back about one-third of the stake held by Nestle, or almost 10 percent, said two of the people, though that amount could change depending on the price of the shares.
 Pierre Tegner, an analyst at Natixis Securities, advises investors not to buy L’Oreal shares only on speculation that Nestle will sell its stake.
 “I’m not sure L’Oreal is ready to spend 20 billion euros just to buy back shares,” said Tegner, who rates L’Oreal shares neutral and recommends buying Nestle stock.
 Every time there is a big deal, you buy the seller and you sell the buyer” Meanwhile, French pharmaceuticals producer Sanofi has said it would consider buying back some of L’Oreal’s 89 percent stake in the drugmaker if it were to become available.
 L’Oreal could use cash from a sale to buy back its shares from Nestle, two of the people said.
 Nestle CEO Paul Bulcke declined to comment in October on any interest to buy Ferrero after an article in Repubblica that the companies were in preliminary stages of talks.
 The Fed last week decided to press on with reductions in its monthly bond-buying program.
 Examples included “a significant volume of selling and buying transactions that had no operative substance and whose main aim was to obtain bank financing,” according to the company’s first annual report since the insolvency filing.
 They include previous purchases, the time of the day the customer buys goods, the frequency of purchases and even how shoppers type their names.
 The rally may extend gains in meat costs for buyers including Hormel Foods Corp.
 In January, the buyer changed course, listing the unit for sale at more than double what he paid just a year ago.
 Luxury-apartment owners in New York are listing a record amount of properties for sale, testing the upper limits of what buyers are willing to pay even as median prices remain off their peak set almost six years ago.
 The good news is that $100 million is, what -- 60 million pounds? Only 73 million Euros? So on world standards, it’s still a pretty good buy” The $88 million sale, by former Citigroup Inc.
 The transaction is still Manhattan’s most expensive residential deal and it’s become a symbol of what wealthy buyers are willing to spend for a unique property, Miller said.
 found a buyer who agreed to pay $95 million.
 Cohen, the billionaire founder of SAC Capital Advisors LP, is still seeking a buyer for his 9,000-square-foot penthouse at One Beacon Court, on the market since April.
 To justify a stratospheric price, “you just best have a product -- an apartment, a house, a co-op -- that truly has unique features so that buyers can fall in love with it,” said Paula Del Nunzio, a luxury broker with Brown Harris Stevens, whose listings include a five-bedroom condo at 15 Central Park West.
 It’s the largest available home at 15 Central Park West, where original buyers in 2007 and 2008 saw the value of their investments double on average in 2012, the year Weill and his wife sold their condo at twice their $437 million purchase price.
 The city’s real estate has come “to epitomize the so-called safe-haven market, with overseas buyers looking to escape currency, economic, political and security crises by putting equity into tangible assets” United Nations Builders seeking to capitalize on that demand include Arthur and William Lie Zeckendorf, who are completing a 43-story condo tower across from the United Nations Secretariat headquarters in Midtown.
 ‘Right Thing’ “With buyers from all over the world increasingly present in the New York market, many of whom live in residences that dwarf even the most luxurious Manhattan apartments, having the option to create a 15,000-square-foot apartment seemed like the right thing to do,” Arthur Zeckendorf said in an e-mail.
 For now, he’s in no rush to find a buyer and is enjoying panoramic views that include ice skaters in Central Park.
 Vodafone Group Plc, the second-biggest wireless operator, is interested in buying the Spanish company as it adds fixed services to its mobile offer across Europe, two people familiar with the negotiations said in the last week.
 The Fed is buying $65 billion of Treasury and mortgage debt a month after cutting the amount by $10 billion in January and again in February.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the buyout firm founded by George R.
 The private-equity firm, which has raised $2 billion for a global fund that will provide financing to distressed firms, may also consider buying a pool of bad loans from Indian banks, Kravis told reporters in Mumbai yesterday.
 KKR’s assets under management rose to $943 billion from $902 billion at the end of the third quarter as the firm raised more money, including for its eleventh North America buyout fund, its first real estate fund and a pool to invest in special situations.
 Leveraged buyouts will be allowed for “specialized entities” to acquire stressed companies, the regulator said.
 wireless carrier, meaning it can’t offer to buy a stake of 30 percent or more in Vodafone for the following six months, according to UK.
 Societe Generale SA upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, saying Europe’s largest oilfield-services provider may begin to reduce costs as it introduces tighter controls on spending.
 The nice thing about a convertible-financed share repurchase is the efficient linkage of the convertible and the share repurchase (which you buy instantly and efficiently from the hedge funds who buy the convertible).
 It's just a terrible capital markets joke1 Why would you sell stock to buy back stock? One, it's pointless -- you end up where you began.
 And two, there will be slippage: You'll sell stock at a discount, and then buy it back at a premium.
 (KO) agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 Coca-Cola is buying the 167 million newly issued shares for about $7498 apiece, the companies said yesterday in a statement.
 In effect, Coke is buying shares from Green Mountain shareholders, with Green Mountain standing between them and collecting an enormously negative spread.
 Coke bought Green Mountain shares at $7498, a discount to yesterday's price,2 and Green Mountain will use the proceeds to buy shares from the public at, I think it's safe to say, a huge premium to yesterday's price.
 So Green Mountain is selling at $75 to finance buying at $110.
 It makes sense for Coke to buy a stake in Green Mountain: it "fits into Coca-Cola’s preferred strategy of taking equity stakes in promising new brands and technologies, such as Zico coconut water and Honest Tea, and helping incubate them" And it makes sense for Coke to pay more or less yesterday's price: Today's run-up is due mostly to the fact that Coke is giving Green Mountain its seal of approval.
 And it's in buyback mode anyway, making a big new equity issuance for more money than is really required is sort of awkward to explain to (otherwise ecstatic) shareholders.
 Since it's benefiting from the broader transaction, it makes sense for it to take a big loss on buying Coke's shares for it4 Every so often, the share-financed share repurchase can make sense.
 to do to improve its EPS? Capital Markets: What about increasing revenues or cutting costs? Banking: *puzzled silence* Capital Markets: What about a stock buyback? Banking: They don't have any money.
 Capital Markets: What about a convertible financed stock buyback? Banking: Their covenants won't let them do any debt.
 Capital Markets: What about a stock-financed stock buyback? Banking: Sounds great, let's fly out there tomorrow and pitch it to them.
 4 It helps that the "loss" from selling shares at $75 and buying them at $100+ is an economic loss but not an accounting one.
 “Apart from meeting friends and buying familiar Indian foods at reasonable prices, the reason we go to Little India on Sundays is to transfer money,” Veera Reddy, a 34-year-old construction worker from the Indian state of Andhra Pradesh, said as he sent funds home at the Westlite kiosk.
 The proposed debt would entice buyers if the Canadian government provides “explicit support” and there’s a “meaningful” spread over other securities, Jonathan Lemco, senior sovereign-debt analyst at Vanguard Group Inc, the biggest US.
 The board would provide “financial certification” to aboriginal groups interested in raising debt to buy equity in a resource project, according to a Sept.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- CVC Capital Partners Ltd, Carlyle Group LP and PAI Partners SAS are among buyout firms considering offers for a majority stake in Spanish food group Deoleo SA, according to people familiar with the matter.
 The buyout firms are looking into bids about 50 percent below Deoleo’s share price of 475 euro cents, and any deal would depend on refinancing the company’s debt, said the people, asking not to be named because negotiations are private.
 Oi SA rallied after Folha de SPaulo reported that a group of 12 banks agreed to raise as much as 8 billion reais to buy a stake in the company that will result from the merger of the phone carrier and parent Portugal Telecom SGPS SA.
 recommended buying the stock.
 “Any pullback at the moment might be used as a buying opportunity.
 will buy oil and gas assets in China’s Bohai Bay from Anadarko Petroleum Corp.
 G Asset also proposed buying 51 percent of Barnes & Noble’s Nook e-book division at $5 a share as an alternative deal, according to a statement yesterday from the investment firm.
 A single call option contract entitles an investor to buy 100 shares of a company’s stock at a set price in the future.
 Similarly, option contracts that entitle the holder to buy shares at or below the market price at the time are more expensive than out of the money options, the term for those whose exercise price is well above the current trading price.
 “He’s got no money,” Tinker, who has a buy rating on Barnes & Noble shares, said in a phone interview.
 Even Carl Icahn has to buy a piece of Apple before he can get breakfast or dinner with Tim Cook” Meanwhile, the Nook business continues to struggle.
 David Jones Chairman Peter Mason didn’t disclose Myer’s approach when it occurred last October and two directors were given approval to buy shares one day after the offer was made.
 The brokerage downgraded the stock to hold from buy after the shares rose yesterday by the 10 percent daily limit in Shanghai and jumped 94 percent in Hong Kong.
 That optimism was misplaced because Sinopec will probably just use the proceeds to buy assets from its parent, Jefferies said.
 Vitol Group, the biggest independent oil trader, isn’t interested in buying a stake in Sinopec’s unit, Chief Executive Officer Ian Taylor told reporters in Melbourne today.
 Sinopec will probably use the funds to buy assets from its parent at “the highest prices acceptable to minority shareholders,” Yu wrote.
 There are 27 buy ratings by analysts on the Hong Kong-listed shares, four holds and three sells, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Shanghai shares have 11 buy ratings and one sell.
 Oerlikon agreed to buy the division, which makes coatings for machinery and airplane engines in a deal valued at 1 billion Swiss francs ($11 billion) on Jan.
 19 that it authorized the repurchase of as much as $25 billion in shares, the company’s biggest buyback plan since 2006.
 Southwest recently agreed to buy additional flying rights at both LaGuardia and Reagan that were sold by American to win approval from US.
 The IFT doesn’t have any contracts that mention a Telmex option to buy control of Dish, Contreras said.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, will close down two funds targeting individual investors in a setback to private-equity firms’ attempts to attract money from individuals and eventually the $4 trillion market for 401(k) retirement plans.
 “The outlook was slightly on the soft side,” Erik Hultgard, an analyst with Nordea who recommends buying AstraZeneca shares, said by phone.
 The company proposed a second interim dividend of $190, leaving the full-year payout unchanged from a year ago at $280 and decided not to resume buying back shares.
 AstraZeneca suspended its $45 billion stock buyback program for 2012 on Soriot’s first day on the job so the company could pursue licensing and acquisition deals.
 The stock, which fell 10 percent last year along with the REIT index amid concerns over rising interest rates, has four buys, five holds and no sells among analysts who research the firm.
 “I’ve got one regret -- that we didn’t buy more,” Sonshine said from behind navy-blue framed glasses.
 Huang rates the shares a buy.
 leveraged buyout firm TPG Capital, said on Feb.
 Fund Outflows The Federal Reserve last month pressed ahead with a plan to taper its monetary policy, cutting the monthly bond buying by $10 million to $65 million a month.
 from Astra Oil Trading NV without knowledge of a put option that in 2012 forced the company to buy the remaining stake as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 The offer came as it sought permission to buy NBC Universal, which it won in early 2011, adding to its stable a television network, movie studio and cable channels such as CNBC, MSNBC and USA Network.
 agreed to buy it for $15 billion.
 Fed Stimulus The Federal Open Market Committee, which meets March 18-19, has cut monthly bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion in December.
 Energy XXI agreed to buy the company to become the largest public independent producer on the Gulf of Mexico shelf.
 Credit Suisse analyst Dan Oppenheim cut both stocks’ ratings to neutral from outperform, citing continued weakness in demand and lower buyer traffic.
 Garofalo, 48, a former chief financial officer at Canadian gold producer Agnico Eagle Mines Ltd, took up his current post in July 2010, more than a year after HudBay abandoned an agreement to buy Canadian competitor Lundin Mining Corp.
 The company also acquired the Constancia copper project in Peru by buying Norsemont Mining Inc.
 It will only consider buying assets in Canada, the US, Mexico, Chile and Peru, he said.
 An offer could value Lorillard at more than $20 billion, though it’s unclear if Reynolds plans to buy the entire company, according to the paper.
 “Though there has been some speculation on BAT buying out Reynolds, helping Reynolds to buy Lorillard would make a lot more sense from a returns perspective,” James Bushnell, an analyst at Exane BNP Paribas in London, wrote in a March 4 note to clients.
 Japan Tobacco, which owns the Camel and Winston brands outside of the US, may seek to buy those brands from Reynolds, allowing Reynolds to acquire Lorillard and its Newport brand, David Hayes, a London-based analyst at Nomura, wrote in a March 4 report.
 “We’re not convinced of the logic of Reynolds acquiring Lorillard, we’re not convinced of the logic of BAT acquiring Reynolds, and we’re certainly not convinced that Japan Tobacco would step in and buy brands that were sold off by Reynolds” Tobacco companies account for a large portion of US.
 France’s second-largest lender is issuing undated securities to yield 675 percent that it can buy back in April 2021, according to the person, who asked not to be identified because they’re not authorized to speak about it.
 stock market, where more than 50 electronic venues compete to match buyers with sellers.
 cable company, had offered to buy Time Warner Cable -- the No.
 Charter, based in Stamford, Connecticut, is considering buying some of the 3 million subscribers Comcast plans to sell following the acquisition, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 says investors should consider buying derivatives protecting bonds of companies focused on Japan’s economy from losses as the nation’s finances worsen.
 “That will definitely change the whole financial market environment” A decline in the competitiveness of Japanese products and services is partly to blame for worsening data, which can’t be fully explained by rising import costs as the yen weakens, said Uomoto, who hasn’t advocated buying default protection for the past 18 months.
 China Demand Marubeni, one of Japan’s largest trading companies, is sensitive to a decline in Chinese demand for commodities such as coal and copper, according to Uomoto, who is advising investors buy default swaps for it and rival Itochu Corp.
 Uomoto recommends buying default protection on Kintetsu, an Osaka-based railway, because of Japan’s shrinking population and tough competition between local department stores, which the company operates.
 Publicly traded companies can also issue the stock to pay for acquisitions and buy back shares, the agency said.
 Distributors have 35 gigawatt less than needed, forcing them to buy energy at spot market prices to meet their responsibilities and then resell it at government-capped prices to consumers.
 Mengniu is winning back customers through increased foreign partnerships such as with France’s Danone, after scandals including melamine-tainted milk from the company led buyers to shun Chinese food products.
 Mengniu agreed to buy about 27 percent of Modern Dairy in May for HK$318 billion ($410 million), giving it preferential purchase rights to Modern Dairy’s milk supply.
 “These helped consumer confidence in Mengniu” Yan is one of 11 analysts tracked by Bloomberg who recommend holding the stock, while 17 analysts suggest buying and two suggest selling.
 Iron ore fell into a bear market this month on speculation that slowing economic growth and credit concerns in China, the biggest buyer, may curb the expansion in demand just as global supply increases.
 Rio Tinto paid $38 billion to buy aluminum producer Alcan Inc.
 The announcement caused Volkswagen’s stock to jump as short sellers raced to buy shares to repay borrowed stock in bets that VW would fall.
 to Switzerland, Credit Suisse obfuscated a decline in asset inflows at its private-banking unit, possibly misleading buyers of the bank’s stock, the Senate panel said.
 “The long-term fundamentals remain intact on the product-tanker story” Private-equity firms contributed to the rush to buy product tankers as they invested the most since at least 2008 in shipping, according to Marine Money, an industry newsletter.
 The company, which intended to use the proceeds to buy 10 ships, planned to price the shares March 11.
 Ross and partners also ventured into dry-bulk commodities shipping, raising $100 million to buy as many as eight ships hauling coal, iron ore and grains through a company called Nautical Bulk Holdings Ltd, he said in November.
 A member of the French business and political elite, Richard made his personal fortune by participating in a leveraged buyout of Nexity SA, the property developer created from the real-estate assets of Generale des Eaux.
 Those who buy three for use as demos get two $250 certificates, bringing the incentive total to as much as $5,000, the person said.
 An offer could value Lorillard at more than $20 billion, though it’s unclear if Reynolds plans to buy the entire company, according to the paper.
 “Though there has been some speculation on BAT buying out Reynolds, helping Reynolds to buy Lorillard would make a lot more sense from a returns perspective,” James Bushnell, an analyst at Exane BNP Paribas in London, wrote in a March 4 note to clients.
 Japan Tobacco, which owns the Camel and Winston brands outside of the US, may seek to buy those brands from Reynolds, allowing Reynolds to acquire Lorillard and its Newport brand, David Hayes, a London-based analyst at Nomura, wrote in a March 4 report.
 “We’re not convinced of the logic of Reynolds acquiring Lorillard, we’re not convinced of the logic of BAT acquiring Reynolds, and we’re certainly not convinced that Japan Tobacco would step in and buy brands that were sold off by Reynolds” Tobacco companies account for a large portion of US.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- Cemex SAB, the largest cement maker in the Americas, sold bonds in dollars and euros today as it looks to buy back securities due between 2017 and 2020.
 Cemex plans to use the proceeds of the euro notes to buy back 130 million euros of 9625 percent bonds due 2017 and 115 million euros of 8875 percent notes due 2017, according to a company statement.
 Of 16 analysts tracking American, 12 rate the stock as a buy, including McAdoo.
 Michael Derchin, a CRT Capital Group LLC analyst in Stamford, Connecticut, who recommends the shares as a buy, questioned whether American could find $1 billion in additional earnings power, a figure he said “seems very high” “I don’t think there would be any question American’s was the most successful airline bankruptcy,” Derchin said in an interview.
 when KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners took it private in 2007 in the largest leveraged buyout ever, is seeking to restructure $456 billion of debt before month-end, when auditors may raise doubts about its ability to remain a going concern.
 Big Profits Criminals buying 200 cases of cigarettes in North Carolina or South Carolina to sell illegally in New York can clear as much as $500,000, Cohen said.
 That includes gangs stealing identities to buy cigarettes in large quantities using fake credit cards, she said.
 Its main investor, Fondazione Monte Paschi, forced the company to delay the stock offering until May from January as it tries to find a buyer for its stake in the bank and strengthen its own finances.
 At the time ofpurchase, it agreed to buy a third-generation operating licenseand frequencies from Takilant for $30 million, as well as theGibraltar-based company’s 26 percent stake in Ucell, as a“prerequisite” for entering the market, according toTeliaSonera’s website.
 Falling demand for hardware and weak sales in growthmarkets have dragged down revenue for the last seven quarters,prompting Rometty to sell assets, fire and furlough workers, buyback shares and cut taxes to help meet profit goals.
 (992) After buying cloud provider SoftLayer Technologies Inclast year for $2 billion, IBM is integrating existing hardwareand data analytics with its services.
 (SWY) bonds are signalingthe grocer’s borrowing costs will rise about 33 percent to fundits $9 billion buyout by Cerberus Capital Management LP as thenew owner piles on debt to merge the company with Albertsons.
 Cerberus, which pulled down Albertsons’ ratings frominvestment grade to a single B with its 2006 buyout, is poisedto do the same to Safeway, the 2031 bond yields indicate.
 Kroger, Wal-Mart The $40-a-share Cerberus offer to buy Safeway and its 1,335US.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- The Swedish billionaire who took control of the world’s fourth-largest oil trader last week buying out his Russian co-founder may soon look for a new partner.
 tried and failed to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities trading business before a $35 billion sale was announced March 19 to Mercuria Energy Group Ltd.
 A sovereign wealth fund or private equity firm are the most probable candidates to buy a stake, said Craig Pirrong, a finance professor at the University of Houston.
 Those talks were put on hold when Mercuria won the right to exclusive negotiations to buy the JPMorgan business, one person said.
 Lloyds will also offer to buy back the bonds, known as enhanced capital notes, from individual investors who will be given the opportunity to retain them and continue to receive coupon payments.
 lowered its recommendation on the maker of drug-delivery systems by two grades to sell from buy.
 Exane BNP Paribas cut its recommendation on the maker of equipment for semiconductors to neutral from outperform, meaning investors should no longer buy the shares.
 The new notes are graded B2 by Moody’s Investors Service, which today changed its outlook on KB Home to “positive” from “stable” KB Home, which mostly focuses on first-time home buyers, issued the debt as data showed purchases of previously-owned homes in the US.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 DBS agreed to buy Societe Generale SA’s Asian private banking business this week in a $220 million deal that will boost its high-net-worth assets under management by more than 20 percent, according to a March 17 statement.
Samena Capital, an investment firm managing about $700 million, is in talks to buy as much as 50 percent of RAK Ceramics, the world’s biggest maker of ceramic tiles, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Samena is in discussions with the ruling family of Ras Al Khaimah to buy a 25 percent to 50 percent stake, the people said, asking not to be identified as the talks are private.
 said March 2 the company and its partners will pay $16 billion in cash and assumed debt to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India, while Emirates Telecommunications Corp.
 In the memo lines of the checks, Mellon wrote notations such as “antique Charleston table” and “bookcase,” even though the funds weren’t going to buy furniture.
 “Because of flaws in construction, we have caused trouble for our business partner and the homebuyers,” Tokyo-based Kajima said in an e-mailed statement.
 Mitsubishi Estate began investigating the construction after one of the buyers told the developer that there were some postings on the Internet about the defects on Dec.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Valero Energy Corp, the world’s largest independent refiner, has agreed to buy a 110 million-gallon-a-year ethanol plant in Mount Vernon, Indiana, from Aventine Renewable Energy Holdings Inc.
 Blimp manufacturers need mining contracts to creep back to life, 77 years after the Hindenburg airship burned and crashed in New Jersey, ending most buyer interest for decades.
 Calbert has been replaced by Nathaniel Taylor, a partner at the New York-based buyout firm, spokeswoman Kristi Huller said today in a telephone interview.
 Calbert, a member of the board of retailer Dollar General Corp, led KKR’s $73 billion leveraged buyout of that company in July 2007.
 Calbert was also involved in the firm’s buyouts of Toys “R” Us Inc, which is struggling under its debt load, Pets at Home Ltd, US Foods and Academy Sports & Outdoors, according to the biography.
 Taylor’s most recent deal was the leveraged buyout valued at more than $1 billion of National Vision Inc, the fourth-largest eyeglass retailer in the US.
 KKR agreed in February to purchase the Lawrenceville, Georgia-based company from buyout firm Berkshire Partners LLC, and the transaction is expected to close this month.
 Buying Opportunity “The yen tends to be bought on risk aversion and that would make you hesitate to buy into Japanese shares,” said Yusuke Kuwayama, a portfolio manager at Tokio Marine & Nichido Fire Insurance Co.
 History shows many of these geopolitical events lead to good buying opportunities” after they stabilize.
 Ciech SA climbed in Warsaw after billionaire Jan Kulczyk offered to buy Poland’s largest maker of soda for glass production.
 Carlyle agreed to buy a 55 percent stake in the company in June 2011.
 That’s defined as what an informed buyer would pay for 100 percent of a business.
 Burger King has been overhauling its management team since its return to public markets in 2012, following a buyout by 3G Capital Inc.
 Asset managers are buying frontier markets as they seek to mitigate risk by investing in securities that don’t move in lockstep with global stocks, according to David Wickham, a senior product specialist at HSBC Global Asset Management, which oversees $4278 billion in assets.
 Kroger had made an approach to Safeway recently about buying parts of the company, people with knowledge of the situation said this week.
 Kroger had also approached Cerberus about buying some of Safeway’s stores after a Cerberus deal, one of the people said.
 The buyer, meanwhile, would owe $400 million if the deal falls apart.
 Berkshire expanded last year by buying Nevada’s largest energy utility and half of ketchup maker HJ Heinz Co.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Transaction Capital Ltd, which finances minibus taxis used by millions of commuters in South African townships, is seeking a bank loan so it can extend credit to plumbers and gardeners to buy pickup trucks.
 “If you want that kind of volume, you’ve got to give it to Qualcomm,” McKechnie, who has a buy rating on the stock, said.
 The products that it buys and then sells at a subsidized price will mostly be from that category though, the spokeswoman said.
 When they started Arista, executives took a more open approach to technology that’s now becoming more popular among buyers of networking gear.
 Rather than meld software and hardware into proprietary systems, Arista built a more modular system that can be more easily improved without the need to buy new machines and works with software from technology firms other than Arista.
 slumped 93 percent after agreeing to buy eAccess Ltd.
 Asia’s biggest Internet company slid amid concern the sector’s rally has gone too far and that buyers are overpaying for acquisitions.
 Spain’s largest phone company is marketing 1 billion euros of notes it can buy back after 10 years and 750 million euros of securities callable after six years.
 The French state and Dongfeng Motor Corp, which have agreed to buy 14 percent stakes apiece in Europe’s second-largest automaker, will also each have two seats.
 “It’s a step in the right direction because it shows the family is losing its grip on the business gradually,” said Erich Hauser, a London-based analyst at International Strategy & Investment Group who recommends buying the shares.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- Gulf Capital, the Abu Dhabi-based buyout company, said the initial public offering of its Gulf Marine unit implied gross gains of more than $600 million and it will sell its remaining shares when a lock-up period ends.
 regulatory approval to use its wireless spectrum by 2015 and may buy more airwaves, a member of a special committee of the company’s board told a bankruptcy judge.
 Ergen had previously offered to buy some of the company’s airwaves for $22 billion, only to drop the offer amid a dispute with Falcone, whose Harbinger Capital Partners LLC controls LightSquared.
 GameStop’s 33 million-member loyalty program will allow it to fend off competition, while flexible lease terms for its stores and aggressive stock buyback programs will help lift the shares, according to Matthew DiFilippo and Nicholas Westrick of Stewart Capital.
 GameStop’s stock repurchases, debt buybacks and dividend payments have totaled more than $21 billion since 2010, according to the company.
 The ratio of outstanding puts giving the right to sell GameStop shares versus calls to buy has jumped 36 percent this year to 113-to-1 on March 24, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “Emerging-market investors buy Korean paper because there are few safe assets to buy other than Korean paper,” said Whang.
 “Developed market investors buy because Korean paper is cheaper than other securities with similar credit ratings” Dollar bonds of Chinese real-estate developers slumped after government officials familiar with the matter said Zhejiang Xingrun Real Estate Co.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Of the 12 million people who abuse the medicines each year, two-thirds obtained the pills after about six months of use through prescriptions from one or more physicians or by buying them from friends, family or drug dealers, according to a study today in JAMA Internal Medicine.
 Milan-based UniCredit’s Reg S offering limits note sales to buyers based outside of the US.
 “Asia is of growing importance for our funding needs as there’s liquidity available and investors seeking return” Minerva is offering a rebate for private banks buying into its deal, with investments of more than $5 million receiving a discount of 50 cents for every $100 of notes purchased.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Never before have Nestle SA bulls paid as much as they are now for options, convinced the food company will buy back shares and boost dividends after it sold a portion of its stake in L’Oreal SA.
 “Buybacks and an improved dividend are on investors’ minds,” said Manish Singh, who helps oversee $2 billion as head of investments at Crossbridge Capital LLP in London, adding that he plans to buy more of the company’s shares.
 “The outlook for a continuation of dividend growth and share buybacks support the bullishness we’re seeing,” Konstantin Giantiroglou, head of investment advisory at Neue Aargauer Bank in Brugg, Switzerland, said in an interview on Feb.
 Craig Sterling, managing director and global head of equity research at EVA Dimensions LLC in New York, advises clients not to buy shares in Nestle, citing its high valuation.
 You need to pick your spots and decide when you want to buy it, and it’s not a compelling valuation.
 Purchasing gold bars is a common way to hide income in Korea, where a shadow economy of unreported buying and selling accounts for a quarter of gross domestic product.
 He also has six utilities in the Los Angeles area eager to buy the desert water.
 The New York-based buyout firm explored a sale of the company before opting instead for an initial public offering, people with knowledge of the matter said in November.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- MModal Inc, acquired less than two years ago by JPMorgan Chase & Co’s investment arm, sought bankruptcy protection to cut debt taken on in the leveraged buyout as hospitals and doctors shift away from its medical-transcription services.
 18 interest payment on $250 million in 1075 percent bonds due in August 2020, as it negotiated with creditors to cut the debt left over from the buyout.
 He rates the shares outperform, the equivalent of buy.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- Samsung SDI Co, a supplier of batteries to Apple Inc, agreed to buy Cheil Industries Inc.
 “In the long run it’s a good buy for SDI because the merger will create synergies for both in areas such as cars and OLEDs,” Kim Chang Jin, a Seoul-based analyst at NH Investment & Securities said by phone today.
 Kroton offered in April 2013 to buy Anhanguera in an all-stock deal valued at 5 billion reais ($21 billion) that would form the world’s biggest education company by market value.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Suntory Holdings Ltd, which agreed to buy bourbon maker Beam Inc.
 Compuware has “no active buyers interested in the company,” according to Lisa Elkin, a spokeswoman.
 Elliott Pressure Elliott offered to buy the company early last year for $11 a share, valuing the company at about $23 billion, and advocated for it to combine with BMC, which was also put on the block after receiving pressure from Elliott, Paul Singer’s New York-based hedge fund.
 Track Record His “track record is quite good with regards to his performance,” said Sascha Gommel, a Frankfurt-based analyst at Commerzbank AG who recommends buying the shares.
 7 that senior currency dealers at banks told BOE officials at an April 2012 meeting that they discussed positions ahead of key benchmarks and matched buyers and sellers ahead of the fix to avoid trading then.
 The carrier, Japan’s biggest, will buy a combination of Airbus single-aisle A320neo planes and Boeing 777X, the person said, declining to be identified as the information isn’t public yet.
 in February 2013 to start a website for investors still interested in buying and holding stocks and who are in need of advice: households.
 “I saw that, while the trading infrastructure is really developed -- you can go to all of these online brokerages and buy and sell stocks -- there’s no equivalent knowledge infrastructure for individual investors,” the 37-year-old said.
 No Frills That may not be much, especially now that individuals buy and sell about 90 percent of their stocks through discount online brokerages.
 And because buy-and-hold asset managers such as Nippon Life Insurance Co.
 Swartz, who recommends buying Herbalife shares, said the probe may take six to 12 months to be completed and doesn’t change his views on the company.
 The disputed figure measures a firm’s ability to absorb losses, and discrepancies can lead the Fed to reject plans for higher dividends and stock buybacks.
 The first round of the Fed’s annual stress test measures how well banks can weather economic turmoil, before the regulator signals in a second stage whether firms can proceed with proposed dividends and buybacks.
 The lender, which ranks as the nation’s second-largest bank, may have requested a buyback over the next year and a dividend increase for the next two years that total $10 billion, Keith Horowitz, an analyst at Citigroup, said in a note to investors yesterday.
 Next week, the banks also must show what capital levels would look like after taking into account their plans for acquisitions, higher dividends and stock buybacks.
 The firm tried to buy Anaren Inc, an electronics manufacturer, in April 2013.
 “It’s a significant issue for major North American traders,” said Andrew Russell, a New York-based analyst for Macquarie Group who recommends buying ADM and Bunge shares.
 “When China needs corn imports, they will ramp up the approval process” White Plains, New York-based Bunge isn’t buying the Syngenta GMO corn, an insect-repelling variety called Agrisure Viptera, or another modified variety from the Swiss company called Agrisure Duracade.
 “It is very difficult to segregate crops that some nations won’t buy” Political considerations also weigh heavily on crop approvals.
 Even if a GMO passes a risk analysis, a government may consider trade and bilateral relations before agreeing to buy new varieties for import, Peng Yufa, chief scientist for China’s committee on safety of biotechnology, said March 7.
 The semiconductor device maker was boosted to buy from neutral by Mizuho, with a 12-month price target of 5,400 yen.
 The virtual cards would have let consumers buy goods from online retail websites on credit.
 Banks have been buying or retaining home loans because it’s lucrative to do so with the Federal Reserve holding funding costs near zero, and because demand for other lending remains limited.
 mortgage rates for 30-year loans rose to a two-month high, increasing borrowing costs for homebuyers as the market’s recovery showed signs of weakening.
 kept would-be buyers away.
 “Most people were expecting stronger pickup in housing this year that would lift the economy into a stronger growth pattern, and that isn’t happening” Contracts to buy previously owned homes fell for an eighth straight month in February, the Realtors group said today.
 “I was trying to buy the very best work,” Sender said in a 2011 interview with Bloomberg News.
 “It was not possible to afford the very best Warhols but you could buy a masterpiece by Richard Prince for $100,000 or $150,000” Todd Levin, director of New York-based Levin Art Group, said he helped Sender assemble the bulk of the collection from 1998 to 2008.
 The shares have 14 buy recommendations, three holds and two sells among equity analysts surveyed by Bloomberg, giving it the highest average rating of 35 companies on Mexico’s benchmark IPC index after tortilla maker Gruma SAB.
 “At the start of any strategy shift, there will be difficulties,” Ana Cecilia Gonzalez, an analyst at Monex Casa de Bolsa SA with a buy recommendation, said from Mexico City.
 “I think that they can” He rates the shares buy.
 “This type of relationship is customary in partial IPOs and would be particularly important for EBay as currently, outside of PayPal, there does not exist a global payment processing solution competent enough to service EBay’s users” Before EBay, Icahn had targeted Apple Inc, pressuring the iPhone maker and CEO Tim Cook to buy back $50 billion worth of stock.
 Krones AG climbed the most in almost a year after UBS AG recommended buying the world’s largest maker of filling and packaging machines’ shares.
 Commerzbank cut the stock to hold from buy, saying investors should take profit amid limited upside.
 UBS raised the shares to buy from neutral, citing the stock’s losses relative to the benchmarks.
 The company also is looking to buy brands to bolster its consumer health business in the categories of vitamins and supplements, cold and allergy, and pain relievers.
 The company agreed to buy AZ Electronic Materials SA, a specialty chemicals supplier to the electronics industry, for 16 billion pounds.
 The Class A shares will be renamed “GOOGL” Traders can begin buying and selling in advance of the new classes being issued in a process known as when-issued trading starting March 27, the dividend’s record date.
 Better Drugs That may motivate Merck to buy Endocyte, whose market capitalization is less than $1 billion, to get its hands on future drugs, particularly if more studies prove the technology’s capabilities, said Roth Capital’s Hazlett.
 Possible buyers include AstraZeneca or Roche, he said.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA rallied 12 percent to 961 reais after announcing a plan to buy back shares.
 recommended buying the stock.
 After selling deposits to rid itself of that distinction last year, MetLife has avoided stock buybacks because it can’t be certain whether the Fed will label it a systemically important firm, and what rules might be imposed, Kandarian wrote today in a letter to shareholders.
 It last authorized a buyback in 2008.
 The agreement with Travelport, which is owned by buyout firm Blackstone Group LP and also works with EasyJet and Air-France-KLM Group discount unit Transavia, does not preclude deals with other global distribution providers such as Amadeus IT Holding SA and Sabre Inc, Jacobs said.
 5 it would buy a 10 percent stake and work with Keurig to introduce a system for producing single-serve cold drinks.
 “The Coca-Cola deal makes Keurig a much bigger, longer-term growth opportunity,” Van Winkle, who has a buy rating on the stock, said in a phone interview on March 27.
 Keurig has been introducing new machines and increasing advertising to get consumers to continue buying K-Cup packs amid more competition as grocery stores including Whole Foods Market Inc.
 “It would be enough for Gazprom to buy gas from independent producers, which supply gas to all consumer categories” at prices that give similar margins to exports based on a producer’s domestic market share.
 In January 2013, he spent $136 million to buy 332,048 shares, and in September 2012, he bought 24 million shares while ESL sold 24 million shares.
 Free cash is money that can be used to invest in the business, reward shareholders with dividends and buy-backs, or pay down debt.
 In 2010 he teamed with billionaire James Packer to buy almost 20 percent of Ten Network Holdings Ltd, Australia’s third-largest commercial broadcaster.
 Shareholders Air New Zealand Ltd, Singapore Airlines Ltd, and Etihad Airways PJSC have supported Borghetti’s ambitions with cash, buying into a stock sale that will reduce Virgin’s net debt by about A$350 million, according to a company presentation.
 Smith & Nephew Plc rose 24 percent after Investec Plc recommended buying the shares.
 Investec raised its rating on the medical-device maker to buy from add, saying that breaking it up could create value.
 Insurers also sank on March 19 after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 interest rates could rise as soon as six months after the Fed ends its bond-buying program.
 “WWE would be very attractive to many different types of buyers.
 For advertisers, “it’s a great target for young males” WWE’s library of characters, story lines and hours of footage can’t be easily replicated, which is why it could lure buyers, said Routh of National Alliance.
 Toys, Games In addition to WWE’s TV shows, any buyer would have to manage its wrestler-themed products such as video games and toys as well as its more than 300 annual live events.
 The Chancellor of the Exchequer yesterday scrapped rules requiring retirees to buy insurers’ annuities with their pension funds, making it more likely people will access their savings as a lump sum instead.
 About three-quarters of retirees buy an annuity, according to government figures cited by Morgan Stanley.
 It was hard to shop around” Jon Hocking, an insurance analyst at Morgan Stanley in London, yesterday forecast that the number of Britons buying an annuity would “drop materially” and that sales would slow as potential buyers wait and consider their options.
 Valet Parking Since agreeing to buy Stansted for 15 billion pounds in January 2013, MAG has embarked on a program of upgrades to the 23-year-old terminal building designed by UK.
 In court, Viacom had argued that YouTube used unauthorized copyrighted material to draw visitors to the website and make it more attractive to potential buyers.
 Google said in a filing that Viacom had also been interested in buying the site.
 Grant Prideco National Oilwell Varco’s largest deal was buying Grant Prideco Inc.
 The company, which has 25 buy ratings from analysts, 10 holds and one sell, makes oil-field gear ranging from blowout prevention equipment for offshore wells to complete land rigs.
 Investment-grade companies will probably become less- creditworthy this year as they boost borrowings used for stock buybacks and acquisitions, the Bank of America analysts wrote.
 Fed Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher, a former managing partner of a fund that bought distressed debt, said in a January speech that he’d “have to hire Sherlock Holmes to find a single distressed company priced attractively enough to buy” “Things seem somewhat calm, but that’s part of the difficulty with this job is trying to predict what might happen,” said Sabur Moini, a high-yield money manager at Payden & Rygel in Los Angeles.
 Issuance Accelerates Real-money investors include mutual funds and insurers, in contrast to so-called fast-money buyers such as hedge funds.
 have abandoned talks to buy mobile operator Warid Telecom, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Amsterdam-based VimpelCom and Pakistan Telecommunication, part-owned by Abu Dhabi-based Emirates Telecommunications Corp, or Etisalat, held talks to buy the business as they sought to consolidate their existing operations in the south-Asian country, the people said.
 are buying the Marine Corps model.
 “They just buy less” The higher costs may spur a switch to chicken.
 12 that it had agreed to buy Amcol for $41 a share, or about $16 billion including net debt.
 The company currently buys fuel-cell stacks from Ballard, and plans to source the components from a second supplier and also begin making its own this year.
 agreed last month to buy more than 1,700 of Plug’s forklift systems for six North American distribution centers.
 “Consumers who buy luxury goods in Asia are very different from Europe,” the executive said.
 The investment floor is intended to limit holders to professional buyers, who typically have analysts reviewing credit risk, rather than individuals, said Haines, who teaches municipal finance at the Maurer School of Law at Indiana University in Bloomington.
 Investors are buying junk-rated munis for their higher yields as a growing US.
 KME buys 80 percent of its cathodes, a form of refined metal, on an annual basis and purchases the rest on the spot market.
 Caesars, bought for $307 billion in a 2008 leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital LP, has struggled since then to reduce its debt load as Americans cut back their gambling spending.
 The company this month sold four casinos to an affiliate for $22 billion in a maneuver that could lead to a restructuring or debt buyback at its Caesars Entertainment Operating Co.
 “There is more than one target that is interesting where we believe that putting the two companies together will create a nice value to Frutarom shareholders” Shares of the Haifa, Israel-based company, have more than tripled from their three-year low of 2698 shekels in September 2011 and Beni Dekel, analyst at Tel Aviv-based Union Bank of Israel, expects them to rise another 14 percent this year as the company continues its buying spree.
 “Frutarom can be expected to buy a significant company for hundreds of millions of dollars soon,” Union Bank’s Dekel said.
 He last month raised Frutarom’s rating to buy from market perform with a price estimate of 104 shekels.
 If you’re not comfortable being the most-noticed thing on the street, buy a Yamaha.
 surged in Istanbul trading after a private-equity group led by EMF Capital Partners agreed to buy the general insurer.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Federal Open Market Committee will further scale back its bond-buying program when its meeting concludes tomorrow, reducing purchases by $10 billion to $55 billion, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg on March 14-17.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Societe Generale, France’s second-largest bank by market value, agreed to increase its controlling stake in Moscow-based OAO Rosbank last year by buying VTB’s 10 percent stake.
 Cemex SAB, the largest cement maker in the Americas, is selling 300 million euros of seven-year notes that the Monterrey, Mexico-based company can buy back after three years, according to another person.
 cable said he was previously worth $5 billion and “had low-balled his true worth” Firtash’s Group DF agreed to buy Intesa Sanpaolo SpA’s Ukrainian unit Pravex Bank Jan.
 Women browse designer stores in malls, men buy tailored robes and drive luxury cars.
 The court heard testimony of Yeung’s lavish lifestyle including buying property in London and a house in Hong Kong’s exclusive Peak neighborhood.
 20 the company announced it was buying a stake in an Indonesian oil service company called PetroPro PT.
 “A lot of people are buying into the ‘London can only go one way’ story and that fills me with grave concern.
 Still, some investors say the slowing price gains for luxury homes are ‘‘a buying opportunity’’ because there’s typically a ‘‘significant ‘bounce back’’’ in values after UK.
 to find a buyer, people with knowledge of the matter told Bloomberg News last month.
 as another logical buyer.
 20, Bloomberg News reported that Anixter is seeking a buyer, citing people with knowledge of the matter.
 A purchase of Anixter wouldn’t come cheap after the run-up in the stock, and the company isn’t in a position where it needs a buyer, said Stifel’s Dilts.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Cox Enterprises Inc, the media holding company, and London-based buyout firm Apax Partners LLP, are interested in bidding for auto-sales website Carscom, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The site, visited by more than 11 million potential car buyers a month, may fetch $25 billion in a sale, one of the people said.
 Downtown Buildings CommonWealth has denied Corvex and Related’s claims of conflicts of interest and said it is focused on buying office buildings in US.
 Before attempting to remove the board, Corvex and Related offered to buy CommonWealth for $2450 a share, or $29 billion.
 Old Habits It’s too soon to say whether Pena Nieto’s soda tax will lead to a long-term decline in soda drinking, said Karla Miranda, an analyst at Corporativo GBM SAB who recommends holding Coca-Cola Femsa and Arca Continental while buying Cultiba.
 Energy Deals Berkshire is also seeking more acquisitions at its MidAmerican unit after buying NV Energy last year for $56 billion to expand in Nevada.
 The soccer body, the CBF, has complained to the South Korean automaker over an advertising campaign that promises an extra year’s warranty to new car buyers in Brazil should the team clinch a record-extending sixth World Cup.
 “The big ISPs can make these demands -- driving up costs and prices for everyone else -- because of their market position” So-called net neutrality gained attention after Comcast Corp’s agreement to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, which would concentrate Internet access.
 One loonie buys 9020 US.
 “It provides a positive catalyst for investors to buy domestic stocks even as the political deadlock is still unresolved” Rate Decision Stocks gained even after Morgan Stanley cut its rating on Thailand to underweight from equalweight, citing decelerating economic growth and prolonged political instability.
 Russia and other former Soviet republics could buy as many as 350 turboprops in the coming years, Guy Hachey, president of Bombardier’s aerospace unit, said yesterday at the company’s investor day in New York.
 “Like many international companies we are going to follow this very closely” Bombardier is also wooing Russian airlines to buy its newest and biggest jetliner, the CSeries, which the company predicts will enter service late next year.
 in 2013 agreed to buy at least 32 CSeries jets in an order valued at about $256 billion at catalog prices.
 “Then you talk to airlines, and airlines will typically say, ‘I’ll buy two and lease three’ That’s why Ilyushin is important” Bombardier expects the CSeries will contribute $5 billion to $8 billion a year in new revenue later this decade, Beaudoin told analysts and investors in New York yesterday, reiterating an earlier forecast.
 We look at our strengths to find new niches for the Q400 with customers that we don’t have today” Separately, Beaudoin said Bombardier’s train division would consider buying Finmeccanica SpA’s Ansaldo STS and AnsaldoBreda units if it can find a partner to bid on the assets.
 Vintage is “essentially a strategic buyer and they’re committed to doing the deal,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said in a phone interview.
 A representative for Aaron’s declined to comment on the status of the evaluation or whether the company has received interest from other buyers.
 With Aaron’s hiring Goldman Sachs and forming a committee to review the offer, “everything seems to be on the table now” and “we struggle to think of a more appropriate buyer” than Vintage, he said.
 The rising stock price shows traders are betting either that another buyer will come in to top Vintage’s bid or that Vintage and Aaron’s will agree on a deal at a higher price.
 An industry buyer such as Rent-A-Center could probably afford to pay a higher price than a private-equity firm because of the potential for synergies, though such a tie-up would likely be scrutinized by the Federal Trade Commission, he said.
 “Why wouldn’t you look at an accretive acquisition if you could do it?” Even if Rent-A-Center paid $40 a share in cash to buy Aaron’s, the deal would immediately boost earnings per share by more than 30 percent, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “We did a lot of heavy lifting towards an objective and that’s what we’re doing here” Hourican said he’s not engaging with investors that have expressed an interest in buying a stake in Bank of Cyprus betting its valuation will bounce.
 The Bank of Cyprus shares received in return, one told Hourican, weren’t worth enough to buy a packet of cookies.
 For retailers, the consumer’s need to repeatedly buy the accompanying products drives traffic into the stores, she said.
 “The potential of these machines is contingent upon broadening the category’s appeal with a wider variety of uses and offerings, ease of obtaining the consumables, and price” Coca-Cola last month said agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain Coffee Roasters Inc.
 paid $2 billion to buy a similarly named company.
 Buying Credit “It’s a form of buying league-table credit,” Gordon said.
 Firms sometimes try to get on a deal just before or after an announcement, and can also get advisory credit when they’re providing financing to the buyer.
 The chunk of Alibaba shares Yahoo plans to sell could at least double its $5 billion cash stockpile for buybacks and acquisitions, JMP Group Inc.
 Facebook announced last month that it’s buying WhatsApp Inc.
 “They are once more betting against China as they did in 2004, 2005, 2006 and beyond and I think that people are going to fail again with their projections” Shares of Vale, which ships about half its iron ore and pellets to China, dropped to a five-year low earlier this month on concern a possible economic slowdown in the biggest buyer of the mineral will hurt sales.
 The Federal Open Market Committee will cut its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $55 billion and continue reductions at that pace at every meeting before announcing an end to the program at its Oct.
 added the stock to its conviction list after upgrading it to buy from neutral.
 CME Group Inc, which had approached Barclays about buying the business last year, could make an offer, one of the people said.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped a requirement for British retirees to buy pension annuities.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Produce Buying Co, the biggest buyer of cocoa beans from farmers in Ghana, will borrow less from the Ghana Cocoa Board in the 12 months that end in September to avoid rising domestic borrowing costs.
 buyout resulted in 26 filings, the most of any M&A deal in 2013, according to the report.
 “We’d like to address the entire inventory so that we can buy our peace and move on down the road,” she said, according to the transcript.
 “We are reluctant to turn positive on longer-dated Ukraine bonds and would not be surprised to see some profit-taking by investors” Investors have been buying Ukrainian bonds while ditching Russian debt amid speculation the US.
 Meanwhile, Crescendo Partners has been pressing Aeropostale management, sending a letter in November demanding that it find a buyer.
 The company will issue convertible preferred stock to Sycamore, giving it the right to buy as much as 5 percent of Aeropostale common stock at $725 a share, the closing price on March 12.
 With Madoff, the customers were told they were buying covered securities, and that’s what their fictitious account statements showed.
 Indeed, the district judge said the safe harbor was applicable because investors believed they were buying securities.
 Now that the Supreme Court said that SLUSA applies if investors thought they were buying covered securities, Troice suggests Madoff investors have slim a chance of winning rehearing and having their suits reinstated.
 He also can contend that just as customers’ expectations about buying securities didn’t carry the day in Troice, they shouldn’t govern in the Madoff case, where no securities ever were bought.
 Chairman Charles Ergen to help make the lenders’ case that Ergen was engaged in a “bait and switch” when he made an offer to buy LightSquared for $22 billion.
 The lenders contend he bought $1 billion in LightSquared debt, intending to drop his buyout offer unless another bidder appeared at auction offering more.
 canceled an agreement to buy the business at the same price.
 The buyer is using some of its $18 million secured claim rather than cash to buy the business.
 Chelmsford, Massachusetts-based Kronos was a leveraged buyout in 2007 led by private-equity investor Hellman & Friedman LLC.
 before the $432 billion leveraged buyout in October 2007 by KKR & Co.
 Alibaba’s Taobao Marketplace, which links individual buyers and sellers, targeted 87 million listings that may have breached intellectual-property rules on cigarettes, clothing and medicine.
 Informal, unsolicited expressions of interest approaching $25 a share from buyout firms including Silver Lake Management LLC, Thoma Bravo LLC and KKR & Co.
 Elliott has urged the company repeatedly to start a formal sales process and allow potential buyers to conduct due diligence.
 “The clear and correct path forward for the company is to engage in a dialogue with Elliott and other interested buyers so that we can conduct expedited diligence toward exploring a value-maximizing transaction” Elliott has pressured technology providers including NetApp Inc, BMC Software Inc, Compuware Corp.
 Activist funds generally buy shares and try to compel corporate management and directors to make changes that boost investor returns.
 has received no “credible” bids from buyout firms and shouldn’t have been targeted by activist shareholders, Chief Executive Officer and Chairman Jerry Kennelly said in an interview.
 I haven’t had that” The San Francisco-based network-equipment maker is being pushed to sell itself by activist shareholder firm Elliott Management Corp, which owns about 105 percent of the company and has called it “significantly undervalued” Riverbed last month rejected an offer from Elliott to buy it for $21 a share.
 Riverbed yesterday said it was increasing its share-buyback program by $250 million to a total of $750 million.
 “Riverbed’s shareholders want and expect the board to explore a value-maximizing sale, not to reflexively announce a buyback when the stock is up 35 percent on buyout speculation,” Jesse Cohn, a money manager with Elliott, said in a statement.
 27 because its buybacks were approaching the previous limit of $500 million.
 Riverbed has returned more than 100 percent of its cash flow to investors over the last two years via buybacks, he said.
 yesterday advised investors to buy shares and increased its price target by 44 percent.
 HCP hasn’t spent a dollar on acquisitions since buying 133 senior housing communities for $17 billion in October 2012, according to data based on reported deals compiled by Bloomberg.
 and Temasek Holdings Pte about buying stock in the offering, said one of the people, who asked not to be identified discussing a private process.
 The company said yesterday it agreed to buy Citic Ltd, its parent’s main operating unit with about $36 billion of shareholder equity.
 While promoting stocks is legal -- Wall Street’s biggest banks send reports daily advising investors on what to buy, often in companies that are clients -- US.
 “People just get an e-mail and they buy these things without doing any fundamental analysis” The SEC routinely sanctions promoters for buying cheap stock, hyping it to investors, then secretly selling their holdings, according to Sporkin, who’s now a lawyer at BuckleySandler LLP in Washington.
 Its e-mails generated the most stock buying in the industry, he said.
 Bag Holders “The sheep that buy end up holding the bag and losing everything,” said Randall Place, a lawyer who used to investigate penny stocks for a predecessor of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.
 Baidu Inc, owner of China’s biggest search engine, bought a 59 percent stake in Renren’s Nuomicom group buying site in August, about a month after announcing it will acquire 91 Wireless Websoft Ltd.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index fell 06 percent as the Federal Reserve reduced its monthly bond buying to $55 billion and more central bank officials predicted interest rates would rise by the end of next year.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- Tokyo Gas Co, Japan’s third-biggest buyer of liquefied natural gas, plans to start trading the fuel before 2017 to boost flexibility in shipments and reduce import costs, the company’s new president said.
 The option to resell LNG will allow Tokyo Gas to commit to buying larger volumes, favoring the company in price negotiations, said Hirose, who was previously an executive vice president.
 Tokyo Gas plans to buy 14 million metric tons a year of LNG from the Cove Point plant in Maryland, it said in September.
 With increased sources of LNG supply, it’s become easier for buyers to secure flexible terms with sellers such as Australia and countries in the Middle East, according to Hirose.
 AutoCanada Inc, which runs car dealerships in Canada, surged 86 percent to C$5499 after saying it planned to buy 10 to 12 new dealerships in the next two years.
 BlackBerry didn’t disclose terms of the agreement, and didn’t name the buyer.
 “Markets have been more favorable over the last 12 months than they were in the previous 12 months,” said Brett Le Mesurier, a Sydney-based banking analyst at BBY Ltd, which has a “buy” rating on Macquarie.
 Sick Cows The judge raised a hypothetical argument comparing Countrywide’s sale of risky loans to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac to a farmer who sells a herd of cows knowing that some may be sick or suffering from disease and doesn’t tell the buyer.
 and UK, he buys enough shares to gain board seats and then pushes for changes, such as divesting assets and installing new managers.
 Brookfield Renewable Energy Partners LP, part of the group, will buy Bord Gais Eireann’s renewable generation assets and iCON Infrastructure Partners II, LP the energy supply and distribution assets.
 Dong Energy A/S, the world’s biggest offshore-wind developer, agreed to buy Centrica’s Race Bank project off England’s eastern coast for 50 million pounds, according to a December statement.
 Grupa Lotos SA, Poland’s second-biggest refiner, said in November it would buy Centrica’s oil and gas exploration assets in the Norwegian part of the North Sea for $1758 million.
 will spend as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 The move bears risks because some shareholders may want a buyout price higher than Etihad is willing to pay.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore extended its decline into a bear market on concern that demand in China may slow as credit tightens in the largest buyer, exacerbating the impact of rising global supplies that are seen spurring a surplus.
 While there may be further pressure on shares until iron ore bottoms out, investors should buy producers on the view that the raw material will average more than $110 a ton in 2014, UBS AG analysts led by Glyn Lawcock wrote in note dated yesterday.
 “The fall in iron ore prices may reflect the beginning of a buyers’ strike in China,” wrote Shaw at Commonwealth Bank of Australia.
 After failing to find a buyer for the whole business, the New York-based firm has been selling off pieces, including its fixed-income business, which was acquired by Guggenheim Partners LLC, one person said.
 New Target Daniel Bischof, a Zurich-based analyst with Helvea AG, confirmed his buy rating on the stock, “despite the solid performance year-to-date,” citing Zurich’s strong commercial lines positioning, geographical revenue mix, capitalization and conservative asset side.
 climbed 7 percent after agreeing to buy western Canada conventional oil and natural gas assets from Imperial Oil Ltd.
March 16 (Bloomberg) -- Allianz SE, Europe’s biggest insurer, agreed to buy Milano Assicurazioni SpA assets from Unipol Gruppo Finanziario SpA for 440 million euros ($612 million), the Munich-based company said.
 “It’s a buyer’s market on several North Sea fielddevelopments as a lot of companies are struggling with cash flowand have capital-expenditure challenges,” Platou’s Grevstadsaid March 7.
 While Platou isn’t advising on any talks over Gina Krog,it’s seeking to assist potential buyers of assets to be sold bycompanies including Marathon and Talisman, Grevstad said.
 “It’s time for us to consider buying the Chinese market” Global equities fell yesterday after disappointing Chinese trade data fueled concern over growth in Asia’s biggest economy.
 Guangzhou Automobile was rated a new buy, while Dongfeng Motor was expected to outperform by the investment bank.
 International investors were net buyers of Indian stocks for a 12th straight day on March 3, the longest stretch of inflows since November, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- AGL Energy Ltd’s A$151 billion ($135 billion) deal to buy government-owned power plants in Australia’s most-populous state was blocked by the nation’s antitrust regulator on concern it would reduce competition.
 EnergyAustralia, a unit of Hong Kong-based CLP Holdings Ltd, in July agreed to buy the Mount Piper and Wallerawang power stations from New South Wales.
 On July 1, Origin Energy agreed to buy power company Eraring Energy from the state.
 Megawati Decides “Investors are flowing into Indonesian equities on the announcement and they are buying liquid stocks with large capitalization like banks,” said Alvin Pattisahusiwa, chief investment officer at PT Manulife Aset Manajemen Indonesia.
 “After recent losses, we may see some gains today as valuation lures a few buyers,” Gustavo Mendonca, an economist at Saga Capital, said in a phone interview from Rio de Janeiro.
 Apollo, like its largest peers Blackstone Group LP, Carlyle Group LP and KKR & Co, has diversified its business from doing leveraged buyouts to managing vast amounts of credit investments, real estate and hedge funds.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Federal Reserve policy makers meet for the first time under Chair Janet Yellen, who has pledged to continue gradual reductions in monthly bond buying as long as the US.
 LightSquared has accused Ergen of buying its debt on behalf his Dish Network Corp, a competitor, to acquire LightSquared’s airwaves for a below-market price.
 consumer prices were probably little changed in February, according to a Bloomberg survey, rising 01 percent for a second month as clothing stores and auto dealers boosted discounts to lure buyers.
 The Federal Open Market Committee meets for the first time under Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen, who has pledged to continue gradual reductions in monthly bond buying as long as the economy continues to strengthen.
 He is one of three analysts who track the company who all rate it a buy.
 “We’re spending money right and left to buy help and systems,” he told analysts on Nov.
 Antitrust Risks Among other criteria in play are Vivendi’s possibilities for exit, regulatory risks and how the French wireless market would evolve should Bouygues catch up to leader Orange SA by buying SFR, Aspesi said.
 As a result of the tapering, the central bank is “buying fewer 30-year Treasuries and fewer agency” mortgage-backed bonds.
 Boss, controlled by buyout firm Permira Advisers LLP, in November delayed a key profitability target as it spends more opening stores and promoting itself to more free-spending Chinese consumers.
 Under the deal, Microsoft is buying the hardware business while leaving most of the wireless patents in Nokia’s control.
 lost 11 percent after agreeing to buy Santonia Energy Inc.
 Tourmaline Oil fell 11 percent to C$4974 after agreeing to buy Santonia Energy for C$1891 million in stock.
 raised the stock’s rating to buy from hold, citing the company’s improving gross margins and strong balance sheet.
 Economists surveyed by Bloomberg predict that the central bank will reduce its rate of bond buying to $55 billion from $65 billion and leave interest rates at 025 percent.
 31 it will buy an unspecified minority stake in Ourgame for 100 million yuan ($163 million).
 Some are bigger and some are small to medium-sized” Wild Flavors owner Hans-Peter Wild and buyout firm KKR & Co.
 State Department warned on March 10 of possible sanctions against any buyers of the vessel’s cargo, as the crude came from Waha Oil Co, a joint venture between Libya’s state-run National Oil Corp.
 Vodafone, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, agreed yesterday to buy Ono for 72 billion euros ($10 billion), including debt, to boost its TV and broadband offerings.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- The recent weakness in European stocks amid a standoff between Russia and the West over Ukraine is a buying opportunity for investors, according to ABN Amro Bank NV’s wealth management unit.
 It is also buying European industrial- and information-technology stocks, including Dassault Systemes SA, a French developer of 3D design software, and ASML NV, Europe’s largest semiconductor-equipment supplier.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- Mick Davis, the former chief executive officer of Xstrata Plc, raised as much as $375 billion from investors to buy assets and turn his X2 Resources into a mid-tier mining company.
 Thailand’s anti-corruption agency says it has enough evidence to charge Yingluck with negligence in overseeing a rice-buying program it says is riddled with graft.
 and other startups are harnessing Bitcoin’s underlying code for such tasks as authentication, which means making sure that a buyer isn’t posing as someone else, and verification of payments.
 If successful, the new tools might reduce the fees shouldered by buyers and sellers in the $122 trillion global electronic-commerce market, as well in financial services, cloud computing and other areas.
 Later that year, SAE handed the team back to the league, which operated it temporarily until a buyer could be found.
 London-based auction house Bainbridges achieved a record hammer price plus buyers fees of 516 million pounds ($86 million) for a Qianlong era vase in 2010, though the buyer reneged and the vase was later sold privately for less than half that.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 MegaFon said it will let Chief Executive Officer Ivan Tavrin to exercise an option to buy a 25 percent stake in the company in May, a year earlier than the original vesting date.
 The Munich-based company has hired a bank to seek potential buyers for the business, which could fetch between $300 million and $600 million, according to one of the people, who asked not to be identified because talks are private.
 Banks have pitched the business to buyout firms including Blackstone Group LP and Carlyle Group LP, they said.
 Losing Ground “We would advise Siemens to follow Johnson & Johnson’s lead and rid itself of a unit requiring major investments to remain competitive against peer Roche,” Kepler Cheuvreux analyst Hans-Joachim Heimbuerger, who recommends buying Siemens shares, said in a Feb.
March 7 (Bloomberg) -- China, the biggest buyer of US.
 Of the five analysts surveyed by Bloomberg, two have buy ratings on Zulily and three have holds.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Fintech, based in New York, is buying a 45 percent stake in Monte Paschi, while BTG is purchasing 2 percent, for 2375 euro cents a share.
 The foundation has agreed to pledge a 25 percent stake in the lender to an investor pact with the two buyers.
 The three companies plan to maintain a combined 9 percent stake by buying shares in Monte Paschi’s planned rights offering.
 Bloomberg News reported earlier this month that buyout firms including Silver Lake Management LLC, Thoma Bravo LLC and KKR & Co.
 ‘False Reality’ “By publicly denying the buyer interest that has been expressed to the company and by comparing the value of Elliott’s bid to a false reality, Riverbed’s management and board have crossed a line from failing shareholders to actively misleading them as well,” Jesse Cohn, a portfolio manager at Elliott, said in the statement.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Japanese shares closed higher, after earlier erasing gains as the central bank maintained its bond-buying program.
 Leveraged loans, which back buyouts and help companies refinance, had their biggest year on record in 2013, with $3527 billion of issuance volume, the data show.
 “Even if we could not continue to supply our customers from production, we would do it through other methods, and if that means buying in volume we would do so” About 70,000 employees who are members of the Association of Mineworkers and Construction Union across the world’s three biggest platinum companies, which also include Impala Platinum Holdings Ltd.
 GPT Group, a Sydney-based diversified property trust, in May dropped an offer to buy Australand’s commercial and development units after failing to agree on a price.
 “Even farmers who purchased import vehicles on foreign currency installments are selling them in the second-hand market to buy local brands” Turkey’s lira declined 19 percent in the past year, the second-worst performance after the Argentine peso among 24 emerging market peers tracked by Bloomberg.
 will probably announce a deal within the week to buy JPMorgan’s $33 billion commodities unit after the parties entered exclusive talks last month, according to two people with knowledge of the situation.
 KB Home, which was primarily focused on first-time buyers, has more recently been opening communities in land-constrained areas where incomes and demand for larger homes are generally greater.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, a New York-based property investment company, agreed to buy 60 US.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA, which has had seven years of falling sales in its home market, is considering buying a stake in network owner Metroweb Italia to boost its broadband service, three people familiar with the matter said.
 Sinclair on March 20 said it would restructure a deal with the Allbritton family to meet FCC objections, selling a station in three markets where it proposes to buy an affiliate of Walt Disney Co’s ABC network from Allbritton.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Some of Wall Street’s biggest banks say that Venezuela’s new currency system is a signal to buy the nation’s bonds.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Venezuela’s bonds due in 2027 rose 02 percentage point today to 109 percentage points.
 Companies and individuals will be allowed to buy and sell foreign exchange daily in cash or bonds in the so-called Sicad 2 market through banks and brokerages that will open local accounts for them, according to a resolution published in the Official Gazette on March 11.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Thales SA, the French maker of defense electronics, is in talks to buy the stake in a joint venture with Spain’s Amper SA that it doesn’t already own, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Very Careful “Retail investors need to be very careful about buying on their own because it’s easy not to know what you’re buying,” said Evan Welch, chief investment officer at Boxborough, Massachusetts-based Antaeus Wealth Advisors LLC, which oversees $285 million.
 “You sell, I’ll buy, and we see who comes out best in the long run,” he said on a Jan.
 The industry won’t overbuild LNG export capacity because the facilities are too expensive to do without signed contracts from buyers in hand, John Watson, chairman and chief executive officer of Chevron, told reporters yesterday after speaking at the CERAWeek conference.
 Many of the proposals will fall away without guaranteed buyers so supply won’t exceed demand, he said.
 Contract Pressures Long-term purchase contracts may come under pressure if a spot market for the liquefied fuel is developed that gives buyers access to cheaper gas not linked to oil prices, Ruehl said.
 BG Group Plc, which has agreed to buy LNG from a Cheniere Energy Inc.
 Each year they must surrender enough permits, which they get for free or must buy at auctions, to account for their discharges or pay fines amounting to 100 euros ($138) a ton.
 In a 2008 letter to shareholders, he lamented his decision not to buy an NBC station in the Dallas area.
 Apple introduced the plastic-cased iPhone 5c last year in a bid to capture more budget-conscious smartphone buyers.
 “There will be a shortfall of allowances by 2021 and that means that even most efficient steel producers will have to buy up to 75 percent of their permits.
 After one of its hepatitis C compounds had setbacks in early testing, Gilead acquired Sovaldi by buying Pharmasset Inc.
 Kroger had made an approach to Safeway recently about buying parts of the company, people with knowledge of the situation said this week.
 The rival grocery chain had also approached Cerberus about buying some of Safeway’s stores after a Cerberus deal, one of the people said.
 Central banks responded by lending trillions of dollars to commercial banks to unfreeze credit markets and buying government bonds to encourage investment.
 An exit by short-term investors from emerging markets will help buyers like Maersk generate bigger returns, Andersen said.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Standard Life Plc climbed to a 10-month high after its investment arm agreed to buy Ignis Asset Management for 390 million pounds ($645 million), gaining 59 billion pounds of funds.
 Aberdeen Asset Management Plc agreed to buy Lloyds Banking Group Plc’s Scottish Widows Investment Partnership unit for 560 million pounds in November.
 Ujaas hands over ready-made solar projects to customers, overseeing construction, licensing and power-sale contracts to ensure plants have buyers for their electricity.
 The Wall Street Journal reported in January that Gryphon was working with Houlihan Lokey to find a buyer for the company.
 The buyout firm largely does middle-market deals in the consumer sector.
 While the increased demand may reduce returns, core buildings are now luring more international buyers seeking a haven and investors trying to hedge against inflation.
 At the opposite end of the risk/reward continuum, real estate opportunity funds aim for returns of at least 15 percent by using large amounts of debt to buy assets in need of turnaround.
 The flip side is rising interest rates increase borrowing costs, reducing what prospective buyers are willing to pay, and some landlords might not see the benefit of higher rents if they’re locked into long-term leases.
 The whole point of the core strategy is it’s the portion of real estate that’s not going to keep them up at night” Blackstone made its first core real estate purchase in December, buying a 29 percent stake in Edens, a South Carolina-based shopping-center landlord, for $718 million.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- Corpbanca rejected a request from an asset manager that the Chilean lender demand that Brazil’s Itau Unibanco Holding SA buy out minority investors as it takes control of the company.
 The Treasury said in December it plans to give taxpayers the opportunity to buy Lloyds shares “when the time is right” after a sale to money managers.
 and Bain Capital LLC, two Boston-based buyout firms, and Danish pension fund ATP, which agreed to buy Nordic card-payment company Nets Holding A/S for 17 billion kroner ($31 billion).
 Accura in Denmark, Hannes Snellman in Finland, and Wiersholm in Norway also acted as legal advisers to the buyers.
 “If you are a long-term investor, it’s a good time to buy” Russian equities have the cheapest valuations among 21 developing countries monitored by Bloomberg, with shares on the Micex Index trading at 48 times projected earnings, compared with a multiple of 91 for the MSCI Emerging Markets Index.
 It rose as much as 12 percent earlier and jumped 19 percent yesterday, the biggest gain on record, on speculation owner Fondazione Monte dei Paschi di Siena sold shares to foreign buyers.
 India bought six C-130J aircrafts in 2011 and plans to buy six more.
 Nike, the world’s largest sporting-goods company, had been benefiting from consumers increasingly buying athletic gear to wear every day, not just when working out or playing sports.
 recommends investors stop buying the currency closer to the May 16 deadline for counting votes.
 The French lender recommends investors purchase options to buy the dollar and sell the rupee as a hedge against election-outcome risks.
 Three-month contracts offering the right to sell the rupee cost 163 basis points more than those to buy, after reaching the cheapest since July 29 on March 11.
 Oracle in February agreed to buy marketing data analysis company BlueKai Inc, and last December said it would acquire Responsys Inc, which helps companies create and track Web campaigns, for $15 billion.
 Mongolian miners “have cheap coal but the high transportation cost to get them to buyers ultimately makes them unattractive,” said Amit Jain, a credit analyst in Bangalore at SJS Markets Ltd.
 on March 27, after upgrading MMC’s bonds to buy from neutral earlier this month.
 The equity offering “buys them some time, but it really doesn’t advance the ball strategically,” Craig Johnson, president of Customer Growth Partners, a New Canaan, Connecticut-based retail consulting firm, said in a telephone interview.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- ProSiebenSat1 Media AG, a German broadcaster, is buying a 20 percent stake in US-based online video company Collective Digital Studios to gain more viewers on websites such as Google Inc’s YouTube.
 this week agreed to buy Maker Studios, a supplier of video content to YouTube, for at least $500 million, with an additional $450 million pledged if the target meets certain performance goals.
 ProSiebenSat1 agreed to buy the stake via its production company Red Arrow Entertainment.
 Hanco, majority-owned by closely-held Bin Sulaiman Holdings, is buying Byrne’s equipment rental operations and modular building services business from Dubai-based Havenvest Private Equity Middle East Partnership, it said today in a statement.
 said March 2 it will pay $16 billion to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India with partners, while Emirates Telecommunications Corp.
 “As strategic buyers, we are here for the long-term” Havenvest manages $600 million in assets through two funds, according to its website.
 HSBC sold 801% in Havenvest in a management-led buyout in 2012.
March 7 (Bloomberg) -- Indian Oil Corp, the nation’s biggest refiner, agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Petroliam Nasional Bhd’s Canadian natural gas fields and a planned export project.
 The Kuala Lumpur-based company aims to reduce its share in Pacific NorthWest LNG, which runs a gas-export facility, to as low as 50 percent by selling stakes to Asian gas buyers, the unit’s President Greg Kist said in November.
 are among companies that are affiliated to or are buyers linked to plantation concessions with fires, according to a March 3 report by World Resources Institute, a non-governmental organization, citing fire NASA satellite data from the previous two weeks.
 The company said it will buy back as many as 10 million shares through 2016.
 Interjet, the brand of ABC Aerolineas SA, has also been cutting some fares, said Romo, who lowered his rating on Volaris to hold from buy after its Feb.
 New Routes Michael Linenberg, a Deutsche Bank AG analyst, cut his Volaris recommendation to hold from buy, saying results would continue to be slowed by “a weaker-than-expected macro environment and intensified competition” “We believe that Volaris’ growth, which primarily focuses on new routes, is taking longer than expected to ramp up to sustainable profitability,” Linenberg wrote in a Feb.
 He kept Aeromexico as a buy last month, saying cost cuts and sales gains would help the airline expand profit margins.
 “The economy is a factor because price sensitivity is an important variable for the customers of low-cost airlines,” Montanez, who raised Aeromexico to buy from hold last month and doesn’t rate Volaris, said in a telephone interview.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- CVC Capital Partners Ltd, one of Europe’s largest private-equity firms, agreed to buy Nordic optician Synsam Nordic A/S from Swedish investment company Alipes AB for an undisclosed sum.
 If there won’t be much stricter European Union sanctions against Russia, this is a good moment to buy Raiffeisen” The US.
 analyst in Toronto who rates the stock as buy.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Temasek Holdings Pte’s plan to buy a stake in the retail arm of billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison Whampoa Ltd.
 Singapore’s state-owned investment company agreed on March 21 to buy 25 percent of AS.
 The Watson investment comes a week after a Temasek unit offered to buy control of Singapore’s Olam International Ltd, one of the world’s top three coffee and rice traders, for $32 billion.
 “On the other hand, as they are opportunistic investors, if the right deal came their way, they wouldn’t shy away from buying” Temasek has said it expects more investment opportunities in China.
 President Dilma Rousseff, then Petrobras’ chairwoman, said directors approved the $370 million purchase of a 50 percent stake without knowledge of a clause that later forced it to buy the rest as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 That’s forcing the company to import gasoline and diesel to meet domestic demand, which it buys at international prices and sells below cost at government-set prices.
 Acquisition Strategy Abercrombie has considered acquisitions and would be more interested buying small, up-and-coming brands than larger, existing businesses, Ramsden said.
 Investors should “sell what the Fed has been buying because they won’t be buying them when taper ends in October,” Gross wrote in a comment on Twitter on March 7.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen last month pledged further “measured” steps to slow the buying if economic improvement continues, and told lawmakers it’s likely to end in the fall.
 in 2013 and agreeing to buy Dutch operator Ziggo NV in January.
 in Paris who recommends investors buy Deutsche Telekom shares.
 analyst who had an outperform rating on the stock, the equivalent of a buy recommendation.
 The company is producing so much TV programming worldwide that Smith is considering starting or buying a cable channel.
 “BMW gave a surprisingly positive outlook,” said Juergen Pieper, a Frankfurt-based analyst with Bankhaus Metzler, who recommends buying the shares.
 The amended 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act will secure the state a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and enable it to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” It will also enable the mines minister to declare some minerals strategic and force companies processing them to sell some output to local manufacturers.
 Leucadia, run by Jefferies Group LLC Chief Executive Officer Richard Handler, agreed last week to buy 23 million preferred securities from Harbinger for $253 million.
 The BOJ currently buys about 7 trillion yen ($69 billion) of Japan’s bonds every month to boost inflation to its 2 percent target through lower borrowing costs.
 senior market analyst Nobuyuki Fujimoto said.
 ISS shares are worth buying at 155 kroner, equivalent to a valuation of 29 billion kroner, Sydbank A/S said in a note to clients today.
 AstraZeneca agreed in 2008 to buy esomeprazole magnesium from Ranbaxy, the companies said at the time.
 Producers of active pharmaceutical ingredients must test their quality before distributing them, and factories that produce finished drugs must test the materials they buy before use, said Christopher Kelly, a spokesman for the FDA.
 “Given London’s enduring appeal as a real estate investment location and the significant upturn in the Canary Wharf occupational market since the start of 2014, we believe this is an appropriate time to seek a buyer for this well-located asset,” Paul Kendrick, chief financial officer of Evans Randall, said in the statement.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Tesla’s entry in China is closely watched by other automakers that have been trying to convince local consumers to buy electric cars.
 “Only about 1 percent of buyers there can afford it, but that’s a big 1 percent,” he said.
 Gazprombank Asset Management, a unit of the lender, is marketing its funds to investors from beyond “traditional” buyers in Europe and the US.
 The Federal Reserve will press on with cuts to its bond-buying program and link its interest-rate policy to a range of economic indicators instead of the jobless rate as unemployment falls, according to economists surveyed by Bloomberg before a policy meeting ending today.
 “Put buying is picking up as hedges in case the crisis worsens” The Bloomberg Russia-US Equity Index of the most-traded Russian stocks in the US.
 ‘Violence and Intimidation’ “War is a time to buy,” Anvar Gilyazitdinov, who manages a $10 million portfolio of Russian stocks, including Gazprom, at Rye, Man & Gor Securities in Moscow, said by phone March 14.
 It’s a great opportunity to buy” In Washington, the White House said in a statement the international community “will not recognize the results of a poll administered under threats of violence and intimidation from a Russian military intervention” UK.
 The deal, announced in a statement today from Renaissance, translates into estimated proceeds of about $600 million for Permira, which contributed about $197 million of equity in the 2011 buyout, according to a Moody’s Investors Service report at the time.
 Permira is raising its fifth buyout fund and may exceed its target of 5 billion euros ($7 billion) by next month, according to people familiar with its plans.
 The commonwealth and its agencies have $72 billion of bonds that have lured buyers because they’re tax-free nationwide.
 The sale is still attracting hedge funds and investors who typically buy taxable securities, such as corporate bonds.
 Property Loans Hong Kong has raised the minimum mortgage down payment six times since 2010 and imposed taxes including a doubling of the stamp duty on deals of more than HK$2 million ($258,000), plus an extra 15 percent levy on non-resident buyers.
 As part of a venture with billionaire Alexander Nesis’s ICT Group, the state-run company is seeking to buy the Tomtor rare-earth deposit.
 Microsoft, based in Redmond, Washington, is buying the business and licensing some patents to challenge Apple Inc.
 Investors should “ideally” buy the lira against the euro, and the currency may appreciate to 215 against the greenback in the next two weeks, according to Anne.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules forcing people to buy annuities with their pension funds.
 Legal & General slid 96 percent, while Resolution Ltd, the insurance buyout firm founded by Clive Cowdery, dropped 14 percent.
 He rates the shares buy.
 This month’s reading follows a drop in February that was the biggest on record amid snowstorms that restrained prospective buyers from going out to shop for homes and kept builders from starting work.
 The gauge of buyer traffic rose to 33 from 31.
 The confidence survey asks builders to characterize current sales as “good,” “fair” or “poor” and to gauge prospective buyers’ traffic.
 “A number of factors are raising builder concerns over meeting demand for the spring buying season,” David Crowe, the NAHB’s chief economist, said in a statement.
 Beyond the weather, borrowing costs for homebuyers have been climbing.
 and partners will pay $16 billion in cash and assumed debt to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India from Jaiprakash Power Ventures Ltd.
 The company holds 51 percent of the group buying the plants, along with a Canadian institutional investor and Indian infrastructure finance fund IDFC Ltd, Taqa said, without identifying the Canadian partner.
 About 81 percent of spot trading -- the buying and selling of currency for immediate delivery -- will be electronic by 2018, Aite said.
 The provider of consulting and outsourcing services was boosted to overweight, an equivalent of buy, by Morgan Stanley.
 The whole industry is contending with sluggish growth over the next four years, underscoring the need to find new buyers for its wares.
 Orient was one of four asset management firms set up by the government in 1999 to buy bad debts from the country’s biggest banks and help clean up a financial system on the brink of bankruptcy.
 Rules meant to safeguard markets after the 2008 financial crisis prompted the traditional middlemen in the bond market -- the world’s largest banks -- to pare back their operations, making it harder for investors to buy and sell debt.
 Vega-Chi lets investors buy and sell debt anonymously with each other.
 to attract a more diverse group of buyers and sellers.
 Also in 2012, Goldman Sachs began offering its clients the chance to buy and sell some debt that the bank held through its GSessions system.
 Last month the East Coast had to pay more than $100 a ton extra to buy propane from Europe because there aren’t any Jones Act tankers that could deliver domestic supplies from Texas.
 “I am single and I am a temporary worker, which makes buying a home even more difficult,” said Suzuki, who makes 60 percent of the 4 million yen ($39,000) a year she used to earn selling ferry trips.
 “We are no longer in the era where workers have lifetime employment and go out to buy their own home,” said Hidetaka Yoneyama, a senior fellow at Fujitsu Research Institute in Tokyo who has written five books on Japan’s housing market.
 The increase has been spurred by an anticipated boost in the consumption tax, which homebuyers pay, to 8 percent from 5 percent.
 Declining Homeownership “Non-regular workers with lower pay simply can’t afford to buy,” said Natsumi Ishino, a senior associate analyst at Macquarie Capital Securities Ltd, a unit of Australia’s biggest investment bank, in Tokyo.
 Euromedic has attracted interest from buyout firms and the company’s owners, including Ares Life Sciences and Montagu Private Equity LLP, could raise about 1 billion euros ($139 billion) from a sale, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 “Evergrande targeted mid-end buyers, which helped turnaround sales quickly,” Duan Feiqin, a Shenzhen-based propertyanalyst at China Merchants Securities Co, who rated the stockbuy, said before today’s release.
 will pay $225 million to buy a 50 percent stake in Tribeca Enterprises, owners of the film festival co-founded by actor Robert De Niro in the wake of the Sept.
 Interested buyers include Sean “Diddy” Combs and NuvoTV, which is backed by Jennifer Lopez, people with knowledge of the matter said on March 14.
 If he sees one that fits with existing operations, is priced attractively and offers better than 10 percent returns, “he’s probably willing to buy,” said Cook, whose firm owns Berkshire shares.
 Ayala is allocating 70 billion pesos or more than a third of its 187 billion-peso capital spending this year to Ayala Land Inc, one of the country’s biggest property developers, as it completes projects and buys more land, Gonzalez said.
 Tencent’s long-term performance in a market where investors have to buy the stock in multiples of 100 has made it harder to attract individuals as rival Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 WhatsApp, Viber Tencent plans to buy new content and improve services for its online video business, increase WeChat marketing outside China and boost demand for its payment services.
 agreed to buy message and calling app Viber for $900 million.
 Virtual Cards Earlier this month, Tencent agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce website JDcom Inc.
 QR codes have been a popular feature on WeChat as part of Tencent’s push for more commercial applications for the service such as allowing users to buy game services and investment products.
 ‘Good Restructuring’ Fernandez Verdes has implemented “very good restructuring, originally at Dragados and then at Hochtief,” Juan Carlos Calvo, a Lisbon-based Banco Espirito Santo analyst with a buy recommendation on ACS and a neutral rating on Hochtief, said by phone.
 A 256 million-euro ($355 million) share buyback and stock cancellation by Hochtief last year boosted ACS’s holding to 557 percent from 504 percent.
 27 that he intends to ask shareholders for permission for further buybacks.
 The benchmark gauge for shares in developing nations has retreated as much as 16 percent since May 22, when the Fed signaled its bond-buying could be trimmed if the economy showed sustained improvement.
 is buying a stake in Keurig Green Mountain Inc.
 adds credibility to SodaStream’s product, Anton Brenner, an analyst at Roth Capital Partners who has a buy rating on SodaStream, said by phone from Newport Beach, California on March 26.
 “It’s too premature to commit without having a technology that actually works” SodaStream’s growth will be limited without a partnership with Coca-Cola or Pepsi, said Akshay Jagdale, a New York-based analyst at KeyBanc Capital Markets who downgraded SodaStream stock to hold from buy on Feb.
 There’s no roadblock in the talks” The Minmetals-led group is nearing an accord to buy Las Bambas for more than $5 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 Youku, based in Beijing, has been cited by analysts as a possible buyout target for Tencent Holdings Ltd, China’s largest Internet company, and Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 Investment Target “Youku could be an investment or buyout target for Tencent or Alibaba,” said Ricky Lai, an analyst at Guotai International Holdings Ltd.
 She mentioned that 7 million people working part-time want to work full time, a share of the work force that is “very high historically” The Fed chief said low numbers of people are quitting jobs “because they worry that it will be hard to find another,” adding that gains in labor compensation have been “very low” The FOMC has kept the benchmark interest rate near zero since December 2008 and sought to cut borrowing costs and fuel growth through bond buying that has more than quadrupled its assets to $423 trillion.
 “Earlier this month, the Fed reiterated its overall commitment to maintain extraordinary support for the recovery for some time to come” The FOMC said in a policy statement this month that rates will likely remain low for a considerable time after the bond buying program ends.
 That case, which involves Halliburton Co, could undercut the ability of shareholders who buy stock on the open market to press class-action fraud suits against companies.
 He has a buy rating on the stock.
 gathered $55 billion to buy distressed assets from US.
March 3 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP agreed to buy Tyco International Ltd’s fire and security business in South Korea for $193 billion, the country’s largest private-equity buyout deal in US.
 Switzerland-based Tyco said net cash proceeds are expected to be $185 billion, and the board added $175 billion to its stock buyback authority, for a total of $2 billion.
 “ADT Korea is a highly stable and profitable business with attractive market positioning, strong brand power and excellent cash flow profile,” Sanghyun Lee, managing director on the Asia buyout team for Washington-based Carlyle, said in a statement.
 31, 2013 and is also the largest private-equity buyout in the country since 2008, according to the company.
 Alibaba will buy 2205 million shares at HK$75335 apiece, for a total of HK$17 billion ($219 million), and will also subscribe to a HK$37 billion convertible bond, the companies said in separate statements today.
 This month, Alibaba led a $280 million investment in TangoMe Inc, an instant messaging service, while in February it offered to buy the shares in AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 Grupo Financiero Inbursa SAB, controlled by Slim, announced the agreement last week to buy Standard Bank Group Ltd’s Brazilian unit as the South African company wound down the division’s operations.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- UBS AG is standing by its recommendation investors buy shares in Ratio Oil Exploration 1992 LP even after a delay in the proposed sale of a stake in Israel’s Leviathan gas field, the company’s most valuable asset.
 Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-largest oil producer, failed to meet a March 27 target for buying a stake in Leviathan for as much as $26 billion.
 Debt’s Effect Duke Energy Progress is negotiating to buy the stakes, said Jeff Brooks, a company spokesman.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Richard Mashaal and Brian Gonick have set an ambitious target for their Senvest Partners LP hedge fund: Stocks they buy should have the potential to double or triple in price over one to three years.
 “And that’s where we were looking to buy” Trust Preferreds Early on, the fund loaded up on trust-preferred securities issued by entities related to Bank of America Corp, Citigroup Inc.
 Timchenko’s share sale was unconditional and doesn’t provide him with an option to buy back his stake, Tornqvist said.
 “A company of the size and reputation of Gunvor, people are going to do business with no matter what” The trader also offered to sell 20,000 metric tons of diesel for delivery to Le Havre, France and 15,000 tons to Amsterdam without finding buyers.
 Russian crude and oil products now account for less than 20 percent of the company’s trading and Gunvor no longer buys crude from Rosneft, Tornqvist said.
 Berenberg Bank cut its recommendation on the shares to hold from buy, meaning that it no longer advises to acquire the stock.
 Redburn Partners LLP recommended buying the stock, raising its rating from neutral.
 agreed to buy the owner of local TV stations in a deal valued at about $16 billion.
 Investment plans won’t be hampered by Volkswagen investors’ lawsuits against Porsche stemming from the sports-car manufacturer’s bid in 2008 to buy the automaker, Hans Dieter Poetsch, chief financial officer of both companies, told journalists.
 Itau, meanwhile, has turned to faster-growing economies in Latin America in response, agreeing to buy control of Chile’s Corpbanca SA in January for $22 billion.
 Bradesco is betting on its network of more than 4,650 branches to offer mortgage loans to first-time homebuyers, payroll lending to those seeking to reduce borrowing costs and insurance products.
 Safaricom plans to buy Essar’s network base stations and transmission equipment.
 The country’s low-sulfur crude is prized by Japanese buyers as a cleaner-burning fuel for power generation.
 who recommends buying the companies’ stocks, said in a telephone interview.
 McGraw Hill returned $13 billion in share buybacks and dividends last year and Moody’s sent shareholders $11 billion.
 “I certainly appreciate shareholders that buy and hold the stock and Hochtief have been on our register for a long time” Hochtief may need to raise the premium it’s offering to other Leighton shareholders, Esho said.
 Mitsubishi UFJ completed in December the purchase of a $5 billion stake in Thailand’s Bank of Ayudhya Pcl, while Sumitomo Mitsui agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion in May.
 Among 10 equities analysts that follow Neustar, seven have hold ratings and three recommend buying the shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Avondale’s Bright, who has a target price of $60 and a buy recommendation, said the market is overestimating the danger to Neustar.
 “The split will sharpen the growth profile of the core FMC platform,” Laurence Alexander, a New York-based analyst at Jefferies Group LLC who recommends buying the shares, said today in a note.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Lloyds Banking Group Plc will step up lending to real estate buyers in mainland Europe as competition among credit providers increases in the UK.
 Multiple Offers Investors have set aside $129 billion to buy European real estate, a 7 percent increase from six months earlier, broker DTZ said in a report published on March 12.
 projects that were shunned by buyers at the start of last year are now being sold and the investors are receiving multiple offers from lenders to finance the purchases, he said.
 banks, so they can offer more attractive credit terms to buyers of the best properties, Feeney said.
 At the same time, Asian buyers of UK.
 CRN reported yesterday that Microsoft was in the final stages of talks to buy or invest in Xamarin.
 agreed last month to buy a 14 percent stake in Peugeot, Europe’s second-largest carmaker, to gain technology to develop its own brands.
 Qoros, which has a design center in Munich and engineering facilities in Graz, Austria, is tapping European expertise, including hiring former executives from VW and Bayerische Motoren Werke AG, to woo the region’s buyers.
 RBC Capital Markets analyst Dan Macdonald raised the stock’s rating to outperform, the equivalent of buy, from sector perform, with a target price of C$2100 a share.
 Possible Default “A default -- maturity extension -- on June bonds is not off the table, so we would be cautious to buy now,” said Szabo, who sold off Ukrainian debt, including corporate bonds, over the last month.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Legg Mason Inc, the money manager that has struggled with more than five years of net redemptions, agreed to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne said this week that he was scrapping a rule requiring retirees to buy annuities with their pension plan.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Press-release distributor Marketwired agreed to stop letting trading firms buy direct access to its service, joining Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s Business Wire in ending the practice.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- A three-year lending boom to car buyers with spotty credit that helped push auto sales to a six-year high is starting to show signs of overheating.
 Auto buyers are taking out longer loans and borrowing more relative to the value of the cars as lenders relax debt terms, Moody’s Investors Service said in Jan.
 “People buy Russian ETFs to create shares for shorting,” Dave Lutz, the head of ETF trading and strategy at Stifel Nicolaus & Co.
 That makes their bonds good to buy” Looking Abroad The Tokyo-based airline will get 11 new daytime take-off and landing slots from Haneda at the end of March, compared with five for Japan Airlines, the Transport Ministry said in October.
 Cormark raised its rating on the stock to speculative buy from market perform.
 The structure is being worked out and could involve buyers providing fresh capital to New York-based Diamond Castle.
 In exchange, they’re buying assets in the developed world, “which has relatively high valuations, potentially limited long-term earnings growth and where markets have just gone up rather fast” While investors should be looking for underpriced assets, following the crowd means that “in practice, investors often buy high and sell low,” Vecht said.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said last week in testimony to the Senate Banking Committee that the central bank intends to reduce asset purchases at a “measured” pace and that the bond-buying program is likely to end in the fall.
 Firms declare how many bars of gold they want to buy or sell at the current spot price, based on orders from clients and themselves.
 The price is increased or reduced until the buy and sell amounts are within 50 bars, or about 620 kilograms, of each other, at which point the fix is set.
 Traders relay shifts in supply and demand to clients during the call and take fresh orders to buy or sell as the price changes, according to the website of London Gold Market Fixing, where the results are published.
 RWE plans to close the sale of its Dea oil and gas unit by mid-year even with a gap between the price it wants and that of possible buyers, said Terium, who told an investor call atomic-fuel company Urenco Ltd.
 Lender Banco Bradesco SA may be active after Credit Suisse Group AG recommended buying the stock.
 Bernstein raised its rating on the world’s second-biggest brewer to outperform, the equivalent of buy, from market perform.
 raised its rating on the builders’ merchant to buy from neutral, citing improving volume trends and a positive economic backdrop this year.
 “Realistically, I don’t think we’ll have a decision in less than a month and a half, because we’re going to have to ask for evidence for an in-depth study” The shares had climbed earlier today to 3,295 pesos, the highest this year on a closing basis, after the government released a list yesterday of potential buyers requesting approval to bid in the auction.
 analyst recommended buying the shares because of its nascent turnaround.
 The department-store chain’s 2 percent gain in fourth-quarter comparable-store sales “bodes well” for continued sales momentum, Citigroup’s Oliver Chen said today in a note raising his rating to buy.
 Gundlach’s View Gundlach said during a webcast for investors that Treasury yields will fall as the Federal Reserve tapers its monthly bond-buying amid a slowing global economy.
March 26 (Bloomberg) -- Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, caught in a feud between Turkey’s prime minister and an Islamic cleric, posted a record gain after saying Qatar Islamic Bank was in exclusive talks to buy a stake.
 Qatar Islamic Bank, in a separate statement today, said it’s in negotiations to buy a stake in the Istanbul-based lender.
 who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Apple’s stock.
 Last month, Carl Icahn dropped his campaign urging Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 Apple also appeased hedge-fund manager David Einhorn last year by boosting its dividend and increasing buybacks.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- Electronic book buyers in the US.
 APA reached a deal with Adelaide-based Envestra in December to buy the rest of the company after raising its bid.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi has pledged to backstop the region by buying the bonds of distressed nations if they request aid.
 Addressing the issue is a priority for retailers such as Wal-Mart Stores Inc, along with state officials who say they lose as much as $23 billion in revenue a year when consumers buy goods from out-of-state sellers and don’t pay sales taxes.
 The Judiciary Committee is discussing several options, including proposals that would tax purchases based on the location of the seller, not the buyer.
 Fed Meeting The Federal Open Market Committee, which meets March 18-19, has cut monthly bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion in December.
 Maher Yaghi, analyst at Desjardins Securities, raised his rating for the stock to buy from hold due to the recent pullback in the share price.
 jumped 47 percent after the shares were upgraded to buy at Citigroup Inc.
 Tate & Lyle, owned by American Sugar Refining Inc, buys raw cane sugar from countries that have tariff-free agreements with the EU to refine it and re-sell in the bloc.
 Refiners, meanwhile, will still be constrained to buying raw cane sugar, which closed at 1823 cents a pound yesterday, from countries that have preferential deals.
 The land may lure such potential buyers as technology firms in search of office space or Chinese developers seeking US investments, according to the person, who asked not to be identified because the plans are private.
 cities such as San Francisco are appealing for their relative stability and predictable population growth, as well as their popularity among wealthy Chinese individual buyers that may be attracted to the properties.
 In April, the government may give details of a policy that will tax buyers of high-emission vehicles starting from 2015, according to a March 6 statement on the environment ministry’s website.
 Bill McDermott, who will take over as SAP’s sole chief executive officer in May, this spring plans to buy a home in Heidelberg, a 15-minute drive from the company’s headquarters in the town of Walldorf.
 McDermott understands the importance of shifting to Internet software, said Brad Zelnick, an analyst at Macquarie Capital USA in New York, who has the equivalent of a “buy” rating on SAP.
 Megaworld has 10 buy and 4 hold ratings from analysts, with an average 12-month price target of 448 pesos, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Ares last year made its biggest private-equity investment, buying luxury retail chain Neiman Marcus Inc.
 The firm started its buyout business in 2003 and oversees about $10 billion in private-equity assets, raised through five funds, including one dedicated to deals in Asia.
 Ares’s largest businesses are tradable credit, or buying and selling leveraged loans and high-yield bonds, and direct lending, a group that provides financing to mid-sized companies.
 No worrying about whether the buyer before him got a better deal.
 JPMorgan has been advising clients to buy Mylan Inc, the biggest US.
 Morgan Stanley rated Perrigo Co, a maker of generic over-the-counter medicines, the equivalent of buy on Feb.
 Fifteen out of the 29 analysts tracked by Bloomberg recommend buying Teva’s shares, the highest level since September.
 ‘Hot Topic’ “The acquisition of generic companies has now become a very hot topic,” Kolbert, who has a buy rating for Teva, said in a March 20 phone interview from New York.
 and FTSE, aren’t tied to an asset manager, presenting an obstacle to buyers wanting a pure-play benchmarking business.
 The Federal Open Market Committee, which meets March 18-19, has cut monthly bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion in December.
 Ecopetrol is seeking to buy 415,000 barrels of diesel for delivery in April.
 “While it is easy to pick an investment option in retrospect (buy Apple Inc.
 Collaboration Abu Dhabi’s Mubadala Development Co, Qatar Petroleum and Oman Oil formed the group late last year to buy as much as a 40 percent stake in Occidental’s Middle East operations.
 California Business Occidental is also planning a spinoff of its California business and will use proceeds from the transactions to buy back shares.
 Numis upgraded the UK’s second-largest bank by assets to add from hold, meaning that investors should buy the shares.
 Centrica Plc gained 21 percent to 3348 pence after HSBC raised its recommendation on the owner of British Gas to overweight, which is similar to buy, from neutral.
 Past Prologue If history is any guide, it could signal a buying opportunity.
 Acquisition Mode Zillow has grown in part through acquisitions, buying companies including Mortech Inc.
 Generali could join the other Italian shareholders of Telco, Intesa Sanpaolo SpA and Mediobanca SpA, to sell their stakes to the same buyer, Carnevale Maffe said.
 Spain’s Telefonica SA, the largest shareholder in Telco, is unlikely to buy Generali’s stake because of regulatory hurdles, Carnevale Maffe said.
 GE said it plans to make up for the spin off’s impact on earnings per share with cost cuts and efficiency gains at the industrial businesses as well as share buybacks.
 agreed to buy Maker Studios, a supplier of online video content to YouTube, for $500 million, gaining technology and experience with short-form entertainment.
 “The perception was that the Garden is back, and the fact that he’s being moved to vice chairman suggests that there’s going to be continuity,” said Maxim Group analyst John Tinker, who doesn’t own the stock and rates the shares as a “buy” Yesterday’s news doesn’t change his rating, he said.
 “The single biggest frustration with MSG is that it hasn’t committed to return capital to shareholders,” said Martin, who rates MSG “buy” and doesn’t own the shares.
 Mobile ‘Megatrend’ Apple spent $350 million buying fingerprint-sensor maker AuthenTec Inc.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- Anil Ahuja, former Asia head of private-equity firm 3i Group Plc, is seeking to raise $100 million from institutional investors for an India-focused hedge fund, saying buyouts are difficult to achieve in the country.
 The value of the real estate has been emphasized by the buyout firms meeting with banks to discuss financing for a potential buyout, said two people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 A buyout would exceed 7 billion pounds and require a group of funds to work together, they said then.
 The buyout firms are considering whether the grocer, once taken private, could be split into a property company that owns the land and a retailer that leases the space, the people said.
 Should the grocer announce similar steps next week to those being considered by the firms, interest in a buyout could diminish, the people said.
 “He can’t follow Reitzle when it comes to growth and very big acquisitions because it’s a fairly consolidated market,” said Klein, who recommends buying Linde shares.
 Kemira, which has appointed Outotec Oyj executive Jari Rosendal to replace Buechele, is already in the process of buying a paper emulsions business from BASF for an undisclosed sum.
 Akzo Nobel NV is seeking a buyer for a similar operation with about 250 million euros in annual sales, people familiar with the situation said Feb.
 Buechele passed up the chance to buy Ashland Inc’s Water Technology division this year.
 Buyout firm Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC agreed to buy the business for about $18 billion.
 Vodafone Plc underscored Spain’s attractiveness as an investment destination with the announcement this week that the world’s second-largest wireless carrier will buy cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 72 billion euros.
 ICA’s Mexican stock has 10 buys, four holds and three sells, according to analyst recommendations tracked by Bloomberg.
 If ICA is ruled to be at fault for the Golden Line, any fine could be deducted from those outstanding payments, which may be as high as 4 billion pesos ($304 million), Ana Hernandez, an Invex Casa de Bolsa analyst who recommends buying the builder’s shares, said by phone from Mexico City.
 “Obviously this situation doesn’t help the company, but I think that very soon this will become an attractive buy for investors” The builder may benefit from recently approved constitutional changes to bolster private-sector investment in the energy industry, Maizel said.
 “Nadella is trying things out,” said Moerdler, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Microsoft.
 The arbitration process was set up to assess claims from savers who say their banks failed to have properly explained the risks of buying junior debt instruments during the financial crisis.
 Spain’s 2012 banking rescue imposed losses on holders of junior debt, a procedure that proved controversial because bailed-out lenders had raised capital by selling junior debt such as preferred shares through their branch networks to customers who didn’t always know what they were buying.
 The company’s finances and increased management experience on buying companies would allow it to “easily accommodate” an acquisition of up to $4 billion, he said today.
 Honeywell will only buy companies where it can at least get a “double-digit” return on investment by the fifth year and that add to earnings in the second year, Cote said.
 “Historically the minimum price of a bond is on average between 90 days before and 90 days after the company falls into non-payment,” he said, adding that Moneda sometimes buys distressed bonds in this period.
 Code-sharing could allow passengers to “buy a ticket from anywhere in the world to a Greek airport, and then onward to water aerodromes on islands we serve” Hellenic Seaplanes has secured 165 million euros from US.
 and European private equity funds to finance plans to buy or lease 20 new planes, Charalambous said.
 Alibaba’s Taobao Marketplace, which links individual buyers and sellers, cracked down on 87 million listings that may have breached intellectual-property rules on cigarettes, clothing and medicine as it tried to address concerns by the Office of the US.
 The safeguards in place include requiring vendors to make deposits with Alibaba to ensure their products are genuine, allowing buyers and sellers to rate each other and helping consumers get refunds.
 “For some goods including wine, users could be more inclined to buy on Tmall because offline counterfeit is even worse,” Tanner said.
 A brighter outlook and a stronger balance sheet put the company in a stronger position to return cash to shareholders, which will probably be through a combination of share buybacks and special dividends, Cheshire said.
 plunged 11 percent, the most since 2012, after saying it will spend $2 billion to buy Oculus VR Inc.
 The world’s largest social network agreed to buy Oculus, which makes a ski-goggles-like device called Rift that people wear to play games and access other immersive virtual-reality experiences.
 passed only after reducing their requests for buybacks and dividends.
 Vodafone Group Plc climbed 17 percent after the world’s second-biggest wireless carrier agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 Statoil remains open to buying US.
 “Our strategy doesn’t say that we will not buy,” he said.
 Investec Plc raised its rating on the lender to buy from hold, citing the stock’s 10 percent loss since this year’s high on Jan.
 February through early April is the biggest business season for Japanese wireless operators as parents typically buy a smartphone for children who pass entrance exams for universities or high schools, Tsubouchi said.
 That deal sees them buying back the 29 percent stake in Bumi sold to ARMS and regaining control of the operator of Arutmin.
 The deal severing links between the Bakries and ARMS will result in Chairman Samin Tan doubling his holding in the London-listed company to 476 percent by buying out the Indonesian family’s interest.
 5,000 Cars BNSF jump-started the safety debate by saying last month that it wanted to buy 5,000 sturdier tank cars.
 Federal rules would ensure shippers buy the right cars, said Bob Pickel, senior vice president of sales for Hamilton, Ontario-based National Steel Car Ltd.
 By announcing its plan to buy 5,000 cars with improved safety features, BNSF wants to “help accelerate the transition to the next-generation tank car,” the railroad said in a Feb.
 The world’s biggest maker of computer mice said it will buy back up to $250 million of its shares.
 The underwriters also have a 30-day option to buy as much as $458 million in additional shares.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Nomura Holdings Inc, Japan’s largest brokerage, said it will offer as much as 104 billion yen ($102 million) to buy the shares it doesn’t already own in its Thai securities unit.
 “Our goal from the outset was to find a buyer that was interested in preserving the value of JPMorgan’s physical business,” Blythe Masters, head of the company’s global commodities operations, said in the statement.
 Masters has been occupied with negotiating the sale and will now turn to conversations with Mercuria about whether she and her managers will join the buyer, said a person with knowledge of the deal.
 Schleifer said Sanofi had reported continuing to buy Regeneron stock as recently as March 3.
 “They obviously weren’t worried about this, because they were buying our stock this week,” Schleifer said.
 to help it find a buyer and dropped the plan the same year.
 “The IPO may attract interest from foreign investors, however the fact that the company failed to find an industry investor may be a negative factor” Industry Consolidation Europe’s communications market is consolidating as Vodafone Group Plc last week agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 “I’m a bit concerned about their outlook as their strategy of holding more assets is not very clear” Man rates the stock a buy.
(Updates with closing share prices criticism by pension group from 10th paragraph) By Sarah Jones March 19 (Bloomberg) -- British insurers led by Legal & General Group Plc and Aviva Plc plunged after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules requiring retirees to buy annuities with their pension funds.
 The move will allow more retirees to access their pensions as a lump sum rather than buy the annuities insurers had been relying on to boost earnings.
 The government “estimates that currently three-quarters of individuals currently buy an annuity, and we expect that proportion to drop materially,” Jon Hocking, an insurance analyst at Morgan Stanley in London, said in an e-mailed report.
 Annuity providers will also be hurt as potential buyers wait and consider their options, he said.
 Hindenburg airship crash ended most buyer interest for decades.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Partners Group AG, one of Europe’s largest publicly traded alternative asset manager, is overhauling its teams responsible for buying stakes in leveraged buyout funds and fundraising.
 Philipp Schnyder, a managing director and former co-head of the private-equity secondaries team, which specializes in buying stakes in leveraged buyout funds, is leaving after more than a decade, having joined in 2002, a spokeswoman said by e-mail today.
March 29 (Bloomberg) -- Detroit seeks $120 million to buy police and fire department vehicles as it heads toward a July trial over how to reorganize $18 billion in debt to end the biggest municipal bankruptcy in US.
 Vodafone agreed to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG, a German cable company, last year for 75 billion euros.
 Reuters previously reported that Vodafone has reached a preliminary deal to buy Ono.
 buyout fund TPG Capital, planning to spend $1 billion in the next five years.
 Citigroup lowered the Dutch telecommunications operator to neutral from buy, meaning it no longer recommends investors purchase the stock.
 -- named the four pillar lenders for a law that prevents them from buying each other -- reported A$14 billion combined profit for their latest six-month results, about 23 percent higher than the corresponding period a year earlier, the central bank said.
 “We are in discussions with a potential buyer and if we can get the right price we will go ahead and sell it” A group led by China Minmetals is nearing an agreement to purchase Las Bambas for more than $5 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 Consumer spending brought Canada through the worst of the 2008 global financial crisis as banks avoided collapse while low interest rates and government stimulus boosted debt-fueled home buying.
 One Canadian dollar buys 9114 US.
 is in talks with Areva SA to buy an undisclosed stake in the Paris-based nuclear power company’s water desalination plant in the southern African country, spokesman Tommi Numbala said by phone.
 Comerci, as the company is known, is working with Rothschild to find a buyer, people familiar with the situation said last month.
 Mexico newspaper Reforma previously reported that Gigante may buy Comerci’s California restaurants.
 who has a buy rating on Hyundai’s stock.
 Disappointing Surprise “While a disappointing surprise, the 787 wing issue announced last Friday looks like a minor speed bump that should be fully resolved by mid-year with negligible impact on full-year results,” said von Rumohr, who rates Boeing the equivalent of a buy and lists the stock as one of his top three picks.
 None of the 30 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg have a sell rating on the stock and 22 recommend buying the shares while eight say hold.
 said after filing an involuntary bankruptcy petition against Houston Regional Sports Network LP that it was interested in buying the business that carries games for the Houston Astros professional baseball club and the Houston Rockets of the National Basketball Association.
 Yesterday, Philadelphia-based Comcast said it’s not interested in buying and won’t submit a bid.
 The bankruptcy judge put the network formally into Chapter 11 last month after efforts failed at finding a buyer.
 The bankruptcy judge didn’t buy the Astros’ argument, telling the baseball club that bankruptcy law imposes fiduciary duties on the owners so they must vote for transactions that benefit the network, even if they’re adverse to the team’s best interests.
 Checkout Holding LBO Results in Downgrade to B3 Checkout Holding Corp, the parent of Catalina Marketing Corp, was downgraded as a consequence of a leveraged buyout where Berkshire Partners LLC is acquiring majority control from Hellman & Friedman LLC.
 The case, decided on March 12 by the Seventh Circuit Court of Appeals in Chicago, involved a cattle farmer who delivered cattle to an agent for sale to a specified buyer.
 Wood looked to Illinois law and concluded that the arrangement was a bailment where the agent didn’t have the right to buy the cattle or keep the money.
 agreed to pay $33 million to settle allegations that it conspired with other makers of picture tubes used in televisions and computers to fix prices and overcharge buyers, lawyers for purchasers of the products said.
 Peer Reaction In an open letter published by La Presse and Le Devoir newspapers, 12 prominent sovereigntists including former Quebec premiers Jacques Parizeau and Bernard Landry said it would not only be “excessive” to ask him to sell his Quebecor shares, but would likely result in the sale of the company to a non-local buyer.
 who rates Energy XXI shares a buy and doesn’t own any, said today in a telephone interview.
 The deal with IBM was Twitter’s first for patent technology, not counting intellectual property gained by buying other companies.
 Ross and partners last year raised $100 million to buy as many as eight ships hauling coal, iron ore and grains through a company called Nautical Bulk Holdings Ltd, he said in November.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 “The psychology of a lot of folks is that they’re not looking to buy houses for investment anymore,” he said.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Equity International, the global real estate investment company founded by billionaire Sam Zell, sees declining values in Brazilian commercial properties as an opportunity to buy.
 will seek to buy smaller US.
 “We can certainly use our infrastructure to better manage and market those assets” By splitting off from CBS and becoming a real estate investment trust, the business will have the ability to buy competitors in the 25 biggest US.
 Buyback Currency For parent CBS, which plans to divest its stake through a tax-free transaction, the IPO and REIT conversion will provide about $5 billion for share buybacks and possible acquisitions.
 New York-based CBS, owner of the most-watched TV network, said in February it would buy back $2 billion of shares this quarter.
 The combination of buybacks and the planned exchange could shrink the number of shares in the media company by 30 percent, according to David Bank, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets.
 They have an option to buy an added 3 million CBS Outdoor shares for $28 each.
 Osisko can continue to operate as standalone company and Vancouver-based Goldcorp is trying to buy access to its Canadian Malartic gold mine without properly valuing it, Roosen said.
 Goldcorp committed not to buy any Osisko shares under the offer until April 15.
March 9 (Bloomberg) -- Royal Bank of Canada officials’ conflicts of interest tainted a $438 million buyout of Rural/Metro Corp.
 Bankers at RBC Capital Markets misled Rural/Metro directors in 2011 about the company’s value to push the board into a quick sale to buyout firm Warburg Pincus LLC, Delaware Chancery Court Judge Travis Laster concluded in a ruling.
 The March 7 decision is the latest in a series of Delaware corporate-law rulings reining in banks’ and investment firms’ conflicts in buyout cases.
 Laster ruled in 2011 Barclays Plc had conflicting interests while serving as Del Monte Foods Co’s adviser in a $53 billion sale because it also arranged financing for buyer KKR & Co.
 Rural/Metro shareholders sued over the buyout, claiming the company’s board accepted a lowball offer from Warburg after getting advice from conflicted RBC bankers, who botched the effort to shop around the emergency services company to the highest bidder.
 Anthony Munoz, an RBC banker, testified during a four-day trial in Wilmington last year that some of his colleagues continued to talk to Warburg officials about providing financing for the buyout in late March 2011 while Rural/Metro’s board was deciding whether to sell.
 In his decision, Laster found RBC bankers put on a “full-court press” to persuade Warburg officials to include the bank in its financing package for the Rural/Metro buyout while telling its client they weren’t part of the buyer’s lender group.
 Strine found Goldman executives handling of the conflicts was “disturbing” and “inadequate” Strine, now the Delaware Supreme Court’s chief justice, also found Douglas Foshee, El Paso’s chief executive officer at the time, also had conflicting interests because he’d considered pursuing a management buyout while negotiating with Kinder.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- When Steve Mollenkopf moved to San Diego in 1994 to join Qualcomm Inc, he and his wife put off buying a house while they waited to see if the then-fledgling company would make it.
 Bernstein & Co, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 Qualcomm boosted its dividend today by 20 percent to 42 cents a share and increased its stock buyback authorization by $5 billion to $78 billion.
 Gauna, like 78 percent of the analysts covering the company, has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The announcement already prompted enquiries from potential buyers, the people said.
 The unit may attract interest from buyers in China and elsewhere in Asia, as well as private equity firms.
 Qatar Islamic Bank started negotiations to buy a stake at Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, the Istanbul-based sharia-compliant lender also known as Bank Asya said in a filing to Borsa Istanbul yesterday.
 Thornton’s pay includes $5 million in cash to be used to buy Barrick stock.
 “We do buy certain products from them” Australian nickel producer Western Areas Ltd.
 1 buyer of the twin-engine A330 and is being specifically targeted by Airbus through the development of a new, shorter-range variant.
 “I shall probably increase my target price” Manibhandu has a buy rating with a price estimate of 1050 dirhams on Emaar.
 Exploring both a sale and an initial public offering of the business, known as a dual-track process, can help propel a sale by pressuring buyers to act before an IPO puts the company in the hands of public investors.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- DLA Piper LLP advised Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, on its agreement to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a 72 billion-euro ($10 billion) transaction.
 Going public or a sale to a strategic buyer could provide a financial boost as the company tries to expand overseas.
 “We are ready and keen to buy again but we remain patient for the right opportunity,” Miller said in a statement today.
 The state-run phone company is contending with falling income as customers flock to free messaging applications such as Tencent Holdings Ltd’s WeChat and buy Apple Inc.
 SipStor gives customers a limited window to buy drink packages like Absolut Elyx vodka with six branded martini glasses for 120 pounds and Havana Club Mojito packs.
 That will herald a necessity for companies to adapt the way they sell, she said, adding that “the whole retail environment we see today could start to change” While creating a website and putting in place systems to package and deliver purchases may have been costly to set up, it could be less expensive than the price of buying space to promote brands in a supermarket, Blackholly said.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Royal Ahold NV, the owner of Stop & Shop stores in the US, agreed to buy Spar AG’s business in the Czech Republic for 525 billion koruna ($266 million) to become that country’s largest food retailer.
 The Dutch company, which operates 284 stores in the Czech Republic, will buy 36 compact hyper markets and 14 supermarkets, it said today in a statement.
 The retail, which generates profit from software sales and from buying used games and consoles and reselling them for a markup, is facing rising competition from rivals both online and in stores.
 Tightening Tools The two largest shareholders of Edwards were CCMP Capital Advisors LLC, the former private-equity unit of JPMorgan Chase & Co, and Unitas Capital Pte, an Asian buyout firm.
 High-Profile The Edwards acquisition by CCMP and Unitas in 2007 was a high-profile deal conducted at the height of the buyout boom in the UK.
 carrier T-Mobile after buying No.
 5,000 Cars BNSF jump-started the safety debate by saying last month that it wanted to buy 5,000 sturdier tank cars.
 Federal rules would ensure shippers buy the right cars, said Bob Pickel, senior vice president of sales for Hamilton, Ontario-based National Steel Car Ltd.
 By announcing its plan to buy 5,000 cars with improved safety features, BNSF wants to “help accelerate the transition to the next-generation tank car,” the railroad said in a Feb.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s soccer federation says an advertising campaign by Hyundai Motor Co, which promises new car buyers an extra year of warranty if the national team wins the World Cup, breaches its intellectual property rights.
 interest rates could rise as soon as six months after the end of the central bank’s bond-buying program.
 18 after they tried to buy a family policy through the federal health insurance exchange and were denied because Ohio doesn’t recognize same-sex marriages, according to their complaint.
 Campari agreed to buy closely-held Forty Creek Distillery Ltd.
 Hall said he looked for a buyer with both North American presence and global clout following increased international demand for the whiskey, which is only available in Canada and the US.
 unit, which makes the baijiu white spirit that’s long been a staple of Chinese banquets, will focus more on selling to walk-in customers and online buyers, said James Rice, Swellfun’s managing director.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Wohnen AG, Germany’s second-largest residential landlord by market value, said 2013 profit rose 68 percent after the company took advantage of cheap financing to buy more homes.
 “We are ahead of schedule and therefore we are quite optimistic we’ll have a better situation at the end of this year” Deutsche Wohnen has been buying apartments to take advantage of rising rents, its ability to raise capital on the stock market at favorable terms, and low interest-rate loans.
 “A very strong set of results and a strong delivery on costs coupled with the potential delivery for more synergies to be realized during 2014 is likely to be well received by the market,” Heath Jansen and Jatinder Goel, analysts at Citigroup who have a buy rating and a 370 pence price estimate, wrote today in a report.
 Trustees of the ICI Pension Fund reached agreements on annuity buy-ins with Legal & General Plc and Prudential Retirement Income Ltd, the Amsterdam, Netherlands-based company said in a press release today.
 The nation’s real estate investment trusts, or J-REITs, bought property worth 223 trillion yen ($22 billion) in 2013, making them the biggest buyers of the assets, according to the Association for Real Estate Securitization.
 Investors who use Microsoft Corp’s Office software at work and then goof off with Zynga’s “Farmville” game in the evening can buy debentures linked to both software makers.
 Iliad, which Niel said tried to buy SFR itself in 2012, is also open to a merger with Bouygues Telecom should Vivendi choose Altice’s bid, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 “They’re buying machinery now as part of the process to become a big manufacturing country.
 The company, now in Nigeria, the United Arab Emirates and Oman, plans to buy ships and equipment to expand in “about 12 countries in Africa over the next five years,” Paul said in a March 7 interview.
 Japaul, based in Lagos, sees earnings rising 10 percent to 25 percent this year after slumping 59 percent to 486 million naira ($3 million) in the first nine months of 2013 as it raised short-term funds to buy assets.
 The company, which has started to import refined petroleum products for sale to Nigerian retail outlets, plans to restrict its upstream business -- relating to production -- to chartering ships for now rather than buying fields itself, Paul said.
 “We have not applied to buy any of the fields,” Paul said.
 The New York-based banks are advisers on Altice SA’s effort to acquire Vivendi’s SFR unit in a $28 billion deal, and also Vodafone’s agreement to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for $10 billion.
 For its part as an adviser to Vodafone, Morgan Stanley will split as much as $27 million with Robertson Robey Associates LLP, which separately advised the buyer’s board, Freeman’s estimates show.
 While Repsol looked at buying all of Pacific, uncertainty over the future of its largest oilfield made Repsol cautious about a deal, one of the people said.
 The trade in software, data or commands that takes advantage of computer bugs generates billions of dollars using digital storefronts that connect sellers and buyers or where mercenaries can be hired to do the job, according to the report released yesterday.
 agreed in October 2012 to buy insurer and hospital chain Amil Participacoes SA for about $49 billion, while Diagnosticos da America SA is rallying after it said in December that its biggest individual investors offered to acquire all its outstanding shares.
 The value of the deal may top Fleury’s 3 billion-real ($13 billion) market value under Brazilian securities rules that require the acquiring company to buy out minority investors when control changes hands.
 plans to enter an agreement to buy $250 million in shares from the Dutch company, the document shows.
 Ukraine has an agreement, negotiated last year by Yanukovych’s government, to buy gas at a discounted rate until the end of March.
 In a prolonged outage, gas buyers could turn to other pipeline suppliers such as Algeria and Norway or increase imports of liquefied natural gas on tankers.
 “I don’t expect we’ll see a sharp appreciation in land values in the next three years and currently there is still plenty of interest” Rodrigo still has an overweight rating on Philippine property stocks, recommending investors buy shares of Ayala Land Inc, Megaworld Corp.
 and Airtel Kenya Ltd’s joint offer to buy Essar Telecom Kenya Ltd, two days after Safaricom threatened to pull out of the deal.
 “The parties have been notified of the decision of the authority” Safaricom plans to buy Essar’s network base stations and transmission equipment.
 Cemex plans to use the proceeds of the euro notes to buy back 130 million euros of 9625 percent bonds due 2017 and 115 million euros of 8875 percent notes due 2017, according to a company statement.
 “A lot of buyers from the mainland need to spend winter here and clear out their lungs,” said Fu Zelong, a researcher at Centaline in Haikou, the provincial capital and biggest city on Hainan.
 Most were buying second or third properties outside their home cities, said Wei, who works for Verdure International Holdings Ltd, a closely held Nanjing-based developer.
 Because most housing sales in Sanya involve holiday homes, few buyers take out mortgages, according to broker Savills Plc and Centaline.
 “Even though buyers don’t take on mortgage loans for holiday homes in Sanya, the slower economy and tighter liquidity will gradually show an impact” Hainan, with an economy largely dependent on real estate and tourism, saw property investment rise 35 percent to 120 billion yuan last year from 2012, while the sales value jumped 40 percent to 103 billion yuan, according to the statistics bureau of the province.
 The world’s largest social network is rated the equivalent of buy at 41, or 80 percent, of the firms that cover the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Twitter analysts stack up more bearishly: 15 sells, or 47 percent, with 11 holds and only six buys.
 (Note to traders: Oculus VR is a closely-held company so don’t confuse it with Oculus Innovative Sciences Inc, which jumped as much as 15 percent, or Oculus VisionTech Inc, which was surged as much as 155 percent today amid confusion over exactly what Facebook was buying) Since its IPO in 2012, Facebook has completed or announced more than 40 acquisitions valued at a total of more than $21 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 ‘Something Viable’ Andrew Zamfotis at EVA Dimensions has a buy rating on Facebook and a sell on Twitter.
 The probe into Hoeness’s tax obligations started a year ago when he reported himself to authorities after lawmakers rejected a treaty that would have stopped prosecutors from buying stolen Swiss bank data with details on German account holders.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 “We are in the business to develop and produce, we’re not in the business to buy and sell” The company is the biggest owner of oil licenses in Norway after Statoil ASA, and in Europe is second to Tullow Oil Plc among the independents, or companies that don’t have refineries.
 The results come in two parts on March 20 and March 26 and help determine whether Citigroup can increase dividends and stock buybacks.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 India’s Sensex extended this quarter’s gain to 49 percent as State Bank surged after Goldman Sachs advised investors to buy the shares.
 That’s their biggest thing, confusion” Migration from analog to digital services will also be slower and more complex as the government’s position is that “even consumers with digital TV sets will be forced to buy a completely unnecessary set-top box, because the free TV signal will be encrypted,” Multichoice said in a letter in several South African newspapers.
 Hutchison held talks with Liberty Global Plc’s UPC to allow it become a virtual operator buying wholesale access from Hutchison’s network to sell phone services to customers, three people said earlier this month.
 Buyout Focus Founded in the late 1970s by Alan Patricof and Ronald Cohen, Apax made venture capital investments and then in 1993 moved into leveraged buyouts.
 Martin Halusa, who succeded Cohen as Chief Executive Officer, decided to stop investing in startup companies in 2007 and focus solely on buyouts after raising a record 112 billion euros ($156 billion) fund.
 For columns, TOP CM) March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Bentham Asset Management, whose flagship fund beat all its Australian peers over the past five years, is avoiding the nation’s “expensive” credit markets to buy asset-backed debt offshore and foreign-currency notes of local banks.
 “The deal priced at $1050, and somebody’s saying, ‘Why should I buy this at $14?’” Compugen, founded by members of an Israeli army intelligence unit that designed software to break codes, uses computer programs to discover proteins that may have the ability to treat diseases.
 18 agreed to buy brand-drug maker Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Perrigo is “going to continue to do deals and continue to supplement further growth on top of that” Perrigo said in July that it would buy Irish drug company Elan for $86 billion.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Yanzhou Coal Mining Co, China’s fourth-largest producer, abandoned a proposal to buy out its Australian unit Yancoal Australia Ltd, leading to a plunge in the subsidiary’s share price.
 Yanzhou Coal, based in Shandong province, proposed buying the rest of Yancoal in July last year, winning Australian government approval in December.
 The company will consider a buyout at a more appropriate time, he said.
 China’s private companies are now a bigger risk to investors as valuations surge, said John-Paul Smith, a Deutsche Bank AG strategist who’s been writing about the dangers of buying state-owned mainland stocks since 2010.
 And maybe over time they diversify” ‘Real Value’ Because of the steady revenue and cash flow that the consumer-targeted software generates, that business may even attract a private-equity buyer, said RBC’s Hedberg.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in a bet the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares more cheaply and pocket the difference.
 funds that buy junk bonds since 2009, according to TrimTabs Investment Research.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Haven buying in response to the euro area’s debt crisis had pushed the franc nearly to parity with the euro the month before.
 Con Edison agreed in May to buy half of two Sempra projects, the 150-megawatt Copper Mountain Solar 2 site in Nevada and a 150-megawatt solar farm in Arizona.
 It would be the largest acquisition financing for a European phone company since Telefonica SA got an 185 billion-pound ($31 billion) loan to buy UK.
 Dainippon said last year it planned to cut costs by buying more materials from overseas markets including China.
 Iron ore extended a slide into a bear market on concern a possible economic slowdown in China, the biggest buyer of the mineral and destination for about half of Vale’s shipments, will reduce demand.
 With first round bids for Ragu, which may fetch as much as $2 billion, due at the end of next week, all of the potential buyers have contacted banks to discuss their interest, the people said.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Onex Corp, Canada’s biggest buyout firm, agreed to sell insurer Warranty Group to an affiliate of TPG Capital in a deal valuing the company at $15 billion, more than tripling its money.
 With six works sold during the VIP preview he said “It definitely lived up to our expectations” Wealthy buyers are flocking to art after prices surged in the past decade, beating asset classes such as US.
 who objected to a $790 million buyout in 2007 by Blackstone Group.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- Intu Properties Plc, the UK’s largest shopping-mall owner, agreed to buy three retail centers from Westfield Group for 8678 million pounds ($14 billion) including working capital.
 Demand in China is starting to emerge from industries including construction and power, and some fabricators are considering buying more copper due to increased orders and lower prices, according to a survey by Macquarie Group Ltd.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- Wumart Stores Inc, a Chinese supermarket operator, said founder Zhang Wenzhong increased his stake in the company, prompting a mandatory buyout offer at HK$498 for each Hong Kong-listed share.
 The buyout offer was triggered after Zhang increased his stake in Beijing Wangshang Shijie E-business Co, which owns 125 percent of Wumart’s shares, according to the filing.
 this year, agreed to buy another 726 million shares held by its parent for about $3445 a share.
 The agreement to buy back shares, announced this week, is “a favorable development,” Jay Gelb, an analyst at Barclays Plc, said in a March 18 report.
 Described by Canada’s industry minister as having the potential to be the country’s fourth national wireless carrier, Quebecor took advantage of a lack of competition in a 700-megahertz spectrum auction last month to buy access to radio waves in British Columbia, Alberta and Ontario.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 He downgraded the stock to the equivalent of a neutral rating from a buy.
 and Airbus SAS, the world’s two biggest planemakers, both count on Asian airlines to buy more aircraft in the next two decades.
 Lion Air agreed to buy 230 Boeing 737 planes in 2012 and followed that with an order for 234 Airbus planes last year.
 Investors should buy Spanish five-year notes against similar-maturity Treasuries after the ECB left its key rate unchanged at last week’s meeting, Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc strategists Harvinder Sian, Michael Michaelides and Marco Brancolini in London wrote in an e-mailed note to clients.
 “We continue to be long periphery and the ECB inertia is a buying opportunity,” the London-based strategists wrote.
 It is visited by more than 11 million car buyers a month, according to the Chicago-based venture’s website.
 Liberty Broadband will include the company’s 25 percent stake in Charter, the cable provider that made an unsuccessful proposal to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Liberty, which already owns 53 percent of Sirius, had offered earlier this year to buy the satellite-radio carrier’s remaining shares.
 He acquired his Charter stake last year with an eye toward making further investments in the industry, only to be thwarted by Comcast’s surprise agreement to buy Time Warner Cable for $452 billion.
 Acquiring Subscribers Charter is considering buying some of the 3 million subscribers that Comcast plans to sell following the acquisition of Time Warner Cable, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 The satellite-radio company was sued in January by two shareholders contending that directors violated their duties to get the best price in the buyout by parent Liberty.
 Sirius announced today that it will resume its share buyback program.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Societe Generale SA, France’s second-largest bank, said it is seeking to buy the free-floating shares of Boursorama SA, valuing the online bank and broker at 105 billion euros ($146 billion).
 “This is a platform with a proven track record, deep trust with the buy-side, and they are set up to really change the industry” IEX opened for business on Oct.
 Those buyers have found a way in, lured by the biggest rally in high-yield municipal bonds in five years.
 Activity Examined The investment floor is intended to limit holders to professional buyers, who typically have analysts reviewing credit risk, said Haines, who teaches municipal finance at the Maurer School of Law at Indiana University in Bloomington.
 Investors are buying junk-rated munis for their higher yields as a growing US.
 Orion and AEW are trying to buy the 25 percent stake in Madrid-based Realia held by the Bankia Group and the 369 percent owned by Fomento de de Construcciones y Contratas, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 “But as we go forward, we suspect that we’re going to see volumes increased” Lennar builds homes for first-time and move-up buyers, retirees and multiple-generation households in 18 states.
 Any buyers of this oil would incur penalties, the State Department said in a statement yesterday.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Aurelius Capital Management LP, the distressed-debt investor that has battled the government of Argentina and some of Wall Street’s biggest buyout firms, is drawing support for its claims that a mobile-phone carrier in Latin America effectively subordinated some of its obligations.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- House flipper Greg Hebner expects to rake in about 30 percent profit in eight months, more than twice the return of the Standard and Poor’s 500 Index, as he seeks a buyer for his latest makeover.
 Arixa Capital Advisors LLC, Oaktree Capital Group LLC and Auctioncom LLC are offering short-term financing to buy and renovate properties at a time banks are reluctant to extend credit for speculative real estate deals.
 Genesis Loans Thomas James typically invests 20 percent of its own money to buy and remodel a home, with lenders providing the balance, Beadel said.
 The loans, which average 137 days in duration, are used for as much as 70 percent of the cost buying the properties it sells.
 Shell agreed to sell holdings valued at more than $45 billion, including in Australia and Brazil, and is seeking buyers for stakes in oil and gas fields, as well as pipeline and fuel-marketing assets from the US.
 The BOJ’s unprecedented buying of more than 7 trillion yen ($69 billion) of bonds a month is eroding profits on lending.
 “Members noted that construction firms were optimistic about the outlook and had reported a pick-up in enquiries from prospective new home buyers” The average home price in Australia’s biggest cities rose 95 percent in the year to Feb.
 Tough Job One of the toughest jobs for any exchange is figuring out whether customers can buy a private plan and if so, whether they’ll get a discount on the premium, based on their income.
 The fund will buy loans that have been in default for three months or more from Peruvian financial institutions at 3 percent of face value, allowing Crowdcredit to potentially collect double or triple the initial cost as creditors repay, he said.
 A record of more than 16,000 call options giving the right to buy the exchange-traded fund changed hands last week as prices for bullish contracts rose to a three-year high compared with puts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Options traders started buying calls on the Teucrium Corn Fund as it rebounded from last year’s decline of 31 percent, according to Fred Ruffy of New York-based Trade Alert LLC.
 The buying has pushed implied volatility, used to gauge the cost of options, up 42 percent on the ETF since Jan.
 The ratio of calls to buy the ETF versus puts to sell has climbed 173 percent this year with bullish contracts outnumbering bearish ones by 35-to-1, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “People are buying upside calls in the ETF and the positioning is bullish,” Terry Wilson, an equity derivatives strategist at Credit Suisse Group AG, said in an interview.
 to find buyers for its one-third stake in the Luna Energy Facility, a 600-megawatt natural gas-fired plant that as a whole is worth as much as $700 million, said the people, asking not to be identified as the information is private.
 Freeport is cutting spending and seeking asset sales to cut debt after buying two oil and gas companies last year for $9 billion.
 last year agreed to buy Continental Energy Systems LLC’s New Mexico gas operation.
 Freeport plans to keep buying power from the plant, one person said.
 “He got closer without having to buy additional shares or engage in an expensive proxy battle” To contact the reporter on this story: Duane D.
March 10 (Bloomberg) -- Chiquita Brands International Inc, owner of the namesake banana label, agreed to buy Ireland’s Fyffes Plc to create the world’s biggest supplier of the fruit for about 403 million euros ($559 million).
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Back in May 2011, investors were giddy about the chance to buy a piece of Renren Inc.
 Zamfotis, an analyst at evaDimensions LLC in New York, raised his recommendation on the stock to buy on March 6.
 Alibaba offered last month to buy the shares it doesn’t already own in AutoNavi Holdings Ltd, a Chinese online map content provider.
 Louis and recommends buying the shares, said in a phone interview.
 “They’re looking for someone with the appropriate background and experience” Jacob joined Target’s Dayton department-store division in 1984 as a buyer and left two years later, according to her profile on the retailer’s website.
 Vodafone this month agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 72 billion euros ($10 billion) including debt.
 The number of aircraft the Pentagon plans to buy is 409 fewer than called for originally.
 “It’s probably some short covering or rotational buying, but I don’t think it’s time for developers’ turnaround yet” Galaxy Entertainment Group Ltd, controlled by billionaire Lui Che-woo, declined 28 percent to HK$72 after the casino operator’s fourth-quarter profit missed estimates.
 The Fed Open Market Committee will further scale back its bond-buying program at its two-day meeting that ends today, reducing purchases for the third time by $10 billion to a $55 billion monthly rate, according to the median estimate of 54 economists surveyed by Bloomberg from March 14-17.
 In response, some of the biggest Middle East producers are turning to Asian nations to lock in buyers as the easing of sanctions on Iran brings more oil into the market.
 “Therefore, they are keen on long-term contracts with Asian buyers prior to the lifting of sanctions on Iran” India, which imported about 185 million metric tons (37 million barrels a day) of crude in the year ended March 2013, gets about 63 percent of its requirement from Middle East suppliers including Saudi Arabia, Kuwait, Iraq, Iran, the United Arab Emirates, Qatar, Oman and Yemen, according to data from India’s Ministry of Oil.
 “That in turn further exacerbated the foreclosure crisis initially caused by the predatory subprime lending itself” HSBC Mortgage Services Inc, which used “bulk underwriters” to buy subprime loans from third-party originators, approved loans for borrowers who were gardeners or worked for McDonald’s and reported $90,000 in annual income, according to the complaint.
 GE said it plans to make up for the spin off’s impact on earnings per share with cost cuts and efficiency gains at the industrial businesses as well as share buybacks.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- CarVal Investors LLC, the credit investment unit of commodities trader Cargill Inc, plans to raise $2 billion to buy distressed investments as banks need to sell assets to meet regulatory requirements.
 The fund will buy corporate bonds, loan portfolios and structured products mostly in Western Europe and the US, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the fundraising is private.
 Forrest, the company’s 52-year-old billionaire founder, snapped up an additional A$49 million ($45 million) of shares last week, buying some the day iron ore plunged the most since August 2009.
 China buys about 60 percent of seaborne iron ore.
 The Marine Corps plans to buy about 340 of the aircraft, which can take off like a conventional fighter and land like a helicopter.
 and Italy also plan to buy it.
 The buyers, who include company Chairman Yuzhu Shi, Baring Private Equity Asia Ltd.
 Last month, Bloomberg News reported the buyers were seeking an $850 million, five-year acquisition loan to fund the deal, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 The two private-equity firms said in recent filings that regulatory guidelines may limit the amount of loans they can access to finance buyouts.
 ‘May Suffer’ Private-equity firms use loans to back their leveraged buyouts, as well as invest in the debt directly through their credit units.
 Regulatory Micromanaging Leon Black, Apollo’s founder, criticized regulators’ proposed clampdown on debt levels in leveraged buyouts during a February conference.
 “A default -- maturity extension -- on June bonds is not off the table, so we would be cautious to buy now,” said Szabo, who sold off Ukrainian debt, including corporate bonds, over the last month.
 upgraded the shares to buy from hold as the company reached an agreement with the Prudential Regulation Authority to reduce its internal loan to 22 billion pounds by the end of 2015.
 ‘Hugely Significant’ “We view this has hugely significant for Aviva and as a consequence, combined with better-than-anticipated results, we upgrade to buy,” Barrie Cornes, a Panmure analyst, said in a note to clients today.
 Sales of the Cruze, which has been well received by critics and car buyers, rose 44 percent in the US.
 With foreigners buying the fewest Treasuries last year since 2006, domestic buyers have added $33 billion of bonds, according to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 government debt as central banks and reserve managers tried to diversify away from dollar-based assets on speculation the Fed’s policy of printing money by buying bonds would debase the greenback.
 can limit the risk any reduction in their buying will trigger a sudden surge in borrowing costs for the government, companies and consumers.
 The reduction in buying comes amid concern the Fed’s stimulus, which has flooded the US.
 bond buyers has occurred this year as yields on the highest-rated company bonds have fallen to a level that doesn’t justify the additional risk, said Thomas Graff, who manages $36 billion of fixed-income assets at Brown Advisory Inc.
 corporate pensions are 95 percent funded on average, the funds are buying long-term government bonds to match liabilities and eliminate the risk of future deficits.
 “You’d rather jump on board with them than get run over by them” Fed Chair Janet Yellen also rattled bond investors after saying on March 19 that the central bank’s benchmark interest rate, which has been close to zero percent since 2008, may rise about six months after it stops buying bonds.
 Investors are also agitating for money to be spent on growth rather than buying back shares.
 The Fed’s buying of assets, launched in 2008 and continuing to the tune of $65 billion a month today, eased global financing conditions and risk aversion among investors, making it easier for companies to raise funds.
 It expects to generate as much as $14 billion in infrastructure asset sales to reduce debt and buy back shares.
 “They surpassed their production target and reduced costs,” Maria Adelaida Velasquez, an analyst at Serfinco, said by phone from Medellin after starting coverage of the company this week with a buy recommendation.
 Record Output The company, which is considering another overseas listing, agreed to buy Petrominerales Ltd.
 Sales of midstream assets are expected to continue through next year, the proceeds from which would be used to reduce debt and buy back shares, the company said today.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Shanghai housewife Yang Huaixin began buying organic food from farms on the outskirts of the metropolis not long after a relative had a brush with cancer.
 Yang, the Shanghai housewife, was so convinced about the importance of au-naturel that she started an online group buying club.
 Members buy organic products in bulk to lower the high costs.
 “Younger buyers like us know better.
 Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital acquired the company in a $307 billion buyout in 2008, just as the financial crisis gripped Las Vegas.
 Exports from Russia to Europe jumped to the highest level in three weeks as buyers built up stocks while UK.
 “A year from now, whoever buys it for the long term knows they will face competition again as new bonds come with a higher premium,” Spielkamp said by phone from Miami.
 “Given the economic turnarounds and continued low inflation picture, we favor buying” Spanish 10-year bonds, Chris Attfield, a strategist at HSBC in London, wrote in a note to clients.
 corporate profits that have helped spur speculation over whether the Federal Reserve will speed the pace at which it tapers its bond-buying program.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Two of Russia’s top billionaires are taking advantage of the bear-market collapse to buy back shares on the cheap.
 Vagit Alekperov, chief executive officer at oil producer OAO Lukoil and Russia’s 11th-wealthiest man, has stepped up his purchases of the stock, buying $147 million in the first quarter, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Mailru Group Ltd, the Internet company controlled by Alisher Usmanov, Russia’s richest man, said yesterday it plans to buy $45 million of its own stock.
 The company resumed its share buyback program as the “current share price significantly diverges from the intrinsic value,” Chief Executive Officer Leonid Mikhelson said.
 The risk is still there” Mailru agreed to buy 12 percent of Russia’s biggest social network VKontakte, raising its stake to 52 percent, and started to buy $45 million of its own stock in an employee incentive program, the company said in statements yesterday.
 “The volatility in the markets caused by political events allowed the employee benefit trust an opportunity to buy stock at what we consider a good valuation,” Mailru’s Chief Financial Officer Matthew Hammond wrote in an e-mail yesterday from Dubai.
 The program “looks to buy GDRs in the market when we consider it a good price,” he said.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The central bank has reduced monthly bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion in December.
 The global explorer, which has announced discoveries off the coast of Mozambique that may contain 70 trillion cubic feet of natural gas, has signed initial agreements with some buyers to sell the gas using a formula that combines Henry Hub and world oil prices and factors in costs for shipping and treatment, Walker said.
 “As a producer, I’m not as sensitive to that as the buyer,” Walker said of the pricing models.
 Lee, who worked for JPMorgan for 15 years, is among almost two dozen Wall Street strategists who try to predict the direction of the stock market and advise investors on which companies to buy and sell.
 He had one of the highest year-end forecasts for the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, telling investors last week to stay bullish and buy health-care, technology and financial stocks.
 Ergen has said he acted only for himself in buying the debt and made no “false representations” He characterized the lawsuit as an illicit ploy to help Falcone keep control of LightSquared in bankruptcy and said the case has cost tens of millions of dollars, eating into creditors’ recoveries.
 With six works sold during the VIP preview he said “Itdefinitely lived up to our expectations” Wealthy buyers are flocking to art after prices surged inthe past decade, beating asset classes such as US.
 Banks stand to earn lucrative fees for underwriting leveraged loans, which are issued to back buyouts and help companies refinance existing debt.
 “Prices have got so low that some people started buying again, but that was just it, just a correction” The Ibovespa closed yesterday at its highest since Feb.
 Proceeds will be applied to the balance sheet as Dow doesn’t plan on buying “anything of size,” Liveris said.
 After Third Point announced its stake in January, Dow tripled its share buyback program to $45 billion and raised its dividend.
 Lee, who worked for JPMorgan for 15 years, is among almost two dozen Wall Street strategists who try to predict the direction of the stock market and advise investors on which companies to buy and sell.
 He had one of the highest year-end forecasts for the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, telling investors last week to stay bullish and buy health-care, technology and financial stocks.
 CTBC agreed to buy Tokyo Star from holders including Lone Star Funds, Shinsei Bank Ltd.
 to consider a takeover and offered to buy the company with an investor group for about $46 billion.
 “Jonathan’s experience as a sell-side real estate analyst, buy-side investor, and Mack-Cali stockholder will be valuable,” William Mack, Mack-Cali’s chairman, said in the statement.
 Yellen indicated the Fed’s bond-buying program will wind down by year-end as forecast and a rate increase could follow in about six months.
 “Getting to 1 percent in 2015 is a real baby step” The Fed has undertaken three rounds of bond-buying since 2008 under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy, swelling its balance sheet to a record $42 trillion to boost the economy.
 We expect to receive the official decision” CEZ, EVN and Energo-Pro denied wrongdoing, saying the situation was created by a regulator’s decision in 2012, which enabled National Electricity not to refund the full amount paid by the distributors to buy energy from wind and solar power producers.
 “When the glass is half empty, every exploration play is deemed to be a failure until proven otherwise” Stoking Demand At PDAC, which was attended by more than 25,000 people for a fourth straight year, Grondin is looking for investors to buy as much as C$3 million ($27 million) of convertible bonds so he can make mining acquisitions.
 “They want to spend money not only to buy luxury goods, they also want quality entertainment, quality content” China Media Capital started in 2009 with an initial fund size of 5 billion yuan ($803 million) from investors including China Development Bank Corp.
 The company will pay for them using a 400-million-pound ($660 million) fund which it sets aside for buyouts globally each year, he said.
March 15 (Bloomberg) -- Gil Dezer, a Miami-area developer, five years ago had 850 unsold condominiums on his hands and almost $500 million in loans coming due as credit markets froze and buyers disappeared.
 All buyers placed deposits of 30 percent in cash -- seed money Dezer relied on to gauge interest in the project on Sunny Isles Beach.
 “We wanted to reconfigure and go after a buyer that is not as financially sensitive,” said Dezer, whose previous condos started at $900,000.
 With construction lending tight and memories fresh of speculators who walked away when mortgage financing dried up, builders are funding projects with cash commitments from buyers of as much as 60 percent of the purchase price.
 Last year, Pierce found the buyer for a penthouse at Ian Schrager’s Residences at the Miami Beach Edition.
 That suggests that buyer deposits back up much of today’s building, according to Peter Zalewski, founder of CraneSpotters.
 “It’s a good way to measure real buyers,” said Carlos Rosso, president of the condo division for the Related Group of Florida, which wrote down $1 billion in losses in 2008.
 All are being funded with buyer deposits of at least 50 percent, he said.
 “If we don’t have those real buyers, we’d rather not build the building,” Rosso said.
 “And what we saw in the last cycle is that the buyers could not care that they had these contractual obligations to close” A large cash commitment “lets you sleep at night” because a buyer is less likely to walk away, said Diego Ojeda, vice president of Rilea Group, which revived its Bond 1080 Brickell after shelving the downtown Miami project in 2007.
 “When the music stops, everything will be real and paid for” Rilea broke ground on the British-themed project in January after 60 percent of the apartments had been sold to buyers who agreed to put down half of the purchase price.
 With so many towers rising along the beaches, Zalewski last week began offering boat trips to prospective buyers in addition to his weekly bus tours of Miami-area project sites.
 In nearby Aventura, Property Markets Group is collecting 60 percent deposits from buyers interested in its 190-unit Echo Aventura.
 Fifty percent cash deposits are required at his 47-unit Faena House, where Blankfein and Black are among the buyers, two people familiar with the deals said in December.
 Ninety percent of the buyers have a primary residence in New York.
 Within a month of starting sales, more than 70 percent of the units were under contract to buyers who put down half of the $250,000-plus purchase price, Carlos Melo said.
 ‘Money Losers’ As builders turn to wealthy buyers for funding, much of the region’s new construction is out of reach for local residents, said Jack McCabe, CEO of McCabe Research and Consulting, which advises developers and lenders on the South Florida market.
 With more than 20,000 units on the way, just three years after investors absorbed a similar number, McCabe said he questions if there are enough multimillionaires in the world who want to buy condos in South Florida.
 Luxury developers sometimes form private partnerships with lenders to assist buyers seeking financing.
 All buyers agreed to put down 60 percent.
 On Sunny Isles Beach, a buyer interested in the Mansions at Acqualina’s Palazzo D’Oro penthouse would have to put down half of the purchase price, listed at $55 million, said Michael Goldstein, who oversees sales and marketing for the project, built by local developers Jules and Edmond Trump.
 More than half the buyers at the Mansions of Acqualina are from Canada and the US, including hedge-fund managers and two owners at Manhattan’s 15 Central Park West, according to Goldstein.
 The bank is considering a different strategy than buying large companies to take them private, which was popular before the financial crisis, Friedman said.
 ‘Not Happening’ “What we’re looking at is actually buying mid-sized companies or making early-stage investments and growing companies, as opposed to what happened in 2005 through 2007, which was a buying spree of taking companies private,” Friedman said.
 Felipe Dutra, the company’s chief financial officer, said last week that after it pays down debt and reduces its leverage ratio to 2, “you should expect us to be combining a dividend and buyback to keep capital structure around the optimum level, provided there is no M&A, which we can never predict” Acquisitions remain “a core competency, and we will always be ready to look at opportunities when and if they arise,” Dutra said.
 Government Pressure A deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Bitcoin users can now buy merchandise from Lord & Taylor department stores using a mobile software application, the latest step by startups to make the virtual currency useful in the physical world.
 Benchmark Price Utilities in Japan, the world’s second-biggest buyer of thermal coal, agreed to pay $95 a ton for annual supplies in 2013.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- Zijin Mining Group Co, China’s biggest gold miner by market value, is studying a move into shale gas and will target buying “super” mines after falling bullion prices and rising costs cut its earnings.
 Zijin Mining will spend about 8 billion yuan to buy mining companies or mines, targeting “super large mines,” it said, without giving a timeframe.
 The company is looking to buy gold projects with more than 100 metric tons of metal reserves, and copper projects with more than 1 million tons of such reserves, he said.
 “A year from now, whoever buys it for the long term knows they will face competition again as new bonds come with a higher premium,” Spielkamp said by phone from Miami.
 said it will be a strong year for buying distressed loans as consumer debts sour at a faster rate.
 NBNK, created in 2010 to acquire bank assets, lost out to Co-Operative Bank to buy 632 branches of Lloyds in 2012.
 Mexico City-based Alsea agreed in September to buy Vips, which has 362 diner-style restaurants, from Wal-Mart de Mexico SAB for 82 billion pesos ($620 million).
 Nine of 17 analysts rate Alsea a buy, with six holds and two sell recommendations.
 The ratio of outstanding calls giving the right to buy versus puts to sell was 112-to-1, near the highest level since October, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 buyout firm Warburg Pincus LLC, surged 23 percent to 370 pence on its London trading debut.
 The CBOE’s new policy affects firms known as trading permit holders, CBOE’s term for individuals and companies that have permission to buy and sell at the exchange.
 The company has expanded by buying smaller names instead of developing its own lines, including the purchases of closely held Smashbox four years ago and Aveda Corp.
 Murad products are sold at Sephora, the cosmetics chain owned by LVMH Moet Hennessy Louis Vuitton SA, and buying Murad would boost Estee Lauder’s presence in specialty beauty retail, Wu said.
 With a record $17 billion in cash at the end of last quarter, the company could increase its dividend or buy back shares instead of doing a deal and still satisfy shareholders, she said.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA, the second-largest Brazilian steelmaker by market value, rose the most in more than five years after the company said it will buy back as much as 10 percent of its freely traded shares.
 The board of CSN, the worst performer of the 73 stocks in the Ibovespa this year through yesterday, approved the buyback of as many as 702 million shares, or 10 percent of the free float of the company, the steelmaker said in a regulatory filing late yesterday.
 “A pledge to buy so many shares in such a short period of time will sure keep the stock rising for a while,” Joao Pedro Brugger, who helps oversee 400 million reais ($170 million) at Leme Investimentos Ltda, said in a phone interview from Florianopolis, Brazil.
 “I consider us pioneers in this industry, and that’s why people should be long-term holders” The company currently buys fuel-cell stacks from Ballard Power Systems Inc, based in Burnaby, British Columbia, and plans to source the components from a second supplier and also begin making its own this year.
 in New York who recommends buying the stock.
 ‘Make Sense’ “The factors likely make sense and don’t affect the longer term,” Schick, who recommends buying the shares, said today in a note to clients.
 The previous buyback program expired in January.
 The company has struggled to repair its balance sheet after a $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008.
 Credit-default swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The pitch probably won’t quiet regulators’ qualms about his plan to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 After buying control of third-largest US.
 ‘Real World’ It’s not clear that Sprint, of Overland Park, Kansas, needs to buy T-Mobile to shake up the market in the “very appealing ways” Son described, John Bergmayer, senior staff attorney with the Washington-based policy group Public Knowledge, said in an e-mail.
 The deal also gave Walgreen and Alliance Boots the right to buy as much as 7 percent of AmerisourceBergen’s equity in the open market.
 The number of outstanding calls to buy the stock rose to 278,275 on March 5, near the highest since July 2012, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 downgraded America Movil shares to neutral from buy, saying the law will hurt profits.
 Sina Weibo earned a profit in the fourth quarter for the first time, as the business attracted more companies to buy advertisements on the platform.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- Jive Investments Holding Ltd, the biggest buyer of distressed assets in Brazil, is starting the first fund that will invest solely in troubled real estate in the country.
 soared on a plan to buy its parent’s assets.
 The deal with IBM was Twitter’s first for patent technology, not counting intellectual property gained by buying other companies.
 “Internet retailers continue to do very well as they gain share from traditional retail” Tsang lifted his share-price estimate for Vipshop by 29 percent to $162 this month, while keeping the equivalent of a buy recommendation for the stock.
 Pension fund shareholders including Previ, which rejected a Cosan offer in 2012 to buy a stake, are pushing for better terms as they assess the value of the logistics assets that Cosan is offering as payment, said the people.
 Consumers who buy electronic devices such as tablets or smartphones would also be subject to the tax, even if they never use the devices to make copies, PC World said.
 The Charlotte, North Carolina-based bank agreed to buy Merrill in September 2008, two months before its advice to the Irish government.
 raised its rating on the financial services provider to buy from neutral.
 Cerberus Capital Management LP’s Albertsons agreed to buy the grocery-store operator for about $40 a share in a deal that may face federal antitrust review.
 Some of the nontraditional buyers who feasted on Puerto Rico two weeks ago are just now finding out how small the market is, and how illiquid munis can be.
 WestJet has 11 buy ratings from analysts and five holds, with a consensus 12-month target price of C$3033, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 delivered seven jets to Russian buyers in 2013, a year when US.
 OAO Gazprom says it provides about 30 percent of the natural gas that powers electricity generators, furnaces and factories across the region, and Europe buys about a third of the 42 million barrels of crude OAO Rosneft pumps daily.
 Plane Purchases Boeing’s 2013 industry outlook estimated that the countries in the Commonwealth of Independent States, including Russia, Ukraine and Belarus, will buy 1,170 aircraft worth $140 billion over the next 20 years.
 German Precedent “The market seems to be buying the reunification idea more and more,” said Huh Nam Kwon, who helps oversee about $77 billion as the chief investment officer at Shinyoung Asset in Seoul and started the unification fund this month after outperforming 84 percent of peers tracked by Bloomberg the past year with the Shinyoung Marathon Securities Investment Trust Equity fund.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Conditions are ripe for more hostile takeovers in mining as buyers capitalize on share prices that plunged last year, while targets hold out for more amid a glimmer of recovery.
 “Eventually every market gets locked” when buyers and sellers can’t agree, Elishis said yesterday in an interview.
 recommended buying the stock, boosting its rating from sell.
 Stimulus Outlook Yellen said the bond-buying program used to stimulate the US.
 added the mainland real-estate company to its conviction buy list.
 The central bank’s bond-buying program, which was reduced by another $10 billion to a $55 billion monthly rate yesterday, will be wound down by year-end with a key rate increase to follow within six months, Fed Chair Janet Yellen indicated.
 CME Group Inc, which had approached Barclays about buying the Index, Portfolio and Risk Solutions unit last year, is expected to make an offer, one of the people said, asking not to be identified because the matter isn’t public.
 Banks can fail on both qualitative and quantitative grounds, prompting regulators to oppose capital payouts through dividend increases or stock buybacks.
 The underwriters marketed the securities to non-traditional buyers of municipal bonds, including hedge funds.
 The yields were also lower than the expectations of some investors, who last month speculated that Puerto Rico would have to pay yields of 10 percent or more to attract buyers willing to take on the risk.
 Fabian said the borrowing buys Puerto Rico some time to seek ways to fix its long-running budget shortfalls.
March 19 (Bloomberg) -- Siebert Financial Corp, whose late founder Muriel Siebert was the first woman to buy a seat on the New York Stock Exchange, is exploring a sale, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 to seek a buyer and could fetch more than $50 million in a sale, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the matter is not public.
 Their growth has been fantastic” Cloud Demand Last year marked the biggest buying spree for Web-based software makers since 2007, with about $16 billion of deals, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Data Providers FactSet, which has a market value of $46 billion, and $14 billion Fiserv are among the financial data providers that also could be interested in buying Envestnet to expand into software for financial advisers, according to Houston.
 Dana Grosser, a spokeswoman for Oaks, Pennsylvania-based SEI Investments, and Michael Amenta of Norwalk, Connecticut-based FactSet, said the companies don’t comment on takeover speculation, when asked whether they’re interested in buying Envestnet.
 A buyer would get a company that’s projected to boost revenue 66 percent to $403 million over the next two years, according to analysts’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 It’s time for Audi to come up with something more courageous again” Audi models in recent years have been dominated by a large front grille, dubbed the singleframe, with design differences between vehicles becoming less pronounced as the world’s second-largest maker of premium cars opted for a conservative approach meant to avoid alienating established buyers.
 Design for the first time replaced fuel economy as the most important selling point after reliability, according to a survey of German buyers by researcher Deutsche Automobil Treuhand.
 As the automaker works on new models in the coming years, analysts say the premium automaker should remember its own catch-phrase, “progress through technology” “It’s really about time that Audi lives up to its ‘Vorsprung durch Technik’ slogan again,” said Frank Schwope, a Hanover-based NordLB analyst who recommends buying VW shares.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 Seasonal Swing If history is any guide, it could signal a buying opportunity.
 The extra yield buyers demand to own 30-year bonds instead of two-year debt fell yesterday to 324 percentage points, the least since June, Bloomberg data show.
 Solar Required Utilities have been buying solar projects because they must -- not because it’s the most economical.
 The state’s three largest utilities are close to buying 20 percent of their power from renewables and have identified projects to meet their 2020 targets for 33 percent, according to a report last month from California electricity regulator.
 “We see First Solar facing a big hole to fill as this demand driver wanes,” Lee, the Goldman analyst, wrote in the report to clients when he downgraded First Solar to sell from buy.
 Crew’s buyout three years ago and would value the company at 21 times its $24 billion in estimated sales for the fiscal year ended last month, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 as power companies meet state requirements and don’t need to buy more solar energy.
 Utilities in California, Arizona and other large solar markets are already meeting state mandates for buying solar power, slowing demand for new First Solar projects.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- Phoenix Group Holdings gained the most in about eight months in London trading after Standard Life Plc said it’s in advanced talks to buy Ignis Asset Management.
 Aberdeen Asset Management Plc agreed to buy Lloyds Banking Group Plc’s Scottish Widows Investment Partnership unit for 560 million pounds in November.
 government announced plans to scrap rules that forced retirees to buy annuities with their pension funds.
 acquisition last month, agreeing to buy Global Index Advisors, which will help boost its assets in North America to more than $50 billion.
 “If it continues to improve, which is what we expect it will be, then the growth will in fact be 5 to 55 percent” Malaysia saw a reversal in portfolio flows last year after investors pared holdings in emerging markets on expectations the Fed would trim its stimulative bond-buying program as the US.
 Banks issue short-term securities and use the proceeds to buy longer-maturity local-government obligations, profiting from the difference in interest rates.
March 20 (Bloomberg) -- After losing a bidding war for SFR, France’s second-biggest mobile carrier, Bouygues SA’s best move may be to turn from buyer to seller.
 While the failed bid included an agreement to have rival Iliad SA buy parts of Bouygues’s phone business to preempt antitrust concerns, Iliad is open to discussing a purchase of the entire Bouygues Telecom unit, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Iliad, now France’s fourth-largest wireless operator, could move into third place by buying Bouygues Telecom.
 Competing Bids Bouygues wanted to buy SFR to create a carrier of more than 21 million contract wireless customers, closing a gap with market leader Orange SA.
 In Spain, Vodafone Group Plc agreed to buy cable provider Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a $10 billion deal this week.
 “Moving all the coal ash ponds could be a substantial cost,” said Kit Konolige, a New York-based analyst for BGC Partners LP who rates Duke shares at buy and owns none.
 ‘Disturbingly Cozy’ “It’s about time someone took a hard look at the disturbingly cozy relationship that Duke Energy has been buying from its regulators in North Carolina and elsewhere,” Gabriel Wisniewski, energy campaign director for Greenpeace, said in a Feb.
 The company, backed by Warren Buffett and Mario Gabelli, did spend $860 million last year to buy New Young Broadcasting Holding Co.
 “It’s like buying and selling insurance as you are dropping from the airplane and not sure if you packed the parachute or not,” Kirill Yankovskiy, director for equity sales at UralSib in London, said of the trading spike.
March 24 (Bloomberg) -- New Jersey Assemblyman Tim Eustace, a Democrat from Maywood, said he has introduced a bill to allow consumers to buy electric cars directly from a manufacturer.
 Australian Mines “We’re both a seller and a buyer of coking coal and we are looking at a range of $125 to $135 a ton for the quarter,” said K.
 Tata Steel in India buys about half of its coking coal requirement from external suppliers.
 Steel Authority imports more than 70 percent, while JSW buys almost all of its needs.
March 22 (Bloomberg) -- Tencent Holdings Ltd, China’s largest Internet company by market value, agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in E-House China Holdings Ltd’s Leju Holdings Ltd, as it adds services through its messaging application.
 Tencent this month agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce site JDcom Inc.
 FuelCell has doubled since November and Plug is up ninefold as traditional investors recognize fuel cells as a viable alternative to buying electricity from utilities.
 in Boston, who downgraded FuelCell to hold from buy today after it blew past his $2 price target.
 Plug Power Plug Power makes fuel-cell systems for forklifts, and Wal-Mart Stores Inc, already a customer, agreed last month to buy more than 1,700 of them for six North American distribution centers.
 ‘Uneven History’ “Plug has had an uneven history and has had quality and liquidity issues,” said Stone, the analyst who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock and a $550 price target.
 Joseph Syage and Dominick Bonanno, who lead the fixed income insurance business at the Brookfield Investment Management unit, will join in a new Manhattan office for Conning, the buyer said in a statement today.
 Bank of America cut the UK’s largest luxury-goods maker to neutral from buy, saying currency moves may reduce earnings before interest and taxes by as much as 50 million pounds ($82 million) in 2015.
 Jefferies Group LLC cut its recommendation on the London-based drugmaker to hold from buy, citing its valuation.
 Supply, Demand All the projects, which mainly target middle-income buyers, were built by Gemdale Corp, a Shenzhen-based developer that jointly started the first fund, whose investors include European, Japanese, Middle Eastern and other Asian institutions, he said.
 He rates the shares at buy and owns none.
 The Tim Hortons deal was the second part of a C$900 million offering to fund a share buyback which arose after a campaign last year by activist investors to reward shareholders.
 downgraded the Oakville, Ontario-based company’s credit rating two levels to BBB from A (low) in August after Tim Hortons announced plans for a debt-financed share buyback.
 The two Tim Hortons bonds meant to fund the share buyback each include a covenant that guarantees investors their money back if a rating downgrade results from the majority of board members being replaced, a possible outcome of a proxy fight by activist investors.
 Energy Future was purchased in 2007 in the largest leveraged buyout in history, and ran into trouble as natural gas prices tumbled.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Babcock International Group Plc agreed to buy private equity-owned Avincis for 920 million pounds ($15 billion) to expand into helicopter services.
 More stability in crude prices helps producers better predict cash flow, which may lead to more share buybacks and dividends, Uplenchwar of Global Hunter Securities said.
 Combs has offered to buy the channel for about $200 million, people familiar with the situation said this week.
 The bid makes rivals of the music moguls and former sweethearts, who dated more than a decade ago and each want to buy Fuse to gain distribution to 74 million homes, the people said.
 to find a buyer for Fuse.
 In this case, neither party to the suit is a so-called nonperforming entity, ie, a “troll” who has no business in the business other than to buy or own a patent that can be used to extort money from a company or person who uses technology that might fit the patent’s description.
 With six works sold during the VIP preview he said “It definitely lived up to our expectations” Better Returns Wealthy buyers are flocking to art after prices surged in the past decade, beating asset classes such as US.
 Performance at some other transportation companies, such as Air Canada, will be damped because their revenues are denominated in Canadian dollars while they buy fuel in the US.
 9 merger to shed the gates, and the Justice Department must approve the buyers.
 ‘Well Sustained’ “The demand will be very well sustained going forward,” said Tan Ai Teng, an analyst at DBS Group Holdings Ltd, who has a buy recommendation on the stock.
 Democratic senators on the panel including Elizabeth Warren of Massachusetts and Sherrod Brown of Ohio have said they want to ensure any measure guarantees affordable loans for most buyers and provides funds for rental housing for the poor.
 Democratic Reservations Reid has expressed reservations about winding down Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac because the companies ensure that homebuyers are able to get affordable fixed-rate mortgages.
 The two firms provide liquidity to the housing market by buying loans from lenders and packaging them into guaranteed securities.
 Expensive Chase Private-equity firms use borrowed money to buy companies, improve profits and resell them.
 The top 25 percent of private-equity funds delivered better returns than the Standard & Poor’s 500 stock index by 37 percent over the life of the fund, according to a 2011 study that looked at 450 buyout funds from 1984 to 2010.
 Some small and mid-size pensions that are shut out of the funds with the best track records buy stakes in a pooled investment called a fund-of-funds, which creates another layer of fees.
 They just don’t have meaningful buying power” Money-management fees paid by Orange County, which has a 5 percent allocation to private equity, have more than doubled to $40 million over the last decade, according to the pension’s annual reports.
 A unit of the state investment firm last week offered to buy control of Olam International Ltd, one of the world’s top three coffee and rice traders, for $32 billion.
 Consumer groups don’t buy it.
 Organizations including the Consumer Federation of America and the Center for Auto Safety said manufacturers should be able to sell directly if they want and buyers would benefit from having a choice.
 The Tesla dispute highlights a tension between a business model developed eight decades ago to sell Packards and Pierce-Arrows and an era when people can buy everything from books and music to soap and socks online.
 Consumer groups say that many customers find buying from dealers an ordeal and that they should be able to experience the same ease shopping as with Apple Inc.
 “Direct sales to consumers, especially with the Internet now becoming the go-to vehicle for purchasing, are very important,” Jack Gillis of the Washington-based Consumer Federation of America and author of “The Car Book,” a consumer guide to buying, said in a telephone interview.
 Last month, the Department of Homeland Security canceled a plan to buy access to such records following criticism from privacy advocates.
 The Immigration and Customs Enforcement agency, known as ICE and part of Homeland Security, dropped a proposal to access or buy databases for tracking license plates nationwide after criticism from groups such as the ACLU.
 Childs will give existing investors an option to sell stakes in its $175 billion buyout fund to CPPIB, Canada’s second-biggest public pension manager, and Goldman Sachs’s asset-management unit, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 and retailer Brookstone, according to the buyout firm’s website.
 “Don’t be too surprised when Facebook buys your Mum for $3 billion,” declares one.
 Wynne’s aim was to get readers to think of flowers beyond the two-to-three times annually that most people buy them.
 The Munich-based company has hired a bank to seek potential buyers for its microbiology unit, which could fetch between $300 million and $600 million, according to a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified because talks are private.
 Goldman Sachs cut its rating on the Dusseldorf-based company to sell from buy, citing a weaker outlook for returns than previously expected.
 “Now that those efforts to buy his way to an investigation have been exposed, he is going to China.
 Inclement weather also has weighed on housing this quarter as frozen ground kept builders from starting work and buyers from shopping.
 “Serendipitously as I become an empty nester, I am moving to the ‘buy side’ where I can more directly implement my ideas for broad-minded investors” Bassman referred questions to Drew Benson, a spokesman for Credit Suisse in New York, who declined to comment.
 It related to bond buying carried out in a reverse auction on Oct.
 Separately Bridgepoint expects to seek as much as 4 billion euros ($56 billion) for its next buyout pool and may start marketing the fund to investors in April, two people briefed on the plans said March 4.
 The buyout of Dutch cable provider Ziggo NV by John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc last month attracted 13 banks to provide financing, including 37 billion euros of term loans.
 Hellman & Friedman LLC, which agreed in November to acquire Deutsche Telekom AG’s digital-classifieds business Scout24 in November, partly financed the transaction with 695 million euros of buyout loans.
 Instead of being pushed to buy an annuity, 13 million savers in so-called defined contribution plans will be able to withdraw their funds gradually or in full.
 The Federal Open Market Committee during its past two meetings cut monthly bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion in December.
 “We don’t have sponsors who are guys that are just buying signs in stadiums and trying to get return on that.
 Akerson, 65, worked at Carlyle as its head of global buyouts and co-head of US.
 buyouts before joining GM in 2009 as a government representative to the board after its rescue by the US.
 The firm began as a group buying parts of aerospace and defense companies and grew to do leveraged buyouts of companies in telecommunications, transportation, consumer, retail, health care and energy.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- L1 Energy, the investment vehicle of Russia’s fourth-richest man Mikhail Fridman, agreed to buy RWE AG’s Dea oil and gas unit, gaining assets in the UK, Germany and the North Sea.
 Industrywide, contracts to buy US.
 “If you have a short life expectancy, you are more likely to take cash” In his 2014 Budget last week, Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity, allowing them to withdraw their pension savings without being hit by a 55 percent tax rate.
 The biggest Web-search company is aiming to woo customers by simplifying the process for buying cloud services, which are attracting startups and established companies looking to cut hardware costs and increase remote or mobile access for workers on the go.
 Bank of Montreal, Canada’s largest lender, agreed to buy F&C for 120 pence a share in cash on Jan.
 Federal Reserve pared its bond-buying program, reducing appetite for riskier emerging-market assets, and the crisis in Ukraine deepened.
 “There are taxes next week, so it’s a good opportunity to buy the ruble cheaply,” Vladimir Miklashevsky, strategist at Danske Bank A/S in Helsinki, said in e-mailed comments.
 Indian Oil Corp, the nation’s biggest refiner, may be in focus after it agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Petroliam Nasional Bhd’s Canadian natural gas fields and a planned export project.
 Buy Qatar Mostaque said he maintains a “buy” recommendation for Qatari stocks.
 Scrapped Auction The Finance Ministry suspended its purchases on March 4 after spending only 38 billion rubles out of 212 billion rubles planned, saying it didn’t see economic sense in buying above the level of 36 rubles per dollar.
 Seeking Funds Chaori Solar said earlier this week it would seek buyers for overseas solar farms, as it seeks funds to repay bond investors.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- Liquefied natural gas prices in Northeast Asia “nosedived” as buyers in the region sought fewer cargoes after purchasing sufficient shipments for April delivery, Energy Intelligence Group said.
 Asian buyers have largely remained on the sidelines of the spot market due to the availability of cheaper oil-indexed term cargoes through annual contracts that begin next month, according to WGI.
 Japanese LNG buyers’ annual supply deals typically run from April to March.
 Some buyers have done deals for May delivery while Asian demand further out remains uncertain, according to WGI.
 If pilots want a more realistic look, they can buy hardware to create the look and feel of the real dials and connect them to the software, Laminar’s Witt said.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Gil Dezer, a Miami-area developer, five years ago had 850 unsold condominiums on his hands and almost $500 million in loans coming due as credit markets froze and buyers disappeared.
 All buyers placed deposits of 30 percent in cash -- seed money Dezer relied on to gauge interest in the project.
 “We wanted to reconfigure and go after a buyer that is not as financially sensitive,” said Dezer, whose previous condos started at $900,000.
 With construction lending tight and memories fresh of speculators who walked away when mortgage financing dried up, builders are funding projects with cash commitments from buyers of as much as 60 percent of the purchase price.
 Last year, Pierce found the buyer for a penthouse at Ian Schrager’s Residences at the Miami Beach Edition.
 That suggests that buyer deposits back up much of today’s building, according to Peter Zalewski, founder of CraneSpotters.
 “It’s a good way to measure real buyers,” said Carlos Rosso, president of the condo division for the Related Group of Florida, which wrote down $1 billion in losses in 2008.
 All are being funded with buyer deposits of at least 50 percent, he said.
 “If we don’t have those real buyers, we’d rather not build the building,” Rosso said.
 “And what we saw in the last cycle is that the buyers could not care that they had these contractual obligations to close” A large cash commitment “lets you sleep at night” because a buyer is less likely to walk away, said Diego Ojeda, vice president of Rilea Group, which revived its Bond 1080 Brickell after shelving the downtown Miami project in 2007.
 “When the music stops, everything will be real and paid for” Rilea broke ground on the British-themed project in January after 60 percent of the apartments had been sold to buyers who agreed to put down half of the purchase price.
 With so many towers rising along the beaches, Zalewski last week began offering boat trips to prospective buyers in addition to his weekly bus tours of Miami-area project sites.
 In nearby Aventura, Property Markets Group is collecting 60 percent deposits from buyers interested in its 190-unit Echo Aventura.
 Fifty percent cash deposits are required at his 47-unit Faena House, where Blankfein and Black are among the buyers, two people familiar with the deals said in December.
 Ninety percent of the buyers have a primary residence in New York.
 Within a month of starting sales, more than 70 percent of the units were under contract to buyers who put down half of the $250,000-plus purchase price, Carlos Melo said.
 ‘Money Losers’ As builders turn to wealthy buyers for funding, much of the region’s new construction is out of reach for local residents, said Jack McCabe, CEO of McCabe Research and Consulting, which advises developers and lenders on the South Florida market.
 With more than 20,000 units on the way, just three years after investors absorbed a similar number, McCabe said he questions if there are enough multimillionaires in the world who want to buy condos in South Florida.
 Luxury developers sometimes form private partnerships with lenders to assist buyers seeking financing.
 All buyers agreed to put down 60 percent.
 On Sunny Isles Beach, a buyer interested in the Mansions at Acqualina’s Palazzo D’Oro penthouse would have to put down half of the purchase price, listed at $55 million, said Michael Goldstein, who oversees sales and marketing for the project, built by local developers Jules and Edmond Trump.
 More than half the buyers at the Mansions of Acqualina are from Canada and the US, including hedge-fund managers and two owners at Manhattan’s 15 Central Park West, according to Goldstein.
 upgraded its rating on the Dutch postal company to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from neutral, saying the stock has fallen too far since its fourth-quarter results announcement.
 “There is upside on this stock, but it is clearly a more risky stock to buy than a few months ago” Shares of Microsoft, Cisco and Intel climbed between 1,078 percent and 3,432 percent in the five years through March 10, 2000 -- when the Nasdaq Composite Index peaked -- to become the world’s most valuable technology companies.
 companies worth more than $1 billion have risen an average of 52 percent in 2014 the day after announcing they are acquiring a target, a reversal from the 19 percent one-day decline buyers experienced five years ago, according to data from Goldman Sachs.
 Strategic Shift More companies are shifting toward strategic M&A in 2014 and away from financial engineering, such as share buybacks, Carr said.
 Comcast Corp’s $452 billion agreement to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Comcast Corp’s buyout of the remainder of NBCUniversal from General Electric Co, and Verizon Communications Inc’s acquisition of Verizon Wireless from Vodafone Group Plc were two 2013 deals driven by financial concerns and cheap debt, rather than “building influence in their particular industries,” Carr said.
 target budget buyers.
 Consumers can start buying the Galaxy S5 for 866,800 won ($808) from SK Telecom’s 3,000 retail stores and website from today, South Korea’s largest carrier said in an e-mailed statement.
 Last month Facebook Inc’s Mark Zuckerberg, who at age 29 has a net worth of $271 billion, made a $19 billion offer for messaging service WhatsApp Inc, and this week agreed to buy virtual reality firm Oculus VR Inc.
 “Large individual shareholders typically take a meaningfully longer-term perspective, especially if they can buy against a market that is moving in the opposite direction,” Parker said in an interview.
 Dell’s leveraged buyout was challenged by Icahn Enterprises LP, founded by Carl Icahn, who at age 78 is the world’s 33rd wealthiest man with a net worth of $219 billion.
 Last year, the world’s fourth-richest richest man, Warren Buffett, 83, teamed with 3G Capital to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 Facebook’s stock, for instance, has declined 10 percent since the company announced it was buying WhatsApp.
 Fed Taper Labor-market improvement is one reason why policy makers have dialed back monthly bond buying by $10 billion at each of their past two meetings.
 The government agreed to bail out the unprofitable airline in 2000 by buying back a 29 percent stake from businessman Tajudin Ramli for more than double the airline’s stock price at the time.
 If he succeeds, the deal would be the biggest leveraged buyout financing in Europe since Alliance Boots Holding Ltd.
 raised 9 billion pounds in 2007, the same year RBS and its partners beat Barclays Plc to buy ABN Amro for 72 billion euros.
 Verizon Communications Inc’s $130 billion buyout of its wireless joint venture with Vodafone Group Plc, which completed last month, included more than $49 billion in bonds, the biggest company debt offering ever.
 The personal-computer maker was raised to overweight, an equivalent of buy, from equal-weight by Benjamin Reitzes, an analyst with Barclays.
 A deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Each year they must surrender enough permits, which they get for free or have to buy at auctions, to account for their discharges or pay fines amounting to 100 euros a ton.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 “Mostly from China but India is starting to crank up a bit” For the past decade China, the world’s biggest buyer of iron ore, has been seeking alternate sources of supply to break the stranglehold of the three biggest exporters led by Brazil’s Vale SA that control almost two-thirds of the global export market.
 In January, the London-based company agreed to buy Dutch broadband provider Ziggo NV for $67 billion.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 spent billions of dollars buying broadcasters and sports assets to add content they could sell to customers.
 Babcock International Group Plc posted the biggest drop in four years after agreeing to buy private equity-owned Avincis Group.
 The engineering-services company agreed to buy Avincis for 920 million pounds ($15 billion) to expand into helicopter services.
 raised the Scottish oil explorer to buy from neutral, saying the valuation has become attractive because the shares have fallen further than rivals since late January.
 Investec Plc also increased its rating to buy from hold today.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Aluminum-delivery bottlenecks at warehouses that raised buyer costs and dragged the world’s biggest metals exchange into 26 US.
 “Consumers may now feel compelled to buy as they hadn’t committed to much on contract as the general market consensus had been for premiums to fall,” Gayle Berry, a Barclays Plc analyst in London, said by e-mail.
 upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, saying the company will meet its revenue and margin forecasts this year.
 The fund will focus on partnerships, mineral rights, royalties and mezzanine debt with the goal of producing consistent income, rather than on buying entire companies and selling them later for a profit, the person said.
 With the International Monetary Fund warning of a possible bust, a committee including Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu yesterday approved proposals to exempt first-time buyers from value-added tax, and capping new home prices.
 The Bank of Israel, which introduced new restrictions on mortgages after rate cuts made homebuying more attractive, has urged the government to boost supply.
 Citing government statistics, he said it takes an average 13 years from the initial planning stages to delivering the keys of a finished apartment to the buyer.
 The other proposal, by Finance Minister Yair Lapid, would exempt some first-time buyers from the 17 percent VAT.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Ardian Sarl, the private-equity firm formerly known as Axa Private Equity, is poised to buy $1 billion of stakes in buyout funds from General Electric Co, said four people familiar with the matter.
 “Someone who is buying an Audi A6, I think will never buy a DS5” Peugeot is working on building DS into a full-fledged brand that could help its return to profitability and compete in a market dominated by Volkswagen AG’s Audi and Bayerische Motoren Werke AG’s BMW.
 These buyers may be entrepreneurs or middle to senior management and in the 30-to-35 age group, he said.
 Apcoa, which manages more than 1 million parking spaces across Europe, has been in talks to restructure its 2007 buyout debt with lenders since last year, the company said in a statement yesterday.
 International investors were net buyers of Indian stocks for an 11th straight day on Feb.
 said March 25 that it agreed to buy the virtual reality company Oculus VR Inc, based in the Orange County city of Irvine, for at least $2 billion in cash and stock.
 Facebook’s interest in the region came to light last year, when Chief Executive Officer Mark Zuckerberg unsuccessfully tried to buy SnapChat Inc, a mobile photo-sharing service in Venice, a beach community on the west side of Los Angeles.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Of the 17 analysts who cover the stock and share their ratings with Bloomberg, 11 advise clients to sell while three have hold recommendations and three have buy ratings.
 Babcock International Group Plc jumped 43 percent after a unit’s joint venture was selected as a preferred bidder to buy nuclear-site licencing companies.
 Liberum downgraded its rating to hold from buy, citing expectations of unchanged profit in fiscal-year 2015.
 The Nuclear Decommissioning Authority selected Cavendish Flour Partnership as the preferred bidder to buy Magnox Ltd.
 Four analysts now recommend buying the company’s American depositary receipts, which are more widely covered than its Mexican shares.
 Five months after Perry began buying Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac securities, Westhus visited a Treasury Department official to talk about the two companies, according to public records.
 Berkowitz Proposal Berkowitz proposed in November that his Fairholme Fund and other investors buy two businesses that insure mortgage-backed securities from Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, in exchange for the preferred stock held by investors and at least $173 billion in new capital.
 The Federal Reserve’s policy of buying Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac mortgage securities to stimulate the economy boosted their company profits, he said.
 Putting passengers in 30-inch pitch seats “is standard practice now,” said Walter Spracklin, a transportation analyst at RBC Capital Markets in Toronto who recommends investors buy Air Canada stock.
 We are keeping those low” David Tyerman, an analyst at Canaccord Genuity who recommends investors buy Air Canada stock, said 2014 will go far in determining the long-term success of Rouge, which means red in French.
 Cutting Stakes According to yesterday’s filing, Fortress will sell 232 million newly issued Class A shares in the offering, with proceeds used to buy Fortress operating group units from the insiders.
 and Credit Suisse Group AG will have an option to buy 42 million shares from Fortress insiders if the offering is oversubscribed.
 in upgrading Tingyi to buy.
 He rates Boeing as a buy.
 “The company will sooner or later invest here” Corruption Probe The arrests of the sons of three government ministers amid a widening graft probe, and the Federal Reserve’s decision to cut its $85 billion-a-month bond-buying program are threatening growth and political stability in an economy that has grown 5 percent annually under Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan’s decade-long rule.
 Canadian Natural has 19 buy recommendations from analysts, while four advise holding the stock and one says sell.
 in Calgary, who has a buy rating on the shares.
 “Canadian Natural is starting to generate a lot of free cash flow and, in general, dividends are taking priority over share buybacks,” said Kepler at Cormark.
 While other partners may also buy into the project, “all these equity providers aim to continue and follow through to the whole 500 megawatts,” he said.
 Kenanga, founded in 1973, has been expanding by buying ECM Libra Financial Group Bhd’s investment banking unit in 2012 and acquiring control of ING Groep NV’s local fund management business last year.
 “Connecting fragmented buyers and sellers through its portal places Freelancer in a very powerful position that will ultimately lead to significant earnings growth,” Owen Humphries, an analyst at Canaccord Genuity in Sydney who has a buy recommendation on the stock, wrote in a note last month.
 Stone rates the shares the equivalent of a buy with a 12-month price target of $40.
 “It’ll make brokers start acting like real estate agents who wait for a buyer before closing a deal,” Georg Andersen, head of the association and managing director at Nykredit, Europe’s biggest issuer of covered bonds, said in an interview.
 Leucadia agreed to buy 23 million preferred securities from Falcone’s hedge funds for $253 million, the firms said yesterday.
 ‘Unique Relationship’ Leucadia agreed in 2012 to buy Jefferies Group LLC in a $32 billion deal that made 52-year-old Handler, who was running the investment bank, chief executive officer of the combined company.
 The Bethesda, Maryland-based company, which buys some of its uranium under contract from Russia, yesterday sought Chapter 11 protection from creditors, listing $70 million in assets and $107 billion in debt.
 CEO Mike Brown said last week that the South African lender controlled by Old Mutual Plc would consider governance issues before deciding whether to exercise a right to buy a stake in Ecobank.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Investors are pulling money out of exchange-traded funds that buy bonds in the US, with the biggest outflows from government securities as they shift into stocks, signaling a willingness to delve into riskier assets.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Mega will buy out listed shell company TRS Investments Ltd.
 Allianz gained the most in two months after agreeing to buy Milano Assicurazioni SpA assets from Unipol Gruppo Finanziario SpA for 440 million euros ($612 million).
 Europe’s biggest insurer will buy the Italian assets in a deal that includes a 11 billion-euro premiums portfolio, 729 agencies and 500 employees, Allianz said in March 15 statement.
 raised its rating on Europe’s largest engineering company to overweight, similar to buy, from neutral, saying that the 4 billion-euro share buyback announced in November could start soon.
 upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, citing the benefits of cost and portfolio restructuring.
 Europe’s second-biggest chipmaker may buy back shares, Handelsblatt newspaper reported, citing an interview with Chief Executive Officer Reinhard Ploss.
 The exchanges, which opened in October, serve those who buy their own individual or family insurance and aren’t covered by employer or government health plans.
 The developer said it’s raising funds to buy land in Hong Kong by giving shareholders convertible warrants.
 HSBC slid 15 percent to HK$8105 after Mizuho Securities downgraded the lender to underperform from buy and reduced its target price by 25 percent, citing “slack revenue growth” The Hang Seng Volatility Index jumped 10 percent to 1843, its biggest gain in a month, indicating traders expect the benchmark equity index to swing 53 percent in the next 30 days.
 In February, the fund was said to buy a minority stake in Trigence Semiconductor Inc, a Japanese chip designer part-owned by Intel Corp’s venture capital arm.
 19 a plan to cut jobs by offering buyouts.
 The company was talking with unions to cut about 20 percent of its workforce through voluntary buyouts, a person familiar with the matter said in January.
 Musk, writing on the company website, said its two New Jersey stores, in Paramus and Short Hills, will become “galleries” where staff can answer questions, though “we will not be able to discuss price or complete a sale” He directed potential buyers to locations in Manhattan and King of Prussia, Pennsylvania.
 is seeking to cut spot purchases of LNG as the world’s biggest commercial buyer of the fuel seeks to shield itself from a potential supply squeeze amid the country’s power shortages.
 Kogas, as the company is known, will look for more long-term contracts lasting at least 10 years for buying liquefied natural gas, Chief Executive Officer Jang Seok Hyo said today in Seoul.
 Kogas has long-term supply deals to buy LNG from countries including Qatar and Oman.
 to buy 35 million tons a year of LNG from the Houston-based company’s Sabine Pass export facility.
 Months of wooing by Boeing paid off as ANA agreed to buy 14 of the 787-9 model, 20 of the upgraded 777X jets due to debut at the end of the decade, and six current 777s to help bridge the gap.
 “By getting more aggressive on the 777 after dragging their heels they managed to convince the Japanese that they’re serious about moving forward with a plane that has the Japanese market in mind” 777 Family ANA is buying the -9X variant of the new 777, along with the existing 777-300ER.
 Picat is overseeing a shift to more up-market vehicles such as the 308 and the 2008 crossover to attract buyers and help restore earnings.
 The fund can only buy private equity if a company is planning to sell shares to the public.
 The Conservative-led government, which will present a white paper on the fund next month, has signaled it may be willing to expand its investment mandate to include private equity and infrastructure, in addition to the stocks, bonds and real estate it’s currently allowed to buy.
 The cloud-computing systems have proved popular because they give companies and government agencies the ability to build out their Internet sites without buying their own hardware and pay Amazon based on how much computing power they use.
 and Flipboard Inc, which have tapped in to Amazon’s data centers instead of buying and configuring their own servers and equipment.
 Mailru, an Internet company controlled by Usmanov, agreed to buy a 12 percent stake in VKontakte from Russian executive Ivan Tavrin, according to a statement from Moscow-based Mailru today.
 Usmanov is also willing to buy UCP’s stake in VKontakte at a “reasonable price,” Ivan Streshinskiy, head of Usmanov’s asset-management company USM Advisors LLC, said in an interview in Moscow last week.
 He cited the gap between the two measurements as a reason to buy back the company’s stock if it trades for less than 120 percent of book value, and said he’d be “aggressive” with repurchases.
 1 buyer of the twin-engine A330 and is being specifically targeted by Airbus through the development of a new, shorter-range variant.
 Imerys last month agreed to buy Hoffman Estates, Illinois-based Amcol for $41 a share.
 Meanwhile, the China Securities Regulatory Commission plans to require money-market funds to set aside provisions to cover unpaid interest, as 90 percent of these funds were invested in negotiable deposits, and any repayment risks in the interbank market will spill over to fund buyers, Caixin magazine reported on Feb.
 “So far a lot of buyers of Internet financial products are not aware of the risks they are buying into and many of them look at it the same way as banks’ wealth-management products,” Li Daokui, a former adviser to the central bank, said in an interview this month.
 The company described the western Siberia reservoirs it intends to begin drilling this year as a “world-class hydrocarbon system” Tillerson agreed to invest billions of dollars and allow Rosneft to buy stakes in premier North American projects in exchange for access to Russia’s vast Arctic, deep-water and shale resources.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- DBS Group Holdings Ltd, Southeast Asia’s biggest bank, agreed to buy Societe Generale SA’s Asian private banking business to bolster market share in a region where millionaires’ wealth may top North America this year.
 The stock declined 47 percent since DBS abandoned a $65 billion bid to buy PT Bank Danamon Indonesia in August.
 recommended buying the online fashion retailer, citing its significant growth potential.
 “We continue to seek clarity” Prime Minister Stephen Harper said in December 2012 that state-owned enterprises would be banned from buying majority stakes in the oil sands outside of “exceptional circumstances” Approval of the $151 billion takeover by China’s Cnooc Ltd.
 Former Alberta Premier Alison Redford, who resigned this month, told reporters in September on a trip to Shanghai that she wanted the federal government to specify under what conditions it would allow Chinese state-owned enterprises to buy companies in the oil sands.
 In 2010, Harper rejected Melbourne-based BHP Billiton Ltd’s bid to buy Potash Corp.
 “You had to use cash or debt to buy things.
 One of the principal concerns that I had in mind was that when this is over, we want a vehicle where we can buy someone’s real estate from them and use equity.
 Vodafone climbed 17 percent as the telecommunications company agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 Allianz SE rose the most in two months after the insurer agreed to buy assets from Italy’s Unipol Gruppo Finanziario SpA.
 Europe’s biggest insurer agreed to spend 440 million euros buying assets from Unipol.
 The British government allows people to buy a new house or flat costing as much as 600,000 pounds ($1 million) with a 5 percent deposit under Help to Buy.
 upgraded Europe’s largest engineering company to buy from neutral.
 The brokerage said the shares will benefit from a buyback and growth in Siemens’s automation markets.
 Voestalpine AG jumped 56 percent to 3039 euros after Credit Suisse Group AG upgraded the Austrian steelmaker to outperform from neutral, meaning that investors should buy the shares.
 Buyer Interest The property, which Snyder spent $190 million to build using a $65 million loan from Bentall Kennedy, has received “a lot of interest” from potential buyers, including US.
 Snyder & Son, eventually buying an empty lot and building his first house.
 The Defense Department, by far the government’s biggest buyer of petroleum products, also withdrew obligations, or promised funding, of more than $400 million last year after one of its offices didn’t buy a minimum amount of fuel required under the contracts.
 “Precious metals is a niche market though it’s part of what UBS considers value-added for its wealth management clients,” said Andreas Venditti, an analyst at Vontobel Holding AG in Zurich with a buy recommendation on the stock.
 A member of the French business and political elite, Richard participated in a leveraged buyout of Nexity SA, the property developer created from the real-estate assets of Generale des Eaux.
 “European buyers are building up stocks to cope with that eventuality” Import Reliance Higher volumes may be flowing to countries such as Bulgaria, Romania and Serbia, which are dependent on Russian imports via Ukraine, Thierry Bros, a senior analyst at Societe Generale SA, said yesterday by e-mail from Paris.
 Ukraine, which depends on Russian gas for about half of its demand, is seeking ways to diversify supply and plans to buy more fuel from the European Union.
 Campari agreed to buy closely-held Forty Creek Distillery Ltd.
 Hall said he looked for a buyer with both North American presence and global clout following increased international demand for the whiskey, which is only available in Canada and the US.
 Each year they must surrender enough permits, which they get for free or must buy at auctions, to account for their discharges or pay fines amounting to 100 euros a ton.
 The transaction involves the Bakries buying back from ARMS 292 percent of coal exporter PT Bumi Resources.
 Tan also will buy 238 percent of ARMS from the family for $223 million through his PT Borneo Lumbung Energi & Metal.
 Anglo Pacific Group Plc, with 92 percent, has an option to buy 15 percent of the company’s production for $125 million within four months.
 “You’re returning to local supply-demand functions in commodities” Aronstein said he started buying commodity-related equities at the end of 2013.
 Commodities may “struggle to attract financial flows” as investors buy more equities, he said.
 Increasing demand from buyers of coins, jewelry and bars will help to sustain bullion’s rally this year, according to James Steel, chief precious metals analyst at HSBC Securities Inc.
March 9 (Bloomberg) -- SodaStream International Ltd, the Israeli maker of home soda machines, rebounded last week after hedge-fund manager Whitney Tilson said he’s buying the stock after it slumped to a 14-month low.
 26, prompting the number of buy recommendations to fall to three, the lowest in 2 1/2 years.
 SodaStream “users are very loyal and will continue using and buying the product,” New York-based Tilson said in a March 7 phone interview.
 Just three of the 15 analysts covering SodaStream have a buy rating on the stock, the lowest number since July 2011, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Barclays Plc cut its outlook on SodaStream to the equivalent of hold from buy and lowered its price target 27 percent to $40, according to a report dated March 3.
 5 to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain for about $125 billion.
 Tilson also cited a possible alliance with Pepsi or another large beverage maker as a reason to buy SodaStream shares.
 SodaStream is unlikely to find a larger partner, said Akshay Jagdale, an analyst at KeyBanc Capital Markets, who downgraded the shares to hold from buy on Feb.
 He now believes Green Mountain’s new single-serve product is ‘‘the best way to play home carbonation” Pepsi Speculation “I don’t think Pepsi’s going to buy them, because they don’t have the mousetrap to produce a good enough drink for Pepsi,” Jagdale said by phone from San Francisco in a March 7 interview.
 “We say thank you for buying our gas.
 Indonesia’s LNG output is sold mostly under long-term contracts to overseas buyers, mainly Japan and South Korea.
 Because of the decline in gas production, domestic buyers in the world’s fourth most-populous nation can struggle for supplies.
 announced plans to buy Oculus VR Inc, messages came pouring in at Virtuix Omni.
 “The company strongly believes its offer to the Indian tax department is fair for all sides” Microsoft agreed in September to buy Nokia’s mobile-phone division, including its factories, in a 544 billion-euro ($76 billion) deal.
 Comcast agreed to buy Time Warner last month for $452 billion in stock in a deal that combines the two largest US.
 ‘Constructive Impact’ “ABC TV, in terms of its ratings, has had its ups and downs,” said Nomura Securities analyst Anthony DiClemente, “but she’s definitely had a constructive impact on the company” He has a buy rating on the stock.
 Intesa ruled out the conversion of savings shares into common shares, and doesn’t plan to buy back hybrid securities, the CEO said.
 Messina, who agreed to sell Intesa’s Ukrainian unit Pravex Bank JSC to a company owned by Ukrainian billionaire Dmitry Firtash, said the local regulator might block the transaction because of legal issues involving the buyer.
 “We are working with local regulator, because the situation of the buyer is not clear,” Messina said.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said last month the central bank will probably maintain its strategy of trimming the debt-buying program it uses to support the economy.
 initiated coverage of the shares with a buy rating, citing its strong balance sheet, cost controls and potential gains in short-term earnings as the construction industry recovers.
 and Bain Capital LLC, two Boston-based buyout firms, and Danish pension fund ATP agreed to buy Nordic card-payment company Nets Holding A/S for 17 billion kroner ($31 billion).
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 AGL, Australia’s second-largest electricity retailer, is seeking Australian Competition Tribunal approval to buy Macquarie Generation in New South Wales, the Sydney-based company said today in a statement.
 ERM Power Ltd, Australia’s fourth-largest electricity retailer, remains “very interested” in buying Macquarie Generation after a first bid failed, Trevor St Baker, ERM’s founder and deputy chairman, said March 21 in an interview.
 The island has also added new taxes and higher downpayments for home buyers during the last five years.
 agreed this month to buy more than 1,700 systems and the company said it expects orders to rise more than fourfold as it approaches profitability.
 Hedge funds were the majority of buyers, with traditional muni investors also participating, said David Chafey, chairman of the Government Development Bank, which handles the commonwealth’s debt sales.
 Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s buyout unit, GS Capital Partners, and Quadrangle Capital Partners, which bought Get AS in 2007 for 58 billion kroner, are sounding out buyers about a sale process or potential initial public offering expected to start this year, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the deliberations are confidential.
 Vodafone Group Plc this month agreed to buy Spain’s Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 72 billion euros ($10 billion) including debt.
 An economic boom and a surge in travel demand across Southeast Asia have prompted budget airlines in Indonesia, Malaysia and Vietnam to buy new aircraft, stoking concerns about whether the industry is building more capacity than it needs.
 orders, a five-year jet-buying frenzy may give way to a more sober approach as carriers adjust to the challenges of intense competition and inadequate infrastructure.
 The fund can only buy private equity if a company is planning to sell shares to go public.
 The Conservative-led government, which will present a white paper on the fund next month, had signaled willingness to expand the investment mandate to include private equity and infrastructure, in addition to the stocks, bonds and real estate it now is allowed to buy.
 ‘Many Questions’ The investment, the fund’s first ever in an unlisted company, raises “many questions” on whether it should be allowed to buy private equity, Hans Olav Syversen, a Christian Democrat, who heads parliament’s finance committee and is a key supporter of the minority government, said last week in an interview.
 The talks come after state-owned Cofco last week agreed to buy 51 percent of Dutch grain trader Nidera BV, which has annual sales of more than $17 billion, as it seeks to expand food supplies for the world’s most populous nation.
 buy 14 percent stakes.
March 6 (Bloomberg) -- Promotora de Informaciones SA jumped 14 percent as Telefonica SA is nearing an agreement to buy a controlling stake in the media company’s pay-TV business for about 800 million euros ($11 billion), according to people familiar with the matter.
 This allowed Telefonica and Mediaset Espana to buy Prisa’s stake in the pay-TV business within 15 days.
 Telefonica was considering options for Prisa’s pay-TV unit including teaming up with either Mediaset Espana Comunicacion SA, which also holds 22 percent in DTS, or with Al Jazeera to buy the asset, one of the people said.
 While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 Citigroup reduced its target price on the shares to $148 from $170 today and cut its rating to neutral from buy.
 Vanguarda, whose shareholders include JPMorgan Chase & Co’s Gavea Investimentos Ltda, is seeking to raise as much as $600 million to buy land and is studying its options, including a capital increase by current investors, Moura said.
 The Sao Paulo-based company aims to buy 100,000 hectares (247,000 acres) in the northern states of Para and Maranhao by 2019, said Moura, who previously worked as John Deere’s chief financial officer for South America and later led SLC for eight years until December 2012.
 With the downgrades out of the way, investors have been buying Puerto Rico securities.
 “The situation is very serious,” said Maria Jesus Puga, a Madrid-based lawyer at Iure Abogados advising home buyers fallen victim to Martinsa’s bankruptcy.
 shale boom threatens to erode demand from its traditional oil buyer.
 B-share markets, where foreign institutions and Chinese individuals are allowed to trade, were set up in 1992 to give local companies a way to raise funds from global investors banned from buying securities denominated in yuan.
 Greenland, Singapore-based Far East Organization Centre Pte and local pension funds are among those buying lower-quality properties as office tenants leave for newer buildings, pushing the amount of commercial space slated for conversion to record highs.
 Livable Cities The trend reflects record-low interest rates that have drawn foreign buyers and domestic investors to Australia’s housing market, boosting dwelling prices almost 10 percent in the past year.
 While most developers mitigate these risks by selling a proportion of apartments before construction, a big enough drop in prices could push buyers to forfeit their deposits and walk away, which happened in Australia’s oversupplied Gold Coast in Queensland state following the global financial crisis.
 About a quarter of the apartments in the first stage of pre-sales went to overseas buyers following marketing campaigns in Shanghai, Hong Kong and Singapore in addition to Sydney, CBRE’s Milton said in December.
 Australia, one of the most popular destinations for Chinese buyers, is also favored by developers who are trying to follow the demand.
 “That’s a risk factor that may eventually lead to higher rates” Concern that higher borrowing costs will prompt property buyers to put plans on hold is giving builders pause.
 Zhu, 40, heard on the radio a year ago that she could buy Herceptin, an expensive, breakthrough drug shown to improve survival by more than a third, at a 75 percent discount, thanks to a cost-sharing deal between her provincial government and Swiss drugmaker Roche Holding AG.
 Eurasia Drilling will continue to buy drilling rigs, ordering another 14 for delivery this year and next year at an average of $15 million per rig, Chief Financial Officer Richard Anderson said in a conference call with journalists today.
 “I don’t drink wine and alcohol,” Cappelli, 52, said after buying the $325 drink at Blue Bottle Coffee at San Francisco’s Ferry Building, in the shadow of the Bay Bridge.
 Marisa Smith, a 25-year-old Brooklyn resident who drinks about two cups a day, said she doesn’t pay much attention to prices when buying coffee at a shop.
 We won’t change the way we buy coffee, and we won’t compromise on quality” Felicia Wong, 24, said she feels the same way about the one or two cups of coffee she buys every day.
 The government will also be entitled to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” or part of their output.
 The virtual cards would have let consumers buy goods from online retail websites on credit.
 Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed in April to buy an 18 percent stake in Sina Weibo for $586 million.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Lucky Cement Ltd, Pakistan’s biggest cement maker, and rivals are competing to buy the local unit of Lafarge SA, a person familiar with the matter said.
 Lafarge’s plant in the Punjab province has a capacity to produce 25 million tons a year and will help the buyer tap demand as Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif’s government increases spending on infrastructure projects.
 Soros is among investors betting on a Spanish recovery by buying shares in banks and real estate.
 Buffett has said the company hasn’t paid a dividend because he’s been able to generate better returns for investors by pursuing takeovers, buying securities and investing in subsidiaries like MidAmerican Energy and the Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad.
March 28 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-largest oil producer, missed its target for completing a deal to buy a stake in a natural gas project in Israel, 15 months after signing an initial accord.
 With the purchase of a coffee, customers can also buy two of the pastries for $129, she said.
 Altana accelerated growth by buying Rockwood Holdings Inc’s clay-additives unit for $635 million and a coatings division from Henkel AG last year.
 Johnson the additional post of executive vice president and that its board had authorized a $125 million share buyback program.
 Brighter views of the economy and personal finances helped make up for increased pessimism about the buying climate as households received higher home-heating bills and paid more to fuel their cars.
 The buying-climate gauge had been as high as minus 32 as recently as early January.
 economy, personal finances and buying climate.
 “We will be very judicious” While purchases may be necessary to lure technology investors looking for growth, buying companies has not been a strength of Hewlett-Packard’s over the past half decade.
 The company said half of the $65 billion it will generate in free cash flow this year will be paid to shareholders in the form of stock buybacks and dividends, a pledge Whitman repeated yesterday at the annual shareholders’ meeting.
 Both spent more on buybacks last year than Hewlett-Packard paid in dividends and repurchases combined.
 “From a bondholder perspective, things can go on for a long time the way they are,” said Dave Novosel, an analyst at Gimme Credit LLC in Chicago who has a buy rating on the bonds.
 buyout firm, said it’s targeting new investments in the Middle East, North Africa and Turkey after agreeing to sell a 30 percent stake in a Saudi Arabian lighting company to Royal Philips NV.
 “We continue to evaluate such opportunities” Philips, the world’s largest lighting company, agreed to buy a 51 percent stake in Saudi Arabia’s General Lighting Co.
 Colleagues of Medina-Mora, who participated in the 2001 talks at a jungle resort where New York-based Citigroup discussed buying Banamex, said they were in awe of his shrewdness and hoped his career endures.
 Yesterday Citigroup failed an annual test of its ability to survive another crisis as the Federal Reserve rejected the bank’s plans for dividends and share buybacks.
 investment bank advised investors to buy shares and increased its price target by 44 percent.
 The lender was upgraded to buy from neutral at Goldman Sachs and its price target raised to 2,080 rupees.
 Goldman raised Punjab National to neutral from sell, and Bank of Baroda to buy from neutral.
 The world’s largest social network plummeted 11 percent after the company announced it would buy virtual-reality firm Oculus VR Inc.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- GAM Holding AG, the Swiss money manager that split from Julius Baer Group Ltd, reported a more than doubling in full-year profit, proposed a higher dividend and said it’s planning a new share buyback program.
 Buyback, Dividend GAM Holding said it has repurchased 74 percent of the maximum 413 million shares it expects to buy back by April 17 as part of a three-year initiative.
 The company plans a new program to repurchase about 10 percent of shares over as many as three years, beginning once the current buyback expires.
 “For JPMorgan, with its large number of leadership positions, the strategy is clear,” UBS’s De Vries, who recommends buying JPMorgan shares, said in a phone interview from New York on March 25.
 bank spent a further 1 billion pounds in 2009 ($17 billion) to buy Cazenove Group, a 190-year-old British brokerage.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Toyota Motor Corp, the world’s largest automaker, said it will buy back stock for the first time in five years as its cash pile swells and profit climbs.
 “They have the cash and this is still a conservative amount that they’re buying back,” Frank Schwope, a Hanover-based analyst at NordLB who recommends buying Toyota, said by telephone.
 The buyback coincides with President Akio Toyoda starting the Toyota Mobility Foundation, which will support global nonprofits and researchers’ work on improving transportation systems in developing markets, the company said.
 From an investment standpoint, the impact of the share buyback is far more significant” In forming the foundation, Toyota is following efforts at other automakers to invest in mobility technology as growing megacities, pollution and gridlock pose risks that could lead to global car sales peaking, which IHS Automotive estimates will occur in the next decade.
 “Toyota has traditionally relied on dividends to return value to shareholders, but these moves demonstrate the possibility that it will also consider share buybacks as another option for enhancing shareholder returns,” Kei Nihonyanagi, a Tokyo-based analyst for Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch, said yesterday in a report.
 “The significance is not as much in the size of this buyback as it is in the very fact that it’s happening,” said Usher, who has a buy rating on the company.
 Their overseers create and redeem shares in the open market based on the level of demand from buyers and sellers.
 Standard Life jumped 7 percent after its investment arm agreed to buy Ignis Asset Management Ltd.
 The insurer’s investment unit agreed to buy Ignis from Phoenix Group Holdings for 390 million pounds ($645 million), gaining 59 billion pounds of funds.
 The insurer is seeking a buyer for its Lithuanian unit valued at about 100 million euros ($138 million), eVersus reported, without saying where it got the information.
 HSBC Holdings Plc raised the stock to overweight, the equivalent of a buy, from under weight.
 Caesars, the largest owner of casinos in the US, has struggled to repair its balance sheet after a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 Amplats has five buy recommendations, 11 holds and six sells.
 The authorization, which has no expiration date, gives Dallas-based AT&T a total of 425 million shares it’s permitted to buy back, according to a statement today.
 “The positive is there’s been a significant local economic-activity rebound in the last three years, especially with the recovery of the tourism aspect of the local economy,” said Schroeder, who may buy the Orlando bonds.
 “It’s challenging if you have to think about capital gains before you buy a cup of coffee,” Gelenbe said.
 Dah Sing Financial will offer shareholders rights to buy about 39 million shares at HK$2340 apiece, while its unit will sell at least 150 million shares at HK$8 each, they said in an exchange filing.
 Dah Sing Financial plans to use the proceeds from the sale to buy more shares in the banking unit, easing speculation that the lender may be sold.
 “As a result, some of the speculative money is leaving” Yue Xiu Group offered in October to buy a majority stake in Chong Hing Bank Ltd.
 is in exclusive talks that expire on March 31 to buy Hong Kong-based Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 The men invested more than $33 million over four years to buy securities in 13 transactions, including OfficeMax Inc.
 Africa’s largest economy is buying the diesel and electric locomotives to upgrade the country’s transport infrastructure and improve export capacity.
 “We won’t consider buying properties that will hurt the return” Office buildings represent more than 90 percent of total properties, Kaizuka said.
 The REIT will consider buying more residential and commercial properties in other metropolitan cities if the yield gets too low in Tokyo, Kaizuka said, without naming the cities.
 Management Changes The REIT has denied Corvex and Related’s claims of conflicts of interest and has said it is focusing on buying office buildings in US.
 Axcel, which bought a controlling stake in Pandora in 2008 and later reduced its holding, is among shareholders paring investments in companies across Europe, the Middle East and Africa as buyers continue to bet on an economic recovery.
 Axcel is also buying 138 million shares from Michael Lund Petersen, a founding shareholder, and will own about 10 percent of Pandora after the transactions.
 In February, Glostrup-based Pandora announced it would buy back as much as 24 billion Danish kroner of stock this year, its biggest such commitment, after reporting a 76 percent increase in net income for the final three months of 2013.
 Of the 14 analysts who cover Pandora and share their ratings with Bloomberg, 11 advise their clients to buy the shares, two have hold recommendations and one favors selling.
March 15 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo Financiero Inbursa SAB, the bank controlled by billionaire Carlos Slim, agreed to buy Standard Bank Group Ltd’s Brazil unit for $45 million, getting a foot in the door in South America’s largest economy.
 Diminished volatility in markets around the world has driven down profits at trading firms such as Chicago-based Infinium, which use computers to make decisions to buy and sell in fractions of a second.
 LG Chem’s board of directors approved buying NanoH2O to boost its water-treatment filter business, according to the March 14 statement.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest manager of alternative assets such as private equity and property, agreed to buy warehouses from French office landlord Fonciere des Regions for 473 million euros ($660 million).
 Jonathan Lurie, the managing director who oversees Blackstone’s European logistics portfolio, in October said the firm was in talks to buy its first logistics property in Germany as part of a plan to double the company’s warehouse holdings over the next two years.
 “Even after the recent rally of Italian banks, shares are still cheaper than in other peripheral countries” Vizzini said the stock offerings may attract buyers who pulled out of emerging markets in recent months to seek higher returns in developed nations.
 The bank’s biggest investor, Fondazione Monte dei Paschi, blocked a stock offering planned for January because it couldn’t find a buyer for its stake.
 “Many of the buyers have already seen the movie and want to watch it over and over again with their kids,” said Paul Dergarabedian, senior analyst for the research firm Rentrak Corp.
 Lender Banco Bradesco SA led a rally among Brazilian banks after Credit Suisse Group AG recommended buying the stock.
 rose 79 percent to C$1708 after announcing an agreement to buy the drug Donnatal, a treatment for irritable bowel syndrome, from Revive Pharmaceuticals.
 That leaves them less to offer asset managers in the secondary market and may create an incentive to favor buyers of new issues that trade in large volumes.
 Those returns come on the heels of a one-day profit of $254 billion reaped by buyers of Verizon Communications Inc’s record $49 billion offering in September, a deal for which money managers put in orders of as much as $100 billion.
 That offering helped fund Verizon’s buyout of Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in Verizon Wireless.
 The 10 largest buyers obtained $221 billion, or 45 percent of the offering, with the top five buying $1625 billion, according to a person familiar with the sale, who asked not to be identified citing lack of authorization to speak publicly.
 Even as the central bank has started slowing its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities, investors are still clamoring to buy corporate bonds in the face of an escalating crisis in Ukraine and volatility in emerging-markets currencies.
 “The big ISPs can make these demands -- driving up costs and prices for everyone else -- because of their market position” So-called net neutrality gained attention after Comcast’s agreement to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, which would concentrate Internet access.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Hutchison Interest Hutchison Whampoa Ltd, owned by billionaire Li Ka-shing, wants to buy more telecommunications assets in the Nordic region, a person familiar with the situation said in November.
 stocks dropped, ending a two-day rally, led by a slump in insurers after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne removed rules requiring retirees to buy pension annuities.
 Resolution, the insurance buyout firm founded by Clive Cowdery, fell 46 percent to 335 pence.
 In the US, Fed officials will end a two-day policy meeting today and will probably announce a $10 billion cut in monthly bond buying to $55 billion after the close of European markets, according to economist forecasts.
 Dutch Position In the Netherlands last year, 1,700 Dutch households raised 13 million euros ($18 million) in 13 hours to buy shares in a wind turbine.
 Now people are buying on the dips and jumping back in” Chinese Premier Li Keqiang said in a statement the country has policies in reserve to deal with any economic volatility this year and can’t ignore “difficulties and risks” from a slowdown in the economy.
 The stock has 12 buys, 14 holds and one sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
March 11 (Bloomberg) -- Activist investors, buyers who take stakes in companies and agitate for shareholder-friendly changes, are likely to increase the number of targets this year as they win battles and raise new cash to fund their agendas, according to Moody’s Investors Service.
 Icahn prodded Cupertino, California-based Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, though he abandoned the proposal last month.
 “If I buy this for 15 years, 15 years from now I am going to get all my money back,” he said.
 is interested in buying a stake in the Italian lender.
 Berenberg Bank cut its rating on construction stocks including the German cement maker to hold from buy, meaning it no longer recommends acquiring the shares.
 Redburn Partners LLP recommended buying the stock, raising its rating from neutral.
 That added to the 36 billion pounds ($6 billion) wiped off the industry’s market value on March 19, when Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 Warehousing Rules Aluminum from Rusal and other producers is stored by the LME, the world’s biggest industrial metals exchange, before it’s shipped to buyers.
 The exchange had proposed new rules to shorten times for withdrawing metals from warehouses after buyers said delays were driving up costs for consumers.
 Qiagen NV rose 25 percent after Berenberg Bank advised investors to buy the stock.
 Berenberg upgraded the maker of medical-diagnostic equipment to buy from hold, citing an expected strong growth from key components of the business, including personalized medicine and bioinformatics.
 Regulators have greeted his ambition to buy T-Mobile with skepticism, and Son has responded by reframing his argument to say he can improve US.
 It sued in 2011 to keep AT&T from buying the Bellevue, Washington-based carrier, majority-owned by Deutsche Telekom AG.
 are buying the Marine Corps model.
 The National Rental Home Council will advocate for professional managers of single-family leased residences, after private-equity firms, hedge funds and real estate investment trusts spent more than $20 billion to buy 200,000 houses, according to a statement by the Washington-based group.
 Representative Mark Takano, a Democrat from California’s Riverside County, who said large investors have bought thousands of foreclosed properties in his district, outbidding local buyers and helping turn owner-occupied neighborhoods into rental communities.
 “The reality is that institutional buyers are in a relatively limited number of markets,” Jonathan Gray, Blackstone’s global head of real estate, said in an interview earlier this month.
 “Their buying is tapering and yet home prices continue to go up at a pretty strong clip nationally -- even in markets where institutional buyers haven’t purchased a single home” American Homes 4 Rent, the largest publicly traded single-family landlord with about 25,000 houses, and Starwood Waypoint Residential Trust, a REIT headed by Barry Sternlicht, are the other two founding members of the association, which has retained the Glover Park Group, a Washington-based communications and government-relations firm.
 Penn Virginia has oil reserves in the lucrative Eagle Ford shale formation in south Texas, and buyers could be drawn by the chance to accelerate drilling there, according to Imperial Capital LLC, which sees EOG Resources Inc.
 as another possible buyer.
 Local governments ensure free or below-cost electricity to farmers while buying it from generators using ever increasing debt.
 Former ECB President Jean-Claude Trichet made sterilization part of the SMP program in 2010 to allay concerns that the bond-buying would stoke inflation.
 For the next, Ballmer agreed to a $72 billion deal to buy Nokia Oyj’s handset unit in September, accelerating Microsoft’s expansion into hardware.
 The airline was offered the chance to buy a stake in Alitalia SpA several years ago that it turned down because it was “not in a position to make equity investments in foreign carriers,” Al Baker said.
 Etihad Airways is completing a study on Alitalia’s finances to make a decision on whether to buy a stake in the Italian carrier, Chief Executive Officer James Hogan and his Italian counterpart Gabriele Del Torchio said Feb.
 In January, Zynga agreed to buy UK-based NaturalMotion Ltd.
 sent the supplies of ursodeoxycholic acid after executives read how the boy’s father, Joel Correa, had to take eight-hour trips to the Colombian border to buy the medicine.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Temasek Holdings Pte, Singapore’s state-owned investment company, is in talks to sell about $1 billion of stakes in leveraged buyout funds to Ardian, said two people with knowledge of the situation.
 The purchase would be Ardian’s second this month, following its agreement to buy $1 billion in buyout stakes from a division of General Electric Co.
 Temasek has been re-focusing to buy direct stakes in large companies this year.
 and has also offered to buy control of Olam International Ltd, one of the world’s top three coffee and rice traders, for $32 billion.
 He reduced his rating on the stock to the equivalent of hold from buy, while saying it’s unlikely that VeriSign will lose the dot-com contract when it comes up for renewal in 2018.
 Virtu Financial Inc, the New York-based automated market maker that tried and failed to buy Knight Capital Group Inc.
 Business has been good enough that Vincent Viola and Douglas Cifu, Virtu’s founder and chief executive officer, were able to buy the Florida Panthers professional hockey team last year.
 The company’s main business is market making, using software to provide standing offers to buy and sell stocks and other securities.
 Electronic market-making firms such as Virtu use automated systems to earn money off the prices that buyers are willing to pay and sellers are willing to offer.
 “The change in sentiment about investing in Spanish real estate and the amount of cash international investors have to spend here will mean that banks will find buyers for some of these assets,” said Mikel Echavarren, chief executive officer of Irea, a Madrid-based debt-restructuring firm that has advised on 22 billion euros of refinancing and 32 billion euros of real estate transactions.
 have been buying real estate in Spain after home prices fell more than 45 percent from their 2007 peak and prime office rents fell more than 40 percent since 2008.
 Investment in European property debt is set to rise to 40 billion euros this year as funds such as Apollo Global Management LLC and Cerberus Capital Management LP buy loans cheaply and financing for purchases becomes more readily available, Cushman & Wakefield said.
 “CTC has also been badly affected by the political crisis” Libin cut his recommendation on CTC to hold from buy on March 17.
 “I would strongly recommend buying Yandex at these levels if we knew for sure that Putin is not going into the rest of Ukraine and was satisfied with just Crimea,” Barclays’s Vilidnitsky said.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Babcock International Group Plc dropped 67 percent after agreeing to buy Avincis Group for 920 million pounds ($15 billion) from its private-equity owners.
 The engineering-services company said in a statement that it will take on 705 million pounds of Avincis’s debt as part of the deal to buy the helicopter business from Investindustrial and Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co.
 Deutsche Bank AG reiterated its buy rating and said the carrier’s balance sheet is strong enough to sustain its high return-on-equity trend.
March 10 (Bloomberg) -- Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s largest Internet company, agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Chinese e-commerce website JDcom Inc.
 Tencent also agreed to buy a further stake representing 5 percent of the company after it completes an initial public offering, it said.
 Accounting standards changed after the buyout, the filing shows.
 The transaction is the biggest private-equity buyout deal in US.
 The EU is also reviewing the capital rules that should apply to insurers when when they buy securitized debt.
 “It’s a validation of the battery fix and the overall process Boeing went through a year ago,” Arment, who rates the shares buy, said of the report.
 Much of Fusion’s sales growth is coming in California, where buyers have embraced the car’s hybrid and plug-in electric offerings, Merkle said.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP is slowing its purchases of houses to rent amid soaring prices after a buying binge made it the biggest US.
 After investing $8 billion since April 2012 to buy 43,000 homes in 14 cities, the company has narrowed most of its purchasing to Seattle, Atlanta, Miami, Orlando and Tampa.
 “It’s at a much lower level than it was 12 or 24 months ago” Private-equity firms, hedge funds, real estate investment trusts and other institutional investors have spent more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 rental homes in the last two years.
 Home prices have risen 24 percent since a post-bubble low in March 2012, which was about when corporate buyers started their buying spree, according to the S&P/Case-Shiller index.
 “In addition, these companies have done this for a certain amount of time and there are lessons learned” While institutional purchases nationwide fell to a 22-month low in January, corporate investors were more active in the Atlanta region, buying 25 percent of homes sold, according to data firm RealtyTrac.
 Outbidding Homebuyers Last week, a group of 80 tenant and neighborhood advocacy organizations, including the California Reinvestment Coalition, the National Community Reinvestment Coalition and the National Consumer Law Center, asked federal regulators “to address first-time homebuyers being outbid, tenants being displaced, and neighborhoods undergoing dramatic changes as private equity and investor cash continues flooding into local housing markets” Gray, 44, said the influence of corporate investors on home prices has been exaggerated.
 “There’s a narrative out there that institutional buyers are driving the market,” Gray said.
 “But the reality is that institutional buyers are in a relatively limited number of markets, their buying is tapering and yet home prices continue to go up at a pretty strong clip nationally -- even in markets where institutional buyers haven’t purchased a single home” American Homes At the height of its activity, Blackstone’s Invitation Homes LP made purchases that may have comprised as much as 6 percent of sales for several months in one or more of its 14 markets, Gray said.
 Customers sign long-term contracts to buy the power and the company is pouring much of its revenue into building more systems.
 Helios Purchase Macquarie Capital agreed in August to buy 45 percent of Singapore’s Helios Terminal Corp.
 buyout firm TPG Capital, planning to spend $1 billion in the next five years.
 “It’s moving from a purchase model to a rental model -- subscriptions are essentially a rental,” said Jay Vleeschhouwer, an analyst at Griffin Securities, who has a buy rating on Adobe stock.
 CommonWealth has denied Corvex and Related’s claims of conflicts of interest and said it is focused on buying office buildings in US.
 and other big buyout firms, JLL and its fellow mid-size shops are taking advantage of a surge in asset values to lock in investment gains across their holdings.
 “The fact that rates are so low enables buyers to finance with debt at very attractive rates” Since the start of 2013, JLL has profitably exited window maker PGT Inc.
 agreed to buy Maker Studios, a supplier of online video content to YouTube, for at least $500 million, gaining technology and experience with short-form entertainment.
 even as costs rise for buyers including Michael Foods Inc.
 Two-thirds of those shipments ended up in China, the biggest buyer, with exports reaching 26494 million tons, topping the previous record of 24464 million tons three years earlier.
 They really had a strong revenue increase there” Of the 11 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg, seven have buy ratings on the company and four have holds.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 Woodside planned to buy a stake worth as much as $26 billion in the field.
 Julius Baer will have spare capital of 150 million francs to 250 million francs that could be used to make acquisitions, or to introduce a special dividend or a share buyback program after the transaction is completed, Collardi said in the television interview.
 The Federal Open Market Committee has cut monthly bond buying to $65 billion from $85 billion in December.
 The Bethesda, Maryland-based company, which buys some uranium from Russia under a 10-year contract, listed assets of $70 million and debt of $107 billion in Chapter 11 papers filed today in US.
 Its electrical-steel unit is undergoing due diligence before a potential sale, while talks continue with potential buyers of Berco, which makes parts for earth-moving machinery, Chief Financial Officer Guido Kerkhoff told Boersen-Zeitung this month.
March 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cevian Capital AB, the Swedish investor that seeks to buy undervalued stocks, increased its stake in German steelmaker ThyssenKrupp AG, pressing ahead with a goal to gain a seat on the board that oversees management.
 Since then it has tripled its stake and hasn’t ruled out buying more of the equities in the next 12 months.
 “With an improving economic environment, UniCredit and other lenders in the country appear very cheap” BlackRock joined foreign investors including Abu Dhabi-based sovereign wealth fund Aabar Investments PJS in buying shares of Italy’s biggest bank while the country’s banking foundations cut their stakes during the financial crisis.
 is planning to increase its share buyback program by more than 80 percent if investors approve its $45 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc, boosting shareholder returns.
 Comcast will add $25 billion to the current plan for $3 billion in 2014 buybacks if shareholders vote for the deal, Chief Financial Officer Michael Angelakis said in an interview.
 Time Warner Cable suspended its own repurchase program of about $25 billion after agreeing to Comcast’s buyout proposal in February.
 “We’d evaluate whether we’d want to accelerate that plan and increase it above $3 billion, based on the fact that Time Warner Cable had terminated their buyback plan” That means Comcast’s share repurchases this year could total $55 billion.
 Comcast’s shares rose as much as 21 percent to $5039 after Bloomberg News reported the buyback proposal.
 Comcast may boost its buybacks even further after the merger by using the proceeds of the planned sale of cable systems serving 3 million subscribers, Angelakis said.
 Philadelphia-based Comcast is looking to use the “vast majority” of the proceeds from that sale to add to the share buyback plan, he said.
 Charter, backed by billionaire investor John Malone, failed in its bid buy Time Warner Cable when it offered $13250 per share in January.
 cable companies, may seek to buy a portion, one person said.
 analyst in New York who recommends buying the stock.
 in Denver who recommends buying the stock and raised his 12-to-18-month price target for Lions Gate to $43 from $40 on March 18.
 If they continue this arrangement, it will be a heavy loss for the country” While Prime Minister Manmohan Singh’s increase in gold levies was intended to help fix India’s record current-account deficit, the move is also fostering the black market for smuggled metal to a country that was the world’s largest buyer in 2012.
 In the two months through May, jewelry buyers and investors imported 304 tons, or 37 percent of the total for all of 2013, based on WGC data.
 The central bank barred jewelers from buying gold on credit from banks and required evidence that 20 percent of the purchases were being used to make items that were exported rather than sold at home.
(Corrects extent of share decline in first two paragraphs of story originally published March 18) March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Cairn Energy Plc, a Scottish oil explorer, slumped in London trading after saying it was suspending a share buyback program pending the resolution of a tax dispute in India.
 To date, 25,180,201 shares have been repurchased for $947 million as part of the buyback program, the Edinburgh-based company said today in a statement.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Foreign investors boosted purchases of China’s onshore bonds by 16 percent this year as some funds look at the yuan’s drop as a buying opportunity.
 In the US, overseas buyers account for 47 percent of Treasuries.
 Shareholders can buy three new shares for every eight already owned at 56 pence apiece, according to a separate statement from the insurer today.
 It’s too early to buy Indonesian shares after valuations increased this year, according to UBS’s Tanja.
 Indonesian shares have lured net buying from foreign investors during 17 of the last 18 days, pushing inflows in February to the highest in 12 months.
 Caesars’ $21 billion of long-term debt is an albatross for a business whose cash flow fails to meet its more than $500 million of quarterly interest expense following a 2008 leveraged buyout.
 The obligations are the result of the buyout, when Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital acquired the company, then named Harrah’s Entertainment Co, in a $307 billion deal.
 That grade “indicates that default of some kind appears probable” In July, Caesars announced a plan to let shareholders buy into a new unit that will own part of its interactive business and other divisions.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Etablissements Maurel & Prom SA, a French oil and gas explorer, dropped the most in more than two years in Paris trading after ruling out a dividend and saying it’s yet to find a buyer.
 The explorer has struggled to raise production and make new discoveries since selling Congolese fields to Eni SpA in 2007, and has sought a partner or buyer to help it expand.
 “They were late to the cloud,” said Ives, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 The company is under pressure in its three main businesses, said Brent Thill, an analyst at UBS AG in San Francisco who recommends buying the stock.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Cable tycoon Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA, which is in exclusive talks to buy Vivendi SA’s SFR phone unit, has no plan to sweeten its offer even after rival bidder Bouygues SA did, according to a person familiar with the matter.
March 25 (Bloomberg) -- SouthGobi Resources Ltd, a coal miner in Mongolia, is seeking additional financing to avoid a default on $250 million in debt, hurt by low prices and weaker-than-expected demand from Chinese buyers.
 “Liquidity issues in China affect how much people are buying.
 lost 69 percent after buying virtual-reality headset maker Oculus VR Inc.
 They accuse the ruling Pheu Thai party of buying votes with damaging populist policies.
 Pearson, who took the helm of Valeant in 2008, has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 35 companies as he works toward his goal of making Valeant one of the world’s top five drugmakers by the end of 2016.
 Even as tensions build between the West and Russia over Ukraine, ETF buyers are chasing equity returns and bigger yields on the bonds of the most-indebted US.
 Investors must assume responsibility for the products they buy, he said.
 The agreement to buy Vivendi SA’s 53 percent stake in Maroc Telecom is subject to regulatory approvals from the five jurisdictions in which the carrier operates, Serkan Okandan said in a phone interview today.
 “Immediately after closing the transaction our financing is ready and we will move on” Axiata Stake Etisalat agreed to buy the Maroc Telecom stake for about 42 billion euros in November.
 “Now, you have guidance that reflects a bit of an investment year but shows trends getting better throughout the year” He has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 Homebuilder MRV Engenharia e Participacoes SA rebounded from its biggest two-day slump since 2012 after saying it plans to buy back about 5 percent of its publicly traded shares.
 Alibaba agreed in April to buy 18 percent of the company, also known as Sina Weibo.
 UBS AG recommended selling the stock, reducing it from a buy.
 The stock was downgraded to hold from strong buy at Haitong International Securities.
March 31 (Bloomberg) -- Credit Suisse Group AG, the Zurich-based bank that has been selling businesses to raise capital, transferred its DLJ Merchant Banking Partners buyout unit to the fund’s managers.
 The bank has invested in the group’s buyouts and received US.
 made a conditional offer to buy Madison Square Garden Co’s Fuse TV for $350 million in cash, which would surpass offers by Jennifer Lopez and Sean “Diddy” Combs, Artist Series said.
 Combs has offered to buy the channel for about $200 million.
 to find a buyer for Fuse.
 If stocks fall further, Usmanov’scompany may consider buying more shares of wireless operator OAOMegaFon (MFON) and Internet company Mailru Group Ltd.
 “If the events will further escalate, wewill be buying shares.
 Crisis is always a good opportunity asvaluations become cheap” Mailru agreed to buy 12 percent of VKontakte, Russia’sbiggest social network, raising its stake to 52 percent, andstarted to buy back $45 million of its own stock, the companysaid in statements today.
 also approached Safeway about buying part of its operations, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Even if Kroger offered $45 to buy the whole company, Safeway would still be getting the lowest profit multiple for a food retail deal of more than $1 billion since 2004, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 ‘Go-Shop’ Provision Cerberus’s Albertsons chain last week said it would buy Safeway and its 1,335 US.
 I think it’s a fair valuation” The complicated structure of the Cerberus bid suggests Kroger wasn’t interested in buying the whole company, said Andrew Wolf, an analyst at BB&T Corp.
 Kroger President Michael Ellis said on a conference call last week that the company likes to buy well-run companies that it admires, such as Harris Teeter.
 The chain contacted Cerberus about buying some Safeway stores it may not want, said a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 “It makes a lot of sense for Albertsons to buy this for a whole lot of reasons.
 Canfor rose 24 percent to C$27 after Raymond James raised the company to strong buy from outperform.
 “The last thing you want from a bank is for them to ask you to put funds to buy something with them.
 UBS AG advised investors this week to wait for more clarity on the political crisis, or more attractive valuations, before buying.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- Orix Corp, a Japanese finance and leasing firm, said it is in talks to buy Hartford Financial Services Group Inc’s unit in the country.
 The acquisition is “good for them because it extends their service offerings,” said Loke Chunying, an analyst at UOB Kay Hian Pte who recommends buying the stock.
 downgraded America Movil shares to neutral from buy, saying the law will hurt earnings.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- BlackRock Inc, the world’s largest asset manager, is looking to buy longer-dated municipal bonds on the view that those securities are cheap compared with federal debt.
 “There they said publicly: ‘We are drawing a line in the sand, this is the bottom end of the currency and we will buy all quantity necessary to support it there’” Last month’s rate cut, which brought the benchmark rate to 075 percent, failed to halt the shekel’s appreciation.
 That means buying more foreign currency” The Bank of Israel said in October that it would buy $35 billion this year to offset the effect of gas production on the balance of payments and would also continue to make purchases in reaction to fluctuations “not in line with fundamental economic conditions or when the foreign exchange market is disorderly” While the bank bought $17 billion in January, reversing the shekel trend, purchases in February dropped to $350 million, and the shekel gained 08 percent that month.
 Enel said it will also undertake minority buyouts.
 The State Bank of Vietnam and the Ministry of Justice are trying to “quickly” complete legislation that will be a “crucial legal basis” for a government-backed asset management company, lenders and investors to buy and sell bad-debt assets and collateral at banks, Governor Nguyen Van Binh said yesterday in e-mailed responses to Bloomberg News.
 The VAMC will consider buying bad debt at market value when conditions mature, he said.
 “I’m a big buyer of China,” said Nader Naeimi, Sydney-based head of dynamic asset allocation at AMP Capital, which manages $131 billion.
March 3 (Bloomberg) -- China Fishery Group Ltd, the biggest anchovy-quota holder in Peru following its acquisition of Oslo-listed Copeinca ASA, may be downgraded after the buyout sent its debt levels soaring.
 The stock has slumped 75 percent since June 2010 when the Carlyle Asia Partners III LP fund invested about S$210 million ($166 million) buying 1135 million new shares at S$185 each, plus 267 million warrants.
 Reckitt Benckiser is also interested in buying Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drugs business, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 BP, Europe’s second-largest oil company, buys and sells currencies to hedge against movements in foreign-exchange rates, repatriate earnings and make proprietary bets.
 Hiro Real Estate Co, a Japanese investment firm, is seeking to sell the long-term leasehold, which would give the buyer rights to control the 17 million-square-foot (158,000-square-meter) landmark at 150 E.
 Centrally located buildings in the world’s financial centers have been commanding buyer interest, even in the face of low yields.
 Fasulo said he expects a “deep and diverse” pool of potential buyers, including real estate investment trusts, foreign investors, wealthy individuals and pension funds.
 Hiro took over the ground lease from Mobil Corp, predecessor of oil company Exxon Mobil Corp, in 1987, a period when Japanese investors were active buyers of New York real estate, acquiring properties such as Rockefeller Center.
 GPT also said its retail property fund would buy CPPIB’s half share of a Melbourne mall for A$505 million on the same condition.
 Vodafone increased its offer to buy Ono to about 7 billion euros last week in a meeting with the Spanish company’s key shareholders, people familiar with the matter have said.
 It’s the fact that rates backed up quite a ways, and that brought in a set of buyers” The yield on the current five-year note fell six basis points, or 006 percentage point, to 167 percent at 1:21 pm.
 cable operator, won’t make an offer to buy out of bankruptcy the television network it jointly owns with Major League Baseball’s Houston Astros and the National Basketball Association’s Rockets.
 Comcast had indicated in court papers filed early in the bankruptcy case that it was interested in buying the network through a court-supervised auction process.
 The Astros called the involuntary bankruptcy a power grab by Comcast that’s intended to strip the network of its value and buy it on the cheap, according to court filings.
 BMW’s fourth-quarter earnings before interest and taxes rose 42 percent to 195 billion euros, counter to analyst estimates that profit would fall, as the 3-Series sedan and wagon attracted buyers.
 “Purchasing power has declined and the regular citizens’ opportunities to buy Western goods have weakened” The ruble has dropped about 10 percent against the euro this year as markets have reacted to the conflict between Russia and Ukraine.
March 21 (Bloomberg) -- Canada Pension Plan Investment Board, the nation’s largest pension fund manager, agreed to buy Wilton Re Holdings Ltd.
 “We’re going to use a major chunk of that money to buy back our shares.
 So that in addition to what we’ve already stated is our share buyback program, it enabled us to state that we are buying back $2 billion worth of stock in the very first quarter” ‘Competitive Industry’ CBS Outdoor had 330,000 advertising displays in the US.
 stock market, where more than 50 electronic venues compete to match buyers with sellers.
 The billionaire, who is said to be considering an offer for T-Mobile after buying control of Sprint last year, has met resistance from regulators who are skeptical that shrinking the number of national wireless carriers to three would promote competition.
 Comcast recently agreed to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 ‘Poor Country’ “It’s not the idea of if I’m a rich country I’m able to buy myself the technology that I need, if I’m a poor country I’m not able to do it,” Viedma said.
 Beyond weather, borrowing costs have increased for buyers.
 have expressed interest in buying Energen Corp’s natural gas utility, which could fetch more than $1 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “Should it become necessary, we will therefore enforce the minimum exchange rate by buying foreign currency in unlimited quantities” The International Monetary Fund backed the SNB’s cap earlier this week, saying the franc remained “moderately overvalued” If the currency faces further appreciation pressure, the SNB should consider charging commercial banks on excess reserves, the IMF said, repeating an assessment it already gave a year ago.
 Next WhatsApp Potential buyers attend SXSW to find at new apps and talent, Forrest said.
 Protea Hospitality Holdings, which Bethesda, Maryland-based Marriott agreed to buy for $186 million in January, is building five-star and three-star hotels in Lagos, Nigeria’s commercial capital, adding 400 rooms to the 700 it has in the country, Danny Bryer, director of sales, marketing and revenue for Protea, said in e-mailed response to questions.
 Oliver told reporters he spoke to Bank of Montreal Chief Executive Officer Bill Downe about the lender’s decision to lower mortgage rates in time for the spring home-buying season.
 “This rate change is driven solely by the fact that bond yields have fallen and we are in what has traditionally been the busiest season for buying a home,” Paul Deegan, spokesman at Canada’s fourth-largest lender, said by e-mail.
 Morgan Stanley raised Germany’s second-largest lender to overweight, similar to buy, from equal weight.
 Altice SA, which is in talks to buy Vivendi’s SFR phone unit, has no plan to revise its bid even after Bouygues SA sweetened its rival offer yesterday, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 cut its rating on the company to neutral from buy, saying the strength of the pound and the euro may cut into profit.
March 5 (Bloomberg) -- Lar Espana Real Estate Socimi SA, a company that plans to buy distressed property in Spain, rose on the first day of trading in Madrid on expectations it will benefit from a recovery in the country’s real estate market.
 It will focus on buying undervalued offices in Madrid and Barcelona as well as retail parks and warehouses throughout Spain, the company said in the Feb.
 Potential buyers include Fast Retailing Co, owner of the Uniqlo clothing chain, which has held talks to purchase J.
 agreed to buy US.
 The biggest was SoftBank Corp’s agreement to buy Sprint Corp.
 The move puts two executives in their late-40s in charge of running the buyout firm underneath its three billionaire founders, Bill Conway, Dan D’Aniello and David Rubenstein, who are in their mid-60s.
 When we make investments in new initiatives and new funds, we do try to make sure that we do it properly, but it should result in revenue growth for us” Even with recent acquisitions, Carlyle relies more on leveraged buyout profits, which are produced in lumpy intervals, and less on predictable management fees than its peers, according to Morgan Stanley analyst Matt Kelley in New York.
 Akerson was head of global buyouts and co-head of US.
 buyouts at the firm before joining GM in 2009 after its rescue by the US.
 Lee had been at New York-based Warburg Pincus for 21 years and was instrumental in dozens of deals, including the buyout of Neiman Marcus Group.
 31, the buyout firm had invested in more than 470 corporate transactions, returned an average of 30 percent annually to investors, and oversaw almost $189 billion.
 The battery maker argued at the hearing that there was little likelihood that it was susceptible to any price fixing because it buys very little lead in the US.
 The Asian nation will probably need to depend more on American wheat as the bottlenecks continue, according to Nobuyuki Chino, who has traded grains for more than three decades and is the president of Continental Rice Corp.
 Ultimately, the changes may be a boon for New Oriental as a move away from memorization of SAT words to focus on context and the ability to synthesize information could lead to more hours in the classroom, said David Riedel, New York-based president of Riedel Research Group Inc, who rates the stock a buy.
 AerCap in December agreed to buy International Lease Finance Corp.
 One loonie buys 9103 US.
 and Apollo Global Management LLC, leaders of the biggest shale-field buyouts, the difference between failure and success may come down to 93 days.
 KKR, led by Henry Kravis, in November 2011 agreed to buy Samson Resources Corp.
 Three months later, with gas plunging, Leon Black’s Apollo struck a deal to buy EP Energy Corp.
 Firms that made billions in the early stage of the boom by buying exploration rights for gas fields and then flipping them are increasingly forced to move into the more costly business of extracting oil, natural gas and gas liquids like propane and butane, after increased supply depressed prices for dry gas.
 “There will be more development drilling that will require more capital, and it will take longer” That change, Foley said in a phone interview, could end a 10-year run in which energy-dedicated buyout funds have beaten average private-equity returns by 24 percentage points and topped the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index by 9 percentage points annually through September, according to Cambridge Associates LLC, a Boston-based researcher and consultant.
 The slump put a halt to private-equity firms’ ability to buy undeveloped gas fields, bore a few wells, then flip the land to the big energy companies.
 When the buyout closed in May 2012, a month after gas hit its low, natural gas accounted for about 70 percent of reserves and production, according to two people familiar with the deal, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The buyers’ plan, to invest surplus cash into oil- and liquids-laden reserves, was thwarted when falling gas prices eroded revenue.
 In 2007 KKR led the record-sized $48 billion buyout of Energy Future Holdings Corp, a Dallas-based utility whose revenues are linked to gas.
 In 2012 it raised a $125 billion fund to buy mature, fully drilled acreage that large companies no longer want to own.
 KKR’s new $2 billion vehicle, which began to deploy money last year, helps energy producers buy acreage from others or bankroll new wells they lack the money to drill.
 to buy Eagle Ford acreage from Chesapeake for $685 million.
 rose to a record after Sun International Ltd, South Africa’s second-biggest leisure company, said it’s in talks to buy a stake in the competitor’s slot-machine unit.
 Dentsu soared 55 percent to 3,850 yen after its rating was raised to buy from neutral at Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 Homeowners with rooftop panels buy less electricity from the grid, and those who use batteries to store power may need to purchase even less.
 said it will spend $70 million to buy 1,000 delivery trucks powered by propane and build 50 fueling stations as it expands one of the largest private alternative-energy fleets in the US.
 “Pierre Karl is the first billionaire in PQ history,” said Nadeau, who was a vice president of the province’s state-owned pension fund manager, the Caisse de Depot et Placement du Quebec, when it teamed up with Quebecor to buy Videotron.
 Finance Minister Siv Jensen in February said banks should be more flexible and lend up to 90 percent of the property value, compared with a previous 85 percent cap, to support first-time homebuyers, going against the advice of its financial regulator.
 Coming back from abroad, she thought, “now I need a job and I need to buy a flat immediately,” she said in an interview.
 “I feel like renting, isn’t a failure, but a downer, because you want to have your grown-up life” Meldahl said she expects to buy an apartment in the summer with help from her parents after she finds a full-time job.
 are buying assets in developing Asia to expand in faster-growing economies.
 The company spent C$129 billion to bring the Kearl oil-sands project online last year and joined with Exxon, which owns 70 percent of its stock, to buy more oil-sands acreage for about C$751 million in August.
 That includes 25 million euros that the Dusseldorf-based buyer will spend to further develop the site.
 Residents of those cities can also buy the insurance.
 to help it find a buyer amid a government crackdown on smoking, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Chrysler’s strength in SUVs and pickups is helping as buyers coping with inclement weather are seeking vehicles that get good traction.
 Margins are rich after corn prices dropped 40 percent last year, and as Brazil, the world’s second-largest producer after the US, has been buying ethanol from the US.
 The buyout firm has begun a process of extending the repayment date for 400 million euros of Infinitas debt to 2016, said two of the people.
 Infinitas provides primary, secondary and higher vocational educational material, content and services to 90,000 schools in six European countries, according to the buyout firm’s website.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from investors such as pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 28 to buy F&C, the manager of the oldest UK.
 executive Mike Cavanagh as co-president, and buyout firm Apollo Global Management LLC looked to Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 LightSquared has accused Ergen of secretly accumulating the debt so he can buy the company’s airwaves for a below-market price through bankruptcy.
 ‘Blocking Position’ Ergen was accused of seeking to manipulate the outcome of the bankruptcy through the “blocking position” he built up in LightSquared debt, by using it to buy assets on the cheap and drive away other bidders.
 Ergen has said he was acting personally, not for Dish, in buying the debt and made no “false representations” about his investment.
 Societe Generale, France’s second-largest bank by market value, agreed to increase its controlling stake in Moscow-based OAO Rosbank last year by buying VTB Group’s 10 percent stake.
 LightSquared has further argued that Ergen sought to manipulate the outcome of the bankruptcy through the “blocking position” he built up, trying to use it to buy LightSquared’s assets on the cheap and keep away other bidders.
 Ergen has said he was acting personally, not for Dish, in buying the debt and made no “false representations” about his investment.
 Tricon is looking to buy communities of manufactured homes in the so-called “sun belt” of Arizona, Florida, and California, where selling prices average $60,800, the cheapest of any US.
 The Toronto-based company aims to buy assets of about C$750 million ($670 million) in the housing segment, with the first investment possibly this year, according to Chief Operating Officer Gary Berman.
 Private-equity firms, hedge funds, and other investors spent more than $20 billion buying about 200,000 rental homes in the last two years.
 It will also “protect consumers and force them to get a clear view of their personal finances before buying” Business Minister Henrik Sass Larsen, who had been due to present the bill today, will now show it to lawmakers on March 18, according to the parliament’s website.
 In response to the findings on the failed test, the Missile Defense Agency plans to improve the warhead’s battery “and implement a fleet-wide software change” for the 20 already in the field that are the same version, Frank Kendall, the Pentagon’s top weapons buyer, wrote House Armed Services Committee members in an update on the continuing review.
 The fiscal 2015-2019 budget plan for the Missile Defense Agency calls for $439 billion for continued development of the ground system, $189 million for a new “common kill vehicle” that could replace the Raytheon warhead and $619 million to buy additional interceptors and other equipment.
 Improving “in-stocks” -- a measure of how much merchandise is available for shoppers to buy -- is a top focus for Wal-Mart, executives said at its Year Beginning Meeting, according to notes taken by an attendee that were reviewed by Bloomberg.
 Publicly traded companies can also issue the stock to pay for acquisitions and buy back shares, the regulator said.
 Gaining new network infrastructure from Bouygues could allow Iliad to stop buying capacity from Orange, for which it pays between 500 million euros and 700 millions euros each year.
 San Miguel “received several offers,” Ang said in a mobile-phone message today, after yesterday saying Ginebra was attracting buyers.
 Bassman, who calls himself “The Convexity Maven,” told clients in a note obtained by Bloomberg News that he was ending his 30-year career on Wall Street’s “sell side” and joining the “buy side” so he could “more directly implement my ideas for broad-minded investors” He’ll start at Pimco’s Newport Beach, California, headquarters in July, reporting to Josh Thimons and Steve Rodosky, the firm said in a statement yesterday.
 Oil Search, which agreed last month to buy a stake in the same discoveries for an initial $900 million, lodged a dispute with InterOil, the Port Moresby-based company said today in a statement, without specifying the basis of its complaint.
 “We can only speculate that Oil Search feels that by bringing in Exxon, it’s a more aligned partnership” Preemption Right Oil Search’s deal to buy 228 percent of the InterOil fields from minority partners gave the company the right to preempt Total’s initial agreement in December, according to a JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Talks are at an advanced stage with a regional investment firm, two of the people said, declining to identify the potential buyer.
 Asked a week later whether he was looking for a buyer, MagicJack Chief Executive Officer Gerald Vento called it a “very appropriate question” before going on to say that he’s “never worried about exit strategy” The stock price, in the meantime, is surging.
 To lure a buyer, MagicJack will have to distinguish itself in a crowded field of competitors by touting its low cost, offering high call quality, and addressing data privacy concerns, said Scott Kessler, an analyst at S&P Capital IQ.
 Fed buying of the securities that helped spur a housing recovery is poised to fall below growth in the $55 trillion government-backed market as soon as May, Nomura Holdings Inc.
 economy at the same time home buying approaches its peak season.
 “The hawkish statement from the Fed occurred at a precarious time for the asset class from a medium-term supply and demand perspective” Closer Hurdle A more-immediate test for the market comes next month, when issuance of the types of bonds the Fed is buying overtakes its purchases for the first time since November, according to Credit Suisse Group AG.
 Attracting Investors That spread between yields on agency mortgage bonds used to package new loans and an average of 5- and 10-year Treasury rates will need to increase about 24 basis points to attract private investors to absorb supply once the Fed ends its buying, the Nomura analysts wrote.
 “When the Fed started buying mortgages in a really big way, we got out of the way,” said Matt Freund, chief investment officer of USAA Mutual Funds, who oversees more than $60 billion.
 The debt would need to reach “more of a market-clearing price” for his firm to consider buying again, he said.
 If it were to stop immediately after the projected end of its new buying in October, “the impact on the market could be quite severe” because it would add about $100 billion of supply to the market over 6 months, JPMorgan analysts led by Matt Jozoff wrote.
 Justified Gains The rally in Olam shares is justified given the company’s outlook, according to Tanuj Shori, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Nomura Holdings Inc, who has a buy rating.
 The investment firm agreed at the time to buy any rights not taken up by other investors.
 Investors who typically buy other types of distressed assets participated in the Puerto Rico sale, with hedge funds accounting for the majority of buyers, according to David Chafey, chairman of the Government Development Bank, which handles the island’s debt transactions.
 While non-traditional muni buyers buoyed demand for the sale, the borrowing gave investors confidence that there would be enough appetite for last week’s $128 billion of long-term issuance.
 Rothschild thanked the Bakries for buying back coal assets he described as “worthless” Aga, son of Nirwan Bakrie and executive vice president of Bakrie Capital Indonesia, countered that Indonesia is “an amazing investment haven” In other posts, they described each other as “dumb” Relations between Rothschild, who still owns about 17 percent of the venture, and the Bakries have been strained over their ill-fated $3 billion investment unveiled in 2010 that created Bumi Plc, later renamed Asia Resource Minerals.
 The complex transaction involved the Bakries buying back from Asia Resource Minerals a 29 percent stake in coal exporter PT Bumi Resources.
 will invest as much as $100 million in a program to buy land that developers will use for large power projects and lease it back to them.
 “The international buyers of these products will likely need to refine them further, so this is basically a veiled form of condensate exports,” wrote Mariani, who’s based in Austin, Texas.
 Canada’s reliance on the US, which buys three-quarters of its exports, took a toll in the last recession, and weak shipments abroad since then are holding back economic growth.
 has sent marketing documents to potential buyers, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the process isn’t public.
 Milan trails European competitors in game-day revenue because the San Siro, the 88-year-old stadium it shares with Inter, doesn’t have the money-making amenities of newer facilities, said Galatioto, who said he expects potential buyers to come from Asia.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Short-seller Carson Block declined to comment on today’s buyout offer for Olam International Ltd, the Singapore-based commodities trader whose stock he has said since 2012 is worthless.
 Morgan Stanley said its latest data shows no evidence of a bubble and “prices are clearly not being affected as much as first feared” About 80 percent of activity is outside of London and southeast England and more than 80 percent of transactions involve first-time buyers with modest incomes, according to the report.
 is sticking with its recommendation to buy Chinese stocks, the biggest decliners worldwide this year, after valuations fell to the lowest level in a decade compared with global peers.
 “Once we find something to buy, it’s time to do it,” Pertti Vanhanen, group head of property, said in an interview.
 Aberdeen is buying Scottish Widows Investment Managers from Lloyds Banking Group Plc to create Europe’s largest publicly traded money manager, overtaking Schroders Plc.
 “House prices are skyrocketing, at least in London, and you need to have savings” to buy a home, he said in the March 12 interview at the MIPIM property conference in Cannes, France.
 “People are older and older when they buy their first apartments” Their investors are interested in buying into multifamily housing because of the steady cash flow and the market is less established, he said.
 Loeb’s Third Point LLC pushed for an initial publicoffering of the entertainment assets last year after buying astake in Sony.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- Puerto Rico’s record $35 billion sale of junk-rated municipal debt buys the struggling US.
 The majority of buyers were hedge funds, although traditional muni investors participated, David Chafey, chairman of the bank, said in an interview.
 “It certainly gives us time to continue working on the measures that we’ve committed to do in terms of balancing the budget” Even with the demand from different types of buyers, Puerto Rico won’t borrow again through June, Chafey said.
 To help lure buyers, the commonwealth agreed to give investors the ability to sue in a New York court, a first for Puerto Rico general obligations, in the event of a default on this deal, according to bond documents.
 Vodafone yesterday agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 72 billion euros ($10 billion) including debt.
 UBS raised its investment rating on the stock to buy from neutral and also raised its target price to 780 yen from 550 yen.
 While the securities rebounded after the crisis, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 Prosecutors accused Litvak of misrepresenting sellers’ asking prices to buyers, or vice versa, keeping the difference for Jefferies.
 Ergen, who accumulated a $1 billion stake in LightSquared debt, at one point offered to buy some of the company’s airwaves for $22 billion, only to drop the proposal amid a dispute with Falcone, whose Harbinger Capital Partners LLC controls LightSquared.
 Rivals such as Ergen’s satellite TV business were barred from buying the debt, according to the companies.
 Ergen has said he was acting personally, not for Dish, in buying the debt and made no “false representations” about his investment.
 and European Union sanctions against Russia won’t stop OAO Rosneft from buying Morgan Stanley’s oil sales unit, Chief Executive Officer Igor Sechin said, underscoring the limitations of the punitive measures.
 “Rosneft welcomes Japanese partners across all areas of energy production from extraction, to infrastructure, logistics and others” LNG Buyers Rosneft is aiming to attract Japanese buyers first and foremost for a liquefied natural gas plant it plans to build at Sakhalin-1 field, Sechin said.
 It’s not likely that Nordion will get a competing offer from other buyers, Alan Ridgeway, an analyst with Paradigm Capital Inc, wrote in a note to clients.
 Litvak was also accused of defrauding investors by telling some buyers that the bonds in the Jefferies inventory were being offered for sale by a third-party seller that didn’t exist.
 While the securities rebounded, markets remained illiquid, with wide spreads between bids from buyers and sellers.
 offered to buy the rest of the commodity trader in a deal valued at S$53 billion ($42 billion).
 The retailer will begin accepting trade-ins on March 26, and customers will be able to buy pre-owned video games later this year.
 agreed in July to spend $25 billion buying Harris Teeter Supermarkets Inc, whose 212 stores compete directly with Food Lion in the southeastern region of the US, and Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 28 that it may raise as much as HK$222 billion ($29 billion) from giving shareholders convertible warrants to buy land in the city.
 The company was bought in 2007 in the largest leveraged buyout in history, which added debt to its balance sheet and bumped holders of its munis below other creditors in payment priority.
 Peak Purchase The buyout of TXU in 2007 for $48 billion came at the peak of the private-equity boom that ended a year later with the financial crisis.
 The buyout -- led by KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners -- was a bet that natural gas prices would rise, allowing the company to charge more for electricity.
March 14 (Bloomberg) -- Federal Reserve policy makers meet for the first time under Chair Janet Yellen, who has pledged to continue gradual reductions in monthly bond buying as long as the US.
 LightSquared has accused Ergen of buying its debt on behalf his Dish Network Corp, a competitor, to acquire LightSquared’s airwaves for a below-market price.
 consumer prices were probably little changed in February, according to a Bloomberg survey, rising 01 percent for a second month as clothing stores and auto dealers boosted discounts to lure buyers.
 The Federal Open Market Committee meets for the first time under Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen, who has pledged to continue gradual reductions in monthly bond buying as long as the economy continues to strengthen.
 Brazil Soccer Federation Complains About Hyundai World Cup Ad Brazil’s soccer federation said an advertising campaign by Hyundai Motor Co, which promises new car buyers an extra year of warranty if the national team wins the World Cup, breaches its intellectual property rights.
 Gross, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, reduced the allocation in his $236 billion Total Return Fund to 43 percent in February from 46 percent a month earlier as the Federal Reserve cut its bond-buying program, data on Pimco’s website showed yesterday.
 “Sell what the Fed has been buying because they won’t be buying them when taper ends in October,” Gross, who is based in Newport Beach, California, wrote on Twitter last week.
 Direct bidders, non-primary dealers buying for their own accounts, purchased 275 percent of the notes, the highest proportion since September.
 Hershey officials denied in court papers they buy any cocoa directly from Ivory Coast or Ghana, relying instead on “cocoa-derived products” provided by multinational corporations.
 The economy’s growth should encourage investors to buy Zambia’s bond, said Charles Laurie, head of Africa at Bath, UK-based risk analysis company Maplecroft.
 The Waterloo, Ontario-based company didn’t disclose terms of the agreement, nor name the buyer.
 The ratio of Roche’s net debt to assets fell to 11 percent at the end of last year, the first time it’s been in the company’s zero to 15 percent target range since buying the rest of California biotechnology company Genentech in 2009 for $468 billion.
 Negotiations are at an advanced stage with a regional investment firm, two of the people said, declining to name the potential buyer.
 said March 2 the company and its partners will pay $16 billion in cash and assumed debt to buy two hydroelectric power plants in India, while Emirates Telecommunications Corp.
 Ergen’s SP Special Opportunities LLC fund began buying the debt following a March 2012 revelation that Dish had interference issues with its spectrum and could benefit from obtaining LightSquared’s, LeBlanc said today.
 “Nobody said, ‘Help, there’s a competitor in my capital structure!’” Illicit Ploy Ergen has said that he acted only for himself in buying the debt and made no “false representations” He characterized the lawsuit as an illicit ploy to help Falcone keep control of LightSquared in bankruptcy and said the case has cost tens of millions of dollars, eating into creditors’ recoveries.
 Kiser testified that he didn’t consider whether he was acting for the company or the chairman when he first looked into buying the debt in 2011.
 Stock Rally Rite Aid shares rose this week to the highest since October 2001 after Goldman Sachs’s Jones recommended investors buy the stock.
 Walgreen, based in Deerfield, Illinois, has a strong presence in the Midwest and buying Rite Aid would fill some holes for the company in the northeast and mid-Atlantic regions, particularly in Philadelphia, Washington and Baltimore, and bulk up its California presence, said Andrew Wolf of BB&T.
 Louis-based Express Scripts declined to comment on whether their companies would be interested in buying Rite Aid.
March 13 (Bloomberg) -- Edison International and Sempra Energy utilities in Southern California were cleared to buy as much as 1,500 megawatts of electricity to replace the power lost when the San Onofre nuclear plant shut in 2012.
 pensions industry in almost a century is threatening to reduce the pool of buyers for long-term corporate debt in pounds.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne last week scrapped rules requiring retirees to buy annuities with savings in defined-contribution pension plans.
 About three-quarters of retirees buy an annuity, according to government figures cited by Morgan Stanley.
 Gilts are less likely to be affected by Osborne’s proposals because providers of defined-benefit pensions are key buyers, according to Robert Stheeman, head of the Debt Management Office.
 He said he will issue a ruling on BlackBerry’s request to block Typo sales “promptly” James Asperger, a lawyer for BlackBerry, said the company will suffer irreparable harm if Typo is allowed to continue to sell the case because it has invested billions in the development of its keyboard and has lost sales to customers who buy the case instead of a BlackBerry Q10.
 BAE climbed 29 percent to 4078 pence after RBC raised its recommendation on Europe’s largest defense company to outperform, similar to buy, from sector perform.
 downgraded its recommendation on the company to hold from buy, and cut its estimate for 2014 profit before taxes by 21 percent.
 for years and whose stock had tumbled more than 90 percent from its 2008 peak -- including on the day he was named CEO, when the company announced that an attempted $47 billion buyout had collapsed.
 Fairfax Financial Holdings Ltd, BlackBerry’s biggest investor and leader of the failed buyout attempt, instead spearheaded a $125 billion cash injection.
 The buyout firm raised about $12 billion in the first round of funding that ended in November and wants to amass $400 million more before the end of the second quarter, the person said, asking not be identified before the process is complete.
 The solar manufacturer is raising production and buying up distressed manufacturing operations of smaller rivals.
 “Our base case view is that the banks have adequate capital for the upcoming ECB stress tests and that while the operating environment is challenging, bank profitability among the two main banks is returning probably relatively quicker than modeled by Moody’s,” said Eamonn Hughes, an analyst at Goodbody Stockbrokers in Dublin, who rates Bank of Ireland a buy.
March 17 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a 72 billion-euro ($10 billion) transaction to boost TV and broadband offerings.
 remains interested in buying Vodafone even after giving up the option to bid for the carrier for six months, people familiar with the situation said in January.
 Proposed changes to the 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act will give the government a 20 percent free stake in all new energy projects, and the right to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” The ruling African National Congress, which wants the state to play a bigger role in the economy, is pushing for the law to be passed before May 7 elections with a National Assembly vote scheduled for tomorrow.
 Cotton On, along with apparel companies such as Fast Retailing and Inditex SA’s Zara, are expanding in China as rising incomes boost buying power.
 Commerzbank AG, Germany’s second-biggest bank rose 25 percent after Morgan Stanley recommended buying the stock.
 Morgan Stanley raised the lender to overweight, the equivalent of buy, from equal weight and increased its price estimate by 36 percent to 16 euros.
 Commerzbank raised the drug-research company to add, the equivalent of buy, from hold.
 recovery has investors seeking to buy the world’s mostly liquid assets.
 ‘Buying Opportunity’ The backup in yields triggered last week by Fed Chair Janet Yellen’s comments that policy makers may raise rates six month after ending their bond-buying program likely prompted investors to increase bids at the auctions.
 “The back-up in rates that we saw last week was seen to be a buying opportunity,” said Richard Gilhooly, an interest rate strategist in New York with TD Securities Inc, a primary dealer.
 Banks are trading interest-rate swaps exclusively with banks in one area, while buyers and sellers such as money managers are doing business in another, according to seven people with direct knowledge of the matter, who asked to not be named because they’re not authorized to speak on the topic publicly.
 SEFs are aimed at giving investors a better chance to buy and sell swaps with each other rather than banks, potentially increasing competition and cutting costs.
 and Bloomberg LP were formulating rules that gave banks too much control over whom their customers could buy and sell with.
 In the past, banks told investors what the price to buy or sell a swap would be, and it was up to the asset manager to accept or reject it.
 Standard Life Plc jumped 7 percent after saying a unit is buying Ignis Asset Management Ltd.
 Standard Life jumped 7 percent to 400 pence, its highest price since May 30, after Scotland’s biggest insurer said its Standard Life Investments unit is buying Ignis Asset Management from Phoenix for 390 million pounds ($645 million).
 HSBC Holdings Plc upgraded the bookmaker to overweight, the equivalent of a buy rating, from underweight, saying that the prospect of further regulatory change has now been priced in to the shares, while its online operations are growing.
 Former Anglo Irish Chairman Sean Fitzpatrick, Willie McAteer, the bank’s former finance director, and Pat Whelan, a one-time managing director of its Irish unit, have pleaded not guilty to charges of having authorized or permitted the bank to give unlawful financial assistance for the purpose of buying shares in the bank.
 The issue of where most of the investors would get the money to buy the shares “didn’t come up” on the call, he said.
 Horan said he understood that most of them would finance the share purchases themselves while another, Quinn, would borrow from Credit Suisse Group AG to buy his stake.
 Cloud programs are sold as subscriptions, providing more regular sales compared with the cycle of customers buying a version of Office every few years, said Mark Moerdler, an analyst at Sanford C.
 LightSquared alleged that Ergen’s debt purchases were improper because he concealed that he was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish, buying through a newly formed fund, SP Special Opportunities LLC.
 Ergen Defense Ergen has said that he acted only for himself in buying the debt and made no “false representations” He characterized the lawsuit as an illicit ploy to help Falcone keep control of LightSquared in bankruptcy and said the case has cost tens of millions of dollars, eating into creditors’ recoveries.
 Munich Re also said it plans to buy back shares worth 1 billion euros before its 2015 shareholder meeting.
 It announced plans last year to buy back 1 billion euros of stock by a shareholders’ meeting scheduled for April 30.
 about buying part of its operations, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Kroger also has contacted Cerberus Capital Management LP, the private-equity firm that is the lead bidder for Safeway, about buying some stores that Cerberus may not want, said one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 The New York-based buyout firm wants to add Safeway to its portfolio to gain economies of scale and market presence, people familiar with the situation have said.
 and Leonard Green & Partners LP also have expressed interest in buying parts of Safeway, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 Facebook Inc’s agreement to buy Oculus VR Inc.
 is spending about $5 billion buying the Motorola Mobility handset business from Google and the low-end server unit from International Business Machines Corp.
March 12 (Bloomberg) -- GIC Pte, Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund, is buying stakes in Brazilian companies in a sign of confidence the world’s second-largest emerging market will overcome slower growth.
 Best Time “This is the best time to buy assets in Brazil,” said Song Seng Wun, a Singapore-based economist at CIMB Group Holdings Bhd.
March 27 (Bloomberg) -- MatlinPatterson Global Advisers LLC, the investment firm that specializes in taking control of companies by buying distressed debt, is seeking as much as $2 billion for its latest fund, 60 percent less than the predecessor, after suffering some high-profile missteps since the 2008 financial crisis.
 The prior fund, gathered at the peak of the buyout boom in 2007, closed at $5 billion.
 After scoring big by buying the debt of MCI Inc.
 36 South is starting the fund when it’s cheap to buy protection against increases in volatility, which can also give investors a source of return separate from stocks, it said.
 Bharti’s sale is likely to result in a split of the towers between multiple buyers, one of the people said.
 Asset Pledge Partially owned by a Goldman Sachs-led consortium, IHS, which provides mobile phone infrastructure and services, has agreed to buy almost 3,000 towers from MTN in Rwanda, Zambia, Cameroon and the Ivory Coast since 2012.
(Corrects 2013 jet buyer to Japan Airlines in ninth paragraph of story published March 27) March 27 (Bloomberg) -- Boeing Co’s 787 Dreamliner gained a vote of confidence as ANA Holdings Inc.
 Months of wooing by Boeing paid off as ANA agreed to buy 14 of the 787-9 model, 20 of the upgraded 777X due to debut at the end of the decade, and six current 777s to help bridge the gap.
 “By getting more aggressive on the 777 after dragging their heels they managed to convince the Japanese that they’re serious about moving forward with a plane that has the Japanese market in mind” 777 Family ANA is buying the -9X variant of the new 777, along with the existing 777-300ER.
 Overseas buyers are competing aggressively, driving up prices, which will ultimately trickle down into higher rents and taxes for office occupants, he said.
 In 2013, foreign buyers accounted for 50 percent of office sales in what Jones Lang LaSalle considers primary markets: New York; Chicago; Houston; Boston; San Francisco; Washington, DC; Seattle; Los Angeles and Bellevue, Washington.
 The judge rejected Yeung’s testimony that the alleged triad member’s check was a loan to buy London property.
 “Investors are buying old-economy stocks” as economic indicators improve and amid expectation that project approvals and spending will pick up when a new government is formed after elections ending in mid-May, Hemant Kanawala, head of equities at Kotak Mahindra Old Mutual Life Insurance Ltd, which has $2 billion in assets, told Bloomberg TV India today.
 Bombardier added 27 percent to C$388 after Walter Spracklin, analyst at RBC Capital Markets, raised his rating for the stock to outperform, the equivalent of a buy.
 “This is a serious threat to certain industries, and private equity is one of them,” said Salama, author of a forthcoming book ‘The End of Limited Liability in Brazil’’ Carlyle funds spent a total of at least $100 million to buy a majority stake in Urbplan in 2007 and to continue funding it through 2011.
 31, the buyout firm had invested in more than 470 corporate transactions, returned an average of 30 percent annually to investors, and oversaw almost $189 billion.
 Even in the rarefied world of buyouts the partners are enjoying heady times.
 Buyout Pioneer Carlyle was a pioneer among buyout firms venturing outside the US, initially targeting Europe and later high-growth emerging markets, such as China.
 One of the first investments was the acquisition of a 61 percent stake in Urbplan, then known as Scopel Desenvolvimento Urbano SA, a family-owned real estate company in Sao Paulo that focused on middle- and low-income housing as well as first-time homebuyers.
 At the time there was huge pent-up demand for housing as the hyperinflation and currency devaluations that had discouraged home-buying were being replaced with relative stability in prices and interest rates, said Roberto Ordorica, the former head of the Latin American division at Prudential Real Estate Investors.
 Brazil’s Economy Brazil’s economy grew more than 6 percent in 2007 and the government was also stepping in to make mortgages more available for first-time buyers.
 In 2011, the firm raised $1 billion for a pair of buyout funds that planned to focus on Brazil.
 By mid-November, the buyout firm concluded none of that was possible, even though Carlyle and some of its senior professionals had lent money to one of its original Scopel co-investment funds, which in turn invested in the developer.
 Turnaround Expert According to Carlyle’s annual report, a potential buyer might also want the firm to guarantee Urbplan’s existing obligations.
 After failing to capitalize on the Brazilian government’s effort to make housing widely available to low income homebuyers, the market has now begun to cool.
 Jive Investments Holding Ltd, the biggest buyer of distressed assets in Brazil, is starting the first fund that will invest solely in troubled real estate within the country.
 carrier T-Mobile after buying No.
 27 it has agreed to buy that stake.
 Swaps pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities or the cash equivalent should a borrower fail to adhere to its debt agreements.
 Facebook has about 12 billion members globally, guaranteeing advertisers a Super Bowl-sized audience every day, said David Cohen, chief media officer at media buying firm UM, “When I’m launching a new movie, and I want to accumulate very quick reach, other than the Super Bowl, getting 100 million guaranteed views in a 24 hour period? That’s just tremendous,” he said.
 If the video ads work, Facebook will prove it’s morphed from a fast-moving startup into a leading media platform, said Jordan Bitterman, chief strategy officer at media buying firm Mindshare.
 in London, rejoined Electricite de France SA to buy and sell UK.
 Justified Gains The rally in Olam shares is justified given the company’s outlook, according to Tanuj Shori, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Nomura Holdings Inc, who has a buy rating.
 The investment firm agreed at the time to buy any rights not taken up by other investors.
 who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 “People care about sustainability” Ells, who founded Chipotle about two decades ago, in 1999 began buying naturally raised pork to start the chain’s Food With Integrity program, according to the company’s website.
 utility owner, is buying two 20-megawatt solar plants in California from Infigen Energy.
 has agreed to buy electricity from the projects under a 20-year agreement.
 “We’re starting to see investors buying dollars at these levels.
 Portugal plans to buy back bonds due in October 2015 tomorrow.
 Corporate Buyers Corporate buyers such as Blackstone Group LP have descended upon the area to buy foreclosed homes and turn them into rentals.
March 18 (Bloomberg) -- Furiex Pharmaceuticals Inc, the maker of a gastrointestinal medicine that’s looking for a buyer, may be a good fit for Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd, its larger competitor 20 minutes down the road.
 Furiex’s premature ejaculation drug, Priligy, also could draw takeover interest from companies with erectile dysfunction medicines, said Redmond Asset Management LLC, which estimated a buyer could offer about $15 billion, more than a 50 percent premium.
 to find a buyer, said people familiar with the matter, who asked not to be named because the plans are private.
 Salix, which makes products targeting digestive ailments, would be an obvious buyer for Furiex, said Matt Kaplan of Ladenburg.
 could also be a buyer, as it has a partnership with Furiex for a Type II diabetes drug, Nash said.
 Large pharmaceutical companies with erectile dysfunction drugs may also be interested in buying Furiex to gain access to its Priligy drug for premature ejaculation, according to Redmond.
 Potential buyers may prefer to wait for the US.
 “A number of factors are raising builder concerns over meeting demand for the spring buying season,” David Crowe, the NAHB’s chief economist, said in a statement.
 “While possible supply may temper share price performance, we are still fans of the Bank of Ireland story over the medium term and would regard any technical weakness as an opportunity,” said Eamonn Hughes, an analyst at Dublin-based Goodbody Stockbrokers, who rates the stock a buy.
 The CFTC also gained power under the 2010 Dodd-Frank Act to increase oversight of over-the-counter derivatives, including those linked to currency benchmarks, that are traded directly between buyers and sellers.
 Xiao, who controlled thedaily operation and every aspect of the Hanlong unit, suggestedthey buy stock in Sundance and criticized Zhu for buying toolittle, according to the sworn statement.
 6 reply obtained by Bloomberg News, the Business Ministry told opposition lawmaker Brian Mikkelsen that a mortgage bond refinancing auction is deemed to have failed if “there weren’t enough buyers for the new bonds needed to refinance existing loans” The definition helps complete legislation that will mark the broadest overhaul of Denmark’s $550 billion mortgage bond market in at least a decade.
 According to Standard & Poor’s, Denmark’s central bank would never stand by if an issuer in the world’s largest mortgage bond market per capita lacked buyers.
 Falling demand for hardware and weak sales in growth markets have dragged down revenue for the last seven quarters, prompting Rometty to sell assets, fire and furlough workers, buy back shares and cut taxes to help meet profit goals.
 After buying cloud provider SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 The E-Class built in Beijing is a stretched version of the upmarket car sold elsewhere, targeting the Chinese buyers for chauffeur-driven vehicles.
 “It is now finally time for me to go exploring! I plan to spend the next few years traveling the planet and discovering the questions and mysteries that intrigue us all” Last month, billionaire John Malone, 73, set his own succession plans in motion by giving Discovery Communications CEO David Zaslav the right to buy 59 billion of his Class B shares of company should he decide to sell.
 Companies and individuals will be allowed to buy and sell foreign exchange daily in cash or bonds in the so-called Sicad 2 market through banks and brokerages that will open local accounts for them, according to a resolution published in the Official Gazette today.
 Bond Gains Fed policy makers’ decision to trim buying further at their January meeting showed they were sticking to their plan for a gradual withdrawal from the program, designed to cap long-term borrowing costs and spur growth, as the economy progresses.
 Investors should “sell what the Fed has been buying because they won’t be buying them when Taper ends in Oct,” Bill Gross, manager of the $243 billion Total Return Fund at Pacific Investment Management Co, wrote in a comment on Twitter.
 corporate credit risk climbed after the Federal Reserve predicted its target interest rate would rise by the end of next year and reduced its monthly bond buying to $55 billion.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The Fed, which announced another reduction of $10 billion to its monthly bond purchases, has undertaken three rounds of bond-buying since 2008 under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy, swelling its balance sheet to a record $42 trillion.
 “We could well see a repeat of February, with ECB President Draghi adding more items to his checklist, and removing a few others, in order to buy extra time.
 Former ECB President Jean-Claude Trichet made sterilization part of the SMP program in 2010 to allay concerns that the bond-buying would stoke inflation.
 “But from the ECB’s point of view, the key advantage would be to buy itself more time to assess how strong the forces of disinflation will continue, and to decide whether stronger and unorthodox -– and hence more controversial –- instruments will be needed” in the second half of the year.
 Drillisch AG rose 28 percent as Chief Executive Officer Paschalis Choulidis told a newspaper that the telecommunications company may pay a special dividend or buy back shares this year.
 SMA Solar slumped 12 percent to 3850 euros as Deutsche Bank cut its rating on the operator of solar-power stations to hold from buy.
 Jungheinrich AG gained 55 percent to 5499 euros as Deutsche Bank upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from hold.
 The Singapore-based commodity trader saw its stock rise 12 percent today after a unit of the nation’s state-owned investment company offered to buy it in a deal that values Olam at S$53 billion ($42 billion).
 Dissenting Judge Clement said “causation was a critical part of the” accord and by expanding the eligible class of claimants “to those who cannot trace their injuries to BP’s conduct,” the majority is improperly “using the powers of the federal courts to enforce obligations unrelated to actual cases or controversies” In court filings, the victims’ lawyers accused BP of “buyer’s remorse” and of attempting to undermine an accord intended to resolve most private spill-damage claims without litigation.
 Allianz was criticized for investing 110 million euros last month to buy an 833 percent stake in FC Bayern amid the on-going tax case against Hoeness.
 Profitability Target BNP Paribas agreed in November to buy the rest of its Belgian consumer-banking unit and three weeks later to purchase Rabobank Groep’s Polish division.
 Growth Mode BNP Paribas, thanks to its earnings capacity, could generate about 10 billion euros in excess capital by 2016, Cyril Meilland, a Paris-based analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux who recommends buying the stock, said in an interview ahead of the presentation.
 BNP Paribas may also seek “bolt-on” acquisitions and be “very opportunistic” on share buybacks, Bordenave said.
 We will scale it up” Nxasana said last month he favored organic growth after three deals to buy assets in Zambia, Ghana and Nigeria failed in as many years.
 FirstRand may still consider buying Nigeria’s Mainstreet Bank Ltd.
 Founded in 1996 by Whitworth and David Batchelder, Relational buys stakes in companies it considers undervalued and then lobbies management and boards for changes to boost investor returns.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The central bank has reduced bond purchases by $10 billion a month at each of its past three meetings, to $55 billion, and Chair Janet Yellen said last month that interest rates may rise “around six months” after it stops buying debt.
 “There isn’t likely going to be a tremendous amount of upside to growth or inflation from here, so it makes it easier to buy the long end of the curve,” said Michael Zezas, Morgan Stanley’s chief muni strategist in New York.
 agreed to buy similar messenger WhatsApp for $19 billion this year, and has 35 million users.
 “The earnings leverage of even just a dollar is pretty substantial,” said Daniel Ernst, an analyst at Hudson Square Research in New York who recommends buying the stock.
 Comcast’s agreement to buy Time Warner Cable for $45 billion, which is pending approval by regulators, may enable it to control high-speed broadband to the majority of American homes, Hastings said in the letter.
 The maker of Durex condoms is considered the frontrunner to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter health business because it would be able to generate the most cost savings and have fewer antitrust issues than competitors, people familiar with the matter said.
 The company is required to provide syndication services to the buyer of PowerReviews for four years so the new company can build a customer base and develop its own network, the Justice Department said in an e-mail.
 Bazaarvoice must also waive trade-secret restrictions for employees hired by the buyer and let customers switch to the new company without penalty.
 Elop stepped down as CEO in September, when Microsoft agreed to buy Nokia’s handset division.
 where they discuss buying and selling the metal, starting from the dollar spot price, until a rate is agreed upon.
 “Emaar is seeing some foreign buying, the euphoria from the last week’s better-than-expected earnings is still there,” Hisham Khairy, the Dubai-based head of institutional trade at Mena Corp.
 Citigroup’s capital plan was among five that failed Federal Reserve stress tests last month, blocking its attempt to quintuple its quarterly dividend to 5 cents and put in place a $64 billion share buyback.
 The company also boosted its quarterly dividend by 14 percent to 32 cents a share and authorized a $200 million buyback, according to a statement late yesterday.
 That has led some analysts to speculate that Pfizer would seek to use some of its cash to buy foreign companies.
 said it may buy metal on the open market to meet deliveries amid a 9 1/2-week strike at the world’s largest producers of the metal.
 The company may also buy metal on the market to continue customer supplies, Griffith said.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Mercuria Energy Group Ltd, which in March agreed to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity unit for $35 billion, reported the largest increase in annual revenue among big closely held commodity-trading houses.
 For Saracen Mineral Holdings Ltd, which agreed in January to buy OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel’s mothballed Thunderbox mines in Australia, the Golden Orb weaving spiders are the first challenge before production can resume next year.
 Miners are betting surging demand in China and India, the two biggest buyers, will underwrite planned production restarts.
 QKR Corp, which in February agreed to buy a Namibian mine from AngloGold Ashanti Ltd.
 said it’s interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca Plc, Britain’s second-biggest drugmaker.
 Sterling also strengthened as Pfizer said it’s still interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca in what would rank as the biggest-ever UK.
 Novartis AG said on April 22 it would buy London-based GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug unit for as much as $16 billion, sell its vaccines unit to Glaxo for as much as $71 billion and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 “Foreign investors are very interested in buying a stake in Vietnam Airlines as it is among a few large size SOEs that operate profitably,” said Alan Pham, Ho Chi Minh City-based chief economist at VinaCapital Group, Vietnam’s biggest fund manager that oversees about $16 billion of assets.
 is looking at more acquisitions after agreeing to buy ABC Holdings Ltd.
 Patrick Gallagher reached a deal April 6 to pay A$101 billion ($950 million) to buy the insurance-brokerage operation of Perth, Australia-based Wesfarmers Ltd.
 by buying Oval Group and the Giles Group of Companies.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, India’s largest drugmaker by market value, agreed to buy competitor Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 Sun Pharma has been is talks to buy Ranbaxy for “some months,” said Chief Financial Officer Uday Baldota.
 markets to entice more drivers to buy one.
 Starting July 1, Nissan will issue EZ-Charge cards to people who buy or lease new Leafs in 10 markets: San Francisco; Sacramento; San Diego; Seattle; Portland, Oregon; Nashville; Phoenix; Dallas-Fort Worth; Houston and Washington, Nissan said yesterday at the New York International Auto Show.
 “Public charging is an important way to provide added range confidence to EV buyers and persuade more shoppers to join the more than 110,000 LEAF drivers around the world,” Fred Diaz, Nissan’s senior vice president for US.
 The promotion expands a test program Yokohama, Japan-based Nissan began offering to Leaf buyers in Texas last year, and takes a page from Tesla Motors Inc, which offers free fast recharges for life to customers who buy its luxury Model S electric sedan.
 Still, Nissan has had to reduce the price of the Leaf and improve its range and features to attract more buyers for a car that averages less than 84 miles (135 kilometers) per charge.
 Deals Skadden Represents Mars in $29 Billion P&G Pet-Food Purchase Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP is representing Mars Inc, the closely held maker of M&M’s candies and Uncle Ben’s rice, on its agreement to buy three of Procter & Gamble Co’s pet-food brands for $29 billion.
 An increase to 290 percent on April 30 would result in a loss of 11 percent for an investor who buys today, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Investors pulled $103 billion out of exchange-traded funds that buy US.
 The proposal could give investors more insight into whether they are getting the best price when they buy and sell large numbers of shares, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after Michael Lewis’s “Flash Boys” book made the claim that high-frequency traders hurt other investors by learning which shares investors plan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higher price.
 2010 Trades The French regulator’s allegations pertain to trades made in 2010, when Elliott disclosed that Eiffarie, a joint venture owned by construction company Eiffage SA and Macquarie Group Ltd’s infrastructure unit, planned to buy Elliott’s APRR shares.
 Ikea has invested in wind farms in Canada, Denmark, France, Germany, Ireland, Poland, Sweden and the UK, including a November deal to buy a 46-megawatt wind farm in Alberta.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- Sopra Group SA agreed to buy Groupe Steria SCA for about 730 million euros ($1 billion) in stock as two of France’s oldest computer-services providers combine to win customers from larger rivals.
 Aurelius AG, based in Munich, today announced a deal to buy Individual Desktop Solutions GmbH, a subsidiary of Deutsche Telekom AG’s corporate-customer unit.
 Scheer Group GmbH last week agreed to buy Software AG’s SAP consulting operations for German-speaking markets.
 in recommending investors stop buying shares in Deutsche Bank AG, saying the company may delay efforts to cut costs and build capital.
 UBS cut Deutsche Bank to neutral from buy and lowered its price estimate for Deutsche Bank’s shares to 33 euros from 47 euros, analysts including Daniele Brupbacher and Mate Nemes in Zurich said in an e-mailed report today.
 Before the UBS downgrade, twenty-one of 45 analysts recommended buying Deutsche Bank’s shares with 17 saying hold and seven saying sell, according to Bloomberg data.
 plans a rights offer to help fund a buyback of $225 million of convertible bonds maturing next year.
 The company plans to sell rights shares valued at no less than the minimum $150 million of bonds offered for buyback.
 State Street has outperformed its biggest rivals after moving more aggressively to cut its workforce and return capital to shareholders through dividends and stock buybacks.
April 21 (Bloomberg) -- Pfizer Inc, the world’s biggest drugmaker, held informal, now-discontinued talks with AstraZeneca Plc about buying the London-based maker of asthma and heart drugs, said two people familiar with the matter.
 The National Basketball Association franchise agreed to buy 12 acres (49 hectares) of undeveloped land from Salesforcecom Inc.
 The world’s largest oilfield services provider today announced plans to complete a $10 billion share buyback program earlier than expected.
 Louis, who rates the shares at buy and owns none.
 Schlumberger plans to complete its share buyback program in two and a half years, as opposed to the 5-year timeframe announced in July, Chief Financial Officer Simon Ayat said on a conference call.
 The hepatitis C sales are “above even the high end of buy-side expectations,” Mark Schoenebaum, an analyst with ISI Group LLC in New York, said in a note to clients.
 “But everybody knows that, and there’s limited visibility on the sustainability of it” Gilead will use the cash it generates from hepatitis C to accelerate share buybacks, and won’t go on a spending spree acquiring companies and new drugs, company executives said.
 The restart of mining may raise supplies of the steelmaking raw material in the world market, especially to China, which used to buy most of Goa’s ore before the ban.
 Germany buys more exports from Russia than any other country, according to the International Monetary Fund.
 They expect the Fed to stop buying more assets at its October meeting, according to a March 17 survey.
 Air France, which recently had six cargo planes, found a buyer for two 747s in recent weeks and plans to hand two more back to lessors, leaving a dedicated fleet of just two Boeing 777s, one of the people said.
 Prices have never been higher, feed costs are down, and output is headed for an all-time high as exports surge to buyers from Mexico to China.
 Cheese shipments jumped 46 percent to 32,118 tons, with a 38 percent increase to Mexico, the biggest buyer of US.
 ‘Huge Hole’ Chinese dairies have been unable to keep pace with rising demand, and the pace of import buying has “caught a lot of people off guard,” said Bill Schiek, an economist with the Dairy Institute of California, the largest US.
 While the company’s costs may rise by as much as $600 million this year, any increase to consumers has to be weighed against the risk of “letting prices get so far out of whack that people just stop buying milk,” he said.
 “Dairy products are still a relatively good buy,” said Bob Cropp, a dairy economist at the University of Wisconsin-Madison.
 He has a buy rating on Vornado.
 After a failed takeover of Dutch phone operator Royal KPN NV last year, the company entered an agreement last week to share control of Telekom Austria AG with the European nation’s government, triggering a bid of as much as 142 billion euros ($196 billion) to buy out minority shareholders.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- Onex Corp, Canada’s largest buyout firm, paid Chief Executive Officer and founder Gerald Schwartz $853 million in 2013 compensation, higher than payouts for the top executives of Walt Disney Co, Coca-Cola Co.
 As a result, Schwartz ceased to hold any options to buy Onex shares.
 He received $3525 million in cash distributions during the year from ownership of partnership units in the New York-based firm he co-founded in 1985 as a leveraged-buyout group.
 Le Blanc, Mersky and Munk received a one-time grant of 850,000 options to buy subordinate voting shares, the filing said.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Keurig Green Mountain Inc, which is company developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, on Feb.
 Instead, they enter forward agreements setting prices at which they’ll buy securities matching certain generic characteristics.
 Once a month, sellers pick the bonds and buyers hand over the cash.
 That allows home buyers to lock in mortgage rates when they submit applications.
 It also leaves sellers of securities waiting for cash that they may not get if a buyer defaults, at which point market prices for their holdings could be lower.
 Such investors, which would also face significant costs to build and maintain “the legal and operational infrastructure” needed, may scale back their buying or exit the market completely, making it harder for everyone to trade, John R.
 where they discuss buying and selling the metal, starting from the dollar spot price, until a rate is agreed upon.
 On the twice-daily calls the banks declare how much gold they want to buy or sell for clients as well as their own accounts.
 The price is increased or reduced until the buy and sell amounts are within 50 bars, or about 620 kilograms, of each other, at which point the fixing is agreed on.
April 9 (Bloomberg) -- Arad Group, an Israeli developer of water meters, has reached an agreement to buy a controlling stake in Mexico’s closely held water-meter maker Cicasa, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Relative declines may create buying opportunities in BlackRock’s national muni funds, he said.
 Even with the negative credit outlooks, investors demand about 007 percentage point of extra yield to buy 30-year New Jersey bonds rather than benchmark debt, close to the smallest gap since December, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Sports Direct International Plc Chairman Mike Ashley bought an 11 percent stake in House of Fraser from Scottish entrepreneur Tom Hunter about a week ago and tried to buy other stakes yet failed, the Sunday Times reported yesterday.
 In the past year, middle-market firms including Brockway Moran & Partners and Code Hennessy & Simmons LLC have decided against raising new funds, as investors back fewer managers, contributing to a shakeout in the buyout industry.
 It also participated in larger buyouts alongside bigger private-equity firms, including the $11 billion buyout of cinema operator AMC Entertainment in 2004.
 advised buying the bearings maker’s shares.
 NSK rose 36 percent to 1,083 yen as its rating was lifted to buy from neutral at Goldman Sachs.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 Who knew buying these assets would be the way to go as the Federal Reserve cuts back on its debt purchases? Two exchange-traded funds managed by Pacific Investment Management Co.
 have returned about seven times the average gains for hedge funds focusing on fixed income by buying baskets of zero-coupon Treasuries that mature in more than 20 years.
 Last year’s concern that interest rates would rise sent buyers into shorter-term debt, which has resulted in meager gains in 2014.
 Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Austrian Drei unit, in an effort to win regulatory approval for its agreement to buy Orange Austria, sold customers of Orange’s Yesss! discount brand to market leader Telekom Austria AG.
 Keating used the new money to buy high-yield junk bonds and develop more real estate.
 Buys Homebuilder Keating struck out on his own in 1978, buying a Phoenix-based affiliate of American Financial, homebuilder American Continental, and becoming its chairman.
 He was accused of misleading investors into buying high-risk bonds that were not federally insured.
 after buying all of the local company’s sugar-manufacturing capacity, Wilmar said today in a statement.
 advised investor to buy the shares after it agreed to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 UBS raised the stock to buy from neutral and its price estimate 9 percent to 720 rupees.
 Nomura also raised the stock to buy from neutral.
 The company said April 7 it agreed to buy Ranbaxy for $32 billion from Japan’s Daiichi Sankyo Co, which had paid 61 percent more for the company five years ago.
 UBS upgraded the drugmaker to buy from sell and boosted the price target 92 percent to 576 rupees.
 She also said the company stopped buying back shares after spending $525 million so far this year, less than the $700 million it planned on spending in that timeframe, and will retain that cash to invest in the business.
 Chinese video sites, including Baidu Inc’s IQiyi, have been aggressively buying copyrights to licensed content to win advertisers and paying members as China’s 618 million Web users search for entertainment.
 The fund can only buy private equity if a company is planning to sell shares to the public.
 The decision to buy a stake in Formula One before a planned listing was based on an assessment that an investor can get a “considerably better” price at that point rather than waiting until “afterwards once everyone has been there,” Slyngstad said.
 CMC Capital Partners, an investment fund focused on media and entertainment, and FountainVest Partners, a Chinese private-equity firm, will buy shares of Imax China Holding Inc.
 Three months after Daiichi Sankyo agreed to buy the controlling stake in Ranbaxy for about $46 billion the FDA barred imports from the Indian drugmaker’s Paonta Sahib and Dewas plants because of manufacturing defects.
 debt dropped earlier as the central bank concludes two-day meeting where it is forecast to hold its shorter-term interest rate target at almost zero while reducing its monthly debt-buying program.
 The report said the Defense Department would be forced to cut 17 of the 343 fighters it planned to buy from fiscal 2016 through 2019 unless Congress repeals the automatic cuts.
 The company said it spent $11 billion buying back 7 million shares, more than double the $461 million it spent on such repurchases in the first quarter of 2013, and increased its dividend payout to $444 million from $371 million.
 Wolseley Plc advanced 17 percent after Credit Suisse Group AG recommended buying shares in the distributor of plumbing and heating products.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Mark Mobius, who oversees about $50 billion at Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said he’s buying technology stocks after a global rout left companies such as Tencent Holdings Ltd.
 “If you look at Tencent for example, it’s come down about 20 percent and that’s a pretty good correction,” Mobius, whose Templeton Asian Growth Fund outperformed 88 percent of peers this year, said in an interview in Bloomberg’s Hong Kong office, declining to name specific stocks he’s buying.
 “We have been selectively buying some Internet stocks in Asia,” said Grace Tam, a Hong Kong-based global market strategist at JPMorgan Asset.
 The Finance Ministry will resume foreign-exchange purchases on April 14, buying an equivalent of 35 billion rubles ($99 million) a day, it said in a statement on its website today.
 Novartis agreed to buy cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the company’s vaccines division to Glaxo for $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Lilly for $54 billion.
 The deal excludes flu vaccines, and Novartis will begin to seek a buyer immediately for those products.
 Of 89 offered lots, only 10 failed to find buyers, Sotheby’s said.
 While the securities rebounded in the years that followed, markets remained illiquid with wide spreads between bids from buyers and offers from sellers.
 The price of contracts that fix the conversion rate for buying dollars with rupees in a month’s time has jumped 123 basis points to an annualized 925 percent over the spot rate from a five-month low in January, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 One-month contracts offering the right to sell the rupee cost 81 basis points more than those to buy, the data show.
 Societe Generale SA recommends that investors protect themselves from election-outcome risks by purchasing two-month options to buy the dollar and sell the rupee.
 “She’s young, trendy, she likes to party and likes to buy something affordable for the weekend,” Emina Alivodic, Nelly’s head of design, said, describing the company’s typical customer.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- Vivendi SA’s board is free to choose a buyer for its SFR phone unit even as state-owned Caisse des Depots et Consignations backs one of the two bidders, CDC Chief Executive Officer Jean-Pierre Jouyet said.
 “Although Ukraine tensions are high, investors are buying back in a depressed market on positive US.
 The company is considering a 10 percent capital increase after buying out Diana, a flavors company, Chief Executive Officer Heinz-Juergen Betram said.
 surprised investors yesterday with stronger-than-expected iPhone sales and an increase of its dividend and share buyback program.
 Novartis, based in Basel, Switzerland, agreed to buy cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the vaccines division to Glaxo for up to $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Lilly for $54 billion.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc.
 The deal excludes flu vaccines, and Novartis will begin to seek a buyer immediately for those products.
 The firm, Amagis Capital Ltd, will invest in companies pursuing acquisitions, share buybacks and other transactions, hoping to benefit from an increase in corporate activity as Europe’s sovereign debt-crisis fades.
 “The sentiment is to still be involved in Japan from a small long position, and we’re seeing a little buying on dips” Futures on the S&P 500 lost 02 percent today.
 Ukraine will find it hard to buy all the gas it needs in European markets, he said.
 Gazprom wants more than $22 billion in back payments and an additional $114 billion for gas Naftogaz was obliged to buy under a take-or-pay contract clause, an arrangement the Ukrainian government calls unjust.
 expansion in 2004 after agreeing to buy a 51 percent stake in Portland, Maine-based Banknorth Group Inc.
April 12 (Bloomberg) -- Unister Holding GmbH, a German operator of Internet portals for travel and finance products, hired Jefferies Group LLC to find a buyer, according to people familiar with the process.
 Internet portals with large consumer audiences are increasingly attractive to buyers as online advertising becomes more sophisticated and more transactions are completed on the Web.
 Weir Chief Executive Officer Keith Cochrane said in February he’s looking to buy more mining, oil, gas and valves companies following the acquisitions of drilling control company Mathena Inc.
 billionaire investor Wilbur Ross and Toronto-based Fairfax Financial Holdings Ltd, who were among five investors to buy 349 percent of the bank in 2011 for 11 billion euros, sold in part of their holdings last month after tripling their money.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- An effort to sell Anixter International Inc, the wiring parts maker that counts billionaire Sam Zell among its investors, has stalled as potential buyers reject the company’s price expectations, according to several people familiar with the matter.
 French electrical-equipment distributor Rexel SA, which was earlier considered one of the more likely buyers, passed on making an offer, two of the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 Dodd-Frank Act’s Volcker Rule has curtailed the ability of banks to use their own money for trading, the biggest money managers have stepped in, using their growing buying power to absorb at a discount large amounts of bonds that get put up for sale.
 Those are opportunities that smaller buyers may never see.
 Dealers’ reduced capacity to trade bonds is a boon to the largest investors, who can buy large chunks of bonds at attractive prices.
 Smaller buyers may never get those offers.
 Fidelity was able to buy a chunk of debt at a “very, very attractive price” last June and July when “competitors were being hit with a lot of redemptions,” forcing them to sell, O’Neil said.
 After corporate debt globally lost 24 percent in June, the debt gained 1 percent the following month as the Fed maintained the pace of its asset buying, Bank of America Merrill Lynch index data show.
 Market Making Bankers have pushed back against some of the rule’s provisions, particularly with respect to so-called market making, the business of using a firm’s capital to buy and sell securities with customers.
 Without as much dealer involvement, it’s generally taking longer to buy and sell debt, Fuss said.
 With shades including Elephant’s Breath, Dead Salmon and Nancy’s Blushes, Farrow & Ball is an opportunity to buy into the top-end paint market as the UK.
 “Buying a car isn’t like buying a pair of shoes online” Tesla has said rules restricting direct car sales were created to protect dealers from unfair competition and mistreatment by manufacturers of the brands they sold.
 ‘Outstanding Portfolio’ Osisko ran a search for alternatives to Goldcorp’s offer and announced April 2 that Yamana had agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 Goldcorp responded a week later by raising its own bid, after which Agnico joined Yamana in a friendly transaction to buy the whole of Osisko.
 “The earnings leverage of even just a dollar is pretty substantial,” said Daniel Ernst, an analyst at Hudson Square Research in New York who recommends buying the stock.
 It offered in 2013 to buy out remaining investors for 8089 euros a share, 39 percent less than the market price when the bid was announced.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC, EQT Partners AB and Blackstone Group LP are among the buyout firms considering offers for the telecommunications infrastructure unit of Spain’s largest natural gas supplier Gas Natural SDG SA, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Such a high short interest magnifies gains in the stock because short sellers may be forced to buy back the stock at the higher prices to cover their bet, she said.
 (ICE), examined the software knownas the matching engine that pairs buyers and sellers, accordingto two people familiar with the matter.
 High-frequency traders have become the de factofacilitators of buying and selling in the $22 trillion USequity market, and their business models depend on reacting toprice movements as fast as possible.
 Algo Technologies claims to have the industry’s lowestlatency, a term describing how long a matching engine takes toprocess and complete requests to buy and sell.
 High-frequency traders have filled the void, becoming the primarymarket makers that facilitate buying and selling.
 Fasterexchange computers can help high-frequency traders buy and sellquicker.
 Heoffered to buy IEX Group Inc, the upstart trading platform thatserves as the hero in Lewis’s book, the person said.
 HFT Background ICE met with market operator PDQ Enterprises LLC, butdidn’t consider buying it, according to a person familiar withthe matter.
 Six international traders have shown interest in supplying gas to Ukraine, and the country may buy gas in Europe for $388 to $400 per 1,000 cubic meters, Prodan said.
 sends a letter demanding the bank buy back mortgages packaged into $47 billion of bonds.
 16, 2010: Moynihan says the bank is waging “hand-to-hand combat” over investor demands that the firm buy back mortgages.
 Outstanding buyback demands climb to $136 billion.
 In February, the company spent $18 billion to buy airwaves to compete with Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s No.
 Novartis agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline’s oncology business for as much as $16 billion, to sell Glaxo its vaccines line for as much as $71 billion and to sell its animal health business to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, meanwhile, announced a bid to buy Allergan Inc.
 Last year, Nokia considered buying the wireless-equipment unit of Alcatel-Lucent, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Goldman raised its recommendation on the stock to buy from hold.
 “Our ability to identify and stay ahead of market disruptions is deeply rooted in our build, buy, partner and integrate approach to innovation,” said Hilton Romanski, Cisco’s senior vice president of corporate development.
 rental homes demanded higher relative yields to buy the debt this time around, a person with knowledge of the transaction said.
 Bond buyers are weighing the risks and rewards of the new market, which American Residential Properties Inc.
 Their buying, funded mostly by equity and credit lines from banks, has helped spur a recovery in housing.
 The company -- which runs the Cost Plus World Market and Buybuy Baby stores, in addition to its flagship chain -- has almost 1,500 locations in 50 states.
 Last quarter it opened three Bed Bath & Beyond stores and four Buybuy Baby locations.
 Benchmark 10-year notes rose even as the central bank reduced the monthly pace of its bond-buying by $10 billion, to $45 billion, the fourth cut of that size since policy makers said in December they would taper the stimulus program.
 In 2007, AT&T held talks to buy a stake in Telecom Italia, though backed down amid political opposition.
 LightSquared has alleged that Ergen’s debt purchases were improper because he concealed that he was acting on behalf of Englewood, Colorado-based Dish, buying through a newly formed fund instead.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- The riskiest portions of specialized loan funds that have helped finance the biggest buyouts in history are luring investors with returns that exceed even junk bonds.
 Funding Dell The approximately $300 billion CLO market has provided financing to back the leveraged buyouts of Dell Inc.
 Returns would fall “well below” what equity buyers require in order to invest, he said.
 CLOs were the largest buyers of high-yield loans in 2013, with a 53 percent market share, according to the New York-based Loan Syndications and Trading Association.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- The prospective bankruptcy filing of Energy Future Holdings Corp, taken private in the biggest leveraged buyout in history, is poised to put the most profitable unit of the power producer up for grabs.
 may eventually end up in the hands of hedge funds and other investors who then could sell it to a utility buyer if bankruptcy proceedings unshackle it from Energy Future, according to debt researchers Gimme Credit LLC and CreditSights Inc.
 “The list of interested buyers would probably be as long as a West Texas country mile” Good Investment The Dallas-based company will probably file for bankruptcy protection this month after a grace period expires May 1 for a missed coupon payment at the beginning of April, according to a regulatory filing yesterday.
 A buyer could also bid for the other 20 percent not owned by Energy Future, he said.
 Financial buyers such as pension, sovereign wealth or infrastructure funds could also be possible bidders, as they seek steady returns from cash-producing assets, Miller said.
 While Oncor may attract buyer interest, disentangling the utility from its parent could be tricky and may take time.
 Even though those businesses, whose revenue has declined since the 2007 buyout, could also be sold as part of the bankruptcy proceedings, creditors may want to hold onto their plants and retail operations in a gamble that power prices will eventually rise, according to Andy DeVries, an analyst with CreditSights.
 “There is a lot of appetite out there from power companies and financial buyers for utilities with a strong customer base and growth investment opportunities,” Miller of Morningstar said.
 “We saw these handbags and we wanted to buy these handbags,” Graber said, gesturing to the camel-colored leather model on the checkout counter at the company’s store on Lexington Avenue in Midtown Manhattan.
 “You have representatives of trillions of dollars of capital refusing to buy new private-label residential mortgage-backed securities because this problem of no one looking out for investors’ interest isn’t solved,” Chris Ames, a senior portfolio manager at Schroder Investment Management North America Inc, part of a global asset manager that oversees about $435 billion, said in a telephone interview.
 The push by bond buyers signals they see a need for action in Washington.
 The market would be healthier if mortgage-bond buyers had an advocate that could ensure servicers aren’t doing things like hiring affiliated companies to mow the lawns of foreclosed homes at inflated prices, Ames said.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Canacol Energy Ltd, Colombia’s best performing major stock in the past year, said it received two expressions of interest to buy the company last year and remains open to offers at the right price.
 The firms, which also include Goldman Sachs Group Inc, maywithdraw their commitment because Brazil’s securities regulatorCVM asked that banks be required to buy any remaining shares ofthe phone company even if there’s no demand from investors, thepeople said.
 Under the previous agreement, the banks would need to stepin to buy shares only if investors placed orders totalingbetween 1 and 13 times the offering size, according to theprospectus.
 Oi’s controlling shareholder,Telemar Participacoes SA, and an investment vehicle managed byBTG Pactual agreed to buy about 700 million euros of that total.
 as it looks to expand locally and overseas by buying rivals.
 LG Household plans to team up with institutional investors in South Korea to initially take a controlling stake in Miramar, Florida-based Elizabeth Arden before buying out the remaining shares, Maeil reported.
 Price Estimate The disposal value is probably about 1 billion euros once about 300 million euros of debt is taken into account, said Schmidt, who cut his recommendation on the stock to hold from “accumulate” Triton, which invests in medium-sized businesses in northern Europe, agreed April 1 to buy a steam auxiliary components business for 730 million euros from France’s Alstom SA.
 Virgin’s buyout-firm executives dropped plans to raise $200 million to buy energy assets in central and eastern Europe with Russia-based investment firm Rusnano Capital earlier this year following a lack of investor interest, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Repo trades are contracts in which one investor agrees to sell a security and then buy it back at a future date at a pre-agreed price.
 is seeking to buy a stake in a unit that designs chips for liquid-crystal displays used in smartphones.
 Singapore’s state-owned investment company will buy a stake in Seven Energy International Ltd.
 Robert Diamond’s Atlas Mara on April 6 said it was buying a stake in state-owned Development Bank of Rwanda after previously agreeing to acquire Gaborone, Botswana-based financial services company BancABC for as much as $265 million.
 Oppenheimer & Son, the investment holding company of the Oppenheimer family, would form an Africa-focused private equity joint venture that would primarily buy stakes in African consumer and agricultural businesses.
 The Las Vegas-based company is committed to spending $75 million a month under its $2 billion share buyback program this year, Adelson said on the call.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Want to buy a trailer park? Freddie Mac wants to give you a loan.
 The shares have 13 buy and eight hold recommendations from analysts.
 The Lockheed-Boeing venture, United Launch Alliance LLC, discontinued the Delta II after the Air Force, its primary customer, said it would stop buying it because it was too small for newer satellites.
 Asian collectors have emerged in the past five years as the fastest-growing geographic segment, even as Americans remain the largest single group of buyers in the category, according to David Norman, Sotheby’s co-chairman of Impressionist and modern art worldwide.
 To woo buyers, New York-based Sotheby’s toured its biggest highlights, including the top lots of the upcoming season, in Hong Kong this month.
 Eneva SA, the Brazil power venture 379 percent-held by EON, is developing a recovery plan after project delays forced it to buy from the spot market, widening its losses.
 “Overall, management believes it will be well positioned to return to growth when the market improves, but the timing of this turn is unclear” Goldman reiterated its buy recommendation on the stock and a target price at $12 per share, according to the report.
 PulteGroup and other builders have been raising prices and building larger homes that appeal to move-up buyers as tight credit reduces demand from first-time buyers.
 Novartis AG may move after the Swiss drugmaker agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business, form a consumer-health venture with Glaxo and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 The company is buying Glaxo’s cancer-drug unit for as $16 billion and selling the animal-health operation to Eli Lilly for $54 billion.
 Apart from dealing with shareholders, Maestri will manage Apple’s spending as it invests in research and development, and buys billions of dollars of equipment and components to manufacture its products.
 The Cupertino, California-based company, which has $159 billion in cash, also is in the midst of a buyback and dividend plan that will return $100 billion to shareholders.
 While Xerox had no share repurchase plan in 2010, Maestri instituted a $700 million buyback in 2011 and another for $11 billion in 2012.
 “The most important people at Apple are those that are working on the development of new products,” said Walter Piecyk, an analyst at BTIG LLC in New York, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 The companies, which buy mortgages and package them into securities, were bailed out with $1875 billion from the Treasury while backing a growing share of mortgages as private capital dried up.
 Many funds that borrow money to buy stocks were forced to cut their bets on higher beta, according to a Deutsche Bank report dated April 4.
 Foreign investors have been fleeing the market after buying the most stocks on record last year.
 agreed to buy Oculus VR Inc.
 stocks rose to their highest level in almost seven weeks as AstraZeneca Plc climbed amid speculation it may be a buyout target and investors weighed quarterly results.
 AstraZeneca rose for a fifth day as speculation it may be a buyout target offset first-quarter profit that missed analysts’ estimates.
 Investors may be reacting to the news about the progress of AstraZeneca’s drugs, including new treatments for lung and ovarian cancer, which might make the company a more appealing buyout candidate, said Fabian Wenner, an analyst with Kepler Cheuvreux in Zurich.
 to buy Essar Group’s local unit, known as Yu.
 Service Delivery The joint bid to buy Essar will see Airtel receive the company’s subscribers and licenses and Safaricom acquire the network base stations and transmission equipment.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA jumped after announcing a plan to buy back as many as 679 million shares through May 23.
 “The strength was from baseband, connectivity and gaming share gains, and communications restocking” Of the the 35 analysts tracked by Bloomberg, 29 recommend buying the stock while the remaining six have hold ratings.
 Sales for delivery in the 12 months that start June 1 are up 17 percent, with increased purchases by Mexico, South Korea and the Philippines, three of the top six buyers of US.
April 21 (Bloomberg) -- TreeHouse Foods Inc, a maker of house-brand foods for retailers, agreed to buy Protenergy Natural Foods for about C$170 million ($154 million) to add soups and broths.
 “It makes the stock more attractive to the smaller buyers,” Jon Burnham, a New York-based fund manager for Burnham Asset Management Corp, which oversees about $12 billion, including Apple shares.
 “It’s better priced and more people will buy it” Stock splits have diminished in the last decade as the role of institutions and exchange-traded funds grew in the equity market, leaving some large companies effectively ineligible for the Dow average.
 Fed policy makers will probably cut the pace of monthly bond buying to $45 billion at the two-day meeting that concludes today, according to the median of economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg News.
 The company owns 215,000 apartments in Berlin, Cologne and other large cities, including 41,000 units it agreed to buy in February.
 Acquisition Pace German publicly traded landlords are buying apartments to take advantage of favorable financing conditions.
 While Deutsche Annington may make further acquisitions, it’s unlikely the company will buy large listed competitors such as LEG Immobilien AG or Gagfah SA, Buch said.
 Leveraged loans, which back buyouts, had a record year of issuance in 2013 with $354 billion of new debt arranged, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 ED&F Man Holdings Ltd, which buys and sells agricultural products, signed a $23 billion loan March 26, the data show.
 JBS Foods, the second-largest producer and exporter of poultry and pork in Brazil, was formed after JBS agreed to buy Seara food processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais in June 2013.
 is buying longtime partner Gnip Inc, seeking to offer more insight into trends, breaking news and other data from more than half a billion tweets posted each day.
 Investors are betting India’s growing middle class will flock to matches and buy merchandise as the English Premier League and Spain’s La Liga whet the subcontinent’s appetite for football.
 Spain’s Real Madrid paid more to buy three players this season -- Gareth Bale, Asier Illarramendi and Isco -- than the Indian Super League is currently worth, based on BBC reports of the transfer fees.
 The company, which agreed to sell SFR two days ago in a deal valued at more than 17 billion euros ($23 billion), will pay a special dividend or buy back shares after the projected completions of the deals this year, Philippe said on a call with analysts.
 may see its Baa1 credit rating drop two levels to the cusp of junk after the maker of artificial hips and knees said today that it agreed to buy rival Biomet Inc.
 By responding to the worst financial crisis since the Great Depression by cutting interest rates to about zero and then buying bonds to inject cash into the financial system, the Fed has helped set the stage.
 Allergan’s $350 million of 28 percent notes due 2023 have dropped to a record-low 893 cents on the dollar to yield 427 percent since Laval, Quebec-based based Valeant offered to buy the business in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion and supported by Allergan’s largest shareholder Pershing Square Capital Management LP.
 UBS AG upgraded the London-based oil and gas explorer to buy from neutral, saying the recent selloff is overdone.
 is in talks to buy the company, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 agreed in August to buy the Duvernay assets for an undisclosed amount.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Forest Laboratories Inc, the drugmaker being acquired by Actavis Plc, agreed to buy Furiex Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 “It could only help Actavis become a bigger GI company” Actavis, the world’s second-largest generic drug maker by market value, is buying Forest in its largest deal ever to transform into a brand-name drugmaker.
 earlier this year to seek a buyer.
 Toronto-Dominion Bank has led lenders on a C$20 billion ($183 billion) buying spree for card portfolios since 2009, including a deal with Target Corp.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Walt Disney Co’s $950 million agreement by buy Maker Studios was reaffirmed by the online video company, putting a quick end to a last-minute offer from Relativity Media LLC.
 Disney agreed to buy Maker Studios on March 24, gaining technology and experience with short-form video entertainment.
 Many drugmakers are buying companies in low-tax countries and then setting up operations there to avoid US.
 If the Canadian company succeeds in buying Allergan, the combined entity would have a tax rate in the single digits, Valeant Chief Executive Officer Michael Pearson said.
 By spending money overseas, the effective cost for a buyer can also be lowered, making acquisitions easier.
 Valeant Tax Valeant, joined by activist investor Bill Ackman, is offering to buy Irvine, California-based Allergan in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion.
 company buys a foreign company, often based in a low-tax country, like Ireland where corporations pay a rate of 12 percent, and adopts the foreign company’s tax domicile.
 That allows the buyer to avoid paying tax on income generated from subsidiaries outside the US.
 For anyone wanting to watch current hits such as “Game of Thrones,” they’ll need to buy a cable or satellite-TV subscription.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- Vodacom Group Ltd, South Africa’s largest wireless carrier, is negotiating final details for a deal to buy local Web-access provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 Vodacom, which said in September it had started exclusive talks to buy Neotel, is expanding in data services to offset declining revenue from its domestic voice division.
 Akzo Nobel is seeking a buyer for assets in its paper-chemical operations, people familiar with the matter told Bloomberg in February and the company earlier this year reported an impairment charge of 139 million euros on a business held for sale within the specialty chemicals unit.
 Last year, the firm agreed to buy Lucky Brand Jeans for $225 million and was in a venture that bought Juicy Couture’s intellectual property for $195 million in cash.
 California regulators in October ordered the state’s utilities to buy 1,325 megawatts of energy storage by 2020.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Vivendi SA, the conglomerate which has sold more than $30 billion of assets in the past year, said it will return 5 billion euros ($7 billion) to shareholders by 2015 through dividends and share buybacks.
 The board, headed by Chairman Jean-Rene Fourtou, plans to use an additional 35 billion euros of “available cash” for more dividends and share buybacks this year and next, according to a statement from the company today.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Reckitt Benckiser Group Plc said it’s no longer in active talks to buy the consumer-health arm of Merck & Co, saying the purchase doesn’t meet its investment criteria.
 Disagreement between LNG buyers and sellers about how the gas should be priced and future supply and demand could delay the expansion of the LNG industry in a “worst-case scenario,” Kitamura said.
 They accuse the ruling Pheu Thai party of buying votes with populist policies.
 While sales rose almost 30-fold last year as six plants started operations, project delays have increased costs and forced the Rio de Janeiro-based company to buy on the spot market at a time of record prices, deepening its losses.
 “The month of April is going to be slightly improved so there are some positives out there,” said Russo, who recommends buying the shares.
 The proposal could give investors more insight into whether they are getting the best price when they buy and sell large numbers of shares, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after Michael Lewis’s “Flash Boys” book made the claim that high-frequency traders hurt other investors by learning which shares investors plan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higher price.
 Antero has 12 buy recommendations and five holds from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 He has a buy rating on the stock.
 “Given the strong underlying drivers in Cemex’s key regions, we believe the stock’s reaction will be positive,” Credit Suisse analyst Vanessa Quiroga, who has a buy recommendation on the shares, said in a note to clients today.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Hotel Properties Ltd, owner of the Four Seasons hotels in Singapore and Bali, jumped the most in almost five years after founding shareholders agreed to buy the stock they don’t own for S$749 million ($597 million).
 A company led by Managing director Ong Beng Seng and Wheelock Properties Singapore Ltd, which jointly own 4191 percent through six stakeholders, offered to buy the shares at S$350 each, according to a statement to the Singapore stock exchange.
 Rio also accused Vale of passing confidential information it obtained during discussions the two companies had about Vale buying a stake in the Guinea property to Steinmetz and BSGR.
 Vale began discussions in August 2008 to buy part of Rio’s Simandou rights, Rio said in the complaint filed yesterday.
 was the initial E2 buyer, ordering 25 E-195s and 25 E-190s in 2013.
 Three rounds of Fed bond-buying and record-low borrowing costs have helped push the S&P 500 higher by as much as 180 percent from its March 2009 low.
 ClearConnect accused its competitor of running a monopoly that puts unreasonable demands on dentists who want to use its products, such as requiring they buy a minimum amount of the company’s aligners.
 and Mitsui & Co, the payoff in dividends and stock buybacks could be as much as 300 billion yen ($3 billion) in the financial year beginning today, according to analysts who follow them.
 In its first buyback in more than a decade, Mitsui said in February it would repurchase 50 billion yen of stock.
 Total Payouts Takeuchi said he expects Mitsubishi to follow Mitsui with a similar 50 billion yen buyback this year.
 It’s likely that buybacks will become “ongoing” for Mitsui and that Mitsubishi will also adopt the practice, Jun Yamaguchi, an analyst with Credit Suisse Group AG in Tokyo, said in a March 4 report.
 Mitsubishi’s last buyback was in 2007, when it repurchased 150 billion yen of stock.
 “If it turns out that we have excess capital available we may decide to return it to our shareholders in the form of share buybacks” as part of the investment options available to the company, Mitsubishi said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Japan’s third-biggest trader, Itochu Corp, is also considering share buybacks as one way to improve shareholder returns, although it has no immediate plans for such a move, the company said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Mitsubishi rose 23 percent in that time, and Mitsui 28 percent, with its February buybacks giving its stock extra momentum.
 Mitsui’s buyback is likely an early lead on a global trend, JPMorgan’s Mori said.
 “I’m not sure they can keep doing buybacks for a long time,” said Yuuki Sakurai, president of Fukoku Capital Management Inc.
 “It seems that these companies are doing buybacks to absorb excess shares in the market to make their stock price more solid.
 We think the market can be very supportive” One-time fees for personal seat licenses, which give the purchaser the right to buy season tickets, will be “modest” compared with amounts levied by the Dallas Cowboys and New York Giants when they moved to new stadiums, he said.
 The stock has fallen so much that a buyout first would short-change minority investors, he said.
 “How much longer do you want to support a company that doesn’t make money?” Addressing Costs While Malaysian Air is facing multiple challenges now, a breakup or government buyout shouldn’t be the priority because those hurdles are temporary and can be overcome, said Ahmad Maghfur Usman, an analyst at RHB Research Institute Sdn.
 Still, the share decline creates an opportunity for Malaysian Air to remake itself now, and the company may ultimately be better off after a buyout or breakup, Maybank’s Mohshin said.
 Companies have begun to buy new vessels again, taking advantage of a drop in prices.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Australia committed to buying a total of 72 F-35 Joint Strike Fighters, down from a 2009 plan to purchase about 100 of what has become the Pentagon’s most-expensive weapons system.
 ally is ordering 58 of the Lockheed Martin Corp- made aircraft for A$124 billion ($116 billion), on top of the 14 it pledged to buy in 2009, Prime Minister Tony Abbott said today in Canberra.
 The 21st Century Business Herald reported earlier that foreign investors may be able to directly buy mainland-listed stocks through the Hong Kong exchange, without saying where it got the information.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Ireland’s state-owned bad bank agreed to buy Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc and KBC Groep NV loans to Ireland’s largest shopping mall, its first purchase of debt that didn’t belong to the country’s bailed-out lenders, people familiar with the matter said.
 Lesiak raised his recommendation on the stock to buy from hold.
 That compares with an estimated decline of 166 percent to about 250,732, from Jeffrey Silber, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets, who has an outperform rating, the equivalent of buy, on the stock.
 While a deal would be expensive, “Mead Johnson would be a very good buy,” Ingrid Yin, a New York-based analyst at Oppenheimer Holdings Inc, said in a phone interview.
 Treasury 10-year notes yielded 67 basis points more than their Group of Seven counterparts last week, the most in four years, as the Fed unwinds its bond-buying program while Japan and Europe consider additional purchases.
 Haven Demand “For now, buyers have come in,” said Justin Lederer, an interest-rate strategist at Cantor Fitzgerald LP in New York, one of the 22 primary dealers Fed.
 Rice Energy’s bond offering this month was rated CCC+ by Standard & Poor’s, seven steps below investment grade, or the level above which some institutional investors, such as pension funds and insurance companies, are allowed to buy.
 Rice said it plans to invest $123 billion this year building pipelines, buying acreage and drilling in the Marcellus region, where the company already has wells with names like Hulk, Captain Planet and Mojo, as well as in the nearby Utica formation in Ohio.
 Sterne, Agee & Leach Inc, a Birmingham, Alabama-based brokerage, rated the company a “buy” in February, shortly after the initial public offering.
 The Federal Reserve’s policy committee pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, in line with economists’ forecasts, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 Coca-Cola agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Green Mountain, a company developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, on Feb.
 “You can just take this as another example of the commitment of the leadership regime to address some of the challenges that China does face” The Shanghai Composite Index advanced 14 percent and the Hang Seng Index climbed 15 percent after China unveiled the plan which will allow wealthy individuals to buy Hong Kong equities through the Shanghai exchange, broadening their investment options from a limited number of funds.
 Connor was seeking to double sales in Latin America when he agreed in 2012 to buy Comex for $234 billion, including the assumption of debt.
 Terminating the deal ends 18 months of uncertainty and allows the company to “aggressively” buy back shares and pursue other deals, he said.
 Panjabi recommends buying shares of Sherwin-Williams and PPG.
 The Beijing-based company known as Sinopec agreed to buy Lukoil’s 50 percent of Caspian Investment Resources Ltd, which holds stakes in four projects in the central Asian nation.
 Of the 35 analysts that cover the stock, 27 recommend buying Sinopec, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Puts totaled 183,052 on April 25, more than double the number of options to buy.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- America Movil SAB is bidding as much as $196 billion to buy out Telekom Austria AG’s minority investors, seeking to cement control of the European phone carrier after striking a shareholder pact with the government.
 “America Movil’s strengths are not as evident there” The Telekom Austria buyout offer can be easily financed by America Movil, Zetina said.
 As a controlling shareholder group, America Movil and OeIAG have to offer to buy the shares of minority shareholders under Austrian law.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Arabtec Holding Co, the United Arab Emirates’s biggest listed construction company, is in talks to buy a large European company and may tap the bond market to pay for the deal, Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik said.
 Chairwoman Cher Wang could follow the lead of Dell founder Michael Dell and pursue a buyout of HTC, enabling her to operate more freely, said Yuanta Financial Holding Co.
 “If I were a shareholder, I’d take a buyout if they were to offer it right now” HTC shares rose 03 percent to close at NT$15950 in Taipei, compared with a 01 percent decline in the benchmark Taiex index.
 None of the 31 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg recommend investors buy HTC’s shares.
 Marketing Shortfall A buyout or sale would “certainly make a lot of sense for investors,” Roger Entner, an analyst at Dedham, Massachusetts-based Recon Analytics LLC, said in a phone interview.
 More Leeway A buyout also could allow HTC to push into strategies that probably won’t have an immediate payoff, such as developing lower-end handsets, said Birdy Lu, a Taipei-based analyst at Deutsche Bank.
 Buyout Challenges A possible challenge for a buyout would be dealing with shares and stock options already issued to employees to supplement salaries, Chan and Lu said.
 A private buyer may need to raise pay or restructure compensation to address this issue, he said.
 A management buyout could be a financial risk for Wang, given the company’s challenges, Recon’s Entner said.
 Businesses are continuing to purchase EMC’s storage products, particularly its mid-priced machines and newer technologies such as those made by its Isilon unit, said Ives, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 She has a buy recommendation on the stock.
 Nokia Oyj gained 29 percent after naming a new chief executive officer and saying it will spend about 5 billion euros ($69 billion) on dividends, share buybacks and debt reduction.
 Fed Meeting The Federal Reserve begins a two-day policy meeting today, where it will probably cut bond buying to $45 billion, according to the median of 43 economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 company was cut to neutral from buy at Citigroup Inc, while JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Saab said on April 14 it’s in talks to buy a marine defense unit from Essen, Germany-based ThyssenKrupp AG, which would put the submarine and warship production at Karlskrona in the south of the country back into the hands of a Swedish company after 15 years of German ownership.
 “The buying of Russian assets is caused by a relative stabilization of the situation surrounding Ukraine,” Anton Zakharov, a money manager at OAO Promsvyazbank, said by e-mail.
 The inclusion will prompt investors who track bond indexes to buy the notes to meet the new weightings.
 Higher fees can mean thinner cushions of cash in case revenue falls, making the MLPs a riskier investment for retirees who are buying into the stocks more than ever as low interest rates make it difficult to find income.
 Williams Partners may have to slow its distribution growth as it pays out more money than it takes in for a third year, according to Christopher Sighinolfi, an analyst at Jefferies LLC in New York who downgraded the company to “hold” from “buy” on March 20.
 is buying a unit of Motorola Solutions Inc.
 “Investors are buying bonds for safety,” said Kazuaki Oh’e, a debt salesman at CIBC World Markets Japan Inc.
 “The economy is plunging into recession and investors are concerned particularly with retail stocks -- who has money to buy more stuff?” Ilya Kravets, the New York-based director of investment research at Daniloff Capital LLC, said by phone on April 25.
 The business is threatening traditional utilities because solar customers buy less electricity from their local power companies.
 Their company agreed to buy printing-ink maker Flint Group Holdings Sarl for about 2 billion euros ($28 billion) last week.
 warned that corporate-bond buyers were in for another year of rising yields that would erode returns.
 has struggled to reconcile its debt load with consumers curbing their discretionary spending since the Las Vegas-based company was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment, in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion in the latest step of the Canadian company’s plan to become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 Valeant Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson, 54, took the helm in 2008 and has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 35 companies as part of Laval, Quebec-based Valeant’s goal to join the ranks of the world’s five biggest drugmakers by the end of 2016.
 “The question has always been, it’s not whether Valeant would be interested in buying Allergan, it’s a question of would Allergan sell to Valeant” Allergan Outpaces Allergan’s shares had increased 25 percent in the last 12 months through yesterday, outpacing a 16 percent gain in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Pharmaceutical Index.
 Allergan makes a tempting target for buyers looking for growth.
 Generic-drug companies have been buying up the makers of specialty medicines as they seek to diversify their product lines and improve margins.
 Actavis Plc in February agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Rather than spend what he says can be billions of dollars developing drugs from scratch, Pearson buys companies with existing products such as Bausch & Lomb.
 In April 2013, Valeant made an offer to buy Actavis, which was rejected because the price was too low, Bloomberg reported at the time.
 Unusual Arrangement Valeant was interested in the unusual arrangement with Ackman because the hedge fund could buy about 10 percent of Allergan’s shares before making a public disclosure, said a person familiar with the matter.
 Still, individual investors may be persuaded to buy Seibu stock because of the perks the company gives shareholders, said Minoru Matsuno, president of Value Search Asset Management Co.
 “People buy premium vehicles to show a wider public what they can afford.
 described its California operations as “our weakest group,” PBF Energy Inc’s chairman said he’s interested in buying a plant in the Golden State.
 Hydropower accounts for more than 90 percent of the nation’s supplies, according to the company, which buys from state-owned Zesco Ltd.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- Volkswagen AG, Europe’s biggest carmaker, sold 58 percent more autos in the first quarter, marking a delivery record for the period as the Audi luxury brand attracted buyers.
 The stock has fallen so much that a buyout first would short-change minority investors, he said.
 Addressing Costs While Malaysian Air is facing multiple challenges now, a breakup or government buyout shouldn’t be the priority because those hurdles are temporary and can be overcome, said Ahmad Maghfur Usman, an analyst at RHB Research Institute Sdn.
 Still, the share decline creates an opportunity for Malaysian Air to remake itself now, and the company may ultimately be better off after a buyout or breakup, Maybank’s Mohshin said.
 Hedge funds were the biggest buyers of the debt when it first sold in March, purchasing about 70 percent of the sale, the Wall Street Journal reported yesterday on its website, citing confidential documents it reviewed.
 The protectors passed on “recommendations” from the Wylys, including to buy jewelry, specific paintings to be hung in their homes, and investments in an art gallery in Aspen, Colorado, and a horse farm in Texas, Fitzpatrick said.
 “They don’t want to pay the tax to bring it back to the US,” said Matthew Duch, a fund manager at Calvert Investments in Bethesda, Maryland, which oversees more than $12 billion in assets, and was considering buying part of today’s offering.
 Such buyers, which are typically guaranteed shares in an IPO in exchange for a pledge not to sell for at least six months, have in past years become increasingly popular among Chinese companies pursuing large offerings.
 The new fuel bill from Moscow is for contracted gas that Ukraine failed to buy last year, Sergei Kupriyanov, a spokesman for the Russian state-controlled exporter, said today by phone.
 Glaxo gained 52 percent after Novartis AG agreed to buy its cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion.
 Merrill Lynch raised its rating on the company to buy from neutral, saying the stock has the potential to gain 26 percent, backed by strong cash generation.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- Manhattan apartment sales surged in the busiest start to a year since 2007, setting price records as buyers vied for a limited supply of homes for sale and deals were completed at new high-end developments.
 Price gains are accelerating in a market where the inventory of homes for sale plummeted to record lows three times in the past year as buyer demand increased.
 “The market really isn’t fun for the buyer” There were 4,968 apartments for sale at the end of March, up 02 percent from a year earlier and the first inventory increase in more than three years, the firms said.
 Many new condo towers have larger units and are aimed at luxury buyers.
 While at least two offers came in above the asking price, the couple preferred to sell for less -- $115 million -- to buyers who offered cash.
 “I have buyers who need to finance, and unfortunately they find themselves losing out a lot to cash deals on a regular basis,” said Scott Harris, a broker with Brown Harris Stevens who handled the Wolfs’ co-op sale.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- General Atlantic LLC is in talks to buy a minority stake in closely held drug company Laboratorios Sanfer SA in its first investment in a Mexican firm, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 to seek a buyer, a person with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 Edward Graham Dulin Jr, the broker who filed the claim, said that because he didn’t have a full understanding of Lehman’s deteriorating condition he recommended clients buy securities that eventually soured, hurting his business, according to the documents.
 He lowered Imperva shares to the equivalent of hold from buy.
 who raised Imperva to a buy on April 11.
 Last year, Telefonica SA, the biggest shareholder in Telecom Italia, tried to look for a buyer for its Madrid headquarters, a complex known as Distrito Telefonica that opened at the height of Spain’s property boom in 2008, people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 Other Sotheby’s highlights include a jadeite necklace owned by American department store heiress Barbara Hutton, described in the Sotheby’s catalog as “the most important piece of jadeite jewelry known to the world” and expected to sell for as much as HK$100 million including buyer’s premium.
 The retailer reached out to more than 75 parties as it sought refinancing or a buyer and “publicly invited strategic alternative proposals of any nature,” Chief Operating Officer James A.
 “Everybody actually benchmarks against these guys” Buyers willing to bet Teradata can withstand the entry of different data-management tools can buy it now at a discount to peers, according to Jesse Hulsing of Pacific Crest.
 Representatives for San Jose, California-based Cisco and Palo Alto, California-based Hewlett-Packard declined to comment when asked if their companies would be interested in buying Teradata.
 With an enterprise value of $69 billion, Teradata also would be a sizeable target, which limits the number of buyers, he said.
 Technology firms may decide buying a company focused on unstructured data is a better move than acquiring a more traditional information-warehousing provider such as Teradata, according to Aaron Schwartz of Jefferies.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock on the assumption the price will decline, allowing them to make money by buying it back at a lower price.
 Investors are concerned that much of the Nasdaq’s 38 percent rally last year was driven by stock buybacks instead of earnings growth as the Federal Reserve’s asset purchase program flooded the US.
 “It’s going to be even harder for them to buy companies of greater scale and buy them attractively,” Scholes said.
 is lending $145 billion to its landlord in downtown Manhattan as the property owner buys out a partner, according to people with knowledge of the deal.
 The lease agreement gives the bank the option to buy back the buildings, including a 39-story tower, in 2017 for $2 billion.
 agrees to buy Hartford’s retirement-plans business for $400 million.
 Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the vaccines division to Glaxo and an animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 offered to buy Allergan in a cash-and-stock deal valued at $457 billion.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Adam Opel AG, General Motors Co’s European brand, is targeting second place in deliveries in the region in the coming years as new models attract buyers.
Mando Corp, the biggest unit ofSouth Korea’s Halla Group, tumbled in Seoul trading after itsplan to split into two raised investor concerns that the companyis preparing to buy more shares of affiliates.
 “People want to buy midstream assets and that means they are not cheap,” Paget said.
 The investigation could lead to enforcement action or an instruction to reduce the spread between buying and selling prices, the report said.
 In matched trades, where banks and other dealers join a buyer to a seller, profits of more than 15 percent to 2 percent would be “questionable,” Ketchum said, according to the newspaper’s account of the interview.
 That could allow the buyers to make a quick profit by selling them at a higher price to investors shut out of the initial deal.
 The Fed will probably cut bond buying to $45 billion at the meeting, according to the median of economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Chief Executive Officer David Bellamy said the British insurer and money manager may look to the Middle East for acquisitions after buying an advisory business in Asia.
 More than 25,000 contracts giving investors the right tobuy the stock changed hands as of 4 pm.
 There are definitely bullishKellogg call buyers here” Kris Charles, a spokeswoman for Battle Creek, Michigan-based Kellogg, declined to comment on the share movement.
 (BRK/A) agreed to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 “People remember the call buying in Heinz the day beforethe bid for the company,” he said.
 Buffett typically buys majority control and leavesmanagement in place.
 Cerberus Price The 1,600 yen price compares with the 1,400 yen a share Cerberus paid to buy stock from shareholders last year when it boosted its stake to 355 percent.
 Western European buyers announced $149 billion of acquisitions in the first three months of the year, a nearly 60 percent gain over the start of 2013 that outpaces the increase from North America and Asia, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Shareholders are rewarding risk-taking buyers, and motivating chief executives to strike large deals while interest rates are still low.
 Spending by Asian buyers rose by about 41 percent from a year earlier while North American companies boosted spending by 18 percent during the quarter.
 In Europe, interest rate cuts and central bank pledges to buy the bonds of crisis-hit countries have boosted business confidence.
 The biggest deal so far this year was Comcast’s $452 billion agreement in February to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Vodafone Group Plc in March agreed to buy cable provider Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for $10 billion to boost TV and broadband offerings in Spain.
 agreed to buy Beam Inc.
 There will be more to come in term of exits” Lehman Start McGee, a Texan who started at Lehman in 1993 and rose to head its investment bank, worked on an acquisition for Exxon Mobil Corp, the world’s second-biggest company by market value, and the 2007 acquisition of the former TXU Corp, the largest leveraged buyout ever.
 The EU restrictions didn’t stop ABN Amro from agreeing to buy Credit Suisse Group AG’s German private-banking business.
 The next would be trying to win back customers, who now buy more iron ore from Australia and Brazil.
 “Large international buyers need reliability of supply and that’s exactly what they can’t find in India now,” Ambar Timblo, managing director of Fomento Resources, said in an interview at Panaji, the state capital.
 Tsuen reduced her estimate for the company’s sales this year by 4 percent and cut her recommendation on the stock to hold from buy.
 The insurer boosted its quarterly dividend by 25 percent to 125 cents a share and authorized a $1 billion share buyback in February.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Endurance Specialty Holdings Ltd, the Bermuda-based provider of property and casualty insurance, announced a $32 billion offer to buy Aspen Insurance Holdings Ltd.
 Endurance said it plans to pay 60 percent with its shares, and that investors led by CVC Capital Partners Ltd-advised funds are prepared to buy $105 billion of newly issued common shares to help fund the cash portion of the deal.
 He said he plans to buy $25 million of Endurance shares in connection with a takeover.
 Facebook is seeking to make even more money on smartphones and tablets by testing a mobile ad network and agreeing to buy text messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 And Facebook agreed to buy Oculus VR Inc, a virtual-reality headset maker, for about $2 billion, a high-priced bet on the fledgling wearable-computing market.
 The proposal could give investors more insight into whetherthey are getting the best price when they buy and sell largenumbers of shares, according to three people familiar with thematter.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after Michael Lewis’s “Flash Boys” book made the claim that high-frequencytraders hurt other investors by learning which shares investorsplan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higherprice.
 The partners agreed to buy out Eni last year, and OAO Rosneft, Russia’s state-run oil producer, acquired Enel’s stake.
 generic-drug maker, was rejected in its bid to buy Meda AB, the Swedish pharmaceuticals maker valued at about $45 billion.
 The company has also been looking at assets to buy that would help expand its global sales power, with commercial operations in new countries.
 18 it agreed to buy Forest in a deal anticipated to be completed by midyear.
 Wirecard AG jumped 58 percent as a broker recommended buying the stock as the company confirmed its 2014 forecast and increased its annual dividend.
 raised its ratings on both stocks to outperform, similar to buy, from market perform, citing the potential for a recovery in Europe and cheaper valuation multiples relative to rival Bayerische Motoren Werke AG.
 Hauck & Aufhaeuser Privatbankiers KGaA upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from hold, after Wirecard also confirmed its 2014 outlook for earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization.
 UBS AG raised its rating on Europe’s largest home-improvement company to buy from neutral, citing the possibility of higher profits from its potential acquisition of Mr Bricolage SA in France.
 The tips involved Celgene’s announcement in November 2007 that it was buying Pharmion Corp.
 for $29 billion, Sanofi’s announcement in March 2010 that it was buying Chattem Inc.
 for $19 billion, Celgene’s news in June 2010 that it was buying Abraxis BioScience Inc.
 for $29 billion and Stryker’s announcement in May 2011 of plans to buy Orthovita Inc.
 He told Lazorchak of Stryker’s plans to buy Orthovita, and Lazorchak told him about Celgene’s planned acquisition of Pharmion, authorities said.
 Growth Focus The lender, which has operations in Togo, Ivory Coast, Senegal and Benin, has no immediate plans for acquisitions after buying the London-based unit of Nigeria’s Access Bank last year, Yinusa said.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper, who has promoted Canadian oil and natural gas resources to Asian buyers, has until June to make a decision on whether to allow the pipeline to go ahead.
 Echigo entertained Tsurisawa in return for buying 1 billion yen of investment products for Mitsui’s retirement fund, and to procure future business, prosecutors said.
 The mandate was designed to ensure subscribers can buy boxes at retail and not only from their cable provider, just as wireless customers can buy many brands of telephone.
 Online travel agents need consumers to book through their sites to generate revenue, and Google, as the best source for delivering that traffic, eats up about 90 percent of Priceline’s digital ad spending, according to Mark Mahaney, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets in San Francisco, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Publicly traded companies can also issue the stock to pay for acquisitions and buy back shares, the CSRC said.
 As many as 200 investors will buy the 50 million share offering in a private sale.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s largest buyout firm, agreed to acquire industrial-products maker Gates Global Inc.
 The company also said it would reduce its stock buybacks in the year through March 2015 to $17 billion from $21 billion in the previous 12 months.
 to buy Allergan, the maker of Botox, has renewed focus on a single rule that affects the balance of power between public companies and the activists that target them.
 Laval, Quebec-based Valeant offered last week to buy Allergan in a deal valued at $457 billion.
 Changing the rule could make it harder and more expensive for activist investors such as Pershing Square to quietly buy up shares in a public company.
 “If you think shareholder activism is a very favorable thing for stock markets, for capitalism, for keeping the balance of power between management and shareholders, then what you do not want to do is restrict activists from buying more than five percent of the company,” Ackman said in an April 23 interview with Bloomberg TV’s Stephanie Ruhle and Erik Schatzker.
 Questions remain as to whether certain derivatives, such as swaps that settle in cash and don’t entitle the buyer to shares, should count toward the five-percent threshold.
 CVM told the firms to buy any remaining shares of the phone company even if there’s no demand from investors if they want to keep referring to the offer as “fully underwritten” in disclosures to investors, the agency said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Under the previous agreement, which the banks described as fully underwritten, the firms would need to step in to buy shares only if investors placed orders totaling between 1 and 13 times the offering size, according to the prospectus.
 Oi’s controlling shareholder, Telemar Participacoes SA, and an investment vehicle managed by BTG Pactual agreed to buy about 700 million euros of that total.
 That market segment is less competitive than the one for private jets, where Cessna has struggled because it doesn’t sell the large, long-range plane favored by corporate buyers.
 recommends buying shares from lenders including Zenith Bank Plc, Access Bank Plc and United Bank for Africa Plc because of their low valuation and growth potential, Kato Mukuru, an analyst at Exotix Frontier Equities, said in an e-mailed note to clients March 24.
 While investors were “disappointed” with Sanusi’s suspension, the declines have created a cheap entry point for stock buyers, said Joseph Rohm, who helps manage $2 billion of Investec Asset Management’s Africa funds.
 Last Resort Lonmin won’t send similar notices to customers and will buy metal on the open market for supplies “as a last resort,” Magara said.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest private-equity firm, and Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s merchant banking unit agreed to buy financial data provider Ipreo Holdings LLC from KKR & Co.
 A law approved by South Africa’s parliament that will give the state a free 20 percent stake in new oil and gas ventures and enable it to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price is awaiting the signature of President Jacob Zuma.
 ‘Flawed’ System “There’s a very strong sense from the buy-side community that maker-taker in of itself is a flawed incentive system and that those flaws are at the root of everything else,” Noll said.
 offshore rig contractor, jumped the most in more than two years after reporting earnings that beat analysts’ estimates and buying back shares.
 and saddled buyers with losses.
 Re/code reported DreamWorks was interested in buying part of Vevo earlier this month.
 The 750 million-euro ($104 billion) sale was oversubscribed 17 times as 700 investors lined up to buy the security.
 Reserves ‘Critical’ Even as Ukraine limited the amount of foreign currency individuals are allowed to buy, the hryvnia has lost 28 percent against the dollar this year, the most among more than 150 global currencies tracked by Bloomberg.
 “The central bank will try to gradually increase reserves through buying on the market” Economy Contracts Ukraine’s economy shrank 11 percent from a year earlier in the first quarter as anti-government protests toppled President Viktor Yanukovych and Russia annexed the Black Sea peninsula of Crimea, preliminary data from the statistics office showed today.
 If a sale of SFR is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Sales of previously owned properties in March tumbled 75 percent from a year earlier to the slowest pace in 20 months and mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 foreclosure auctions in the last two years by buying as many as 200,000 single-family homes to rent.
 A smaller portion of the Metacapital fund will buy bonds and loans tied to commercial real estate, according to the letter.
 Narula’s flagship fund is coming off of a tumultuous 2013 after the firm, along with other investors in government-backed mortgage bonds, was hurt by speculation about the timing of the Federal Reserve’s retreat from its debt-buying program.
 Price Limit “Even if competition materially increases, and it seems like it is, there should be a limit to what NPL buyers are willing to pay because 85 percent to 90 percent of the pool will have to go through the foreclosure process,” Rahmani said.
 “It’s just one of those things that happens and you have to bear with it” BCE and Rogers teamed up in 2012 to buy a controlling stake in Maple Leaf Sports & Entertainment Ltd, whose crown jewel is the Leafs hockey franchise.
 is in talks to buy Alstom SA, the French builder of power plants and transmission gear, people with knowledge of the matter said, in what would be GE’s biggest acquisition ever.
 GE’s attempt to buy Honeywell International Inc.
 The only deal that would have been larger was its attempt more than a decade ago to buy Honeywell for about $53 billion, including the assumption of debt, the data show.
 Even the idea of investors buying a stake in a patent litigation is old: it’s how Elias Howe, inventor of a unique type of stitch, funded his patent battles with sewing machine company founder Isaac Singer.
 Government Accountability Office report last year only counted “patent monetization entities,” companies buying patents to profit from royalties or lawsuits.
 Turning up the economic heat on Ukraine, Russia’s state-run OAO Gazprom presented the nation with an additional $114 billion bill for gas it promised to buy last year.
 is running out of steam as buyers balk at record prices and higher mortgage rates that are making properties less affordable.
 Changing Mix More higher-priced properties are selling while first-time buyers and lower-income Americans struggle to get into the market.
 “The first-time homebuyer is not participating, nor are other buyers of modest means,” said David Crowe, chief economist for the National Association of Homebuilders in Washington.
 “We’ve lost a segment of our homebuyers because of tight credit” The average rate on a 30-year, fixed mortgage was 427 percent in the week ended April 17.
 “Prices are rising, mortgage rates are higher, and that makes it considerably more expensive to buy than it was a year ago,” said Jed Kolko, chief economist for Trulia Inc, a San Francisco-based real estate information service.
 Sales of existing homes fell in March for a third consecutive month as rising prices and a lack of inventory discouraged would-be buyers.
 “You don’t get a job one day and buy a home the next,” said Trulia’s Kolko.
 VW is pushing to fully buy the Soedertaelje-based truckmaker to advance cooperation between the Swedish company and Munich-based MAN SE, which VW also controls.
 The carmaker said it didn’t buy stock or other financial instruments in the truckmaker during the offer term, which expired April 25.
 Challenging Daimler The German manufacturer has thus far reaped limited financial rewards for the billions of euros invested in buying control of Scania and MAN in the last decade as minority investors resisted efforts to share technology that would boost profit.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- Private-equity firms that focus on buying closed life insurance funds should invest for the long term to bolster the industry if they are to be tolerated, Germany’s financial regulator said.
 Bafin would accept buyout firms that “don’t act in too rough a way and don’t try to push through overly short investment horizons to run away after three or four years,” Felix Hufeld, Bafin’s head of insurance supervision, said at a conference organized by Handelsblatt newspaper in Munich today.
 and German reinsurer Hannover Re, agreed last week to buy Old Mutual Plc’s Skandia units in Germany and Austria for 220 million euros ($303 million) in its first deal since its creation.
 The company is seeking to buy life insurance providers that are closed to new customers in a similar way to how Clive Cowdery built up Resolution Ltd, the UK.
 insurance buyout firm.
 “I don’t know if it’s everybody waking up at the same time and having the same thought in mind that they need to buy as many companies as they can.
 Serial acquirer Valeant is trying to buy Botox-maker Allergan, and Actavis Plc is acquiring Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Novartis agreed to buy cancer drugs from Glaxo for as much as $16 billion, while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly.
 Defensive Move Allergan, trying to fend off an unwanted bid from Valeant and hedge-fund manager Bill Ackman, could turn around and buy Dublin-based Shire as a vehicle for a tax inversion, Shibani Malhotra, a New York-based analyst at Sterne Agee, said last week.
 said it will buy Turkey’s Tekstil Bankasi AS as the biggest Chinese lender seeks to counter a credit slowdown at home that led to the weakest profit growth in almost five years.
 The company said it will buy 76 percent of Tekstilbank, as the Turkish lender is known, from its parent for $316 million.
 ‘Sexy’ Sector The Chinese bank will buy all of GSD Holding AS’s shares in Tekstilbank and bid for the remainder of the Istanbul-based company, according to ICBC’s statement.
 Qatar Islamic Bank said March 26 that it’s in exclusive talks to buy a stake in Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, while Commercial Bank of Qatar agreed to take a 71 percent stake in Turkey’s Alternatifbank AS in March last year.
 The bank said in January it will buy control of Standard Bank Group Ltd’s London-based markets unit for about $765 million to expand in trading spanning commodities and interest rates to currencies.
 The New York-based firm invested about $360 million of equity in a $17 billion leveraged buyout of Michael from Thomas H.
 Post Chairman and Chief Executive Officer William Stiritz has been buying products such as Premier Nutrition supplements and Hearthside Food Solutions’ organic cereals and snacks since Post was spun off from Ralcorp Inc.
 In February, Post agreed to buy the PowerBar and Musashi sports-nutrition brands from Nestle SA to take advantage of increasing demand for health- and fitness-related snacks.
 The firm offered to buy Chindex International Inc.
 The buyout company raised $38 billion in 2008 in its fifth fund in Asia, its biggest in the region.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Aquarius Platinum Ltd, which operates mines in South Africa and Zimbabwe, said holders of 58 percent of its bonds accepted a buyback proposal as the company announced terms of a rights offer.
 Aquarius will offer investors two shares for each one they hold to raise as much as $225 million to fund the buyback, it said.
 The largest utility in the European Union’s ex-communist east may be interested in buying some assets from Vattenfall AB in Germany, CEZ chief Daniel Benes said yesterday in an interview in Prague.
 “The biggest failure in CEZ’s history was that we didn’t buy Slovenske Elektrarne,” Benes said in his Prague office.
 CEZ doesn’t plan to buy any generation assets in its home market and will instead focus on developing smaller co-generation units and activities including gas distribution and mobile-phone services to mitigate the falling revenue from electricity production, according to Benes.
 agreed to buy mobile-phone subscribers from Nashua Mobile (Pty) Ltd.
 The company, which abandoned a plan to buy about 630 branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc last year as the capital hole was revealed, was damaged by “acute systemic weakness” in its governance, Myners wrote in his report.
 will buy an 89 percent stake in Highland Group Holdings Ltd, which owns UK.
 Sports Direct International Plc Chairman Mike Ashley bought an 11 percent stake in House of Fraser from Scottish entrepreneur Tom Hunter about a week ago and failed in attempts to buy other stakes, the Sunday Times reported April 6.
 “The share buyback is definitely a positive signal for investors as this means the company is optimistic about the future, else it wouldn’t have bought them now,” Hu Jiaming, an analyst at Capital Securities Corp.
 The rout has drawn out buyers including Templeton Emerging Markets Group’s Mark Mobius, who said in an interview yesterday he’s been adding to technology stocks after valuations at companies such as Tencent dropped to “reasonable” levels.
 The size of the buyback is too small to have a major impact on investor sentiment, according to Benjamin Tam, a Hong Kong-based portfolio manager at IG Investment Ltd, which oversees about $15 billion.
 The Chinese company could be valued at $160 billion to $180 billion at its IPO, he wrote in a note in which he raised Yahoo’s rating to the equivalent of a buy from a neutral after the shares pulled back recently.
 offered to buy the rest of its mall unit to consolidate some businesses and boost returns.
 ‘Financial Engineering’ Singapore’s home sales dropped to the lowest this year in March as loan curbs crimped demand from homebuyers, a government report showed today.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar’s national oil company has dropped out of a group of state-backed investors seeking to buy a stake in Occidental Petroleum Corp’s Middle East business amid a political dispute in the region, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Qatar Petroleum is weighing buying some or all of the stake on its own, and is seeking a financial adviser to help it do so, the people said.
 Selling the businesses will give Occidental cash to fund drilling, buy back shares, and extend international contracts, analysts have said.
 The dollar was little changed versus a basket of peers before the Federal Reserve is forecast to continue tapering its bond-buying program when it meets next week.
 The retailer’s managers, speaking in a presentation for analysts and investors last week, didn’t provide specific plans to gain new customers or lure current shoppers into buying more, Sterne Agee’s Sam Poser said in a note yesterday.
 Domestic sales of passenger cars fell 47 percent in the 12 months ended March for a second consecutive annual period as expensive loans and high inflation discouraged buyers.
 and founder Jack Ma’s Yunfeng Capital agreed to buy a $122 billion stake in video website Youku Tudou Inc.
 “Alibaba needs a lot of traffic so they have been buying a lot from pretty much every single Chinese Internet company,” Tian X.
 This month, Alibaba agreed to buy AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 The clearinghouse requires investors who buy a contract on CME Group’s markets to return to the same exchange to sell it.
 Previously, traders found out that their orders were completed before other CME Group customers were told, possibly giving them time to buy or sell on other exchanges with knowledge of that execution.
 “As the Chinese people start buying more washing machines and fridges and cars, they will use more metals that go into durable goods,” including zinc, she said.
 company buying its energy assets, representing more than 70 percent of sales, the people said.
 That’s enough to buy a Ferrari FF in the country, according to auto pricing website Cheshicom.
 Brasileira de Distribuicao Grupo Pao de Acucar may move after Deutsche Bank recommended buying the retailer’s shares.
 by July as the government considers reducing the amount of renewable fuel that oil companies will be required to buy.
 The central bank implemented rules in 2012 that limited financial institutions to buying a 40 percent stake in Indonesian lenders.
 in August ended a bid to buy Bank Danamon for $65 billion in what would have been Southeast Asia’s largest bank takeover, after failing to win regulatory approval for a majority stake.
 said it planned to raise funds through a private share placement to buy assets from affiliates for designing and building battleships and submarines.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- British lawmakers mobilized against Pfizer Inc’s attempt to buy AstraZeneca Plc, demanding Business Secretary Vince Cable secure assurances on jobs and research investment.
 Stifel has been shifting staff since it agreed to buy KBW in a deal that was completed last year.
 obtained $91 billion in loans to back its buyout by Chief Executive Officer Michael Dell and Silver Lake Management LLC.
 posted the second-biggest gain in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index after reporting profit that beat analysts’ estimates and announcing increased share buybacks.
 “The bull case appears well intact” Ameriprise’s last buyback authorization, in 2012, was for $2 billion of shares.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG is in talks with potential buyers of its Cosmopolitan resort in Las Vegas as it tries to end a six-year, money-losing venture into casino development, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The 2,960-room resort drew lawsuits from condominium buyers and sales agents who were offered their deposits back to walk away and allow Cosmopolitan to open as a hotel without residential units.
 CapitaCommercial may buy the 60 percent stake it doesn’t own in CapitaGreen, which would become its largest asset by income and raise the proportion of grade-A assets in its portfolio to 33 percent, according to Standard Chartered.
 It spent 121 billion euros ($168 billion) to buy French retailer Conforama in 2011.
 Manufacturing Push In buying Alstom’s power assets, GE Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Immelt is looking to build on a plan to reorient GE toward manufacturing.
April 9 (Bloomberg) -- Mars Inc, the closely held maker of M&M’s candies and Uncle Ben’s rice, agreed to buy three Procter & Gamble Co.
 The business hasn’t been a good one for P&G, said Dibadj, who recommends buying P&G shares.
 “They’re unraveling some of their mistakes, and this potentially was one” While Mars didn’t want the brands’ European business, it has an option to buy operations in remaining markets in Asia and Africa, said Paul Fox, a P&G spokesman.
 Falling Prices While the electronic-goods market in France is showing signs of returning to growth after years of decline, the main risk to business is falling prices as growing numbers of shoppers choose to buy cheaper products, Schultz said.
 “An improving current account deficit and overseas fund buying are major positives,” Akash Dharia, head of derivatives at ICICI Securities Ltd, wrote in an e-mail.
 Vodafone has expressed interest in buying that holding, while Telecom Egypt has said it wouldn’t be obliged to exit the joint venture and it may buy a controlling stake when 4G spectrum is offered.
 “Also, Apple’s cash on balance sheet means dividends or buybacks.
 That offers downside protection for shareholders, so I’m happy to hold Apple stock” Apple has $159 billion in cash and is in the midst of a buyback and dividend plan that will return $100 billion to shareholders.
 There were 122 million calls giving the right to buy the stock, 40 percent more than puts to sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg as of April 1.
 They rate the stock an outperform, the equivalent of buy.
 Pure uses special software loaded on its devices that can compress customers’ data so they need to buy less flash storage, which is pricier than disk-based systems.
 The company has entered into exclusive talks with owner Paris-based buyout firm Ardian Sarl, formerly known as Axa Private Equity.
 Owner Hans-Peter Wild and buyout firm KKR & Co.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Credit Agricole Leasing Greece, Credit Agricole SA’s remaining business in the country, is seeking buyers for around 400 million euros ($554 million) of loans mostly backed by real estate, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 slumped 11 percent in the month, its worst drop in two years, after bungling its Federal Reserve stress test so badly it had to suspend plans for a dividend increase and stock buyback.
 were among investors to buy into GM.
 “We’re looking for a leader, someone that can bring out the best in players, someone that has the capability of encouraging his staff to meet the needs that players have so that they philosophically join in, they buy into what we’re doing,” Jackson told reporters today at the team’s training facility in Tarrytown, New York.
 In interviews with players after the season, Jackson said players said they “weren’t on the same page” as Woodson and “didn’t buy in like we did the year before” Jackson’s desire to remove several staff members has caused him to clash with team owner Jim Dolan, the executive chairman of Madison Square Garden Co, the New York Daily News reported today, citing an unidentified team source.
 “It’s very difficult to buy this stuff as a consumer in the US.
 consumers the opportunity to buy goods they otherwise wouldn’t have access to because the logistics are too complicated.
 Long Road Artisan Connect plans to generate revenue by marking up the items, a model that North says benefits the artisans because they’re reaching new customers who can spend more than buyers in their local markets.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- The tycoon who built the world’s biggest sugar-cane operation by buying mills in Brazil is about to dominate rail freight transport in the country.
 Cosan, the sugar maker controlled by billionaire Rubens Ometto, won approval from ALL-America Latina Logistica SA controlling shareholders to buy the train operator for about $3 billion in an all-stock deal, ALL-Logistica said in a filing yesterday.
 Price Premium Previ, which rejected a Cosan offer to buy a stake in ALL in 2012, is part of the group that approved the 696 billion-real ($31 billion) takeover offer valuing ALL’s shares at 10184 reais each.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- The most deadly outbreak of a hog virus in 18 years in Japan is raising pork prices and may boost imports from the biggest buyer, supporting a record rally in Chicago.
 Japan is the world’s largest importer of pork, buying 124 million tons last year, representing 18 percent of global purchases, according to the US.
 ‘Huge Gap’ The easier requirements haven’t been enough to overcome an absence of market makers, or institutions that provide liquidity by acting as ready buyers and sellers of shares.
 “The exchanges don’t provide efficient pricing as there’s always a huge gap between bid and ask prices” Market makers bridge the information gap in over-the-counter exchanges and bring down expenses, as they have access to buyers and sellers.
 Pearson Plc climbed 25 percent after Jefferies Group LLC recommended buying shares in the textbook publisher.
 Jefferies raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold, with analyst David Reynolds citing signs of a pickup in US.
 Man Group added 47 percent to 1067 pence as HSBC upgraded the hedge-fund manager to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from underweight.
 “Some investors buying the dollar against the yen may take profits as it climbed above 103 in the past few days” GPIF Portfolio Japan’s Government Pension Investment Fund said it will maintain its portfolio and deviation limits for the fiscal year beginning today, while allowing flexibility in the deviation when needed, according to a statement on its website.
 Fujitsu declined 19 percent to 615 yen after the share’s rating was cut to neutral from buy at Goldman Sachs.
 Leveraged buyouts worth more than $500 million are, on average, valued at 95 to 10 times companies’ Ebitda in the US.
 It’s still a better time to sell than to buy” Black, Rowan and Josh Harris founded New York-based Apollo in 1990.
 The firm in January finished gathering $184 billion for its eighth buyout fund, the largest private-equity pool raised since the financial crisis.
 Itochu joined a KKR & Co-led purchase of most of Tulsa, Oklahoma-based Samson as part of the biggest leveraged buyout in the oil and gas production industry, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Novartis agreed to buy London-based GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of the Swiss company’s vaccines division to Glaxo for $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 In January, Lilly CEO John Lechleiter said “we’re buyers” in the animal health field during an interview at an industry conference.
 Buffett shouldn’t vote based on “any other extraneous factors” Coca-Cola has said that stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook extended his buying spree with the iPhone maker acquiring speech-recognition software company Novauris Technologies to help improve its Siri service.
 “Apple buys smaller technology companies from time to time, and we generally do not discuss our purpose or plans,” Huguet said.
 In its last quarter, Apple spent $525 million buying other companies, almost double what it spent a year earlier.
 HSBC recommended investors buy German 10-year bunds versus selling Austria’s 175 percent bond due in October 2023.
 Vulcan Materials Co, Mexican and South American companies, or private-equity funds may be potential buyers of US.
 The deal is part of an asset swap that sees Cemex buying Holcim’s operations in Spain and the Czech Republic.
April 17 (Bloomberg) -- PZU SA, central Europe’s largest insurer by market value, agreed to buy RSA Insurance Group Plc’s four units in the biggest foreign acquisition by a Polish financial company.
 It failed to buy Croatia Osiguranje dd as well as Polish lenders Bank Gospodarki Zywnosciowej SA and Alior Bank SA last year.
 “PZU is buying players with solid positions, well-known brand names and operating on markets with long-term growth potential,” Pawel Kozub, a Warsaw-based analyst at UniCredit SpA, said by phone.
 In Poland, the company is seeking to buy health insurers belonging to state energy companies, KGHM Polska Miedz SA and PKN Orlen SA.
 agreed to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 Sun Pharmaceutical agreed to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories for $32 billion in stock.
 We need the money for their medical bills and to buy a home for my child.
 the option to sell rights in the trust to unidentified buyers, staving off a default that threatened to roil China’s financial markets.
 Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed in April to buy an 18 percent stake in Weibo for $586 million, and plans to exercise an option to raise that stake to 30 percent, according to the filing.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Emaar Properties PJSC, Dubai’s largest publicly traded developer, said it expects profit to more than triple in the next five years as it hands over completed properties to buyers.
 Foreign Operations Emaar only accounts for sales after properties are completed and handed over to the buyer, even though it collects payments before and during construction.
 Overseas buyers accounted for 77 percent of that investment, the broker said.
 ADIB agreed to buy the conventional retail assets of Barclays Plc in the United Arab Emirates for 650 million dirhams ($177 million), the Abu Dhabi-based lender said in a statement yesterday.
 The deal to buy Barclays’s operations is “a perfect fit” as part of the bank’s strategy to expand into the expatriate market, it said.
 added 42 percent after proposing to buy AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion).
 “If you ban them, you buy them,” Wetch told legislators at the hearing, referring to the whales.
 Weir Chief Executive Officer Keith Cochrane said in February he’s looking to buy more mining, oil, gas and valves companies following the acquisitions of drilling control company Mathena Inc.
 analyst who recommends buying Weir shares, said by phone.
 “The whole NSA spying scandal is pushing the Chinese IT buyer away from US.
 Goodman’s share price “came back down and they’ve turned buyer again,” he said.
 In July, Manila Water failed to win approval to buy a 51 percent stake in PT PAM Lyonnaise Jaya, which supplies water to western Jakarta.
 The company has also been looking at assets to buy that would help expand its global sales power, with commercial operations in new countries.
 18 agreed to buy brand-drug maker Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Now he’s building a new life with plans to buy a car and find his own place to live.
 Investors can apply to buy seven new shares for every 12 shares already held, Peugeot said.
 While the San Jose, California-based company is still deciding whether to actually bring back the cash, the money could be used for stock buybacks or acquisitions, executives said.
 Throwing Darts? Possible targets that EBay might use to boost its marketplace business include Etsy Inc, the service known for its homespun crafts, said Robert Peck, an analyst at SunTrust in New York, who rates EBay a buy.
 Deutsche Bank, along with bankers’ groups in California and Nevada, told the California Supreme Court the ruling by a lower court may jeopardize the economic recovery as lenders and investors weigh the risks of buying properties that house unwanted tenants, are subject to leases, or are vulnerable to lawsuits brought by renters evicted by paid middlemen.
 A Defense Department report this month said it would be forced to cut 17 of the 343 fighters the agency planned to buy from fiscal 2016 through 2019 unless Congress repeals automatic cuts.
 The Federal Reserve will probably cut bond buying to $45 billion at the meeting that starts today, estimates compiled by Bloomberg showed.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said that time the central bank may start to increase interest rates “around six months” after ending its asset-buying program.
 economy remain intact in markets” Carry Trade UBS AG’s V24 Carry Index was at its highest since April last year, when the gauge reached a level unseen since August 2012, signaling increased gains for those who borrow in low interest-rate currencies to buy into markets offering higher yields.
 The chairmen of congressional tax-writing panels say they’re considering a short-term infusion into the trust fund to buy more time.
 Namwater has “to look for finance to buy the plant,”Solomons said yesterday during a tour of the Subiaco, WesternAustralia-based company’s mine.
 Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s biggest Internet company, rebounded after buying back shares.
 Tencent Rebounds Tencent rose 16 percent to HK$50950 to halt its four-day drop after buying back HK$767 million ($99 million) of shares yesterday, according to an exchange filing.
 KKR, which acquired a 635 percent stake in Visma in 2010, has offered a number of its larger investors the chance to buy shares, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 The New York-based asset manager is also offering outside bidders the chance to buy the stake and may also seek an initial public offering for the Oslo-based company, said the people.
 Some ETNs, particularly those with the word “shares” in the title, may be ambiguous enough for investors to think they’re buying stocks or exchange-traded funds, the letter says.
 We can’t sit there and read prospectuses all day” Steckbeck was among 29 named investors whose arbitration claim made via Finra was withdrawn after Credit Suisse sued to block it, arguing that the buyers of TVIX notes didn’t fit the Finra definition of “customer,” court records show.
 The investors weren’t the bank’s customers because they didn’t buy the securities from Credit Suisse and never entered into an agreement to obtain investment advice from it, the lender said in the complaint.
 Although ETNs are debt securities, they allow individual buyers, sometimes called retail investors, to track assets such as futures or options, financial instruments that may otherwise require certification that the purchaser is a sophisticated investor.
 More Accessible Futures are contracts to buy or sell assets at a set price, allowing them to create a position, or a view, on the market.
 Options give the buyer the right, but not the obligation, to buy or sell a security at a set price.
 After buying the exchange operator in November, ICE purchased Algo Technologies Ltd.
 with plans to use its technology to serve as the new NYSE matching engine, which is the software that pairs up buyers and sellers at an exchange, according to people familiar with the matter.
 dollars intoloonies to buy Canadian stocks at the end of last year and thensold on March 20, you’d be down 03 percent once you convertedback to the greenback.
 Hedge funds and other money managers boosted bullish wagers the most since February, betting that refineries will need to buy more crude to accelerate gasoline output before the peak US summer driving season.
 UBS raised its rating on the carrier to buy from neutral, predicting a benchmark measure for revenue will grow at a faster pace, starting in the second quarter of this year.
 Novartis yesterday agreed to buy cancer drugs from Glaxo for as much as $16 billion, while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 They were net buyers of 402 million pounds this year through March 30, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “It’s a normal transaction for a private equity firm that skews the numbers because of its size relative to the Egyptian market” Arab Buyers Arab investors were net buyers of 656 million pounds yesterday.
 Before approving the transaction, the agency required Hertz to spin off its Advantage Rent A Car business to a new buyer to maintain competition.
 Advantage filed for bankruptcy last year, and now Hertz has agreed to buy back 10 Advantage locations, according to an FTC statement yesterday.
 has agreed to buy 12 locations, while six remain unsold, the FTC said in the statement.
 Hertz’s deal to buy the locations stems from the November bankruptcy filing of Advantage.
 “The assets are going back to the previously anticompetitive buyer,” Doyle said.
 Shareholders in insurance firms had already lost around 36 billion pounds ($6 billion) on March 19, when Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 ECB President Mario Draghi was said to have told German lawmakers yesterday that an asset-buying program, or quantitative easing, isn’t imminent and is relatively unlikely for now.
 Mercedes, the world’s third-biggest producer of luxury cars, has posted sales jumps exceeding 10 percent for nine consecutive months, including a 13 percent increase in March, as new compact cars and variants of the S- and E-Class sedans win buyers.
 homebuilders rose less than forecast in April as sales and prospective buyer traffic stagnated, showing the residential real estate market struggled to improve after a harsh winter.
 Tight credit for some home buyers and limited availability of lots are restraining builder sentiment months after snow storms and freezing temperatures held back construction.
 “As the spring home-buying season gets into full swing and demand increases, builders are expecting sales prospect to improve” Estimates in a Bloomberg survey of 49 economists ranged from 48 to 54.
 The group’s gauge of prospective buyer traffic held at 32 in April, while the index of current single-family home sales was unchanged at 51.
 “The housing recovery remained on track, and should benefit from the spring buying season,” Chief Executive Officer John Stumpf said on an April 11 earnings call.
 jumped 37 percent after Japan’s largest mobile-phone company by subscribers announced plans to buy back as much as 500 billion yen ($49 billion) in shares.
 The company said it will buy back as many as 320 million of its outstanding shares, or about 77 percent, through a repurchasing plan and also sell a stake in Tata Teleservices Ltd.
 Yields Fall The debt may have attracted buyers because African sovereign bonds have performed well in recent weeks, Raza Agha, chief Middle East and Africa economist at VTB Capital Plc in London, said in reply to e-mailed questions.
 executive and ex-Chief Executive Officer of Glasgow’s Celtic Plc soccer club and Halfords Group Plc bicycle retail chain, McLeod was hired in 2008 to turn around Coles after Wesfarmers bought the chain as part of Australia’s biggest-ever buyout the previous year.
 Oil Producers Upper Nile produces Dar Blend, a low-sulfur crude that is prized by Japanese buyers as a cleaner-burning fuel for power plants.
 Apple said it plans to take on debt to pay for the added stock buyback and dividend plans.
 With investors having griped that Apple’s business is slowing and that the company wasn’t doing enough with its cash, the actions buy Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook time to reignite growth with new products that he today reiterated are in development.
 Breaking Away With the expanded buyback program and stock split, Cook is breaking further from his predecessor, Steve Jobs, who had dismissed calls for Apple to do more with its cash hoard.
 Cook, who has faced calls from activists including David Einhorn and Carl Icahn to do more for shareholder payouts, had in April 2013 announced a plan for a total of $100 billion in dividends and buybacks.
 Mallinckrodt Plc said yesterday that it will buy Questcor Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 “We’ve seen so many deals in specialty pharma, and a number of companies have been very aggressively buying,” Timothy Chiang, an analyst at CRT Capital Group LLC in Stamford, Connecticut, said in a phone interview.
 The positive stock performance may provide an incentive for companies to continue buying, he said.
 Several companies including Mondelez International Inc’s Cadbury’s unit have offered free mobile airtime credit to buyers.
 this month agreed to buy a stake in state-owned Development Bank of Rwanda, while KKR & Co.
 is competing with Abraaj Group to buy a stake in Saudi Arabian restaurant business Kudu, two people familiar with the deal said in September.
 The Bloomberg Consumer Comfort Index climbed from a nine-week low, reflecting more upbeat views on the economy, finances and buying climate.
 AT&T announced plans today to spend more than $500 million with partner Chernin Group to buy or build video-streaming services, setting it up to compete with Netflix.
 The number of loan products available to borrowers with a 5 percent deposit has tripled to 132 since the government in October extended its Help-to-Buy program, which assists buyers with down payments on new homes, according to Genworth Financial Inc.
 offered HK$384 billion ($5 billion) to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 That offers a more comparable valuation to Yue Xiu Group’s $15 billion offer to buy a majority stake in family-owned Chong Hing Bank Ltd, since the two lenders use different methods for valuing their properties.
 The benchmark 10-year note’s winning streak was the longest since January amid revisions of projections established when Fed Chair Janet Yellen said March 19 the central bank may increase rates six months after it ends its bond-buying stimulus, which is forecast to conclude in October.
 jumped 66 percent to C$1376 after analysts at Morgan Stanley raised their rating for the stock to overweight, the equivalent of a buy, as the company is positioned to “capture outsize share” of natural gas drilling activity in the coming years.
 The larger-than-expected dividend boost comes as IBM plans to reduce its pace of stock buybacks following an $82 billion splurge in the first quarter.
 IBM said earlier this month that it won’t sustain its rate of share repurchases from the first quarter, when buybacks more than tripled from a year earlier to the most since 2007.
 China is the top buyer of iron ore, the key steelmaking ingredient, consuming 72 percent of global imports of ore delivered by ship.
 Borrowers with down payments of less than 20 percent, or similar home equity in a refinancing, generally must also buy mortgage insurance from private firms when receiving Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac loans.
 After buying a stake in PizzaRev in March 2013, Buffalo Wild plans to open its first store under the brand in Minnesota in May.
 The Chinese maker of personal computers must convince government officials that buying a server unit from International Business Machines Corp.
 locations in shopping malls, a response to changing buying patterns by moms, according to a statement yesterday.
 Meanwhile, Crescendo Partners has been pressing Aeropostale management for bigger changes, sending a letter in November demanding that the company find a buyer.
 and Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s private-equity unit agreed to buy Flint Group from CVC Capital Partners Ltd.
 capital’s status as a magnet for wealthy foreign home buyers is helping to drive prices in many areas beyond the reach of most Londoners.
 Foreign-born buyers made 69 percent of central London new-home purchases in the two years through June, with 28 percent living outside the UK, broker Knight Frank LLP said in October.
 Speculation “does nothing for London whatsoever other than push prices up even further” More Competition Developers have refocused their sales efforts on local buyers in response to criticism of their efforts to market some homes exclusively abroad.
 When the project’s Malaysian owners sold the first 866 homes in just three days in January, more than half went to foreign buyers.
 Residents Preferred Rob Tincknell, chief executive officer of the Battersea Power Station Development Co, said in an interview that the company’s staff called all 13,000 people who registered to buy the project’s 3,500 homes and intends to give preference to those who said they intend to live in the homes they buy.
 We have buyers” Hutchison’s development, known as Convoys Wharf, is in a neighborhood founded by King Henry VIII as a dockyard in 1514.
 Safe Investment Foreign investment in London property took off after the financial crisis in 2008 as a weaker pound, economic instability from Europe to Asia and record-low returns on fixed-income investments prompted wealthy buyers to search for assets that would hold their value.
 Spending by non-British investors spread from luxury properties in neighborhoods such as Chelsea and Knightsbridge to new houses and apartments as builders used advance sales, many to buyers from Asia, to finance projects amid tight lending for development.
 A main reason for the local backlash: two-thirds of foreign buyers are investors rather than owner-occupiers, broker Savills Plc said in November.
 homebuilders, including Barratt Developments Plc, Taylor Wimpey Plc and Telford Homes Plc, agreed to stop giving overseas residents the first shot at buying London homes sold before they’re built.
 “Even with that, we save about 1,000 pounds a month and every time we reach what we think is a milestone, we look at the prices in London and realize we just can’t get close to buying anything” No Help Programs such as Help to Buy “just fuel the fire by pushing prices up further,” Haycroft said.
 He also called foreign investment a “long-standing and necessary part of any global city’s housing market” It’s too early to tell whether changes in marketing will have a substantial effect on the proportion of foreign buyers in the capital.
 buyers accounted for almost half of sales in the boroughs of Kensington & Chelsea and Westminster in 2013, up from 43 percent in 2012 and 37 percent the year before, as high prices reduced demand and an improving global economy provided more safe investments for foreign investors to choose from, broker Hamptons International Ltd.
 government has taken steps to increase the tax burden for luxury homes and properties owned by foreign buyers through companies.
 There are no restrictions on the type of property a foreign investor can buy in the UK.
 In Australia, by contrast, non-residents are unable to buy existing homes and can only invest in property that adds to the housing stock.
 Introducing rent controls similar to Berlin’s and creating more council tax bands would “scare overseas buyers because they won’t get these huge profits” Coyne, the protester at City Hall, expressed her exasperation with politicians as they prepared to approve apartments that she says local people earning any less than 40,000 pounds a year would be unable to afford.
 “In an otherwise volatile energy quarter, these guys managed to generate year-on-year earnings margin growth,” Hassan Ahmed, a New York-based analyst at Alembic Global Advisers who recommends buying the shares, said by phone.
 In January, Dow tripled its share buyback program to $45 billion and raised its dividend.
 The buyout firms are in talks with sovereign wealth funds and other buyers to act as so-called cornerstone investors in the share sale, which may take place as early as July, one of the people said.
 to what was then was Australia’s biggest buyout in eight years.
 Defense Department have inquired about buying the project’s power, said Pickett, who was previously CEO at Telkonet Inc, a smart-grid technology company.
 Novartis, which is based in Basel, Switzerland, is considered the most likely buyer because it already has a partnership to market ThromboGenics’s Jetrea eye medicine outside of the US, the people said, asking not to be identified because the process is private.
 has held talks to buy the trainmaker.
 Volkswagen, which owns a majority, plans to pursue its bid to buy out minority shareholders only if acceptance reaches 90 percent, the threshold needed under Swedish law to force remaining owners to sell their holdings and delist the company.
 Glaxo gained 62 percent after Novartis on April 22 agreed to buy the UK.
 held informal, now-discontinued talks to buy the drugmaker.
 stock and real estate prices, Blackstone has taken three hotel companies public in the past six months, prompting traders to load up on bullish options on the world’s biggest buyout firm.
 Investors including pension plans and endowments give their money to buyout firms, expecting them to return a profit over a 10-year cycle.
 Valuation Discount The buyout group, which manages $266 billion, trades at 99 times estimated earnings, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 There were 246,313 calls giving the right to buy the stock as of April 15, or 22 percent more than puts to sell, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The prize is the amount of money the company saved by buying the slot following the football championship rather than during the game.
 are “obvious candidates to do something similar” Boosting Westlake The MLP, which may sell as much as $2717 million in stock, may boost the value of Westlake by about $10 a share to $85, excluding the ethylene pipeline, Hassan Ahmed, a New York-based analyst at Alembic Global Advisers who recommends buying the shares, said today in a note.
 Westlake will buy 95 percent of the partnership’s ethylene production at a 10 cent-per-gallon premium over production costs.
 who recommends buying the shares, said in a note today.
 The money is usually locked up for about a decade, and the firms have a mandate to buy companies, improve their value, and sell them with a profit.
 The deal comes after state-owned Cofco agreed in February to buy 51 percent of Dutch grain trader Nidera BV, which has annual sales of more than $17 billion, as it seeks to expand food supplies for the world’s most populous nation.
 The drought that’s draining hydropower dams of water, the source of most of Brazil’s energy supplies, hurts distributors as they buy energy at all-time highs in the spot market and then resell it for a loss at a government-set price cap.
 As the SPDR S&P Homebuilders ETF heads for its first weekly gain since February, investors are buying options betting that the rebound will keep going.
 and failed to properly vet its finances before buying the British software company for $103 billion.
 He has a buy rating on the stock.
 “We had extensive negotiations with a potential buyer regarding the sale of our global cocoa and chocolate business,” ADM Chief Executive Officer Patricia A.
 “In the end, we could not agree to an outcome that met ADM’s objectives” As part of the fertilizer agreement, ADM said it will buy fertilizer from Mosaic after the deal closes and will continue to supply certain fertilizer customers in Brazil and Paraguay.
 Possible buyers may be “telecommunication companies, which have targeted the region and have made some takeovers already in the past,” he said.
 “It remains a buyers’ market, there is too much capacity from all areas,” Vickers said.
 “People are buying more into better and best” products, and female customers are “trading into better-priced dresses,” Bolland told journalists on a conference call.
 is buying shares in Africa’s biggest mobile-phone operator, a logistics company and a sugar producer as it bets on the growing spending power of the continent’s consumers.
 “We’re buying into companies with a big exposure to African consumers,” he said in an interview in Johannesburg on March 28.
 New annualized premium sales fell 44 percent in the US, and Aflac said some customers delayed buying coverage amid uncertainty over the health-care overhaul.
 to find buyers for the unit, which could fetch at least $25 billion, said one of the people, asking not to be identified because the matter isn’t public.
 The company has begun contacting potential buyers and is expected to begin soliciting offers in about a month, the people said.
 Bove has a buy recommendation on the stock because BNY Mellon will benefit when short-term interest rates eventually rise.
 In addition to finding a white knight to merge with, Irvine, California-based Allergan’s choices include buying another company to make itself tougher to acquire and negotiating with Valeant.
 Allergan makes a tempting target for buyers looking for growth.
 Two States The Daily Caller, a web-based publication founded by Republican Tucker Carlson, first reported the Freedom Partners ad buy, saying the group spent $11 million on it between the two states.
 agreed to buy ABC Holdings Ltd.
 The ministry, which needs to buy about 174 billion rubles for the fund, suspended the purchase of 212 billion rubles ($6 billion) on March 4 after the ruble fell to a record.
 Everything about the deal is as big as Texas -- biggest leveraged buyout ($48 billion, in 2007), biggest energy bankruptcy (a possible $456 billion, bigger than Enron Inc) and a big loss for Henry Kravis, George Roberts, David Bonderman and Lloyd Blankfein, the big shots who bought the company formerly known as TXU Corp.
 lost $873 million on its $2 billion bond investment: “Big mistake” “Watching the buyout sponsors haggle with creditors for a small slice of the equity is like watching two movie stars get out of a Rolls Royce and fight over a dime in the gutter,” said Erik Gordon, a professor at the Ross School of Business at the University of Michigan in Ann Arbor.
 “The collapse shows that even buyout superstars can fall on their faces when they make highly leveraged investments in volatile businesses.
 Their brand name and reputation aren’t enough to save them” Lose Control In the largest buyout of their lives, Roberts and Kravis of KKR & Co, Bonderman of TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s Blankfein -- billionaire cousins, a private-equity giant and a titan of Wall Street -- may salvage just 1 percent of the original equity investment of about $83 billion, according to people with knowledge of the negotiations.
 Orderly Bankruptcy KKR, TPG and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, the investment bank’s buyout arm, opened negotiations last year asking to keep about 15 percent of their stake.
 We can both buy a Rolex for the money we spend on a lawyer but I’m not letting you get my Rolex” Wring Value The three owners and their investors have managed to wring some value from the deal.
 That breaks down to $300 million for advising on their own buyout, management fees totaling $220 million and as much as $741 million for consulting on debt deals.
 Borrowed Money The October 2007 buyout by KKR, TPG and Goldman Sachs was a bet, using mostly borrowed money, that natural-gas prices would rise.
 Make Peace The gig was supposed to go differently for John Young, who was hired to be Energy Future chief executive officer soon after the buyout.
 Goldman sent out so-called teasers, or invitation letters, to potential bidders for stock in the Istanbul-based company, which is owned equally by New York-based private-equity firm Rohatyn Group and another buyout investor group that Sozeri, speaking in a phone interview, identified as Spokane while declining to specify other details.
 Future Uncertain Facebook is now seeking to make even more money on gadgets, agreeing to buy text messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 And Facebook agreed to buy Oculus for about $2 billion, a high-priced bet on the fledgling wearable-computing market.
 AMG today agreed to buy a majority stake in Veritas Asset Management LLP, a global equity manager with $17 billion in assets, adding to its collection of boutique managers specializing in stocks, hedge funds and private equity.
 He rates the shares a buy.
 AMG buys stakes in money management firms and provides them with distribution and back-office help.
 The same day AMG said it was buying a stake in value-oriented investor River Road Asset Management.
 in Des Peres, Missouri, who rates the stock as buy.
 After Schiller raised the idea of getting a new agency, Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook, who took over after Jobs died in October 2011, responded: “If we need to do this, we should get going” In another e-mail displayed for the jury, Schiller, who was on the witness stand for a second day, was discussing with Vincent a Wall Street Journal article from January 2013 titled “Has Apple Lost its Cool to Samsung?” Samsung’s campaign, including some ads that ran before last year, mocked loyal iPhone users for waiting in line to buy new models and Apple for touting features that were already available in other smartphones including Samsung’s Galaxy.
 The company also said it will buy back about $32 billion of mortgage bonds from them.
 Alibaba is the latest sign of change, building an e-commerce business that connects buyers and sellers of everything from fruit to forklifts.
 Weighed down by $24 billion of debt after its buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC, yields on the company’s most-widely traded bonds due March 2019 surged to 126 percent today.
 Fielding took over from Gene Kahn, who Apollo installed at the time of its $31 billion buyout seven years ago and oversaw its European expansion.
 Free cash is money that can be used to retire debt, reward shareholders with dividends and buybacks, or reinvest in the business.
 Then, in 1988, he led Philip Morris in a hostile bid for Kraft that ended with a $13 billion buyout that created, for a time, the world’s largest consumer products company.
 In so doing, he achieved what Time magazine called a “coup” with “an unusually smooth resolution” during the height of the leveraged-buyout era.
 Richman, accused Maxwell of “pressure tactics to buy Kraft on the cheap,” according to the Times.
 Of 17 analysts who share their recommendations with Bloomberg, five recommend buying Lonza shares, while 12 advise holding the stock.
 Andrew Mulliner, money manager at Henderson Global Investors in London told Bloomberg in a telephone interview on April 9 that his company wouldn’t buy Greek bonds, citing the “very murky picture on the long-term debt sustainability” of Greece.
 Goldman Sachs invested about $360 million of equity in a $17 billion leveraged buyout of Michael from Thomas H.
 Post Acquisitions Post Chairman and Chief Executive Officer William Stiritz has been buying products such as Premier Nutrition supplements and Hearthside Food Solutions’ organic cereals and snacks since Post was spun off from Ralcorp Inc.
 In February, Post agreed to buy the PowerBar and Musashi sports-nutrition brands from Nestle SA to take advantage of increasing demand for health- and fitness-related snacks.
 Passengers on kuluacom can buy tickets on flights between Johannesburg and Nairobi, according to a Kenya Airways statement distributed to reporters.
Grupo BTG Pactual SA and 13 banksmanaging Oi (OIBR4) SA’s stock offering, part of a capital increase ofas much as 242 billion reais ($106 billion), will no longercommit to buying the shares should investor demand fall short.
 The change in terms, published today, followed a requestfrom the Brazilian securities regulator to clarify whether theunderwriters were fully committed to buying all shares or notUnder the original terms, the banks said they offered firmguarantees to the deal while setting minimum investor demandconditions for that to happen.
 State-run OAO Transneft will buy out the company’s oil and oil-products terminals for up to $1 billion, while privately owned Summa Group will get control over Novorossiysk seaport, which will only keep non-oil terminals, Vedomosti said.
 Positively Resolved Though the insurance meant that investors were likely to receive full value regardless of the recovery rate, it boosts confidence in buying bonds from other Michigan cities, including those that could also seek bankruptcy protection, according to a report this week from Municipal Market Advisors.
 The S&P 500 is holding up, but investors will need more of a signal to start buying into the market” Facebook, Apple Facebook rose 29 percent at 4:46 pm.
 The world’s largest company by market value also boosted its buyback to $90 billion and raised its dividend.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- Forbes Media LLC’s effort to find a buyer is running into trouble, with one potential bidder officially out of the running and two others no longer in active talks, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Those buyers decided that Forbes was asking too high a price, both people said.
 Axel Springer, Spice and Fosun were the only bidders known to be interested in buying Forbes, the people familiar with the situation said.
 His potential influence over the company scared away potential buyers that wanted to run the entity their way, the person said.
 If no outside buyer is chosen, Forbes may attempt a management buyout of the company, two of the people said.
 The family got a $400 million buyout offer from fashion publisher Conde Nast in 2004, which it turned down because it wasn’t high enough, according to Stewart Pinkerton’s 2011 book “The Fall of the House of Forbes” Bloomberg News, which publishes its own ranking of the world’s billionaires, competes with Forbes.
 The Rwanda Energy, Water & Sanitation Authority has agreed to buy electricity under a 25-year contract from the power plant, which will increase the country’s total generating capacity by at least 8 percent, according to the statement.
 said it’s interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca Plc, Britain’s second-biggest drugmaker.
 Draghi Remarks The euro gained against the dollar and the yen as Draghi said at the gathering attended by lawmakers from the parties that form Germany’s coalition government that the central bank does stand ready to embark on QE, or asset-buying, if needed, the official told reporters.
 Once a major buyer of Rosneft’s crude production, Gunvor no longer buys oil from Rosneft tenders, Gunvor’s CEO Tornqvist said in an interview March 22.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper, who has promoted Canadian oil and natural gas resources to Asian buyers, has until June to make a decision on whether to allow the pipeline to go ahead.
 Lenovo is working to get approval to buy Motorola Mobility from Google Inc.
 The company also agreed to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion to add corporate customers.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 with a buy rating on the stock, said in an e-mail.
 “Barclays is somewhat behind the curve in creating a unit for businesses it’s winding down,” Joseph Dickerson, an analyst at Jefferies International with a buy rating on Barclays, said by telephone.
 Separately, Novartis AG said today it agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion, form a consumer-health venture with Glaxo and sell its animal-health operation to Eli Lilly & Co.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s $444 billion bid to buy Botox maker Allergan Inc.
 Pearson, who became CEO in 2008, has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 35 companies as part of Valeant’s goal to join the ranks of the world’s five largest drugmakers.
 Zions is among banks that have been tying pay to results of the Fed’s tests, which help determine whether a lender can increase dividends and stock buybacks.
 to buy the US.
 He rates the shares the equivalent of a buy.
 Chinese buyers spent more than $11 billion on US.
 Zillow is seeking to expand usage on mobile devices for StreetEasycom, its New York City listings site, as more apartment hunters and homebuyers shop while on the go, Chief Executive Officer Spencer Rascoff said in an interview last week.
 Fed policy makers decided to trim buying further at their March 19 meeting, sticking to their plan for a gradual withdrawal from the program, designed to cap long-term borrowing costs and spur growth.
 “They’re a leader in a niche market, and their top-line revenue is growing and they have good gross margins and they’re profitable - those are the things that’ll catch the IPO buyers’ eyes” Revenue at Tarena, which provides job-oriented education, jumped 63 percent to $928 million in 2013, according to the company’s filing.
 The key challenge is finding assets to buy” Claritin, Coppertone Merck has identified its veterinary unit as one that isn’t big enough on its own, meaning it needs either to sell it or bulk it up.
 BofA’s Countrywide unit last year settled a class-action, or group, lawsuit by investors who said the lender duped them into buying $500 million worth of the securities.
 In a separate $85 billion settlement, the Charlotte, North Carolina-based bank resolved investor claims it failed to buy back delinquent mortgages packaged in the securities.
 will buy out Piramal Enterprises Ltd’s stake in its India mobile-phone unit for 89 billion rupees ($15 billion), giving it full control of its biggest market by customers.
 Pfizer proposed buying AstraZeneca for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion), while General Electric Co’s bid for France’s Alstom SA gained steam.
 dropped 63 percent, the most since 2012, after announcing it will suspend planned buybacks and a dividend increase because of an error in the lender’s capital planning.
 the company also raised its forecast as sales gained in North America and halted its dividend to buy back more stock.
 Investors have been buying lower-rated munis for their higher relative yields as interest rates on local debt remain close to the lowest since June.
 Arabtec soared to 871 dirhams after it announced plans to buy a European company and said it may tap the bond market to pay for the deal.
 said it’s interested in a deal to buy AstraZeneca Plc, Britain’s second-biggest drugmaker, while the US’s General Electric Co.
 It’s a selective buying opportunity” Some 37 companies on the S&P 500 were scheduled to report earnings today.
 At the conclusion, they will probably announce a fourth consecutive reduction to their monthly bond-buying program designed to stoke the economy, according to economists polled by Bloomberg.
 “A lot of these institutional buyers need to be a part of these big deals because they need to mimic the indexes and they need to play in the new name,” Jody Lurie, a Philadelphia-based corporate credit analyst at Janney Montgomery Scott LLC, said in a telephone interview on April 25.
 “There’s a lot of factors that forced their hands into such a bond offering, and those factors are still there” The iPhone maker is planning to offer notes to help fund a $30 billion increase to its stock buyback plan after the shares rose 32 percent since the previous bond issue, compared with losses of as much as 65 percent on the debt.
 ‘Investors’ Minds’ The plunge in longer-maturity Apple bonds may have hurt buyer psychology even though the losses resulted more from rising Treasury yields, according to Lon Erickson, a money manager at Thornburg Investment Management Inc, which didn’t purchase debt in last year’s sale.
 Lim is one of South Korea’s jicgoojok -- literally, tribe of direct buyers -- challenging local retailers who have long used their protected status to charge prices as much as nine times higher than overseas Web stores.
 Savings offered by direct buying often more than make up for import duties, shipping fees and waiting times.
 Han, 34, buys from Gap’s US.
 “I don’t mind the delivery time” Gap, Chloe Data show that the direct-buying trend is expanding in Korea.
 By contrast, companies catering to Korea’s direct-buyers are seeing growth, including firms that offer US.
 For shoppers like Han, the attraction of direct-buying is unlikely to wane.
 The referendum poses a challenge for Switzerland’s government, as quotas on European Union citizens may jeopardize trade accords with the bloc, the biggest buyer of Nestle’s Swiss-made products.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers -- more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed -- according to a study that consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 and Netgear Inc, early last month initiated coverage of Harman with the equivalent of a buy rating, data compiled by Bloomberg shows.
 She said in March the central bank may start to increase borrowing costs “around six months” after concluding its asset-buying stimulus program.
 Fed policy makers are unwinding the bond-buying program they have used to support the economy, while keeping their target for overnight lending between banks in a range of zero to 025 percent since 2008.
 Considerable Time At its March meeting, the Federal Open Market Committee said rates would remain low for a “considerable time” after it ends its bond-buying program.
 Data yesterday showed confidence among homebuilders rose less than forecast in April, as sales and prospective buyer traffic stagnated.
 generic-drug maker, was rejected in a second bid to buy Meda AB, the Swedish producer of the Dymista allergy medicine.
 Mylan’s attempt to buy Meda comes as the generic drug industry is undergoing a wave of consolidation, with the US.
 pharmaceutical maker and competitors buying up smaller companies as well as expanding into brand-name and injectable medicines.
 Actavis Plc, a Dublin-based drugmaker with operations in New Jersey, agreed in February to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Valeant teamed up on April 22 with Bill Ackman, the billionaire hedge fund manager, in a $457 billion bid to buy Allergan Inc, the maker of the Botox cosmetic treatment.
 Money spent on stockpiling “has been thrown down the drain” Policy makers need better information to make decisions about buying medicines, and they can’t depend on manufacturers for unbiased data, said Fiona Godlee, editor-in-chief of the BMJ, at the briefing.
 The Fed is forecast by economists to scale back monthly bond buying after its two-day meeting, amid signs the US.
 It’s a selective buying opportunity” Twitter Inc.
 Fed Survey The Fed will probably cut stimulatory bond buying to $45 billion at the two-day meeting that started today, according to the median of 43 economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Valeant proposed to buy it for about $48 billion in the Canadian company’s plan to become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The maker of artificial joints agreed to buy rival orthopedic-device maker Biomet Inc.
 Hickey, who has a buy rating on the shares, said some investors expect the WWE service to amass 3 million subscribers by the end of 2015.
 While Marois has worked hard to downplay the chances of another vote, saying she wouldn’t call a referendum as long as Quebeckers didn’t want one, Couillard told voters not to buy it.
 The Liberal website also promises support for small- and medium-sized businesses and the province’s forestry sector, and says a Liberal government would protect company head offices in Montreal by allowing a provincial fund to buy as much as 10 percent of companies facing hostile takeover bids.
 The houses are targeted at first-time buyers with prices as low as $120,000.
 First-time homebuyers represented 42 percent of closings by the builder’s mortgage company, compared with 50 percent a year ago.
 Entry Level “We view the move positively if it enables DHI to capture some lower-qualified buyers struggling with current affordability,” Adam Rudiger, an analyst with Wells Fargo & Co, said in a note today.
April 16 (Bloomberg) -- Four of the nation’s largest banks, led by JPMorgan Chase & Co, are driving a surge in borrowing from the Federal Home Loan Bank system as they raise funds to buy assets that meet new liquidity requirements.
 led declines after agreeing to buy its parent’s financial assets.
 The steelmaker and property developer agreed to pay 2269 billion yuan ($36 billion) to buy Chinese banking and brokerage assets from its state-owned parent.
 The most serious were Mercuria, New York-based buyout firm Blackstone Group LP and Macquarie Group Ltd, an Australian bank.
 The buyout firm had a significant banking relationship with JPMorgan through its history of acquisitions.
 Its limited presence in commodities and energy trading also made it the most likely candidate to buy JPMorgan’s business in its entirety and bring Masters and her team on board to run it, the people said.
 Private-equity firms buy companies using a combination of investor capital and debt, with the goal of selling them or taking them public for a profit.
 report showed contracts to buy previously owned houses increased 34 percent in March, more than economists had predicted.
 Etihad Airways PJSC, Air Berlin’s largest shareholder, will buy 300 million euros of convertible bonds issued by the carrier to increase its capital.
 is in talks to buy a 10 percent stake in the maker of home soda machines.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- Swisscom AG offered to buy stakes in two directory businesses it jointly owns with PubliGroupe SA for 230 million Swiss francs ($261 million), rivaling Tamedia AG’s bid for the advertising company.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc.
 Revenue from selling electricity lets them buy new plants as they go into production, and those purchases give the developers capital to build projects.
 was providing $250 million in initial capital for the unit to buy projects from SunEdison and other companies.
 That helps them buy new plants from developers at favorable terms, said Swami Venkataraman, a vice president at Moody’s.
 Apple Inc’s quarterly results this week showed the iPhone maker reduced its cash holdings for the first time since 2006, cranked up a share buyback program by $30 billion and raised its dividend.
 “Corporations are flush with cash and are beginning to pick up M&A activity as well as share buybacks and dividend increases,” said Eric Teal, who helps oversee $35 billion as chief investment officer of First Citizens BancShares Inc.
 The next priority is on investments to add value to the company and, finally, buybacks.
 “That cash permits them to do buybacks, dividends, M&A, cap expenditures, hiring, new plants, whatever they want.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- GIC Pte, Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund, is opening an office in Sao Paulo after buying stakes in some Brazilian companies in a show of confidence in Latin American economic growth.
 Yesterday’s announcement that Pfizer is seeking to buy AstraZeneca Plc in a new $100 billion megamerger is putting the industry on notice that a company that was once the world’s biggest drugmaker is seeking to quickly reclaim its title.
 From 1999 to 2009, Pfizer completed three deals worth a total of $216 billion, buying Warner Lambert Co, Pharmacia Corp.
 Atlas agreed to buy BancABC, which offers financial services in Botswana, Mozambique, Tanzania, Zambia and Zimbabwe, for as much as $265 million and will use the company as a springboard for further acquisitions.
 Atlas Mara, which raised $325 million in an initial public offering in December, plans to buy another bank with a “multi-country platform,” high-quality management and good earnings at a reasonable valuation, Diamond said.
 Lilly is expanding in veterinary medicine, and on April 22 agreed to buy Novartis AG’s animal unit for $54 billion.
 Key Safety’s owner, New York-based buyout firm Crestview Partners LP, hired Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 and UBS AG to look for a buyer late last year, said the people.
 for $38 billion last year in the biggest buyout of a Chinese company.
 Crestview, which manages about $4 billion in assets, is a middle-market buyout firm focusing on media, financial services, energy and health care, according to its website.
 agreed to buy Indian rival Andhra Pradesh Paper Mills Ltd.
 Thapar is also seeking buyers for his stake in electrical equipment maker Crompton Greaves Ltd, people familiar with the matter said in March.
 The share sale may give Fosun, which has been on a buying spree, further funds for acquisitions.
 In January, the company agreed to buy 80 percent of the insurance unit of Portugal’s Caixa Geral de Depositos SA for 1 billion euros ($139 billion).
 In October, the conglomerate said it would buy New York’s 1 Chase Manhattan Plaza office building for $725 million.
 Thornton’s pay includes $5 million in cash to be used to buy Barrick stock.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- Merrion Capital Group Head of Private Clients Shane Nolan is preparing a management-led buyout of the Dublin-based securities firm, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The Sunday Independent reported on March 2 that the executives, as well New York-based securities firm Cantor Fitzgerald LP, were contenders to buy Merrion, put up for sale for about 10 million euros ($138 million).
 merchant bank Barings, hired Park Hill Group LLC to find buyers for investors’ stakes in a 368 million-euro ($506 million) pool the firm raised in 2000, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 Hitachi is leading the race to buy the stake controlled by the founding family of Crompton Greaves, the Economic Times reported citing two people familiar with the development.
 Australand is where it is now because of Stockland’s stake buy last month” Stockland expects to save A$15 million in the first year of completing the transaction, it said in today’s statement.
 Gerry Jordan, president of Hellman Jordan Management Co, said the recall crisis was an opportunity to buy.
 proposed buying it in what would be the industry’s biggest-ever takeover.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi has pledged to backstop the region by buying the bonds of distressed nations if they request aid.
 is in talks to buy a 10 percent stake in the maker of home soda machines.
 agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Keurig Green Mountain Inc, which is developing a make-your-own, single-serve product similar to SodaStream’s, on Feb.
 Growth in China, the biggest iron ore buyer, slowed to 74 percent in the first three month of the year, the weakest pace in six quarters and missing the 75 percent annual growth target after the government reined in a credit boom and toughened regulation to combat pollution.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- The European Union paused its review of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s bid to buy Telefonica SA’s O2 unit in Ireland as the regulator seeks revisions to concessions the company made to win approval for the tie-up.
 The Singaporean lender already agreed to buy shares amounting to a 25 percent stake in Wing Hang from Aberdeen, OCBC said yesterday.
 Hong Kong lenders are luring overseas buyers seeking to tap the Chinese market as the yuan becomes more widely used for finance.
 Citigroup failed to find a buyer for 16 Nevada branches last year, people familiar with the matter said.
 Yields on the debt as measured by a Bank of America Merrill Lynch index dropped to 602 percent, about the same rate buyers were paid to own 10-year Treasuries during the past three decades.
 “It’s trading at dangerous levels” DoubleLine Capital LP’s Jeffrey Gundlach trimmed allocations to the debt earlier this year, saying last month that “if they start to suffer losses, you really wonder who’s going to buy them” As investors have learned over the past five years, it hasn’t paid to fight Federal Reserve stimulus, which is still supporting values that by any historical measure seem expensive.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries were poised for the best month since January as the Federal Reserve started a two-day meeting, with economists forecasting policy makers will scale back their monthly debt-buying program.
 who recommends buying the shares, said by phone.
 Etisalat agreed in November to buy Vivendi’s 53 percent stake in Maroc Telecom, Morocco’s biggest wireless carrier, for about 42 billion euros.
 is offering buyouts in Pittsburgh, the city it has called home for more than a century, as its new owners overhaul the company’s culture and press for cost savings.
 The food company was founded in Sharpsburg, a suburb of Pittsburgh, in 1869 and moved to the city in 1890, according to the Associated Press, which reported the buyout offers earlier today.
 Hays Advisory LLC and Biondo Investment Advisors LLC were among buyers of the ETF, according to regulatory filings in March.
 His firm follows a quantitative strategy, under which it buys markets gaining momentum as long as they appear cheaply valued.
 The bank will focus on preparing for the 2015 stress test rather than requesting additional buybacks or dividend increases this year, Corbat said today on a conference call with analysts.
 People buy variable annuities as a way to ensure they will have a source of income after they retire.
 Lufthansa has the option of buying the remaining 55 percent in Brussels by 2017, Menne said.
 “Only the defendant had an obligation to know what they contained and to warn the buyer of the danger of rotten meat,” Schwartz said, comparing the investment products to sausage with meat that’s gone bad.
 The Fed is in the process of reducing its third round of quantitative easing, in which it now buys $55 billion of bonds a month, down from $85 billion last year, to support the economy.
 Crop Tour More than 75 traders, farmers, grain buyers, flour millers and bakers, including representatives from Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 “If we don’t get widespread, heavy rain in the next two weeks, it will be a disaster,” said Kahle, who has been buying wheat for 30 years in Kansas.
 “Investors are taking a pause in buying Japanese stocks and selling the yen” The Topix has dropped 55 percent since capping a nine-day rally on April 3 for the longest streak of gains since 2011.
 owner of single-tenant buildings, isn’t in discussions to buy NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, according to statements from both companies today.
 The Swiss drugmaker agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug business for as much as $16 billion, sell most of its vaccines business to Glaxo for as much as $71 billion and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Loeb contends Sotheby’s decision to trigger the pill if activist investors buy more than 10 percent of its shares, while allowing passive investors to buy as much as 20 percent, leaves the measure open to attack.
 Nomura will spend as much as 70 billion yen to buy back shares, it said.
 “Investors still unsure of an economic recovery are parking money in money-market funds and cash-management accounts,” which buy short-term bonds, Seoul-based Moon said.
 capital’s status as a magnet for wealthy foreign home buyers is helping to drive prices in many areas beyond the reach of most Londoners.
 Foreign-born buyers made 69 percent of central London new-home purchases in the two years through June, with 28 percent living outside the UK, broker Knight Frank LLP said in October.
 Speculation “does nothing for London whatsoever other than push prices up even further” More Competition Developers have refocused their sales efforts on local buyers in response to criticism of their efforts to market some homes exclusively abroad.
 When the project’s Malaysian owners sold the first 866 homes in just three days in January, more than half went to foreign buyers.
 Residents Preferred Rob Tincknell, chief executive officer of the Battersea Power Station Development Co, said in an interview that the company’s staff called all 13,000 people who registered to buy the project’s 3,500 homes and intends to give preference to those who said they intend to live in the homes they buy.
 We have buyers” Hutchison’s development, known as Convoys Wharf, is in a neighborhood founded by King Henry VIII as a dockyard in 1514.
 Safe Investment Foreign investment in London property took off after the financial crisis in 2008 as a weaker pound, economic instability from Europe to Asia and record-low returns on fixed-income investments prompted wealthy buyers to search for assets that would hold their value.
 Spending by non-British investors spread from luxury properties in neighborhoods such as Chelsea and Knightsbridge to new houses and apartments as builders used advance sales, many to buyers from Asia, to finance projects amid tight lending for development.
 A main reason for the local backlash: two-thirds of foreign buyers are investors rather than owner-occupiers, broker Savills Plc said in November.
 homebuilders, including Barratt Developments Plc, Taylor Wimpey Plc and Telford Homes Plc, agreed to stop giving overseas residents the first shot at buying London homes sold before they’re built.
 “Even with that, we save about 1,000 pounds a month and every time we reach what we think is a milestone, we look at the prices in London and realize we just can’t get close to buying anything” No Help Programs such as Help to Buy “just fuel the fire by pushing prices up further,” Haycroft said.
 He also called foreign investment a “long-standing and necessary part of any global city’s housing market” It’s too early to tell whether changes in marketing will have a substantial effect on the proportion of foreign buyers in the capital.
 buyers accounted for almost half of sales in the boroughs of Kensington & Chelsea and Westminster in 2013, up from 43 percent in 2012 and 37 percent the year before, as high prices reduced demand and an improving global economy provided more safe investments for foreign investors to choose from, broker Hamptons International Ltd.
 government has taken steps to increase the tax burden for luxury homes and properties owned by foreign buyers through companies.
 There are no restrictions on the type of property a foreign investor can buy in the UK.
 In Australia, by contrast, non-residents are unable to buy existing homes and can only invest in property that adds to the housing stock.
 Introducing rent controls similar to Berlin’s and creating more council tax bands would “scare overseas buyers because they won’t get these huge profits” Coyne, the protester at City Hall, expressed her exasperation with politicians as they prepared to approve apartments that she says local people earning any less than 40,000 pounds a year would be unable to afford.
 It’s bad for Berkshire” Coca-Cola said stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 The swaps pay the buyer face value if the referenced borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 John Malone, who controls Charter’s largest investor Liberty Media, has said he wants the cable company to be a “horizontal acquisition machine,” buying up many cable assets to increase the scale of the operator.
 Charter had made its own offer to buy the company for $37 billion in cash and stock and had held talks with Comcast about dividing Time Warner Cable up as part of that bid.
 and saddled buyers with losses.
 Mahony said it’s unlikely Glaxo would buy AstraZeneca and combine the country’s two biggest drugmakers because both companies have significant respiratory divisions, which may raise antitrust concerns.
 It’s unclear whether Pfizer’s approach, which comes after Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer business for as much as $16 billion last week, is a harbinger of things to come, according to Viehbacher.
 Botox-maker Allergan has contacted companies including Sanofi to smoke out potential buyers, people with knowledge of the matter said today, as it explores options after getting an unsolicited $457 billion bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Price Range The 1,600 yen price compares with the 1,400 yen a share Cerberus paid to buy stock from shareholders last year when it boosted its stake to 355 percent.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG may learn today whether it will get a chance to overturn a California court ruling that exposes it to wrongful-eviction claims the bank says will depress prices in foreclosure sales and spur lawsuits against innocent homebuyers.
 Deutsche Bank, along with bankers’ groups in California and Nevada, told the California Supreme Court the ruling may jeopardize the economic recovery as lenders and investors weigh the risks of buying properties that house unwanted tenants, are subject to leases, or are vulnerable to lawsuits brought by renters evicted by paid middlemen.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Dell Inc, the computer maker whose founder, Michael Dell, prevailed last year in a contested management-led buyout, is offering faster systems for SAP AG’s Hana database product to attract business clients.
 Dell went private in a $249 billion leveraged buyout completed last October, and is concentrating on gaining market share in personal computers while selling servers, storage and networking equipment to corporate customers.
 Michael Dell undertook the buyout to escape market scrutiny while fixing the company’s low-margin PC business.
 Decision-making has accelerated since the buyout, with Michael Dell personally rendering decisions on product and spending plans within hours, Norrod said.
 “We should be in a position after 2015 to grow the fleet if the economics and the business are right” Showing a higher return on invested capital is part of Southwest’s push to broaden its appeal to investors, along with stock buybacks and the longest-running dividend among major airlines.
 Investors rushed to buy the funds, helping drive up State Street Corp, Wells Fargo & Co.
 “The Fed may not start raising rates until the second half of 2015 or perhaps later” In her first press conference as head of the central bank, Yellen said March 19 that borrowing costs could start to rise six months after the Fed stops buying bonds.
 As investors inject money, industry-specific ETFs buy equities, contributing to price moves.
 Busiest Dealmaker Valeant, the drug industry’s busiest dealmaker since 2010, last week offered to buy Allergan for $457 billion in stock and cash, with support from Allergan’s largest shareholder, Pershing Square Capital Management LP, the fund run by Ackman.
 said yesterday it proposed buying AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($988 billion) and is still interested in a deal after AstraZeneca rebuffed the bid.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA jumped after announcing a plan to buy back as many as 679 million shares through May 23.
 The SEC is examining to what extent smaller buyers are disadvantaged, and whether the behavior constitutes market manipulation, according to two people with direct knowledge of the matter who asked not to be identified because the probe hasn’t been made public.
 One day last month, dealers sold $15,000 of steel company ArcelorMittal SA’s bonds maturing in 2041 for 35 cents on the dollar more than they paid to buy $25,000 of the same securities an hour later.
 The price instantly jumped, handing those buyers about $25 billion in gains just one day after issuance.
 Deutsche Bank’s earnings from buying and selling fixed income, currencies and commodities for clients have come under further pressure as it follows European competitors in shrinking its balance sheet to meet stricter regulatory requirements for capital levels.
 “Deutsche Bank had a pretty slow start to the year,” Stefan Bongardt, an analyst with Independent Research GmbH who recommends investors buy the shares, said by phone from Frankfurt.
 The committee pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 agreed to buy it and Twitter Inc.
 “Sure, absolutely it is” “A few years ago, people would buy anything that has the word China in it.
 Facebook CEO Mark Zuckerberg clinched his deal to buy WhatsApp, the mobile messaging service, for $19 billion in February after taking hour-long walks around Silicon Valley with WhatsApp co-founder Jan Koum.
 “The recovery is there and we see good signs on salary and consumption increases” The Topix jumped 51 percent in 2013, its best year since 1999, as the Bank of Japan embarked on a bond-buying program.
 Even if sanctions aren’t levied directly against Rosneft, clients’ hesitation to do business with the Moscow-based company may harm the value of the unit it’s buying.
 Last month, AOL introduced a system that helps companies automate the buying and selling online ads.
 The company also said it would reduce its stock buybacks in the year through March 2015 to $17 billion from $21 billion in the previous 12 months.
 “It’s almost scary that the money comes in as the return profile is coming down” Valeant, Microsoft Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Dallas-based Energy Future Holdings, which was taken private in the largest-ever leveraged buyout in 2007, filed for bankruptcy protection earlier today.
 Goldman Sachs Asset Management, which oversees $30 billion in such products, agreed this week to buy Westpeak Global Advisors LLC, without disclosing terms.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Charlotte, North Carolina’s largest city, plans to draw bond buyers about two weeks after federal prosecutors charged its mayor with soliciting bribes.
 In July, Mayor Boris Johnson said the government could buy Heathrow, Europe’s busiest hub, for 15 billion pounds and use the 1,220-hectare (3,000 acre) site to build 100,000 homes, creating an entirely new borough that would help ease a national housing shortage.
 EPA regulations measure fleet averages based on what consumers actually buy, not what automakers produce, he said.
 “We might consider a share buyback if we would face problems meeting our return on equity targets because of too much capital,” Wallin said.
 “Naturally, our major shareholder Talanx prefers dividend payments to a share buyback” Talanx AG, Germany’s third-biggest insurer, owns 502 percent of the Hanover, Germany-based reinsurer.
 Drugstore chain Raia Drogasil SA may move after Banco Itau BBA SA withdrew a buy recommendation for the stock.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 That followed her March 19 comments, when she said the Fed’s bond-buying program could end later this year and benchmark interest rates may be raised about six months after that.
 Reverse Mode Ukraine, which depends on Russian gas for about half of its domestic needs, is seeking to diversify by buying gas from Slovakia, Poland and Hungary using east-west pipelines in a so-called reverse mode.
 added 42 percent after proposing to buy AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion).
 dropped 63 percent after suspending its planned buybacks and dividend increase because of an error in its capital planning.
 Pfizer proposed buying the London-based company on Jan.
 The bank said it will suspend its planned buybacks and dividend increase because of an error in its capital planning.
 “Yet there is some buying in the market time to time” While the Micex entered a bear market on March 13 as the tension with Ukraine triggered the worst standoff between Russia and the US.
 CEO Tim Cook may give further details regarding Apple’s dividend and buyback plans amid pressure from Carl Icahn.
 utility owner, is buying 139 megawatts of solar capacity in California from Sharp Corp’s Recurrent Energy, more than quadrupling its solar operations.
 that target budget buyers.
 The 64-year-old farmer said mid-year rains will mean “worse losses” Prices that almost doubled this year to a 26-month high may surge 18 percent further by the end of December to $254 a pound, a Bloomberg survey of 19 analysts showed, boosting costs for buyers including Nestle SA.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- Emily Collie used to spend A$2,500 ($2,320) a year buying accessories from overseas websites to take advantage of prices as much as 40 percent lower than in her hometown of Melbourne.
 “What’s the point of buying something overseas?” Collie’s return to local retailers is just the transition the Reserve Bank of Australia is seeking as it signals the need for a lower currency to spur domestic demand.
 “Part of the logic behind a falling currency is it sends a signal to people to buy locally rather than offshore,” said Shane Oliver, head of investment strategy at AMP Ltd.
 ‘Cheap’ Stocks “I wouldn’t expect any serious buying in both Ukrainian and Russian markets before geopolitical tensions ease and the conflict is resolved,” Slava Breusov, an analyst at Alliance Bernstein LP in New York, said by phone yesterday.
 He recommends the stock as a buy while Mayes has a hold rating on the shares.
 The company repurchased 194 million shares for $25 billion during the period after authorizing a $10 billion buyback plan, the largest in its history, in December.
 is reducing stock buybacks after an $82 billion first-quarter splurge, putting more pressure on Chief Executive Officer Ginni Rometty to reignite sales growth or cut costs to hit her profit targets.
 IBM said last week it won’t sustain its rate of share repurchases in the first quarter, when buybacks more than tripled from a year earlier to the most since 2007.
 ‘Stunning’ Support Rometty’s first-quarter buyback bonanza was 41 percent higher than the $58 billion estimated by Barclays Plc.
 “Ultimately we believe it is not, but that the model is increasingly strained, and that IBM risks being tethered to its road map to the detriment to its longer-term financial health” Declining sales and rising buybacks have squeezed IBM’s free cash flow, which fell 65 percent from a year earlier to $600 million last quarter.
 During the first quarter, IBM issued $45 billion of new bonds, clearly used to fund buybacks, Black said.
 Led by billionaire Chief Executive Officer Stephen Schwarzman, Blackstone has been the most successful of the large firms to expand beyond traditional leveraged buyouts, which can produce lumpy earnings, and into real estate, credit and hedge funds.
 “The beat was driven by a combination of both realized and unrealized performance fee strength across platforms,” said Daniel Fannon, a San Francisco-based analyst at Jefferies Group LLC, who rates the stock “buy” Blackstone will continue to grow its asset base with “consistently strong performance across all segments,” Fannon said.
 Blackstone, whose assets rose to an industry-record $272 billion as of March 31, is seen as a bellwether for publicly traded buyout firms given its size and reach across markets.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years of raising the money, overhaul and then sell them.
 That has him looking in the ballpark of 1,795 as a potential place for buyers to come in and stop the bleeding.
 Charter couldn’t acquire the new company immediately, though it will also be difficult for other companies to buy it without Charter’s blessing, one person said.
 Malone, who controls Charter’s largest investor Liberty Media, has said he wants the cable company to be a “horizontal acquisition machine,” buying up many cable assets to increase the scale of the operator.
 “If you want to sell something you don’t want to get 75 cents, you want to get what it’s worth” London Boost Earnings should reach about $60 million this year given some stabilization, the chairman said, with the carrier seeking to boost long-haul traffic by adding a second daily flight to London’s Heathrow airport from April 17 after buying a night slot from Cyprus Airways for 63 million euros ($9 million).
 agreed to buy it.
 “Household spending appears to be rising more quickly” Winding Down The committee pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 nuclear operator, agreed to buy Pepco in an all-cash deal for $68 billion.
 In what resembles one of the NBA multiplayer trades, Novartis will buy Glaxo’s cancer-drug operations and sell Glaxo its vaccines business -- except for flu drugs, which it will sell to someone else -- while creating a joint venture with Glaxo for consumer health and selling its animal-drugs business to Lilly.
 *** You’ll get another chance to see your money at work today in what has to be the best use of it -- buying a political office.
 They said they would like the government to get the two bidders to sign an employment pact rather than have the state pick a winner or buy a stake.
 10, the day before the company said it would buy back 8 percent of its stock from Nestle, reducing the Swiss foodmaker’s stake to 233 percent.
 Ergen has said he acted only for himself in buying the debt and made no “false representations” He characterized the lawsuit as an illicit ploy to help Falcone keep control of LightSquared in bankruptcy.
 Moelis may raise as much as $2435 million by selling 84 million shares for $26 to $29 each, assuming underwriters exercise an option to buy more stock, according to a filing today.
 “When we are thinking 20 years out, it doesn’t matter a whole lot” That’s because George believes that QVC’s template of what he calls “high integrity” product pitches can win in any market that has people with enough disposable income to buy everything from a $400 Vitamix blender to $25 sandals.
 French laws require a foreign company to buy a minority stake in a domestic company to broadcast over the air.
 “But 5–30 year maturities are at risk” Treasury two-year note yields surged the most since 2011 on March 19 after Yellen signaled that an interest-rate increase might come six months after the central bank concludes its bond-buying stimulus, which is forecast for the fall, and Fed officials increased projections for the benchmark interest rate.
 Fed Outlook The Fed in March ordered a $10 billion cut in its monthly bond-buying for a third straight meeting, lowering it to $55 billion.
 “Probabilities suggest that as the Fed completes its taper, the 5-30 year bonds that it has been buying will have to be sold a higher yields to entice the private sector back in,” Gross wrote in his investment commentary.
 The world’s biggest drugmaker, held informal, now-discontinued talks with AstraZeneca Plc about possibly buying the London-based maker of asthma and heart drugs, said two people familiar with the matter.
 Bulls including Abhay Laijawala, the head of research at Deutsche Equities India, point to a recovery in Asia’s third-biggest economy as another reason to buy stocks.
 “This would potentially give Chinese buyers a hedge on purchases” Li spent $22 billion buying the London Metal Exchange in December 2012, the most expensive bourse acquisition over $1 billion since at least 2000, according to data complied by Bloomberg.
 Oil Search, which agreed in February to buy part of the same discoveries for an initial $900 million, lodged a dispute last week with InterOil.
 Preempt Accord Oil Search’s deal to buy part of InterOil’s fields from minority partners gave the company the right to preempt Total’s initial agreement in December, according to a JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 In the revised accord, Total purchased an InterOil unit that held the 401 percent stake, rather than buying the stake itself.
 First-time buyers are stretching their finances to the point that the Bank of Israel warned against taking on too much risk.
 Rising prices and efforts by the government and central bank to cool the market failed to deter Israeli homebuyers taking advantage of the lowest borrowing rates since 2009.
 “There is a mentality in Israel that everybody needs to buy their own home and people get a lot of help from their families,” said Tzvi Shapiro, general manager of First Israel Mortgage brokerage in Jerusalem.
 The challenge for new buyers is particularly acute in Tel Aviv, where locals compete with cash-rich foreign investors, like they do in cities such as New York and London.
 As homebuyers pour in, a shortage of development land and a cumbersome planning process create a squeeze that is helping to stoke price increases in the city of 400,000 people.
 “There’s no more space to buy, everything has to be demolished and the only way to build is up” Low mortgage rates have fueled the surge in purchases.
 The Bank of Israel capped home loans to first-time buyers at 75 percent including mortgage insurance in 2012, when it was headed by Federal Reserve vice chairman nominee Stanley Fischer.
 Borrower Beware The change resulted in more homebuyers taking unsecured loans to cover their down payments, leading to the Bank of Israel’s warning this month about risky borrowing.
 A committee including Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu in March approved proposals to exempt first-time buyers from value-added tax and cap new home prices, steps that could attract even more people to the market.
 In Israel, it takes an average of 13 years from the initial planning stages to delivering the keys of a finished apartment to the buyer, said Jonathan Katz, a Jerusalem-based economist for HSBC Holdings Plc, citing government statistics.
 In Israel, the foreign buyers are mostly Jews from countries such as Russia, France and South Africa, attracted by their cultural ties to the country.
 Tel Aviv’s vibrant nightlife also attracts buyers and holidaymakers.
 “We have all these first-time homebuyers who are tying their money up for 20 to 30 years in mortgages they can barely afford,” said Alex Zabezhinsky, chief economist at Tel Aviv-based Meitav DS Investment House Ltd.
 cut its price estimate for the nation’s biggest lender to 142 rubles a share, while confirming its buy recommendation.
 “The United States is prepared to impose additional significant sanctions on Russia if it continues to escalate the situation in Ukraine” Russia’s Finance Ministry will resume purchases of foreign currency on April 14, buying an equivalent of 35 billion rubles ($98 million) a day until it reaches 174 billion rubles for its sovereign-wealth fund, it said yesterday.
 “All of these alternative are potentially higher-returning assets in a world of 2% policy rates where cash is a poor performing asset, but likewise a cheap liability that can be borrowed to an investor’s advantage” The Federal Open Market Committee said today in a statement following a meeting in Washington that it will pare monthly bond buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 The committee pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since it was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout put together by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital at the peak of the last takeover boom in 2008.
April 21 (Bloomberg) -- Hillshire Brands Co, the maker of Jimmy Dean sausages and Ball Park hot dogs, agreed to buy Van’s Natural Foods from private-equity firm Catterton Partners for about $165 million to add healthy breakfast foods.
 Texas lawyer Hilliard said he wants the automaker to “disgorge” to all customers the full amount of their original purchase price so they can buy new cars.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- Brasil Pharma SA surged the most since 2011 as controlling shareholder Grupo BTG Pactual pledged to make up the difference if other investors fail to buy all the stock in a planned 400 million-real ($182 million) sale.
 BTG Pactual agreed to buy all remaining shares if demand for the securities falls short of the offering’s target, according to the filing.
 this month agreed to buy Michael Foods Inc.
 General Mills says it has enough pea protein to meet its needs -- being among the first big buyers helped -- though that has left others in the lurch.
 Chinese suppliers are also filling the gap, but North American food companies are reluctant to buy from them due to food safety concerns, according to Hoogenkamp.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said last month the central bank may start to increase interest rates “around six months” after ending its asset-buying program.
 For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA may be active after agreeing to buy Universidade Sao Judas Tadeu for 320 million reais.
 If a transaction is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc, making it the second-biggest acquisition announced this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “This news signifies the difficulty that Reckitt is having in finding a trade buyer,” Exane BNP Paribas analyst Eamonn Ferry said in an e-mail.
 The company is the frontrunner to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drugs business, people with knowledge of the matter have said, which would push its health division to more than one-third of sales from about 30 percent.
 In fact, it provided them with a prime buying opportunity.
 The selloff opened the door for new money by giving investors a chance to buy pricey biotechnology shares at a discount, according to BMO Capital Markets Corp’s Max Breier.
 “They’re trying to play a continuation of what’s a longer-term bullish trend” Stocks Recover The Nasdaq Biotechnology Index is rebounding from losses last week as traders buy up shares that were hit the hardest in the selloff.
 “People are wary of holding the stock, so they are buying calls to play the high-beta turnaround,” Igor Biselman, an equity-derivatives trader at Cowen & Co.
 In addition to the companies that will access the data, the department also must approve the companies that can buy the services from the providers.
 The battery unit could be attractive to private equity firms looking to do a leveraged buyout because “it’s not a bad cash business,” he said.
 The buyout firm has an option to exit the digital classifieds business via an IPO in 2015.
 Seeking Buyers BHP may be aiming to flush out buyers by raising the prospect of a spinoff, said Sean Fenton, who helps manage A$16 billion at Tribeca Investment Partners Pty in Sydney.
 Glencore, based in Baar, Switzerland, this week agreed to buy Caracal Energy Inc.
 A spinoff “raises a number of questions,” including why BHP couldn’t find other buyers for the assets, Paul Gait, a London-based analyst at Bernstein, wrote in an April 10 report.
 Monsanto could explore the sale of its Agricultural Productivity segment, which makes Roundup herbicide, said Zekauskas, who raised his rating on the stock to buy from hold.
 Louis-based company could also take on $11 billion in debt to buy back shares, he said.
 “There will be technology partnerships, ranging from saying that we are buying a technology in from a partner, all the way through to M&A activity” Siemens currently offers products that optimize manufacturing by remote monitoring, identifying processes inefficiencies and preempting failures by trend evaluation.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said in March that interest rates may rise around six months after the central bank ends its bond buying.
 For Jacques Porta at Ofi Gestion Privee in Paris, the selloff is a chance to buy stocks at a discount.
 Unjustified Losses “There’s a good opportunity to begin to buy,” Porta, who helps oversee $780 million at Ofi Gestion in Paris, said on April 11.
 It really comes down to when our quality team is prepared to release, and they’re on their own schedule and we can’t touch it” The revamped 200 is Chrysler’s bid to win buyers in one of the largest segments in the US, a market dominated by the Toyota Camry, Honda Accord and Nissan Altima.
 “If the answer to that is it’s going to have even a 10 percent probability of influencing cash flow, I think most buyout firms of this quality would think twice before they go forward,” he said.
 with a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note.
 Mercedes-Benz, the third-largest maker of premium cars, said April 4 that demand in March climbed 13 percent as new compact models and the top-of-the-line S-Class sedan attracted buyers.
 CarMax also said it plans to buy back $1 billion in stock after reporting its biggest annual jump in comparable-store sales in more than a decade.
 “This trade is not without risk,” Mark Nash, a London-based money manager at Invesco, which oversees $787 billion including $177 billion of fixed-income assets, said in a telephone interview on April 17 after buying the new government notes.
 The fundamentals in Greece are not terribly rosy, but there’s no doubt they are doing a lot better” Greylock, BlackRock Joining Invesco among the buyers of the new five-year securities were New York-based Greylock Capital Management LLC, which oversees $850 million, and Legal & General Investment Management, with the equivalent of $758 billion.
 “It is better to buy Greece than buy Spain, as they carry about the same story” Greek government securities returned 30 percent this year through April 22, more than double the next-best performance among the 34 sovereign markets tracked by the Bloomberg World Bond Indexes, extending their world-beating returns into a third year.
 “We buy to hold for some time and my biggest fear was that there would be a lot of hot money coming into this deal, which will leave after the issue” Greece lost a quarter of its economic output during a six-year recession, unemployment is just shy of 27 percent and consumer prices fell 15 percent in March from a year ago.
 We will shy away from buying Greek bonds at this stage” Samaras Concerns These were among the concerns Samaras faced at the investor meeting in New York in September.
 His hedge fund was among those that made money by buying Greek bonds in 2012 on speculation that European officials would prevent the euro-area debt crisis from spreading.
 Still Buying The investor rush for the sovereign bonds sold this month left some, including Sturgeon Capital, unable to buy the notes.
 So, when the coffee comes to chase down those last swigs of wine, the conviviality at the table a dims a bit and the uncomfortable conversation is about to start, just accept that your dad’s not going to buy your argument.
 “It’s painful while you’re in it, but when you’re coming out of it it’s a buying opportunity.
 In the past year, investors have appeared to be selling gold when the economic data comes in better-than-estimated and buying when it misses.
 In other words, the reasons to buy or sell gold today may not be the same reasons to buy or sell it tomorrow.
 Anzengruber confirmed reports that the company is seeking to buy Kelag Kaerntner Elektrizitaet’s 10 percent stake in Verbund’s hydropower unit, which would boost ownership to 90 percent.
 “We’re gladly ready to buy that 10 percent,” Anzengruber said.
 Selling Point Technology to keep drivers connected in their vehicles is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 “The market actually over-reacted, because the issue was known to the market since 2009,” said Joseph Wong, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Nomura International Hong Kong Ltd, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 The price has slumped 35 percent since Sesa agreed to buy the mines for $90 million from Elenilto Minerals & Mining LLC in August 2011.
 Discover “is decidedly the ‘no-brainer’ to own in the card space,” Daniel Furtado, an analyst at Jefferies Group LLC, said in an April 8 note with a buy rating on the lender’s stock.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
 Americans are buying more chicken as a cheaper alternative just as fast-food restaurants including Yum! Brands Inc.
 Yamana’s C$147 billion offer for 50 percent of Osisko’s assets probably spells the demise of Goldcorp’s plan to buy the whole company, said Adam Graf, a New York-based analyst at Cowen & Co.
 Jefferies said the agreement also means RBS doesn’t need to prioritize buying back the state’s Class B shares, which the UK.
 RBS can use the extra capital to repurchase common stock without needing to buy back the Class B shares at 650 pence apiece, more than twice their current value, Jefferies said.
 Head Offices The Liberal website promises support for small- and medium-sized businesses and the province’s forestry sector, and says a Liberal government would protect company head offices in Montreal by allowing a provincial fund to buy as much as 10 percent of companies facing hostile takeover bids.
 Etihad will buy bonds convertible into stock which will have no maturity and count toward equity, according to a statement today, while Air Berlin will sell at least another 150 million euros in notes, providing 450 million euros in cash.
 Investors may be reacting to the news about the progress of the company’s drugs, including new treatments for lung and ovarian cancer, that might make it a more appealing buyout candidate, said Fabian Wenner of Kepler Cheuvreux in Zurich.
 AstraZeneca won’t comment on the buyout speculation, Soriot said on a conference call with reporters.
 Discover “is decidedly the ‘no-brainer’ to own in the card space,” Daniel Furtado, an analyst at Jefferies Group LLC, said in an April 8 note with a buy rating on the lender’s stock.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Sanlam Emerging Markets, a unit of South African insurance company Sanlam Ltd, said it’s buying 51 percent of Malaysia’s MCIS Zurich Insurance Berhad for about 125 billion rand ($1184 million).
 Sanlam will first buy a 40 percent stake in MCIS Zurich from shareholder Koperasi MCIS Berhad and then make an offer to acquire 11 percent from minority investors, the Cape Town-based company said in a statement today.
 “Reynolds’s management agrees with us” BAT analyzes its cash position at the end of each year, looking at the potential for share buybacks, dividends and buying minority stakes, Durante said.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- SunEdison Inc, the solar developer and polysilicon supplier formerly known as MEMC Electronic Materials Inc, closed the first $150 million of a $300 million credit facility to buy and develop projects in the US.
 to buy Allergan for about $46 billion in a cash-and-stock deal.
 Ackman began buying Allergan stock Feb.
 A buying pause April 9 and 10 helped lower the price, before Ackman resumed in earnest April 11, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Voracious Acquirer Ackman is partnering with a voracious acquirer in Valeant Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson, who took the helm at the Laval, Quebec-based company in 2008 and has since spent at least $19 billion buying more than 35 companies.
 Spending Spree Rather than spend what Pearson says can be billions of dollars developing drugs from scratch, he buys companies with existing products, such as Bausch & Lomb for $87 billion last year, his biggest acquisition to date.
 In February, Actavis agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 urging them to seek buyers.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP is the preferred bidder to buy about 18 billion euros ($25 billion) of Irish, German and UK.
 Some of the city’s wealthiest residents are buying out their neighbors to create super-sized apartments that can double the value per square foot compared with the separate properties.
 London luxury-home prices have surged in the past five years as political and economic turmoil overseas attracted cash-rich buyers and foreign investors seeking a haven.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy mortgages and package them into securities, began posting record profits as the housing market rebounded.
 upgraded the shares to buy from hold.
 and VTB Capital recommending buying the shares.
 Bernstein raised the stock to outperform, similar to a buy, from market perform.
 Morgan Stanley cut its rating to equal weight from overweight, meaning it no longer recommends buying the stock.
 Kepler Cheuvreux SA also lowered its rating to hold from buy, saying the stock is close to the broker’s price estimate of 1650 euros.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 In May, Petrobras said it rejected offers to buy other assets in Argentina.
 “The long end is finding buyers” The 30-year bond yield dropped four basis points, or 004 percentage point, to 348 percent at 4:59 pm.
 Now the rally is morphing into a bet the ECB will either print cash to buy bonds or allow inflation, which slowed to a more-than four-year low of 05 percent in March, to remain subdued and preserve the value of fixed-income payments.
 Huseby said in February that the board would consider share buybacks this year and also is discussing whether to separate its digital or college businesses from its retail stores.
 agreed to buy WhatsApp for as much as $19 billion, while Rakuten Inc.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- BNP Paribas SA, France’s biggest bank, agreed to buy South African credit provider, RCS Investment Holdings Ltd, from Standard Bank Group Ltd.
 annuity sales fell 50 percent in the weeks after the government unveiled its budget that scrapped rules forcing retirees to buy such products.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne last month in his 2014 budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity, allowing them to withdraw pension savings without paying a 55 percent tax.
 In 2011, Google spent about $700 million to buy ITA Software Inc, a provider of flight information, and the company has a service called Hotel Finder that scans prices and availability from numerous online travel agents.
 The deal also steps up competition with Priceline Group Inc, which is one of Google’s biggest customers in buying search ads.
 RBC Capital Markets upgraded the silver producer to outperform from sector perform, meaning investors should buy the stock.
 Intermediate Capital Group Plc gained 34 percent to 4499 pence after HSBC raised the money manager to overweight from neutral, meaning investors should buy the shares.
 HSBC said the company could increase returns to shareholders, including through a special dividend or a share buyback.
 He has a buy rating on the stock.
 Wachtell, Latham on Mallinckrodt’s $56 Billion Questcor Deal Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz and Arthur Cox advised Mallinckrodt Plc, which agreed to buy Questcor Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Bathiya & Associates advised Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, India’s largest drugmaker by market value, on its agreement to buy competitor Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent ofcar buyers -- more than twice the 14 percent who say their firstconsideration is traditional performance measures such as powerand speed -- according to a study that consulting firm Accenturereleased in December.
 (AAPL) and Netgear Inc, early last month initiated coverageof Harman with the equivalent of a buy rating, data compiled byBloomberg shows.
 Investors are reluctant to let go of bonds they already own, even if they’re losing value, since they don’t know whether they’ll be able to buy them back, the Barclays strategists said in today’s report.
 After all, with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index returning 17 percent after a choppy start to the year and an escalating conflict in Ukraine, what else are investors going to buy? To contact the reporter on this story: Lisa Abramowicz in New York at labramowicz@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Shannon D.
 The hacking at Ellie Mae has prevented some lenders from closing homes loans, delaying buyers and sellers from completed their deals.
 “It doesn’t just affect homebuyers.
 This means that borrowers’ are inconvenienced and there could be 2 or 3 deals that are affected if people buying and selling a house are closing on the same day, Pyne said.
 “We may see investors buying back shares as we head towards earnings season” Alibaba Earnings China’s Alibaba posted a surge in fourth-quarter profit as analysts prepare to raise their valuations ahead of a potential US.
 ‘‘The Nikkei 225 and the Topix were at levels that are oversold and are in a buying zone,’’ said Hiroichi Nishi, an equities manager in Tokyo at SMBC Nikko Securities Inc.
 Morgan Stanley doubled its quarterly dividend to 10 cents and set plans for a $1 billion buyback after passing Federal Reserve stress tests in March.
 “Share buybacks will make up the difference between dividends and the total payouts, which we intend to drive to 100 percent of firm earnings over the next several years,” Gorman said, adding that regulators would have to approve.
 With major producers seeking to divest some parts of their businesses there may be fewer buyers for BHP’s non-core assets, according to Pengana’s Schroeders.
 EBay, which added $5 billion to its stock-buyback plan earlier this year, could also use the cash to repurchase shares.
 Second Quarter “There’s not a lot to get excited about,” said Gil Luria, an analyst at Wedbush Securities Inc, who recommends buying the stock.
 Pressure is building on Levine, and there’s still a chance buyout firms will step in or shareholder activism will pick up, Edward Jones & Co.
 “A lot of times you’ll see private equity take an interest in some of these broken businesses, so you can’t rule it out” Bryn Winburn, a spokeswoman for Family Dollar, said the company doesn’t comment on market speculation, when asked whether it has been approached by buyers or is weighing a sale.
 Almost none of the analysts covering Family Dollar recommend buying it.
 These types of traders bet on stock declines by selling borrowed shares and then buying them back more cheaply to pocket the difference in price.
 Higher Likelihood “A buyout bid lingers,” Mushkin wrote.
 No LBO While that takeout provides a precedent for any private-equity firms looking at Family Dollar, the company may not be as attractive of a candidate for a leveraged buyout, according to Anthony Chukumba, a New York-based analyst at BB&T Corp.
 The bid was viewed as an effort by Peltz to put Family Dollar on the block for buyout firms.
 Antics include threatening to make people pay to use bathrooms on-board, buying a taxi license plate to get to work faster, and a calendar featuring scantily clad female cabin crew.
 The proposal might give investors more insight into whether they are getting the best prices when they buy and sell large numbers of shares, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 The SEC faces pressure to overhaul trading after the book, “Flash Boys” by Michael Lewis, a columnist for Bloomberg View, made the claim that high-frequency traders hurt other investors by learning which shares investors plan to buy, purchasing them and selling them back at a higher price.
 Fed Sanctions Missouri Banker for Misusing TARP Bailout Money The Federal Reserve prohibited a former Missouri bank chairman from involvement in any bank management after he admitted to using federal bailout money to buy a luxury condominium.
 American Water’s California subsidiary also said today it intends to buy the operating assets of Meadowbrook Water Co.
 “We have not been a big buyer of the thesis of a great rotation” from bonds into stocks, she said.
 Devices Removed While T-Mobile has offered BlackBerry’s Q10 and Z10 since they were introduced last year, the carrier began removing the device maker’s products from its stores in September, requiring buyers to have the phones shipped to them instead.
 He said the system more accurately rewards the desired behavior than options, which give the holder the right to buy a specific number of shares for a set price in a defined period.
 Edison International’s Southern California Edison has agreed to buy electricity from the Adobe solar farm under a 20-year contract.
 HSBC upgraded the owner of British Airways to overweight, the equivalent of buy, from neutral, saying that the drop in airline shares is a buying opportunity.
 BP expects to distribute proceeds from disposals to investors, with a bias toward buy backs, it said today.
 agreed to pay 2269 billion yuan ($36 billion) to buy Chinese banking and brokerage assets from its state-owned parent, underscoring China’s push to loosen control over the economy.
 He has a buy recommendation on the shares.
 Investors can also hedge an investment in a company by buying a swap that will pay them if a borrower stops paying its debts.
 The insurance companies are moving away from investing in bonds into alternative products such as loans after interest rates fell, reducing returns from buying debt, Moody’s analyst Benjamin Serra told reporters in Frankfurt today.
 turned to National Bank to co-lead a C$500 million share sale to help finance its March 17 agreement to buy Western Canadian oil and natural gas assets from Imperial Oil Ltd.
 The central bank will further cut bond buying to $45 billion, according to the median of 43 economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in Petroliam Nasional Bhd’s proposed liquefied natural gas facility in Canada for an undisclosed amount.
 Sinopec Group will buy 12 million metric tons of LNG annually from the project and China Huadian 600,000 tons.
 Sinopec Group announced it will buy a 15 percent stake in the project yesterday without mentioning a Chinese partner.
 Sinopec Group, the parent of listed China Petroleum & Chemical Corp, will separately buy 3 million tons of LNG a year for 20 years from Petronas, according to a statement yesterday.
 Relational is urging the company to refocus on its core hazardous waste business, buy back stock and pursue asset sales or spinoffs, according to a regulatory filing yesterday.
 Chief Executive Officer Alan McKim, who is also the company’s chairman and founder, announced $75 million in cost cuts and a $150 million buyback authorization that day.
 Founded in 1996, Relational buys stakes in companies it considers undervalued and then lobbies management and boards for changes to boost investor returns.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 “With the new units, we can buy 10 million tons of heavier grades out of 13 million tons of our annual imports,” Upadhya said.
 China Imports Prices may rebound after dropping to a level that makes it cheaper for China to import than buy domestic output, according to Goldman Sachs.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 The deal with the Stichting International Dispensary, which buys medicines on behalf of the WHO, hospitals and governments across the developing world, will ensure the medicine reaches people who need it even in countries where it’s not approved, he said.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- A Blackstone Group LP affiliate will buy a share in a central Sydney office building for A$435 million ($404 million), and take options to acquire a further A$3914 million of properties from Mirvac Group.
 That would have helped fulfill Munk’s ambition of creating a genuine Canadian national mining champion, after a decade in which some of its biggest domestic rivals were acquired by foreign buyers.
 It’s sad” Cost Alternatives An advisory panel yesterday recommended the state abandon plans to fix its website or buy technology from another state with a functional marketplace, such as Connecticut.
 Deal’s Backers Underwriters have the option to buy more than 14 million shares.
 Recent selloffs in the Nasdaq 100 have turned out to be buying opportunities.
 auto-parts maker agreed to buy Air Distribution Technologies for $16 billion, seeking to lessen its reliance on the cyclical auto industry by adding ventilation products by purchasing Air Distribution Technologies from the Canada Pension Plan Investment Board.
 Novartis is considered the most likely buyer because it already has a partnership to market ThromboGenics’s Jetrea eye medicine outside of the US, the people said.
 The company has offered 13 billion euros ($18 billion) to buy Diana Group, a French flavors and pet-food additive maker.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- Fannie Mae is selling more of its foreclosed properties to investors as prices rise, limiting homebuyers’ access to cheap housing.
 While homebuyers retreat from this market, investors are buying a greater share of the housing from the government-owned mortgage giant to rent or flip.
 In December, the companies extended their first-look programs, which place homeowners at the front of the line to buy the houses, by five days.
 Fannie Mae also is providing as much as 35 percent closing cost assistance in 27 states for buyers who submit offers by the end of April.
 This makes it harder for owner-occupants to get a home during their exclusive buying window.
 “While we applaud the newly introduced Fannie incentives program for REO purchase by potential owner occupants, we are concerned it will be no more effective than existing ’first look’ policies, which have failed to significantly expand homeownership opportunities for first-time homebuyers and others who wish to live in the homes they purchase,” the groups, including the California Reinvestment Coalition and the National Community Reinvestment Coalition, said in a March letter to federal regulators.
 The organizations asked regulators “to address first-time homebuyers being outbid, tenants being displaced, and neighborhoods undergoing dramatic changes as private equity and investor cash continues flooding into local housing markets” Strong Emphasis Fannie Mae does “a few things to try to market properties to owner-occupants and the goal is to sell to them as often as we can,” said Andrew Wilson, a spokesman for the comapny.
 $28 Billion Repairing properties makes them more marketable to potential homebuyers.
 Consumer and civil-rights organizations are pushing instead for a mandate that those citizens must be served to ensure that young, low-income and minority homebuyers can get loans.
 The Federal Housing Administration, the biggest source of financing for first-time and low-income buyers, raised the cost of borrowing to cope with losses on mortgages it insured as the real-estate bubble burst.
 The FHA has started to relax underwriting standards, with homebuyers’ average FICO scores at 686 in February, down from 699 a year earlier, according to data compiled by Pleasanton, California-based Ellie Mae.
 Increasing these sales to non-investors could be a challenge with prices at levels too high for American homebuyers, especially first timers, who have been shrinking from the market, said Thomas Lawler, a former Fannie Mae economist.
 The 21st Century Business Herald reported that foreign investors may be able to directly buy mainland-listed stocks through the Hong Kong exchange, without saying where it got the information.
 “Expectations tend to rise that Orix would buy back its shares unless they deploy their capital otherwise, so they will likely continue with mergers and acquisitions” Among Orix’s biggest takeovers was the purchase of the Robeco Groep NV asset-management unit from Rabobank Groep last year for about $26 billion.
 Earlier that day, Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung reported that the institution tested buying about 80 billion euros a month over one year and found that it could boost inflation by as much as 08 percentage point or as little as 02 percentage point.
 competitor Next Plc has handed back about 30 percent more to shareholders since 2010 in the form of buybacks and dividends.
 Each sale generated VAT, which the buyer could reclaim from the tax authorities as a refund.
 “Our Zimbabwe subsidiary is one of the businesses where the proceeds of the bond will be used” Diamond, who quit as Barclays Plc CEO in July 2012 after the British bank was fined for manipulating benchmark interest rates, this week agreed to buy ABC Holdings Ltd.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Time Inc, the publisher of the namesake magazine whose first issue ran in 1923, is seeking a type of loan typically issued to investors that buy junk-rated debt as it prepares to be spun off from its parent.
 Chamber of Commerce, National Association of Manufacturers, Aerospace Industries Association and Nuclear Energy Institute are stepping up their lobbying to reauthorize the bank, which helps foreign companies buy US-made goods.
 The new CEO “holds no extensive retail track record, which may also raise concerns” JPMorgan didn’t change its rating on Via Varejo shares, currently the equivalent of buy, saying the fundamentals of the company remain sound.
 Via Varejo is also rated buy by the other analysts who cover it, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Kleine is among seven analysts recommending investors buy the stock, while five say hold and two suggest selling, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “There’s been an exaggeration in the market, that’s why we’re maintaining a buy” rating, Kleine said.
 While potential buyers have approached La Polar, talks are on hold, the person said.
 “If La Polar is able to renegotiate its debt, then it will be adding value for any potential buyers,” Guillermo Araya, head of research at Santiago-based brokerage Renta 4 Corredores de Bolsa SA, said in a telephone interview.
 The maker of communications chips had its rating downgraded to hold from buy at Needham & Co.
 said on April 28 it’s interested in buying AstraZeneca for about $99 billion, in what would be a record buyout for the industry.
 Glaxo said April 22 it intends to sell its cancer drugs to Novartis for as much as $16 billion and buy most of the Swiss company’s vaccines business for up to $71 billion.
 You’re not focused on the other 20 or 30 things you’re not interested in” While Glaxo would look to hire talented AstraZeneca employees who become available if New York-based Pfizer does buy the company, “we’re not really sitting here opportunistically waiting for things like that,” Witty said.
 Pfizer, which paid $64 billion to buy Wyeth in 2009 in the biggest pharmaceutical takeover, is considering its AstraZeneca bid options after the UK.
 To blunt that, Anadarko and Noble are buying ads after their Coloradans for Responsible Energy Development spent $1 million on television time in the fourth quarter, according to New York-based Nielsen Media Research.
 The resellers in turn sold the information to others who encoded it onto magnetic strips on blank plastic cards that were used to make unauthorized withdrawals from automated teller machines or to buy goods, according to the indictment.
 Banco Santander Brasil SA gained the most on record after its parent company offered to buy out minority shareholders.
 In deals with the attorney general’s office in February and March, Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s Business Wire and Toronto-based Marketwired agreed to stop allowing high-speed firms to buy direct access to their services.
 Bank lawsuits against Neo have locked up his remaining Blumont shares, leading Alexander Molyneux, who has been appointed to succeed Neo as chairman, to abort a plan to buy 135 million shares of the company.
 with a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note.
 “The lack of urgency in using the excess capital weighs heavily on the stock” Mediobanca cut its rating on Vontobel to neutral from outperform, Alevizakos said in the note, leaving two of 12 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg recommending buying the shares.
 UBS AG cut its rating on the drugmaker to neutral from buy, with analyst Guillaume van Renterghem saying the stock is fairly valued.
 Molotova rates Symrise shares buy.
 Owner Hans-Peter Wild and buyout firm KKR & Co.
 Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, which agreed in 2013 to buy an 18 percent stake in Weibo, will exercise an option to raise that stake to 32 percent, according to the filing.
 Ten-year Treasury notes yielded 67 basis points more than their Group of Seven counterparts last week, the most in four years, as the Fed unwinds its bond-buying program while Japan and Europe consider additional stimulus.
 The metal has pared its advance in 2014 as investors assess prospects for further cuts to the Federal Reserve’s bond buying program amid signs of recovery in the world’s largest economy.
 Amaturo, a New York-based analyst with Buckingham Research Group, today maintained his buy rating on the automaker’s shares, as well as his earnings estimates for next year.
 Some of the factory’s more than 40,000 workers began protests earlier this month over what labor advocacy organizations have said were unpaid contributions by the company to a government social security program and a fund to help workers buy homes.
 ‘Aggressive’ Returns H&R Block will be able to buy back stock without Fed approval after the bank sale, which would “lead to aggressive shareholder returns,” Moody’s Investors Service said in November.
 homes plunged in March to an eight-month low as buyers balked at record prices and higher mortgage rates that made properties less affordable.
 exchanges, from $52475 in normal hours, as the company posted higher-than-estimated earnings per share for the fiscal second quarter, raised its dividend payout and expanded a buyback program.
 The S&P 500 is holding up, but investors will need more of a signal to start buying into the market” The Stoxx Europe 600 Index lost 06 percent, while the euro gained versus most of its major peers on faster-than-forecast factory and services sector growth.
 As part of about $23 billion of funding in euro and dollar bonds and loans to buy SFR, Drahi is paying 775 percent in interest on $29 billion of eight-year junk notes with a preliminary B rating from Standard & Poor’s.
 Fox, based in New York, has been expanding its European pay-TV holdings, buying control of German provider Sky Deutschland AG last year.
 The announcement followed its agreement to buy Lincoln Benefit Life from Allstate Corp.
 The debt sparked fan protests and attempts to buy the team, with thousands of supporters wearing green and gold to represent the club’s origins as Newton Heath.
 One poor season won’t affect that” Randal Konik, a Jefferies Group LLC analyst, said in an e-mailed note he would keep his “buy” rating, with a $21 price target.
 Adding Talent The club has no option but to spend on talent if it is to retain its status and value, according to Jim O’Neill, the former Goldman Sachs executive who led a consortium that wanted to buy the team following fan dissatisfaction with the Glazers in 2010.
 Traders should buy the euro at NZ$15960 and sell it should the currency fall to NZ$15740, he said.
 As more entertainment goes digital and shoppers become increasingly comfortable buying big-ticket items like televisions online, Best Buy Co.
 Investors are betting India’s growing middle class will watch matches on television, flock to stadiums, buy merchandise and lure sponsors, as the English Premier League and Spain’s La Liga whet appetites for “the beautiful game” The challenge is cricket’s popularity in the nation of 12 billion people.
 Spain’s Real Madrid paid more to buy three players for this season -- Gareth Bale, Asier Illarramendi and Isco -- than the current value of the Indian competition, based on British Broadcasting Corp.
 law firms and two from Canada advised on Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s deal to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the blockbuster Botox wrinkle treatment.
 Shareholders may be buying the stock to show confidence, Vajda said.
April 17 (Bloomberg) -- Hapag-Lloyd AG agreed to buy most of Chilean rival Cia.
 CSAV will buy shares worth 259 million euros in a 370 million-euro capital increase that will boost its stake in Hapag-Lloyd to 34 percent from about 30 percent.
 The sale of the interest in Sunrise Senior Living LLC’s management unit was completed yesterday, according to statements from McLean, Virginia-based Sunrise and one of the buyers, Revera Inc, a Canadian provider of senior-living services.
 Revera’s partner in the purchase was Health Care REIT Inc, which finished buying Sunrise’s properties last July.
 Pension Funds Retirement funds are buying the bonds after an improved financial position encouraged them to switch out of stocks so they can make revenue more predictable by reducing vulnerability to price swings and inflation.
 “And risk-free bonds for them to buy are long-dated UK.
 GE also is considering buying solar and wind power projects in countries including Japan, Ireland and Chile, and prefers to invest in projects that use GE equipment such as wind turbines and inverters.
 GE also bought 50 megawatts of projects in Ontario from First Solar last year and is in talks to buy more, said Kevin Walsh, the company’s head of power and renewable energy.
 And despite the record in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index earlier this month, the so-called Fed model of stock valuation signals it’s still a decent time to buy.
 on April 24 after it agreed to buy Biomet Inc.
 nuclear operator, agreed to buy Pepco Holdings Inc.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- South Korea’s biggest pension funds are cutting holdings of local debt to buy stocks in the US.
 A lot has changed since Charles Dow came up with his theory and some may argue it is outdated, yet to many market technicians his words are just as relevant today: “The revival of interest in industrial stocks is but the natural outcome of the prosperity in the industrial world,” Charles Dow wrote in his newspaper, the Wall Street Journal, in 1899, according to the book “Dow Theory Unplugged: Charles Dow’s Original Editorials & Their Relevance Today” Still, the interest in industrials then was nothing compared with the interest in railroad stocks of the day, which made industrial shares “open to all, and likely to lead to promiscuous buying for the first good turn in these stocks” It’s more than a century later and Dow’s disciples are once again looking for some promiscuous buying in industrial stocks.
 Higher costs will boost pressure on cotton buyers including Hanesbrands Inc, which already is increasing prices on some clothing.
 Walker maintained a buy recommendation on the stock and raised his price prediction to 173 euros from 163 euros.
 “It would be harder for potential issuers to find buyers as pension funds will have less money and will be more selective” Poles have four months from April 1 to decide if they want to continue allocating 29 percent of their pay checks to funds or automatically switch to the state system.
 “Pension funds played an important stabilizing role and very often were buying stocks during market turmoil thanks to steady inflows” The exchange’s broad WIG Index has climbed 32 percent since the collapse of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc.
 Mark Zuckerberg’s company is focusing on wireless device users, from increasing mobile-advertising sales to buying the messaging application WhatsApp Inc.
 “If you believe this is a short-term blip in the China macro picture, then it’s a buying opportunity.
 The ratio of outstanding puts giving the right to sell Wynn shares versus calls to buy fell to 143-to-1 on April 7 after reaching a high of 383-to-1 on Jan.
 He has an outperform rating on Wynn, similar to a buy.
 Relative yields on the drugmaker’s 675 percent notes due 2018 narrowed as much as 44 basis points to 255 basis points after the Laval, Quebec-based company offered to buy Botox maker Allergan yesterday, suggesting a one-level rating upgrade.
 That’s not currently the case and Unilever has no present plans to start a share buyback program, he said.
 The company said yesterday it was buying a stake in state-owned Development Bank of Rwanda after last week agreeing to acquire BancABC for as much as $265 million.
 “Opportunities to buy real estate here won’t last much longer” Paulson & Co, which is based in New York and oversees $228 billion, is adding to its Puerto Rico investments as the commonwealth and its agencies wrestle with a $73 billion debt load and an economy that’s shrunk in five of the past seven fiscal years.
 BSkyB and Discovery are close to buying Channel 5 for 350 million pounds ($585 million), according to Broadcast magazine.
 HKEx, which spent $22 billion buying the LME, said on April 22 it plans to introduce contracts for thermal coal and industrial metals this year for Asian users.
 Pfizer said it proposed buying the UK.
 Reid has expressed reservations about winding down Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac because the companies ensure that homebuyers are able to get affordable fixed-rate mortgages.
 Record Profits Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, long political flash points in Washington, buy mortgages from lenders and package them into securities on which they guarantee payments of principal and interest; they now back about two-thirds of new home loans.
 “The idea is to let a customer buy a $30,000 vehicle in his 20s or 30s and move him up once he’s paid for college and can afford a more expensive car” So far, the plan’s working.
 “We have been working intensively from the very outset on how to improve fuel economy, while at the same time increasing performance” BMW is rolling out the i8 this year, it says, to speak to a new kind of luxury buyer.
 Twitter’s new products build off its acquisition of MoPub Inc, a mobile-advertising exchange, which gives it an existing network of ad buyers.
 “You can’t really buy them,” he said.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said in March that a rate rise might come as soon as six months after the central bank ends its monthly bond-buying program.
 Petroleo Brasileiro SA, the state-owned energy company, is buying record amounts of liquefied natural gas in the spot market to run gas-fired power plants at full capacity and preserve water reserves.
 ‘Maximum Capacity’ “They’re running gas plants at maximum capacity now, buying time for rains to help replenish water reservoirs,” said Javier Diaz, an analyst at Bentek.
 Brazil will most likely accelerate LNG buying next month to boost storage levels as a precaution, said Trevor Sikorski, the head of natural gas, coal and carbon at Energy Aspects.
 Barclays Plc upgraded Europe’s second-largest tour operator to overweight, the equivalent of a buy rating, from underweight, or sell, citing the company’s success in restructuring its business.
 Nickel has jumped 31 percent this year after Indonesia banned exports of unprocessed ore and some buyers took the view that Norilsk, the world’s biggest producer, would have sales curtailed by widening sanctions aimed at punishing President Vladimir Putin’s government.
 “We could help, and not only by buying those volumes, but by marketing the deal.
 I myself as a businessman would be interested to buy” The price of palladium has risen 11 percent this year and platinum 34 percent, while copper has fallen 8 percent.
 “I am not looking for this opportunity on purpose, and don’t seek to buy from the market, but if any investor were selling, I would buy” The stock has advanced 19 percent this year, even as Moscow’s benchmark Micex Index declined 13 percent.
 The projects include 540 apartments in the first phase of Ansam and 230 units in Al Hadeel, both of which are open to foreign buyers.
 Builders were forced to cancel projects as buyers, who acquired properties before they were built, defaulted on thousands of purchases.
 CEO Appointment With its new projects, Aldar will ban buyers from reselling the properties before paying half of their value, the chairman said.
 The developer will also limit the number of properties buyers can purchase before development, he said.
 central bank may conclude the bond-buying program it uses to support the economy in the second half of 2014.
 There were six successful buyers from a total of 61 bids, the figures show.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore exports to China from Australia’s Port Hedland climbed to a record last month as signs of rising steel production in the world’s biggest buyer boosted demand and miners increased supply.
 “I would rather buy food than liquor too” The shop’s sales are down by 30 percent to 40 percent and people have switched to cheaper liquor brands along with the wholesale business largely declining because “taverns are scared to sell until the strike is over,” according to Kruis.
 Even so, “the name becomes more attractive when it’s trading near the low end of its historical ranges for longer-term buyers,” the New York-based analyst said in a phone interview.
 If you’re a firm that’s looking to buy something and fix it, there’s an opportunity here” Kellogg also could appeal to PepsiCo and Nestle, said Yarbrough, who estimated a potential takeout price of $80 to $90 a share, or at least a 24 percent premium from yesterday’s close.
 While it may make more sense for Nestle to buy General Mills because of the companies’ cereals joint venture, a takeover of Kellogg instead can’t be ruled out, Yarbrough said.
 Potential hurdles for any buyers may be the company’s size and the challenge of convincing its largest shareholder, the WK.
 While Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg openly supportedBouygues, Vivendi said it had asked any buyer to stick toemployment promises “that correspond to the priorities definedby the French government” SFR employs about 9,000 people.
 Vivendi can’tstart selling its 20 percent stake for one year, and must giveAltice a first chance to buy it.
 Telecoms Consolidation The deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buyForest Laboratories Inc.
 After losing out to SFR, Bouygues’ best move may be to turnfrom buyer to seller by discussing a sale to Iliad.
 Iliad hadnegotiated buying Bouygues’ wireless network for as much as 18billion euros, on the condition that Bouygues would win SFR.
 Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit downgraded the insurance-buyout company to underperform, similar to sell, from neutral.
 The buyer and terms of the deal weren’t disclosed.
 That reluctance is a signal to buy the cheapest shares in the stock market in the developing world, according to Sberbank Asset Management and Prosperity Capital.
 “It’s a good time to buy.
 “People don’t understand and refuse to buy butcher’s meat,” he said.
 The DBJ was considering buying about 50 billion yen in the power company’s preferred stock, a person familiar with those talks said.
April 21 (Bloomberg) -- Pfizer Inc, the world’s biggest drugmaker, held informal, now-discontinued talks with AstraZeneca Plc about possibly buying the London-based maker of asthma and heart drugs, said two people familiar with the matter.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- Plug Power Inc, the fuel-cell company that’s the best performer on the Nasdaq in the past year, agreed to buy a supplier of fuel-cell components.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore climbed the most in seven months, trimming a quarterly drop, on speculation that China may speed up construction projects and take measures to counter slowing economic growth in the world’s largest buyer.
 “We’re still in the early stage of knowing if the resources are there, let alone knowing the cost of transporting the resources” Santos agreed in December 2012 to buy a 14 percent stake in Tamboran for A$10 million and acquire as much as 75 percent of its Northern Territory shale permits.
 Seventeen analysts rate the stock a buy, four recommend holding it and one rates it a sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers -- more than twice the 14 percent who look at traditional performance measures such as power and speed -- Accenture said in December.
 “These are seen as growing areas, and if you can buy an established footprint, particularly in the Medicaid side, it’s beneficial” Jack Maurer, a representative for WellCare, said the company doesn’t comment on speculation when asked whether it would be open to a sale.
 “Cigna, when they’ve talked about acquiring businesses, they’ve talked about not necessarily wanting to buy only Medicaid,” Carter said in a phone interview from New York.
 “In order for Humana to be a bigger participant in duals, as more states create models, it feels to me like they’re going to have to buy somebody,” the analyst said.
 Not Now While WellCare is an attractive target, potential buyers may be focused on other areas right now, said Sarah James, a Los Angeles-based analyst at Wedbush Inc.
 Even so, with the initial stages of the Affordable Care Act implementation completed, buyers may feel more comfortable weighing an acquisition, said Carter of Credit Suisse.
 “This is the time where you shift up in credit quality” Private-equity firms are using more debt to finance buyouts.
 Individuals have made deposits into funds that buy junk loans for 95 straight weeks, including a record $63 billion in 2013, according to JPMorgan.
 “There are more aggressive deals being done” Collateralized loan obligations, the biggest buyers of junk loans that fueled the 2005-2007 buyout boom, will raise as much as $90 billion in 2014, the most in seven years, based on a forecast from Wells Fargo & Co.
 Deals done before the financial crisis were “incredibly large,” with private-equity firms grouping together to back a single buyout, said RBC’s Fishlow Minter.
 got more than $20 billion of loans backing its $48 billion buyout by KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Bloomberg data show.
 If a sale of SFR is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc, making it the second-biggest acquisition globally announced this year, data compiled by Bloomberg showed.
 Last year, Apollo Global Management LLC, Carlyle and Silver Lake Management LLC raised multi-billion pools contributing to the strongest year for buyout capital raising since 2008.
 Founded in 1984 by Warren Hellman, who died in 2011, and Tully Friedman, who heads San Francisco-based private-equity firm Friedman Fleischer & Lowe LLC, the firm participates in buyouts, restructurings and minority investments.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Samena Capital, an investment firm managing about $700 million, agreed to buy a 31 percent stake in Ras Al Khaimah Ceramics as the owners of the world’s biggest maker of ceramic tiles seek to raise funds.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Stabilis Energy, the closely held company proposing to build five liquefied natural gas facilities with Koch Industries Inc, agreed to buy most of Encana Corp’s US.
 retailer of new cars and trucks, reported quarterly profit that topped estimates even as horrible winter weather kept many car buyers home for much of January and February.
 The last two weeks of March were absolutely spectacular and the consumer came out of hibernation and streamed back into the showroom” Blizzard conditions and frigid temperatures kept car buyers away in January and February, which caused industrywide auto sales to fall 14 percent, according to researcher Autodata Corp.
 and Carscom that sell leads of interested car and truck buyers.
 Today’s data was seen as critical for the ECB as it decides whether to embrace policies ranging from negative interest rates to buying debt, known as quantitative easing.
 Housing Target Leung in September 2012 announced a plan giving only citizens the right to buy apartments at some sites built by private developers to ensure local needs are met.
 to what was then was Australia’s biggest buyout in eight years.
 weapons buyer said.
 Kendall said he didn’t have any indications that the eight countries that were original partners for the F-35 will be “substantially reducing” their planned quantities, though “there have been some adjustments for budget reasons” “Everybody is still there and everybody still plans to buy the airplanes,” he said.
 The F-35’s rocky path reflects in part a culture of optimism that’s common in weapons-buying, Kendall said.
 Activist investor Arthur Lipson said in a regulatory filing this month that he’s seeking to oust the management and replace the board of Joseph “Lloyd” McAdams’s Anworth Mortgage Asset Corp, a real estate investment trust with $86 billion in assets that buys mostly government-backed home-loan bonds.
 After rallying since the financial crisis, REITs that buy mortgage debt fell last year as they struggled to navigate Federal Reserve moves to scale back its monthly bond buying.
 Anworth primarily buys home-loan bonds backed by the government, which suffered their first annual loss last year in almost two decades.
 The firm repurchased at least 28 million shares in the fourth quarter when their stock was trading at the lowest levels since 2007, and in December announced board approval to buy back as many as 5 million more.
 If a company can buy back shares at a big discount and doesn’t boldly do so, it creates an opportunity for activist investors like Western, Stewart said.
 McAdams takes a more retail approach to investing, by laddering, or buying shorter term bonds that mature at set periods of times, and staggering them so each year a portion of the portfolio is maturing, according to Stewart.
 $400 Billion REITs buy property-linked assets and are exempt from taxes as long as they pay out 90 percent of their earnings in dividends.
 Fed Tapering In May, they started plunging as investors speculated that the Fed would slow its bond-buying program as the economy started to strengthen.
 Lipson said his hedge fund and its affiliates started buying Anworth stock in December when it was as low as $420 a share.
 In the near term, “our goal will be to be working on both ends of the spectrum, the royalty business and the greenfields exploration side” Mineral exploration and development companies take on the risk of hunting for and studying new deposits, with the potential for a huge payoff if they’re successful in building a mine or finding a buyer willing to pay a big premium.
 ‘Knock-Out Punch’ Osisko rejected Goldcorp’s initial bid as too low and announced April 2 that Yamana had agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 “Household spending appears to be rising more quickly” The committee pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions are likely in “measured steps” At that pace, the quantitative easing program intended to push down borrowing costs for companies and consumers would end in December.
 Housing Market The housing market is another source of concern as higher prices and mortgage rates deter buyers.
 ‘Sunspots’ Investors tend to focus their buying in options and derivatives on Mondays to protect from losses in stocks ahead of the week’s potential market-moving catalysts, Lutz said in an e-mail today.
 Also, bad news tends to happen over the weekend so the phenomenon could be a result of buyers coming in after losses in stocks on Mondays, he said.
 “But as improbable as anything may sound, it’s not illogical” Indeed, the buying on Tuesdays has followed the two worst days of the week this year.
 Prices plunged into a bear market during the quarter as inventories ballooned to the highest ever in China, the biggest buyer.
 The ink and color on paper painting titled “Landscape in Snow” sold to an Asian private buyer, Poly said.
 The hammer price was HK$160 million and buyer’s commission 15 percent.
 The judge yesterday also approved a $120 million loan to buy emergency vehicles and remediate blight in the city of about 700,000 people.
 video-game publisher, gained autonomy from majority shareholder Vivendi SA after buying back $583 billion of its stock from the Paris-based conglomerate last year.
 IMS, a 60-year old company that sells data on prescription use to drugmakers and analysts, is asking investors to buy shares in its initial public offering at as little as one-seventh the earnings multiple its digital peers fetch.
 The fund follows a strategy where it buys assets that fall in price and sells as they rally.
 spent $22 billion buying the 137-year-old bourse in a deal HKEx Chief Executive Officer Charles Li called “a catalyst” to tap China’s commodities demand.
 The acquisition was part of a broader shift to diversify the business beyond private equity and came months after buying a majority holding in Claren Road Asset Management LLC, which now oversees $83 billion.
 Pandora is poised to benefit from higher advertising on its mobile and desktop products, with users tuning in to the service more often and listening longer, according to Michael Pachter, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles who recommends buying the stock.
 and Deutsche Boerse AG’s Eurex Clearing, operate as central counterparties for every buy and sell order executed.
 in New York who rates the shares the equivalent of a buy and owns some.
 and the New York Stock Exchange were among dozens of exchanges, brokerages and traders sued over high-frequency trading by the city of Providence, Rhode Island, over claims they rigged securities markets to divert billions of dollars from buyers and sellers of shares.
 Carlyle, like peers Blackstone Group LP and KKR & Co, has diversified its business beyond traditional leveraged buyouts by bolstering assets dedicated to real estate and credit investments.
 Together, all of Carlyle’s funds from which it can collect a slice of profits, which in addition to buyouts include real estate, energy and certain Global Market Strategies pools, appreciated 6 percent in the quarter.
 Selling Stakes The value of buyout holdings at private-equity firms affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric depends on quarterly mark-to-market valuations of those investments.
 Carlyle funds spent at least $100 million to buy a majority stake in Urbplan in 2007 and to continue funding it through 2011, and that investment was worthless as of the end of 2012.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 National Pride Investors welcomed Suri’s appointment and Espoo, Finland-based Nokia’s plan to spend about 5 billion euros ($69 billion) on dividends, share buybacks and debt reduction.
 The proceeds from the Microsoft sale bring Nokia’s gross cash to more than 10 billion euros, giving it ammunition for purchases even after the planned dividends, buybacks and debt reduction.
 Last year, Nokia considered buying the wireless-equipment unit of France’s Alcatel-Lucent, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Blue Harbour sees at least 40 percent upside in Babcock & Wilcox, which has no debt and can buy back $750 million in stock, Robbins said.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 She recommends buying the shares.
 Fed Policy Fed policy makers are unwinding the bond-buying program they have used to support the economy, while keeping their target for overnight lending between banks in a range of zero to 025 percent since 2008.
 The company is part of a group which last month agreed to buy Chinese online-gaming developer Giant Interactive Group Inc.
 Berenberg cut the stock to hold from buy.
 Paul Flowers later stepped down as chairman after the Mail on Sunday reported that the Methodist minister had sought to buy crack cocaine and crystal methamphetamine.
 The deals, which include selling cancer drugs to Novartis AG for as much as $16 billion and buying Novartis’s vaccine business for $71 billion, also help shift the conversation about Glaxo away from the eruption of bribery investigations in China, Poland and the Middle East.
 “Because of my bad judgment, I have caused immense suffering to everyone I love” The tips involved Celgene’s announcement in November 2007 that it was buying Pharmion Corp.
 for $29 billion; Sanofi’s announcement in March 2010 that it was buying Chattem Inc.
 for $19 billion; Celgene’s news in June 2010 that it was buying Abraxis BioScience Inc.
 for $29 billion; and Stryker’s announcement in May 2011 of plans to buy Orthovita Inc.
 For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA jumped the most on record after agreeing to buy Universidade Sao Judas Tadeu for 320 million reais.
 Underwriters of the sale will have a 30-day option to buy as many as 375 million more shares.
 “We felt that knocking on the door was a waste of our time” Hogan has typically received a rapturous reception from carriers and governments grateful for Etihad’s cash, entering a Berlin briefing to rock-orchestral fanfare “Rise of a Hero,” and feted in Belgrade by Serb prime ministerial candidate Aleksandar Vucic after Jat failed to find a buyer for years.
 Hogan says that’s “smarter” than buying 200 more planes to add to the 95 already in the fleet and 200 on order.
 The country’s low-sulfur crude is prized by Japanese buyers as a cleaner-burning fuel for power generation.
 He was interviewed by Winfrey in 2008 as an eligible bachelor worth more than $100 million, “living the American dream in a big, big way” The segment shows him driving a $240,000 Bentley and talking about buying himself a Lamborghini while he was still in his early 20s.
 Time Warner Cable ceased its own share buyback plan that would have totaled about $25 billion this year because of the pending acquisition.
 The state produces Dar Blend, a low-sulfur crude prized by Japanese buyers as a cleaner-burning fuel for power plants.
 Coca-Cola has said that stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 “We buy power from four different sources of power, wind power, solar power, biomass and small hydro power, and we balance that currently through the grid,” she said.
 Orix may seek to team up with another investor to buy PrimeCredit Ltd, said one of the people, asking not to be identified because the information is private.
 Atsushi Horii, a spokesman for Orix in Tokyo, declined to comment on whether the company is interested in buying PrimeCredit.
 Boeing’s Alder said the storage was “a longstanding planned activity” While Boeing’s track record on reducing 787 production costs doesn’t inspire confidence, “we continue to take the long view, believing that ultimately the 787 will be a very successful program,” said Ken Herbert, a San Francisco-based analyst with Canaccord Genuity who rates Boeing a buy.
 Sales growth at Mercedes has exceeded 10 percent for nine consecutive months as expanded lineups of compacts and the up-market E-Class won buyers.
 owners KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, which took the company private seven years ago in a record leveraged buyout, will have their investments almost erased under a proposed bankruptcy reorganization plan.
 Henry Kravis’s KKR, David Bonderman’s TPG and the other sponsors of the buyout were told they would get a 1 percent stake that will be diluted when bankruptcy loans convert to equity, accounting for more than half of the new company’s stock.
 The 2007 purchase of Dallas-based Energy Future Holdings, known as TXU Corp, for $48 billion came at the peak of a three-year boom in leveraged buyouts.
 The sponsors and their co-investors bought $83 billion of equity and financed the rest of the buyout.
 surged 55 percent to 530 pence after Glencore Xstrata Plc agreed to buy the oil and gas explorer with assets in the Republic of Chad for $135 billion, or 550 pence a share.
 agreed to buy a 89 percent stake in the owner of department-store group House of Fraser.
 The company has similar growth plans for baseball after closing a $330-million deal to buy Easton-Bell Sports Inc’s baseball and softball unit, Chief Executive Officer Kevin Davis said.
 More Acquisitions The deal to buy the baseball unit closed today, and will add to the company’s adjusted earnings per share in the first year of ownership, Bauer said.
 “We are presented with opportunities on a weekly basis” Fractured Market The acquisition of Easton Baseball, the company’s largest, is part of Bauer’s strategy of gaining share in a fractured market by buying brands that are already recognized by athletes as leaders in their sport and then expanding them through aggressive product development.
 Who can afford that in India? At 35,000 rupees you can buy a motorbike” The Doodle3 will compete with phones including the Samsung Galaxy Mega 58, which was released in 2013.
 refinery and may close the plant if it can’t find a buyer.
 Murphy Oil said March 17 it was in advanced talks with a potential buyer.
 “Murco’s reported difficulties in finding a buyer for its Milford Haven refinery are consistent with the broader challenges facing the UK.
 The investigation could lead to enforcement action or an instruction to reduce the spread between buying and selling prices, the report said.
 In matched trades, where banks and other dealers join a buyer to a seller, profits of more than 15 percent to 2 percent would be “questionable,” Ketchum said, according to the newspaper’s account of the interview.
 That could allow the buyers to make a quick profit by selling them at a higher price to investors shut out of the initial deal.
 Regulators are examining whether being able to turn quotes on and off allows market manipulation, and whether smaller buyers are given worse prices, the person said.
 One area of investigation is the difficulty some investors had in buying and selling bonds last May after the central bank suggested it might scale back its own bond purchases, according to the report.
April 10 (Bloomberg) -- A group of Formula One teams is “having a conversation” about buying a stake in the auto racing series whose biggest shareholder is CVC Capital Partners Ltd, F-1 Chief Executive Officer Bernie Ecclestone said.
 “Maybe they will get enough together to buy shares” The move comes as Ecclestone prepares to stand trial on bribery charges in Munich, and as lawmakers in Norway examine whether the state-owned investment fund broke its own rules in buying a stake in the sport.
 The Norwegian fund’s rules say it can only buy private equity if a company is planning to sell shares to the public.
 Oil Search agreed earlier this year to buy a stake in the same discoveries for an initial $900 million.
 Louis, who rates the stock a buy and owns none, said of the year-end backlog projection today in a phone interview.
 “The newbuild rig market is starting to show signs of shakiness,” Trey Stolz, an analyst at Iberia Capital Partners LLC in New Orleans who rates the shares the equivalent of buy and owns none, said today in a phone interview.
 Twitter would successfully raise $182 billion in its IPO and later settle with IBM in January by agreeing to buy 900 patents from IBM.
 Facebook IPO Facebook went through a similar fight with Yahoo and ended up buying 750 patents from IBM to settle the dispute in July 2012, two months after it began selling shares to the public.
 The Telesat purchase would come in two pieces: buying publicly traded Loral, which owns 63 percent of the company, and acquiring the rest from Canada’s Public Sector Pension Investment Board, which co-owns the satellite operator.
 and Carlyle Group LP had looked at buying Telesat, and all have dropped out of the bidding, the people familiar with the situation said.
 Mine owners including Lonmin Plc say they are losing $15 million a day and may buy metal to meet supply commitments.
 ‘Last Resort’ Lonmin Chief Executive Officer Ben Magara said earlier this month it would buy metal on the open market “as a last resort” The company runs operations from Johannesburg.
 Triton, which invests in medium-sized businesses in northern Europe, on April 1 agreed to buy a steam auxiliary components business for 730 million euros from France’s Alstom SA.
 As a result, multiple sets of buyers are making separate purchases and leaving volume-buying discounts on the table, said Silvio Abrahao Laban Neto, a professor of marketing at Insper Institute of Education and Research in Sao Paulo.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- IMC Financial Markets is in talks to buy Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s New York Stock Exchange market-making unit, two people familiar with the matter said.
 IntercontinentalExchange Group Inc’s NYSE relies on traders known as designated market makers, or DMMs, to facilitate the buying and selling of shares.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Transgene SA shares had the steepest decline in more than three years after Novartis AG decided not to buy the rights to the French drug developer’s experimental lung cancer therapy TG4010.
 About 57 percent of global fund managers said companies should spend their money on business investments rather than on increasing dividends or share buybacks, according to a Bank of America Corp.
 In Europe, an increase in mergers and acquisitions may signal that companies will move away from using cash to boost share buybacks and dividends to instead start growing their businesses, according to Raiffeisen Capital Management’s Herbert Perus.
 IMC Financial Markets is negotiating to buy the floor-trading business, according to two people familiar with the matter, who asked for anonymity because talks are private.
 pledged to preserve the trading floor in lower Manhattan when it agreed to buy the exchange in 2012.
 The NYSE has long relied on traders known as designated market makers to facilitate buying and selling.
 Getco LLC, now part of KCG Holdings Inc, agreed to buy Bank of America Corp’s business in 2011.
 Hong Kong Exchanges wants to expand its commodities trading after spending $22 billion buying the London Metal Exchange, the world’s largest metals bourse, in December 2012.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG’s asset management unit started the first US-based exchange traded fund that allows investors to buy Chinese stocks trading in both the domestic and foreign markets.
 Foreign investors are not allowed to buy local Chinese shares unless they are granted licenses and individual quotas by regulators.
 Market making is the banking practice of keeping an inventory of securities on hand so that their customers can always find someone to buy from or sell to.
 While Aereo questions that assessment, Diller says his goal is nothing short of upending the TV distribution system so consumers can buy programming they want, rather than the packages offered through cable and satellite.
 Deals Slaughter & May Advises OCBC $5 Billion Wing Hang Bank Bid Slaughter & May is advising Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, which offered HK$384 billion ($5 billion) to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 One loonie buys 9155 US.
 have all been called logical buyers for the company in the past.
 If the financial incentives are great enough, they might consider something like that” Coca-Cola may be more willing to open its wallet to increase its stake or buy the entire company if Keurig’s stock declined, Shah of Albert Fried said.
 Google is selling Motorola Mobility’s handset manufacturing business to Lenovo for $291 billion, after buying it for more than $12 billion in 2012.
 “After looking at the success of our deal, it became easier for other regional banks to follow” Sales of convertible notes, which combine a fixed-income security with an option to buy stock, have surged since Abe’s stimulus program sparked a 515 percent gain in the Topix benchmark index last year.
 The difference touched 67 basis points on April 18, the most in four years, as the Fed unwinds its bond-buying program while Japan and Europe consider additional purchases.
April 24 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Gazprom, Russia’s state gas exporter, presented Ukraine with an additional $114 billion bill for fuel it promised to buy last year, increasing pressure on the government in Kiev as the prospect of supply cuts looms.
 Ukraine, which is getting an international bailout to stave off default, met European Union and Slovakian officials today to discuss buying more gas from the rest of the continent.
 Naftogaz was obliged to buy at least 416 billion cubic meters of Russian gas last year under the contract, whether or not they took the volumes, according to Gazprom.
 By buying or selling the contract on the index before the constituent companies had been named, investors could wager on whether they expected credit conditions to improve or worsen.
 In 2007, the world’s largest banks that buy and sell credit swaps resisted efforts by CME Group Inc.
April 4 (Bloomberg) -- Leon Black, who made billions by buying up debt of companies in the US.
 Apollo Global Management LLC, the private equity and distressed debt specialist co-founded by Black, is starting a unit to primarily buy investment-grade and high-yield corporate debt from Latin America and Asia, according to Tolga Uzuner, the 41-year-old heading the group.
 “A lot of the credit-underwriting skills and requirements for emerging markets are similar to those in the firm’s other areas of focus” JPMorgan Background This will be the first time Apollo has created funds dedicated to developing countries, though some investments were previously made from buyout and credit funds, said Uzuner, who Apollo recruited in October as he was looking to raise money for his own hedge-fund firm, Brocade Capital Management.
 Record Deal Last year the firm exited its investment from LyondellBasell Industries NV, capping a gain of more than $10 billion, the largest ever for a private-equity deal, after buying debt in the chemicals maker at the height of the financial crisis.
 agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in gas reserves and a proposed liquefied natural gas facility in British Columbia from Petroliam Nasional Bhd.
 Sinopec also agreed to buy 3 million tons a year of LNG for 20 years from Petronas, making it one of the Malaysian state-owned company’s largest buyers of the fuel.
 The Kuala Lumpur-based company aims to reduce its share in Pacific NorthWest LNG, which runs the gas-export facility, to as low as 50 percent by selling stakes to Asian gas buyers, the unit’s President Greg Kist said in November.
 Recovering home prices and mortgage rates that have climbed from near-record lows last May have put real estate out of reach for some would-be buyers.
 Under a plan announced yesterday, wealthy individuals will be allowed to buy Hong Kong equities through the Shanghai exchange, broadening their investment options from a limited number of funds.
 The deal, which also allows overseas investors to buy mainland shares through Hong Kong, furthers China’s push to reduce capital controls after policy makers pledged the biggest expansion of economic freedoms since the 1990s and widened the yuan’s trading band.
 Pilot Program Under the pilot program due to start in about six months, Chinese institutions and investors with at least 500,000 yuan ($80,483) in their securities accounts will be able to buy Hong Kong shares using yuan through mainland brokerages, which will place their orders through Hong Kong’s exchange, according to a statement from the city’s Securities & Futures Commission.
 Currently, Chinese investors can only buy securities outside the mainland through asset managers as part of the Qualified Domestic Institutional Investor program, which began in 1996.
 A Shares “From a trading perspective, if you are an overseas investor, you will buy stocks traded at a discount to domestic A shares and stocks with a scarcity premium, or those that you don’t have in China,” said Paul Chan, the Hong Kong-based chief investment officer for Asia ex-Japan at Invesco, which oversees about $787 billion.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Northern Star Resources Ltd, an Australian gold producer that’s agreed deals to buy assets from Barrick Gold Corp, is seeking further acquisitions after raising about A$130 million ($120 million) in share sales.
 to drop a bid to buy British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc.
 “I’m not going to just spend money to try and buy that number one position,” Jim Lentz, Toyota’s North American chief executive, said in a 2013 interview.
 Mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 Mortgage interest rates are rising from record lows as the central bank withdraws its stimulus, and investors, who had helped drive national prices up more than 20 percent as they went on a buying spree, are now retreating.
 “Once it goes back to the normal owner-occupied purchase market, you really realize how weak the market is” While last year’s spring buying season was characterized by bidding wars across the country as buyers rushed to take advantage of record-low mortgage rates amid low inventory, the market so far in 2014 has been more affected by issues specific to local geographic areas.
 Phoenix, Denver Sales are slipping in Phoenix and Las Vegas, where traditional buyers aren’t stepping in to fill the void left by investors.
 The average dipped to 8 percent in 2009 and 2010, when tax incentives were put in place to encourage purchases by first-time buyers, who more often use federally-insured loans with lower down payment requirements.
 Prices have climbed so fast in the last two years that buyers have sticker shock, said Lawrence Yun, chief economist for the National Association of Realtors.
 “Investors have driven the market since the turn, back in early 2012, and investor demand is petering out” Investors who swooped in to take advantage of low prices -- including companies such as Blackstone Group LP and American Homes 4 Rent buying homes to turn them into rentals -- have retreated as costs rise and fewer distressed properties come to the market.
 Blackstone, whose Invitation Homes unit invested more than $8 billion in 43,000 homes, slashed its buying pace by 70 percent from last year’s peak, Jonathan Gray, the New York firm’s global head of real estate, said in March.
 He said he buys 10 to 15 homes a month, about half the pace of last year.
 It shocked some buyers and sapped some momentum from the housing market” Sales Decline Phoenix-area sales fell 26 percent in February from a year earlier and total spending on homes fell 16 percent, according to a report this month by the WP.
 Many first-time buyers can’t qualify for a new home mortgage, he said, leading builders to focus production on move-up buyers.
 “There’s not much out there and if there’s something you might consider, it’s gone in an hour” Nelson would like to buy a smaller home with a lower mortgage payment than the 4,600-square-foot (427-square-meter) house she bought in 2010, moving before her daughter goes to college in two years.
 In late 2012, Amber and Ben Hodge, working with Realtor Mike Caruso, quit their search to buy a home in Queen Creek, about 38 miles (61 kilometers) southeast of Phoenix, because competition was so heavy that agents for sellers didn’t even bother to call back when they made offers.
 “It’s nice being a buyer in this market because there are so many options,” she said.
 Horton, which has historically served first-time buyers, has been targeting more move-up shoppers as its traditional customers have been hurt by tight credit.
 posted higher-than-estimated earnings per share for the fiscal second quarter, raised its dividend payout and expanded a buyback program.
 “It’s the lack of bad news on the earnings front combined with the progress in the restructuring that’s really what’s pushing the stock,” Stephen Gengaro, an analyst at Sterne Agee & Leach in New York, who rates the shares a buy and owns none, said today in a phone interview.
 The company, which has 15 buy ratings from analysts, 16 holds and two sells, is the second-best performer this year in the Philadelphia Oil Service Index, climbing 32 percent.
April 15 (Bloomberg) -- Do you want to be buying what Kenneth Moelis is selling? The Wall Street veteran, who has helped companies from HJ Heinz Co.
 The firm ranked 12th among merger advisers in 2013, its highest-ever position, with roles on Heinz’s buyout and the merger of Omnicom Group Inc.
 “If you buy this stock just in time for a downdraft, Moelis could be a lot scarier” Ken Moelis will own stock valued at about $386 million, with another $100 million in trust for his family, according to a filing.
 With combined annual sales of about $57 billion, the merged group will have more buying power than Abercrombie & Fitch Co.
 “You used to get retailers essentially shopping in the northern hemisphere, buying their inventory and then making it up in Australia,” he said.
 Heritage Oil Plc surged 23 percent after Qatar’s royal family offered to buy the company for 924 million pounds ($156 billion).
 There’s still a lot of money in the market and investor behavior is quite positive, though geopolitical risks are rising” Stimulus Reduction The Fed will probably cut bond buying to $45 billion at the end of a two-day policy meeting, according to the median of economists’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Geothermal Inc, an energy project developer whose shares have doubled in the past year, agreed to buy Ram Power Corp’s proposed Geysers California geothermal project for $64 million in cash.
 Ram Power said in January 2013 it was seeking a partner or buyer for the project and would reduce staff to “enhance long-term cash flow” The sale will free up additional capital for the company, Antony Mitchell, executive chairman of the Reno, Nevada-based said in a separate statement.
 “If they were to buy something else in health care, it would be a good move” Bayer exited large parts of its specialty chemicals portfolio a decade ago by spinning off its Lanxess AG subsidiary.
 Dekkers wouldn’t say during Bayer’s quarterly earnings analyst call today whether he wants to buy the Merck unit or sell the plastics division.
 The executive has also said in the past he’s interested in buying animal-health assets, something he missed out on last week when Novartis AG agreed to sell its business to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Novartis said April 22 it would buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer-drug unit for as much as $16 billion, sell its vaccines unit to Glaxo for as much as $71 billion and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly for $54 billion.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- ING Groep NV, the biggest Dutch financial-services company, is considering buying a stake in Euronext NV as IntercontinentalExchange Group Inc.
 ICE plans to find buyers for as much as 30 percent of Euronext, the operator of the Paris, Brussels, Amsterdam and Lisbon exchanges, before it goes public this year, three people with knowledge of the matter said at the start of this year.
 The Netherlands isn’t planning to buy a stake, Dutch newswire ANP reported today, citing Finance Minister Jeroen Dijsselbloem.
 They plan to rejuvenate the 120-year-old department-store chain by buying brands in cosmetics and other categories to distribute alongside third-party labels, as well as expand it internationally, CEO Philippe Houze told Bloomberg in an interview last year.
 They need to make this work” Audi AG, the world’s second-largest premium automaker, is adding plug-in hybrid versions of already existing models as the reach of purely battery-powered vehicles remains a concern for many car buyers.
 Aereo would give consumers a new way to watch broadcast television without buying the packages offered by cable and satellite companies.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 In December, Pearson agreed to buy Grupo Multi, an English-language training company in Brazil, for about 440 million pounds to accelerate growth in its education business.
April 1 (Bloomberg) -- Profit at Aguas Andinas SA, Chile’s largest water utility, probably will rise as infrastructure investments and higher water tariffs come online, BTG Pactual said, reiterating a buy recommendation on the shares.
 As part of the deal, the buyers -- Martinley Holdings Ltd, Nabara Holdings Ltd, Vitect Services Ltd, Hayston Investments Ltd and Dawnaly Investments Ltd -- agreed to repay $128 million of Evraz’s intercompany debt, according to the statement.
 The Vevey, Switzerland-based company buys 410,000 tons of palm oil a year for use in ice creams, chocolate coatings and fried noodles, Philippe Aeschlimann, a spokesman, said in an April 24 e-mail.
 Unilever, which sells more than 400 brands of food and home products, including Ben & Jerry’s ice cream and Flora spreads and cooking oils, buys about 15 million tons of palm and its derivatives a year.
 Nestle, Unilever, Kellogg, Mondelez and Mars are among the companies that have said they will buy only palm certified by the Roundtable on Sustainable Palm Oil.
 To reduce dependence on the automotive industry, Continental agreed in February to buy Veyance Technologies from the Carlyle Group for 14 billion euros to strengthen its ContiTech plastics and rubber division.
 Yet they can view each other’s public documents such as TV ad buys at local stations and FEC filings to develop synchronized strategies.
 “I have no legislation pending before Congress, so why would I want to buy anybody? What would I do with them?” he asked, adding that his political donations reflect his patriotism.
 Consumers are buying fewer phones based on older technology as they wait for the introduction of the long-term evolution network, Chief Executive Officer Steve Mollenkopf said.
 He recommends buying the stock, as do 80 percent of analysts who cover the company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 ‘Depending on China’ “It might be ugly for another quarter or two, but China Mobile will make it happen one way or another,” said Alex Gauna, an analyst at JMP Securities LLC in San Francisco, who rates the shares the equivalent of a buy.
 Bank of America and the former executives were accused of failing to disclose mounting losses of billions of dollars at Merrill Lynch as it prepared to buy the brokerage firm at the peak of the financial crisis.
 The bank has faced regulatory probes, investor lawsuits and criticism from lawmakers over claims it didn’t warn shareholders about spiraling losses at Merrill before they voted in December 2008 to buy the brokerage, an acquisition that was completed the following month.
 The Navy should consider buying fewer of the ships if its limitations prevent effective use in the Pacific, the report said, following others that have questioned the cost, mission and survivability in combat of the ship.
 Navy will probably keep buying Littoral Combat Ships because it doesn’t really have an alternative, according to Richard Bitzinger, a senior fellow at the S.
 Any such dip should be seen as a buying opportunity” Hong Kong’s Hang Seng Index and the Hang Seng China Enterprises Index of mainland shares listed in the city both gained 02 percent.
 gained 13 percent to 1,674 yen in Tokyo as UBS AG lifted its recommendation to buy from neutral on the ham and sausage maker.
 Wells Fargo said last week that it’s seeing more cash buyers in the housing market.
 “Some of those cash buyers were investors, both individuals and private equity firms and the like, and that had an impact on home prices,” Wells Fargo’s Sloan said.
 “If you look at the year-over-year increase in home prices being in the low teens, our folks think probably a third of that increase was due to the impact of investors as buyers” Institutional Landlords Private-equity firms, hedge funds, real estate investment trusts and other institutional landlords have spent more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 rental homes in the last two years.
 Airlines buying large commercial aircraft will require $100 billion in financing this year, according to Avolon estimates.
 In December, AerCap Holdings NV agreed to buy International Lease Finance Corp.
 At the start of his trial in the Tokyo District Court today, Echigo accepted prosecutors’ argument that he bribed a pension fund executive to buy investment products.
 He entertained Tsurisawa in return for buying 1 billion yen of investment products for trading company Mitsui’s retirement fund, and to procure future business, prosecutors said today.
 Underwriters have a 30-day option to buy an additional 34 million shares.
 “Contract pricing is starting to come down,” said Van Hees, who recommends buying the stock.
April 6 (Bloomberg) -- Sibanye Gold Ltd, South Africa’s biggest miner of the metal by production, will consider buying platinum mines once a strike over wages that’s crippling the sector is resolved.
 “There’s nothing specific on the table right now, but we’re open to the idea” of buying platinum mines, some of which may go on sale after the strike, James Wellsted, a spokesman for the company, said by telephone today.
 When a local currency is suffering, people tend to spend savings on long-term goods such as appliances and materials for property repairs, in order to buy before their money doesn’t go as far, said Mikhail Burmistrov, head of St.
 “Russia is totally different from Europe: When you buy a new flat here, it’s empty and you need to do everything -- and for us this is a big market,” he said.
 7 note, when he initiated coverage of Strauss with a buy rating and a 74-shekel target price.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study by the consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 Lincoln is looking at buyers between 35 and 40 years old and living predominantly in larger cities, he said.
 The company said the quarterly dividend will rise to 40 cents a share from 38 cents, and it authorized a $65 billion stock buyback after the Fed approved the lender’s capital plan.
 agreed to buy 407 megawatts of wind power from Warren Buffett’s MidAmerican Energy Holdings Co, the technology company’s largest deal to date for renewable energy.
 and other companies, are buying buying power from renewable energy projects to curb greenhouse-gas emissions.
 Google has agreed to buy more than a gigawatt of clean power.
 Aereo would give consumers a new way to watch broadcast television without buying the packages offered by cable and satellite companies.
 Separately, Amazon said it agreed to buy New York-based ComiXology, which offers a library of digital-comic books and graphic novels.
 Of 114 possible buyers contacted, 31 signed confidentiality agreements to learn more about Sbarro, Adam Keil, a managing director at investment bank Moelis & Co, said April 4 in a filing in US.
 Sbarro’s secured lenders already have a proposal to buy the company under a reorganization plan that provides for an auction to test the market for higher bids.
 withdrew a buy recommendation for the stock.
 Telenor ASA of Norway last year agreed to buy the Bulgarian unit of Hellenic Telecommunications Organization, also known as OTE.
 Deutsche Telekom has also offered to buy the Greek government’s 10 percent stake in OTE, people familiar with the talks said in January.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 The hedge-fund manager, who last year considered relocating to Puerto Rico to take advantage of new tax laws, said opportunities to buy real estate in the region won’t last much longer, and he’s looking to purchase sites that can be developed to serve people he expects to move here because of the legislation.
 raised its rating on Babcock to buy from hold, saying it is in a strong position to beat earnings forecasts due to improved margins and yesterday’s announcement that a unit’s joint venture was named a preferred bidder to buy nuclear-site licencing companies.
 Vulcan Stake About 3 percent of new vehicle sales were handled through TrueCar, which funnels interested buyers to car dealers.
 The company gets $300 from dealers for each customer it refers who buys a new vehicle, and $400 for each used car sale it arranges, Painter said.
 for mobile and music devices -- this year as talks with potential buyers are making progress.
 The company also will free up more cash for stock buybacks by suspending its dividend -- a move applauded by its largest shareholder, billionaire Carl Icahn.
 “That’s what’s defeating Ackman” The dividend suspension may buy Herbalife Chief Executive Officer Michael Johnson more time as he waits for the multiple investigations to play out.
 Herbalife will use cash from the discontinued dividend to buy back $216 million more of its shares than previously planned.
 Stiritz, the Herbalife shareholder who also serves as CEO of Post Holdings Inc, said last year that he’d be willing to take part in a buyout of Herbalife if that came to pass.
 He said yesterday that stock buybacks could be a move toward that end.
 Orix may seek to team up with another investor to buy PrimeCredit Ltd, said one of the people, asking not to be identified because the information is private.
 Atsushi Horii, a spokesman for Orix in Tokyo, declined to comment on whether the company is interested in buying PrimeCredit.
 Orix said last month that it’s in talks to buy Hartford Financial Services Group Inc’s Japan operations.
 The Swedish firm may reach a deal to buy LTS Lohmann for about 12 billion euros ($17 billion) within the next month ahead of French investment firm Wendel SA, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Evonik held talks to buy the company and then dropped out in February, the people said.
 Nordic, a Stockholm-based firm that specializes in buying companies in Scandinavian and German-speaking countries, raised 35 billion euros for its eighth buyout fund, Nordic Capital Fund VIII in December.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 “Stabilizing growth and disinflationary pressures in recent data globally have been the signal to buy stocks,” said Daniel Weston, a portfolio manager at Aimed Capital GmbH in Munich.
 The new strategy will focus on expanding into emerging economies through organic growth, rather than buying businesses to move into new markets.
 Natixis SA raised the network-equipment maker to buy from neutral, saying that telecommunications companies will increase their capital expenditure.
 As part of about $23 billion of funding in euro and dollarbonds and loans to buy SFR, Drahi may pay about 775 percent ininterest on $29 billion of eight-year junk notes with apreliminary B rating from Standard & Poor’s.
 bond market andproviding solid returns will play well,” said Chris Ucko, a NewYork-based analyst at debt researcher CreditSights Inc, whichissued a report on the bond sale entitled “Priced to MakeFriends” The leveraged buyout signals a return of confidence in theeuro region, which was in danger of breaking up two years ago asGreece, Ireland, Portugal and Spain sought bailouts amid asovereign debt crisis.
 The deal comes after Western Europeanbuyers announced $149 billion of acquisitions in the first threemonths of the year, a nearly 60 percent gain from the start of2013 that outpaced increases in North America and Asia.
 The lender has also expanded in the US, buying $57 billion of US.
 Mitsui Fudosan Residential Co, a unit of Mitsui Fudosan, plans to explain the details of the defects to buyers of the apartments from April 10, the city said.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Xstrata Plc, the global commodities trading and mining group, agreed to buy Caracal Energy Inc.
 Caracal, which last month agreed to buy TransGlobe for about C$696 million ($635 million) in stock, said it paid a fee of $925 million for terminating that deal.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Saab AB, the maker of the Gripen fighter jet, said it’s in talks to buy a marine defense unit from ThyssenKrupp AG, which would put the submarine and warship production into the hands of a Swedish company.
 14 that Saab and the Swedish Defence Materiel Administration were in talks about Saab potentially buying the Kockums shipyard to secure Swedish exports of submarines.
 Saab Chief Executive Officer Hakan Buskhe told TV4 on April 8 that the company is prepared to buy ThyssenKrupp’s Karlskrona shipyard to add the capacity and knowledge to build submarines.
 Energy Future was taken private in the largest leveraged buyout in history more than six years ago.
 While Michael Lewis’s new book “Flash Boys” sparked a nationwide debate on whether speed traders rip off the stock market, the potential hazards haven’t stopped investors from buying.
 “You’re buying into the hope that the economy is going to continue to improve, and that the lows we saw over the winter were due to weather” Investment Shift An investor retreat from some of the bull market’s biggest winners also helped industrial shares as money shifted to companies with stable earnings, according to Jim McDonald, chief investment strategist at Chicago-based Northern Trust Corp.
 Bonds declined yesterday after Energy Minister Yuri Prodan said Ukraine won’t buy Russian gas for storage until a price is agreed and Russian President Vladimir Putin told his government to draw up a plan to replace Ukrainian imports.
 President Dilma Rousseff, then Petrobras’ chairwoman, said last month that directors approved the $370 million purchase of a 50 percent stake without knowledge of a clause that later forced it to buy the rest as part of a $8205 million legal settlement.
 While the company has had offers to buy the refinery, Foster said the board doesn’t recommend divesting Pasadena after years of investments and a federal investigation into the deal.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 In 2012, Toyota announced a three-year plan to buy the Tesla components for 2,600 vehicles, sales of which totaled 1,525 through March.
 The bank was cut to hold from buy last month by Riyad Capital, which said the “advantage Rajhi enjoyed over peers in asset yields and net interest margins is shrinking” JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Man Group Plc increased 47 percent to 1067 pence as the hedge-fund manager bought back some of its shares and HSBC Holdings Plc upgraded the stock to overweight, which is similar to a buy recommendation, from underweight.
 The costs of those transmissions would vary widely, depending on what satellite packages they buy.
 Mounting concern that economic growth is slowing in China, Vale’s biggest buyer, is pushing down iron-ore prices and holding the miner’s shares close to a five-year low.
 stocks fluctuated after the Federal Reserve pared its monthly bond-buying program and said the economy is gaining momentum.
 Gas Discount Ostchem Holding AG, the Austrian company that unites Firtash’s Ukrainian fertilizer producers, buys gas from Gazprom at a discounted price of about $270 per 1,000 cubic meters, or 30 percent less than Gazprom’s customers in Europe paid on average last year, according to the people.
 Daimler will also buy Evonik’s 10 percent share in their Deutsche Accumotive battery partnership to take full control of that business, the Stuttgart, Germany-based carmaker said today in a joint statement with the chemical producer.
 A “three-digit-million” euro sum and a lot of extra risk would be needed to keep up with the industry’s rapid development, prompting Essen, Germany-based Evonik to seek a buyer for its battery activities, Engel said.
 when KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners acquired it for $48 billion in 2007, and the stumbles of other huge deals of the past decade have reshaped how major buyout firms go about their trade.
 The Dallas-based utility’s bankruptcy yesterday ended the biggest leveraged buyout on record and will wipe out most of the $83 billion of equity that investors led by three of the world’s largest private-equity firms sank into the company.
 “Energy Future is emblematic of the peak of the buyout boom, when firms did very high-priced, over-leveraged deals that left little room for error,” said Steven Kaplan, professor at the University of Chicago Booth School of Business.
 “When you buy into a cyclical industry at the peak and you get the bet wrong, bad things happen” TXU marked the climax of an era when buyouts stretched into the tens of billions on dollars and Carlyle Group LP’s David Rubenstein predicted there would be a $100 billion LBO.
 After many of those deals faltered in the 2007-2009 global financial crisis, private-equity investors mostly shied away from companies valued at $20 billion and up, arguing that such buyouts are often overpriced, overburdened with debt and too big to exit easily.
 Since the end of 2008, two private-equity buyouts priced above $20 billion have been announced, both in 2013.
 TPG told investors last year that its next fund will largely stay away from the biggest buyouts, according to a person who attended the firm’s annual meeting in October.
 Debt Markets Three private-equity executives interviewed for this story said they didn’t expect a revival of super-sized buyouts any time soon.
 Those conditions in 2007 set the stage for a buyout that loaded Energy Future with $40 billion of debt, or 82 times the company’s adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, a common yardstick for leverage.
 buyouts in 2013, according to Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ.
 ‘Poor-Performing’ The biggest buyout funds have lagged behind smaller competitors in recent years, according to London-based research firm Preqin Ltd.
 It wasn’t until November 2011 that a corporate buyout once again topped $7 billion in size.
 Large company deal valuations fell from the boom-era median of 127 times Ebitda to 86 for the nine largest corporate buyouts completed from 2009 to 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 and 2012’s $715 billion buyout of oil and gas driller EP Energy by Apollo Global and others.
 Even as lenders have opened their purses, buyout firms continue to apply the brakes to jumbo deals.
 Multiple Managers Limited partners, the pension systems and other financial institutions that supply the money buyout firms invest, have curbed commitments to buyout funds raised since 2009, shrinking sponsors’ capital.
 Clients have also pressed firms to avoid banding together with two or more competitors to raise the billions of dollars of equity that the biggest buyouts demand.
 Last year’s $249 billion Dell buyout skirted that issue because company founder Michael Dell provided most of the equity, with a single buyout firm, Silver Lake Management LLC, furnishing the rest.
 Fundraising Woes TPG, which is preparing to raise a new buyout fund this year, told limited partners at its annual meeting last year that it will avoid megadeals unless an opportunity is exceptional, according to an investor who attended.
 KKR’s $313 billion takeover of RJR Nabisco in 1989, by far the largest buyout of its era, barely escaped bankruptcy in 1990 and dealt KKR a loss of about $816 million on its $36 billion equity investment, according to a confidential KKR marketing document obtained by Bloomberg News.
 “Even though most firms say they won’t pursue mega-buyouts, in the private-equity industry memories can be short and some just can’t help themselves,” said David Fann, president and CEO of TorreyCove Capital Partners LLC, a San Diego-based pension-fund adviser.
 Partners plans to buy ground-mounted plants in northern and central Italy, Daum said.
 Quarterly Data February through early April is the biggest business season for Japanese wireless operators as parents typically buy a smartphone for children who pass entrance exams for high schools or universities.
 Logitech on March 6 also announced a share buyback program of $250 million, to be completed in three years.
 He has an outperform rating for the shares, meaning investors should buy the stock.
 Dubai has been taking steps to limit the buying and selling of incomplete properties, known as flipping, that was blamed for playing a major part in the 2008 crash.
 The Land Department raised the transaction fee to 4 percent from 2 percent last year, and the United Arab Emirates Central Bank imposed restrictions on the value of mortgages made available to foreign buyers to try and cool the market.
 The maker of Barbie dolls and Fisher-Price in February agreed to buy Mega Brands Inc.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Taiwan’s stocks rose the most in two weeks on speculation that government funds are buying equities after a selloff last week triggered by concern the construction of a nuclear power plant would be halted.
 Of the 33 analysts that cover the company, 14 recommend buying the shares, 18 have hold ratings and one advise selling the stock.
 Buybacks, Dividends The top contractors have been buying back stock, and most have cut costs and increased dividends to satisfy investors.
 Former Barclays Chief Executive Officer Diamond saidhis investment firm Atlas Mara, which this week agreed to buyBancABC for as much as $265 million, will spur investor interestby helping to develop African capital markets.
 Atlantic wouldn’t buy the bonds, he said.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG agreed to buy the rights from Spain’s Oryzon Genomics SA to an experimental drug that’s meant to switch on genes that block the growth of cancer, a new area in the crowded field of potential oncology therapies.
 “It’s an opportunity to really be one of the first companies out there” Roche also said today it will buy IQuum Inc, a Marlborough, Massachusetts-based maker of molecular-diagnostics products, for $275 million in cash and potential additional payments of as much as $175 million.
 The company, which is constructing part of a 1,200-kilometer (750-mile) gas conduit with partner Petroleos Mexicanos, is expected to be one of the main pipeline suppliers for energy and gas providers that buy into Mexico, said Federico Robinson, an analyst at Actinver SA.
 Credit Suisse’s Quiroga rates it the equivalent of a buy with a target price of 71 pesos.
 Five analysts rate the stock a buy, four recommend holding and one recommends selling, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Deals V&E, Gibson Dunn, Bingham on ETP $18 Billion Deal for Susser Vinson & Elkins LLP advised Energy Transfer Partners LP, the pipeline company run by billionaire Kelcy Warren, which agreed to buy Susser Holdings Corp.
 Seven Firms Advise on Forest Laboratories Acquisition of Furiex Covington & Burling LLP was legal counsel for Forest Laboratories Inc, the drugmaker being acquired by Actavis Plc, which agreed to buy Furiex Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Simpson Advises Alibaba on $122 Billion Stake in Youku Tudou Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP’s Katie Sudol is leading a team advising Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, which along with founder Jack Ma’s Yunfeng Capital agreed to buy a $122 billion stake in the video website Youku Tudou Inc.
 Joint Bid Prelios is jointly bidding with Fortress for UniCredit SpA’s bad loan management unit and they also offered to buy a majority stake of Banco Popolare SC’s bad bank called Release, Serrini said.
 Lone Star Funds and its partners are the biggest buyers of real estate loans in Europe so far this year, followed by Cerberus, Cushman & Wakefield Inc.
 The company also unveiled a new grocery service for its Prime members called Prime Pantry, which lets people buy goods in bulk to pack into a box that holds as much as 45 pounds and that can be shipped for a flat $599 fee.
 “Amazon keeps spending like drunken sailors,” said Gene Munster, an analyst with Piper Jaffray Cos, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 recommended buying the train operator’s shares.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 It can also leave banks tempted to serve a different client than the company: the fund manager who regularly buys into IPOs and is seeking to pay as little as possible for the stock, he said.
 She rates the stock a buy.
 “They only don’t work out on average for the buyers because they overpaid” Managers need to execute on promised savings and communicate quickly with the market and clients about the benefits of the merger, he said.
 While IEX welcomes high-frequency traders as market makers, the firm has curbs that slow the pace of buying and selling.
 Maloni said it was prudent for the league to buy time as it investigated the veracity of the recording; Johnson said the NBA waiting until today before issuing any kind of discipline has allowed the story to grow and dominate the news cycle without resolution.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Energy Transfer Partners LP, the owner of 35,000 miles of natural gas pipelines, will buy gasoline-station owner Susser Holdings Corp.
 Deals-Obsessed Warren, who didn’t speak on today’s call, acknowledged in a September interview a reputation as a deals-obsessed “cowboy” He led a $13 billion buying spree in 2011 and 2012 to expand the reach of his company’s group of master-limited partnerships, or MLPs.
 Energy Transfer forecast annual savings of $70 million from consolidating fuel buying, merchandising and other operations, and said further savings are likely.
 In their complaint, they alleged that in 2007, the CBOT and CME began letting high-frequency traders peek “at all orders to buy and sell futures contracts before they were reflected” to the rest of the market.
 That glimpse occurred “before the person or entity entering the buy or sell order received confirmation that their order was received -- in other words before anyone other than the HFTs were privy to this information,” according to the plaintiffs.
 “We have only one data feed, no one can buy it to be faster than anyone else,” she said.
 The move to expand the board and appease shareholders could give the retailer more time to execute its turnaround strategy, rather than having a strategic or financial buyer step in, Mizuho’s Chen said.
 Housing demand has weakened since the middle of last year as rising prices and borrowing costs put ownership out of reach for some prospective buyers.
 Buyer Traffic “After a dismal winter, more buyers got an opportunity to look at homes last month and are beginning to make contract offers,” NAR chief economist Lawrence Yun said in a statement.
 New-home sales also retreated as buyers balked at record prices.
 Home Prices Harsh winter weather at the beginning of the year further slowed housing as snow and frigid temperatures stalled construction and kept some buyers indoors.
 A pickup in housing demand may prove difficult as first-time buyers struggle to obtain credit and builders design new homes for a higher-end market.
 are raising prices and fewer are targeting first-time buyers.
 show, and none of the 17 analysts who cover it advise buying the stock.
 Hochtief’s offer to buy three of every eight shares held by minority investors closes May 9.
 In Spain, where Vodafone Group Plc agreed to buy cable provider Grupo Corporativo Ono SA last month, Orange sees “no urgency” to make a move on a target like Jazztel Plc, Pellissier said.
 ‘Buying Opportunities’ “People are hesitant to buy,” Chris Osborne, the New York-based chief executive officer at Sberbank CIB’s subsidiary in US, said by e-mail yesterday.
 “Political crises are historically good buying opportunities, but further sanctions, if they are serious, present an asymmetric downside for the Russian market” The Bloomberg Russia-US Equity Index fell 07 percent to 8237 yesterday.
 T-Mobile, which was the first to introduce phone purchase payment plans and buyout offers to lure customers out of competitors’ contracts, is expected to have added about 1 million monthly customers in the first quarter, according to the average of nine estimates from analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Ahmad Zuaiter, who was a money manager at Soros Fund Management from 2006 to 2011 before founding Dubai-based hedge fund Jadara Capital Partners Ltd, said in a telephone interview that he began buying Argentine bonds and American depositary receipts after the election results in August.
April 25 (Bloomberg) -- The number of Britons buying their first home climbed to the highest in more than six years in March as the government’s Help-to-Buy program enabled borrowers to take out loans with smaller down payments.
 The average buyer borrowed 835 percent of the value of their home, 29 percentage points more than a year earlier, according to LSL’s report.
 The Help-to-Buy program, allowing purchasers to take out a mortgage with a down payment of as little as 5 percent, is prompting banks to offer more loans to first-time buyers.
 and spend as much as 500 billion yen ($49 billion) buying back shares as Japan’s largest wireless carrier cuts prices to lure customers.
 The company also will buy back as many as 320 million, or about 77 percent, of its shares through a repurchasing plan extending from tomorrow through March 31.
 The planned stake sale and share buyback come as competition for new subscribers in Japan intensifies amid a declining population and after NTT Docomo became the last of Japan’s three carriers to offer Apple Inc.
 “The financial guidance, and the share sale and its own share buyback all mean Docomo is showing the real financial status of the company” Net income in the year ended March 31 was 46473 billion yen, a 54 percent decrease from a year earlier, the company said today in a statement.
 February through early April is the biggest business season for Japanese wireless operators as parents typically buy a smartphone for children who pass entrance exams for high schools or universities.
 “When you have these large transactions back to back to back, it just begs the question of what do the big pharma guys think about this? Right now, Pfizer’s probably coming to the conclusion that it needs to have a ‘buy’ mentality” Informal Talks New York-based Pfizer held informal, now-discontinued talks with AstraZeneca about possibly buying the London-based company, two people familiar with the matter told Bloomberg News this week, asking not to be identified.
 The largest of those deals was Actavis’s agreement in February to buy Forest Labs for about $21 billion.
 today announced an offer to buy Botox wrinkle treatment maker Allergan Inc.
 Columbia is buying the brand from Steelpoint Capital Partners and other investors in a cash transaction, according to a statement today.
April 11 (Bloomberg) -- A contract for France’s largest natural gas company to buy the commodity from Azerbaijan shows the decades-old structure of Europe’s energy market is starting to crumble.
 For the first time, GDF Suez SA signed a 25-year contract to buy gas from BP Plc and partners in the former Soviet republic at prices tied to those in Western Europe’s domestic gas markets, a person with knowledge of the matter said, asking not to be named because the terms are confidential.
 The Shah Deniz partners have agreements to sell more than 10 billion cubic meters of gas year starting in 2019 to nine different buyers, including Italy’s Enel SpA and EON.
 “It’s still a discussion that hasn’t been completely solved because long-term certainty is needed” Gazprom will probably reduce the price it charges European buyers in a bid to overcome competitors such as Azerbaijan, Societe Generale said in a March 19 report.
 drugmaker proposed buying AstraZeneca Plc for about 588 billion pounds ($987 billion) in what would rank as the industry’s biggest-ever takeover, surpassing Pfizer’s $64 billion purchase of Wyeth in 2009.
 The company concluded that, absent a specific and attractive proposal, it was not appropriate to engage in discussions with Pfizer’’ “They’re sellers, we’re buyers,” Read said.
 “They are trying to buy what they think is feasible, not necessarily what is most strategic” Pfizer’s interest has surprised some analysts and investors, given that AstraZeneca faces the loss of patent protection on some of its best-selling drugs.
 Unless Pfizer thinks they are the experts on dealing with patent cliffs, I can’t see why they would want to buy them” Cancer Focus Pascal Soriot, AstraZeneca’s CEO, joined the company in October 2012 from Roche Holding AG, where he was head of pharmaceuticals at the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs.
 Valeant this month offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment, in a cash-and-stock deal valued at about $457 billion.
 Novartis also agreed to buy London-based GlaxoSmithKline’s cancer drugs for as much as $16 billion while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo for $71 billion and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 “No news is good news, and we do not expect any meaningful incremental charges for litigation or conduct issues,” Ian Gordon, an analyst at Investec Plc who has a buy rating on Barclays, said in an e-mailed note.
 Record-low borrowing costs and demand from overseas buyers helped London home prices gain 138 percent to more than 414,000 pounds ($690,000) in the year through February, according to the Land Registry.
 Ocwen, Nationstar Mortgage LLC and other non-bank servicers have been buying servicing rights as lenders such as Citigroup Inc.
 The ruble fell yesterday after Finance Minister Anton Siluanov said Russia will resume buying foreign exchange for one of its sovereign wealth funds “in days” The currency depreciated 01 percent to 414809 versus the central bank’s target basket of dollars and euros by 6 pm.
 jumped to the highest level on record after the biggest traded construction contractor in the United Arab Emirates said it plans to buy a European company and spin off a unit.
 He represents private-equity sponsors in matters including M&A, leveraged buyouts and portfolio company operations and exits.
 Federal Reserve policy makers are scaling back its bond buying.
 Sometimes the best hedge is to sell what you own rather than buy protection” The cost of insuring corporate debt around the world has fallen to the lowest levels in years.
 Creditors including hedge funds and other investors stand to take over the units - some more than 40 years old - for cents on the dollar after KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs lost billions on them in the biggest leveraged buyout in history.
 agreed earlier this month to pay 2269 billion yuan ($36 billion) to buy Chinese banking and brokerage assets from its state-owned parent.
 Gerry Jordan, president of Hellman Jordan Management Co, said the recall crisis was an opportunity to buy.
 Valeant climbed 73 percent to $13515 at 3:26 pm, after Canada’s largest drugmaker offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of Botox wrinkle treatment, in a cash and stock deal valued at $457 billion.
 When announcing a new operating plan in conjunction with the buyback and dividend that month, the CEO said he joined “as an agent of change” and that he would “align our cost structure around this new strategy” The job cuts will reduce Juniper’s internal bureaucracy, said Jason Noah Ader, an analyst at William Blair & Co.
 “It’s long overdue; this is a company that has been pretty badly mismanaged,” Ader, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock, said in an interview.
 China’s active pharmaceutical ingredient manufacturers are less well known and drugmakers that buy from them must confirm the products’ quality.
 He’s the hero of the 2011 novel “The Shipping Man,” a New York hedge fund manager who becomes so captivated by wild swings in freight rates that he buys a dry-cargo carrier and sets off on an adventure leading to run-ins with Somali pirates and Greek tycoons.
 “Now is a great time to be buying these loans because there’s an oversupply,” Marc Lasry, co-founder and chief executive officer of Avenue Capital Group LLC, a New York-based company which oversees $136 billion including shipping debt, said by phone April 24.
 The book’s hero, Robert Fairchild, sums it up: “What was it about the international shipping business that was so appealing? Robert wondered as he listened to his former investor bemoan the fact that there weren’t enough shares for Eurkea! Capital to buy.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Permira Advisers LLP agreed to buy German manufacturer CABB International from Bridgepoint to tap demand for chemicals used in pesticides, cosmetics and food.
 24 it agreed to buy BRFkredit A/S for about 74 billion kroner ($14 billion) to expand in mortgage lending.
 Spar Nord Bank A/S, Denmark’s fourth-largest listed lender has “expressed its interest” to buy parts of Copenhagen-based FIH Erhvervsbank A/S, it said last month.
 CapitaLand is realigning its business to focus on more profitable opportunities in Singapore and China by offering to buy the rest of its mall unit to consolidate some businesses and boost returns.
 CapitaLand earlier this month offered to buy CapitaMalls Asia -- whose Singapore malls include ION Orchard and Plaza Singapura along the city’s famed Orchard Road shopping strip -- for S$306 billion.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac keep money flowing in the housing market by buying mortgages from lenders and packaging them into securities.
 Berkshire also makes loans to customers who buy manufactured homes.
 Mounting concern that economic growth is slowing in China, Vale’s biggest buyer, is pushing down iron-ore prices and holding the miner’s shares close to a five-year low.
 S&P cut its grade two levels to AA, citing ADP’s plan to use the proceeds to buy back stock, while Moody’s lowered its ranking one step to Aa1, saying the diminished scale of operations and variety of ADP’s products increases the company’s credit risk.
 They haven’t dealt with capital issues and the market has come to realize that” ‘Tight Capital’ UBS AG cut Deutsche Bank to neutral from buy this week on concern capital levels will decrease as the bank protects its bottom line by delaying cost-cutting.
 Profit Estimate Shares of Nomura rose after the company announced plans to reward shareholders for last year’s results by buying back shares and increasing dividends.
 Aluminum dropped 08 percent to lead industrial metals lower as zinc, lead and tin declined in London on concern that demand will ebb from China, the biggest buyer of industrial metals and energy.
 Cosan, the Sao Paulo-based company controlled by billionaire Rubens Ometto, last week won the blessing of ALL’s controlling shareholders including pension fund Previ to buy the train operator for about $3 billion in an all-stock deal.
 plans to lead investment in energy projects in Africa by buying into South African shale gas projects and helping to fund what could be the world’s biggest power generation complex in Democratic Republic of Congo.
 The continent’s largest money manager, which is based in the South African capital of Pretoria and has 16 trillion rand ($153 billion) under management and holds about 11 percent of the stock of companies traded in Johannesburg, will buy stakes in energy companies operating in Africa, its chief executive officer, Elias Masilela, 49, said in an April 1 interview in Johannesburg.
 For the aggregates, which are crushed rock, gravel and sand, potential buyers are Vulcan Materials Co.
 “This divestment plan represents a very good opportunity for potential buyers” Representatives for Cemex, Titan, CRH and Martin Marietta didn’t respond to requests for comment.
 Dublin-based CRH, the third-biggest producer of both aggregates and ready-mixed concrete in the US, has operations in those states and is a logical buyer, she said.
 “So they may be limited in what they can actually buy” HeidelbergCement spokesman Andreas Schaller declined to comment beyond CEO Bernd Scheifele’s April 17 statement that while there were expansion possibilities, the world’s third-largest cement maker would not do any “crazy deals at crazy multiples” Mariangiola Fiore, a spokeswoman for Buzzi Unicem, declined to comment, saying the company is waiting until the terms of the disposals are clearly defined.
 Interest will come down to whether the aggregates assets are in fast-growing cities and near buyers’ existing operations, he said.
 Peter Rose, a spokesman for New York-based Blackstone, declined to comment on whether it’s an interested buyer.
 said they agreed to sell most of a 217 billion-euro ($30 billion) loan book to buyers including Lone Star Funds LP and Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Investors agreed to buy more than 90 percent of the loan book from Irish Bank Resolution Corp, liquidators at KPMG LLP said in a statement today, without disclosing how much the loans sold for.
 Lone Star in February won an auction to buy about 85 percent of IBRC’s 63 billion-pound ($105 billion) UK.
 Condor, of Hauppauge, New York, buys and services auto loans made to people whose credit ratings don’t qualify them for prime lending rates, Lawsky said in the complaint.
 and Telefonica SA have said they would adopt a separate currency system called Sicad I, which was created last year for importers of non-essential products and closed at 10 per dollar yesterday, Brink’s said it didn’t anticipate being able to buy dollars in that market.
 Bancorp said April 14 it will purchase Ally Financial Inc’s custodian bank, adding 40 employees, and in January announced plans to buy 94 branches from RBS Citizens Financial Group Inc.
 by as soon as next year, Musk, 42, will attempt to accomplish what the Chinese government has struggled to do: get people to buy electric cars.
 China lags behind its target of 5 million alternative energy-powered vehicles by 2020 as a lack of charging stations and high costs deter buyers, even as air pollution worsens and chokes its inhabitants.
 Beijing’s license-plate lotteries underscore the extent of the challenges automakers have had luring electric-car buyers in China.
 to buy Eike Batista’s 33 percent stake in SIX Semicondutores SA for 40 million reais ($18 million).
 Record-low interest rates and government incentives to help home buyers have fueled demand for UK.
 Investors can also buy 10-year notes that yield 17 times the increase in the index.
 Mylan’s latest rejection follows a $15 billion bid for Actavis that the company spurned last May in favor of buying Warner Chilcott Plc.
 Mylan also was among drugmakers that considered buying Elan Corp, which was acquired by Perrigo Co.
 It was able to buy Strides Arcolab Ltd’s injectable drug unit Agila Specialties for less than $2 billion in December.
 Teva, which hasn’t done a sizable deal since 2011, could be a buyer, Heupel said.
 Amsellem of Piper Jaffray said Perrigo or Valeant may also want to buy Mylan.
 While liquidity remains good, Toys ‘R’ Us is “hamstrung” by debt from its 2005 leveraged buyout, with a ratio of debt to earnings before interest, depreciation, amortization and taxes of more than eight times, Moody’s said.
 since KKR & Co, Bain Capital LLC and Vornado Realty Trust took it over in a $66 billion buyout.
 Generic-drug makers have been consolidating and buying up new assets as a way to broaden their revenue to include more profitable brand-name drugs and injectable medicines that face less competition.
 Actavis Plc, a Dublin-based drugmaker with operations in New Jersey, in February agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 Valeant this week teamed with Bill Ackman, the billionaire hedge fund manager, in a $457 billion bid to buy Allergan Inc, the maker of the Botox cosmetic treatment.
 Lonmin won’t send similar notices to customers and will buy metal on the open market for supplies “as a last resort,” Magara said.
 “Focusing separately on just one or the other misses the entire point of how buyers and sellers are brought together” Berman is one of the SEC’s policy advisers on rules that affect high-frequency traders, dark pools, and other elements of computerized trading that evolved after years of regulatory changes and advances in technology.
 In the US, Orix is interested in buying non-financial companies such as solar-power plants and wind-farm operators, Inoue said in an interview in Tokyo on April 8.
 “We’ll only buy something exciting and reasonable price-wise,” said Inoue, 61, without giving specific targets.
 Hartford Talks Orix said last month that it’s in talks to buy Hartford Financial Services Group Inc’s Japan operations.
 “If there is any good deal, we would be willing to spend as much as we did to buy Robeco,” said Inoue, who has been president since 2011 and became co-chief executive officer with incumbent Yoshihiko Miyauchi, 78, on Jan.
 company aiming to buy its energy assets, which generate more than 70 percent of sales.
 “None of these big players buying Alstom is going to have a smooth ride,” said Simon Toennessen, an analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG.
 Europe’s residents and tourists buy 34 percent of the world’s luxury goods, according to Bain, making the region the single biggest battleground for high-end brands.
 The company also is siphoning off tourists, including Chinese travelers, who had been buying the French and Italian brands, he said.
 Iron Ore The three countries buy more of Australia’s iron ore, coal and other exports than the rest of its customers combined.
 The firm continues the small-cap activist strategy developed by Smith and Mark Mitchell since 2002 and Peter Feld since 2005 -- buying stakes in companies they call undervalued and pushing executives and directors for changes such as unit spin-offs and asset sales.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The figures on sentiment also showed fewer people plan to buy automobiles in the next six months as prices at the pump climbed.
 “Elevated price gains are a headwind, especially for first-time buyers.
 The explorer may also use proceeds to lower gearing and buy back shares.
 “They’re being paid well, but they’ve done a lot of very good work and created a lot of value at the same time,” said Will Frohnhoefer, a special situations equity analyst for BTIG LLC in New York, who rates Cheniere as a buy.
 Analyst Ratings Of 12 analysts that cover the company, eight have buy ratings on Cheniere shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Accord Sales Accord sales fell in China at the start of this year because its price deterred buyers, Honda’s China chief, Seiji Kuraishi, said during the Beijing motor show this week.
 Honda showed a new concept hatchback designed exclusively for China at this week’s Beijing motor show to attract young Chinese buyers.
 trade buyer at a Sotheby’s wine auction Saturday in New York, matching the pre-sale estimate and making it top lot.
 private buyers.
 “North America reasserted itself in the auction market today,” Duncan Sterling, head of New York wine auctions at Sotheby’s, said in the statement, noting that buyers from the region accounted for 15 out of the top 20 at the sale.
 “None of these big players buying Alstom is going to be a smooth ride,” said Simon Toennessen, an analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG.
April 3 (Bloomberg) -- After buying up everything from US.
 Cofco and other Chinese buyers are racing to secure access to food supplies to meet the growing demand for staples in the world’s most populous country.
 Food-related acquisitions by Chinese buyers reached a record in 2013, led by the $47 billion purchase of Virginia pork processor Smithfield Foods Inc, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 is considering buying Tnuva, according to a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified as the information is private.
 In 2012, Bright Food agreed to buy 60 percent of British cereal maker Weetabix Ltd.
 Record Spree The value of proposed, pending and completed acquisitions in food and agriculture industries by Chinese buyers soared to $169 billion in 2013, the most on record and up from $24 billion in 2012, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Changing Tastes Beyond beef and grains, Chinese buyers are also pursuing brands that may later suit tastes at home, said Meredith Paynter, a partner at King & Wood Mallesons.
 The chase may also bring Chinese buyers to Treasury Wine Estates Ltd, the $21 billion maker of Penfolds Grange wine, Sydney-based Paynter said in a phone interview.
 Other household names, particularly in Europe, have already attracted interest from Chinese buyers.
 The bid could involve teaming up with a corporate buyer, said the people, who asked not to be named at the time because the deliberations were private.
 Former Israel intelligence agency chief Ephraim Halevy has said the sale of assets including Tnuva Food to Chinese buyers threatens national security.
 recommended buying the stock.
 Salzgitter advanced 12 percent to 3081 euros after Citigroup upgraded the steelmaker to buy from neutral and raised its price forecast to 36 euros from 31 euros.
 experiment intended to win over young buyers with idiosyncratic designs and low prices, will overhaul its lineup amid fading sales as the brand reaches adolescence.
 Tullow Oil Plc rose the most in almost two months after UBS AG recommended that investors buy the shares.
 Tullow Oil Tullow Oil climbed 62 percent to 800 pence after UBS raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from hold, citing a strong portfolio of assets and an attractive price.
 is buying JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities business.
 “International trading companies have been buying assets all along, just not so much in America,” JP Fjeld-Hansen, managing director of Musket Corp, a commodity supplier and trading company in Houston, said April 29.
 energy markets and they’re bringing their capital here” The world’s biggest commodity merchants, most privately owned, are buying or building more physical assets in the US.
 “You don’t care whether prices go up or down because you know you can arb 50 cents out of this because of your supply arrangements” Trading companies are buying or building US.
 Mercuria is buying JPMorgan’s physical commodities business, giving the Larnaca, Cyprus-based company gas and power trading operations on both sides of the Atlantic.
 Houston-based Enron, which had a strategy of buying physical capacity and leveraging it in trades, declared bankruptcy in 2001 amid an accounting scandal.
 is seeking a buyer for its New York Stock Exchange designated market-making business acquired through the 2000 purchase of Spear, Leeds & Kellogg, a person briefed on the matter said.
 The bank is in the early stages of the process and has held talks with potential buyers, according to the person, who requested anonymity because the discussions are private.
 The NYSE, purchased in November by Atlanta-based IntercontinentalExchange Group Inc, relies on traders known as designated market makers, or DMMs, to facilitate buying and selling.
 “He’s had a game plan for a decade,” said Rich Lawson, the CEO of Palo Alto, California-based buyout firm HGGC LLC, which isn’t publicly traded.
 The founding of Ares began with the collapse of Drexel, which in the 1980s pioneered the use of junk bonds as a financing tool for large-scale transactions such as leveraged buyouts.
 The three put together a private buyout group and named it Apollo Advisors, after the Greek god of sunlight and healing, and handpicked former Drexel colleagues in the process.
 With Black’s experience in dealmaking at Drexel, Apollo turned its focus to leveraged buyouts, or buying companies using large amounts of debt and selling them for a profit.
 “Since then, Apollo rebuilt its credit business; it is a fabulous firm” Ressler took Ares on a different path, deciding to first build a foundation of credit assets that produce stable income and pay predictable fees, rather than initially pursue volatile leveraged buyouts that pay off in lumpy intervals.
 In 2003, Ressler and his partners started investing a private-equity fund -- their first of what would become five buyout vehicles -- as a way to supplement their earnings from credit with takeovers that appeared attractive.
 While Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg openly supportedBouygues, Vivendi said it had asked any buyer to stick toemployment promises “that correspond to the priorities definedby the French government” SFR employs about 9,000 people.
 Vivendi can’tstart selling its 20 percent stake for one year, and must giveAltice a first chance to buy it.
 If the deal is completed, it could surpass Actavis Inc’sagreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 After losing out to SFR, Bouygues’ best move may be to turnfrom buyer to seller by discussing a sale to Iliad.
 Iliad hadnegotiated buying Bouygues’ wireless network for as much as 18billion euros, on the condition that Bouygues would win SFR.
 BM&FBovespa is considering a requirement that stock trading be halted for 30 minutes after events such as announcements of acquisitions or share buyback plans, according to its press office in Sao Paulo.
 “Companies are feeling confident enough about that to have the buyers and sellers able to come together now” A tie-up of Holcim and Lafarge would allow the cement producers to cut costs as some of the industry’s kilns run at a loss after the global recession eroded demand for building materials.
 agreed to buy Texas Industries Inc.
 With the cement takeovers, buyers may “see a recovery and want to get ahead of it,” Jack Kasprzak, analyst at BB&T Corp, said in a phone interview from Richmond.
 It’s also possible that private-equity firms could take a look at some businesses, though the expertise needed in this industry and the difficulty generating returns could keep financial buyers at bay, Cantor Fitzgerald’s Osburn said.
 “The buyers would be all of the major competitors.
 “Elevated price gains are a headwind, especially for first-time buyers.
 At the current sales pace, it would take 52 months to sell houses, a reading that constitutes a tight market favoring sellers over buyers, the group said.
 Drugstore chain Raia Drogasil SA retreated after Banco Itau BBA SA withdrew a buy recommendation for the stock.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Mallinckrodt Plc agreed to buy Questcor Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Price Leverage Mylan, for example, agreed last year to buy India’s Agila Specialties for $16 billion.
 Mallinckrodt in February agreed to buy Cadence Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 HSBC Holdings Plc upgraded the parent of British Airways to overweight, or buy, from neutral, saying it sees strong earnings momentum in 2014 and 2015 and a rebound in the stock price from recent declines.
 Exane BNP Paribas raised its recommendation for Europe’s second-biggest water company to outperform, or buy, from neutral.
 Reasonable Levels Mark Mobius, who oversees about $50 billion at Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said he’s been buying technology stocks after a global rout left companies such as Tencent trading at “reasonable” levels.
 “If you look at Tencent for example it’s come down about 20 percent and that’s a pretty good correction,” Mobius said in an interview in Bloomberg’s Hong Kong office, declining to name specific companies he’s buying.
 who has a buy rating on Teva’s stock, said investors will be keeping an eye on the court starting the next day.
 “It is so much to consumers’ advantage, to a buyer’s advantage, and to regulators’ advantage for the public to see what assumptions the insurer makes” The filings contain “sensitive proprietary information” that the agency believes should remain private, said Aaron Albright, a spokesman for the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that oversees the health exchanges.
 Zheng Jianming, also known in Cantonese as Cheng Kin Ming, has spent or pledged about $533 million to buy assets that at their peak were worth almost $20 billion, according to regulatory filings in the US.
 He also owns 30 percent of the Hong Kong-based panel maker Shunfeng, which is seeking to buy Wuxi Suntech.
 He shifted into real estate in Shanghai in 1993, and gained attention in media reports at the time by buying up property in Hong Kong in 2003 during the SARS health crisis as prices plummeted.
 “The investment bank hasn’t done so well with revenue under pressure as the bank sheds assets and clients hold off trades,” Dirk Becker, an analyst with Kepler Cheuvreux, who recommends investors buy the shares, said by phone from Frankfurt.
 has held talks to buy the French train maker.
 Telekom Austria jumped 63 percent after America Movil SAB said it will buy out the company’s minority shareholders.
 The shares pared a rally of as much as 18 percent after Le Figaro reported that GE is only interested in buying Alstom’s energy assets.
 Scania Soars Scania AB surged 86 percent to 18780 kronor, the biggest gain since Volkswagen offered in February to buy out the Swedish truckmaker’s minority shareholders.
 made a tentative approach about buying the company.
 Chinese video sites have been aggressively buying copyrights to licensed content to win advertisers and paying members as the country’s 618 million Web users search for entertainment.
 and its founder Jack Ma’s Yunfeng Capital agreed to buy a $122 billion stake in the video website.
 in Boston who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 “It really became quite a mess” Popping Bubble Investors could buy loans more easily under the electronic MERS system, which helped feed Wall Street’s growing appetite for securitization -- the bundling of loans into packages of investments.
 Naeem raised the stock to buy with a share price estimate of 61 pounds, taking the tally of similar recommendations to seven against four sells and one hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Part of the attraction of a spinoff -- as opposed to selling a business to a single buyer -- is that there are tax advantages for shareholders, said Henry Stewart, head of consumer investment banking for Europe, the Middle East and Africa at Morgan Stanley, who sees spinoff activity picking up in Europe.
 “Ultimately people are looking for the positive data” Fed Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher said the central bank will end its bond purchases in October if it continues to taper buying at the current pace, in comments today in Hong Kong.
April 8 (Bloomberg) -- Mando Corp, the biggest unit of South Korea’s Halla Group, tumbled the most in a year in Seoul trading as its plan to split into two raised investor concern that the company is preparing to buy more shares of affiliates.
 borrowers approaching record lows, buyout firms are taking advantage of the Federal Reserve’s easy-money policies to extract payouts by piling more junk debt onto the companies they own.
 Companies have been pursuing dividend deals even as buyout loans increase.
 Bain and other buyout firms extracted a dividend out of BMC Software seven months after buying the computer-network software maker in September.
 Platinum Equity LLC, a Beverly Hills, California-based buyout firm raised a $262 million payment-in-kind bond to pay itself a dividend a week after closing on its takeover of a rental unit from Volvo AB in February.
 “The price is right for the borrower” Fed Taper The Federal Open Market Committee last month said it will reduce its monthly bond buying by $10 billion to $55 billion and reiterated plans to taper additional purchases “in further measured steps at future meetings” The committee announced $10 billion of reductions at its previous two meetings.
 raised its equity rating to buy from outperform.
 The company also agreed to buy 175 million of its shares from Blackstone.
 It would be irrational for a country that has been ousted from the international bond markets for so long not to take advantage of the apparent appetite of investors for buying Greek bonds, a senior Greek government official said this week on condition of anonymity in line with policy.
 Henderson Global Investors, which oversees the equivalent of about $126 billion, isn’t planning on buying any of the new five-year bonds tomorrow, money manager Andrew Mulliner said in phone interview today.
April 30 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries fell before the Federal Reserve concludes a two-day meeting where it is forecast to reduce its monthly debt-buying program to almost half of the amount it was purchasing at the end of last year.
 “The odds of yields falling are greater than the odds of yields rising” Diam extended the duration of its Treasury holdings two weeks ago by buying five-year notes, Nagata said.
 Market volatility has been low and will probably stay that way, which creates an opportunity to capture higher yields by buying longer maturities, he said.
 Facebook Inc, the world’s largest social network, agreed to buy mobile-messaging startup WhatsApp Inc.
 The stock has 35 recommendations equivalent to buy, versus five holds and one sell.
 Asset Buyout The two governments in February agreed to pay a combined 965 billion ringgit ($3 billion) to the water concessionaires to buy out their assets.
 “We want to become dominant” in the financing of small businesses by buying some niche players, Chief Executive Officer David Hurwitz said in an interview in Johannesburg on April 8, without naming the companies.
 Transaction Capital distributed 210 rand a share to investors on March 17 after last year selling its stake in unsecured lender Bayport Financial Services for 133 billion rand and disposing of Paycorp Holdings to buyout firm Actis LLP for 937 million rand.
 may seek to buy new assets in Asia after they agreed on a A$800 million ($739 million) deal to combine their operations stretching from China to Malaysia.
 The transaction comes amid an acceleration of acquisitions in the sector, led by L1 Energy’s agreement to buy RWE AG’s Dea oil and gas unit that valued the assets at about 51 billion euros ($71 billion).
 agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business for $23 billion.
 Liberty offered to buy Barnes & Noble in 2011 for about $1 billion, spurring speculation that a takeover battle would emerge.
 “The question has always been: Liberty doesn’t own a lot -- are they going to buy more? It takes away that aspect of the story” Today’s move puts pressure on Barnes & Noble to find new allies.
 Liberty’s sale of its stake to “qualified institutional buyers” will be completed on April 8, the company said.
 Tinker said today’s move doesn’t change his buy recommendation on Barnes & Noble’s stock.
 With that backdrop, investors have felt more comfortable buying fixed-income securities,” he said April 25.
 The central bank may start to raise interest rates “around six months” after ending its asset-buying program, Chair Janet Yellen said in March.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 Katzenberg, chief executive officer of the studio that made the “Shrek” films, said that within 10 years or so consumers will be able to buy or rent movies 17 days after their release in cinemas.
 One of Mulally’s first acts was borrowing $23 billion to shore up Ford’s finances and buy time to turn around the company.
 To dispose of riskier assets ahead of the ECB review, banks are seeking buyers for nonperforming shipping loans and the assets that back them.
 and Tennenbaum Capital Partners LLC are among firms buying German vessels and taking stakes in companies that need financial backing.
 is selling 19 million shares of common stock to help fund the purchase of Wesfarmers Ltd’s insurance brokering operation, as the buyer extends its growth outside the US.
 Wesfarmers, which operates supermarkets and sells coal, chemicals and industrial equipment, said Gallagher agreed to buy its brokerage operations for A$101 billion ($935 million) as the Perth, Australia-based company scales back from insurance.
 “Our combined operations will become one of the largest insurance brokers in Australia and New Zealand” Gallagher, which raised funds in June for acquisitions, announced an agreement in September to buy the Giles Group of Companies for 237 million pounds ($393 million) to expand in the UK.
 Edens helped engineer Fortress’ buyouts of railroad operator Rail America Inc, nursing home owner Brookdale Senior Living Inc.
 Medical-services provider Fleury SA slipped 17 percent to 1704 reais after Valor Economico reported that private-equity firm Gavea Investimentos may review its bid to buy a controlling stake after finishing an audit.
 Blackstone’s buyout holdings climbed 7 percent in the latest quarter, Carlyle’s appreciated 8 percent and the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index of large US.
 The value of a private-equity firm’s buyout holdings affects economic net income because the metric relies on a quarterly “mark-to-market” valuations of those investments.
 Retail Setback KKR, like larger competitors Blackstone and Carlyle Group LP, has broadened its business beyond traditional leveraged buyouts by underwriting stocks and bonds, managing funds of hedge funds, and investing in infrastructure and real estate.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 The company also unveiled a new grocery service for its Prime members called Prime Pantry, which lets people buy goods in bulk to pack into a box that holds as much as 45 pounds and that can be shipped for a flat $599 fee.
 “Amazon keeps spending like drunken sailors,” said Gene Munster, an analyst with Piper Jaffray Cos, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Sweden proposed measures to buy more fighter jets and submarines amid an increase in geopolitical tensions.
April 2 (Bloomberg) -- EverPower Wind Holdings Inc, backed by British private-equity financier Guy Hands, plans to buy one of Illinois’ biggest wind farms from indebted Indian turbine-maker Suzlon Energy Ltd.
 Suzlon would buy Big Sky for a nominal price and agreeing to settle its first priority mortgage claim, according to the US.
 with a buy rating, expects at least $60 million in cost cuts by 2015.
 Home appliances retailer Magazine Luiza SA may be active after announcing a plan to buy back as many as 5 million shares, or 8 percent of free float.
 In a separate investigation, Huseyin Aydin, CEO of Turkey’s largest government-owned bank, was overheard by police approving loans to businessmen who said they were under orders from Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan to buy a media company.
 Leaked Recordings In leaked recordings of phone calls allegedly made in October, Aydin can be heard talking to businessmen who say they have been ordered by Erdogan to buy Turkey’s Sabah newspaper and ATV television network.
 Because the buyer couldn’t borrow the purchase price in excess of $500 million on his own, five construction firms formed a pool to help with the acquisition.
 Heavily Exposed They have been winning billion-dollar infrastructure contracts for airports, roads and bridges, buying state assets and racking up debt.
 T-Mobile has also introduced more aggressive pricing, such as international text messaging at no additional cost and free data access for tablet buyers.
 And AT&T and T-Mobile have engaged in customer-poaching, with each offering buyouts to cover early-termination penalties for people that switch service.
 Munich Re, which completed a 1 billion-euro share buyback before today’s shareholders meeting, plans to buy back shares worth another 1 billion euros before next year’s gathering.
 Baird & Co, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 The company unveiled a new grocery service for its Prime members called Prime Pantry, which lets people buy goods in bulk to pack into a box that holds as much as 45 pounds and can be shipped for a flat $599 fee.
 “Amazon keeps spending like drunken sailors,” said Gene Munster, an analyst with Piper Jaffray Cos, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 The Dallas-based electricity provider, taken private seven years ago by Henry Kravis and David Bonderman in a record leveraged buyout, filed for bankruptcy yesterday in Wilmington, Delaware, after months of wrangling among creditors, owners and management yielded a restructuring proposal.
 Kravis and Bonderman took the company private in 2007 in the biggest-ever leveraged buyout.
 The deal, coming at the peak of a three-year boom in leveraged buyouts, turned into a big loss for Kravis’s KKR & Co, as well as Bonderman’s TPG Capital and Lloyd Blankfein’s Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, which loaded the company with debt.
 Shale Boom The buyout, larger even than KKR’s 1989 takeover of RJR Nabisco Inc, left Energy Future struggling to reduce debt when the financial crisis, coupled with booming shale production, sent gas prices down starting in 2008.
 Funds such as Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC, Howard Marks’s Oaktree Capital Group LLC and Centerbridge Capital Partners LP amassed Energy Future debt after the buyout, giving them a seat at the negotiating table when the company sought to reach a restructuring deal with creditors.
 Individual investors will also be offered shares in the IPO, and about 700,000 of Saga’s customers have indicated they are interested in buying, Goodsell said.
 The buyout firms still own the AA.
 “It’s unlikely that one single entity will take up all those shares, as there’s not a lot of buyers around with that kind of cash and empowerment credentials in place,” said De Wet Schutte, a Cape Town-based analyst with Avior Research (Pty) Ltd.
 After buying Pixar for $74 billion in 2006, Walt Disney Chief Executive Officer Bob Iger put Catmull and Chief Creative Officer John Lasseter at the helm of both their studio and Disney’s animation unit.
 There are 11 who recommend buying the shares, while four have holds.
 Starting this weekend, soccer fans must buy a so-called Passolig card from investment bank Aktif Yatirim Bankasi AS, owned by Calik Holding AS, which until December was run by Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan’s son-in-law.
 in Des Peres, Missouri, who rates the stock as buy.
 One loonie, as the Canadian currency is known, buys 9051 US.
 Teva, which became the Soros fund’s biggest holding at the end of last year, is rallying amid speculation it will fuel profit growth by buying smaller rivals.
 The court’s decision has already diminished the threat of generic competition to Copaxone because it buys Teva more time to convert patients to the new version of its multiple sclerosis drug, said Jason Gerberry, an analyst at Leerink Partners LLC in Boston.
 Loan Package The central bank last May approved 30 trillion dong ($14 billion) of financing for five banks to use for low-interest home loans, yet few homebuyers have participated in the program, Leech said.
 Policy makers are also weighing a proposal that would make it easier for foreigners to buy homes in the country.
 Foreign investors are showing more confidence in Vietnam’s market than domestic buyers, he added.
April 28 (Bloomberg) -- Gold jewelers in India, the world’s largest consumer after China, are banking on a surge in demand at the country’s second-biggest bullion buying festival this week to end a sales slowdown caused by import curbs.
 The government is restricting imports to tackle a record current-account deficit and stop a decline in the rupee after housewives and retail investors rushed to buy gold at the same festival last year as prices slid into a bear market.
 The festival is considered by the country’s more than 900 million Hindus as a traditional day to buy precious metals.
 But you cannot stop Indians from buying gold, so overall people are positive about Akshaya Tritiya” Bridal Trousseau During Akshaya, a Sanskrit word meaning “that which never diminishes,” Indians begin a new venture or buy value items with the belief it will bring luck and prosperity.
 “It’s an auspicious day, so people who have to buy will buy, but they will have to deal with unnecessarily high premiums,” Prithviraj Kothari, vice president of the India Bullion and Jewellers Association Ltd, said by phone from Mumbai on April 25.
 India increased the tax on imports three times last year to 10 percent, required buyers to supply 20 percent of purchases to jewelers for export and sell 80 percent on the local market.
 ‘Buoyant Mood’ “Consumer confidence is improving and the buying mood is buoyant right now,” Colin Shah, managing director of Kama Schachter, which retails diamond jewelry from India to Japan and Hong Kong, said in an e-mailed statement.
 The car is part of Chief Executive Officer Mike Flewitt’s plans to introduce a new McLaren annually as the company seeks to triple sales in two to three years and to lure buyers from Fiat SpA’s Ferrari and Volkswagen AG’s Lamborghini.
April 14 (Bloomberg) -- Momentive Performance Materials Inc, a maker of silicones and quartz products, filed for bankruptcy after struggling to make payments on debt dating to its 2006 buyout by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC.
 Black, who pioneered the leveraged buyout business with Michael Milken at Drexel Burnham Lambert, is the 76th-richest person in the US, worth $59 billion, according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index.
 The reclassification, which may see developer Emaar Properties PJSC added to the MSCI Emerging Markets Index, may draw more liquidity to the Arab world’s second-biggest economy as fund managers buy shares to mirror indexes tracked by investors managing more than $8 trillion.
 If no buyer steps up within 15 days, the shares can then be sold to the general public.
 “As our results improve -- now with net profit and savings in all areas -- there are more people looking to buy shares” Juan Valdez has seven shops in the US, including New York and Washington, and plans to open its first in Florida this year.
 The stock jumped the most in six months after Espoo, Finland-based Nokia also said it plans to spend about 5 billion euros ($69 billion) on dividends, share buybacks and debt reduction.
 After the dividend and buybacks, Suri will still have cash left over to invest.
 It also plans a one-time dividend of 1 billion euros, or 26 cents a share, to be paid on or about July 3, and stock buybacks of 125 billion euros over two years.
 Last year, Nokia considered buying the wireless-equipment unit of France’s Alcatel-Lucent SA, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Of 42 analysts who track the stock, 37 recommend buying and none favor selling, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Kingfisher Plc rose 33 percent after UBS AG recommended buying shares in Europe’s largest home-improvement retailer.
 UBS raised its rating for the company to buy from neutral, citing the possibility of higher profits from its proposed acquisition of Mr Bricolage SA in France.
 IMI climbed 19 percent to 1,547 pence after HSBC raised the stock to overweight from neutral, meaning investors should buy the shares.
 Mainland Chinese buyers purchased a total of 1058 tons in March, including scrap, compared with 1272 tons in February and 2235 tons a year earlier, data from the Hong Kong government showed.
 Facebook also has a separate Messenger software and agreed to buy messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 announced a deal to buy Viber Media Inc.
 The penalty was placed on the CEO after Telkom awarded a 6-million rand interest-free loan to CFO Jacques Schindehutte to buy shares in Telkom.
 “The history of Eircom has been one of buyer’s regret,” said Brian Lucey, a finance professor at Trinity College Dublin and former Central Bank of Ireland economist.
 Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s second-largest mobile carrier is buying Grupo Corporativo Ono SA, Spain’s biggest cable company, for 72 billion euros, while Paris-based Billionaire Patrick Drahi last week issued a record $23 billion of high-yield debt to fund his purchase of French phone company SFR.
 In the first step of today’s three-part agreement, Charter said it will buy 14 million Time Warner Cable customers for $73 billion after the merger of Comcast and Time Warner Cable closes.
 The transactions may give Comcast $10 billion to spend on share buybacks, estimated Adam Ilkowitz, an analyst with Nomura Holdings Inc, in a note today.
 Charter will likely buy the rest of the spinoff after the four-year period, and can do other deals in the meantime, Craig Moffett, founder of research firm MoffettNathanson LLC, said in a note today.
 “Our ‘buy’ thesis was predicated on Almirall undergoing transformational change, driven by growth of its respiratory franchise,” analysts at Goldman Sachs, including Eleanor Fung, wrote in a note to clients.
 economy prompted the Fed to cut back its own bond buying.
 “Banks have been big buyers of Treasuries.
 The rate for an average 30-year mortgage has surged about a percentage point in the past year to 433 percent, making properties less affordable to first-time buyers.
 Regulations that will impose stricter capital rules are prompting banks to buy more government debt and fuel demand for Treasuries regardless of whether loan growth increases.
 “Evidence suggests the domestic economy is going to be a laggard in its growth rate relative to other developed markets, so investors are just looking for better sources of growth and perhaps seeing that in international markets” Canadian investors have added $103 billion in ETFs tracking international equities so far this year, after buying a record $35 billion last year, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The biggest drugmakers are reshuffling units to get rid of ones that don’t make them leaders in a particular market, while smaller players are buying competitors to add size, lest they be swallowed up themselves.
 It also may be why New York-based Pfizer, which has a handful of promising oncology drugs, tried to buy AstraZeneca Plc, the London-based drugmaker with a complementary cancer portfolio.
 To that end, Novartis yesterday agreed to buy Glaxo’s oncology business for as much as $16 billion, to sell Glaxo its vaccines line for as much as $71 billion and to sell its animal health business to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Valeant, meanwhile, announced a bid to buy Allergan Inc.
 Generic and specialty drugmakers such as Mylan Inc, Actavis Plc and Valeant have been buying competitors, expanding geographically and using the deals to cut costs.
 As companies that buy drugs in bulk or control prescriptions get bigger, drugmakers have to as well, he said.
 Generic-drug makers are also buying up more profitable injectable and brand-name drugs in a bid to grow bigger than rivals.
 Valeant proposed to buy the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment for about $15289 a share in the Canadian company’s plan to become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The bid comes as Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer drugs as part of a series of deals among major pharmaceuticals makers.
 “No news is good news, and we do not expect any meaningful incremental charges for litigation or conduct issues,” Ian Gordon, an analyst at Investec Plc who has a buy rating on Barclays, said in an e-mailed note.
 On April 22, Glaxo said it was selling its cancer drugs to Novartis AG for as much as $16 billion, and that it was buying most of Novartis’s vaccine business for up to $71 billion.
 Technology to do that is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 has agreed to buy the electricity under a 20-year agreement.
 Chief Executive Officer Jack Welch’s retirement when it prevented his $53 billion plan to buy Honeywell International Inc.
 GE may announce plans to buy the French builder of power plants as soon as next week, according to people with knowledge of the proposed deal.
 That’s prehistory and not relevant today” GE Lessons GE’s painfully gained experience shone through when Immelt, 58, successfully steered through a complex deal to buy Italian aerospace company Avio SpA in 2013.
 “The complexity of this new offer is far less than that of the previously announced Yamana partnership” Today’s deal replaces a transaction announced April 2 in which Yamana agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 private in the largest leveraged buyout ever seven years ago, had asked for 15 percent of the restructured company, according to documents released a year ago.
 Biggest Buyout The biggest buyout, at $48 billion, became the biggest energy-company bust.
 Enghouse is “good at utilizing their cash to buy things,” said Jason Donville, CEO of Donville Kent Asset Management, whose DKAM Capital Ideas Fund holds the company among its top five stocks.
 Low Prices “It is a buyers’ market, with low price levels that will allow for strong potential capital gains,” said Spyros Raptis, manager of valuations and planning at Athens-based real estate adviser Redvis.
 “Concern by other investors on the recent disposals is reason” for today’s decline, said Tang, who recommends buying the stock.
April 22 (Bloomberg) -- Turkey’s pledge to guarantee the debt of contractors on public-works projects threatens to balloon government spending, a headwind for foreign buyers of the nation’s bonds.
 Plug, which buys most of its stacks from Ballard Power Systems Inc, also plans to make its own after the $4 million purchase of ReliOn Inc.
 In addition to the Focus, the best-selling foreign car in China last year, Ford has drawn buyers for locally manufactured models such as the Kuga and EcoSport utility vehicles and the Mondeo, which sells in the US.
 “Management teams are starting to build this mentality that they’re going to be a buyer or be bought.
 It puts pressure on everybody to think about who they could be buying” If dealmaking continued at April’s rate for the rest of the year, 2014 would see almost $4 trillion of deals announced, making it the second most active year for M&A ever, behind 2007, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
April 6 (Bloomberg) -- Robert Diamond, former head of Barclays Plc, has agreed to buy a stake in state-owned Development Bank of Rwanda through his new financial-services venture Atlas Mara Co-Nvest Ltd.
 It follows Atlas Mara’s agreement last week to buy Gaborone, Botswana-based financial services company BancABC for as much as $265 million.
 Policy makers last increased their bond-buying target in July 2012.
 Consumers in the Asia Pacific region will eat 1096 million tons by 2018, a 27 percent increase from 2013, compared with a 5 percent gain over that period in western Europe, the biggest buyer, Euromonitor forecasts.
 “Assuming we have no weather problems, prices could ease amid increased supplies” European demand was weaker than expected during the first quarter, which may indicate higher prices encouraged grinders to use inventories and delay buying, said Edward George, the head of soft commodities research at Ecobank Group in London.
 Ukraine is seeking to diversify energy supplies by buying gas from Slovakia, Poland and Hungary using east-west pipelines in reverse.
April 29 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander Brasil SA surged as much as 21 percent, the most since the company went public in 2009, after its Spanish parent offered to buy the 25 percent of the bank it doesn’t already own.
 Banco Santander SA proposed issuing as many as 665 million shares and spending about 47 billion euros ($65 billion) in a bid to complete a voluntary buyback of the business at the equivalent of 1531 reais a share, or 20 percent more than yesterday’s closing price, the Santander-based company said today in a statement.
 Buying Low “They sold high and are buying low -- well done,” said Bill Rudman, who helps manage about $400 million of emerging-market stocks, including Santander Brasil shares, at Blackfriars Asset Management in London.
 The fact that Santander is offering to buy out minority shareholders in Brazil doesn’t mean it will do so in other markets where it has listed banks, Marin said.
 Leverage Ratio The stock’s drop was overdone and “too punitive” in view of the company’s high capital levels, wrote Betsy Graseck, Morgan Stanley’s banking analyst, who has a buy recommendation on the shares with a $20 price target.
 Graseck said she’s assuming Bank of America will eliminate its buyback request while keeping the higher dividend.
 Citigroup was also seeking its first dividend increase since the crisis as well as a stock buyback.
 Fleurette, which already has shares in KCC through its companies, was the most likely buyer of the stake, according to Gecamines documents.
April 23 (Bloomberg) -- Crescent Point Energy Corp, a Canadian producer of light oil, agreed to a buy closely held CanEra Energy Corp.
 More than 25,000 contracts giving investors the right to buy the stock changed hands as of 4 pm.
 There are definitely bullish Kellogg call buyers here” Kris Charles, a spokeswoman for Battle Creek, Michigan-based Kellogg, declined to comment on the share movement.
 agreed to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 “People remember the call buying in Heinz the day before the bid for the company,” he said.
 Buffett typically buys majority control and leaves management in place.
 She said this month the central bank may end the bond-buying program it uses to support the economy this fall and increase borrowing costs six months after that.
 Fed last month further trimmed its bond-buying program by $10 billion to $55 billion as the world’s largest economy recovers, while Russia raised its main rate the most since 1998 as investors withdrew money on concern President Vladimir Putin will invade Ukraine.
 Investors may also be able to directly buy mainland-listed stocks through the Hong Kong exchange, the 21st Century Business Herald said on its website, without saying where it got the information.
 Mercuria agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities business for $35 billion.
 “Nobody is buying or selling energy stocks at the moment based on macro pipeline developments,” said Matt Skipp, chief investment officer at Sw8 Asset Management Inc.
 surged 12 percent after it agreed to buy Biomet Inc.
 People with knowledge of the matter said the company is in talks to buy France’s Alstom SA in what would be its biggest-ever acquisition.
 Recovering home prices and rising mortgage rates have put real estate out of reach for some would-be buyers.
 “If consumers are unlikely to buy a car built by the government, why on earth would they want to buy an insurance policy underwritten and adjusted by folks who act more like bureaucrats than business people?” he said in a 2009 conference call.
 The Chinese company could be valued at $160 billion to $180 billion at its IPO, he wrote in a note in which he raised Yahoo’s rating to the equivalent of a buy from a neutral after the shares pulled back recently.
 were among 16 buyers given preferential allocations of Royal Mail shares with its IPO on the understanding they would be long-term investors.
April 7 (Bloomberg) -- Alfa Laval AB agreed to buy Norwegian pumpmaker Frank Mohn AS for 13 billion kroner ($22 billion) to capture spending in offshore oil and gas drilling.
 company aiming to buy its energy assets, which generate more than 70 percent of sales.
 ‘No Smooth Ride’ “None of these big players buying Alstom is going to be a smooth ride,” said Simon Toennessen, an analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG.
 Le Nouvel Observateur reported that the government was studying selling some of its holding in EDF to raise funds to buy Bouygues SA’s stake in Alstom and also inject funds.
 The shipping industry has suffered from a glut of vessels after buying too many before the 2008 global recession, driving down rates and saddling companies with debt, said Erik Nikolai Stavseth, an Oslo-based analyst at Arctic Securities ASA.
 “We invest predominantly via specialized funds, positioning ourselves on the more senior part of the capital structure” Generali is joining German insurers including Gothaer Group and Versicherungskammer Bayern buying into leveraged loans to boost yields and diversify assets.
 With defaults by borrowers approaching record lows, buyout firms are also taking advantage of the Federal Reserve’s easy-money policies to extract payouts by piling more debt onto the companies they own.
 Versicherungskammer Bayern, with 425 billion euros in investments, and Gothaer Group, which oversees 25 billion euros, have been buying into loans for several years.
 DuPont said in January it planned to buy back $5 billion of its shares, including at least $2 billion this year.
 While Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg openly supported Bouygues, Vivendi said it had asked any buyer to stick to employment promises “that correspond to the priorities defined by the French government” SFR employs about 9,000 people.
 Vivendi can’t start selling its 20 percent stake for one year, and must give Altice a first chance to buy it.
 Telecoms Consolidation The deal could surpass Actavis Inc’s agreement to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 After losing out to SFR, Bouygues’ best move may be to turn from buyer to seller by discussing a sale to Iliad.
 Iliad had negotiated buying Bouygues’ wireless network for as much as 18 billion euros, on the condition that Bouygues would win SFR.
 Valeant in April offered to buy Allergan Inc, the maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment.
 The company is also buying back stock for the first time in five years.
 “President Toyoda’s comments that ‘we intend to continue paying dividends in a stable and sustainable manner,’ plus the addition of buybacks suggests that Toyota is taking shareholder returns seriously, which we welcome,” said Ben Williams, a London-based fund manager at GAM (UK) Ltd, which oversees about $300 million in Japanese equities.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Eurosic, a French real estate investment trust, agreed to buy a 59 percent stake in SIIC de Paris from Spain’s Realia Business SA and may acquire the rest of the property-rental company.
 home purchases increased in April as a bigger supply of properties lured buyers and raised prospects for a stronger spring buying season.
 A gain in home construction last month showed builders are responding to limited inventory at the same time mortgage rates retreat and lure prospective buyers.
 Investors continued to play a big role in the market, the April increase was driven mainly by purchases of condominiums and the share of first-time buyers was little changed.
 First-Time Buyers “There’s not that many first-time buyers who are getting into the market,” said Stephanie Karol, a US.
 Now with more inventory, I think there will be more buyers entering the market” The median selling price of an existing home rose 52 percent from April 2013 to $201,700.
 First-time buyers represented 29 percent of all transactions.
 Potential buyers are starting to find relief in cheaper borrowing costs.
 “It’s unclear what changed since the April 23 conference call,” said Howard Rubel, an analyst at Jefferies LLC in New York who recommends buying the shares.
 “They seem to have gone in another direction; from the idea of buying to selling or finding another option to create value” B/E is “an attractive company, which has grown the business much faster than the market,” said Rubel, who declined to speculate on potential buyers in a note to clients today.
 A buyer would have the option of rehiring them for a minimum of one year and a maximum of two years, the filing shows.
 Proceeds of the deal will also go toward mitigating noise for local neighborhoods and buying land.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Man Group Plc, the world’s largest publicly traded hedge-fund manager, is in talks to buy Numeric Holdings LLC in a deal that would diversify its computer-driven investments after the company’s biggest fund posted losses over the past three years.
 “Online shopping has unleashed consumer demand, particularly because people can now buy stuff online they couldn’t get before in the shops, especially outside the biggest cities,” said Song Yu, senior China economist with Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Alibaba data indicate the average retailer on its marketplaces such as Taobao, where one can buy anything from imported US.
 Rules imposed under the 2010 law require the platforms to offer impartial access to Wall Street banks and traditional buyers including mutual funds and hedge funds.
 UniCredit, based in Milan, is considering a 1 billion euro ($14 billion) deal that would involve a buyer of the stakes also committing capital for future investments, known as a stapled secondary deal, according to two people with knowledge of the situation, who asked not to be named because the information is private.
 Secondary buyer AlpInvest Partners BV, owned by the Carlyle Group LP, helped structure a deal that involved purchasing fund stakes from HVB and providing about $450 million in capital for new investments.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Dar Al Arkan’s third Islamic bond sale in a year is attracting buyers as investors bet the Saudi Arabian company’s real estate assets outweigh a junk credit rating at Standard & Poor’s.
 Deutsche Wohnen AG, Germany’s second-largest residential landlord by market value, said yesterday that first-quarter profit rose 91 percent after it took advantage of higher share prices to buy more homes.
 “I wouldn’t declare victory at this point but I would say, great progress” Encana has 10 buy, 13 hold and two sell recommendations from analysts tracked by Bloomberg.
 in a wager that the telecommunications company will benefit after buying out its partner in the largest US.
 “There’s always a lot of gamesmanship with M&A,” said Amy Yong, a New York-based analyst for Macquarie Group Ltd, who sees logic to AT&T buying either one of them.
 DirecTV CEO Mike White has decided not to transform the direction of his company in recent years, as opposed to Dish’s Ergen, who has spent billions of dollars acquiring wireless spectrum and attempted to buy Sprint Corp.
 White has looked at buying Netflix Inc, Hulu LLC and Vivendi SA’s GVT, a Brazilian telecommunications company, and hasn’t pulled the trigger on any of them, favoring buying back shares.
 That may explain why Dish’s stock rose more than 6 percent this week after the report that AT&T is looking to buy its rival.
 In addition to patents it has developed on its own, CopyTele buys patents and last year began a campaign of licensing and litigation to get money from companies including Microsoft Corp, airlines and Citrix Systems Inc.
 Siemens AG climbed 21 percent to 9584 euros as Europe’s biggest engineering company said it will buy some energy assets from Rolls Royce Holdings Plc for $13 billion.
 “Unless you buy something at a real bargain-basement price, you’d want to be in a higher-growth region,” he said.
 Goyder said Wesfarmers is looking at buying coal mines, particularly those that produce the coking coal used in making steel, amid a record slump in prices for the commodity.
 That gives SFR, a Vivendi SA unit which Altice SA agreed to buy last month in a $23-billion deal, more room to cut prices.
 The metal producer’s price target was raised to 340 yen from 325 yen at Nomura Holdings Inc, which maintained the company’s buy rating.
 The policy-setting Federal Open Market Committee pared its monthly asset-buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 Chief Investment Officer Noel Reyes said he’d begin “selective buying” when the benchmark index reaches 6,650 or below, adding that he prefers shares in the consumer, energy and infrastructure sectors.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC, the New York-based buyout firm, is nearing an agreement to buy German industrial packager Mauser from Dubai International Capital for $17 billion, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Siemens yesterday agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion, while saying it will list its hearing-aid unit and manage its health-care business separately.
 Kaeser today said a joint deal with GE, under which both companies would buy different Alstom assets, would be too complex.
 The lender, which is looking to buy a 40 percent stake in an Indonesian bank, reported May 1 quarterly profit of 6366 million dirhams.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Gold sales at jewelers in Hong Kong have declined as mainland shoppers buy less, the Chinese Gold & Silver Exchange Society said, adding to signs of a slowdown in consumption by the world’s largest user after 2013’s surge.
 While China surpassed India as the biggest user last year, the buying frenzy sparked by gold’s slump into a bear market last April hasn’t been repeated, according to Heraeus Metals Hong Kong Ltd.
 While the on-year comparison is misleading because April 2013 was unique, with bullion’s slump spurring unprecedented buying, the lower spending in China signals lower gold prices for now, Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Federal Reserve winds back monthly bond-buying.
 Tsinlien Group Co, owned by the Tianjin, China, municipal government, will buy unit Famous Ever Group Ltd.
 “Brands help people find inspiration and discover things they care about, whether it’s ideas for dinner, places to go or gifts to buy,” Joanne Bradford, head of partnerships at Pinterest, said in the blog post.
 Puts give the right to sell a security, while calls convey the right to buy.
 “I’d have loved to have gone home yesterday buying Infosys puts,” Manoj Vayalar, an assistant vice president at Religare Securities Ltd, said in a phone interview.
 American Homes 4 Rent would recoup 83 percent of the money that the Agoura Hills, California-based firm invested in buying and improving the homes, and may generate continuing returns in excess of 20 percent on the remaining amount, KBW analyst wrote in a May 7 report, citing rating-company reports.
 The fund recently lost out to money manager Blackstone Group LP in a bid to buy a stake in Italian luxury brand Versace and was beaten by private equity firm CVC Capital Partners in the contest for a stake in Spanish olive oil-maker Deoleo SA.
 EBay’s Marketplaces business had about 145 million active buyers at the end of the first quarter.
 Government Accountability Office last month said the Navy was starting the latest version with a more realistic understanding of requirements and readiness of the technology “that generally aligned with acquisition ‘best practices’” Defense officials sought “to make sure we did as careful a job on this acquisition as we could” after the 2009 cancellation, Frank Kendall, the Pentagon’s chief weapons buyer, told the Senate Armed Services Committee on April 30.
 “In contrast, we believe the lack of action by the BoJ and lack of buying by non-domestic investors represent a challenge for Japanese equities near term” ‘Year’s Worst’ Like Loeys, Bank of America Corp’s Savita Subramanian also had capital expenditures on her mind on Friday.
 Part of the reason is that companies aren’t seeing the same consistent pop in share prices they formerly saw by spending cash on buying back their own stock.
 “Buying companies with the largest share buybacks was the best performing strategy from 2012 through most of 2013 but is one of this year’s worst,” she wrote.
 Capex Beneficiaries Subramanian packed her pdf chock full of stocks likely to perform well should companies start doing more with their cash than just buy their own stock.
 There were 79,354 bids to buy wind, hydropower and biomass credits, the least since September, according to data from trader REConnect Energy Solutions Pvt.
 Companies have until March 31, 2015 to buy credits to comply with their obligations.
 “There is a rerating that has happened,” said Mumbai-based Kapadia, who has a buy recommendation on the stock.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest energy producer, may step up its hunt for acquisitions after scrapping a deal to buy a stake in Israel’s Leviathan natural gas project for as much as $26 billion.
 “It buys diversification” Gazprom capital expenditure totaled $439 billion last year, trailing only Brazil’s Petroleo Brasileiro SA and CNPC among the world’s biggest oil and gas companies, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 We’re buyers rather sellers at this time” Retail sales in the US.
 The distributor of petroleum products was raised to buy from hold at Canaccord Genuity Corp.
 Lehman Bailout Geithner was concerned that Paulson’s public insistence that taxpayers not bail out Lehman Brothers could undermine the government’s ability to pursue a rescue if one were needed, the Times reported, citing “Stress Test” Geithner preferred to send a message that a bailout might be available, which might have made the investment bank more desirable to a potential buyer.
 CommonWealth, under Portnoy management, denied Corvex and Related’s claims of conflicts of interest and said it was focused on buying office buildings in US.
 The billionaire, nicknamed “the grave dancer” for buying distressed properties left for dead in the 1990s, sold his Equity Office Properties Trust in 2007 for $39 billion as the commercial real estate market was peaking.
 “It’s a good route to get to India and that’s a growing market,” Laut said about Energy East in a May 9 telephone interview, noting Indian buyers of crude have contacted Canadian Natural and are “keen” to buy its oil.
 Alfa, a conglomerate with energy assets in Mexico and the US, said yesterday that it built a 10 percent stake in Pacific Rubiales and may buy more stock.
 climbed the most in almost two months after KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, offered S$14 billion ($11 billion) to buy the provider of bulk containers.
 The buyout firm is turning its interest to Singapore after acquiring disk-drive parts maker MMI Holdings Ltd.
 The buyout firm said in 2012 it was planning to expand its business lending to Asian companies amid a shortage of funding in the region.
 In the Asia-Pacific region, KKR’s A$305 billion ($28 billion) proposal to buy Melbourne-based Treasury Wine Estates Ltd, whose labels include Stags’ Leap, Wolf Blass and Beringer, was rejected as too low earlier this month.
 The private-equity firm has about 23 investments across the Asia-Pacific after buying an 80 percent stake in Panasonic Healthcare Co.
 Sterba, CEO since August 2010, “has been a large part of American Water’s transformation into the best-of-breed operator it is today,” Ryan Connors, a Janney Montgomery Scott LLC analyst, said in note that reiterated his buy rating.
 Local savers and investors are buying more dollars after central bank President Juan Carlos Fabrega cut rates from a decade-high 289 percent in March to 2686 percent on 98-day notes to be issued at tonight’s auction.
 Evidence of uneven economic growth that may constrain inflation has confounded predictions for a second year of bond losses after early signs that growth is gaining traction prompted the Federal Reserve to taper its $85 billion-a-month bond-buying program.
 “It will be very difficult to have an adjustment in an election year,” Luana Helsinger, an oil and gas analyst at brokerage GBM Brasil, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock, said by telephone from Rio.
 rose the most in more than 10 months in Tokyo stock trading after Japan’s biggest brokerage said it will buy back shares and raise dividends as it posted a lower-than-estimated decline in quarterly earnings.
 Nomura said yesterday that it plans to buy back as much as 26 percent of outstanding shares after net income climbed to an eight-year high in the year ended March.
 “Nomura rose more than other brokerages as the size of the share buyback, earnings and dividend payments were bigger than expected,” Masao Muraki, an analyst at Deutsche Securities Inc.
 “In the long term, it will be hard for investors to buy into the securities industry unless market conditions take a favorable turn” The drop in Nomura’s quarterly earnings was the first since the three months ended June 2012, as lower brokerage commissions overshadowed gains from investment banking and trading.
 Ryanair agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
 Richard Davis, an analyst at Canaccord Genuity, lowered his 12-month target for the stock to $65 from $80, citing in a report “the broader valuation correction in cloud software” Davis rates the shares a buy.
 “The core CRM business still continues to grow,” said Brendan Barnicle, an analyst at Pacific Crest Securities in Portland, Oregon, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Salesforce.
 The Fed pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion.
 The companies’ partnership gives Rosneft the ability to buy stakes in Exxon’s North American projects in exchange for Exxon’s access to the Russian Arctic.
 Deutsche Bank cut its rating for the stocks to sell from buy.
 Investors are buying retailers as they have proven more resilient amid slowing growth, according to OAO Promsvyazbank and Kapital Asset Management LLC.
 “I cut our Magnit holdings at the start of the year during the ruble devaluation wave and started buying it at the beginning of May,” Sabina Mukhamedzhanova, a fund manager at Promsvyaz Asset Management in Moscow, which manages about 179 billion rubles ($520 million), said by phone yesterday.
 Barclays Plc reiterated a rating equivalent to buy in a note dated yesterday.
 analysts Victor Dima and Ilya Ogorodnikov wrote in an e-mailed note yesterday, giving it a buy recommendation and a price estimate implying a 27 percent jump.
 “It’s a very good stock longer-term, while in the meantime we need to see what is going on in the economy before we consider buying retailers.
 “We deserve a livable wage,” said Topel, who receives government assistance to buy food.
 Through its Spanish unit, the Italian broadcaster has an option with Prisa to match the bid of any buyer, one of the people said.
 “The concept is appealing, marketing has been terrific, and reviews have been sensational, which will make ticket buyers feel like their money will not be wasted,” Gitesh Pandya, chief executive officer of Boxofficegurucom, said on his website.
 Europe’s biggest oil company said today in a statement it is canceling its scrip-dividend program, a move that will enable A class shareholders to take part in buybacks without having to pay the Dutch withholding tax.
 After the divestments, Vivendi will return 5 billion euros to shareholders by 2015 through dividends and share buybacks.
 is seeking a buyer for Cole-Parmer Instrument Co, the lab-equipment manufacturer that it acquired in 2001, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Encana, which has seven buy, 14 hold and four sell recommendations from analysts, has risen 35 percent this year.
 to buy clean energy at premium prices is poised to fuel the spread of panels to more farms.
 The family is considering turning them into orchards and buying more panels, he said.
 “It looks like most investors forgot about the risks and focused on Ukraine electing a new president in the first round of voting” The RTS gauge has to sink about 11 percent from yesterday’s close to look attractive for buyers, Smolyaninov said.
 mortgage rates fell for a fourth week, reducing borrowing costs for homebuyers during the key spring selling season.
 The drop in loan costs this month may help spur some would-be buyers, said Keith Gumbinger, vice president of HSHcom, a Riverdale, New Jersey-based mortgage-data firm.
 “With a combination of a flatter trajectory for home prices and lower rates, that should be preserving affordability as we go through the spring homebuying season,” Gumbinger said in a telephone interview yesterday.
 Two members of the group are combining, with Samsung SDI Co, a supplier of batteries to Apple, agreeing to buy chemical and electronic materials maker Cheil Industries Inc.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- For potential buyers from Google Inc.
 This “is an exceptional buying opportunity” for shareholders.
 ‘Premium Property’ For interested buyers, which also may include Apple Inc, “it’s definitely easier to justify the price,” Blake Harper, a Baltimore-based analyst at Wunderlich Securities Inc, said in a phone interview.
 And any buyer may have to offer more than the company’s March high, at least an 81 percent premium, to get a deal done, said Kerry Rice of Needham & Co.
 “Unless it’s a very attractive offer, I don’t think it would be consummated” For buyers looking for a cheaper option, OpenTable may be an enticing target, said White of Macquarie.
 Beats Headphones Apple is in talks to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the closely held headphones maker and music streaming service co-founded by Dr.
 “We really see this as another way to become the place where you can buy pretty much anything,” Rob Lopez, general manager for Groupon Basics, said in an interview.
 The companies, which buy mortgages and package them into bonds, were seized by regulators in 2008 as they neared bankruptcy.
 “The board undeniably is comprised of a majority of independent directors” Loeb contends Sotheby’s decision to trigger the pill if activist investors buy more than 10 percent of its shares, while allowing passive investors to buy as much as 20 percent, leaves the measure open to attack.
 Loeb complains he’s being unfairly denied the right to buy more shares that could help him win the proxy contest.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Usman Ahmad is in no hurry to insure his own life, even after buying protection for his gray BMW and the house he bought in Toronto.
 Gundlach said there will be more supply of housing when investment firms, who together with cash buyers have supported the property market, liquidate their holdings.
 Yarbrough, who rates the company a buy, said the company’s forecast may be conservative given signs that growth is picking up.
 joined 3G Capital last year in a $233 billion takeover of ketchup maker HJ Heinz Co, said he’d welcome more deals with the buyout firm.
 Abel completed the $56 billion acquisition of NV Energy, Nevada’s largest electric utility, in December and announced a deal May 1 to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $29 billion to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 “Growth is slowing down, but it’s slowing down because they’re so big now,” said Colin Gillis, an analyst at BGC Partners in New York who rates the stock a buy.
 who rates the shares the equivalent of a buy.
 They seem to fall down on the side of, ‘Is the economy at a point where it reaches a self-sustaining path?’” Dollar General, an owner of discount stores, declined 3 percent to $5460 as Deutsche Bank AG lowered the stock’s rating to hold from buy.
 Nomura raised its rating on the shares to buy from neutral.
 “Once some potential buyers surface, all of a sudden people sharpen their pencils,” said George Young, a partner at St.
 The valuation is already “a little rich, and it’s a $10 billion company, so their options are limited in terms of buyers,” said Scott Goginsky, a research analyst and money manager at Milford, Pennsylvania-based Biondo Investment Advisors LLC, which owns B/E stock among the $500 million it oversees.
 “It makes you wonder whether a breakup is more likely to be in the cards” Safran, a Paris-based company that makes aircraft engines, landing gear and cockpit controls, would be more interested in B/E’s cabin business, although it’s large enough to buy the whole company, said Rob Stallard, an analyst with RBC, in a May 6 report.
 General Electric Co, which is seeking French government support of its offer to buy the power business of Alstom SA, can’t be ruled out, according to Stallard.
 Multiple Suitors Representatives for United Technologies, GE and Precision Castparts declined to comment on whether they’re interested in buying B/E or any of its businesses.
 “The question is whether we understand it well enough to use it without encountering a significant amount of blowback or unintended consequences” Spy Agencies Spy agencies develop exploits themselves, buy them from contractors or steal them from rivals.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- French buyout firm Eurazeo SA is planning a potential initial public offering of Elis SA, Europe’s largest provider of linens to hotels and restaurants, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 partners including Romney to invest in early-stage companies and then later managed leveraged buyouts, oversaw more than $70 billion at the end of last year, including credit funds.
 The firm this year raised $73 billion for its latest buyout fund.
 The firm will buy 214 million shares at $7 apiece in a private placement, according to a statement.
 Founded in 1996, Relational typically buys stakes in companies it considers undervalued and then lobbies management and boards for changes to boost investor returns.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 EBay also recently expanded its global shipping program to Brazil, making the process simpler when shoppers buy products from a US.
 Language was added to the bill, dealing mainly with rules for all-terrain vehicles, to explicitly require consumers to buy vehicles only through franchise auto dealerships.
 Proceeds will be used to buy back $126 million of Qantas’s 605 percent notes due April 2016 from one investor and to repay other shorter term debt maturities, according to the statement.
 Investors should buy assets before they get more expensive, and GIC and Temasek are faster than other state funds in seizing the opportunities” Direct investments refer to strategic acquisitions rather than investments made as part of an index-linked portfolio, usually intermediated by an asset manager or bank, according to the Sovereign Wealth Center.
 Biggest Share Temasek in March agreed to buy a 25 percent stake in the retail arm of Hutchison Whampoa Ltd.
 “While a number of factors have pushed GM stock downward recently, the controversy around the ignition switch recall appears to have had a chilling effect, and has underscored the idea that despite attractive valuation, GM might perpetually be a value trap,” Brian Johnson, a Chicago-based analyst at Barclays Plc who rates GM the equivalent of a buy, wrote in a May 14 report.
 They found a 2004 post on a popular Chinese auto forum in which someone identifying himself as UglyGorilla was seeking advice on buying a car for his wife to use.
 VW, which said separately today that it has enough shareholder backing to buy full control of truckmaker Scania AB, increased 03 percent to 19230 euros.
 Osisko ran a search for alternatives and announced April 2 that Yamana had agreed to buy 50 percent of Osisko’s assets.
 After Goldcorp responded a week later by raising its own bid, Agnico joined Yamana in a friendly transaction to buy the whole of Osisko.
 Nintendo completed a 114 billion-yen share buyback Feb.
 Charles and Grace Silvas, who sued GM in federal court in Corpus Christi, Texas, were seeking as much as $10 billion so they and similarly affected customers could buy new cars, according to their lawyer, Bob Hilliard.
 Derivatives that give the buyer the option to sell the Aussie against the US.
 “Reserve managers continually buy Aussie dollar because it has the highest yield for a AAA nation,” Azous said.
 For example, the policy would have barred an employee from buying a bottle at a wine shop during a long layover and taking it on board in luggage, Caldwell said.
 “That’s going to be a major focal point” Caesars was taken private at the tail-end of a leveraged buyout boom, and a collapse in yields following the Federal Reserve’s unprecedented stimulus to counter the last recession has helped the company carry out more than 45 transactions to reduce debt and extend maturities.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since its buyout.
 Mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 Also, the investors who helped drive up prices in the past two years by buying homes and converting them into rentals are finding fewer distressed properties on the market.
 “Croatia is underrated and a good credit story,” Lutz Roehmeyer, a money manager overseeing $11 billion at LBB Invest, who is seeking to buy the new securities, said by phone from Berlin on May 19.
 The Frankfurt-based company will seek a premium of about 50 basis points over the current secondary-market rates to buy the new notes, he said by phone yesterday.
 Analysts have 14 buys, one sell and four hold recommendations on the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 is doing extremely well and India might be the flavor of the month again” Foreign buying of $114 billion of Philippine shares in the 15 weeks through May 23, the longest stretch of weekly purchases since February 2012, supported a 15 percent rally in the nation’s benchmark stock index this year.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Pacific Rubiales Energy Corp, Latin America’s largest non-state oil producer, hasn’t been approached by a potential buyer, Chief Executive Officer Ronald Pantin said today.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy loans and package them into securities, were taken into US.
 Archipelago maintains the error account to trade securities that it acquires when computer malfunctions require it to buy or sell stock to maintain an orderly market.
 pressed its case for buying AstraZeneca hours before the chief executives of both companies are scheduled to appear before UK.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Amid a wave of consolidation in the drug business, Meda AB is ready to buy and double in size.
 ‘Valeant’s prospects of completing this deal are less than 50 percent’’ Maris said Allergan’s options include being acquired, buying another company or selling a large stake of the company to a strategic acquirer.
 35 Companies Valeant Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson took the helm in 2008 and has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 35 companies as part of a goal to join the ranks of the world’s five biggest drugmakers by the end of 2016.
 In March, Atlas Mara agreed to buy BancABC, which offers financial services in Botswana, Mozambique, Tanzania, Zambia and Zimbabwe, and said it will use the company as a springboard for further acquisitions.
 Cineplex Inc, an operator of movie theaters, gained 31 percent after RBC Capital Markets recommended buying the shares.
 climbed 46 percent after saying it was doubling its oil production by buying fields from Freeport-McMoRan Copper & Gold Inc.
 Bank of Montreal and Raymond James analysts said they were reviewing their buy ratings on the stock.
 The e-commerce company provides various marketplaces for buyers and sellers, as well as services that help them conduct their businesses.
 The catering company was taken private in 2006 by founder Robert Zolade with backing from buyout firms Chequers Capital and Charterhouse, which currently owns 622 percent of Elior.
 Sunac, the Tianjin, China-based luxury-home builder part owned by buyout firm Bain Capital LLC, is in discussion with three of Greentown’s shareholders, including Chairman Song Weiping and Chief Executive Officer Shou Bainian, according to two statements from the companies to the Hong Kong stock exchange yesterday.
 and Greentown have cut property prices since March to lure homebuyers, according to China Real Estate Information Corp.
 government bonds, buyers of the longest-term Treasuries are facing a potential shortage of supply.
 Fewer available bonds, along with a lack of inflation and increased foreign buying, help to explain why longer-term Treasuries are surging this year even as the Fed pares its own bond purchases.
 In the next 12 months alone, buying from private pensions will create $150 billion in demand for longer-maturity Treasuries, based on Bank of Nova Scotia’s estimates.
 The company, which stopped developing the Fruta del Norte mine last year as Ecuador sought to increase taxes, is looking for about $300 million from the sale of the project, two of the people said, asking not to be named because talks with the government and prospective buyers may not lead to a deal.
 Couldn’t Agree Junefield Mineral Resources Holdings Ltd, the Hong Kong-listed company that already holds three gold concessions in Ecuador, is one of four companies interested in buying the project, three of the people said.
 Yuedong Xu, Junefield’s Ecuador country manager, declined to comment yesterday on whether the company was in talks to buy the concession.
 with a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a research note.
(Corrects reference to PC titles in sixth paragraph of story published May 14) May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Nexon Co, the Japanese maker of online games such as MapleStory, jumped the most on record in Tokyo trading after saying it will buy back shares.
 The company, which earns money from sales of in-game items, plans to spend as much as 10 billion yen ($98 million) to buy back as many as 125 million shares, it said yesterday.
 The buyback reflects efforts to return money to shareholders, Chief Financial Officer Shiro Uemura said on a conference call.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Polymetal International Plc, the gold and silver producer part-owned by Russian billionaire Alexander Nesis, agreed to buy the Kyzyl project in northeast Kazakhstan for $6185 million to add 50 percent to its reserves.
 It is buying the assets from Sumeru Gold BV.
 The gold producer planned to buy the Bakyrchik mine from companies owned by Timur Kulibayev, a son-in-law of Kazakh President Nursultan Nazarbayev, Kommersant reported in October.
 “UltraShape is, in our mind, the best opportunity to develop this business model” Eckhouse’s plan to revive sales seems to have convinced analysts: four out of five rate the stock equivalent of buy, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The increase may hurt health-care real estate investment trusts and companies including Brookdale Senior Living Inc, which is buying competitor Emeritus Corp.
 In February, Brookdale agreed to buy Seattle-based Emeritus.
 The government will have spent 880 billion baht ($27 billion) buying rice from farmers from October 2011 to February 2014, according to the Bank for Agriculture and Agricultural Cooperatives, including about 100 billion baht that hasn’t yet been paid.
 In 2008, the court found his allies guilty of vote buying, disbanding their party and banning another 30 executives, including then-Prime Minister Somchai Wongsawat, Thaksin’s brother-in-law.
 Democrats argue that the $12 trillion worth of outstanding student-loan debt retards economic growth as young college graduates are forced to postpone home buying or other purchases.
 A 10 percent drop would be a buying opportunity, he said.
 Aston Martin vehicles have been featured in 11 James Bond movies, including the vintage silver DB5 in the latest one, “Skyfall” “They have a good brand image, so they will always have a buyer,” Boulanger said.
 The Fed said April 30 it will keep the benchmark interest rate at virtually zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends.
 “A little of a surprising aspect is that there’s still this much return left in it this far along,” according to Marcia Page, co-chief investment officer of Varde, which oversees $85 billion and has been buying Lehman claims since 2008.
 “There’s just so much debt” Bright Spot The investments have been a bright spot in a world of increasingly expensive securities because they are complicated to analyze, partly hinge on decisions made by judges and may take a long time to pay out, which reduces the pool of buyers to those who have adequate resources and available capital.
 government aid or attract a buyer, 158 years after its founding as a cotton brokerage in Alabama.
 Paulson and Varde were some of the earliest buyers of the claims, which give investors the right to collect any income tied to an estate’s assets.
 Bull Market “One of the reasons I still like seasoned liquidations at this point in the cycle is that we’ve had a 30-year bull market in bonds, and spreads associated with most credit instruments, especially high yield, are pretty tight,” said John Bader, chief investment officer of $126 billion New York-based Halcyon, which has been buying the majority of its Lehman claims since late 2011.
 Some hedge funds, including Varde, have shifted the bulk of their distressed dollars to Europe, where the firm has been buying holdings of performing and non-performing loans.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- Tullett Prebon Plc, facing a decline in revenue, agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 is enticing equity investors with the prospect of bigger dividends and buybacks, and options traders are digging it.
 Bensen, responding to a question about whether the company could raise its buyback goal, said on March 11 that McDonald’s capital structure “can probably get more aggressive” without jeopardizing its credit rating.
 McDonald’s, which has paid uninterrupted dividends on its stock since at least 1977, had a record $311 billion in dividends and $181 billion of buybacks last year.
 rebounded from its lowest level in three years after winning regulatory review to buy assets from its parent.
 The China Securities Regulatory Commission will review a private share placement by the company to buy mining assets from its parent company, according to an exchange statement.
 tumbled the most on the ADR gauge as Deutsche Bank AG cut it to hold from buy.
 cut its rating on the stock to hold from buy.
 rental housing as the homebuying market collapsed in 2006 is still going strong in cities including San Francisco, Seattle and Houston, boosting rents and driving construction of apartments in and near downtowns.
 “There are fewer suburban, garden-style four-story walkups being built in most of our markets because suburban rental rates are not high enough to justify new construction” Blackstone is buying older apartments and fixing them up to compete with newer units -- improvements such as upgrading the kitchens and bathrooms, swapping carpets for wood floors and changing the lighting.
 It’s also buying a group of shopping centers from American Realty Capital Properties Inc.
 Since the financial crisis, Blackstone has formed a warehouse-property landlord, IndCor Properties, and a company to own shopping centers, Brixmor Property Group Inc, by taking advantage of opportunities to buy assets at discounts from distressed sellers.
 Hilliard told Bloomberg he wants as much as $10 billion so customers can buy new vehicles.
 “Because of the need for continuing adaptation, certain banks still need to be conservative in their capital planning and show restraint in measures that weaken their resilience, such as profit distribution and share buybacks” Sweden’s financial industry is one of the biggest in Europe relative to gross domestic product, with combined assets at home and abroad equivalent to four times the nation’s $560 billion economy.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Asian buyers snapped up works by Henri Matisse, Claude Monet and Alberto Giacometti at Sotheby’s mixed $219 million evening sale of Impressionist and modern art in New York yesterday.
 Of the 71 lots, 21, or 30 percent, failed to find buyers.
 The prices include the buyer’s fee; the estimates don’t.
 Another Asian buyer won Giacometti’s sculpture “La Place (City Square)” Cast in 1948, it fetched $13 million, within the estimated range of $12 million to $18 million.
 The Asian buying trend was visible at Christie’s, where the top lot, a Monet painting of water lilies once owned by reclusive heiress Huguette Clark, went to a private Asian buyer for $27 million.
 Bond yields are tumbling this year as investors find fewer signs of strength in the economy than expected and less-than-anticipated damage to debt prices from the Federal Reserve’s reduction in its buying, said Vitaliy Liberman, a money manager who focuses on mortgage securities at DoubleLine Capital LP.
 Borrowing costs, which are driven by changes in lenders’ profit margins as well as bond yields, are up from a record low 331 percent in November 2012 Sales of previously owned homes dropped in March to the slowest pace since July 2012, as higher property prices and loan costs held back buyers, according to National Association of Realtors data.
 “Expectations about replacing with domestic technology products have provided adequate buying excuses” Industrial Profits The CSI 300 Index rose 1 percent to 2,16935.
 Lenovo, which agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business this year, advanced 1 percent.
 Economic Stimulus Manulife Asset Management is buying Chinese stocks for the first time this year, betting that government steps to buoy growth will finally boost the lowest equity valuations in Asia.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Axa Real Estate Investment Managers and Danish pension fund ATP agreed to buy the Belgian Finance Ministry’s headquarters in Brussels in a transaction that values the property at 475 million euros ($654 million).
 Axa is partnering with European pension funds to buy commercial properties as large investors seek to boost returns amid low interest rates.
 In November, the insurer agreed to buy Munich’s SZ Tower with Norway’s sovereign wealth fund Norges Bank Investment Management.
 That doesn’t make sense if investors are buying risky assets because they feel good about the economy.
 In recent months, Tencent agreed to buy a $500 million stake in Seoul-based mobile game developer CJ Games and purchased exclusive rights to the Chinese version of Candy Crush Saga from King Digital Entertainment Plc, of Dublin.
 in Hong Kong who recommends buying Tencent’s stock.
 By agreeing to buy a 28 percent stake in CJ Games in March, Tencent returned to one of its most reliable sources of overseas hits: South Korea.
 Oracle agreed to buy Sun in 2009 for $74 billion and sued Google a year later.
 Consumer confidence rose last week to its second-highest level in more than six years, propelled by growing optimism over household finances and the buying climate, the Bloomberg Consumer Comfort Index showed.
 His company helps pension funds buy insurance-linked securities such as catastrophe bonds.
 Treasury Yields In a note to clients dated May 9, Bank of Nova Scotia recommended investors buy the bonds.
 In addition to securing buyers for decades worth of supply required to backstop financing of the Pacific Coast projects, proponents of Canadian LNG projects need to negotiate access to coastal lands claimed by aboriginal groups, known as First Nations in Canada.
 Afterward, she sought to gather funds to honor Michelle’s memory, refinancing her home in San Anselmo, California, near San Francisco, and in 2006 buying an acre of land about 94 miles (151 kilometers) north in Clearlake, California, for $550,000.
 Bogdanoff dismissed allegations that the company had swindled more than 100 prospective buyers, without giving any real explanation, Lackner said.
 Robinson, who was a fashion buyer for boutiques and small department stores, compares herself to Erin Brockovich, the former legal researcher whose activism against chemical contamination inspired a 2000 Hollywood movie.
 Luxury-home sales are climbing as an improving economy and stocks that have almost tripled from 2009 lows bolster confidence among affluent buyers.
 The New York-based brokerage marketed the property, known as Copper Beech Farm, to international buyers.
 Whether you’re buying a third home in Manhattan as a pied-a-terre or another Picasso, these are acquisitions of passion, of lifestyle and of experience” Purchases of getaway homes are also climbing.
 He’s also buying a 5,000-square-foot (465-square-meter) condominium in a project under construction in Miami’s Coconut Grove section.
 The Federal Housing Administration, the biggest source of financing for first-time buyers, has raised the cost of borrowing and tightened underwriting to cope with losses on mortgages it insured before the crash.
 Homeowners prefer to sell to cash buyers who then paint and upgrade carpets and resell at a significant markup, Mastykaz said.
 “First-time homebuyers are paying retail price, investors are getting wholesale pricing,” he said.
 “The market has shrunk and the inventory that is left over are the ones where the price increased so far so fast that it’s less appealing” Investor Buying In states where prices have risen the most in the past two years -- including Florida, California, Nevada, Arizona and Georgia -- institutional investors have helped worsen the inventory crunch by buying thousands of single-family homes and converting them into rentals.
 homebuilders haven’t done much to ease the supply problem for lower-income families because they’re increasingly catering to buyers who can afford larger, more expensive properties and have an easier time getting mortgages.
 KB Home, which traditionally targeted entry-level buyers, now builds about half of its houses for the move-up market.
 “With the mortgage headwinds and the lack of job growth and everything else that we dealt with through this housing cycle and now into the recovery, the typical first-time buyer got kneecapped,” Jeff Mezger, CEO of the Los Angeles-based company, said on a conference call in March.
 Last month the Fort Worth, Texas-based builder said it started a new brand, Express Homes, aimed at first-time buyers who are now shut out of the market.
 “The next leg of this recovery will be driven by the true entry-level buyer, and we are prepared to capture that demand,” CEO Donald Tomnitz said on DR.
 “There’s no question that with the price increases that we’ve experienced in our industry over the last couple, three years, with all the pricing power we’ve had, we’ve really depleted that pool of affordable buyers” Lower Affordability US.
 “Persistent dollar buying by state-owned banks pressured the rupee,” said Amogh Moghe, a Mumbai-based currency trader at Mecklai & Mecklai Ltd.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 “It may be expensive but people seem to be able to afford what they are buying,” Home Capital Chief Executive Gerald Soloway said in a May 15 telephone interview.
 programmer who has achieved celebrity in the debate surrounding high-frequency trading, says traders use them to cloak plans to buy or sell shares, giving them an advantage over other investors.
 Although he didn’t identify Algo Technologies by name, Sprecher said today that ICE made an acquisition to create a “single, fast, lightweight platform that is reliable” The goal is to use the same matching engine -- an industry term for the software the pairs buyers and sellers on an exchange -- on all of NYSE’s stock and options markets, he said.
 Traders who frequently buy and sell small amounts of stocks can use those confirmations to gain insights about where the market is moving even without data feeds.
 Strategas says congressional inaction on government-sponsored enterprise reform will buy time for the courts to rule on whether the government “illegally swept profits from shareholders” of GSEs like Fannie.
 During apartheid, black people weren’t allowed to buy clear or full-strength beer, leading to the emergence of illegal bars known as shebeens.
 Bent on reversing that, SABMiller is also paying bar owners to buy from them.
 The brewer runs two trade loyalty programs for smaller taverns via which owners can earns points for buying the company’s products.
 will stop buying and reselling storage technology from NetApp Inc.
 Instead, the company will encourage clients to buy IBM-made offerings, the memo said.
 IntercontinentalExchange Group Inc’s NYSE relies on traders known as designated market makers, or DMMs, to facilitate the buying and selling of shares.
 Retail Sales About $48 billion in market value has been erased this year from Bed Bath & Beyond, which runs almost 1,500 brick-and-mortar stores including Cost Plus World Market and Buybuy Baby.
 He recommends buying the shares, citing its inexpensive valuation.
 Compliance Policy Japan’s FSA Moves to Loosen Rules for Insurers, Sankei Reports Japan’s Financial Services Agency submitted an amendment to a bill that will allow insurance companies to buy competitors with units that operate non-insurance businesses, Sankei reported, without attribution.
 The new rule, which will take effect as early as this year, will enable insurers to buy the assets as long as they divest non-insurance units within five years of acquisition, the newspaper reported.
 ‘Restoring Positions’ The advance may be due to “massive buying by foreign investors, who may be willing to restore their positions in government bonds,” Dmitry Polevoy, chief economist for Russia and the Commonwealth of Independent States at ING Bank Eurasia Zao in Moscow, said in an e-mailed note.
 “It’s time to buy,” Jack Arnoff, a partner at Elbrus Capital Partners in London, said by e-mail today.
 to find buyers for the unit, which could fetch at least $25 billion, a person with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 Spain buys about 99 percent of its oil and natural gas abroad -- among the highest proportions in Europe.
 “Iraq could buy back the entire bond issue at par with the revenue from 10 days of oil exports,” Geoffrey Batt, managing director of the $110 million Euphrates Iraq Fund, said in a May 20 e-mail from New York.
 Last week, the REIT said it would buy more than 500 Red Lobster seafood restaurants in a $15 billion sale-and-leaseback deal.
 “All this serves to recapitalize the company, and puts the company in a position to continue to aggressively buy assets,” Lachance said.
 is buying Harlequin Enterprises, a publisher of novels such as “Destiny’s Last Bachelor?” and “The Heartbreaker Prince,” for C$455 million ($415 million) in cash, according to a statement today.
 The Federal Reserve pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion in April, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in measured steps are likely.
 Consumers are buying fewer personal computers and printers as they embrace smartphones and tablets, and companies are opting to use more software via the Internet or building their own machines.
 AstraZeneca has resisted the 604-billion-pound ($1019 billion) offer, and said yesterday that the disruption of a buyout could jeopardize its pipeline of experimental drugs.
 AstraZeneca cut 40 percent of its workforce in the UK” AstraZeneca CEO Pascal Soriot, who appeared before the committee after Read, said Pfizer’s offer undervalued the company, and that the buyout could be disruptive.
 The company is considering selling bonds to buy back more expensive debt and extend maturities, he said.
 He was also threatened by some who incorrectly speculated that he assisted in the investigation and prosecution of Silk Road, the billion-dollar online website where customers used bitcoins to buy and sell drugs, according to the US.
 Repsol has said it is seeking to use cash to buy assets.
 Fiat SpA, the carmaker that agreed to buy the rest of Chrysler Group LLC in January, surged 46 percent for the second-biggest rally in the index.
 Expanding the portfolio will provide more revenue to buy more projects, both from TransAlta Corp.
 The bill will also prohibit banks from buying their own stock or making loans using their shares as security.
 They’ve made it more of a bold statement” She recommends buying the shares.
 is in talks to buy the company, just months after Ergen approached DirecTV about a combination.
 Last year, Ergen offered to buy Sprint, only to be outbid by SoftBank Corp.
 He’s competing for DirecTV’s attention with AT&T, which is in talks to buy the company, people with knowledge of the situation said this week.
 “I don’t think we are at an equilibrium yet” The city’s private home prices dropped by the most in almost five years following a campaign that started in 2009 to curb property market speculation, with government curbs ranging from taxes on property sales, additional levies on foreign buyers and mortgage limits.
 “The government will monitor but their fingers won’t be pressing any buttons at this point in time” Some developers that have cut prices by 10 percent to 15 percent are drawing buyers, he said.
 Some curbs that were introduced were for the “short term,” such as stamp duties or taxes for homebuyers, CEO Lim Ming Yan said in an interview at the time.
 “The concept is appealing, marketing has been terrific, and reviews have been sensational, which will make ticket buyers feel like their money will not be wasted,” Gitesh Pandya, chief executive officer of Boxofficegurucom, said on his website.
 Orix agreed last month to buy US.
 to help it find a buyer and dropped the plan the same year.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- Federal Reserve Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher said he favors a steady tapering in bond buying by the Fed, with a $15 billion cut to zero in October.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen said May 7 that, with inflation and employment far from the central bank’s goals, “a high degree of monetary accommodation remains warranted” Policy makers haven’t indicated whether their plans for tapering $45 billion in monthly bond buying would mean announcing an end to purchases in October or a final $5 billion reduction in December.
 “There is abundant liquidity to finance economic expansion” Fed officials on April 30 announced a trim to bond buying for the fourth consecutive meeting, saying the economy has strengthened after harsh winter weather slowed growth to a 01 percent annual pace in the first quarter.
 Yellen said in May 7 testimony to the Joint Economic Committee that the central bank will probably end bond buying in the fall if the labor market continues to improve.
 They are buying ads and organizing phone calls and letter writing campaigns, with supporters urging Democrats to defy President Barack Obama by overriding his administration’s now-delayed review of the pipeline.
 Bovis Homes Group Plc said today trading is “strong” and the outlook “very positive” The number of loans advanced to first-time buyers was 24,400 in March, up 24 percent from a year earlier, data from the Council of Mortgage Lenders show.
 Societe Generale cut its rating on the stock to hold from buy, citing the lack of a catalyst to drive the shares higher.
 raised its rating on the potash producer to overweight, which is similar to a buy recommendation, from neutral.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity and allowed them to withdraw pension savings without paying a 55 percent tax.
 “There’s been some buyback from yesterday’s oversell triggered by the stronger yen,” said Koji Toda, chief fund manager at Resona Bank Ltd.
 aren’t bad enough to raise concerns, but too weak to be completely optimistic, so there’s been buying and selling over small reasons in the stock markets” The Bank of Japan meets from today amid forecasts by 44 percent of economists in a Bloomberg News poll of additional stimulus by the end of the July gathering.
 No change to policy is expected tomorrow, with the central bank buying about 7 trillion yen ($69 billion) of sovereign debt a month since April last year.
(Corrects name of Csathy’s company in second paragraph) May 10 (Bloomberg) -- Apple Inc’s plan to buy Beats Electronics LLC for $32 billion highlights the attractiveness of streaming companies such as Pandora Media Inc.
 Pandora, seen as a potential acquisition target, rose 19 percent to $2262 yesterday, following reports of Apple’s discussions to buy Culver City, California-based Beats.
 “Any number of the large tech or media companies with big balance sheets could easily digest Pandora if they feel like music is part of the entertainment package they want to offer,” said Tinker, who rates Pandora a buy.
 The company last month offered to buy stakes in directory businesses it jointly owns with PubliGroupe SA as it seeks to strengthen its position in advertising.
 The golf courses and beaches of Los Cabos are luring Americans who are able to get home-equity loans to buy in Mexico as US.
 American buyers in Mexico are benefiting from the decline in the costs of credit lines, which have adjustable rates tied to the prime rate.
 Mexican Market “I leveraged the equity in my house and spent my savings,” the homebuyer Gipson said.
 While resort areas such as Puerto Vallarta and Los Cabos are getting a boost from international buyers, the home market in Mexico has struggled amid weak economic growth and shifts in government policy.
 buyers avoid getting financing in Mexico because it’s too costly, said Julie Kershner, a broker at Sotheby’s International Realty in Los Cabos.
 Americans buying in Mexico should expect to pay 14 percent to 16 percent for mortgages.
 He said buyers frequently must make a 35 percent down payment.
 San Diego South International buyers who obtain residency in Mexico typically get a 10 percent fixed-rate mortgage for as long as 20 years, according to Apsey.
 An increase in the number of available homes, slower price gains and easier lending standards would help encourage prospective buyers to take advantage of falling mortgage rates.
 Some relief may be in store for potential buyers as borrowing costs decline.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- Junk-rated companies are paying up to borrow in the loan market as investors yank more than $900 million from funds that buy the debt.
 Loan investors are getting more selective about what they will buy after facing three weeks of withdrawals, with the end of a 95-week streak of cash inflows relieving pressure on fund managers to put money to work in a market that Federal Reserve officials have said shows signs of froth.
 Increased Discount TravelClick last week increased the rate on a $385 million loan that will finance its buyout by Thoma Bravo LLC to 45 percentage points more than the London interbank offered rate from a previously proposed spread of 375 percentage points to 4 percentage points, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The New York-based provider of technology services to the hotel industry also increased the discount on the buyout loan to 99 cents on the dollar from 995, the data show.
 While mutual fund demand is waning, other buyers are still supporting the market, according to Pimco’s MacLean.
 Collateralized loan obligations, the biggest buyers of junk loans that fueled the 2005-2007 buyout boom, will raise as much as $90 billion in 2014, potentially the most in seven years, according to a forecast last month from Wells Fargo & Co.
 CLOs are a type of collateralized debt obligation that buy speculative-grade loans and slice them into securities of varying risk and return.
 Until now, the biggest buyers of China’s auto exports have been countries such as Algeria, Russia and Chile.
 The railroad said in February that it planned a record $5 billion outlay this year to buy locomotives and maintain track as it hauls more crude oil drilled in shale fields.
 The South Korean giant is also interested in buying a stake in Ha Long Shipbuilding, he said.
 “The concern is largely about the way to get there” He advises buying the shares and estimates IBM will hit the $18 target.
 Eight analysts advise buying the stock, while 24 say to hold and three recommend selling.
 agreed to buy IBM’s low-end server business for $23 billion.
 Job Cuts Lower tax rates have also helped profits continue to grow, and a surge in buybacks has helped IBM hit its targets for earnings per share.
 EPS (buybacks, tax rate, one-time gains, etc), we expect investors to remain focused on this metric and to look for both upside and downside risk at the analyst day,” Bernstein’s Sacconaghi said in a note.
 Old Dominion, based in Thomasville, North Carolina, added $25 million to its budget to buy additional tractors and trailers, raising its planned 2014 equipment investment to $188 million “as a result of our strong volume for the first quarter and our expectation for the remainder of the year,” CEO David Congdon told analysts on an April 24 conference call.
 Shoppers with higher incomes are buying fresher and less processed food, while those that earn less are eating more leftovers to cut their food outlay and, in the US, grappling with reduced government food-stamp benefits.
 government introduced a program that provides equity loans for home buyers who can only afford a small down payment.
 “The car is really becoming a platform like when the mobile handset became a smartphone and all the apps and services developed around that” Nokia built its location-technologies business by buying Chicago-based map provider Navteq Corp.
 The recent TV spots are designed to educate consumers to come to Groupon when they want to buy anything, any time, anywhere.
 agreed to buy Argentine government bonds from oil producer Repsol SA for $2 billion, bringing its purchases of the country’s securities to about $5 billion in less than a week.
 Rating Risk “The risk the baht will weaken further is deterring foreign investors from buying and even encouraging them to pocket profits and leave,” Kim Jin Ha, head of the global fixed-income investment division at Mirae Asset Global Investments Co, which oversees 55 trillion won ($54 billion), said in a May 16 interview from Seoul.
 Monetary policy that Federal Reserve Bank of New York President William Dudley says will keep benchmark borrowing rates in check is leveling the field for the most indebted companies as investors seeking to boost returns buy riskier securities.
 said it would buy back shares, outweighing slumps for Great Wall Motor Co.
 Canon climbed 19 percent to 3,252 yen after the camera maker said it will buy back as many as 17 million shares between May 9 and July 29.
 is insisting Chinese buyers open letters of credit before it ships soybean cargoes to the world’s top importing nation amid a slump in demand, Chief Executive Officer Fumiya Kokubu said.
 The buyers’ financial situation began to improve from mid-April and Marubeni is working to make sure it obtains letters of credit for all 20 of its latest China-bound cargos, according to Kokubu.
 If the buyer in the end doesn’t open a letter of credit Marubeni tries to find alternative sales routes, he said.
 The delays from Chinese buyers in opening letters of credit aren’t connected with the Japanese trader’s ownership of Gavilon because the US.
 agreed to buy the 49 percent stake Singapore Air held in Virgin Atlantic for $360 million.
 Nine of 21 analysts recommend investors buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Lenovo, which in January agreed to buy Motorola Mobility for $29 billion, plans to triple the number of countries where it sells phones by adding 20 new markets in the Middle East, Africa and Latin America.
 In January, the company announced plans to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility handset unit for $291 billion in cash and stock.
 Yang also is expanding in other types of hardware and in January announced plans to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion.
 SBC grew by making deals, buying three of its Bell brethren and combining Cingular with AT&T Wireless, which is now the second-largest mobile operator.
 People familiar with the matter said in January that AT&T was still interested in buying Vodafone, even after UK.
 cut its rating to neutral from buy.
 began analyst coverage of the insurer with a buy rating and a price target of C$22.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Michael Novogratz, principal at Fortress Investment Group LLC, said most macro hedge-fund managers missed the biggest trade this year -- buying long-dated US.
 “There’s only one great trade in macro this year we missed, most macro missed -- buying duration in the Treasury market,” Novogratz said at the SkyBridge Alternatives Conference in Las Vegas today.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Bombardier Inc’s biggest customer for the CSeries jet is considering whether to take the planes after a change in airline strategy, a potential blow for an aircraft struggling to win buyers.
 Frontier Strategy Republic placed the CSeries order along with options to take 40 more of the 138-seat planes after buying Frontier Airlines Inc.
 Then, in 2011, Republic also agreed to buy planes from Airbus’s A320 family, the type used at Frontier.
 The next-largest buyers after Republic are Russia’s Ilyushin Finance Co, with 32, and Deutsche Lufthansa AG, with 30.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest oil and gas producer, scrapped an agreement to buy a quarter of Israel’s largest natural gas field for as much as $26 billion after talks to complete the deal collapsed.
 He rates the stock a buy.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Mercuria Energy Group Ltd, which agreed to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity unit for $35 billion in March, is offering jobs to about 200 people, or half the unit’s staff, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 The Bloomberg Consumer Comfort Index declined last week to its lowest level since November, falling to 333 in the period ended May 25 from 341 the prior week, as Americans’ views of their finances and the buying climate weakened.
 “We have a ways to go until there is enough confidence out there for more and more people to come out to buy” Income Growth Wage gains have been slow to materialize, and may be needed to help galvanize consumer activity.
 government owns warrants to buy 799 percent of the equity in Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy mortgages and package them into securities.
 Even after the deal was reached last year, the company refused to identify the would-be buyer, saying in regulatory filings “that disclosure of the counterparty is a commercially sensitive matter,” and “would jeopardise their ability to complete similar transactions and would also jeopardise this transaction” It described the mystery buyer only as “a strong presence in the Permian basin and is an ongoing acquirer of oil & gas properties through the negotiation of similar transactions” Lone Star expects to deliver necessary paperwork within a week and called for a shareholder meeting no later than July 20.
 In the meantime, the activist asked Antares’s incumbent board not to issue securities, buy or sell assets, add more directors or delay the extraordinary meeting.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Valley National Bancorp, the New Jersey-based lender, will buy Florida’s 1st United Bancorp for about $312 million in the biggest US.
 “You give me a commercial bank that’s willing to sell itself to Valley at the type of multiples we’re getting in Florida, with the potential growth this bank has, and we’ll be only too happy to buy it,” Lipkin said in a phone interview.
 Fiat, Italy’s largest manufacturer, is reducing its reliance on its home country after buying full control of Chrysler in January.
 Marchionne has personally put his money behind the strategy by buying 130,000 shares for nearly 1 million euros.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Treasury notes snapped a three-day rally after a government report showed the economy added the most jobs last month since 2012, a sign that economic growth is poised to accelerate as the Federal Reserve pares monthly bond-buying and considers when to raise interest rates.
 Fed Policy The Fed said it will keep the benchmark interest rate close to zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends.
 Passenger Satisfaction Airlines first look for operational efficiency in buying new planes, including low fuel and maintenance costs, “but not less important is the satisfaction of passengers,” Camelier said in a telephone interview.
 Last month, Vodafone agreed to buy out Piramal Enterprises Ltd’s stake in its Indian unit for about $15 billion, winning full control of its biggest market by customers.
 “Dividends are a very important part of the puzzle for us but ultimately what we’re looking for at Templeton is to buy a stock that offers us a double over a five-year period including dividends,” said Tuttle, whose group manages C$143 billion in assets.
 rose 08 percent as Deutsche Bank AG analysts recommended buying the shares.
 Accor SA rose 13 percent after Europe’s largest hotel operator agreed to buy hotels in Germany and the Netherlands for about 900 million euros ($123 billion).
 abandoned its effort to buy the UK.
 The local portion of Emaar’s IPO will have a tranche aimed at institutional investors and a second portion for retail buyers.
 Trade Secrets/Industrial Espionage Hon Hai to Buy Huawei 4G Equipment If Safety Can Be Guaranteed Hon Hai Precision Industry Co’s application to buy 4G telecom equipment from Huawei Technology Co.
 K+S slid 11 percent to 2620 euros after Kepler Cheuvreux downgraded its rating on the shares to hold from buy.
 in New York who has the equivalent of a buy rating on IAC.
 “The hiring should be a positive for the stock, as it removes a significant piece of uncertainty” Bennett rates the stock a buy with a 12-month price target of $68.
 offered to buy Aquila Resources Ltd.
 The offer signals a possible resumption of Chinese companies buying up global resources to take advantage of a price slump.
 Now the world’s biggest buyer of metals may be stepping up acquisitions.
 agreed in February to buy a 13 percent stake in Alumina Ltd.
 Investment banks, buyout firms and insurers were among those who benefited from New York-based AIG’s distress.
 Asia        n/a  4/16/09   21st Century Insurance  Zurich Financial      2,000*  5/11/09       Japan headquarters       Nippon Life      1,200   6/2/09  Argentine finance units  Banco de Galicia         69   6/4/09   Transatlantic Holdings   public offering      1,136+~   6/9/09    New York headquarters             Kumho        n/a  6/19/09           ForEx platform       BNP Paribas        n/a  6/24/09          Mexican finance Afirme, Consorcio        n/a  6/29/09             Russian bank        Banque PSA        n/a  6/30/09  Taiwan credit-card unit       Far Eastern        n/a  7/28/09   Life insurance finance          Wintrust        680^  7/29/09  Polish consumer finance   Banco Santander        n/a  8/11/09            Energy assets   multiple buyers      1,900^^  8/12/09        Hong Kong finance  China Construct.
   public offering     20,500+~  1/12/11            Nan Shan Life         Ruen Chen      2,160  4/18/11         Railroad leasing  Perella Weinberg        n/a   7/7/11    New Jersey apartments   multiple buyers        242   3/6/12           AIA Group Ltd.
 ^^Includes previously disclosed deals such as Spanish solar plants to HG Capital, interests in oil and gas contracts to an undisclosed buyer and stakes in gas storage and marketing ventures to Tenaska.
 In 2008, the court found his allies guilty of vote buying, disbanding their party and banning another 30 executives, including then-Prime Minister Somchai Wongsawat, Thaksin’s brother-in-law.
 New Strategy Vivendi is revamping its strategy around television and music and plans to return 5 billion euros ($68 billion) to shareholders by 2015 through dividends and share buybacks after completing planned divestments.
 Negotiating Deal Energy Future filed for court protection April 29 after negotiating a restructuring deal with senior lenders that virtually wipes out the equity stakes of KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Group Inc, which took the company private in a record $48 billion leveraged buyout in 2007.
 While those austerity plans were overshadowed last month by news the company failed to buy its biggest competitor, Newmont Mining Corp, Sokalsky says those talks are “finished” and Barrick is focused on its strategy as a standalone entity.
 No Panic “The shares haven’t reacted particularly negatively thismorning, so there’s no panic as a reaction to the announcementin terms of the reality of the deal with GE,” said PierreBoucheny, a Paris-based Kepler Cheuvreux analyst who recommendsbuying Alstom shares.
 Earlier this month, Hillshire agreed to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Traders are betting that an even higher offer will emerge for Hillshire and that its plans to buy Pinnacle are probably dead.
 It would have been tricky for a suitor to buy Hillshire before that anniversary because of rules imposed by the US.
 That’s before it borrows an additional $15 billion to buy Allergan.
 “They have to keep buying at a heavier and heavier and more expensive pace to keep this up.
 “They have kind of the highest quality management team, and so they’d be the most likely to succeed with the strategy” Most analysts still recommend buying Valeant shares, and their average estimate is for the stock to climb about 25 percent in the next 12 months, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in a bet the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares more cheaply and pocket the difference.
 Amid the seizure of Bangkok’s airports by anti-government protesters in 2008, the Constitutional Court found Thaksin’s allies guilty of vote buying, disbanding their party and banning another 30 executives, including then-Prime Minister Somchai Wongsawat, Thaksin’s brother-in-law.
 is buying itself time at the expense of unsecured bondholders.
 “It buys everybody more time for there to be a recovery” With the money from the offering, the cash-burning coal miner would be able to wipe out $159 million of convertible notes due in 2015.
 card-swiping devices to provide premium-mass players with cash for buying chips has yet to affect business, Ho told analysts on a conference call yesterday.
 “The stock market could fall tomorrow on a knee-jerk reaction to heightened perceived political risk, but it should be an opportunity to start buying near the point of maximum pessimism,” Alan Richardson, whose Samsung equity fund beat 96 percent of peers tracked by Bloomberg in the past five years, said in a phone interview from Hong Kong.
 Baht Outlook “The rubric goes that one should buy any market when there is blood on the streets, but that suggestion arose because blood on the streets historically caused the market in question to dip to levels that were too cheap to ignore,” Sally Macdonald, head of Asian equities at Marlborough Fund Managers in London, said by e-mail.
 People need to feel that need to shift to electric models” Mass-market battery-powered vehicles have failed to meet industry delivery goals as buyers object to a lack of driving range and higher prices versus gasoline or diesel cars.
 ‘Premium Buyers’ “Most people who buy electric vehicles tend to be premium buyers, as zero-emission cars are more expensive,” Sascha Gommel, a Frankfurt-based analyst at Commerzbank AG who has a hold recommendation on Renault stock, said by phone.
 “I get no better feeling in the stomach about the development anywhere at Carlsberg,” and “I’m struggling to find any reason to buy, even if it’s cheap,” Michael Friis Jorgensen, an analyst at Alm.
 “They are always, always, always leading the pack,” said Gheit, who rates the company a buy and doesn’t own shares.
 Bob Witeck, a gay-marketing strategist and corporate consultant, has said Sam could earn millions in endorsements and speaking engagements from companies seeking to capture more of the buying power of an adult US.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Rio Alto Mining Ltd, owner of the La Arena gold mine in Peru, agreed to buy Sulliden Gold Corp.
 “Treasuries still look attractive on a relative-value basis against a lot of high-quality debt, which has brought a lot of buyers in, despite the low yields.
 Setting a short means borrowing and selling an asset in anticipation of making a profit by buying it back after its price has fallen.
 The Bank of Japan is buying about 7 trillion yen ($69 billion) of sovereign bonds a month as the central bank battles deflation in the world’s third-biggest economy.
 Officials have reduced monthly buying to $45 billion this year, from $85 billion in 2013, amid signs of growth.
 The Fed said today it plans to buy about $25 billion of Treasuries during June.
 bonds surged to a record after Sabine Oil & Gas LLC agreed to buy the energy producer, which has been struggling with dwindling cash flow.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 “There’s no reason that investors can find to justify buying stocks” The CSI 300 Index slid 13 percent to 2,14408, while the Hang Seng China Enterprises Index dropped 05 percent.
 Pennsylvania: Enjoy Our Hot and Cold Running Natural Gas *** Caxton Associates and Odey Asset Management were buyers of Bank of America in the first quarter, as the bank was botching its stress test.
 As for Citi, Highfields Capital Management and TPG-Axon Management were buyers in the first quarter, according to filings.
 The S&P 500 climbed for a fourth day yesterday after durable-goods orders unexpectedly rose and JBS SA offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 added it to a conviction-buy list.
 recommended buying the shares of the chemical maker, whileSymrise AG rose 13 percent as the brokerage added the companyto its conviction-buy list.
 “People are buying securities at levels that really don’t make sense,” said Thomas Roth, senior Treasury trader in New York at Mitsubishi UFJ Securities USA Inc.
 debt tumbled amid speculation a strengthening economy would prompt the Fed to taper bond buying.
 Yellen Testimony The Fed pressed ahead April 30 with reductions to its monthly bond-buying while holding its short-term interest-rate target at virtually zero.
 Policy makers have cut monthly buying to $45 billion, from $85 billion last year.
 government bonds, buyers of the longest-term Treasuries are facing a potential shortage of supply.
 The contracts, which typically rise as investor confidence deteriorates and fall as it improves, pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 is in talks to buy Skybox Imaging Inc, a provider of high-definition imagery that could enhance the Web company’s maps, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 The provider of equipment for genetic screening and drug research was raised to a buy from neutral at Janney Montgomery Scott LLC.
 Siemens plans to list its hearing-aid unit and agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion.
 Billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Hutchison agreed last year to buy O2 Ireland, the country’s No.
 The company also is buying back stock for the first time in five years.
 Housing demand has cooled as higher prices and borrowing costs put ownership out of reach for some prospective buyers.
 A reading of 100 corresponds to the average level of contract activity in 2001, or “historically healthy” home-buying traffic, according to the NAR.
 “Higher inventory levels are giving buyers more choices, and a slight decline in mortgage interest rates this spring is raising prospective home buyers’ confidence,” NAR chief economist Lawrence Yun said as the report was released.
 The agreement to buy 45,500 net acres (18,413 hectares) in Texas’s oil-rich Eagle Ford basin from Freeport’s energy unit gives Encana “the opportunity to accelerate the rebalancing of our portfolio” to higher-priced crude, Encana Chief Executive Officer Doug Suttles said today on a conference call.
 AerCap has jumped since agreeing in December to buy AIG’s International Lease Finance Corp.
 If AIG’s shares still trade below book value, the insurer will probably favor buybacks.
 AerCap is buying the planes at “unambiguously below-market prices,” he said.
 The company, which has 12 buy, 12 hold and two sell recommendations from analysts, rose 1 percent to $7503 at the close of New York trading.
 “We are seeing the last vestiges of panic buying by investors who delayed their purchases because they expected yields to go up,” said Aaron Kohli, an interest-rate strategist at BNP Paribas SA in New York, one of 22 primary dealers that trade with the Fed.
 Most macro hedge-fund managers missed the biggest trade this year -- buying long-term US.
 “There’s only one great trade in macro this year we missed, most macro missed -- buying duration in the Treasury market,” Novogratz said at the SkyBridge Alternatives Conference in Las Vegas.
 Steve Kuhn, fixed-income trading head at $148 billion Pine River Capital Management LP, said investors should sell their bonds and buy “boring” stocks including packaging manufacturer Rock-Tenn Co.
 Man Group Plc advanced 5 percent after saying it’s in talks to buy Boston-based money manager Numeric Holdings LLC.
 The world’s biggest publicly traded hedge-fund manager said it is in discussions to buy Numeric.
 Exane BNP Paribas downgraded the French utility to neutral from outperform, similar to buy, saying the company will find it difficult to pass on increasing costs to consumers.
 is seeking European Union antitrust approval for its plan to buy WhatsApp Inc, according to a person familiar with the company’s plans.
 RPX Corp, a San Francisco-based company with technology company investors that buys patents to keep them from being used against its clients in lawsuits, yesterday announced a new search engine for litigation.
 1 airline oninternational routes, is interested in buying the world’sleading inflight catering business from Deutsche Lufthansa AG (LHA),the head of the Dubai-based company’s Dnata services arm said.
 The forecast buys the struggling company time as it deals with a management transition and a market that is shifting to smartphones and tablet computing, where security tools aren’t as widely used.
 “They still have a real story to tell around security,” said Patrick Walravens, an analyst at JMP Securities in San Francisco who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Symantec shares.
 The Federal Open Market Committee last week pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely as the economy improves.
 Exchange-traded funds that buy computer and software shares absorbed $11 billion of fresh cash last week, more than any other industry tracked by Bloomberg.
 Apple, the maker of iPhones and iPads, has jumped 19 percent since April 23 after posting a better-than-forecast quarterly profit and boosting its share buyback by $30 billion.
 Sony previously agreed to sell its PC division, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 The service has said it may buy as many as 100 of the new aircraft in a program that may top $55 billion, generating billions of dollars in revenue for the contractor chosen to build it.
 It anticipates continued purchases of Lockheed’s C-130J transport plane, buying 32 more by 2021 for use by special operations forces as AC-130 gunships.
 Canaccord Genuity Corp, one of three research firms which this year have recommended that investors buy NQ Mobile shares, said today that it is suspending its rating and price target on the stock.
 “I had to buy it,” Swatch Chairwoman Nayla Hayek said in a statement.
 The Blue had been estimated to sell for $21 million to $25 million, excluding the buyer’s premium.
 A buyer confused about currency conversions asked for bidding to be restarted, and the item sold.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on Burbank, California-based Disney.
 started with a $20 million bet on a then-unknown Web portal connecting Chinese manufacturers with overseas buyers.
 After the Sprint deal, Son last December sought about $20 billion in bank loans to buy Deutsche Telekom AG’ s 67 percent stake in T-Mobile, the smallest of the four national carriers, people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 “They want T-Mobile to get scale” Still, a similar attempt by AT&T in 2011 to buy T-Mobile was blocked by regulators, arguing consumers were better off with more choices.
 He could look to buy the second- or third-tier operators in Europe, according to Hideki Yasuda at Tokyo-based Ace Research Institute.
 “If we’re not on the job, doing exams in this area and spreading sunshine, these problems, which involve significant sums of money, are more likely to persist” ‘More Emphasis’ The SEC, which created a special unit of staff to inspect buyout firms, started the exams in October 2012 and plans to have scrutinized 275 groups by year-end.
 Among the PEGCC’s members are the world’s biggest buyout firms, including Blackstone Group LP, Carlyle Group LP, Apollo Global Management LLC and KKR & Co.
 Private-equity firms often tout the role of those executives as a service and then pay them with investor funds or money from portfolio companies rather than the buyout firm, he said.
 bonds that investors showed up in droves to buy last month.
 The Clear Channel bonds, the proceeds of which were used by a unit to refinance securities maturing this year and next, have a rating of Ca, second-lowest on the Moody’s scale and described by the credit grader as “highly speculative” and “likely in, or very near, default” ‘Substantially Similar’ The securities refinanced previously investment-grade notes that were issued before the company’s $179 billion leveraged buyout in 2008 by Bain Capital Partners LLC and Thomas H.
 raised $250 million by selling 85 percent bonds that limited how it could spend its cash on buying back shares or repaying lower-ranked notes.
 Such terms are attractive for an issuer that expects to be acquired, because it allows them to buy back the notes at a cheaper price than the so-called make-whole premium they normally would have to pay, Canale said.
 Allergan, which makes the wrinkle treatment Botox, could buy another company to make itself tough to acquire, or make a case to shareholders that they should vote against the deal.
 Diverse Businesses Some of the companies that Allergan has contacted want parts of the company and aren’t interested in buying the entire business, two of the people familiar with the matter said.
 The biggest drugmakers are reshuffling units to get rid of ones that don’t make them leaders in a particular market, while smaller players are buying competitors to add size, lest they be swallowed up themselves.
 Novartis agreed last month to buy Glaxo’s oncology business for as much as $16 billion, to sell Glaxo its vaccines line for as much as $71 billion and to sell its animal health business to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Bayer AG agreed this month to buy Merck & Co’s consumer unit for $142 billion, solidifying its position near the top of the market for over-the-counter health products.
 Actavis, the world’s second-largest generic-drug maker by market value, agreed to buy Forest in February to add branded medicines including Alzheimer’s treatment Namenda and blood-pressure pill Bystolic to its lineup.
 “We’re still in the Explorer Program while we continue to improve our hardware and software, but starting today anyone in the US can buy the Glass Explorer Edition, as long as we have it on hand” The Mountain View, California-based company, owner of the world’s most popular Internet search engine, is making improvements to Glass as it seeks ways to attract consumers eager to access digital information while on the go.
 Alan Richardson, whose Samsung Asean Equity Fund beat 96 percent of peers tracked by Bloomberg in the past five years, said in an interview yesterday he’s been buying.
 The nation’s biggest money manager said three days ago it’s been buying amid the selloff.
 “It’s a favorable buy at these levels,” said Samsung’s Richardson.
 offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 Hillshire Brands jumped 18 percent after Tyson made a $68 billion offer to buy the company, trumping a competing bid from Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 gained 07 percent to $34 as Cantor Fitzgerald LP raised the stock to a buy from hold.
 Shale Gas Siemens’s proposal to buy Alstom’s energy business will probably entail swapping some of its rail assets for the French company’s energy division and creating two European leaders in their respective fields, people familiar with the matter have said.
 for about $33 billion in April 2013, it took Siemens until this month to secure a deal in the oil and gas segment, buying Rolls-Royce’s energy aero-derivative gas turbine and compressor business.
 A buyout would be a distraction, and could jeopardize its ability to get its drugs to the market, according to Soriot.
 “It would be very remiss of me while buying another company to lay out my final strategy” Swedish Concerns Separately, Swedish Finance Minister Anders Borg said he has spoken to the UK.
 The company has quickly accumulated a large user base and attracted the attention of Internet giants including Facebook Inc, which last year offered to buy Snapchat for about $3 billion.
(Corrects to remove Caxton founder’s name from headline in story published May 16) May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Caxton Associates LP and Crispin Odey’s hedge fund were among buyers of Bank of America Corp.
 Dinakar Singh’s TPG-Axon Management LP initiated an investment in the New York-based bank, buying 19 million shares valued at almost $91 million at the end of March, according to filings.
 Spokesmen for the funds buying shares either declined to comment or didn’t return e-mails seeking comment.
 Moynihan, 54, had said that the bank would increase its dividend and buybacks this year.
 RBS canvassed investors’ interest in buying a stake in Ulster Bank, according to people with knowledge of the discussions who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 April 20, 2011: Udvar-Hazy says he’s interested in buying back ILFC after he started rival Air Lease Corp.
 Chairman Weng Xianding agreed to buy 80 percent ILFC for about $423 billion.
 14, 2012: New China Life has denied agreeing to join the buyer group and ICBC said it had no role in the deal, the South China Morning Post reports.
 16, 2013: AerCap Holdings NV agrees to buy ILFC for about $54 billion in cash and stock, replacing the failed China deal.
 in London with a buy recommendation on Lloyds.
 Others that showed up in the screen, which are rated buy at Citigroup though not on lists of top recommendations, include Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd, Applied Materials Inc.
 Just like good comedy, timing is the key to buying and selling momentum stocks.
 China’s ICBC said last month that it will buy GSD Holding AS’s 76 percent stake in Tekstil Bankasi AS for $316 million, while Qatar Islamic Bank is seeking a stake in Asya Katilim Bankasi AS.
 In ICBC’s case, “the buyer’s motive was to buy a bank license ticket to enter Turkey,” he said.
 “In Finansbank’s case, the buyer will buy into the bank’s prospects and future profitability” Finansbank’s shares rose as much as 33 percent and gained 13 percent to 312 liras as of 3:26 pm.
 agreed to buy 112 acres (45 hectares) from Union Pacific Corp.
 The railroad chose Miami-based Lennar as the buyer after a bidding process that attracted other suitors, said the person, who asked not to be named because the agreement is private.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Christie’s sold $1346 million of contemporary art in New York in an hour as international buyers from 26 countries chased after works including Andy Warhol’s electric chair silkscreen and Martin Kippenberger’s slouching man in his underwear.
 Of the 35 lots offered, all but one found buyers.
 Prices include buyer’s commission; estimates don’t.
 And then he held the sale” “If I Live” was part of the 248-year-old auction house’s long-term strategy to attract a broader group of buyers.
 Montebourg, which unsuccessfully backed Bouygues’s bid to buy SFR, is pushing Alstom, in which Bouygues has a 29 percent stake, to reject General Electric’s offer for its energy units.
 Limited Rewards The German manufacturer has thus far reaped limited financial rewards for the billions of euros invested in buying control of Scania and MAN as minority investors resisted efforts to share technology that would boost overall profit.
 He sold his MagicJack shares at $22 about a month ago after buying them at $11 in December.
 A rail option would have much lower upfront costs than the pipeline -- the company would have to build some infrastructure and may have to buy some tank cars to fulfill customer needs, he said.
 That means bondholders aren’t really being compensated for the risk that there might be no one who wants to buy their obscure securities if demand dries up and they’re forced to sell.
 “Investors should beware of credit funds that offer daily liquidity where managers are reaching for yield and are not paying close attention to the prospective liquidity profile of what they buy” Since the end of March, investors have earned an average 009 percentage point more to own older, smaller bonds instead of larger, more recent ones, according to the Barclays data, which doesn’t take into account differences in maturity.
 In the past, dealers would purchase bigger clumps of bonds than they could immediately sell, allowing investors to get out of positions even if a broker didn’t have a client on the other side looking to buy.
 From his note: “Pimco is generally an advocate of the buy-and-hold strategy in credit investing,” as long as investors won’t need to exit those investments during a rough patch and are getting paid appropriately for the lack of flexibility.
 scrapped an agreement to buy a quarter of Israel’s largest natural-gas field for as much as $26 billion.
 The Fed pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion in April, its fourth straight $10 billion cut.
 It’s also difficult to imagine a strategic buyer who would step forward, he said.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Flipkart, India’s largest online retailer, will buy competitor Myntracom, according to people with knowledge of the talks, to gain a business with higher margins and boost competitiveness against Amazoncom Inc.
 The combination would add customers and help challenge Amazon, which has expanded by buying several rivals, including the $12 billion deal for online shoe retailer Zapposcom in 2009.
 “I think it is very good for Flipkart if this were to actually happen because Myntra is a pretty solid fashion vertical,” said Niren Shah, managing director at private equity firm Norwest Venture Partners’ Indian unit“It’s a bit like Amazon buying Zappos” Accel Partners, based in Palo Alto, and Tiger Global Management LLC, the $14 billion investment firm run by Chase Coleman, were early investors in both Myntra and Flipkart.
 Its capital buffers and bad-loan ratio make the stock a buy, F&C Asset Management Plc says.
 Laursen sold HDFC Bank shares this year to buy ICICI Bank, the country’s No.
 Housing demand has cooled as rising prices and tight credit have kept buyers on the sidelines.
 In the week ended April 25, applications for loans to buy homes dropped 44 percent and were down 21 percent from a year earlier, according to data from the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 “The drop in applications was disappointing because, with interest rates steadily improving recently, it suggests a reluctance of homebuyers to take action,” Bill Banfield, vice president at Detroit-based lender Quicken Loans Inc, said yesterday in a statement.
 Contracts to buy existing homes climbed by the most in almost three years in March, a sign that the market is starting to stabilize as it enters the key spring selling season, the Realtors group said three days ago.
 Appetite for exposure to Russian stocks should return after the crisis ends, creating a buying opportunity as some companies are inexpensive, according to Andrey Shenk, an analyst at Alfa Capital LLC.
 dropped 1 percent after agreeing to buy DirecTV, the largest US.
 The central bank pared its monthly asset-buying and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 The undated notes will convert to equity if the bank’s capital falls to 5125 percent of assets weighted by risk and the company has the right to buy them back after five years, the person said.
 All Putin has done “is buy a little time,” Olcott said.
 The non-agency market has contracted as banks seek jumbo mortgages to hold as investments and bond buyers demand higher relative yields, after showing signs of reviving from its paralysis following the 2008 financial crisis.
 is seeking to raise as much as $1089 million in an initial public offering of the auto-buying Website.
 Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit cut its rating on the stock to neutral from buy on concern over proposed curbs on Hong Kong visitors.
 He repeated a recommendation to buy the stock.
 The Fed said April 30 it will keep the benchmark interest-rate target at virtually zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends.
 Its structure is “intended to alleviate” burdens of directly investing in buyout funds.
 The fund will primarily allocate its capital to buyout and special situation funds, with the latter term referring to vehicles that make loans and invest in distressed debt.
 Foreign currency needed to pay wages and buy imports has dried up and factories are operating at just 40 percent of capacity.
 Leading investor Telefonica last September tightened its grip on Telecom Italia, increasing its holding in Telco to 66 percent, with an option to buy out remaining Telco partners.
 are also grappling for pieces of a shrinking mortgage market as demand for home loans declines and investors and cash buyers dominate some sales.
 The bond manager, who says he’d rather buy Tesla Motors Inc.
 If you’re going to buy a high-flier, I would rather own Tesla” Musk, 42, Tesla’s chief executive officer, is the 121st richest person in the world with an estimated net worth of $98 billion, according to the Bloomberg Billionaires Index.
 The Federal Reserve, which has cut its unprecedented bond buying program to $45 billion a month from $85 billion as it seeks to ease stimulus measures that have supported markets for more than four years, may be stuck in the program known as quantitative easing as the economy won’t grow fast enough, he said.
 real estate market, saying potential homebuyers younger than 35 aren’t accruing wealth fast enough and foreign buyers seeking tangible assets flooded the market with cash deals.
 A plan to complete the acquisition announced last year faltered as no buyer could be found for stations affiliated with MyNetworkTV, the company said.
 Mitsui Fudosan is forecasting a third straight year of increase in net income as it plans to generate 189 billion yen of profit from 325 billion yen worth of apartment sales to investors and homebuyers.
 and the Shanghai Stock Exchange agreed to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily trading, opening up the mainland market to foreign investors while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 There’s really room for arbitrage” The through-train allows individuals to buy Hong Kong equities via the Shanghai exchange and investors to buy mainland shares through Hong Kong’s bourse.
 Favorable market conditions have led to multibillion-dollar valuations as hedge funds, private equity and corporate investors compete with venture capital firms to buy stakes in high-growth companies before they go public.
 dropped on plans to buy a stake in Greentown China Holdings Ltd.
 Greentown China climbed 28 percent to HK$803 after Sunac China said it plans to buy a stake of as much as 30 percent in the developer.
 The Canada Pension Plan Investment Board will invest about 2064 million euros, and shareholders will be offered a chance to buy 1965 million euros in stock in a fully underwritten rights issue.
 “The risk versus reward makes lots of sense for us” The shopping-mall owner partnered with the Canada pension board in 2012 in a 46 billion-krona ($700 million) deal to buy Kista Galleria, outside Stockholm.
 as a way to further a $100 billion-plus bid to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 Since buying Wyeth in 2009, Pfizer has cut $46 billion in research spending, announced plans to close at least seven labs and narrowed its scientific focus to six areas of medicine.
 Shipments through Port Hedland surged to a record in April as stockpiles in China, the biggest buyer, reached an all-time high.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- JPMorgan Chase & Co’s proposal to pay $280 million to investors who claimed they were misled in buying mortgage-backed securities won preliminary approval from a federal judge in Brooklyn, New York, according to court records.
 Jones Day Advises Koch Unit on PetroLogistics $21 Billion Deal Jones Day advised the Flint Hills Resources LLC unit of Koch Industries Inc, controlled by billionaire brothers Charles and David Koch, on an agreement to buy PetroLogistics LP for $21 billion.
 Simpson Thacher Advises KKR on Goodpack $14 Billion Bid Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP is representing KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, on its $14 billion ($11 billion) offer to buy Goodpack Ltd, a provider of bulk containers.
 The stock, which has 14 buy, four hold and two sell recommendations from analysts, has gained 14 percent this year.
 Global Comparison Investors should buy on any drop in Treasury prices, when 10-year note yields rise closer to 265 percent, said Thomas Simons, a government-debt economist in New York at primary dealer Jefferies LLC.
 “There are only so many Treasuries out there and there are a lot of buyers for them.
 Audi AG, the world’s second-largest premium automaker, is adding plug-in hybrid versions of already existing models as the reach of purely battery-powered vehicles remains a concern for many car buyers.
 mobile-phone carrier, is in talks to buy satellite-television company DirecTV, people with knowledge of the situation said.
 The talks with DirecTV come as AT&T is restricted from making an approach to buy Vodafone Group Plc, Europe’s largest mobile carrier, by UK.
 Their strategy of pumping up profits through stock buybacks and cost-cutting might be difficult to maintain.
 “Rather than buy back the stock, they want to buy back congresspeople” The government’s top 10 suppliers, most of which rely heavily on defense spending, made $137 million in PAC contributions during the first 15 months of the current two-year election cycle, which began Jan.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The company was purchased in 2008 in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 The move is the latest maneuver designed to shore up the company’s finances after the buyout and a decline in gambling revenue in large markets such as Atlantic City, New Jersey, and Tunica, Mississippi.
 Air Canada’s decision today to retain some of the E190s erased a potential buyer for the CSeries, a model beset by delays and cost overruns that so far has failed to attract many big-name airlines.
 Review Options Air Canada had been evaluating the CSeries as a replacement for its Embraer jets since announcing in December an order to buy Boeing Co.
 The agreement called for Boeing to buy as many as 20 of Air Canada’s E190s, with the airline leasing larger, narrow-body aircraft until taking delivery of the 737s.
 We consider this decision a material negative for Bombardier” Spracklin rates both companies outperform, while Tyerman has a buy rating on Air Canada and a hold rating on Bombardier.
 Robbins said he was attracted to Monsanto because its management recognized the company had too much cash on the balance sheet and started buying back shares at an accelerated pace.
 Humana, which Glenview started buying in December 2012, may partner with a pharmacy benefits manager, Robbins said.
 He also said he likes WellPoint Inc, which he started buying in the past three months.
 Louis open to give the Navy an option to continue buying EA-18G Growler radar-jamming jets.
 While the Pentagon didn’t request any money for the planes, Navy officials told Congress that buying more Growlers topped their wish list for items that didn’t make the budget.
 Calgary-based Encana raised C$146 billion from the sale and may receive a total of C$167 billion if the underwriters exercise their option to buy more stock.
 Encana sold 52 million shares and the underwriters have an option to buy an additional 78 million, according to a statement today.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Herbalife Ltd, which suspended its dividend last month to increase share repurchases, agreed to buy back $266 million of its stock from Bank of America Corp.
 The total number of shares repurchased will be determined by the average volume-weighted price during the buyback program, which will be completed by the end of the second quarter, Cayman Islands-based Herbalife said today in a statement.
 Herbalife, the nutrition company that hedge fund manager Bill Ackman has accused of being a pyramid scheme, got a vote of confidence in the buyback plan last month from Carl Icahn, its largest shareholder.
 He accused Republicans of aligning themselves with “insurance companies that jacked up people’s premiums with impunity, and denied care to the patients who were sick; Mortgage lenders that tricked families into buying homes they couldn’t afford; A financial sector where irresponsibility and lack of basic oversight nearly destroyed our entire economy” 2010 Villains During the 2010 midterm elections, Obama cited the battle against “special interests,” “Wall Street banks,” “corporations,” the “oil industry,” the “insurance industry” and “credit-card companies” He even went after specific corporations, saying the Republican agenda was “written by a former lobbyist for AIG and Exxon Mobil” Political and policy considerations are taking Obama’s usual targets out of play for this year’s elections.
 were among investors to buy into GM.
 He rates Merck’s shares buy.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG, Europe’s largest engineering company, will start its 4 billion-euro ($55 billion) share buyback today as it seeks to boost shareholder returns.
 The buyback was first announced on Nov.
 “The buyback serves the sole purposes of canceling and reducing the capital stock, issuing shares to employees, board members of affiliated companies and members of the managing board of Siemens AG as well as servicing convertible bonds and warrant bonds,” the company said in the statement.
 Investments to develop new models to woo more buyers caused earnings from carmaking to narrow to 95 percent of revenue in the first quarter from 99 percent a year earlier.
 Among the PEGCC’s members are the world’s biggest buyout firms, including Blackstone Group LP, Carlyle Group LP, Apollo Global Management LLC and KKR & Co.
 Private-equity firms often tout the role of those executives as a service and then pay them with investor funds or money from portfolio companies rather than the buyout firm, he said.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC, the buyout fund led by billionaire Leon Black, is planning to take a dividend from Hostess Brands Inc.
 after buying the maker of Coffee Cakes and Twinkies out of bankruptcy 14 months ago.
 The buyout funds bought the Kansas City, Missouri-based baker in March 2013 for $410 million.
 The latest bankruptcy, which included other divisions in addition to the Hostess baked goods unit, came after a strike by bakers and left asset buyers free of union contracts and $13 billion in debt.
 If you’re going to buy a high flier, I’d rather buy Tesla” Twitter fell 18 percent yesterday to $3185 after restrictions were lifted on sales of shares by insiders and early investors.
 lowered its rating on the shares to neutral from buy.
 Metso, Ahold Metso Oyj fell 22 percent to 2843 euros after Weir Group Plc abandoned its attempt to buy the Finnish maker of rock crushers.
 added the stock to its conviction-buy list, saying the telecommunications operator will benefit from consolidation in the industry.
 Ineos will seek a buyer for sites producing suspension polyvinyl chloride and related assets, giving the purchaser a “self-standing S-PVC business capable of competing with the new joint venture,” the European Commission said in an e-mailed statement today.
 The EU also ordered the companies to set up a joint venture with the buyer of the S-PVC business to produce chlorine at Runcorn.
 Regulators are skeptical of SoftBank’s ambition to buy T-Mobile, and Son has reframed his argument to say he can improve US.
 “A robust competition among buyers is important,” Carbo said.
 The remainder will fund a share buyback program of as much as $700 million.
 JBS Foods, the second-largest producer and exporter of poultry and pork in Brazil, was formed after JBS agreed to buy Seara food processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais in June 2013.
 His chances of making an impact as chairman of the House Financial Services Committee may turn on whether he loosens his opposition to two programs pushed by business lobbies and top House Republicans: government-backed terrorism insurance and loans for buyers of US.
 While the program has business critics -- including Atlanta-based Delta Air Lines Inc, which says taxpayers shouldn’t make it easier for foreign competitors to buy jets -- Hensarling’s position puts him at odds with some of the biggest industry groups.
 It pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion, the fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in measured steps are likely.
 Katara, which bought Le Royal Monceau in Paris in 2012, plans to more than double its properties by 2030 and was in talks to buy “iconic” hotels in London and Rome, Chief Operating Officer Christopher RJ Knable said last year.
 was looking for buyers for 7 European hotels, including Madrid’s Hotel InterContinental, newspaper Expansion reported last June, citing people with knowledge of matter .
 analyst Patrick O’Shaughnessy, who this week raised his rating on E*Trade to the equivalent of buy.
 A few other data points he highlighted: E*Trade customers purchased a net $39 billion of securities in the first quarter, matching the strongest buying since the company began reporting the metric five years ago, and the brokerage attracted a record amount of new assets.
 Odd-lot trades, orders to buy or sell fewer than 100 shares, were included in the data starting in December.
 “It’s a temporary window of opportunity for buyers in that a year from now rates will be higher,” said Mark Zandi, chief economist for Moody’s Analytics in West Chester, Pennsylvania.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses in the US.
 The decline in borrowing costs is more likely to spur buyers of cheaper homes, yet more purchases have been of pricier homes, she said.
 Rates spiked from a near record low of 359 percent last May around the time that the Fed chairman said that the central bank would start tapering its bond-buying program as the economy improved.
 “As long as the economy stays in neutral or first gear, we’re not going to see much upward pressure on interest rates” The turmoil in Ukraine, coupled with the expectation that the European Central Bank will reduce rates and be more accommodative in June, is driving investors to “safe-haven” buying and keeping mortgage rates low, said Erin Lantz, vice president of mortgages at Zillow Inc.
 “As we start to get into June, we should start to see a different economic story coming out” While financing costs are lower than they were a few months ago, rising prices have made homes less affordable for first-time buyers, said Jed Kolko, chief economist at San Francisco-based property-listings service Trulia Inc.
 “If we see an increase in sales, it’s more likely to be trade-up buyers,” Kolko said.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- Todd Vitale, a personal trainer who opened his own gym last year, said he was having difficulty getting a mortgage of more than $700,000 to buy a home in Greenwich, Connecticut, because his new business was untested.
 A decade ago, jumbo ARMs helped fuel the housing bubble by letting buyers qualify for homes they could only afford at the low rates before they reset.
 Today, demand for jumbos is growing as borrowers resume buying second homes or investment properties, according to Chase’s Corydon.
 The Federal Open Market Committee pared its monthly asset-buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 “They are taking their toys and playing elsewhere right now where they expect more volatility” Total Assets Backwardation allows USO to buy more barrels of crude each month as it sells the expiring futures and rolls over to the less expensive second-month contract.
 Shoda, 65, was Daiichi Sankyo’s chief executive officer in 2008, when it agreed to buy the Indian maker of generic medicines.
 Since Daiichi Sankyo agreed to buy a controlling stake in Ranbaxy for about $46 billion six years ago, the Indian drugmaker has had four plants banned from exporting drugs to the US.
 Three months after Daiichi Sankyo agreed to buy the controlling stake in Ranbaxy, the FDA barred imports from the Indian drugmaker’s Paonta Sahib and Dewas plants because of manufacturing defects.
 Julius Baer’s shareholders shouldn’t expect a dividend increase or share buyback “any time soon,” said Dirk Becker, a Frankfurt-based analyst with Kepler Cheuvreux.
 “We expect Taco Bell’s upcoming year to be one that reinforces Greg Creed’s track record as a leader with a proven ability to deliver results” Palmer recommends buying the shares.
 Network upgrades, driven by mobile devices, are making up for weaker demand as companies build their own equipment, using software to buy fewer machines.
 The buyers have a right to sell the stake back if FL Mobile doesn’t complete a qualified initial public offering within 12 months after the sale, according to the statement.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on Burbank, California-based Disney.
 On top of the strategic merits to the acquisition, buying AstraZeneca would give Pfizer a lower tax rate because the combined company would be a corporate resident of England.
 In order for a hostile offer to succeed in the UK, the buyer typically needs the support of shareholders representing 90 percent of the shares outstanding.
 While airlines buying planes essentially get identical aircraft, with modification limited to interiors, train manufacturers often design entirely new models just to win a single order.
 and other parts of the world” Simply closing plants and concentrating output to cut costs is not necessarily an option, partly because the train market tends to be dominated more by state buyers eager for a slice of production than the airliner sector, and also because of the world’s wildly differing railroad systems, Troger said.
 There's something to be said for the company’s forthrightness in making its numbers public — Google's Laszlo Bock notes that "all our diversity efforts, including going public with these numbers, are designed to ensure Google recruits and retain many more women and minorities in the future" But some, like Vivek Wadhwa, "don’t buy its excuses" Wadhwa has a series of recommendations to move the needle.
 So you have to find a partner to have one (and buy two at a time).
 On top of that, buyers are willing to pay a premium for access to the owners’ circle, an exclusive club with accompanying bragging rights.
 Potential buyers, such as Magic Johnson and Oprah Winfrey, may pay at least $763 million for the Clippers, according to the average of four estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Last month, Fortress Investment Group LLC co-founder Wesley Edens and Avenue Capital Group’s Marc Lasry said they’re buying the Milwaukee Bucks for $550 million.
 The Clippers team “I can guarantee will sell for tens of millions of dollars more than it’s worth in a strictly financial sense” That’s part of why buying the Clippers in 1981 will pay off for Sterling financially, even if selling it comes with the loss of his reputation, said Lysko of Southern Methodist University.
 Investors in most mutual funds can buy or sell shares once a day, typically after markets close, and only directly with the fund.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- A patent-buying venture that includes Apple Inc, Microsoft Corp.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- The finance chiefs of the world’s two biggest buyout groups said the stocks of private-equity firms will benefit as public investors gain more understanding of their earnings.
 “I still think that the value of carry is undervalued in the market,” Adena Friedman, Carlyle Group LP’s departing chief financial officer, said yesterday at the inaugural Bloomberg CFO Conference in New York, referring to carried interest, or the share of investment profits collected by buyout firms.
 Carlyle benefited by not being the first private-equity firm to go public, Friedman said, because it took advantage of greater investor understanding of the leveraged-buyout business and it was able to time the offering with a market upswing.
 Toyota, which owns a 24 percent stake in Palo Alto, California-based Tesla, said in May 2012 it would buy the company’s components for 2,600 electric RAV4 EVs over three years.
 Bavaguthu Raghuram Shetty, an Indian-born entrepreneur, Centurion Investment and Infinite Investment LLC, two firms owned by Abu Dhabi’s bin Butti family, are in talks to buy a controlling stake in the chain of currency-exchange centers, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Private-equity firms typically pool money from pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within five to six years, then sell them and return the money and a profit after 10 years.
 “We’ve made it easy for you to buy against our top content and talent,” Susan Wojcicki, who was recently promoted to run YouTube, said at the event.
 He owned the Mexican professional soccer league’s White Roosters franchise in the central city of Queretaro, after buying the team in May 2013.
 He has a buy rating on the shares.
 “Although we have continued to see meaningful levels of quote volumes for individual annuities, it is too early to predict the eventual impact of the budget” Shares of Partnership have slumped 60 percent since Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 for $291 billion after buying it for more than $12 billion in 2012.
 sank 75 percent after agreeing to buy Sulliden Gold Corp.
 rose 24 percent to C$3387 after Geoffrey Kwan, analyst at RBC Capital, raised his rating for the stock to outperform, the equivalent of a buy.
 Gold Deal Rio Alto Mining slumped 75 percent to C$197, the lowest since January, after agreeing to buy Sulliden Gold to expand its production of the precious metal.
 agreed to buy Beats Electronics LLC for $3 billion, its biggest-ever acquisition, nabbing a popular line of headphones and a nascent subscription music-streaming service as the iPhone maker seeks to rev up growth.
 As sales of digital music downloads fall, buying Beats gives Apple a foothold in Internet-based streaming, where Google Inc’s YouTube, Spotify Ltd.
 In buying Santa Monica, California-based Beats, Apple also would get the company’s colorful, high-end headphones.
 While the San Jose, California-based company is still deciding whether to actually bring back the cash, the money could be used for stock buybacks or acquisitions, executives said.
 Throwing Darts? Possible targets that EBay might use to boost its marketplace business include Etsy Inc, the service known for its homespun crafts, said Robert Peck, an analyst at SunTrust in New York, who rates EBay a buy.
 Public Offers EPSO-G and Lietuvos Energija, as required by law, will make a public offer to buy all remaining shares of Dujos and Amber Grid, for which they’ve foreseen financing, Lietuvos Energija Chief Executive Officer Dalius Misiunas and EPSO-G Chief Executive Officer Virgilijus Poderys told reporters today.
May 26 (Bloomberg) -- Atos of France offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros ($844 million), underscoring demand for cybersecurity and cloud-computing services.
 “Most buying are from retailers now, and funds are unlikely to invest in MAS, as it is difficult to answer to stakeholders if they lose money investing in MAS now,” Ang Kok Heng, who helps manage $428m as chief investment officer of Phillip Capital Management Sdn.
 Investors buying now “stand to gain if the government decides to privatize MAS” or if there is a takeover from other parties, he said.
 Deutsche Bank, along with bankers’ groups in California and Nevada, told the California Supreme Court the ruling by a lower court may jeopardize the economic recovery as lenders and investors weigh the risks of buying properties that house unwanted tenants, are subject to leases, or are vulnerable to lawsuits brought by renters evicted by paid middlemen.
 The slide in the kwacha seems “overdone” as relatively high yields on government securities may attract foreign buyers, Khan said.
 In buying Pinnacle, Hillshire is paying a high price for a “mediocre set of assets,” Eminence Chief Executive Officer Ricky Sandler said in an interview.
 The system of offering wealthy parents the opportunity to buy a place at the school of their choice is entrenched in the former British colony and “will flourish for as long as the demand for places at the best schools exceeds supply,” said Nicholas Brummitt, chairman of the international-schools consultant.
 As well as the new minimum wage, the Swiss also will decide on May 18 whether the country buys 31 billion francs worth of Saab AB Gripen combat jets.
 Energy producers are seeking new buyers for their Canadian gas after modern drilling technologies let companies unlock previously inaccessible supplies from tight rock buried deep underground across North America, flooding the continent’s market with the fuel and depressing prices.
 The council voted unanimously in favor of buying Aqua Indiana’s drinking water system assets in southwest Allen County for $67 million, including $501 million in addition to $169 million the city already paid the company in 2008.
 rose 36 percent as TD Securities raised its recommendation on the stock to buy from hold.
 The company said today it will buy a wind farm in Texas for $125 million.
 The remainder will fund a share buyback program of as much as $700 million.
 Users also can buy coupons and get group discounts.
 Baidu Inc, China’s largest search engine, bought a majority stake in the group buying site Nuomi Holdings Inc.
 Baidu agreed to buy the remaining shares in January, without disclosing a price.
 Mumbai-based Essar Group wants to buy all the shares it doesn’t already own in its listed units as it considers them undervalued, the people said.
 After privatizing the units, the Ruia brothers plan to manage their holdings like private-equity investments and may buy or sell assets, the people said.
 A subsidiary of the Ruias’ buyout company Essar Global Fund Ltd.
 offered in March to spend $793 million to buy the remaining stake the brothers don’t already own in Essar Energy, as well as the company’s outstanding convertible bonds.
 Recurring revenue from selling electricity provides funds for the yield companies to buy more power plants as they’re built, and provide investors with dividends.
 TerraForm will buy renewable-energy assets from SunEdison and other companies, according to the filing.
 They are finding things to buy, but they sort of buy them begrudgingly” Fed policy makers are watching progress toward their goal of full employment as they consider the timing of the first interest-rate increase since 2006.
 The reliance on telecommunications revenue “is a weakness, and they need M&A to gain more revenue from other segments,” said Pratish Krishnan an analyst at Antique Stock Broking in Mumbai with a “buy” rating on Tech Mahindra.
 agreed to buy the company for about C$38 billion.
 Hilliard told Bloomberg News he wants as much as $10 billion so customers can buy new vehicles.
 One of the companies Twitter was considering buying is SoundCloud Ltd, a Berlin-based startup that lets people share music, according to one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 SoundHound, Shazam SoundHound has attracted more than 200 million users to its mobile app that recognizes songs and lets consumers search for and buy music based on what they’re hearing.
 Whirlpool slid 28 percent to $15155 after Longbow Research LLC cut the company’s rating to neutral from buy.
 Unless they announce sales of the TV business, the market won’t think Sony is serious” Hirai issued the earlier forecast in February as the company announced the sale of its PC business, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 If brokers omit or delay reports of falling prices, buyers may end up overpaying.
 The stock has underperformed since the company released a lower-than-anticipated resource report in March, said Sam Wahab, a Cantor Fitzgerald analyst in London who has a buy rating on the stock.
 “Trading in Melco has been misplaced, and it’s created an incredible opportunity to buy the shares at a very low valuation, especially when you look out to 2015 and 2016 numbers with new properties online,” Bryan Maher, a senior analyst at Craig-Hallum Capital Group LLC who has a buy recommendation on Melco with a $50 price target, said by phone on May 16.
 Options traders are betting on a rebound in Melco’s shares, pushing the number of outstanding calls to buy the stock to almost 153,000 contracts, the most since April 2013 and up from about 55,000 at the end of March, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Twenty-two of 25 analysts covering the company have a buy recommendation, and none is rating it a sell.
 The crackdown is aimed at stopping gamblers from using the devices in casino resorts to get cash for chips without buying anything, they said.
 Elliott had disclosed that Eiffarie, a joint venture owned by construction company Eiffage SA and Macquarie Group Ltd’s infrastructure unit, planned to buy Elliott’s APRR shares.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Berkshire Hathaway Inc’s energy unit agreed to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $C32 billion ($29 billion) in cash to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 The buyer, renamed this week as Berkshire Hathaway Energy from MidAmerican, has been growing through acquisitions under Greg Abel, chief executive officer of the business.
 Last month, Vivendi SA snubbed Bouygues’s offer to buy SFR, France’s second-largest phone operator, and agreed instead to sell it to Altice SA in a deal valued at more than 17 billion euros.
 Front End Pacific Investment Management Co’s Bill Gross said he’s sticking to the front end of the yield curve, buying securities due in five to seven years.
 While the purchase of government bonds by the central bank in the primary market is prohibited by treaty, “our mandate nevertheless includes the possibility of buying” in the secondary market if necessary, Mersch said in a speech in Berlin.
 Abbott will buy Kalo Pharma Internacional SL, the holding company that indirectly owns 73 percent of CFR, and conduct a cash tender offer for the remaining shares outstanding, the Abbott Park, Illinois-based drugmaker said in a statement today.
 The company called off a $12 billion offer to buy South Africa’s Adcock Ingram Holdings Ltd.
 China Hongqiao Group Ltd, the nation’s largest non-state aluminum producer, said this month it’s in talks to buy a bauxite mine in Africa to secure supply for as long as 30 years.
 in March and today’s announcement by Old Mutual Wealth to buy Henderson Group Plc’s 50 percent stake in multi-asset firm Cirilium.
 In their letter, London-based War on Want and Change to Win say that after being bought in a leveraged buyout in 2007, Alliance Boots transferred store properties to a group of LLPs and used a Cayman Islands partner to “provide flexibility and a veil of secrecy to the whole business” According to a separate briefing note made available to UK.
 Policy makers at the April 29-30 Federal Open Market Committee meeting reiterated that the central bank will keep the key interest-rate target at almost zero for a “considerable time” after concluding its monthly bond-buying program.
 “Most money managers are generally fully invested and so one of the issues is that for these mega ones, the buy side has to free up some liquidity to buy the new IPO,” Skip Aylesworth, a portfolio manager for Hennessy Funds in Boston, tells Lu Wang.
 Gordon Runte, a spokesman for Fortress, didn’t respond to e-mail and telephone messages last week seeking comment on potential plans to buy the property.
 Any potential buyer also has to be prepared to deal with the intervention of politicians.
 “Given the highly publicized nature of the trials and tribulations of the asset, especially given its rent-controlled status, we think the buyer and the special servicer will do all they can to avoid any appearance of impropriety,” said the analysts, led by Alan Todd in New York.
 The buyer will need to have plenty of cash on hand as banks won’t be willing to make the kind of loan that enabled Tishman Speyer’s boom-era acquisition, a highly leveraged bet that hinged on being able to raise rents.
 Housing financiers Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy loans and package them into securities, were taken into government conservatorship during the financial crisis and received $1875 billion in taxpayer funds to stay afloat before a market turnaround propelled them to record profits.
 Fed Meeting The central bank decided at the April meeting to pare bond purchases to $45 billion per month, while reiterating that it will keep the key interest-rate target at almost zero for a “considerable time” after concluding the bond-buying program.
 Support refers to an area on a chart where buy orders may be clustered.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion and plans to list its hearing-aid unit as Europe’s largest engineering company aims to close a profitability gap with rivals General Electric Co.
 Siemens will buy Rolls-Royce’s energy aero-derivative gas turbine and compressor business to strengthen its position in the power generation and oil and gas industries and manage its health-care business separately, the Munich-based company said in a statement yesterday.
 Kaeser, 56, is also preparing an offer to buy parts of Alstom SA’s energy businesses to counter a $17 billion bid by GE.
 Kaeser today said a joint deal with GE, under which both companies would buy different Alstom assets, would be too complex.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- Bendigo & Adelaide Bank Ltd, an Australian regional lender, agreed to buy Rural Finance Corp.
 They’re part of a wave of projects designed to appeal to ultra-wealthy buyers seeking the investment haven of New York real estate.
 Several buyers have upgraded to larger units or purchased second apartments at the tower, where prices range from $395 million for a one-bedroom to $60 million for the two-floor penthouse, he said.
 The 57th and 53rd Street corridors in New York City are drawing a collection of international investors seeking to put cash in Manhattan residential real estate, according to Dylan Pichulik, CEO of XL Real Property Management, a property-management company that works with overseas buyers.
 Of the domestic buyers, about half are New Yorkers, with others coming from states such as Texas and California.
 The Baccarat is unique because it offers buyers access to the luxury Baccarat Hotel, scheduled to open by year-end, Gordon said.
 “If a buyer is interested in a 4,500-square-foot residence, they could own their own floor and have the prestige and exclusivity and security that go along with that.
 “TIG Advisors believes that both issues could have been addressed with an equity component to the consideration” Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Sales in Sweden rose 14 percent as Telenor gained 237,000 TV customers after buying Tele2 AB’s Internet and cable business.
 stocks advanced, with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index extending a record, after durable goods orders unexpectedly rose and JBS SA offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 drugmaker yesterday stopped its attempt to buy AstraZeneca for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion), saying the bid rejected by its London-based competitor represented full value.
 The comprehensive capital analysis and review includes the company’s requests for dividends and buybacks.
 rose 08 percent to $2471 as Deutsche Bank AG boosted its recommendation on the maker of networking equipment to buy from hold.
 There is a huge chance that the activity we saw in puts is people buying protection” Alibaba, Yahoo Selling in one of the biggest initial offerings of 2013 came as Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 homebuilder by volume, is expanding and introducing a line of lower-cost residences for first-time buyers.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- China Hongqiao Group Ltd, the nation’s largest non-state aluminum producer, is in talks to buy a bauxite mine in Africa to secure raw material.
 It also has signed a three-year supply contract with Rio Tinto Group to buy at least 3 million tons of the ore annually from Australia and has supply agreements with India, she said.
 Hapag-Lloyd last month agreed to buy most of CSAV’s assets in an all-share transaction to become the world’s fourth-largest container liner with about $12 billion in sales.
 When the market makes a peak, you’ve exhausted the last vestige of buying” Probably Unravel The S&P 500 was little changed at 1,88368 yesterday.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA may be active after announcing plan to buy back shares.
 The insurer has to buy from private-equity firm PPF Group NV the remaining 24 percent stake it doesn’t own in their eastern European joint venture by the end of this year for about 12 billion euros.
 Yesterday, Pfizer offered to pay 694 billion pounds ($117 billion) to buy the London-based drugmaker.
 The organization funds the United Nations Children’s Fund, which buys and supplies vaccines against diseases including measles, rotavirus and pneumococcal disease, the world’s biggest killer of children under 5 years.
 locations in shopping malls, a response to changing buying patterns by moms, according to a statement yesterday.
 Meanwhile, Crescendo Partners has been pressing Aeropostale management for bigger changes, sending a letter in November demanding that the company find a buyer.
 Banks and the largest fund managers can hold bonds until a buyer can be found and they risk being disadvantaged by having to publicize those positions, according to Tim Gately, the London-based head of European credit trading at Citigroup Inc.
 Wall Street bond traders lost commissions after Trace was implemented when the difference between bids to buy and offers to sell corporate bonds narrowed in the first year of the price reporting rules, according to a study published in the Journal of Financial Economics in 2006.
 “The buy side has plenty of cash.
 “Pfizer could have had softer manners when approaching AstraZeneca” Pfizer ended its six-month effort to buy AstraZeneca yesterday following the London-based company’s May 19 rejection of its last bid of 55 pounds a share in cash and stock.
 In April, Novartis AG agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer drugs while selling most of the company’s vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co, in an industrywide shake up.
 offered to buy Allergan Inc, maker of the Botox wrinkle treatment.
 Glass said it’s a lot easier to persuade someone to take money than to spend it buying stock.
 Instead of lending, Palm buys an asset, such as a refrigerator or a pizza oven, and then leases it to the business owner.
 Tow Truck Nick Frederick, 38, a tow-truck driver in Sykesville, Maryland, said the Islamic lender solicited him by e-mail and phone last year when he needed $15,000 to buy a trailer.
 Purchasing real estate is a better way to prevent inflation eroding the value of pension savings than buying inflation-linked government bonds, he said.
 Home prices in the capital’s most desirable areas have jumped more than 60 percent since 2009, making central London the second-most expensive place in Europe to buy a house after Monaco, according to broker Knight Frank LLP.
 Cash-rich buyers and foreign investors seeking a haven in London property amid political and economic turmoil overseas have contributed to price gains and caused policy makers to warn of an unsustainable boom.
 Issuance of RMBS dried up after a Bank of England program to cut borrowing costs for small businesses and homebuyers provided banks with a cheaper source of funds.
 Investors are buying the stock in expectation a strong government will be able to make policy changes in the power sector, boosting orders and output, Kim Eng Securities analyst Anubhav Gupta said in phone interview today.
 The shares have 13 buy, 11 hold and one sell recommendation from analysts.
 said first-half profit declined 52 percent after South Africa’s largest food company wrote down its investment in Nigeria’s Dangote Flour Mills Plc less than two years after buying the stake.
 To pick a winning stock at the start of March, you had to find a company that was hated by analysts, adored by short sellers, avoided by institutional buyers and averse to doing just about anything but pay dividends.
 We’re going to have these bouts of volatility that are going to continue to make it challenging” While the fund performance may be a wakeup call for individuals about market volatility, deposits to mutual funds and ETFs that buy American equity haven’t stopped.
 To compensate, the traders widened the spread between prices they were willing to pay to buy and sell shares, making it more expensive for most investors to trade stocks.
 The warrants, which traded as low as $466 in October of that year, allow investors to buy AIG common stock at $45 apiece by Jan.
 raised its rating on the stock May 21 to buy from neutral and lifted its 12-month price target by 26 percent to $63 a share.
 New York-based AIG has more opportunities to deploy capital than other large financial firms that may face limits on share buybacks because of regulation, said Goldman Sachs analysts led by Michael Nannizzi.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- South Korea’s military is buying one of the top anti-armor weapons developed by the Pentagon, a Textron Inc.
 South Korea also is expected this year to commit to buying its first Global Hawk reconnaissance drones made by Northrop Grumman Corp, according to a person familiar with the matter who asked not to be identified discussing military planning.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- National CineMedia Inc, the largest supplier of commercials in movie theaters, agreed to buy its closest competitor for $375 million in cash and stock.
 Eneva, which was listed by Batista as a startup in 2007, dropped to a record low on May 2 amid project delays that increased costs and forced it to buy higher-cost energy on the spot market, deepening its losses.
 The utility also said in today’s statement it will sell at least 50 percent of its Pecem II project in the northeast, with EON offering to buy up to 50 percent of the power plant for as much as 400 million reais.
 The AG comes after deliveries in South Korea, where Hyundai got 44 percent of its revenue in 2013, fell for two consecutive years as BMW, Mercedes-Benz and Volkswagen AG’s Audi lured buyers with imports of fuel-efficient diesel models.
 Bouygues SA climbed 44 percent after a report that Orange SA has studied buying Bouygues Telecom.
 economy is showing signs of improvement and buyers of exchange-traded funds are taking note.
 “Confidence is increased, and institutional and individual investors and even strategic buyers are all adding to stocks,” said Howard Ward, the chief investment officer for growth equity at Rye, New York-based Gamco Investors Inc, which oversees about $47 billion.
 Investors are buying even as the S&P 500 approaches a record and the Federal Reserve removes stimulus that underpinned a five-year bull market in which $14 trillion was added to equity values.
 The Ontario Power Authority agreed to buy electricity from the three plants under a 20-year contract.
 The European Commission also granted Lloyds more time to carry out the divestments, which led to the creation of an additional stand-alone bank, TSB, after the lender failed to find a buyer for its assets.
 agreed to buy US.
 satellite TV company DirecTV for $485 billion in cash and stock, which may indicate that the Dallas-based phone company has less capacity to make an offer to buy Vodafone.
 AT&T has been interested in buying Vodafone since at least last year, people familiar with the plans have said.
 Vodacom agreed to buy local Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 That means that Vodafone needs to buy or build broadband and TV infrastructure for fixed services in its biggest markets.
 In March, Vodafone agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA for 75 billion euros ($103 billion), including debt.
 In most cases, the technology works as advertised, said Dan Edmunds, an auto engineer at Edmundscom, which helps buyers assess models.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 A previous deal for ILFC with a group of Chinese investors fell apart when the would-be buyers failed to deliver funds.
 Dip Buying At first blush, the $379 million added to the fund yesterday suggests investors were “buying the dip” as the Russell 2000 was stumbling its way to a 33 percent three-day loss.
 However, it also shows that the buy-the-dip urge may be fading.
 The buy-the-dip flows into the triple bull fund are slowing after investors poured $3989 million into the TNA since the peak and shares outstanding jumped 57 percent.
 The country’s middle-income earners are set to double by 2020, according to the Boston Consulting Group, leaving more disposable income for residents to buy insurance products.
 BNP, SocGen The bank’s shares are gaining “somewhat at the expense of other French banking stocks,” said Omar Fall, a London-based analyst at Jefferies who recommends buying Credit Agricole shares.
 Sino-French Holdings also granted an option to a company owned by gambling tycoon Stanley Ho pledging to buy a 9 percent stake in Macau Power from Ho’s company, NWS said.
 He rates Solazyme the equivalent of a buy with a 12-month price target of $18.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Huntington Bancshares Inc, the Ohio lender that agreed in April to buy 11 Michigan branches from Bank of America Corp, plans to buy 13 more.
 consumer debt buyers agreed to drop collections on about $16 million to settle allegations they pursued debtors in violation of New York law, an accord reached as federal regulators prepare to crack down on the growing industry.
 The firms, which buy mostly unpaid credit card debt at discounted prices and then get court judgments on the defaults, broke New York law by trying to collect obligations that were too old, the state said.
 Schneiderman said his probe of the industry found that debt buyers had for years failed to ensure their claims were filed within appropriate time limits under New York law.
 In New York City, debt buyers filed nearly 457,000 suits from January 2006 to July 2008.
 to Skagen AS said they have been buying.
 “So far, the market takes it as his sincere desire to avoid a war and some investors are beginning to buy Russia” Autonomy Votes The Market Vectors Russia ETF, the biggest US.
 “Russian equities are cheap, but that doesn’t mean it’s time to buy,” Ilya Kravets, the New York-based director of investment research at Daniloff Capital LLC, said by phone on on May 9.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc agreed to sell its minority stake in a private-equity unit to an investor group led by buyout firm Adams Street Partners LLC, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Credit Suisse Group AG transferred its buyout unit, DLJ Merchant Banking Partners, to the fund’s managers last year, while HSBC Holdings Plc hired Campbell Lutyens & Co.
 “They’ve gotten some indication from three judges with an engineering degree that their patents will be dead within a year” Computers, Drugs Created as part of the patent system’s 2011 overhaul, the process is ramping up just as Congress considers more steps to curb abusive royalty demands and courts tighten litigation rules, in part to stop companies that buy patents solely for profit, known by the pejorative “patent trolls” It’s a popular alternative for companies targeted by patent-infringement lawsuits because decisions must come within 12 months and the agency allows the broadest interpretation of what a patent covers, which makes it easier to find evidence to prove the invention isn’t new.
 After a rough year-and-a-half, Apple has been on a tear lately, rising 13 percent since announcing on April 23 that sales of iPhones surged and the company was taking on debt to boost its dividend and increase its share-buyback plan by $30 billion.
 (Even though it was sitting on enough cash to literally buy the world a Coke or, heck, even buy the world a Coke, a chili-cheese dog and a Chocolate Covered Strawberries Waffle Bowl Sundae from DQ, which surely would make Buffett happy) ‘Attractive Entry’ Even after the jump in the stock, Daryanani believes Apple’s price -- at $59258 as of today’s open -- remains an “attractive entry point” While he agrees that Apple deserves to trade at a discount to the S&P 500, the analyst said it’s still cheaper than it should be.
 Philosophical Differences Back to the buyback, which on its own is enough to keep Apple on the A list.
 Buffett is constantly on the prowl for companies to buy with his cash pile.
 This comes at a time when buybacks are leveling off, and equity offerings are increasing at a rate that may threaten an eventual oversupply of shares.
 While a Bloomberg gauge tracking stocks with the biggest buybacks has lagged the S&P 500 this year, over the long run it’s provided stronger returns.
 So bottom line, buyback stocks can beat the market over the long haul.
 “It’s important for New York to retain the stature of downtown as one of the key financial markets in the world” Limestone Tower BNY Mellon is also closing in on selecting a buyer for 1 Wall St, a 52-story limestone tower near Broadway that may fetch one of the highest per-square-foot prices for a large lower Manhattan office building, the person said.
 “Some investors seem to be getting hopes up that strategic changes involving the company’s dividend policy and share buybacks may take place,” said Lee Jin Woo, a Seoul-based senior fund manager at KTB Asset Management Co.
 Two other members of Samsung Group are combining, with Samsung SDI Co, a supplier of batteries to Apple, agreeing to buy chemical and electronic materials maker Cheil Industries Inc.
 China should set first-home lending rates appropriately and give priority to the needs of families buying first homes, the PBOC said.
 Local Government The government’s “mini-stimulus has not yet turned around the growth momentum,” and the government may ease credit by loosening restrictions on lending to homebuyers and local-government financing vehicles, Wang Tao, chief China economist at UBS AG in Hong Kong, said in an e-mail.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Cobham Plc agreed to buy Aeroflex Holding Corp.
 buyout fund.
 this year to as much as $85 billion, at least the third bank since April to boost projections for the biggest buyers of junk loans.
 CLOs were the biggest buyers of new high-yield loans last quarter, with about 55 percent of the primary market, according to Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ Leveraged Commentary & Data.
 “Anti-Tesla” language was added to a state House bill at the request of car dealers that explicitly requires consumers to buy vehicles through franchise dealerships, Tesla said yesterday in a statement.
 With social media, the partners can reach audiences with a precision print and TV lack, finding fans who might buy lipstick, as well as tickets to the live-action film based on the 1959 classic “Sleeping Beauty” “Cosmetics form a kind of two-way street between the movie world and the fan’s ordinary world,” said Jeff Gomez, chief executive officer of Starlight Runner Entertainment, which advises studios on marketing.
 “The Maleficent range is doing very well with our customers so far,” Elodie Bohuon, Selfridges’ beauty buyer, said in an e-mail.
 The stock is down 60 percent since the company’s February 2007 initial public offering, when it sold shares at $1850 apiece to become the first US-listed buyout and hedge-fund manager.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Paulson said the stock can trade for at least that value, after the initial public offering of the Australia mortgage insurer frees cash that can be used for buybacks and debt reduction.
 venture from buying Russian-made rocket engines for the Air Force, saying the purchases don’t violate sanctions imposed after Russia’s takeover of Crimea.
 Accor SA climbed after agreeing to buy hotels in Europe.
 abandoned its effort to buy the drugmaker.
 Accor gained 13 percent to 38 euros after saying it will buy hotels in Germany, the Netherlands, and Switzerland for about 900 million euros ($123 billion).
 drugmaker, ended its six-month effort to buy the UK.
 China has allowed most cities to adjust home-buying curbs, the Southern Weekly reported May 22, citing several unidentified people from the housing ministry.
 Gorman later rejoined the board after buying the interests of a Westech investor.
 Nova has now secured an agreement to buy Hess Corp.
 made an unsolicited $62 billion offer to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 Four investors have agreed to buy 31 percent of the stock on offer.
 While Co-Operative Group Ltd’s stake will be diluted, the company said it will buy new stock and will remain the lender’s largest shareholder.
 The 150-year-old lender is raising the money to plug a capital deficit that was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s biggest Internet company by market value, will buy a stake in digital mapping provider NavInfo Co.
 Tencent, owner of the WeChat instant messaging application, will buy 78 million NavInfo shares, an 113 percent holding, from that company’s state-owned parent China Siwei Surveying & Mapping Technology Corp, according to a Shenzhen Stock Exchange filing yesterday.
 The purchase may help Tencent defend services such as restaurant recommendations against Alibaba, China’s largest e-commerce company, which is buying AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 The analyst has the equivalent of a buy rating on both Lorillard and Reynolds.
 Western European buyers announced $149 billion of acquisitions in the first three months of the year, a nearly 60 percent gain over the start of 2013 that outpaces the increase from North America and Asia, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The deal may also harm competition in the TV market because it brings together two of the main buyers of Dutch-language audiovisual content and TV channels as well as two of the country’s premium pay-TV film channels, Ziggo’s HBO and Liberty Global’s Film 1.
 The system of offering wealthy parents the opportunity to buy a place at the school of their choice is entrenched in the former British colony and “will flourish for as long as the demand for places at the best schools exceeds supply,” said Nicholas Brummitt, chairman of the international-schools consultant.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Flipkart, India’s largest multibrand online retailer, agreed to buy competitor Myntracom as it seeks to widen its lead over Amazoncom Inc.
 Flipkart will buy 100 percent of Myntra, Chief Executive Officer Sachin Bansal said at a press conference in Bengaluru today.
 that year, and by 2010 agreed to buy shares it didn’t already own in fund manager DundeeWealth Inc.
 “CI will work in the interests of all of our shareholders and management will remain focused on the continued success of our business” Scotiabank “made a lot of money buying CI,” Paul Holden, an analyst at Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, said in a telephone interview.
 Exchange-traded funds that buy American bonds attracted $1388 million yesterday while $2 billion was taken out of equity ETFs, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The central bank pared its monthly asset buying and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- China Southern Airlines Co, Asia’s biggest carrier by passenger numbers, agreed to buy 80 single-aisle jets with a list value of at least $73 billion from Airbus Group NV, as a growing economy fuels travel demand.
 The Guangzhou-based carrier will buy 30 A320 jets and 50 A320neo planes, the company said in a statement to the Shanghai stock exchange.
 Buyer Traffic The group’s gauge of prospective buyer traffic climbed to 33 in May, a four-month high, while the index of the six-month sales outlook increased to 57 from 56 in the prior month.
May 30 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore Airlines Ltd, Asia’s biggest carrier by market value, will spend S$400 million ($319 million) buying stock in budget carrier Scoot Pte, boosting the capital of its subsidiary which plans to buy Boeing Co.
 Not long after real-estate billionaire Sam Zell’s leveraged buyout in 2007, the company began to fall apart, saddled by massive debt and mismanagement.
 “It’s fun to see what well-known people have collected over the years and then have the chance to buy the wine” Romanee-Conti The top lot of Ferguson’s collection is a six-liter methuselah of Romanee-Conti Domaine de la Romanee-Conti 1997 with a high estimate of HK$1 million.
 In 2010, he led a management buyout and Recruit, a Japanese human-resources company, remains a client.
 He raised Qiwi to buy from hold on May 23, setting a price target at $5237 per share.
 The stock has seven buy ratings and three holds, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 has agreed to buy the power under a long-term contract.
 At its March meeting, the bank said it would buy as much as $1 billion in the second quarter.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable Group, the cable carrier that agreed last month to a $23 billion deal to buy operator SFR, is in exclusive talks to also take over Virgin Mobile in France from Virgin Group Ltd.
 about buying part of its Suez Environnement stake, JDD reported today.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- Ramsay Health Care Ltd, Australia’s biggest operator of private hospitals, and Credit Agricole SA offered to buy most of Generale de Sante for about $11 billion to gain private hospitals in France.
 “It goes without saying that the decision not to sell, but to wind down Depfa under FMS-WM, is that of the owner” Better must also find a buyer for Hypo Real Estate’s remaining business, Deutsche Pfandbriefbank, by the end of 2015 to meet EU conditions for its bailout.
 A group led by Daniel Loeb’s Third Point LLC and an offer involving Oswald Gruebel, the former CEO of UBS AG and Credit Suisse Group AG, and Mead Park Holdings LLC, a New York-based hedge-fund firm, were also on the short list as potential buyers, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Christie’s sold at least HK$303 billion ($391 million) worth of art during its five-day spring sale in Hong Kong that ended last night as Chinese buyers demonstrated more selectivity than at previous auctions.
 The results exceeded the auctioneer’s pre-sale estimate of HK$25 billion, which includes the buyer’s premium, according to Christie’s website.
 The top lot of the jewelry sale on May 27, a necklace made of emeralds and containing the largest Golconda diamond ever auctioned in Asia, weighing 400 carats, with a high estimate of HK$80 million, failed to find a buyer.
 Oil buyers, sellers and senior officials from Abu Dhabi National Oil Co, Kuwait Petroleum Corp, Bharat Petroleum Corp.
 Falcone, 51, accused Ergen of trying to game the bankruptcy process to get a lower price and of secretly buying debt that LightSquared rivals weren’t permitted to own.
 T-Mobile ‘Interest’ Ergen last year also offered to buy wireless provider Sprint Corp, only to be outbid by SoftBank Corp.
 Chapman said Ergen concealed his identity in buying LightSquared debt and wasn’t credible when he blamed the technical issue for the dropped airwave offer.
 Thirteen of 21 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg recommend buying the gas producer’s Moscow-listed share, while seven rate it the equivalent of hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 After recently visiting Chinese supermarkets and seeing limited Australian beef available, Forrest, who made his fortune exporting iron ore to China, returned home and developed a plan, including buying his own processing company, to boost shipments of the meat from his country, the third-largest exporter.
 Forrest is considering buying more farms or companies to help boost output, he said.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- Sunac China Holdings Ltd, a homebuilder partly owned by buyout firm Bain Capital LLC, agreed to pay HK$63 billion ($812 million) for a 243 percent stake in Chinese developer Greentown China Holdings Ltd.
 Tianjin, China-based Sunac will buy 5248 million shares at HK$12 each from Greentown Chairman Song Weiping, Chief Executive Officer Shou Bainian and shareholder Xia Yibo, Sunac said in a filing yesterday to the Hong Kong Stock Exchange.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica Czech Republic AS declined the most in six months after its majority owner said it will buy out minority stakes for less than some investors expected.
 Czech billionaire Petr Kellner’s PPF Group NV, which bought 66 percent of the phone company from Spain’s Telefonica SA last year, said yesterday after the stock market closed it will offer to buy the rest of the company for 29515 koruna a share.
 A “key risk” is that PPF will buy back enough shares to trigger a delisting of the company, according to Vera Sutedja, an analyst at Erste Group Bank AG in Vienna.
 The Austrian bank had estimated PPF would offer a buyout price of 2986 koruna, Sutedja wrote in a report to clients today.
 to help it find a buyer and dropped the plan the same year.
 Market Consolidation Europe’s communications market is consolidating as Vodafone Group Plc in March agreed to buy Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 The Fed has been buying US.
 Dodd-Frank Act’s Volcker Rule, which limits the amount of their own money they may use to buy and sell riskier securities.
 Litgas plans to sign agreements with other suppliers from whom it could buy additional LNG, as needed, at spot-market terms, according to the company’s website.
 That agreement called for buying Tower for $3 a share, and was revised to $250.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The firm this month agreed to buy 20 percent of the financial-services business of retailer Canadian Tire Corp.
 “We’re not just going to rush out and buy whatever is there just to use the capital” Earnings at Scotiabank’s global banking and markets unit increased 94 percent to C$385 million on gains in fixed-income, investment-banking and US.
 Executives should “almost reintroduce the brand, but first, you’ve got to have the stores well stocked,” said Yarbrough, who recommends buying Target shares.
 Now they’re telling investors to buy insurance against a potential plunge in the shares.
 Goldman recommends buying put options on the stock to protect against a fall of as much as 10 percent if Mylan Inc.
 The options market is “underpricing the potential for Teva shares to be volatile around Copaxone” Approval Delays Goldman is recommending investors buy put options with a $49 strike price expiring in June to protect against a potential drop in Teva’s US-traded stock.
 The threat of a generic version of Copaxone, which garnered Teva $43 billion in sales last year, has split stock analysts, with 15 recommending buying Teva and 15 rating the stock neutral out of 31 covering the company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Teva has made enough progress converting patients to its new three-times weekly version of Copaxone that the impact of generic competition has diminished, according to Douglas Tsao, an analyst with Barclays Plc in New York who has had a buy rating on Teva shares since March 7.
 are among those seeking to buy Telecom Italia SpA’s mobile-phone towers in Brazil, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Goldman’s Cell Site Solutions Cessao de Infraestruturas SA and American Tower are among potential buyers that have sent letters of interest to the Italian carrier, said the people, asking not to be named because the talks are private.
 “There is no offer of any kind to buy Tim,” Abreu said to reporters in Brasilia today.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Accor SA agreed to buy hotels in Germany, the Netherlands and Switzerland for about 900 million euros ($123 billion) as part of a plan to boost the company’s real estate holdings.
 Accor, Europe’s biggest hotel operator, set up its HotelInvest unit to buy properties last year after reversing a previous plan to sell assets and focus on management.
 Accor is buying 86 hotels with 11,286 rooms in Germany and the Netherlands from funds managed by Moor Park Capital Partners LLP, according to the statement.
 “We have consistently denied such rumors in the past and continue to do so” Teva made its latest offer in November and it may potentially seek to buy as much as 568 percent of Cipla, the publication cited an unnamed merchant banker as saying.
 in April agreed to buy smaller competitor Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 LSE confirmed last week that it is in exclusive talks to buy the indexing and fund-management unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.
 Professional money managers, meanwhile, are still piling in and using borrowed money to buy them up.
 “In the leveraged-loan market, strength has returned,” in part because buyers are using more leverage, Barclays Plc credit strategists Jeffrey Meli and Bradley Rogoff wrote in a May 16 report.
 Professional investors are using borrowed cash to buy top-rated bonds of collateralized loan obligations that are backed by the risky debt, the Barclays strategists wrote.
 AT&T’s bid this week to buy satellite-TV provider DirecTV for $485 billion comes three months after Comcast proposed a $452 billion acquisition of Time Warner Cable Inc.
 “When the consumer buys access to the Internet, they are buying access to the full Internet; and that’s what our rules attempt to protect,” Wheeler told the subcommittee.
 Carlyle and Unison acquired Toshiba Ceramics in 2006 in a management buyout, delisted it from the Tokyo Stock Exchange and renamed it Covalent.
 Bond Buyback Covalent clinched a deal with its bondholders in October 2012 to buy back some of the securities and extend their maturity, after finding it was unable to repay about 53 billion yen in bonds, according to the company.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- AT&T Inc’s plan to buy US.
 With potential buyers likely tied up with other deals, Vodafone will be on its own to build out its Internet infrastructure and restore revenue growth.
 Setting aside grand visions of European expansion, AT&T is in advanced talks to buy DirecTV for about $50 billion, people with knowledge of the situation said this week.
 tries to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 People familiar with the matter said in January that AT&T was still interested in buying Vodafone, even after UK.
 Now, with AT&T courting DirecTV, its ambitions to buy Vodafone are probably postponed for at least a year, said John Hodulik, an analyst with UBS AG.
 as it tries to win regulatory approval to buy T-Mobile, said Bienenstock.
 Vodafone has used the funds from its Verizon sale to buy fixed assets of its own, agreeing to pay about $10 billion for Spain’s Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March, following a takeover of Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year.
 The companies, which buy mortgages and package them into securities, were bailed out with $1875 billion from the Treasury and backed a growing share of mortgages as private capital dried up.
 The world’sbiggest buyout firm holds about 36 percent in the company, Purisaid.
 Telefonica had considered options for DTS including teaming up with Mediaset Espana Comunicacion SA, a unit of former Italian Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi’s Mediaset SpA that holds the remaining 22 percent of DTS, or with Al Jazeera to buy the asset, a person familiar with the matter said in March.
 Prisa plans to hold a board meeting to evaluate Telefonica’s bid and other potential buyers, said a spokeswoman who asked not to be identified, citing company policy.
 Shareholders of Madrid-based Prisa, which publishes El Pais newspaper, approved an agreement to restructure about 3 billion euros of debt in December, giving the media company time to turn around the business and reduce debt while looking for a buyer for the broadcasting assets.
 The buying climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, stood at 345.
 MasterCard Inc, the second-biggest payments network, attributed buying to improved consumer sentiment after reporting profit that beat analyst estimates for the first quarter.
 lost a last-ditch effort to challenge a ruling that millions of e-book buyers could sue the company as a group, setting the stage for a trial where it faces claims by consumers for as much as $840 million in price-fixing damages.
 Watt, the overseer of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, is loosening rules that have forced banks to buy back billions of dollars worth of flawed home loans in an effort to spur the housing market.
 The banks’ reticence has kept first-time homebuyers and others with weak credit out of the real-estate market and created a drag on the fragile housing recovery.
 First Step The new rules that Watt will announce today in Washington are a first step in a long-term effort to clarify loan-buyback policies and ease lender concerns.
 In addressing the issue of loan buybacks, also called putbacks, Watt is answering concerns raised by Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen, who told Congress on May 8 that the “flattening” housing market “will bear watching” New home sales dropped 145 percent to a 384,000 annualized pace in April, the weakest since July, according to Commerce Department data.
 “In many cases, deserving lower- and middle-income consumers may pay far more than they might have in the past for a mortgage or, worse yet, they won’t be able to get one” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac provide liquidity to the mortgage market by buying loans and packaging them into securities.
 Lenders who sell loans to the two companies sign so-called representations and warranties guaranteeing that the mortgages meet specific underwriting standards; if it turns out that the loans didn’t meet those requirements and later default, that agreement allows Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac to demand that the lenders buy them back.
 The housing bubble was fed by millions of mortgages issued by banks to people with subpar credit, and the buyback program was designed to make sure all of the cost didn’t land on taxpayers.
 The FHFA is also considering allowing banks to fix some curable defects such as missing paperwork instead of automatically requiring buybacks when such flaws are found.
 The agency started making changes to its buyback rules in January 2013, when Watt’s predecessor, Edward J.
 To broaden credit availability, it will be important for the FHFA, Fannie Mae, and Freddie Mac to set out a clear timetable for improving the buyback process, she said in an interview.
 Two-Year Release Studying loan performance data released by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, Goodman concluded the companies could relax their buyback requirements even further than they have without incurring major losses.
 “With C$37 billion of pro-forma net cash post the sale, the crux of investors’ concerns is now shifting towards capital deployment” Sytchev rates the shares buy.
 He rates the shares buy.
 SocGen recommends investors sell Indian shares and buy stocks in “more attractive” Asian markets such as China.
 Money Manager Admits to Operating $96 Million Ponzi Scheme A New York money manager pleaded guilty to running a $96 million Ponzi scheme that was used to buy luxury homes and cars and to finance an unprofitable resort in eastern Long Island, prosecutors said.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Lloyds Banking Group Plc, the UK’s biggest mortgage lender, said it will impose limits on lending to homebuyers to counteract rising house prices in London.
 The UK’s coalition government is coming under pressure from opposition politicians to modify Help to Buy, which allows homebuyers to purchase properties with small deposits.
 Two Houses Prosecutors said Frederick and Hough, who was convicted of filing false returns for 2005, 2007 and 2008, used funds in undeclared offshore accounts to buy an airplane, two houses in North Carolina and a condominium in Sarasota, Florida.
 is in talks to buy a stake in Ivanhoe’s Kamoa copper project in the Congo, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
 That may disappoint buyers expecting the car to achieve its Environmental Protection Agency city/highway window sticker rating of 47 mpg, the magazine said.
 “These people are very highly qualified -- it shows a logical succession,” said Mark Montagna, an analyst at Avondale Partners LLC in Nashville, Tennessee, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 ‘Her Success’ “They didn’t need to go with an internal candidate,” said Quintiliano, who recommends buying the shares.
 securities arm recently created a group to buy home loans from other lenders.
 While home buyers are being served by government programs and bank lending, a fuller revival of the market may eventually be needed to keep borrowing costs low and expand credit.
 Stephens, said the non-agency market is “almost totally dormant,” citing a failure to restore investor trust after an era of “fraud and deceit” A dearth of confidence in the securities from bond buyers is compounding two potentially bigger roadblocks to sales.
 After the lender completed two securitizations of fixed-rate jumbo loans last year, other banks are now the buyers because they pay more, he said.
 Bond investors are getting a chance to buy housing debt without government backing, though those offerings are coming through Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac.
 Bridge loans for buying Vannes, France-based Diana will be refinanced partly with equity, with a larger portion coming from new debt, Chief Financial Officer Bernd Hirsch said on the conference call.
 Lawyers for plaintiffs have said BP had “buyers’ remorse” over the settlement.
 Network upgrades, driven by mobile devices, are making up for weaker demand as companies build their own equipment, using software to buy fewer machines.
 The British bank is looking for investors to buy a stake inits operations in the Republic or for another bank to merge withthe division, allowing RBS to dilute its holding, after rackingup 17 billion pounds of losses from bad loans in the worst real-estate crash in western Europe.
 RBS Chief Executive Officer Ross McEwan is under pressureto return some of the 455 billion pounds British taxpayersinjected into the Edinburgh-based lender during the financialcrisis of 2008 in the biggest banking bailout in the worldIreland’s economy is rebounding from the worst recession onrecord, helping him to attract buyers for the first time sincethe financial crisis.
 A larger unit wouldbe more attractive for potential buyers, one of the people said.
 Investors aren’t buying it.
 North American operations posted a loss due to buying the rest of Chrysler Group LLC.
 “Can Fiat do enough to turn Alfa into a big, profitable brand? Are there enough Maserati buyers to make Fiat a global player?” Rising Debt Fiat will also need to come up with the money for the investments even with borrowings already on the rise.
 Paramount Holdings Services Ltd, an investment vehicle owned and controlled by former Qatari Prime Minister Sheikh Hamad Bin Jassim Bin Jabr Al Thani, agreed to buy 60 million Deutsche Bank shares at 2920 euros apiece, the bank said late yesterday.
 Qatar Discount Qatar is buying Frankfurt-based Deutsche Bank shares at a 5 percent discount to the May 16 closing price.
 after agreeing to buy the equivalent of 49 percent of the bank in 2007.
 are under tremendous pressure” Caesars has been struggling to remain solvent amid a glut of casinos and weak consumer spending, following a 2008 leveraged buyout that left the company with about $23 billion in debt.
 boosted its dividend by 50 percent and authorized a $2 billion stock-buyback plan, as airlines start putting cash back into shareholders’ pockets.
 Petersburg, Florida, and Kevin Crissey, founder of Skyline Research LLC in Mahwah, New Jersey, had been forecasting a buyback program closer in size to the $500 million share repurchase plan Delta announced a year ago.
 carriers, will probably wait to increase its dividend or buy back shares until it improves its financial performance, Derchin said.
 “How quickly that’s going to happen I can’t say” Clippers Suitors A number of suitors have emerged as possible buyers for the Clippers, including music executive David Geffen, who said his bid group would include Oracle Corp.
 Others who have expressed interest in buying the team with the third-best record in the league this season are former Live Nation Entertainment Inc.
 The buyout “will provide struggling Exelon with a windfall acquisition” in the face of “depressed power prices and increasing competition from wind and natural gas in recent years,” according to Gordon’s complaint, filed May 5 in Delaware Chancery Court in Wilmington.
 Big companies using rubber, most of which buy directly from farmers, are trying to expand production by attracting more cocoa producers, George said.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore exports to China from Australia’s Port Hedland surged to a record in April as stockpiles in the biggest buyer reached an all-time high.
 “Innovations require a lot of money and know-how” Personal Touch Keeping that cutting edge is a challenge for Aston Martin as it vies for buyers of elite cars with the likes of Volkswagen AG’s Porsche and Bentley, Fiat SpA’s Maserati and Tata Motors Ltd’s Jaguar.
 Speedier Route DuPont has taken a speedier route to expanding in enzymes, buying Denmark’s Danisco A/S for about $71 billion in 2011, as it moves away from the traditional chemicals and coatings that were the mainstay of the 212-year-old company.
 “Foreign investors are buying consumer-sector shares, they’re reacting to the ruble’s strengthening,” Alexander Krapivko, investment director at Promsvyaz Asset Management in Moscow, which manages about 179 billion rubles, said by phone.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Juhl Energy Inc, the Pipestone, Minnesota-based renewable-energy developer, is buying two wind turbines in Iowa and may acquire three more projects this year, adding to a portfolio that may eventually reach 200 megawatts of small generating assets.
 In the same way Apple and Amazon use digital entertainment to get people to buy higher-margin electronics, Nike’s ultimate aim is to persuade its customers to buy more shoes, shirts and sweats.
 agreed to buy Argentine government bonds from oil producer Repsol SA for $2 billion, bringing its purchases of the Latin American country’s securities to almost $5 billion in the past week.
 The bank will buy Argentine bonds due in 2015, 2017 and 2033, Madrid-based Repsol said yesterday in a regulatory filing.
 Nordex SE gained 41 percent to 1220 euros after Deutsche Bank AG raised the German turbine maker to buy from hold.
 The company agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 The area is “more of a buyer’s market at the moment” because of the number of interested sellers, Kapadia of Tudor said.
 Government Accountability Office last month said the Navy was starting the latest version with a more realistic understanding of requirements and readiness of the technology “that generally aligned with acquisition ‘best practices’” Defense officials sought “to make sure we did as careful a job on this acquisition as we could” after the 2009 cancellation, Frank Kendall, the Pentagon’s chief weapons buyer, told the Senate Armed Services Committee on April 30.
 The Federal Reserve said on April 30 that it will keep the benchmark interest rate close to zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends.
 Vice Premier Ma Kai said last month that buyers of electric cars may be exempted from paying purchase taxes as part of expanded state measures to bolster their sales.
 “If GE buys us, we’ll kind of be returning to what we had before” Alstom was founded in 1928 as a venture between a GE affiliate and a Belfort company called Societe Alsacienne de Constructions Mecaniques.
 French President Francois Hollande today said in an interview on RMC radio and BFM TV that the state buying an Alstom stake is “not envisaged” for now.
 The buyout firm, founded by Henry Kravis, made a preliminary cash offer on April 16 of A$470 a share, the Melbourne-based winemaker said in a statement today.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc reported quarterly revenue that beat estimates while saying the European Union will probably extend a probe into its agreement to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV.
 Succession Plans Liberty Global said it bought back almost $400 million of its stock in the first quarter and is committed to buying back a further $31 billion in the period from April 1 through December 2015.
 In February, Malone set succession plans in motion by giving Fries and the CEO of Discovery Communications Inc, David Zaslav, the right to buy his stakes should he decide to sell.
 Part of the loan that IVG’s fund used to buy its share of the building was in Swiss francs, which have gained about 67 percent against the pound over the last seven years.
 tumbled the most on the ADR gauge as Deutsche Bank AG cut it to hold from buy.
 Tongling city in the eastern province of Anhui will give tax breaks to buyers of homes that are 144 square meters or less if they are the family’s only home, according to a statement from the city’s government yesterday.
 “At this price, E-House looks attractive,” Ji, who has a buy rating on the ADRs, said in a telephone interview.
 “That has retarded the growth of buying pure battery vehicles, because there is the anxiety about range” Toyota’s US.
 The company’s owners include emerging market-focused private equity arms of Capital Group Inc, New York-based Concord International Investments, and the Rohatyn Group, which bought Citigroup Inc’s buyout business last year.
 AGL’s A$151 billion ($141 billion) deal to buy government-owned power plants in New South Wales was blocked in March by the nation’s antitrust regulator on concern that it would reduce competition.
 “It might be better to sell to a buyer like Alliance who also wants to work with those grain whiskies” In addition to owning Emperador Inc, the world’s largest maker of brandy, Alliance Global has interests in property development, food and gaming.
 But obviously that’s not the case” Eagle Ford EOG Resources Inc, the Houston-based company that helped discover Texas’s productive Eagle Ford formation and is known for quietly buying acreage to drill, said May 5 that its land in the DJ and Powder River basins in Colorado and Wyoming may hold the equivalent of 400 million barrels of oil.
 Valeant is trying to buy the Botox producer with the help of Bill Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP, Allergan’s biggest shareholder.
 dropped 56 percent to C$728, the most since October, after GMP Securities LP cut its rating on the oil sands producer to hold from buy.
 (“There’s a lot of cursing,” she said) She takes their calls on nights and weekends and buys them lunch at TGI Friday’s when they don’t feel like talking.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Kindred Healthcare Inc, a provider of long-term medical care, made an unsolicited offer to buy Gentiva Health Services Inc.
 “Kindred is the logical strategic buyer.
 It really needs to be a strategic buyer with the level of debt Gentiva has” About $118 billion of health-care mergers and acquisitions were announced or proposed last month, a record, according to data compiled by Bloomberg that dates to 2002.
 Draghi said at an ECB conference this week in Sintra, Portugal, that the ECB could buy asset-backed securities as a way to add liquidity to the euro-area financial system.
 and 125 Summer St, and team with JPMorgan Chase & Co’s asset-management unit to buy three other properties: 60 State St, 225 Franklin St.
 Blackstone, the largest private-equity investor in real estate, had held talks with several potential buyers besides Oxford Properties.
 Canadians were the largest cross-border buyers of US.
 So far this year, buyers from Singapore and Norway are ahead of Canadians.
 The company is holding off on stock buybacks as it works on its comeback.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy home loans and package them into bonds on which they guarantee payments of principal and interest.
 “Investors have fairly high expectations with regard to non-interest expense reductions in the near term,” Mark Palmer, an analyst at BTIG LLC in New York with a buy rating on the stock, said in a April 29 note.
 Twelve artworks failed to find buyers.
 All prices include buyer’s commission; the estimates don’t.
 Jeffrey Deitch, a dealer and former director of the Museum of Contemporary Art in Los Angeles, was the buyer.
 We do the best for our consignors and buyers.
 The European Central Bank has signaled that it may buy the securities to help boost the region’s economy.
 Increased investment in the Amundi ABS fund, which buys bonds backed by commercial mortgages to auto loans, helped boost total assets to 312 million euros, the most since July 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “It’s more difficult to buy than it was two or three years ago,” said Matthias Wildhaber who manages the Julius Baer fund.
 “You can still find paper if you are buying one million here or two million there, but if you are a one billion fund trying to invest 10 percent in ABS it will be difficult to find big blocks” Europe’s ABS market was pushed underground by the financial crisis.
 “If the ECB would buy more ABS as part of a quantitative easing program this is likely to crowd out investors even further,” said Angelien Kemna, APG Groep chief investment officer.
 Pfizer Inc, the largest US, drugmaker, yesterday abandoned its effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion), saying the public bid rejected by its London-based competitor represented “full value” AstraZeneca said it welcomed “the opportunity to continue building on the momentum we have already demonstrated” Under UK.
 There are likely shareholders on both sides that want this to happen” Pfizer has declined to say if it will try again to buy AstraZeneca after the UK.
 John Paulson, the billionaire investor, said in a letter discussing his hedge-fund firm’s first-quarter results that Genworth Financial will probably rally if the proceeds are used for buybacks and debt reductions.
 ‘Buyer’s Remorse’ Lawyers for spill victims have accused BP of “buyer’sremorse” and trying to renege on a settlement that is provingmore costly than anticipated.
 Fed policy makers last month trimmed monthly bond buying by $10 billion for the fourth consecutive meeting.
 With low interest rates “it’s tempting to take inexpensive debt and buy companies,” Rubenstein said.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity with their pension savings.
 The company also carried out its first share buyback in more than a decade in February, spending 50 billion yen.
 Future Buybacks Mitsui will be “flexible” in deciding on further stock buybacks, Chief Financial Officer Joji Okada told reporters in Tokyo today.
 nonfarm payrolls rose last month by the most in two years and the jobless rate fell to 63 percent, a sign that economic growth is poised to accelerate as the Federal Reserve pares monthly bond-buying and considers when to raise interest rates.
 The Fed said it will keep the benchmark interest rate close to zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends.
 sank 6 percent after Deutsche Bank AG cut the three developers to sell from buy.
 The number of annual active buyers rose 14 percent to 231 million, each placing an average of 49 orders over that period, according to Alibaba’s filing on May 6 in what could become the largest US.
 Alibaba provides various marketplaces for buyers and sellers, as well as services that help them conduct their businesses.
 “There are institutional investors that only buy companies in a major index.
 So belonging to the IPC generates more trading and greater investor interest, which can lead to higher returns” Flores recommends buying Lala shares and says they still have room to climb 9 percent this year from yesterday’s closing price of 3248 pesos.
 The stock has seven buy recommendations, two holds and zero sells.
 “Lala may well be included in the IPC and that’s one reason the stock has done so well recently,” Montanez, who recommends buying the shares, said in a telephone interview from Mexico City.
 Carso, based in Mexico City, has one buy, one hold and three sells, according to analyst estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Objective Evidence “The question isn’t just is there objective evidence per se, but objective evidence of what a willing buyer and willing seller would pay,” he said.
 Reversing DeMarco Reversing decisions made by DeMarco, Watt announced yesterday that FHFA will remove targets for reducing the companies’ mortgage-market footprint and keep current limits on the size of loans they buy.
 Watt also announced he was loosening rules that have forced banks to buy back billions of dollars worth of flawed home loans they sold to the two mortgage financiers, a move designed to spur the housing market.
 Taxpayer Support The companies, which buy mortgages and package them into securities, were seized by regulators as losses on risky loans brought them to the brink of bankruptcy.
 private-equity firm, plans to expand its credit business far faster than its buyout activities, its chief executive officer said.
 “What we’ve tried to do in building our credit business is to create, if you will, a Chinese menu of different products across the yield and liquidity spectrum” Apollo, whose credit arm oversaw $18 billion in September 2009, has diversified its business beyond leveraged buyouts like larger peers Blackstone Group LP and Carlyle Group LP.
 Executive Departure The firm, which managed assets of $1593 billion as of March 31, said first-quarter profit fell 71 percent as its buyout holdings appreciated at a slower pace than a year ago and compensation increased to pay for the departure of President Marc Spilker.
 Apollo has been one of the most active buyout firms in exiting investments over the past two years, taking advantage of rising markets to sell holdings and take companies public.
 “Illiquid, opportunistic credit is really, in my opinion, the best opportunity in the world right now” Apollo said the value of its buyout holdings rose 2 percent in the first quarter, compared with 14 percent in the same period last year.
 GAAP Income The value of buyout holdings at private-equity firms affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric in part depends on quarterly mark-to-market valuations of those investments.
 Pooling Money Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc, 39 percent owned by Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc, said this week it’s in talks to buy the Italian and German pay-TV assets of Fox.
 “They sell chocolate and people will buy more” He didn’t give consumption numbers.
 “We have to consider how we can continue supplying beans to the global market” The country shipped 188,000 tons of beans to foreign buyers in 2013, the government says.
 Credit Suisse Group AG reduced its rating on the lender to neutral from outperform, meaning that investors should stop buying the shares.
 If you’re going to buy a high flyer, I’d rather buy Tesla” Elon Musk, chief executive officer of the Palo Alto, California-based Tesla, is planning to add a mass-market electric car in about three years, powered by battery packs.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Investors demanded mostly higher relative yields to buy securities tied to rental houses managed by Blackstone Group LP’s Invitation Homes as the largest single-family landlord completed the new market’s biggest deal.
 The Blackstone business is getting back almost 85 percent of the money it spent buying and improving the more-than 6,500 properties packaged into its bonds, according to a report today by Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 Institutional investors, who went on a property-buying spree following a crash in prices, are bundling their rental homes into securities to recoup cash and earn higher returns on their residual investments with cheaper financing.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP is in talks to buy Oyatsu Co, the 65-year-old Japanese maker of crispy snacks, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 In 2012, the buyout firm acquired Diversey GK, a provider of cleaning services to Japanese companies, for about 30 billion yen.
 mobile-phone carrier, made an approach to buy DirecTV.
 “Vanke will take a cautiously optimistic approach to face the slowdown and target those buyers who need homes for self-use” The housing market threatens Premier Li Keqiang’s efforts to put the brakes on a slowdown in the world’s second-largest economy that is projected to grow at the weakest pace since 1990.
 have cut property prices since March to lure homebuyers, according to China Real Estate Information Corp.
 “As the big brother in the industry, we are responsible to alert risks, but it doesn’t mean we are bearish on the property market” The growth in the real estate industry will slow and the phase where “whoever buys makes money” is gone, even as the nation’s accelerating urbanization still promises bright prospects for the market, Vanke Chairman Wang Shi told Caixin, a financial news company, in an interview last month.
 Once all the other gold fixing members had declared their positions, it became clear the level of selling exceeded the level of buying, suggesting the price was going to fall further.
 The number of buyers and sellers had changed and the price looked like it was going to move higher again, according to the FCA report.
 where they discuss buying and selling the metal, starting from the dollar spot price, until a rate is agreed upon.
 The companies, which buy mortgages and package them into securities, were bailed out with $1875 billion from the Treasury and backed a growing share of mortgages as private capital dried up.
 Consumers are buying fewer personal computers and printers as they embrace smartphones and tablets, and companies are opting to use more software via the Internet or building their own machines.
 Domestic sales of passenger cars fell 47 percent in fiscal 2014, a second consecutive year of decline, as expensive loans discouraged buyers.
 Policy makers cut monthly bond purchases by $10 billion to $45 billion and are on track to halt buying in the second half of this year.
 That was followed by a second round of bond buying.
 Brian Pitz, an analyst at Jefferies LLC, wrote in a report today that RetailMeNot’s stock decline was an “over-reaction and that the real impact is much smaller” Pitz, who recommends buying the stock, said the company has effectively dealt with algorithm changes in the past.
 In the FHA lawsuit, the agency, which insures loans to help lower-income individuals buy homes, said it paid hundreds of millions of dollars on defaulted mortgages because Wells Fargo didn’t properly vet the origination of individual loans.
 Investors rushed to buy the shares in the city’s bourse last month after the city’s regulator and China Securities Regulatory Commission unveiled plans on April 10 to connect the stock exchanges of Hong Kong and Shanghai for cross-border trading.
 Ren acknowledges that Huawei faces a challenge to convince customers to buy its smartphones amid intense competition.
 Home buyers with higher debt and lower FICO credit scores are now a growing minority among borrowers of loans backed by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, the government-owned mortgage giants.
 More than 23 percent of the mortgages in March went to property buyers with credit scores less than 720, an above-average measure on Fair Isaac Corp’s scale that ranges from 300 to 850.
 Wells Fargo In 2009, Fannie Mae asked lenders to buy back $124 billion of mortgages, according to a regulatory filing.
 Home prices that have risen 28 percent since a 10-year low in 2012 have also stymied lending, particularly to first-time buyers.
 Credit Dings There is “a reduced inventory of available and affordable homes for first-time and low-to-moderate income buyers, and this program increases the affordability of homeownership,” said Kathleen Toy, a TD Bank spokeswoman.
 The trust fund “is quickly running toward insolvency” Both Wyden and Camp say they’re seeking a long-term funding solution, while also considering some kind of stopgap patch to buy more time this year.
 That may present an obstacle to buyers that want a specialist benchmarking business.
 Orange declined to name potential buyers or say how many towers are being sold.
 RBC Capital Markets raised its recommendation on Germany’s biggest utility to outperform, similar to buy, from underperform.
 “The shares have pulled back from recent peaks and we see this as a good opportunity to top up holdings,” Mark Irvine-Fortescue, an analyst at Jefferies in London with a “buy” rating on the stock, said in a note.
 Individual investors buying up to 2,000 pounds ($3,364) of stock will get one free share for every 20 they buy, as long as they hold them for a full year after the IPO.
 TSB Chief Executive Officer Paul Pester said there was “strong appetite” for the offering and predicted individual investors will buy as much as 20 percent of the shares on sale.
 Co-Operative Bank Plc pulled out of a 700 million-pound deal to buy the operation in April 2013, forcing Lloyds to seek an extension of the deadline.
 “This is a business that we expect investors to buy and hold as we grow,” Pester said on the conference call.
 Fed Watch The central bank pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion in April, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in measured steps are likely.
 Verizon completed a $130 billion buyout of Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in its wireless venture this year.
 He has an outperform rating on the shares, the equivalent of a buy.
 He has a buy rating on the shares.
 His rating on the shares is the equivalent of a buy.
 sales, and the move into Canada added additional headaches, said Yarbrough, who recommends buying the shares.
 Irish Case The lack of a new market entrant would set the German case apart from Ireland, where Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s attempt to buy Telefonica’s local unit may be facilitated by Liberty Global Plc stepping in to offer mobile-phone services in the country.
 “The dividend and buyback offer some support, but the shares look unattractive” Centrica shares dropped 2 percent to 3204 pence in London, the lowest since March 4, valuing the company at 16 billion pounds.
 Centrica announced Qatar Petroleum International will buy 40 percent of its Canadian Natural Gas business for C$200 million ($184 million).
 The Dublin-based airline agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- Sullivan & Cromwell LLP represented AT&T Inc, which plans to buy DirecTV for $485 billion, gaining more than 38 million video subscribers at home and in Latin America.
 CLSA has the equivalent of buy ratings on Samsung Electronics and Samsung C&T.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co’s offer to buy Treasury Wine Estates Ltd.
 After rejecting the buyout firm’s A$305 billion ($28 billion) proposal as too low, Treasury Chief Executive Officer Mike Clarke this week said any suitor is free to approach the Melbourne-based company, whose labels also include Stags’ Leap, Wolf Blass and Beringer.
 Discussions broke off when the winemaker discovered that a shareholder had been informed of the buyout firm’s bid, forcing the company to disclose the offer to the market.
 Property Curbs China has allowed most cities to adjust home-buying curbs, the Southern Weekly reported May 22, citing several unidentified people from the housing ministry.
 He downgraded the shares to reduce from buy.
 In 1950, in a bid to diversify away from Bertelsmann’sreligious roots, Mohn founded the “Lesering,” a book club inwhich customers committed to buy multiple titles annually at adiscount.
 To meet Rabe’s growth target, Bertelsmann is focusing onacquisitions of about 500 million euros rather than blockbusterdeals such as Vivendi SA (VIV)’s purchase of Vodafone’s stake in SFRfor 8 billion euros in 2011, Disney’s $4 billion buyout ofLucasArts Entertainment Co.
 set a target of returning as much as $20 billion in cash to investors through dividends and share buybacks by 2016, dashing optimism that the company would spend even more to boost its stagnant shares.
 Chief Financial Officer Pete Bensen said in March that the company could be “more aggressive” in borrowing to fund buybacks and dividends.
 Announced corporate buying -- a combination of new cash takeovers and new stock buybacks -- rose to a five-month high of $805 billion in April, according to data from TrimTabs Investment Research Inc.
 The buyback trend then slowed in May, TrimTabs Chief Executive Officer David Santschi said in an interview.
 Alibaba doesn’t buy the products it sells, nor does it pay for the warehouses where goods are stored, or the delivery and logistics infrastructure needed to get a package to a person’s doorstep.
 Hybrid Model Alibaba’s three main websites -- Taobao Marketplace, Tmall and Juhuasuan -- instead serve as an intermediary to connect buyers and sellers.
 Alibaba co-founder and CEO Jack Ma has already been buying or investing in smaller US.
 In 2010, Alibaba agreed to buy online marketplace companies Vendio Services Inc.
 Arabtec Holding, the biggest listed builder in the United Arab Emirates, lost the most in more than a year as it was cut to hold from buy at Naeem Holding.
 KKR, Silver Lake and Technology Crossover Ventures acquired Go Daddy under a $23 billion buyout in 2011, according to the report.
 Free cash is money available to reinvest in the business, reward shareholders with dividends and buybacks, or pay down debt.
 The idea was broadly to know if GE would be welcome if talks with Alstom were to start” For all Gaymard’s political savvy, GE was unsuccessful in a 2009 attempt to buy Areva T&D, which makes power-grid equipment.
 Our shares will benefit from a recovery in mining as well” Cochrane said in February he’s looking to buy more mining, oil, gas and valves companies following the acquisitions of drilling control company Mathena Inc.
 Technology to do that is the top selling point for 39 percent of auto buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who say their first consideration is traditional performance measures such as power and speed, according to a study consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 and AT&T now buying DirecTV, there’s more than $130 billion of deals among cable and telecommunications providers that require approval.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- Freddie Mac, which along with Fannie Mae has forced home lenders to buy back tens of billions of dollars of flawed mortgages, said the companies are loosening rules that made banks more cautious about extending credit.
 First-time buyers and those with weaker credit have faced trouble getting mortgages from lenders seeking to avoid defaults and putbacks.
 The stock was cut to neutral from buy at Merrill Lynch & Co.
 While expanding beyond the suburbs into the countryside will cost more money, AT&T could make up for that by getting customers to buy bigger service packages with wireless, TV and home-security systems.
 NOTHING A LA CARTE A combined AT&T and DirecTV would have little incentive to let people buy just the channels they want.
 “This is overall a slightly positive result because operating efficiency and margins improved even with the weaker sales,” said Vincent Chen, who recommends buying the stock at Yuanta Financial Holding Co.
 Hon Hai is rated the equivalent of buy among 21 of 29 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Permanent TSB said in March its cases of Irish owner-occupier mortgage arrears of more than 90 days peaked at 151 percent in September, while arrears on buy-to-let loans to landlords reached a high of 21 percent in December 2012.
 The bank’s main business unit, excluding loans in arrears and buy-to-let mortgages in asset management as well as loans earmarked for sale, is profitable this year, it said.
 “When you have sharp sell-offs, you have a lot of buyers on the sidelines waiting for that weakness,” James Paulsen, the Minneapolis-based chief investment strategist at Wells Capital Management, which oversees about $357 billion in assets, said by phone.
 The central bank pared its monthly asset-buying and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 Bouygues SA gained 44 percent after a report that Orange SA has studied buying Bouygues Telecom and after reporting that quarterly revenue beat analysts’ estimates.
 Corporate landlords are looking to the debt market for capital to buy more houses and increase returns by adding leverage to the properties they purchased with cash.
 Rising Prices With home prices up 23 percent since a post-bubble low in March 2012 and bargains harder to find, some of the largest buyers have been scaling back purchases.
 Blackstone has reduced its pace of buying by 70 percent since last year, focusing its acquisitions on five markets -- Seattle, Atlanta and the Florida cities of Tampa, Orlando and Miami, Jonathan Gray, the firm’s global head of real estate, said in March.
 Getting rid of about $26 billion of liabilities in the deal is “an important step for our company” AIG completed the deal to exit ILFC last week, after years of unsuccessful efforts to find a buyer, getting $3 billion in cash and about $46 billion in AerCap stock.
 Herzog and Chief Executive Officer Robert Benmosche have been buying back shares and seeking to bolster AIG’s credit rating since repaying the US.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- XL Group Plc reached a deal to sell a life reinsurance business for $570 million in cash as Chief Executive Officer Mike McGavick seeks to simplify the company and free up capital for share buybacks.
 The buyer is GreyCastle Holdings Ltd, a newly formed company in Bermuda whose shareholders include family offices and university endowments, according to a statement today from Dublin-based XL.
 “This transaction meaningfully reduces the risk profile of the company, which gives us additional flexibility to pursue capital management initiatives” such as the planned buyback of $300 million in shares beyond what XL previously expected, Chief Financial Officer Peter Porrino said in the statement.
 “Results of utilities were better than expected, and this encourages investors to buy Brazilian stocks,” Paulo Brito, an investment manager at the brokerage firm HPN Invest, said by phone from Recife, Brazil.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- The iShares Emerging Markets exchange-traded fund rose for a second day as the Micex Index rallied after Morgan Stanley recommended buying Russian stocks, outweighing a drop in Chinese shares.
 Morgan Stanley reiterated a buy recommendation on Russian equities, saying in an e-mailed research report that Petro Poroshenko’s election as president of Ukraine will help ease tensions between the two countries, which will probably benefit stocks.
 Brokers are seeking to buy overseas firms as property investment rises and more buyers are willing to purchase assets outside their region.
 military satellites, the Defense Department’s top weapons buyer said.
 SpaceX won a court order yesterday temporarily blocking the Air Force from buying the Russian rocket engines.
 The effort to expand Citigroup’s share of a market curbed by higher interest rates, consumer aversion to debt and new regulations will include a renewed focus on buying mortgages from correspondent lenders, Fraser said.
 “If consumers stop buying materials from the Congo, then people like us have to disengage because we cannot put ourselves in a position where people won’t buy from us,” he said.
 “They must buy conflict-free products, not Congo-free products” In January, Krzanich declared that Intel had successfully made its processors conflict free.
 and Mexico because those are the two areas where incremental Ebitda the next three years is going to come from” Peyrelongue recommends buying the company’s American depositary receipts.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks rose to their highest level in more than six years, as mining companies advanced, and Sky Deutschland AG rallied after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc said it’s in talks to buy the company.
 recommended buying shares in miners on signs of a recovery in Chinese demand.
 Logitech International SA added 68 percent as Credit Suisse Group AG advised buying the stock.
 Credit Suisse raised its rating on the stock to outperform, similar to a buy recommendation, from neutral, after the shares fell more than 20 percent from a Feb.
 He says ATP struggled to find buyers for about 7 billion euros ($97 billion) in German government bonds at the end of last year.
 companies trying to buy a foreign company and relocate their headquarters to a lower-tax country would have to ensure that shareholders of the non-US.
 “These are good operating results and the increased guidance shows that internal measures really help,” said Christian Obst, an analyst at Baader Bank AG in Munich, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 The 203-year-old company, which has sold or shut units since Hiesinger took over in 2011, said in November it would raise capital by offering stock after finding a buyer for an unprofitable US.
 Revenue at Citigroup’s bond-trading division dropped in four of the past five quarters compared with a year earlier as the Federal Reserve slowed its debt-buying program.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- After 10 years and spending about $6 billion buying American plants, Russian steel billionaire Alexey Mordashov has had enough.
 Before taking over Arcelor, Mittal also started to grow in the US, buying assets such as plants held by International Steel Group.
 That’s when it sold plants in Illinois and Ohio back to Esmark Inc, two years after buying the assets.
 Buffett, who typically leaves management in place, has said he’d welcome more deals with the buyout firm.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Sullivan & Cromwell LLP represented Bayer AG in its agreement to buy Merck & Co’s consumer unit for $142 billion.
 The state, in a filing in support of the case this month, cited a May 4, 2010, e-mail from McClendon to an Encana executive in which he asked, “Should we throw in 50/50” on Michigan “rather than bash each other’s brains out on lease buying” In a later note, the CEO allegedly said the companies could save “billions of dollars in lease competition” McClendon left the company last year after a shareholder revolt.
 to a foreign buyer were halted.
 Novartis has agreed to buy cancer drugs from GlaxoSmithKline PLC for as much as $16 billion, while selling most of its vaccines division to Glaxo and its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- Chris Shumway, head of Shumway Capital Partners LLC, recommended betting against the Chinese yuan using forward options and buying shares of Moody’s Corp.
 abandoned its attempt to buy the drugmaker.
 Individual investors buying up to 2,000 pounds of stock will get one free share for every 20 they buy, as long as they hold them for a full year after the IPO.
 Investec Plc cut its recommendation on the producer of security scanners to hold from buy, citing a May 23 forecast of lower profit at its Smiths Detection unit, and macroeconomic risks regarding public-finance budgets in the US.
 Deputy Finance Minister Wu Tang-chieh said by phone yesterday Chang Hwa Bank “is operating well” under the current arrangement and that any proposal to merge or buy Taishin’s stake must take into account the interest of employees and government-related shareholders.
 Energy Future, a Dallas-based power producer taken private in a record-setting leveraged buyout, filed for bankruptcy April 29 with a proposal to restructure $40 billion of $497 billion in liabilities.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA led an advance of raw-material producers after announcing a plan to buy back shares.
 “The American markets are closed, so investors prefer to buy stocks of commodity producers, which are always a safe haven,” Sandro Fernandes, a trader at the brokerage firm Geraldo Correa, said in a phone interview from Belo Horizonte, Brazil.
 CSN plans to buy back as many as 583 million shares by June 25, according to a regulatory filing after the market closed May 23.
 While makers of everything from jewelry to solar panels are buying the most silver in nine years, prices are languishing.
 After the first quarter we decided to broaden our offering” Under Chief Executive Officer John Legere, T-Mobile’s aggressive introduction of phone financing, cheap international rates and $650 buyout offers to get customers to switch service, helped it add more users in the first quarter than AT&T Inc.
 Linda and Frank Hasenfratz began buying stock to shore up investor confidence in the company, which had fallen to about $2 in March 2009 from $26 in October 2007.
 They can be taken out of the system because the work goes away” Kaeser’s plan to cut jobs at Munich-based Siemens may anger German unions after he promised the French government this month that he would guarantee jobs there for three years if the company buys the energy assets of Alstom SA.
 The CEO said he’s keen to find more deals like the agreement this month to buy most of Rolls-Royce Inc’s energy assets for $13 billion.
 He said that he sees no good reason to buy a robot-maker, prompting shares in KUKA AG to decline yesterday as much as 34 percent.
 Stocks Rotation While most analysts covering the company have buy recommendations, the shares have been caught up in the market’s recent selloff.
 “It doesn’t make sense that we have to save on the flood protection, that we have to save on the border security and at the same time buy new aircraft” The fighter plane’s supporters had said that neutral Switzerland needs the Gripen to defend its airspace.
 Caesars, the largest owner of casinos in the US, generates less cash than it needs to service debt taken on in a $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008, led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 and Ellerston Capital Ltd, to buy as much as 98 percent of its shares if the bid is recommended.
 Previous Approach Wilmar had previously approached the baker and discussed a takeover after buying a 10 percent stake in February 2012.
 The buyback amounts to 116 million shares and will be concluded in 2014, the Dearborn, Michigan-based company said yesterday in a statement.
 Mulally Retiring Ford is buying back an additional 126 million shares to offset the dilutive effect of stock issued through its employee incentive compensation this year, which includes the shares awarded to Mulally.
 “Some shareholders will say: ‘Increase the dividend’ And if the earnings numbers continue to roll, some free cash flow will be set aside for increasing the dividend” Ford is financing the buyback through its strengthening cash flow, which it reported was $12 billion from automotive operations in the first quarter.
 Rosneft will buy “a significant” stake and Seadrill Ltd.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- Ultratech Cement Ltd, India’s biggest maker of the material, is looking to buy the local assets of Holcim Ltd.
 “Being the largest player in the sector with a healthy balance sheet, it is a natural buyer of good assets on the block” India Capacity Jona, Switzerland-based Holcim and Paris-based Lafarge are preparing to sell assets with 5 billion euros ($69 billion) in revenue to win regulatory approval after announcing plans to form the world’s largest cement maker with combined annual sales of $40 billion.
 Mumbai-based Ultratech plans to add 20 million tons to its current 58 million ton capacity in the next three years, for which a few buyouts will be necessary, the person said.
 The company was in talks to buy a second cement unit in Himachal Pradesh from India’s only Formula One track builder, the person said.
 would buy out the Swiss cement marker’s stake in the other, ACC Ltd, effectively bringing both under a single management.
 “There’s basket-buying happening and this rally will garner more legs as May 16 approaches,” Alex Mathews, head of research at Geojit BNP Paribas Financial Services Ltd, said by phone from Mumbai.
 “There is buying by overseas hedge funds,” Jitendra Panda, head of broking at Capital First Ltd, said by phone from Mumbai.
 Hess found a buyer after filing paperwork in January to put the 1,342 stations along the US.
 The additional stations will buy 200,000 barrels a day from Marathon Petroleum’s refineries, guaranteeing a buyer for 75 percent of the company’s gasoline and diesel output.
 Hess increased its buyback authorization to $65 billion from $4 billion, the company said today.
 Pemex is seeking to increase sales to Asia and Europe to offset falling oil exports to the US, Mexico’s largest crude buyer.
 Court of Federal Claims Judge Susan Braden lifted an order that temporarily blocked the Air Force from buying the Russian engines.
 The company also said it will free up more cash for stock buybacks by suspending its dividend -- a move applauded by its largest shareholder Icahn.
May 13 (Bloomberg) --- Awas Aviation Capital Ltd, an aircraft lessor focused on buying used jets mainly from other leasing companies, is studying options for a sale or initial public offering as its private-equity owners consider an exit.
 Or you could make two leasing companies out of it” With assets valued at about $11 billion today and expected to grow to as much as $17 billion in 2016, Sisson said the company may be too large to be swallowed by any one buyer, requiring a division into two if the path chosen is for private sales.
 By buying mainly used jets, which are far less expensive than new-build planes coming directly from manufacturers Airbus Group NV or Boeing Co, Awas has been able to achieve higher yield, or lease revenues, relative to what it spends, Sisson said.
 Second-Tier Markets “We are determined to transform Awas into a clearinghouse for other lessors,” Sisson said, meaning companies that want to move older planes out of the portfolio can turn to Awas as a partner to buy them, find new airline customers to rent the jets, or even have the aircraft scrapped for parts.
 The Irish government set up NAMA to buy 712 billion euros of property loans from Irish banks as part of a bid to save the country’s economy from collapse.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, a property investor and lender, agreed to buy a majority stake in 47 US.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy mortgages and package them into securities, began posting record profits as the housing market rebounded.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 He started the business with Joe and another brother, James, in 1993, buying assets from Amerco in part with $600 million in loans from the company.
 The central bank is scaling back the bond-buying program it has used to pump money into the economy amid signs growth is accelerating.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- A 10-cent plunge in a portion of Caesars Entertainment Corp’s secured bonds is “overdone” and buyers have a good chance of reaping gains with the casino operator likely to restructure its debt within two years, according to KDP Investment Advisors Inc.
 The company may exchange equity for first-lien notes as part of an eventual restructuring, and “collateral backing these bonds is the same as the bank debt so we think holders have a good case to receive a par exchange,” Barbara Cappaert, an analyst at KDP in Montpelier, Vermont, wrote today in a report that changed its recommendation on the 85 percent securities to “buy” from “hold” The notes traded at 765 cents to yield 147 percent at 1:36 pm.
 The company is battling to reorganize the business after amassing debt brought on by a series of buyouts that began with the company’s privatization in 1997.
 Former managers, including representatives of the buyout firm’s owners at the time, cost the firm 650 million euros ($900 million) for taking on additional debt to pay shareholders dividends in 2004, according to Seat Pagine.
 investors are learning a hard lesson today: The chain isn’t the only place to buy organic kale anymore.
 The fund Ergen used to buy the debt, SP Special Opportunities LLC, wasn’t technically prohibited from making the purchases because it was owned by him and not Dish, Chapman said.
 However, Ergen violated a covenant of good faith and fair dealing in LightSquared’s credit agreement by using the fund to conceal his identity and make an “end run” around the rule that competitors couldn’t buy LightSquared’s debt, she said.
 LightSquared’s Inaction Still, Ergen won’t face damages in the case because of the “inaction and delay” in confronting him by LightSquared and Falcone’s investment fund Harbinger Capital Partners LLC, which both knew or had strong suspicions for almost a year about who was buying, Chapman said.
 Falcone was less inclined to complain as the price of LightSquared’s debt more than doubled to 90 cents on the dollar, she said, citing e-mails he exchanged with Andrew McKnight at Fortress about it being potentially beneficial that Ergen was said to be a buyer.
 The insurer, which changed its name from Resolution Ltd, has slumped 15 percent this year after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 He didn’t give details on the buyers of the bonds sold today or possible future debt sales.
 The subsidiary completed its acquisition of Nevada’s largest electric utility in December and announced a deal this week to buy SNC-Lavalin Group Inc’s AltaLink for about $29 billion to expand in electricity transmission in western Canada.
 About 40 percent of this year’s leveraged buyouts had debt of more than six times earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, or Ebitda, up from less than 30 percent last year, according to Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ Leveraged Commentary & Data.
 RBS has also canvassed investors’ interest in buying a stake in its Ulster Bank operation, according to people with knowledge of the discussions who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 It agreed to buy SeeWhy, a Boston-based maker of marketing software designed to increase e-commerce sites’ conversion of visitors into buyers, for an undisclosed price yesterday.
 In March it agreed to buy Fieldglass Inc, a maker of online human-resources software.
 recommended buying its shares, while Symrise AG climbed 11 percent as the brokerage added the company to its conviction-buy list.
 Goldman Sachs upgraded its rating on the shares to buy from neutral, saying volume growth may offset pricing challenges.
 Goldman Sachs added the maker of fragrances and food flavorings to its conviction buy list, saying its acquisition of Diana Group will help accelerate earnings growth.
 Linde slipped 11 percent to 151 euros as Goldman Sachs cut its rating on the company to neutral from buy, citing the stock’s recent rally.
 The idea was broadly to know if GE would be welcome if talks with Alstom were to start” For all Gaymard’s political savvy, GE was unsuccessful in a 2009 attempt to buy Areva T&D, which makes power-grid equipment.
 said it would buy the company at a 32 percent premium.
 Staples said in a statement it would buy the company for C$170 a share, or a net equity value of about C$739 million.
 “Treasuries are supported as people buy into the idea that interest rates are not going to rise anytime soon,” said Salman Ahmed, a global strategist at Lombard Odier Asset Management in London.
 “Over the next few months, data should show us whether Yellen’s dovish comments are misplaced” The Fed is unwinding the bond-buying program it has used to support the economy.
 “Yingluck failed to prevent or stop fraud in the rice-buying program even after the NACC and other government agencies sent letters to warn her,” Commissioner Vicha Mahakun said in a televised media briefing in Bangkok.
 And should that happen, one will also start to get worried about potential implication for long-term investors” Yingluck’s government will have spent 880 billion baht ($271 billion) buying rice from farmers from October 2011 to February 2014, according to the Bank for Agriculture and Agricultural Cooperatives, including about 100 billion baht that hasn’t yet been paid.
 In 2008, the court found his allies guilty of vote buying, disbanding their party and banning another 30 executives, including then-Prime Minister Somchai Wongsawat, Thaksin’s brother-in-law.
 pork producer, made an unsolicited $62 billion offer to buy Hillshire Brands Co, trumping a competing bid from Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 The proposed takeover is subject to Hillshire terminating a $52 billion agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, owner of the Birds Eye frozen foods brand.
 shoppers aren’t buying enough soup -- especially the condensed varieties that have long been a staple of American pantries.
 “We’ve had no insight yet into how they will be thinking about this” MetLife, led by Chief Executive Officer Steve Kandarian, hasn’t announced share buybacks since 2008 amid uncertainty over rules the New York-based insurer could be subjected to if it’s deemed a systemically important financial institution, or SIFI.
 Dubai Islamic, the UAE’s biggest Shariah-compliant lender by assets, will buy a 25 percent stake in Indonesia’s PT Bank Panin Syariah Tbk, the Islamic banking arm of Bank Panin, it said yesterday.
 Saba Capital Management LP, the hedge fund run by Boaz Weinstein, has also been a buyer, adding to a stake in the biggest such fund, Pimco’s $32 billion Dynamic Credit Income fund.
 Merger Wave Comcast’s $45 billion takeover of Time Warner Cable, announced in February, and AT&T’s May 18 deal to buy DirecTV for $485 billion are part of a wave of merger activity in the telecommunications industry.
 Comcast has been trying to reassure regulators and lawmakers that even after it buys Time Warner Cable, there will be robust competition from companies such as AT&T, Netflix Inc.
 That is not good, but it’s not nearly as bad as the forecast of the death of the annuity industry” Shares of Just Retirement have slumped 40 percent since Chancellor Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his 2014 budget that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 who recommends buying the shares, said by phone.
 Abandoned Proposal The miner abandoned a proposal to buy out its Australian unit, Yancoal Australia Ltd, in March, with the company’s chief financial officer saying the privatization wasn’t in the interests of shareholders.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 Why use leverage now? Because for buyers who have faith the riskiest companies will pay back their obligations, the loans just aren’t quite yielding enough.
 That hasn’t stopped the biggest buyers from using more leverage through total return swaps and buying the lowest-rated portions of CLOs, which pool the loans and slice them into different tiers of varying risk and return, Barclays Plc strategists wrote in a May 16 report.
 Sony previously agreed to sell its PC division, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 agreed to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 is buying mobile-bill payments provider Check Inc.
 “The most important issue is to get clarity around it, and then allow people to start buying toward it,” Rose said.
 Railroads typically don’t buy specialized equipment such as tank cars, and BNSF said at the time that its interest was intended to jump start the shift to the safer units.
 Lithuania relies on OAO Gazprom for all of its natural gas and is battling the Russian pipeline gas export monopoly to cut prices it says are at least a quarter more than other European buyers pay.
 That’s at least a quarter more than other European buyers, President Dalia Grybauskaite said in February.
 “How much we’ll be buying from Gazprom will depend on the price for Russian gas,” he said.
 If you buy into that notion, then your sector preferences would probably change” Concern that anemic growth will discourage central bankers around the world from lifting borrowing costs is prompting Canada’s second-largest lender by assets to revisit its forecasts.
 Even as the Federal Reserve starts slowing its monthly purchases of Treasuries and mortgage-backed securities known as quantitative easing, other buyers have emerged, surprising traders expecting a surge in yields.
 beef unit as a cattle shortage pushes up prices for livestock that JBS buys to process at its abattoirs.
 “Pent-up demand from buyers who’d been holding off is now coming to the market,” said Juan Villen, head of mortgage lending at Idealistacom, Spain’s largest property website.
 As buyers re-emerge in certain parts of the country, prices, which have dropped an average of 47 percent since the peak in 2007, are starting to increase in cities such as Barcelona, the second-largest, according to Idealista.
 “Today you need at least 20 percent of the property’s value saved up before you can attempt to buy it” His Madrid-based firm, Acuna & Asociados, estimates that 40 percent of unsold housing units will never find buyers due to their undesirable location and because workers earning 1,000 euros a month -- known as “mil euristas” -- aren’t able to stump up deposits.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom LLP is advising Hillshire Brands Co, the maker of Jimmy Dean meats, on its deal to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 If either Pfizer or AstraZeneca decide to sell the pipeline, Roche should buy it, Shlaes said.
 The buyout firms still own the AA.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- CBS Corp, owner of the most-watched television network, posted first-quarter earnings that beat analysts’ estimates after buying back $2 billion of its stock and selling shares in its US.
 The decision to sell shares in the outdoor unit, turn the business into a real estate investment trust and eventually divest is giving the company about $5 billion for buybacks and potential acquisitions.
 Shareholders of Prisa, which publishes El Pais newspaper, approved an agreement to restructure about 3 billion euros of debt in December, giving the media company time to turn around the business and reduce debt while looking for a buyer for the broadcasting assets.
 Telefonica had considered options for DTS including teaming up with Mediaset or with Al Jazeera to buy the asset, a person familiar with the matter said in March.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Russia is preparing to buy palladium from local producers, chiefly OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel, Interfax cited the head of the state metals depositary as saying.
 Norilsk doesn’t see any evidence that Russia is buying palladium, and such a move would be unjustified, Norilsk Chief Executive Office Vladimir Potanin said in an interview on April 24.
 “We could help, and not only by buying those volumes, but by marketing the deal.
 I myself as a businessman would be interested to buy” Palladium pared losses and traded 06 percent higher at $81675 by 1:32 pm.
 Canada’s third-biggest lender by assets also said it will buy back as many as 12 million shares over the next year.
 rose 3 percent to C$339 after its board approved a plan to buy back as much as 10 percent of the company’s public shares.
 Last month, Vivendi SA snubbed Bouygues’s offer to buySFR, France’s second-largest phone operator, and agreed insteadto sell it to Altice SA in a deal valued at more than 17 billioneuros.
 The amendment represents a continuing fight as lawmakers have tried to stop the Pentagon from buying Russian helicopters US.
 is buying a translate-on-the-go application developer, seeking to bolster its mobile services.
 Salamander Energy Salamander Energy Plc jumped 10 percent to 1475 pence, the highest price since July, after saying it has held formal talks with bidders after receiving approaches to buy some or all of its assets.
 Vodafone Group Plc slipped 15 percent to 2207 pence after the Wall Street Journal reported that AT&T has approached DirecTV about buying the satellite-TV company.
 A deal, worth least at $40 billion, may reduce the likelihood of AT&T buying Vodafone.
 mobile-phone operator from offering to buy Vodafone until the end of July.
 venture from buying Russian-made rocket engines for the US.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- AstraZeneca Plc Chairman Leif Johansson said the UK’s second-biggest drugmaker will return to growth as an independent company and listed the reasons for rejecting a $99 billion buyout offer from Pfizer Inc.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- German stocks advanced, extending two weeks of gains for the benchmark DAX Index, as Sky Deutschland AG rallied after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc started talks to buy the company.
 Europe’s largest engineering company starts its 4 billion-euro share buyback today.
 The buyback was announced on Nov.
 The company may be close to buying Brazilian sugar assets from Bunge, Exane said.
 recommended buying the stock.
 Analysts at Citigroup led by Alexander Robarts raised the recommendation on the meatpacker to buy from the equivalent of hold, citing productivity gains and expectations for higher sales with the World Cup in Brazil, according to a note to clients dated yesterday.
 The Federal Reserve pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion in April, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in measured steps are likely.
 “We are not doing buybacks at the moment,” Chief Financial Officer Simon Henry said.
 The Anglo-Dutch company, which has been examining plans to merge the two categories of shares, declared more than $11 billion in dividends and executed about $57 billion of buybacks in the past 12 months.
 “Investors don’t like it” as it costs more for London-based investors to buy Class B shares, which are not subject to Dutch withholding tax, said Iain Reid, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets Ltd.
 “Due to Dutch withholding tax rules, buybacks are currently limited to the B shares, for economic reasons,” Henry said.
 “We are working hard on solutions to give us the flexibility to buy back both A and B shares” Shell increased first-quarter dividends by about 4 percent to 47 cents a share from a year ago, it said April 30.
May 13 (Bloomberg) -- Northern Star Resources Ltd, an Australian gold producer, plans to buy a Newmont Mining Corp.
 Sports Direct International Plc advanced after Exane BNP Paribas recommended buying the stock.
 Exane initiated coverage of the shares with an outperform rating, similar to a buy.
 earlier this week maintained its underperform recommendation on Bumi’s notes, with a high-yield analyst at the debt researcher, Sandra Chow, saying “nobody really knows what’s going on there, whether they are genuinely out of cash and trying to buy some time” Distressed debt from Indonesia has fallen 149 percent this quarter, the worst performance in an index of 17 developing nations tracked by Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- Air France-KLM Group closed the sale of its CityJet unit to Intro Aviation GmbH with a deal the German buyer said will seek to extend the partnership between the carriers at London City airport.
 Woehrl became CEO of Deutsche BA in 2003 after buying the unit for 1 euro from British Airways, which had hired him to shut it down.
 Canadian Natural has 22 buy, five hold and one sell recommendations from analysts.
 ADIB last month agreed to buy the conventional retail assets of Barclays in the UAE.
 Mortgage applications to buy homes plunged 19 percent from a year earlier, indicating slowing demand during what is typically the busiest season for deals.
 Also, the investors who helped drive up prices in the past two years by buying homes and converting them into rentals are finding fewer distressed properties on the market.
 He recommends buying Home Depot shares.
May 12 (Bloomberg) -- Rayonier Inc, the Florida company that’s spinning off its specialty wood pulp business, is seeking to expand by buying more land, incoming Chief Executive Officer David Nunes said.
 Nunes said he didn’t know yet where or how much the company would spend to buy additional timberlands, from which it can sell logs and in some cases develop into real estate.
 The analyst has a “buy” recommendation on the stock.
 As metals prices declined, the company has been trimming dividends since 2011 when it returned a record $12 billion including a $3 billion share buyback.
 Cost Cutting Relative to BHP, Vale is trading at the cheapest levels in at least two years, and all 15 analysts covering the preferred shares in Sao Paulo have the equivalent of a buy recommendation.
 counterparts in questioning the economic impact of the drugmaker’s push to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 Read is set to speak about his proposal to buy AstraZeneca at two separate UK.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Gilead Sciences Inc, the maker of a hepatitis C treatment projected to be the best-selling drug of all time, said it would double the size of an existing $5 billion share buyback program.
 The $29 billion left from the 2011 buyback program will be spent by September, Gilead said in a statement.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Steve Kuhn, fixed-income trading head at $148 billion Pine River Capital Management LP, said investors should sell their bonds and buy “boring” stocks including packaging manufacturer Rock-Tenn Co.
 They also said CaixaBank SA, Spain’s third-largest bank, “stands out” as a potential buyer for the business.
 Last year, Apollo acquired FinanMadrid, an auto and consumer loan provider, from Bankia and in September agreed to buy Evo Banco, part of the banking business of nationalized Spanish lender NCG Banco SA, for 60 million euros.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Millhouse LLC, billionaire Roman Abramovich’s investment company, and OAO Pharmstandard, Russia’s biggest drugmaker, plan to buy Biocad, a biotechnology firm.
 An affiliate of Millhouse will purchase 50 percent of Biocad while Pharmstandard is set to buy 20 percent, the companies said in a joint statement today.
 Millhouse plans to buy its stake from OAO Gazprombank, Russia’s third-largest lender, according to John Mann, a spokesman for the investment company.
 Irina Bakhturina, the company’s head of investor relations, said it isn’t buying a stake from Gazprombank, declining to provide further details of the transaction.
 California regulators in October ordered the state’s utilities to buy 1,325 megawatts of energy storage by 2020.
 in the long haul, then it’s absolutely going to open up a buying opportunity” BlackRock Caution Dubai’s economy grew at the fastest pace since 2007 last year and is set to expand by an average 46 percent through 2015, according to government forecasts.
 Arqaam Capital, a Dubai-based investment bank, on May 5 said investors should buy Dubai Islamic, predicting gains to 920 dirhams.
 Nothing new about this kind of thing -- buyers say it all the time.
 The tapering of another $10 billion in QE asset buying was a foregone conclusion, and while yesterday’s US.
 Previous Approach Wilmar had previously approached the baker and discussed a takeover after buying a 10 percent stake in February 2012.
 and Ellerston Capital Ltd, to buy as much as 98 percent of its shares if the bid is recommended.
 Patrick Gallagher announced a deal in April to buy brokering operations from Australia’s Wesfarmers Ltd.
 5, the day Coca-Cola announced it was the buying the stake.
 SodaStream Competition Under today’s agreement, Coca-Cola owns about 195 million shares and has the right to buy as much as 65 million more.
 Credit Suisse was the financial adviser to CD&R on the acquisition, the buyout firm said.
 ‘It’s an operational and deleveraging story now,’’ Peyrelongue, who recommends buying Cemex’s American depositary receipts, said in a telephone interview.
 In 2007, Lorenzo Zambrano capped a two-decade, $29 billion buying spree with the Rinker Group acquisition, boosting Cemex’s exposure to the US.
 Benson recommends clients buy ICL as rising potash priceswould support a short-term increase in the stock.
 Making Money Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy loans and package them into securities, were taken into US.
 make a rival offer to buy Hillshire Brands Co, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Vinmar International Ltd, a closely held company based in Houston, signed a 15-year contract in January to buy all the plant’s production and take a 10 percent stake in the facility.
 Management led by former Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s co-head of Brazilian investment banking Fabio Bicudo is seeking to bolster finances amid project delays that have increased costs and forced the company to buy on the spot market at a time of record prices, deepening its losses.
 You have to buy on the dips” ‘New Normal’ China’s President Xi Jinping said this month that the nation needs to adapt to a “new normal” in the pace of economic growth.
 They invested more than $500,000 in Atheros stock and options after they learned Qualcomm would be buying the company and before the $32 billion acquisition was announced, prosecutors said.
 The resistance also prompted restaurants and grocery stores, such as Kroger Co, to stop buying ground beef containing the substance.
 Beef with the component can be cheaper than meat without it, which may appeal to buyers seeking less pricey options, he said.
 That contrasts with Berkshire’s practice of buying great businesses and leaving management alone.
 Novartis agreed to buy Glaxo’s cancer business for as much as $16 billion, form a consumer-health joint venture with Glaxo, sell its veterinary unit to Eli Lilly & Co.
 Landesbank Hessen-Thueringen Girozentrale and other lenders said 400 million pounds in loans used to buy the property should be repaid ahead of money owed to Bayerische Landesbank under the swaps, according to court documents at a hearing yesterday.
 agreed to buy it for about $66 billion including debt.
 China is the biggest buyer of industrial metals.
 Renewable Energy agreed on May 21 to buy Tyson Foods Inc’s 50 percent stake in Dynamic Fuels LLC.
 Three analysts recommend selling the stock, five say to hold it while two recommend buying Penoles, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 ‘Not Sexy Year’ While 2014 will “not be a very sexy year” for the company because of the fall in prices, Penoles is “a very well-positioned company,” said Jean-Baptiste Bruny, a BBVA Research analyst who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Consumers are buying fewer personal computers and printers as they embrace smartphones and tablets, and companies are opting to use more software via the Internet or building their own machines.
 “Part of why we wanted to do it in Romania is because it’s very cheap to get a business off the ground,” Sterns, a professional photographer and the president of Mobuy Solutions, said in Bucharest.
 In the May 4, 2010, e-mail to an Encana executive, former Chesapeake CEO Aubrey McClendon asked, “Should we throw in 50/50” on Michigan “rather than bash each other’s brains out on lease buying,” according to the state’s filing.
 Two, including UFS’s Balakirev, rate it a buy.
 agreed in December 2012 to buy a 49 percent stake in Virgin Atlantic.
 Calgary-based Talisman solicited offers last year for its 50 percent interest in the Eagle Ford, and couldn’t find a buyer in part because Statoil wasn’t ready to exit, three of the people familiar with the matter said.
 Shipments through Port Hedland surged to a record in April as stockpiles in China, the biggest buyer, reached an all-time high.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Nationwide Building Society, the UK’s biggest customer-owned lender, said fiscal full-year pretax profit rose more than fourfold as it extended more loans to homebuyers.
 The company said it won’t follow Lloyds Banking Group Plc, the country’s largest mortgage provider, in imposing limits on lending to homebuyers to help stem the gains in London.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc’s shares reversed a nine-day slide, gaining 11 percent after Nomura Securities upgraded the microblogging company to a buy.
 The hammer price, which excludes the buyer’s premium, was 1 million francs, compared with an initial estimate of 12 million francs to 18 million francs.
 Estimates for the auction don’t include the buyer’s premium.
 While its repurchase program lets it acquire shares once owned by AT&T when they’re in the open market, America Movil has no plans to buy any significant portion of AT&T’s stake, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 ‘Positive Message’ Slim could also opt to buy shares directly, Legarreta said.
 Ahmed’s sales drought is good news for Dubai financial authorities who have been trying to tame a market that has lurched between boom and bust since it was opened to foreign buyers in 2002.
 “There would have been cause for concern if we had continued to see the kind of price increases we saw over the last 18 months” Price growth is also slowing because recent increases have put homes out of reach for many buyers, Liam Bailey, head of residential research at Knight Frank LLP, said in a phone interview from London.
 First Timers New rules “should incentivize first-time home buyers with a higher LTV to allow them to get into the market,” he said.
 The alternative is staying in rental accommodation, and rents will keep spiraling out of control” Ahmed, the broker at Indus, said buyers are pushing for lower prices and dropping out of talks when their bids are rejected by sellers.
 “Before, buyers would have negotiated and raised their prices,” she said.
 has agreed to buy the UK’s Channel 5, according to a person with knowledge of the situation who asked not to be named because the deal hasn’t been announced.
 Acquisition Parade Yahoo, based in Sunnyvale, California, has discussed buying Fullscreen, as well as forming partnerships, one of the people said.
 DreamWorks Animation, the studio led by Jeffrey Katzenberg, was an early buyer in the field with its $33 million purchase in May 2013 of AwesomenessTV, a popular teen network on YouTube.
Christie’s sold at least HK$303billion ($391 million) worth of art during its five-day springsale in Hong Kong that ended last night as Chinese buyersdemonstrated more selectivity than at previous auctions.
 The results exceeded the auctioneer’s pre-sale estimate ofHK$25 billion, which includes the buyer’s premium, according toChristie’s website.
 The top lot of the jewelry sale on May 27, a necklace madeof emeralds and containing the largest Golconda diamond everauctioned in Asia, weighing 400 carats, with a high estimate ofHK$80 million, failed to find a buyer.
 offered to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 has shown interest in buying offtake output from the Chinese company’s Husab uranium mine in Namibia.
 Now he’s joined billionaires George Soros and John Paulson in acquiring shares in one of the real estate investment trusts buying property in the Irish capital, Dublin.
 Last week, Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy a portfolio with a par value of 18 billion euros from McDonagh’s organization, the National Asset Management Agency.
 “When we opened all of the envelopes, we counted 17 billion euros of cash bids on the table,” he said, declining to name the eventual buyer.
 Price Rise As prices rise and yields drop, investors might be rattled by the possibility of REITs not producing the kind of returns they pictured last year, according to Eamonn Hughes, an analyst at Goodbody Stockbrokers in Dublin, who has buy ratings on Green and Hibernia shares.
 Goldman Sachs Hibernia last week agreed to buy two offices, with tenants including Goldman Sachs Group Inc, in Dublin’s city center, in a deal which valued the buildings at 60 million euros.
 “What about all the American companies flooding in here buying it, have they got it wrong?” he said.
 That goes against the playbook of Apple co-founder Steve Jobs, who never paid more than a few hundred million dollars for an acquisition, choosing to buy small companies designed to bring in technology and talent.
 The biggest-ever acquisition was the $400 million Apple paid in 1997 to buy Next Computer Inc.
 Modus Operandi A deal to buy Beats would be unlike anything Jobs ever did, and shows that Cook is taking his predecessor’s advice to heart.
 Cook has already been putting his stamp on Apple since taking over, introducing dividends and share buybacks and rolling out a corporate philanthropy program.
 “Why not just buy Spotify? Go for the big boy in the market” Maintaining a separate brand might also help Apple appeal to a younger audience that no longer thinks Apple is cool, Gillis said.
 agreed in February to buy more than 1,700 Plug systems for six North American distribution centers.
 Accor agreed to buy hotels in Germany, the Netherlands and Switzerland for about 900 million euros, according to a statement today.
May 20 (Bloomberg) -- French state-controlled nuclear company Areva SA would consider buying Alstom SA’s wind energy business if those assets come up for sale as part of a deal with General Electric Co.
 Areva has been in contact with potential buyers of Alstom’s energy units, Oursel said today.
 Both are buying about 14 percent in the troubled carmaker.
 Tecnologica SA to share costs, buying Alstom’s offshore wind business would eliminate a rival that was selected by EDF for a 2 billion-euro ($27 billion) contract to supply three wind farms in the country.
 “It’s like that old Henry Ford story: I’ve got to pay my workers enough so they can buy my product,” said David Dollar, a former US.
 He took advantage of relaxed rules on foreign ownership to buy out other investors in the Indian unit to bring the holding to 100 percent last month.
 has been interested in buying the UK.
 Still, AT&T’s agreement this week to buy US.
 “We have an unregulated generation piece of our business we’re trying to bring some stability to” Without more earnings stability, such as long-term agreements with power buyers, Columbus, Ohio-based American Electric will look to sell the unit, which doesn’t get guaranteed returns like its regulated business.
 Lucas says Doyen’s model is different to Quality Sports because it doesn’t directly buy stakes in players’ economic rights.
May 26 (Bloomberg) -- Kakao Corp, South Korea’s largest mobile messaging service, agreed to buy Daum Communications Corp.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC, the buyout firm led by billionaire Leon Black, made its bond-market debut today by selling $500 million of 10-year notes after boosting the offering from $300 million initially marketed.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Wohnen AG, Germany’s second-largest residential landlord by market value, said first-quarter profit rose 91 percent after the company took advantage of rising share prices to buy more homes.
 Deutsche Wohnen has been buying apartments to take advantage of rising rents, its ability to raise capital on the stock market at favorable terms and low interest-rate loans.
 Transportation Secretary Anthony Foxx said last week a short-term infusion of general funds will probably be needed to buy more time for a long-term solution.
 It acquired Wuxi Suntech Power in April for 3 billion yuan ($480 million), the biggest panel maker in 2012, and this month agreed to buy an inverter company.
 The Federal Reserve, which announced the fourth straight $10 billion cut to its monthly bond-buying April 30, says the job market in the world’s largest economy is improving.
 Both homebuilders were raised to buy at Citigroup Inc, which cited an improved outlook for valuations.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Centrica announced Qatar Petroleum International will buy40 percent of its Canadian Natural Gas business for C$200million ($184 million).
 Oil Search has contested Total’s agreement to buy part of InterOil’s project, saying the deal breached its pre-emptive rights.
 Investors from outside the six-nation Gulf Cooperation Council aren’t allowed to buy Saudi listed shares directly, and instead access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 This included doing a “full test cycle” with a foreign institutional client, opening an account for direct investment in Saudi equities, transferring cash in and out of the kingdom, and executing buy and sell orders, according to a spokesman for the bank.
 where they discuss buying and selling the metal, starting from the dollar spot price, until a rate is agreed upon.
 As the Fed began reducing its buying, the securities soared 31 percent this year, Bank of America Merrill Lynch index data show.
 Merrill Lynch downgraded Wharf Holdings Ltd, a commercial landlord, to neutral from buy.
 Three rounds of bond-buying from the Federal Reserve has helped bolster the US.
 made a $68 billion offer to buy the company, trumping a competing bid from Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 economic growth is gaining traction prompted the Fed to taper its $85 billion-a-month bond-buying program.
 IMI Plc added 3 percent as UBS AG recommended buying the engineering company’s shares.
 Man Group Plc rose 5 percent after saying it has held talks to buy Boston-based money manager Numeric Holdings LLC.
 IMI added 3 percent to 1,608 pence as UBS raised its rating on the maker of valves for liquified-natural-gas projects to buy from neutral.
 So went the buying frenzy during two weeks of marathon auction sales this month in New York.
 Asian collectors fueled the bidding and buying during both weeks, snapping up pieces by Claude Monet, Henri Matisse, Alberto Giacometti and Francis Bacon.
 “Wealthy buyers are willing to pay above the high estimates for iconic works that they want to own and feel they may not have other opportunity to acquire,” said Jeff Rabin, a principal at Artvest Partners LLC in New York.
 The head of Kynikos Associates LP said the market is being inflated in part because of “hot money” from Chinese buyers.
 While Sony rejected the plan in August, it said in February it would sell its PC business to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 One way of doing that would be to put higher-growth divisions, including PlayStation and entertainment, in one business and more commoditized operations, like TV, in a “cash cow” business focused on buybacks and dividends, he said.
 SolarCity installs rooftop solar panels at little to no upfront cost to customers who sign long-term contracts to buy the power.
 slid amid speculation buyers might not be interested in scooping up Bank of Nova Scotia’s 37 percent stake in the money manager.
 “It is unclear to us who a logical buyer would be given various restrictions,” Gary Ho, an analyst at Desjardins Securities Inc, said in a note to clients today.
 Capital Redeployed The difficulty “has always been whether another strategic buyer can be found,” Stephen Boland, an analyst at GMP, said in a note to clients today.
 that year, and by 2010 agreed to buy shares it didn’t already own in fund manager DundeeWealth Inc.
 “CI will work in the interests of all of our shareholders and management will remain focused on the continued success of our business” Scotiabank “made a lot of money buying CI,” Paul Holden, an analyst at Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, said in a phone interview.
 central bank is unwinding the bond-buying program it has used to hold down longer-term borrowing costs and spur growth.
 drugmaker, yesterday abandoned its effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion), saying the public bid rejected by its London-based competitor represented “full value” AstraZeneca said it welcomed “the opportunity to continue building on the momentum we have already demonstrated” Under UK.
 ‘Compelling’ Offer Pfizer has declined to say if it will try again to buy AstraZeneca after the UK.
 Brooks’s lawyer has spent much of the last two days lambasting the prosecution case, calling it “desperate,” “absurd,” and “outrageous” “It is beyond ridiculous that the prosecution are trying to make you buy the fantastic tale of what she did and the people she corrupted,” Laidlaw said.
May 5 (Bloomberg) -- Emperador Inc, the brandy maker that gets almost all its revenue from the Philippines, fell the most in five months in Manila trading after confirming talks to buy Scottish spirits company Whyte & Mackay to expand overseas.
 “I used to spend about $5,000 a month to make a profit of about $1,000 a month as a cross-border trader, but no one’s buying now,” Takavarasha said in an interview, as he hugged his knees against the cold night air.
 Foreign currency needed to pay wages and buy imports has dried up, Mugabe’s government has given investors mixed signals on plans to seize company stakes as part of its “indigenization” policy, and factories are operating at just 40 percent of capacity.
 “Plus, pork exports have come down a little bit, and that’s one of the most profitable segments” Still, Tyson has managed to increase margins even as diseases threaten sales, Craig Sterling, the global head of equity research at EVA Dimensions in New York, who has a buy recommendation on the stock, said by phone.
 Banco Santander Brasil SA, the Brazilian unit of Spain’s biggest bank, may move as magazine Veja reported that it’s negotiating to buy Banco Bonsucesso.
 of East Aurora, New York, was Quaker Oats’ first non-food acquisition since 1942, when it had expanded into dog food by buying Chappel Brothers Inc, maker of Ken-L-Ration.
 Randstad Holding NV advanced 31 percent as UBS AG advised investors to buy shares in the biggest Dutch staffing company.
 UBS raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, saying the company will witness profit growth if the economic recovery continues.
 Adecco advanced 09 percent to 7315 Swiss francs after UBS raised its rating on the world’s largest supplier of temporary workers to buy from sell.
 Societe Generale cut its rating for the company to hold from buy, citing increased pressure to cut broadband prices.
 That system has been challenged by buyers including Germany’s RWE AG and Eni, the Russian company’s biggest client, as the gap between what they paid Gazprom and the price on European markets widened.
 A 500 million-pound share buyback program will be suspended until payment of the special dividend on July 29, pending shareholder approval, the company said.
 Of the 72 lots offered, 94 percent sold and only four works failed to find buyers, Christie’s said.
 International buyers from 26 countries chased after works that helped Christie’s surpass its high target of $1241 million for the sale.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- TrueCar Inc, the online auto-buying service that’s planning an initial public offering, said board member John Krafcik, the former head of Hyundai Motor Co’s US.
 Painter has said it gets $300 from dealers for each customer it refers who buys a new vehicle, and $400 for a used-car sale.
 dealers have long been protected by state laws requiring drivers to buy from franchised stores.
 slipped 24 percent to $2243 as Deutsche Bank AG removed the stock from its short-term buy list.
 have invested billions of dollars to expand output, betting on sustained growth in demand from China, the biggest buyer.
 Politicians’ Questions “If they buy Astra because of the R&D, they will have to ring-fence the R&D completely,” Kulhoff said, adding that that would put a damper on cost cuts and earnings growth.
 “However, if they buy it because of taxes, well, then I think they will make big cuts” The prospect is likely to be atop the list of questions Read and other Pfizer executives will face in the hearings scheduled to start tomorrow.
 “Clearly they had to do something about the price” Microsoft will also start selling a standalone Kinect module for Xbox One later this year, in case those who buy the $399 console want to add it later.
 In April, the Oakbrook, Illinois-based company agreed to buy Protenergy Natural Foods, a developer and maker of private-label soups and broths, to expand its offerings.
 Fitch Ratings called the deal a medium-term positive for China’s gas sector, while Bank of America Merrill Lynch raised China Gas to buy from neutral, saying it will improve the company’s sales after northeastern China begins to receive the new supply from 2018.
 raised its recommendation on Beijing Enterprises to buy from hold with a target price of HK$80.
 In 2008, the court found his allies guilty of vote buying, disbanding their party and banning another 30 executives, including then-Prime Minister Somchai Wongsawat, Thaksin’s brother-in-law.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- Goldman Sachs, which shifted its real estate focus to lending from buying properties after the financial crisis, completed fundraising for its second real estate credit pool at $42b.
 The company sold its Canadian coal businesses to two buyers for C$946 million ($869 million) last month.
 Bond buyers are paying up for rental-home securities partly because of their limited supply as investors search for relatively high-yielding notes, especially variable-rate debt that will benefit when Federal Reserve raises short-term borrowing costs, said Vishal Khanduja, a money manager at Calvert Investment Management Inc.
 Institutional investors, who went on a property-buying spree following a crash in prices that led to a foreclosure crisis, are bundling their rental homes into securities to recoup cash and earn higher returns on their residual investments with cheaper financing.
 “We’re very pleased with the ability to get a securitization done and lower our cost of capital, which will enhance our opportunities to buy attractive assets and enhance the returns to our stakeholders along the way,” American Homes Chief Executive Officer David Singelyn said.
 In today’s offering, potential buyers put in orders exceeding the amount of debt offered by between five and 15 times, depending on the class, he said.
 The firm started buying the shares in February and began talks with B/E management shortly therafter, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 While a sale of the company could yield as much as $120 a share, “we see this as less likely,” Strauss said, downgrading the company to the equivalent of hold from buy.
 Rubel rates B/E Aerospace a buy, while Nadol of JPMorgan downgraded it to the equivalent of a hold on May 13.
 Timken, SPX Founded in 1996, Relational buys stakes in companies it considers undervalued and then lobbies management and boards for changes to boost investor returns.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 agreed to buy for $291 billion earlier this year, is introducing the Moto E, an affordable smartphone aimed at emerging markets.
 The new Moto smartphones, which complement that strategy, will appeal to first-time smartphone buyers, Motorola said in a statement.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- Consumer confidence declined last week to the lowest level since November as Americans’ views of their finances and the buying climate weakened.
 A measure of personal finances retreated for the third time in four weeks, and a gauge of whether this is a good time to buy goods and services dropped to the lowest point since mid-February.
 An index of the buying climate dropped to 29 from 309, and a measure of consumers’ views on their personal finances fell to 495 from 508 the prior week.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Under its proposal, a group of states would set a price for carbon that would be added to the cost to buy and sell electricity on their regional wholesale market.
 The extra charge would be paid by the power generator to the grid operator, and then refunded to the utilities that buy the electricity.
 “There would be a price-premium on coal” when utilities buy electricity, Sue Tierney, a principal at the Analysis Group in Boston who wrote a paper on the mechanisms states could use to comply, said in an interview.
 Their initiative requires power plants of 25 megawatts or greater to participate, and lets them comply by buying pollution allowances to offset the carbon emitted.
 Best Bet While New Brunswick, New Jersey-based J&J has been pegged as a potential buyer for Smith & Nephew in the past, Canaccord Genuity Group Inc’s William Plovanic said a deal would be challenging because it would require divesting assets to appease regulators.
 “From an antitrust standpoint, it might become rather difficult for anybody else in orthopedics to buy them” other than Stryker, the analyst said in a phone interview.
 Ernie Knewitz, a spokesman for J&J, said the company doesn’t comment on speculation, when asked whether it’s interested in buying Smith & Nephew.
 The Fed is unwinding the QE bond-buying program it has used to hold down longer-term borrowing costs and spur growth.
 President Frederic Cumenal’s “new energy and ideas for the business are helping business, too” Schick recommends buying the shares.
 The company remains open to further engagement from the buyout firm or other investors, Chief Executive Officer Mike Clarke told a conference call after the market closed.
 “There’s certainly buyers for their assets” The company was spun off from Foster’s Group Ltd.
 “He didn’t always buy the priciest properties.
 He never sold anything” He’s still buying -- and a sale of the Clippers would bring hundreds of millions of dollars to buy even more.
 Rent Growth “The Westside is very pricey, but it does make sense to buy there still because you’re seeing a lot of rent growth,” Palmer said.
 While Sterling may be able to afford to buy more if he sells the Clippers, he probably won’t always get a warm reception, said Dean Zander, a senior partner at Hendricks-Berkadia, the apartment investment-banking unit of Berkadia Commercial Mortgage LLC.
 He owns some high-profile communities throughout better parts of Los Angeles and is a natural buyer for these assets.
 The company is also buying back stock for the first time in five years.
 “President Toyoda’s comments that ‘we intend to continue paying dividends in a stable and sustainable manner,’ plus the addition of buybacks suggests that Toyota is taking shareholder returns seriously, which we welcome,” said Ben Williams, a London-based fund manager at GAM (UK) Ltd, which oversees about $300 million in Japanese equities.
 Deflation Goal Even as equities slump, Abe remains on target to achieve his goal of ending deflation, Nobuyuki Hirano, chairman of the Japanese Bankers Association, said in an interview in March.
 Lending profits are constrained by interest rates kept low by a Bank of Japan program, unveiled in April 2013, of buying about 7 trillion yen of bonds a month.
 Mitsubishi UFJ purchased Thai lender Bank of Ayudhya Pcl for about $5 billion in December, its biggest acquisition in Asia outside of Japan, and Sumitomo Mitsui agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion last May.
 nuclear operator, on its agreement to buy Pepco Holdings Inc.
 for opportunities to buy discarded assets.
 “We see this as maybe a potential opportunity in the gold space” Barrick, the world’s biggest gold producer, discussed buying Newmont, the second-largest, last month before both companies said April 28 talks were terminated and exchanged a series of statements accusing each other of scuppering the deal.
 Eduardo Cortes, who helps manage $16 billion of debt at GIA Partners LLC, including America Movil dollar bonds, said he’s unlikely to buy the peso securities because their performance is too dependent on swings in the exchange rate.
 Samsung is counting on the Galaxy S5, which went on sale March 27 in South Korea, as its marquee device to compete with Apple for high-end shoppers and with Chinese producers that target budget buyers.
 Measures to coordinate incentives for buyers of ZEVs were a missing component when the states, which account for about a quarter of US.
 That compares with an industry average of 23, while John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc, which is also buying European cable assets, has a debt-to-Ebitda ratio of 56.
 While BSkyB may have more room to maneuver than its peers, the company will probably cut back on spending its cash by discontinuing share buybacks, Pollock said.
 and Fox businesses, attempted to buy the remaining 61 percent of BSkyB.
 Debt Load Caesars has been struggling under the debt load taken on in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo and TPG in 2008.
 That growing affluence is spurring more imports of Western brands to China, the world’s biggest buyer of luxury goods in 2012, employing sommeliers in wine shops and prompting the opening of more Carrefour supermarkets.
 Tighter Spreads “In the supranational and sovereign-backed space, there have been opportunities at different points on the curve that appeal to different types of buyer,” said Citigroup’s Arnold, one of the managers on the ADB transaction.
 said it’ll buy back as much as 60 billion yen ($589 million) of its stock, the most in seven years, joining Mitsui & Co.
 Japan’s biggest trader will buy back as many as 40 million shares, or about 24 percent of its stock outstanding, from tomorrow, according to a statement today.
 It’s a “good time” for a buyback after the company returned to positive cash flow last year, he said.
 Legg Mason that same month agreed to spend as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 Patrick’s administration requested $50 million in additional funding from the federal government in March for the Connector, and plans to buy technology from hCentive Inc, a Reston, Virginia-based company with products that are used by functional exchanges in Colorado and Kentucky, Iselin said.
 Officials in Maryland, whose exchange also failed, have asked for $45 million to buy replacement technology for their system to try to fix their system.
 The company will issue convertible preferred stock to Sycamore, giving it the right to buy as much as 5 percent of Aeropostale common stock at $725 a share, the closing price on March 12.
 Gonzalez, 59, is the odds-on favorite to succeed Zambrano, according to Garik Shmois, an analyst with Longbow Research, who recommends buying the cement maker’s American depositary receipts.
 Zambrano’s buying spree was capped by the $142 billion purchase of Rinker Group Ltd.
May 27 (Bloomberg) -- It’s easy to get caught up in the glossy numbers within Alibaba Group Holding Ltd’s IPO prospectus: 44 percent profit margins, 72 percent revenue growth, and 231 million active buyers last year.
 military won an end to a ban on buying Russian rocket engines as a federal judge said the purchases don’t violate sanctions stemming from Russia’s annexation of Crimea.
 Moutai Drops The People’s Bank of China told 15 lenders yesterday to “improve efficiency of service, give timely approval and distribution of mortgages to qualified buyers,” according to a statement posted on its website.
 It also urged lenders to give priority to families buying their first homes and to strengthen their monitoring of credit risks.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses in the US.
 locations in shopping malls, a response to changing buying patterns by moms, according to a statement yesterday.
 Meanwhile, Crescendo Partners has been pressing Aeropostale management for bigger changes, sending a letter in November demanding that the company find a buyer.
 A recent drop in borrowing costs and a loosening of credit conditions are poised to lure more buyers into the market and lift demand for builders.
 is pursuing an issue, both in part to pay for current or recent buyouts, according to people familiar with discussion with underwriters.
 I wouldn’t be surprised if this became a staple use of funds for the Canadian market” Canadian companies spent $356 billion to buy other firms this year, and $133 billion this quarter, on pace for the slowest quarter since the first three months of 2011, Bloomberg data show.
 Parkland spent at least $7102 million to buy 13 companies since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 AutoCanada Purchases Northern Frontier, formed in 2011 to “buy and build” an industrial and resource services business, is seeking to sell C$75 million of five-year notes to fund the purchase of a firm that provides water for industrial uses, according to another person who declined to named.
 Tecnologica SA to share costs, buying Alstom’s offshore wind business would eliminate a rival that was selected by Electricite de France SA for a 2 billion-euro ($27 billion) contract to supply three wind farms in the country.
 The potential buyer lost 65 percent to HK$386.
May 19 (Bloomberg) -- Dubai Islamic Bank will buy a 25 percent stake in Indonesia’s PT Bank Panin Syariah Tbk, the Islamic banking arm of PT Bank Panin, as part of the lender’s overseas expansion strategy.
 The Dubai-based bank, the oldest Sharia-complaint lender in the world, said at the start of the month that it was planning to buy a stake in a Indonesian bank as part of its strategy to expand into Asia and Africa.
 You sign a 20-year contract, agreeing to buy back the electricity your system generates at rates 20 percent to 30 percent below the local utility rates.
 By buying Nest, Google overnight gains an impressive position behind the power meter -- while getting data on the growing number of customers whose energy use is tracked online.
 BHP, the world’s largest mining company, is contracted to buy 12,000 tons a year and Jinchuan purchases 13,000 tons annually under its current contract.
 Nomura raised its rating on the stock to buy from neutral, citing expectations of a higher success rate for the company’s nano-drug delivery system formulations.
 Elizabeth Arden is relying on Goldman to contact private-equity firms and other potential buyers, a person familiar with the matter previously told Bloomberg.
 made the $5 billion investment in Bank of America in 2011, receiving preferred stock and warrants to buy 700 million shares for $714 apiece.
 In 2008, Buffett paid $5 billion for a preferred stake in Goldman Sachs and warrants to buy $5 billion of stock for $115 a share.
 Dropped Bid CFR, Chile’s biggest drug maker, called off its 128-billion rand cash and stock offer to buy Adcock on Feb.
 jumped 31 percent after reports that Rupert Murdoch’s British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc is in talks to buy European pay TV assets from Fox.
 agreed to buy it for about $66 billion including debt.
 BSkyB, 39 percent owned by Fox, said today it’s in talks to buy the Italian and German pay-TV assets of Fox.
 And withdrawals from individual retirement accounts have a broader set of exceptions to the penalty, including spending for higher education and first-time home-buying.
 The loan must be repaid within five years, unless the money was used to buy a primary residence.
 The proposed deal that piqued congressional interest this month was Pfizer Inc’s bid to buy AstraZeneca Plc, take advantage of the lower UK.
 made the $5 billion investment in Bank of America in 2011, receiving preferred stock and warrants to buy 700 million shares for $714 apiece.
 Bond buyers are less concerned about companies going bankrupt.
 Even though most Wall Street strategists predict that benchmark 10-year Treasury yields will rise by year-end as the Fed winds down its bond-buying program, they’ve been going the other way.
 That would depend on whether the funds used to buy it were community property.
 Alibaba agreed in April to buy mapping service AutoNavi Holdings Ltd.
 None recommend buying the stock.
 Before his death yesterday, Zambrano led Cemex on a $29 billion buying spree to build the biggest cement maker in the Americas.
 The next CEO will follow a man who transformed Monterrey, Mexico-based Cemex into a multinational corporation and then saw the company flirt with default after buying Rinker Group Ltd.
 Convertro Purchase Yesterday, AOL announced it would buy Convertro Inc, which helps marketers evaluate ad purchases, for $101 million, part of AOL’s continuing investment in ad technology.
 APA reached a deal with Envestra in December to buy the rest of the company after raising an earlier offer.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- China’s stocks rose, with a gauge of mainland shares traded in Hong Kong climbing the most in a week, as speculation that state-linked investors are buying equities overshadowed concern that the economy is slowing.
 In terms of injection of funds, it will increase holdings of big state-owned companies and buy index ETFs” Hong Kong’s Hang Seng Index ended little changed at 22,83652.
 To improve profitability, the brewer is selling more expensive beers and reducing costs in regions including Mexico, where it agreed to buy the rest of Corona maker Grupo Modelo SAB in 2012 for about $20 billion.
 Sips has a buy recommendation on the stock.
 While Panasonic will be the only cell supplier at the factory, Tesla may buy cells from other suppliers, Musk said, without elaborating.
 The delivery result “beat, but not by as much as people expected them to beat,” said Andrea James, an equity analyst at Dougherty & Co, who rates Tesla a buy.
 will exercise an option to buy closely held CardioMEMS after US.
 Jude initially took a 19 percent stake and the option to buy the remainder of CardioMEMS for $60 million in September 2010.
 Options are derivatives that give the right to buy or sell assets at a set price by a specific date.
 While the EU is still Turkey’s biggest market, the Middle East now buys almost quarter of its exports, more than doubling its share during the Erdogan decade.
 Saudi Arabia pulled out of talks to buy Turkish Anka drones, which would have been the first overseas sale of the aircraft, Cumhuriyet newspaper reported on March 18.
 ‘Going Eastward’ Qatar Islamic Bank is in talks to buy a stake in Turkey’s Asya Katilim Bankasi AS.
 central bank also imposed restrictions on the value of mortgages made available to foreign buyers.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- Atlas Mara Co-Nvest Ltd, the investment firm backed by Robert Diamond, agreed to buy a 77 percent stake in the commercial arm of the Development Bank of Rwanda from the government to expand in East Africa.
 In March, Atlas agreed to buy Sub-Saharan African bank ABC Holdings Ltd.
 Sixteen of 18 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg have either a buy or hold rating on Mexichem’s shares.
 The company’s digital business “growth is exponential,” Canaccord analyst Aravinda Galappatthige, who rates DHX a buy with a price target of C$670, said in a phone interview.
 Investors have been buying bonds of peripheral euro-area nations amid confidence the ECB will step in to support the debt should the region’s recovery falter.
 “In Europe we’ve now got Italy and Spain both through 3 percent on 10 years, mainly on the back of expectations the ECB is going to go in and buy,” Bill Blain, a London-based strategist at Mint Partners Ltd, said in an interview on Bloomberg Television’s “On The Move” with Francine Lacqua.
 “The ECB is not going to go in and buy.
 What they’ve done is the typical ECB thing of saying we’ll think about buying and planning it so the market then assumes it’s going to happen” German government securities returned 32 percent this year through yesterday, according to Bloomberg World Bond Indexes.
 He told his family office to buy land -- a bare patch of hillside that he named Decero, or Spanish for “from scratch” “It’s the only place I know where you are the total master of your destiny,” he said of the vineyard.
 natural gas producer, must pay $121 million to three Texas lease holders after failing to persuade an appeals court to overturn a verdict that it reneged on deals to buy mineral rights when prices plunged in 2008.
 have seen buy ratings reduced after 10 months of advances boosted valuations in the Standard & Poor’s/TSX Composite Index to a three-year high.
 “You’re simply not going to have as many buys at the top of the market as you would in a market a year ago when things looked like they were underperforming” Analysts are tamping down expectations for further gains as stocks trade at 20 times reported earnings, up 26 percent from the end of June and higher than the price-to-earnings ratio of 17 for equities in the S&P 500.
 Fewer Buys While buy ratings still outpace sells and holds on the S&P/TSX, the number of sell and hold ratings has increased 11 percent since the rally started at the end of June, while buy recommendations fell 17 percent, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The shift has left the average stock in the index with a rating of 388, based on a Bloomberg system that assigns each sell a 1, each hold a 3 and each buy a 5.
 to cut his recommendation to hold from buy on May 5.
May 19 (Bloomberg) -- African Bank Investments Ltd, which reported a record first-half loss, is finding buyers for its debt among investors betting the South African lender’s fortunes will improve as the economy rebounds.
 Should enough bondholders stop buying, “then you create a liquidity squeeze and you shoot yourself in the foot,” said Wood.
 An inventory shortage, tight lending standards and higher prices and mortgage rates have caused some would-be homebuyers to hold back as the key spring selling season begins.
 “The challenges of low inventory at the first-time homebuyer and move-up buyer levels are compounded by tough credit underwriting and the effects of a sluggish economy, which we believe has slowed demand” The company said it expects transaction customers to decline 5 percent to 7 percent in the second quarter from a year earlier for the franchise and NRT units combined.
 One of those techniques is known as a call spread, when a trader buys options at one strike price and offsets the cost by selling contracts with a higher strike price.
 “Considering the workforce in the future, increasing women’s participation is an important measure in Japan,” said Nobuyuki Hirano, chairman of the Japanese Bankers Association who’s also president of Mitsubishi UFJ, in a March interview.
 He moved to London to be global head of fixed-income sales and trading for UBS the following year and offered to buy a controlling stake in the Swiss bank during the 2008 financial crisis.
 “I won’t buy at these rates,” Kara, 41, said.
 “If you buy an apartment at 250,000 liras today, you may sell it at 300,000 a year later,” Baskalem said.
 That would depend on whether the funds used to buy it were community property.
 It’s impossible for most investors to pick the right moment to buy and sell shares and during the past two years, the market has quickly rebounded from any decline.
 “Any time you’ve stepped out of the market with the intent to buy it lower, it’s been a very, very challenging thing to do” In the past year, the S&P 500 declined 48 percent from June 18 to June 24, slipped 58 percent from Jan.
 Applied Materials is seeking to capture more market share after agreeing to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 In response to a question on Wal-Mart buying 3-D printing companies, McMillon said it might make sense “in some cases” More generally, the retailer is planning to ramp up acquisitions and partnerships, he said.
 Fed officials dialed back their unprecedented bond-buying program yesterday as the looked beyond the first-quarter slowdown in growth.
 The central bank said the economy is gaining momentum as consumers spend more as they pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, the Federal Open Market Committee statement showed following a two-day meeting in Washington.
 In one May 2001 call, Obus told SunSource’s chief executive officer that “a little birdie” at GE Capital told him about the company’s planned sale to a “financial buyer,” the SEC said.
 announced it was buying the company, a maker of nuts, bolts and key-cutting equipment.
 “The concept is appealing, marketing has been terrific, and reviews have been sensational, which will make ticket buyers feel like their money will not be wasted,” Gitesh Pandya, chief executive officer of Boxofficegurucom, said on his website.
 In December 2012, ICE said it would buy the company and spin off Euronext after completion.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA led an advance of raw-material producers, rallying 37 percent after announcing a plan to buy back shares.
 Reckitt, which dropped out of the race to buy Merck’s assets, will “continue to be a predator,” Scheske said.
 agreed to buy the portion of the Hotel del Coronado it doesn’t already own from joint-venture partner Blackstone Group LP in a deal that values the property at $787 million.
 Jefferies Group LLC cut its rating on the UK’s biggest grocer to hold from buy.
 will buy 38 billion cubic meters of piped gas annually over 30 years from OAO Gazprom’s fields in eastern Siberia at a cost of about $400 billion in an agreement concluded May 21 after 10 years of talks.
 China purchased 186 million tons as the world’s third largest buyer of LNG in 2013, according to the International Group of LNG Importers.
 “In South Korea, a lot of the end-users want to buy their own LNG and not go through Korea Gas Corp, so there may not be room for a lot of of long-term contracts,” according to Fesharaki.
 “Japan’s LNG demand will peak at about 91 million tons, with contract volumes of 25 million tons up for renewal” LNG sellers will have to be less picky and amend their contract formulas as buyers have more options, said Milo Sjardin, an analyst from Bloomberg New Energy Finance.
 Calls giving owners the right to buy Yahoo’s shares are near the most expensive level ever relative to puts, according to data on six-month options compiled by Bloomberg.
 “There’s definitely a cash allocation risk” The infusion of cash from the Alibaba IPO may support further deals and share buybacks, according to Youssef Squali, global head of Internet and media research at Cantor Fitzgerald LP.
 The bank has a buy rating on the stock.
 ‘Buyer’s Remorse’ Lawyers for spill victims have accused BP of “buyer’s remorse” and trying to renege on a settlement that is proving more costly than anticipated.
 recommended buying shares in commodity producers as demand from Chinese industry recovers.
 BSkyB lost 24 percent after saying it has held talks to buy the German and Italian pay-TV assets of 21st Century Fox Inc.
 Commodity Producers Twelve out of 14 members of the FTSE 350 Mining Index advanced today after JPMorgan raised its rating to overweight from underweight, meaning that investors should buy shares in commodity producers.
 raised the UK’s largest oil-and-gas engineer to buy from hold after the shares tumbled 20 percent last week.
 The mortgage insurer announced this week that it had agreed to buy Clayton for $305 million to expand outsourcing services for the home-lending industry.
 are competing for buyers in the world’s most-expensive housing market as the government’s curbing measures cooled prices and transaction volume.
 Sales at City Point may also benefit from an adjustment in the double stamp duty, which extends the time local buyers have to sell their existing homes to qualify for a refund of the additional tax.
 The steady returns offered by the regulated power assets could attract buyers such as State Grid Corp.
 agreed to buy a 98-year lease for the Port of Newcastle, the world’s biggest export harbor for coal.
 “There’s no doubt buyers will be interested,” said Neil McDermott, who runs Sydney-based corporate advisory business Asian Capital Investments Holdings and has advised bidders or governments selling assets in every Australian state.
 The returns also may attract China’s State Grid, which last year agreed to buy almost 20 percent of Australian power company SP AusNet, said Adrian Atkins, a Sydney-based analyst at Morningstar.
 Appeasing Shareholders Munich Re has been increasing dividends and share buybacks to appease investors including Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, which owns an 112 percent stake, as prices fall and interest rates are stuck at record lows.
 “There’s an incentive to convert and some holders have” Dana Gas stock soared about 70 percent in the past 12 months, helping prompt investors to buy bonds to exchange for equities, as the company boosted cash flow from Egypt and began arbitration against the government of Iraqi Kurdistan to recover more than $400 million.
 Rabobank International recommends investors buy Spanish 10-year bonds versus Germany’s at current spread levels with a target of 1 percentage point and an order to exit the trade if the yield difference widens to 175 percentage points, analysts including the London-based head of rates strategy Richard McGuire, wrote in a client note today.
May 26 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co, seeking France’s approval for its $17 billion bid to buy Alstom SA’s energy division, pledged to keep the power-equipment maker’s nuclear operations in the country.
 French President Francois Hollande and Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg have called on GE to improve its offer to buy Alstom, which is based in the Paris suburb of Levallois-Perret.
 UBS will have to use extra capital for dividends and share buybacks, otherwise they’ll never make the target for a 15 percent return on equity” Higher Earnings UBS advanced as much as 21 percent in Zurich trading, and was up 1 percent to 1846 francs by 12:04 pm.
May 9 (Bloomberg) -- A patent-buying venture that includes Apple Inc, Microsoft Corp.
 The Frankfurt-based bank initially marketed about $4 billion of additional Tier 1 bonds in dollars, euros and pounds that it can buy back after six, eight and 12 years, a person familiar with the transaction said.
 The transactions came as Temasek in March agreed to buy a 25 percent stake in Hong Kong-based Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s retail arm AS.
 “You had to buy lots of quality paper, the ink, the printing press.
 The Secret Service unraveled a much larger counterfeiting scheme in the months after a convicted armed robber was caught in 2012 trying to use 10 fake $100 bills to buy a Dell laptop at a Brandsmart Store in West Palm Beach.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG said European shipping lenders may accelerate sales of distressed loans to buyers such as US.
 “There is no shortage of buyers” Private-equity firms pumped more than $72 billion into the industry in 2013, according to Marine Money, a shipping newsletter.
 to buy for $45 billion.
 Freedom is boosting its mortgage volumes partly by buying loans from other lenders, an effort Middleman says is really about expanding its business of collecting payments and handling other work over the life of the debt.
 By helping originate the mortgages, he gets the asset more cheaply than by buying it, he said.
 A large source of Freedom’s volume gains this year have come from its correspondent business, in which it buys closed loans from other lenders.
 “You can buy these and think interest rates will never go lower, I can’t tell you how many times I’ve heard that,” Middleman said.
 are among buyers of the nation’s crop.
 The crackdown is aimed at stopping gamblers from illegally using the devices in casino resorts to get cash for chips without buying anything, police said in an e-mailed statement.
 Goldman Sachs cut its rating on the stock to neutral from buy, saying potential acquirers of Vodafone, such as AT&T Inc, SoftBank Corp.
 raised their ratings on the stock to hold from sell, while OCBC Investment Research and AmResearch upgraded to buy from hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Koch Industries Inc, the holding company controlled by billionaire brothers Charles and David Koch, agreed to buy PetroLogistics LP for about $21 billion including debt to gain raw materials used to make plastics.
May 2 (Bloomberg) -- Skechers USA Inc’s push to become a legitimate sports-shoe brand now may include buying a piece of the Los Angeles Clippers.
 The company, based in the Los Angeles suburb of Manhattan Beach, said today it may lead a group to buy part of the National Basketball Association team.
 The stock dropped on the company’s interest in the Clippers because buying a stake would likely mean taking money from its robust advertising budget, said Poser, who recommends buying the shares.
 announced its plans to buy London-based AstraZeneca Plc and become a British company.
 A buyer confused about currency conversions asked that bidding restart after the daffodil-yellow diamond was pulled from the sale late last night, said Catherine Allen, a spokeswoman for the auction house.
 The event also set per-carat records for fancy pink diamonds and round colorless diamonds, as gems of those colors were sold for $73 million and $62 million respectively, including the buyer’s premium.
 Including the buyer’s premium, the price was 145 million francs.
 RTL Group SA rose 23 percent after Societe Generale SA recommended investors buy shares in the broadcaster.
 The benchmark rallied the most this month yesterday as Sky Deutschland AG climbed after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc started talks to buy the broadcaster of Bundesliga soccer games.
 Societe Generale upgraded its recommendation to buy from hold, predicting that the broadcaster will pay a special dividend.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- Dubai Islamic Bank is in talks to buy a 40 percent stake in an Indonesian Islamic bank as it seeks expansion abroad.
 The swap contracts pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities if a borrower fails to meet its debt agreements.
 The aim? Lock in customers by incentivizing them with loyalty points to buy everything from mortgages to grapes from the Cheshunt, England-based retailer.
 The Hudl comes with a raft of Tesco apps to encourage users to buy everything from new release movies and e-books via Tesco’s BlinkBox to its F&F clothing and then pay off their mortgage via a Tesco home loan.
 It’s the reason why Clarke bets someone would buy Disney’s “Frozen” from Blinkbox for the same price as Amazon.
 The crackdown is aimed at stopping gamblers from illegally using the devices in casino resorts to get cash for chips without buying anything, police said in an e-mailed statement.
 Users can still obtain Macau currency beyond the legal limit through pawnshops that let customers use UnionPay cards to buy watches, which the stores then repurchase.
 Analysts have a total of five sell ratings and 132 buy recommendations on the six casino companies.
 Buffett told shareholders this month that his company is looking for a large takeover with 3G Capital, the buyout firm he teamed up with last year for the acquisition of ketchup maker HJ.
 To counter a drop in cereal sales as consumers opt for protein-laden breakfasts, Kellogg will invest money educating buyers about the proteins present in milk and cereal, Chief Executive Officer John Bryant said in a conference call on May 1.
 said yesterday it will buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 “Usually such a surge in nickel prices triggers a strong speculative buying wave.
 electricity producer, is providing power to 50 residential and commercial users in Vermont who agreed to buy all the output from a local solar farm.
 The customers signed 10-year contracts to buy the electricity.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Nova Scotia agreed to buy a 20 percent stake in Canadian Tire Corp’s financial-services business for C$500 million ($460 million) in cash, giving it access to the retailer’s customers.
 Canadian banks have spent more than C$20 billion in the past five years buying credit-card balances and striking alliances with retailers, including Toronto-Dominion Bank’s deal with Target Corp.
 The assets are attracting buyers because of their relative safety and steady cash flows.
 who rates the stock the equivalent of buy, wrote in a note today.
 Nippon Steel & Sumitomo will pare costs by buying more low-grade coal and iron ore, the key raw materials used to make steel, and from benefits of the merger.
 Gundlach, the chief executive officer of DoubleLine Capital LP, and Zell, chairman of landlord Equity Residential, predict fewer young people will buy homes, further driving down the US.
 People may just rent longer than they otherwise would have before eventually buying” Miller, portfolio manager since 1999 of the $21 billion Legg Mason Opportunity Trust at LMM LLC, is bullish on housing even as Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen raises concerns about the economic impact of slowing sales.
 And earlier this week, the Federal Housing Finance Agency, which oversees the two government-backed mortgage companies, unveiled plans to spur lending by reducing the risk to banks of having to buy back loans that default.
 ‘Uninterested Buyers’ “You have a huge fraction of 18- to 34-year-olds who are unemployed and they also are much less interested in homebuying,” Gundlach said May 6 during an interview with Matthew Winkler, editor-in-chief of Bloomberg News, in New York.
 It will again profit as originations return and it buys more servicing rights from banks, according to Miller.
 Miller started buying shares of the Lewisville, Texas-based servicer at the end of last year.
 Are you wed to everything you hold? Are there any bonds you feel are missing? With summer approaching fast in the US, your window of opportunity to cull the unwanted and buy the securities you desire without the hassle of having to scour the market for a counterparty is about to close.
 Bond offerings have been met by feeding frenzies of investors seeking riskier assets, who’ve been tripping over each other to buy and are largely unwilling to sell once they’ve gotten a piece.
 So, there is a time to sell, and a time to buy.
 “We expect mortgages to be a good amount cheaper than they are today after the Fed’s done buying, but with originations likely to stay slow,” yield premiums will increase more gradually.
 After a surge in interest rates last year killed a homeowner refinancing wave, mortgage bankers expected the housing recovery would temper the slowdown with increased demand from property buyers.
 Issuance of US-backed mortgage bonds is set to fall to less than $843 billion this year, about $450 billion lower than the 14-year average, American Capital Agency Corp, the second-largest real-estate investment trust that buys mortgage debt, said in an investor presentation that cited a Morgan Stanley forecast.
 The lending slowdown has been fueled by an uneven economic rebound, higher rates, tight credit, rising home prices and more cases where investors are buying properties with cash.
 The finances of potential first-time buyers are also improving more slowly than other Americans.
 “While this admittedly helps the supply/demand balance modestly later in the year, it doesn’t change the fact that the scales will tip negative” between the Fed’s buying and net issuance by August, the analysts wrote.
 Chinese video sites, including Baidu Inc’s IQiyi, have been aggressively buying copyrights to licensed content to win advertisers and paying members as China’s 618 million Web users search for entertainment.
 “We have provided resources to the other talented professionals at Batterymarch and thank them for their professionalism during this transition time” Legg Mason is spending as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, which split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010, according to a regulatory filing in March.
 department-store company, maintained its annual profit forecast and increased its share buyback program after cost cuts helped it cope with a first quarter marked by weak shopper traffic.
 We believe Macy’s is well-positioned as a dominant apparel retailer and in a better position than most to gain market share” He recommends buying the shares.
 The Tennessee Valley Authority has agreed to buy electricity from the pair of 16-megawatt projects in McNairy County under a long-term contract.
 recommended buying the shares.
 “There aren’t any reasons to buy Japanese shares at the moment, so investors are excessively reactive to movements in the yen,” said Masaru Hamasaki, a Tokyo-based senior strategist at Sumitomo Mitsui Asset Management Co.
 The company said today it will boost its dividend and buy back shares as it targets net income of 18 billion yen this fiscal year.
 ‘Stripping Airplanes’ It can continue to try to sell off real estate, though some of it may not be seen as desirable locations, and it’s also difficult to find buyers for big-box stores as retailers cut down on square footage, Meyer said.
 “It’s the same as buy therumor and sell the fact” Egypt’s benchmark EGX30 Index was little changed at 1:21pm.
 The company agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity business for $35 billion.
 An acquisition became more likely after Zimmer’s agreement to buy Biomet changed the landscape “pretty dramatically,” Clive said in an e-mail.
 The move to expand the board and appease shareholders could give the retailer more time to execute its turnaround strategy, rather than having a strategic or financial buyer step in, Mizuho’s Chen said.
 The German government abandoned the Depfa sale plans after months considering bids from potential buyers.
 “That needs to be addressed immediately if investment is to be reestablished” The call comes weeks before the commission is set to decide on the combinations of Telefonica SA’s German unit with Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus and Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s bid to buy Telefonica’s Irish unit.
 Vodafone and SFR, the French operator that billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Numericable Group SA agreed to buy last month, extended an alliance today to provide fixed and mobile services for multinational businesses in France.
 The talks follow Comcast Corp’s agreement this year to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The Los Angeles-based firm derives 78 percent of revenue from management fees provided to the firm for advising funds, a more predictable stream of income than incentive-based fees, which are typically produced in lumpy intervals for buyout managers.
 The higher proportion of management fees is reflective of Ares’s emphasis on credit rather than on leveraged buyouts, which produce earnings in less predictable intervals.
 While action by the ECB will probably fall short of buying government bonds, “negative rates and a new search for yield will have a huge positive impact” on short-term securities in the region, said Owen Callan, an analyst at Danske Bank A/S in Dublin.
 UBS AG raised its rating on the lender to buy from neutral, saying its valuation is attractive and the bank will benefit from an improving Irish economy as retail and commercial lending activity pick up.
 gained 25 percent to 204 pounds as the company agreed to buy assets from Orascom Development Holding AG.
 “We have seen international institutional investors buying these names” Masraf Al Rayan surged 10 percent to 5730 riyals, the highest level on record, in more than four times the three-month average daily volume.
 He has spent $150,000 buying and renovating 10 foreclosed houses in the past two years and turned them into rentals.
 “I like buying with cash, because then I can control my investments” Investors like Leffel helped spur all-cash home purchases to a record 43 percent of US.
 “The cash buyers today mean that all is not well in the housing market,” said Clifford Rossi, finance professor at the University of Maryland’s Robert H.
 “First-time home buyers should make up 40 percent and we’re not seeing it because of mortgage rules” US.
 Small Investors Smaller investors, who deploy cash for homes to rent, flip, or vacation in, are finding better deals now that institutions have pared buying foreclosures, said RealtyTrac Vice President Daren Blomquist.
 In Manhattan, buyers are using cash for trophy apartments and to gain an advantage over borrowers who must depend on loans to finance a purchase.
 Pej Barlavi, owner of brokerage Barlavi Realty LLC in Manhattan, said three of his five current clients buying homes prevailed with all-cash offers.
 Barlavi said two of them are hedge fund managers who used year-end bonuses to buy the properties: a $22 million two-bedroom apartment in Midtown, selling for $150,000 above the asking price; and $15 million for a one-bedroom in Tribeca.
 His client in the second transaction was “nudged higher by a foreign buyer” before being chosen by the seller, Barlavi said.
 Foreign Buyers “In Manhattan, you have foreign buyers coming in and using properties as a second, third, fourth or fifth home and hedging risks in their home countries,” said Chris Mayer, a real estate professor at Columbia University Business School in New York.
 Private-equity firms, hedge funds and other institutional investors have spent more than $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 rental homes in the last two years.
 “As institutional investors pull back their purchasing in many markets across the country, there is still strong demand from other cash buyers, including individual investors, second-home buyers and even owner-occupant buyers,” RealtyTrac’s Blomquist said.
 The 422 percent average rate for a 30-year fixed mortgage on May 6 rose from 353 percent a year ago, following the Federal Reserve’s announced plan to taper its bond buying, according to Bankratecom.
 Wells Fargo “The increase in all-cash purchases is partly because rates are higher than they were a year ago, so it’s made buying with a mortgage more expensive on top of home price increases,” said Jed Kolko, chief economist at real-estate information service Trulia Inc.
 First-time buyers in particular are struggling to get home loans.
 Without these buyers, existing-home sales are declining.
 “With fewer first-time buyers, you end up with more all-cash buyers and less trading up in home activity,” said Columbia’s Mayer.
 Whirlpool reported first-quarter sales of $436 billion, surpassing analysts’ estimates, as a rebound in March made up for soft demand in January and February caused by “extreme weather” Fed officials dialed back their unprecedented bond-buying yesterday as they looked beyond the first-quarter slowdown.
 Citing positive economic momentum and improved consumer spending, the central bank pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth-straight $10 billion cut.
 The shares plunged by 64 percent to the lowest level in more than three months on March 28, the day after Yahoo Japan said it had agreed to buy eAccess.
May 23 (Bloomberg) -- Nordstrom Inc, which is exploring a sale of its store-branded credit cards, has begun reaching out to potential buyers including Capital One Financial Corp.
 Nordstrom is informally canvassing buyers of the $2 billion portfolio of credit card receivables and hasn’t yet set a date to solicit initial offers, said one of the people.
 in getting rid of store-branded card portfolios, which banks are interested in buying.
 Outflows Limited “Net foreign trading for us appears to be flat, while local funds are net buyers,” he said.
 in buying Irish real estate assets, Danske Bank is exiting businesses there to stanch losses in the country.
 “It gives an institutional buyer a platform to run a professional landlord business” About 60 percent of the properties are in Dublin and the rest are across Ireland.
 About 27 percent of 145,530 buy-to-let mortgages outstanding at the end of 2013 were in arrears, according to the Ireland’s central bank.
 to buy for $45 billion.
 Lawyers for the joint venture that Microsoft, Apple and Sony formed to buy the patents in 2011, Rockstar Consortium Inc, will be following the trial along with Ericsson AB, which bought Nortel’s wireless unit for $1 billion.
 Falcone, 51, accused Ergen of trying to game the bankruptcy process to get a lower price and of secretly buying debt that LightSquared rivals weren’t permitted to own.
 Chapman said Ergen concealed his identity in buying LightSquared debt and wasn’t credible when he blamed a technical issue for dropping his airwave offer.
 in New York State Supreme Court in Manhattan in January 2012 claiming the bank secretly chose the riskiest mortgages for sale in CDOs while buying credit default swaps to bet against them.
 Citigroup had argued the fraud claim should be dismissed because Loreley hasn’t shown that it relied on bank documents to buy the securities.
 “We’ve got far more consumers that have held off for five years to make that decision about buying or moving,” Chief Executive Officer Mark Clare said by phone.
 The recent TV spots are designed to educate consumers to come to Groupon when they want to buy anything, any time, anywhere.
 The company said it will buy back $100 million worth of shares.
 ’Attractive Fundamentals’ Echo He, an analyst at Maxim Group LLC, maintains her buy rating on YY, saying the company’s growing market position will help improve its pricing power and boost revenue.
 Deutsche Bank AG’s analysts said the earnings results were “solid,” keeping their buy rating.
 Capital LLC, which follows US-listed Chinese companies and recommends buying Ctrip, said by phone from Beijing.
 The central bank decided at the session to pare bond purchases to $45 billion per month, while reiterating that it will keep the key interest-rate target at almost zero for a “considerable time” after concluding the bond-buying program.
 It would’ve made a lot more sense to buy that last sweet woody station wagon made by Dodge for less than three grand and drive away to someplace nice.
 So here are a few more freshly made-up rhymes for your consideration: • “Always remember to buy in November” This is the ying to the sell-in-May yang.
 Wack Nasdaq • “If you don’t think January is time to buy Nasdaq, you are wack” Best month by far for the Nasdaq Composite Index with an average 3 percent gain since 1971, twice the S&P 500’s advance, according to the Almanac.
 Buying Helicopters The company, which currently operates in Nigeria and Cameroon, plans to buy seven new helicopters and one fixed-wing aircraft by the third quarter to boost its aviation support services, Makanjuola said.
 Creditors including hedge funds and other investors stand to take over the units - some more than 40 years old - for cents on the dollar after KKR, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs lost billions on them in the biggest leveraged buyout in history.
 He’s the hero of the 2011 novel “The Shipping Man,” a New York hedge fund manager who becomes so captivated by wild swings in freight rates that he buys a dry-cargo carrier and sets off on an adventure leading to run-ins with Somali pirates and Greek tycoons.
 “Now is a great time to be buying these loans because there’s an oversupply,” Marc Lasry, co-founder and chief executive officer of Avenue Capital Group LLC, a New York-based company which oversees $136 billion including shipping debt, said by phone April 24.
 The book’s hero, Robert Fairchild, sums it up: “What was it about the international shipping business that was so appealing? Robert wondered as he listened to his former investor bemoan the fact that there weren’t enough shares for Eurkea! Capital to buy.
 The Federal Open Market Committee last week pared monthly asset buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely as the economy improves.
 mobile-phone carrier, is in talks to buy the satellite-television company, people with knowledge of the situation said.
 Late 2015 The Fed will likely end its bond buying program by November, and begin to raise the funds rate late in 2015, Gross said from Pimco’s headquarters in Newport Beach, California.
 Employee buyouts may add to restructuring costs, Katsura said.
 The CLO for the credit group of Canada’s largest buyout firm surpasses an $838 million fund for Symphony Asset Management LLC, issued earlier this month, according to Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc.
 Increasing regulatory and legislative scrutiny hasn’t curbed the market for CLOs as issuance of the deals that helped finance some of the biggest buyouts in history reached $441 billion this year, more than half of sales completed in all of 2013.
 The funds were the biggest buyers of junk-rated loans in the first quarter, increasing their market share to the most since 2006, according to the Loan Syndications and Trading Association.
 CLOs made up 58 percent of buyers of leveraged loans during the first three months of the year, an increase from 53 percent in 2013, the LSTA said in an April 23 report citing Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ Leveraged Commentary and Data.
 KDP’s Dwyer recommended against buying the securities at that price range.
 The “anti-Tesla” language was added to a state House bill that explicitly requires consumers to buy vehicles through franchise dealers, the company said in a statement.
 While Panasonic will be the only cell supplier at the factory, Tesla may buy cells from other suppliers, Musk said, without elaborating.
 didn’t buy back any of its own shares in 2013: The stock just wasn’t cheap enough.
 “If regulators let Comcast buy Time Warner Cable, there’s no reason they wouldn’t let AT&T buy DirecTV,” Entner said.
 rose 19 percent as the camera maker said it would buy back shares.
 The camera maker plans to buy back as many as 17 million shares between today and July 29, it said.
 Fed, ECB An April 2013 survey of 60 central banks by Central Banking Publications and Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc found that 23 percent either owned shares or planned to buy them.
 He rates the shares the equivalent of a buy with a 12-month price target of $75.
 Customers sign long-term contracts to buy the electricity.
 and Rio Tinto Group have invested billions of dollars to expand output, betting on sustained demand from China as economic expansion in the world’s biggest buyer slowed.
 “One of the keys to finding superior long-term investments is buying companies that will be able to stay one step ahead of their competitors, and it’s this characteristic -- think of it as the strength and sustainability of a firm’s competitive advantage -- that Morningstar is trying to capture with the economic moat rating,” according to the Chicago-based company.
 The company, run by hedge-fund manager Edward Lampert, has invested in online and is shutting stores and may seek buyers for its auto centers and Canadian unit.
 Canaport was the only major asset that Royal Dutch Shell Plc didn’t buy when it agreed to acquire Repsol’s worldwide LNG assets for about $44 billion in the same month.
 economic growth is gaining traction prompted the Federal Reserve to taper its $85 billion-a-month bond-buying program.
 “It’s a good, old-fashioned squeeze” as investors who bet on lower prices for Treasuries have been forced to buy them as the debt rallied, said David Ader, head of US.
 This week the company completed the C$946 million sale of its coal businesses in Canada to two buyers.
 The stock has seven buy and three hold recommendations with a 12-month price target of C$595, the average of nine analysts’ estimates according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 is shrugging off the impact of a 259 million small-car recall with new Chevy Silverado and GMC Sierra pickups that are luring buyers into dealerships as the weather warms and the US.
 Pickup sales were helped by pent-up demand coming out of January and February when bad winter weather kept buyers away from showrooms, suggesting contractors are feeling more confident about housing starts, Mark Wakefield, leader of AlixPartners LLP’s automotive practices in the Americas, said yesterday in a telephone interview.
 CYVA says EBay’s electronic broker, which “provides trusted processing of transactions, ensuring that the rules governing the buyers and sellers personal information are satisfied,” infringes one or more claims of the patent.
 The objective of the program is to let potential diamond buyers know the stones are Canadian-mined and conflict-free, according to the CBC.
 The securities’ appeal goes beyond their extra yield: The $94 billion corner of the market offers bonds that are easy to buy and sell in relatively large amounts.
 say that presents opportunity for buyers willing to hold the securities for decades.
 In the FHA lawsuit, filed in Manhattan federal court, the agency, which insures loans to help lower income individuals buy homes, alleged that it paid hundreds of millions of dollars on defaulted mortgages because Wells Fargo didn’t properly vet the origination of individual loans.
 Chinese investors are interested in buying a stake in Rosneft, Interfax reported, citing Finance Minister Anton Siluanov.
 Berkshire’s strategy has been to buy companies ranging from See’s Candies to the Burlington Northern Santa Fe railroad, keep their management and hold them forever.
 Fed Stimulus The Federal Open Market Committee pared its monthly asset-buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 The drugmaker being acquired by Actavis Plc agreed to buy Furiex Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Impulse Buying Amazon, the world’s largest online retailer, is working to take advantage of potential customers’ impulse-buying habits by making it easy to add items to their shopping carts without ever visiting Amazoncom.
 A Telesat purchase would come in two pieces: buying publicly traded Loral, which owns 63 percent of the company, and acquiring the rest from Canada’s Public Sector Pension Investment Board, which co-owns the satellite operator, the people said last month.
 The next-largest buyer, Korean Air Lines Co, ranked 31st in 2012, according to an International Air Transport Association study.
 Bombardier Aerospace President Guy Hachey said last week that a steady stream of would-be buyers to the company’s test facility in Mirabel, Quebec, will eventually result in sales.
 is the biggest buyer, with a firm order for 40 of the larger CS300 models that was announced in 2010.
 Beaudoin said he feels “very confident” that Bombardier will reach its goal of 300 CSeries orders by the time it enters commercial service next year, pointing to the 244 additional “commitments” the company has from buyers -- a figure that includes options and conditional agreements.
 Until flight tests are sufficiently advanced, Bombardier can’t guarantee would-be buyers that the CSeries will meet the advertised targets.
 made an unsolicited $62 billion bid to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 “One of the two companies is going to have free capacity to buy something and so the speculation obviously is rampant around Maple Leaf,” said Sam La Bell, a Toronto-based analyst at Veritas Investment Research.
 The government’s “mini-stimulus has not yet turned around the growth momentum,” and the government may ease credit by loosening restrictions on lending to homebuyers and local-government financing vehicles, Wang said.
 jumped by the most since October 2011 after the nation’s biggest commodities trader said it will buy back as much as 60 billion yen ($589 million) of its stock.
 jumped 65 percent to 1,938 yen after saying it will buy back as many as 40 million shares, or about 24 percent of its stock outstanding.
 agreed to buy for $291 billion earlier this year, will shutter the plant in Fort Worth by the end of the year, the company said in an e-mailed statement today.
 who prefer to buy locally made products.
 Foreign investors outside GCC countries can’t buy Saudi shares directly, and access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 Emboldened by improving bank creditworthiness, investors are eager to buy their higher-yielding debt after more than five years of near-zero interest rates from the Fed.
 The companies provide liquidity to the mortgage market by buying loans and packaging them into guaranteed securities.
 It cut monthly bond buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 jumped 64 percent in Tokyo after the consumer-electronics retailer said it will buy back shares.
 KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, offered S$14 billion ($11 billion) to buy the Singapore-based provider of bulk containers.
 Yamada Denki rose 64 percent to 399 yen in Tokyo after saying it will sell convertible bonds and use the proceeds to buy back shares.
 The company said its dividend will grow 10 percent to 15 percent this year and next, and there will be a share buyback program of about 300 million pounds both years.
 No company or brand could buy that kind of free exposure.
 Mobile Assets In April, Frontier agreed to buy 49 percent of Phoenix Aviation in Kenya for $14 million.
 Investcorp agreed to buy a majority stake in Esmalglass from 3i Group Plc in August 2012 in a deal valued at about 200 million euros, the people said.
 Risk Aversion “The good data is still being overwhelmed by risk aversion from geopolitical issues, strong demand for Treasuries from foreign buyers on a relative-value basis and the continued short squeeze that is still bringing buyers in,” said Dan Heckman, a senior fixed-income strategist in Kansas City, Missouri, at US.
 “Inflation hasn’t been a concern” A short squeeze is when traders are forced to buy back a security whose price is rising after they sold it short, betting the price would fall.
 Bond Purchases The central bank is scaling back the bond-buying program it has used to pump money into the economy amid signs growth is accelerating.
 An increased availability of cheaper properties, faster job and income growth, and a sustained drop in borrowing costs this year would help draw more buyers into the market.
 The increase showed signs of underlying softness, as investors continued to play a big role in the market and the share of first-time buyers was little changed.
 “Mortgage rates are near a seven-month low but recent comments from the Fed point to bank lending standards as a problem” The rise in borrowing costs eased in the second half of 2013, providing more incentive for buyers to come off the sidelines.
 are competing for buyers in the world’s most-expensive housing market as the government’s curbing measures cooled prices and transaction volume.
 Sales at City Point may also benefit from an adjustment in the double stamp duty, which extends the time local buyers have to sell their existing homes to qualify for a refund of the additional tax.
 Piraeus Bank SA jumped 65 percent to 148 euros as Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit upgraded its rating on the stock to buy from underperform, or sell.
 Alpha Bank AE advanced 5 percent to 63 euro cents as the brokerage raised its rating to buy from neutral.
 Renault’s no-frills Dacia nameplate has revamped the Duster sport-utility vehicle and Sandero hatchback, while the main brand of Boulogne-Billancourt, France-based Renault has attracted buyers with the Captur crossover brought out a year ago.
 The buyout firms still own the AA, as it’s known in the UK.
 The company is negotiating final details for a deal to buy local Web-access provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 Morgan Stanley’s brokerage, the world’s largest by number of advisers, didn’t distinguish in its policy between a client’s indication of interest in an IPO and a conditional request to buy, the industry-funded watchdog group said today in a statement.
 “Customers must understand when they are entering a contract to buy shares in an IPO,” Brad Bennett, Finra’s chief of enforcement, said in the statement.
 “There must not be ambiguity regarding the customer’s obligations given the significant legal differences between an indication of interest and a conditional offer to buy” Brokers often gauge clients’ interest in IPOs before the offering’s registration.
 Both retailers have also pulled back from opening more large supermarkets as shoppers increasingly buy their groceries online and top up at smaller convenience stores.
 ITV has an option to buy the remaining 20 percent of Leftfield after three years and the maximum consideration for the entire company is $800 million, including the initial payment.
 Deutsche Bank AG said last week European shipping lenders may accelerate sales of distressed loans to buyers such as US.
 He built a reputation in England for outperforming rivals by buying shares of the country’s biggest dividend-paying companies, including drugmakers AstraZeneca and GlaxoSmithKline Plc.
 who has a buy rating on Sotheby’s, wrote in a report today.
 Loeb had contended Sotheby’s decision to trigger the pill if activist investors buy more than 10 percent of its shares, while allowing passive investors to buy as much as 20 percent, was unfair.
May 1 (Bloomberg) -- Pfizer Inc’s $106 billion bid for AstraZeneca Plc faces increased resistance as the unwilling target’s chairman listed the reasons the offer was rejected and British lawmakers began efforts to block the buyout attempt.
 “We have a company which closed its operations in Sandwich for tax purposes and now says it’s buying a British company for tax purposes” If the bid goes ahead and is subject to a European Commission investigation, the UK.
 jumped to a record after Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in the company to develop its logistics in Southeast Asia.
 Information will go out to potential buyers in the next few weeks, they said.
 No Hesitation The NAACP’s interim president and CEO, Lorraine Miller, wrote in an e-mail that money “does not buy corporations a free pass if their actions run afoul of our mission.
 Since 2010, Pearson has spent $12 billion in Brazil buying English-language courses and learning systems and is now counting on organic growth to reach its targets.
 ‘Good Buy’ “Their asset-management business thinks it’s a good buy and that’s why they own it,” said Ian Nakamoto, director of research at MacDougall, MacDougall & MacTier Inc.
 The Fed, which announced its fourth straight $10 billion cut to stimulatory bond buying April 30, says the job market in the world’s largest economy is improving.
 increased 65 percent to A$409 in Sydney after the Australian newspaper said Pernod Ricard SA is interested in buying its US.
 to buy distressed assets from the Resolution Trust Corp.
 “It’s a bit tragic for the company to lose him,” said Mirko Maier, an analyst at Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg in Stuttgart, who recommends buying SAP shares.
 Greenhalgh, 50, formed Innervation Capital Partners, with Sotiris Lyritzis, a former managing director at buyout firm Summit Partners LP, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 “There is realistically no big threat from Cisco going internal until the end of 2015,” said Srivatsa, who has a buy rating on the stock and a $32 price target.
 Even after the retreat, the stock is not a buy to Barclays Plc, which said revenue from large customers like ZTE can be “lumpy” and unpredictable, according to a May 14 research note.
 “The stock already reflects 20 percent growth” Four out of nine analysts have a buy rating on EZchip, while the remaining five recommend holding the shares.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- If you can’t buy whole companies then buy bits and pieces of them.
 These so-called carve-outs are giving private-equity firms something to buy and clean up, at a time when leveraged buyouts of entire companies have all but stopped, as US.
 “In an environment where it’s difficult to pay a premium to buy publicly traded companies, divestitures are one of the most attractive deals for private equity,” said Chris Sullivan, head of the Americas financial sponsors group -- which is charged with advising private-equity firms on deals -- at Barclays Plc.
 Private-equity executives say they can increase the value of discarded assets more easily than companies bought whole or from other buyout firms.
 buyout group at Carlyle.
 Recent carve-out transactions include Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC’s agreement in February to buy Ashland Inc’s water technologies business for $18 billion, and TPG Capital’s deal to acquire energy company Encana Corp’s Jonah Field natural gas properties for $18 billion in March.
 PE Slump Private-equity transactions overall have fallen 22 percent to $53 billion through April, data compiled by Bloomberg show, led by the drop in buyouts of public companies.
 The value of those leveraged buyouts declined to $32 billion compared with an average of $34 billion in the 10 years through 2013.
 The peak for buyouts came before the financial crisis, when US.
 “The easy days for private-equity buyers are over when they profited from buying undervalued companies,” he said.
 PE’s Limits While high valuations haven’t scared off dealmaking between companies, buyout firms are motivated by different factors, said Gordon Caplan, chairman of the private-equity practice group at law firm Willkie Farr & Gallagher LLP.
 “If business growth slows, companies have to buy things,” he said.
 “Private-equity buyers can’t create synergies like company mergers can in most cases” Corporations are more willing to spin off divisions as management continues to clean up underperforming businesses and pay down debt following the financial crisis, said Tom Franco, a partner at Clayton Dubilier.
 announced in February that Carlyle agreed to buy its industrial packaging business for $32 billion after shareholder activist Relational Investors LLC pushed management to consider shrinking the business.
 is buying JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities business.
 “International trading companies have been buying assets all along, just not so much in America,” JP Fjeld-Hansen, managing director of Musket Corp, a commodity supplier and trading company in Houston, said April 29.
 energy markets and they’re bringing their capital here” The world’s biggest commodity merchants, most privately owned, are buying or building more physical assets in the US.
 “You don’t care whether prices go up or down because you know you can arb 50 cents out of this because of your supply arrangements” Trading companies are buying or building US.
 Mercuria is buying JPMorgan’s physical commodities business, giving the Larnaca, Cyprus-based company gas and power trading operations on both sides of the Atlantic.
 Houston-based Enron, which had a strategy of buying physical capacity and leveraging it in trades, declared bankruptcy in 2001 amid an accounting scandal.
 Hilliard, who has also brought a suit seeking damages for such losses, told Bloomberg he wants as much as $10 billion so customers can buy new vehicles.
 ambulatory surgery centers, agreed to buy Sheridan Healthcare for $235 billion to add the country’s biggest provider of anesthesia services.
 Ford, which yesterday announced plans to buy back $18 billion of its shares, saw its stock rise 23 percent to $1581 today at the close in New York.
 CEO Robert Benmosche has warned employees against buying homes in the New York area, people familiar with the matter said last year.
 Cavaricci pants of your youth? It was only your friend who wore those in the 1980s, right? So too goes the cool factor of car brands, a dynamic to which some buyers are keenly attuned.
 Perhaps you’re a buyer with other things to worry about.
 The Seoul-based company presented the Genesis as a competitor to Bayerische Motoren Werke AG’s BMW 5 Series, although in truth it more likely enticed buyers away from Honda Motor Co’s Acura and General Motors Co’s Cadillac.
 It may not be hip, but for many buyers it will be more than fancy pants enough.
 Flamand, 43, will invest globally, focusing on catalyst-driven trades related to corporate transactions such as mergers, share buybacks and bankruptcies, according to the statement.
May 19 (Bloomberg) -- Vodacom Group Ltd, the wireless operator with the most South African customers, agreed to buy local Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 Watson’s 2017 goal “still seems viable because they have a lot of big projects coming on,” said Stewart Glickman, an equity analyst at S&P Capital IQ in New York who rates Chevron a buy and doesn’t own any shares.
 investors would rather see their company hunted by a meat producer than buying up vegetable brands.
 That compares with a 32 percent drop on May 12, the day Hillshire offered to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, which makes Birds Eye frozen vegetables.
 Combining with a meat producer means more cost-cutting and supply chain benefits than buying Pinnacle Foods, according to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The price, while attractive, probably isn’t high enough to prevent other buyers from emerging, Shea said.
 The undated notes will convert to equity if the bank’s capital falls to 5125 percent of assets weighted by risk and the company has the right to buy them back after five years, the person said.
 “It’s an increasingly competitive landscape, with more sports networks, more hours on the air and new platforms,” said Tom McGovern, managing director of New York-based Optimum Sports, which buys media time for Dick’s Sporting Goods Inc.
 “It’s a way of appeasing a new group of incredibly huge investors that are dividend-oriented and don’t care much for buybacks” Yield-starved investors are clamoring for more cash as $511 billion of capital piled up at the 30 biggest US.
 While there are no immediate plans, it could happen “if we were still retaining capital above the level that we needed and the distribution between buybacks and dividends were such that we have the capacity” Chasing Yield A special dividend could be part of future capital planning, PNC Chief Executive Officer Bill Demchak said during an April conference call, adding that he’s discussed the concept informally with regulators.
 “At some point the regulators will have to say to the banks, ‘You’ve done good, you’ve fixed your internal system, you’ve raised enough capital, now we don’t have any restrictions on your excess capital’” Gross capital payouts including dividends and stock buybacks for the 23 biggest publicly traded US.
 Theoretically, banks could reallocate money from buybacks to special dividends without increasing the total capital payout.
 bank, got permission to buy back an additional $500 million shares for a total of $65 billion, and to raise its dividend by 2 cents.
 “Regulators are likely to be indifferent between special dividends and buybacks,” Bill Isaac, former chairman of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.
 Some stockholders prefer dividends because the benefits from buybacks are hard to quantify, according to McCormick.
 “I can’t spend a buyback.
 *** Remember at the start of the year, when the common wisdom was to buy stocks and sell bonds? Neither does the bond market.
May 14 (Bloomberg) -- Comcast Corp’s bid to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Sprint/T-Mobile Dish, which failed to buy Sprint last year, would be interested in acquiring T-Mobile if regulators block Sprint’s efforts, Ergen said.
 fails to win regulatory approval for its plan to buy T-Mobile, which is controlled by Deutsche Telekom AG, Ergen said last week.
 “We are well positioned strategically and financially for the changes that are going to develop” If AT&T buys DirecTV, the wireless giant could theoretically bundle its service with DirecTV’s video product, and in some areas of the country its U-verse high-speed broadband to the home, to compete with cable, said Amy Yong, an analyst at Macquarie Group in New York, in a note to clients.
 “When he brought Apple back from its near-death he didn’t use the profits from the new line of Macs or the iPods to buy Dell.
 “If there’s any price weakness, a slowdown in the Chinese economy, or a slowdown in demand for rare earths, than how long does it buy them? It’s hard to know” Lynas, the worst performer this year among a Bloomberg Index of 11 rare earths producers and explorers, said in March it would need more funds after its loss widened and with a $35 million repayment then scheduled by Sept.
 Erste Abwicklungsanstalt, the Dusseldorf-based agency that’s winding down WestLB’s assets, set a May 30 deadline for investors to signal their interest in buying Westdeutsche Immobilien Bank AG, EAA spokeswoman Marie Luise Hoffmann said by phone.
 “While the story of the company remains intact, they will likely suffer from foreign-exchange rate effects in the current quarter as well,” said Andres Bolumburu, an analyst at Banco de Sabadell SA in Madrid, who recommends investors buy Telefonica shares.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Consumer confidence last week suffered its biggest one-week drop since the federal government shutdown in October as attitudes toward the buying climate and personal finances soured.
 Buying Climate The buying climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, dropped to 322, the lowest since early April, from 345.
 Yields on bonds from Ireland to Spain fell to records this week amid speculation the European Central Bank will cut interest rates next month and may also introduce additional measures such as a longer-term refinancing operation or buying asset-backed securities.
 “People have broadly accepted the ECB are going to do something big, it’s just whether they do another LTRO or ABS buying on top of that.
 and buy assets in a policy known as quantitative easing.
 BDO funds will prepare to buy when the gauge falls to 6,600, he said.
 “There’s a lot of liquidity in the Philippines and if you use that up just to buy Philippine assets, they become overvalued very fast,” Abrogena said.
 producer of biodiesel from animal fats and grease, agreed to buy Tyson Foods Inc’s 50 percent stake in Dynamic Fuels LLC.
 “It’s unclear what changed since the April 23 conference call,” said Howard Rubel, an analyst at Jefferies LLC in New York who recommends buying the shares.
 “They seem to have gone in another direction; from the idea of buying to selling or finding another option to create value” B/E is “an attractive company, which has grown the business much faster than the market,” said Rubel, who declined to speculate on potential buyers in a note to clients today.
 State-run Abu Dhabi Investment Council also offered to buy the Astir Palace resort in Athens, WAM reported, while Abu Dhabi National Energy Co.
 The company sold stock in its outdoor unit during the quarter and accelerated its buybacks.
 The actions are giving CBS about $5 billion for buybacks and potential acquisitions.
 EON climbed 75 percent after RBC raised its recommendation on the shares to outperform, similar to buy, from underperform.
 Societe Generale SA cut its rating on France’s largest phone company to hold from buy, citing increased pressure to cut broadband prices.
 agreed to buy the Indian partner of Viacom Inc.
 In February, the company spent $18 billion to buy airwaves to compete with Vodafone Group Plc, the world’s No.
 buying Beats Electronics.
 As consumers shift away from buying, artists like Keating worry the newer subscription services will pay far less in royalties.
 Me and a lot of my music artist friends are worried about the switch from music buyers to music listeners” That’s also the dilemma for the recording industry, which is finding that streaming, while growing, isn’t making up for shrinking purchases, physical and online.
 Apple could also provide links that let interested listeners easily buy music they like, in much the same way conventional radio encouraged purchases over the years.
 ‘‘The addition of Beats will make our music lineup even better, from free streaming with iTunes Radio to a world-class subscription service in Beats, and of course buying music from the iTunes Store as customers have loved to do for years’’ Pandora Battle Tom Neumayr, a spokesman for Apple, didn’t return a phone call seeking additional comment.
 Transaction Capital last year sold its stake in unsecured lender Bayport Financial Services for 133 billion rand and sold Paycorp Holdings to buyout firm Actis LLP for 937 million rand.
 The company was told by the FBI in March 2009 that hackers had broken into the beverage maker’s computer systems and pilfered files related to its aborted plan to buy China Huiyan Juice Group for $24 billion, according to three people familiar with the situation and an internal company document, Bloomberg News reported in 2012.
 agreed to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Hillshire, which had about $4 billion in revenue in fiscal year 2013, agreed to buy Van’s Natural Foods for about $165 million last month.
 The company intends to maintain its current annual dividend as it undertakes the merger, though it will suspend a stock buyback program.
 debt tumbled on speculation a strengthening economy would prompt the Fed to taper bond-buying.
 The long bonds gained as pension funds continued to buy the securities after their yield reached as high as 347 percent following the payrolls report, said David Ader, head of US.
 The Fed said it will keep the benchmark interest rate close to zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends.
 Pilgrim’s and JBS were puzzled by Hillshire’s agreement to buy Pinnacle because they believed the deal’s promised cost savings were aggressive -- especially considering Pinnacle’s private-equity owners had already made cuts, according to the person.
 Amid the seizure of Bangkok’s airports by anti-government protesters in 2008, the Constitutional Court found Thaksin’s allies guilty of vote buying, disbanding their party and banning another 30 executives, including then-Prime Minister Somchai Wongsawat, Thaksin’s brother-in-law.
 He recommends buying Tronox shares and doesn’t rate DuPont.
 agreed to buy its outstanding shares as part of a takeover of Latin American drugstores.
 Hilliard, who has brought a lawsuit seeking economic damages, wants as much as $10 billion so his clients can buy new vehicles.
 The agreement, announced last month, will allow overseas investors to buy mainland shares through Hong Kong, while wealthy individuals will be allowed to buy Hong Kong equities through the Shanghai exchange.
 It cut monthly bond buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 The Hong Kong market requires investors to buy shares in multiples of 100.
 Tencent said May 6 it will buy a stake in digital mapping provider NavInfo Co.
 agreed to buy message and calling app Viber for $900 million.
 Atos climbed the most since November 2011 after the French computer-services supplier offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros ($845 million).
 Der Spiegel reported yesterday that Germany, which currently holds 17 percent of the country’s second-largest lender, will keep its stake until at least 2016, after having rejected potential buyers.
 said it had abandoned its effort to buy the UK.
 The dearth of residential listings nationwide is now feeding on itself, with homeowners such as Adler reluctant to sell because of the difficulty in finding a place to buy.
 “We could be entering this cycle of no inventory coming on because of a fear people have that they cannot buy” Adler and her husband, Jeffrey Palter, are planning to expand or rebuild their 1,250-square-foot (116-square-meter) home after talking to an agent about listing it last year.
 The 30-year rate probably will reach 5 percent by the end of the year as the Federal Reserve scales back bond-buying that has held borrowing costs close to record lows, according to the Mortgage Bankers Association.
 Fewer homes are trading and prices are soaring in part because buyers have limited choices, especially in the strongest markets.
 Some properties are not desirable because they’re in unpopular locations or lack the amenities that buyers want, he said in a report last week.
 ‘Shadow Demand’ The “inventory of homes for sale that buyers actually want to purchase is even less than what’s on the market now, and many people who are looking (and qualified) to buy a home are holding off because they can’t find the right one,” Fleming wrote.
 These “buyers waiting in the wings are the new ‘shadow demand’” About half of mortgaged homes have below-market loan rates, Fleming said.
 Homebuilders are increasingly catering to buyers who can afford larger, more expensive properties near employment hubs and are cautious about creating housing on more-plentiful land on the outskirts of cities.
 “They are naturally going to approach this up market more conservatively because, for anyone looking at new construction over the last decade, one thing you don’t want is to get out over your skis” Adler, the homeowner, said a local builder approached her a few months ago and said his client wanted to buy her house, built in the 1940s, and renovate it.
 “The only way I would list this house is if I could buy something first,” Adler said.
 “It would take me inheriting a million dollars to buy something first -- or winning the lottery.
 The offer to buy as many as 104 million shares for 1,030 yen apiece will begin in early November and was approved by both companies, Tokyo-based Mitsubishi Chemical said today in a statement to the Tokyo Stock Exchange.
 are uniquely equipped to answer the question at the heart of Bill Ackman’s $1 billion bet against the company: Do people buy its products for their own use? Sixteen months after going public with his claim that Herbalife is a pyramid scheme, the hedge-fund manager has failed to force it to disclose receipts crucial to his thesis.
 Of the 349 survey respondents who said they had purchased for personal use, 87 percent said they didn’t buy as a distributor themselves.
 The ensuing transfer of wealth benefits the top of the pyramid while those at the bottom lose money buying products they can’t sell.
 They buy products at a discount and sell them at a markup.
 NBAD has a buy rating on Emaar.
 Existing shareholders will be given priority to buy the new stock, though some portions will be set aside for financial institutions and the general public, Emaar said.
 BSkyB, 39 percent owned by Fox, said today it’s in talks to buy the Italian and German pay-TV assets of Fox.
 “Many investors own Sky for either cash returns or for a possible bid, not for Sky buying expensive European pay-TV assets,” Bank of America Merrill Lynch analyst Daniel Kerven wrote in a note.
 The central bank pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion in April, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in measured steps are likely.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen testified to lawmakers May 7 that the Fed will probably end bond buying in the fall if the labor market continues to improve.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee pared its monthly asset-buying to $45 billion, its fourth straight $10 billion cut, and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 ambulatory surgery centers, which agreed to buy Sheridan Healthcare for $235 billion to add the country’s biggest provider of anesthesia services.
May 16 (Bloomberg) -- Hilmar Kopper, who took Deutsche Bank AG into the league of global securities firms more than 20 years ago by buying investment bank Morgan Grenfell and hiring Merrill Lynch & Co.
 Front-running was normal,” he said, referring to traders using knowledge about client orders to buy and sell securities for their own books in advance.
 Kopper said he established rules that stopped managers from buying bonds before the bank arranged a sale for a client.
May 7 (Bloomberg) -- After two months of looking for a home to buy, Brittani Kaufman walked into a townhouse under construction in Glen Burnie, Maryland, in April.
 Kaufman, a dental hygienist, said she planned to purchase her first home with a mortgage backed by the Federal Housing Administration, whose mandate is to help lower-income buyers.
 “Yes, the insurance fund needed to raise more revenue, but using the monthly fees wasn’t the way to do it” First-Time Buyers The decline in first-time buyers is contributing to downturns in the housing and mortgage markets as rates rise.
 The FHA, a primary source of loans to new buyers, provided them with about 27,100 mortgages in February, according to agency data.
 The higher fees prevented new buyers from making as many as 375,000 purchasers in 2013, NAR said in a letter to FHA Commissioner Carol Galante in April.
 Any additional increases would start pricing first-time buyers out of the market, she said.
 About 80 percent of FHA loans go to first-time buyers.
 Raymond Baldwin, 28, pays about $450 a month in fees for the $380,000 FHA loan he and his wife used to buy a house in Sykesville, Maryland, in November.
 “The current premium structure is pricing many creditworthy first-time buyers out of the market,” the mortgage bankers group wrote in an April 2 letter to HUD Secretary Shaun Donovan.
 Pilot Program About 28 percent of people buying their first home last year used an FHA loan, according to Bloomberg data.
 “You’re stripping out a lot of people when you increase FHA fees so high, and without first-time buyers it’s not possible to have a healthy real estate market,” said Richard Green, a loan officer at Presidential Mortgage Group in Bowie, Maryland.
 HUD hasn’t specified when the program would start, how many buyers it would help, or the size of the fee reductions.
 Kaufman, the dental hygienist, said she may have to wait to buy a home until she saves more money.
 By comparison, Americans are expected to buy 161 million new cars and trucks this year, according to the average of analyst estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 to protect research jobs in the country should it succeed in buying AstraZeneca Plc.
May 28 (Bloomberg) -- Stockland, Australia’s biggest diversified real estate trust, sweetened its proposal to buy Australand Property Group in an all-share offer valuing the smaller rival at A$25 billion ($23 billion).
 “They’re getting us enough production to make sure we can grow” Krafcik is now president of TrueCar Inc, the auto-buying website, which is seeking to raise more than $100 million in an initial public offering.
 The National Social Security Fund will buy HK$168 billion ($22 billion) of shares and China Life Insurance Co.
 The company said last month it will buy assets from parent Citic Group Corp, the country’s first state-owned investment corporation, ranging from financial services to energy and property.
 AIA Group Ltd, the second-largest Asia-based insurer by market value, will buy $300 million of shares, and a company controlled by Agricultural Bank of China Ltd.
 “SNC has indicated that it could also entertain a buyback or dividend if a suitable acquisition is not possible” Minority Stake SNC said in November it would consider selling all of AltaLink as well as listing a minority stake on the stock market, in order to free up cash for its traditional engineering and construction units.
 buying Time Warner Cable Inc.
 The Netherlands’ benign environment for bitcoin doesn’t stem from its potential as a currency that Dutch citizens might use to buy their bitterballen, a sort of deep-fried meatball that is a national dish.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- A trader paid almost $13 million to buy call options that pay off if the Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility Index rises at least 56 percent in the next four months.
 Fuel Tax EON climbed 32 percent to 1384 euros after RBC raised its recommendation on the shares to outperform, similar to buy, from underperform.
 Grybauskaite said her “firm position” in Lithuania’s battle with Russia’s OAO Gazprom over gas pricing that the Baltic nation says is at least a quarter more than other European buyers pay is yielding a discount “without compromising the interests of the country” Prime Minister Algirdas Butkevicius said yesterday that Gazprom may reduce the cost of Lithuanian gas imports by as much as 23 percent next year.
May 21 (Bloomberg) -- Verizon’s top executive scoffed at a report that his company wants to buy a satellite-TV company, calling it “someone’s fantasy” Take note, AT&T.
 spent $130 billion this year to buy out its joint-venture partner in one of the nation’s most advanced wireless networks.
 “AT&T settled for a more conventional transaction to fund its dividend and hide slowing growth” McAdam dismissed a report that his company would buy Dish Network Corp, DirecTV’s biggest competitor, saying he didn’t need to do a big deal to catch up with rivals.
 Essentially, AT&T did a deal to prepare for online video by buying a traditional provider of what is known as linear video, since it is delivered on a set schedule for all users.
 “How will AT&T ever justify to its shareholders that it is buying a company where in 25 percent of the country the best they can hope for is to preserve revenues they already have, while in the other 75 percent of the country they are consigned to secular decline?” Craig Moffett, an analyst at MoffettNathanson, said in a research note last week.
 While stock buyers are fixating on the revenue Gazprom will receive from the $400 billion deal signed yesterday to supply gas to China for 30 years, BCS is focusing on another figure: the $55 billion the company will dole out to develop the reserves in Siberia and build the pipelines.
 The call puts BCS in the minority: 14 of 21 analysts tracked by Bloomberg had buy ratings on the state-run company as of yesterday.
 Bernstein reiterated buy recommendations on Gazprom after the company said it had reached the agreement with China.
 The firm reiterated a hold recommendation on Gazprom and a buy on Novatek.
 21 report in the Wall Street Journal that Shiv Nadar was seeking potential buyers because his only child wasn’t interested.
 Sumner Redstone’s company will pay cash to buy the broadcaster from Northern & Shell, the publishing company owned by Richard Desmond.
 Viacom is buying a station -- known for provocative reality-TV shows like “Britain’s Crime Capitals” and “Celebrity Big Brother” -- that also airs popular US.
 The team will begin contacting prospective buyers within 30 days, the club said in a statement.
 The Buffalo News also reported that a pair of billionaires -- Terry Pegula, owner of the National Hockey League’s Buffalo Sabres, and former Sabres owner Thomas Golisano -- are potential buyers when the Bills come up for sale.
 oil explorer with a focus on Asia said it has received approaches to buy the company out.
 Siemens also said it agreed to buy some Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc energy assets for $13 billion.
 HSBC Holdings Plc raised the lighting manufacturer to overweight, similar to a buy, from neutral.
 drugmaker abandoned efforts to buy AstraZeneca Plc for 694 billion pounds ($117 billion) in what would have been the biggest deal ever in the drug industry.
 Atos rose 62 percent after the French computer-services supplier offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros ($844 million).
 Credit Suisse Group AG said yesterday that banks may stop allowing home buyers to use personal loans for down payments.
 One way of looking at it is that maybe they are trying to clean up everything so that they’re more appealing to someone willing to buy them” Shire rose 21 percent to a record 3,450 pence in London.
 Pfizer is seeking to buy London-based AstraZeneca Plc to redomicile in the UK, while Actavis based itself in Ireland after an acquisition six months ago.
 While that means their day-to-day activity doesn’t have to change, it gives them an edge in raising after-tax profits and more cash to use for deals to buy assets or pay dividends.
 The foreign companies they might like to buy will be cheaper for lower-tax rivals, such as Actavis and Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 said it’s close to a decision on buying wide-body aircraft for trans-Atlantic routes as it prepares to escalate a challenge to Air Canada.
 announced last month that it was buying Tekstilbank AS and Qatar Islamic Bank said on March 26 that was nearing the end of exclusive talks to buy a stake in Asya Katilim Bankasi AS.
 ICBC said last month that it will buy all of GSD Holding AS’s 76% stake in Tekstilbank AS for $316 million, and make a tender offer for the remaining shares of the Istanbul-based lender.
 “Why would you buy a medium sized bank in Turkey while scale has become the most important factor?” he said in an e-mail.
 Herbalife, which suspended its dividend last month to increase share repurchases, said May 7 that it had agreed to buy back $266 million of stock from Bank of America Corp.
 The producer may have failed to find assets to buy so far because it may be too “conservative” in its approach, Chief Financial Officer Miguel Martinez said in an investor conference call today.
 “We don’t think investors should be in a rush to buy Brazil,” the analysts wrote.
May 6 (Bloomberg) -- First Reserve Corp’s Sabine Oil & Gas agreed to buy struggling Forest Oil Corp.
 private in the largest leveraged buyout ever seven years ago, will be almost wiped out under the plan.
 Bavaguthu Raghuram Shetty, an Indian-born entrepreneur, and entities linked to Saeed Bin Butti Al Qubaisi’s Abu Dhabi-based Centurion Investments will buy London-based Apax’s stake in the chain of retail currency exchanges, the London-based buyout firm said in an e-mailed statement today.
May 29 (Bloomberg) -- RadioShack Corp, the struggling electronics retailer, jumped as much as 33 percent after a trader spent more than $600,000 buying bullish options.
 In February, Facebook agreed to buy WhatsApp Inc, which has 500 million users, for about $19 billion.
 sought to buy a piece of Naver Corp’s Line, a similar app that is popular in Japan.
May 22 (Bloomberg) -- Gold imports by India, the world’s second-biggest user, will probably rise after the Reserve Bank of India allowed more companies to buy the metal from overseas.
 (GM) is shrugging offthe impact of a 259 million small-car recall with new ChevySilverado and GMC Sierra pickups that are luring buyers intodealerships as the weather warms and the US.
 Pickup sales were helped by pent-up demand coming out ofJanuary and February when bad winter weather kept buyers awayfrom showrooms, suggesting contractors are feeling moreconfident about housing starts, Mark Wakefield, leader ofAlixPartners LLP’s automotive practices in the Americas, saidyesterday in a telephone interview.
 ‘Soft Underbelly’ Poland, which already spends above the European average on defense, plans to sign a deal to buy 70 long-range tactical transport helicopters and to take a share in a missile-defense partnership.
 A non-NATO member, Sweden wants to buy more Jas 39E fighter jets, two more submarines and medium-range anti-aircraft artillery.
May 8 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Xstrata Plc is considering an offer to buy manganese assets from Eurasian Natural Resources Corp, the Kazakh miner taken private by its founding shareholders, according to people familiar with the situation.
 Shorting involves selling borrowed shares and buying them back later as their prices fall for a profit.
 Part of the trades could also depress the closing price of the bank’s stock so that it could buy shares in the placement at a lower price, according to the filing.
 “We’re not going to get back on track until we start making credit more available to potential buyers” He said he expects Watt’s moves to spur “meaningful” sales growth.
 Lenders had to absorb buy backs with a balance of $812 billion between 2011 and 2013 alone.
 Ultimately, this undermines the goal of improving access to mortgage credit for creditworthy borrowers” Watt said discussions with Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac and lenders led him to make a number of refinements to the buyback process.
 “It’s going to make lenders more willing to give people a chance” While Watt can’t force banks to lower credit standards, he can spur originations by reducing buyback demands, according to a report by Jay McCanless, a senior analyst with Sterne Agee & Leach Inc.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy loans and package them into securities, were seized by regulators in 2008 and received a $1875 billion bailout.
 He may create an independent dispute resolution program for lenders to challenge buybacks and provide ways for lenders to fix faulty loans without repurchasing them.
 “Purchasing a company is getting more competitive, and speed is crucial,” said Nobuyuki Fujimoto, senior market analyst at SBI Securities Co, Japan’s largest online brokerage.
 While its repurchase program lets it acquire shares once owned by AT&T once they’re in the open market, America Movil has no plans to buy any significant portion of AT&T’s stake, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 Slim could also opt to buy shares directly, Legarreta said.
 Slim’s low-cost mobile-phone company in the US, Tracfone Wireless Inc, buys airtime from AT&T, along with other US.
 The two companies also joined forces in a failed attempt to buy an indirect stake in Telecom Italia SpA in 2007.
 are leading the sale and the banks, have an option to buy an additional 108 million shares at the closing.
 Blackstone originally invested $4142 million of equity in a leveraged buyout of Parsippany, NJ-based Pinnacle.
 and JW Childs Associates LP, a Boston-based buyout firm.
 Siemens AG climbed 21 percent as Europe’s biggest engineering company forecast an increase in productivity after saying it will buy some energy assets from Rolls Royce Holdings Plc and list its hearing-aid unit.
 The stock, which has 10 buy and seven hold recommendations from analysts, was little changed at C$5117 at the close in Toronto.
May 15 (Bloomberg) -- Tiger Brands Ltd, South Africa’s largest food company, will write off about half of its investment in Dangote Flour Mills Plc less than two years after buying a majority stake in the Nigeria-based producer.
 It’s just a short flight for them” West Coast Gutkowski isn’t buying it.
 won European Union approval to buy Telefonica SA’s O2 Irish unit after it pledged to offer access to a smaller mobile operator.
 Hutchison agreed last year to buy O2, Ireland’s No.
 Antinori also today that even with 90 superjumbos still to be delivered, Emirates would be prepared to buy further planes should Airbus commit to adding new engines to improve the jet’s fuel burn by 8 or 9 percent, just as it has done with the re-engined A320neo version of its narrow-body family.
 Among potential buyers of travel insurance, “there’s usually a little more interest when you have weather issues,” said Linda Kundell, a spokeswoman for the industry association.
 Berkshire announced in January that it agreed to buy the assets of MyAssist Inc, a concierge and personal-assistant service, from a company founded by Noel.
 Added fees make up a growing portion of the price of flying and those costs aren’t always obvious while buying a ticket, the US.
 PanAust agreed last year to buy Glencore Xstrata Plc’s stake in Frieda River in a deal it expects to be concluded before September, estimating the development costs at as much as $18 billion.
 BNP Paribas could beat its 10-percent target for return on equity if it successfully reshapes its business, according to Barclays Plc’s Kiri Vijayarajah, who has an overweight rating on the bank, similar to a buy.
 The Las Vegas-based company has carried out more than 45 transactions to reduce debt and to push out maturities since a 2008 buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital left it with more than $23 billion in debt.
 Son and Sprint Chief Executive Officer Dan Hesse got a skeptical response when they raised the possibility of Sprint buying T-Mobile US.
 The spread has widened to 153 basis points as of yesterday, down from a high of 178 basis points following reports of Son’s ambitions to buy T-Mobile in a bid to take on AT&T Inc.
 The benchmark 10-year Japanese government bond yield has fallen 13 basis points, or 013 percentage point, to 0605 percent this year as the Bank of Japan buys 7 trillion yen of the notes a month to spur inflation.
 Previously, only banks got to buy and sell the derivatives on interdealer platforms run by firms such as GFI.
 “In the next couple of weeks, we’ll onboard buyside clients to our credit SEF,” Jim Toffey, global head of electronic markets at New York-based GFI, said today during an event with reporters.
 At other venues, investors buy and sell mainly through an auction process where their identity is known to the firm they’re transacting with.
 The new trading systems are aimed at giving investors a better chance to buy and sell swaps with each other rather than banks, potentially increasing competition and cutting costs.
 Delayed settlement may make it harder for buyers to get their money out in a timely manner from a market that’s grown to $700 billion when demand dries up.
 More cash than ever has flowed into the loans that are used to back leveraged buyouts as investors seek protection in the floating-rate debt from rising borrowing costs as the Federal Reserve prepares to withdraw its record stimulus.
 Original Content Youku said in the earnings statement that it will continue to build up its content portfolio “by strengthening original, partner-generated and user-generated content” Seven of 19 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg rate Youku a buy, while eight recommend holding and four rate it a sell.
 The Italian company, which owns a 22 percent stake in Distribuidora de Television Digital SA, or DTS, through its Spanish unit, has an option with Prisa to match the bid of any buyer, one of the people said.
 Sheikh Hamad completed the deal to buy 60 million Deutsche Bank shares without hiring an external advisor, a person with knowledge of the transaction said, asking not to be identified as the details aren’t public.
 Instead, the group may try to raise the value of shares that Eui Sun owns or lower the value of those he needs to buy to take over, Chae said.
 facility just outside Chicago, permitting almost light-speed buying and selling of US.
 Treasuries is nothing new, though the pace of buying and selling has accelerated in recent years.
 Manulife Asset Management is buying Chinese shares traded in Hong Kong this month, the first time this year, betting that government steps to buoy growth will finally boost the lowest equity valuations in Asia, according to Ronald Chan, head of Asian equities at Manulife, which oversees $269 billion.
 “It will be very difficult to have an adjustment in an election year,” Luana Helsinger, an oil and gas analyst at brokerage GBM Brasil, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock, said by telephone from Rio.
 jumped to a record after Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, China’s biggest e-commerce company, agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in the company to develop its logistics in Southeast Asia.
 Coca-Cola has said that stock repurchases, including $48 billion of buybacks in 2013, cushion the dilution tied to employee awards.
 “Apple buys smaller technology companies from time to time and we generally do not discuss our purpose or plans,” Kristin Huguet, a spokeswoman for Apple, wrote in an e-mail.
 Third Point expects opportunities to buy assets being divested by banks that need to conform with new regulations, he said.
 “This announcement speaks to a historically smart real estate buyer making a statement on the length of the Las Vegas Strip recovery, also a positive,” he said.
 Vegas Premium The price also illustrates the premium buyers are willing to pay for Las Vegas properties, which generate a large share of revenue from non-gaming amenities compared with other markets, according to Bloomberg Industries research.
 While the pace of bond buying is slowing, Fed Chair Janet Yellen said May 7 the US.
 plans to buy DirecTV for $485 billion, gaining more than 38 million video subscribers at home and in Latin America and stepping up an acquisition-fueled overhaul of the $110 billion US.
 “Instead of innovating and investing in their networks, companies like AT&T and Comcast are simply buying up the competition.
 The agency doesn’t disclose the names of buyers.
 agreed to buy an NT$117 billion ($388 million) stake in Taiwanese carrier Asia Pacific Telecom Co.
 will purchase 583 million new APT shares in a private placement at NT$20 apiece, a 12 percent premium to its previous closing price, and could introduce international strategic investors to buy a further 244 million new shares, the companies said in exchange filings yesterday.
 “Dividends are a very important part of the puzzle for us but ultimately what we’re looking for at Templeton is to buy a stock that offers us a double over a five-year period including dividends,” said Tuttle, whose group manages C$143 billion in assets.
 “It makes sense on a lot of different levels,” said Todd Gordon, an executive vice president at Magna Global, the media buying arm of the advertising company Interpublic Group of Cos.
 Online Partners “We don’t expect there to be spending growth this year,” said Christopher Geraci, president of national broadcast buying at OMD in New York, part of Omnicom Group Inc.
 So went the buying frenzy during two weeks of marathon auction sales this month in New York.
 Asian collectors fueled the bidding and buying during both weeks, snapping up pieces by Claude Monet, Henri Matisse, Alberto Giacometti and Francis Bacon.
 “Wealthy buyers are willing to pay above the high estimates for iconic works that they want to own and feel they may not have other opportunity to acquire,” said Jeff Rabin, a principal at Artvest Partners LLC in New York.
 The head of Kynikos Associates LP said the market is being inflated in part because of “hot money” from Chinese buyers.
 Dish and DirecTV have attracted merger speculation as Comcast Corp’s offer to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 mobile-phone carrier, is in talks to buy DirecTV, people with knowledge of the situation said.
 increased for the first time in a week after JPMorgan Asset Management said hardware stocks in Taiwan and Korea offer good buying opportunities.
 The Fed reduced monthly asset buying to $45 billion on April 30 with the fourth straight $10 billion cut, and policy makers said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 is seeking to buy sugar companies in the Philippines to expand its footprint in Southeast Asia and tap opportunities from a free-trade agreement in the region.
 “When you have sharp sell-offs, you have a lot of buyers on the sidelines waiting for that weakness,” James Paulsen, the Minneapolis-based chief investment strategist at Wells Capital Management, which oversees about $357 billion in assets, said by phone.
 The central bank pared its monthly asset-buying and said further reductions in “measured steps” are likely.
 That strategy depends on signing new deals as it completes construction on projects that power companies have already agreed to buy.
 From a technical perspective, the market fell through a support level just above the 5,000 mark, which shows that “buyers have somewhat given up,” he said.
 Upper Nile produces Dar Blend, a low-sulfur crude that is prized by Japanese buyers as a cleaner-burning fuel for power plants.
 The closely held buyer entered into a purchase agreement for 300 N.
 would have tried to buy the building even if Peter Bren’s company wasn’t the property’s owner, Holte said.
 The BOJ said it will continue buying about 7 trillion yen of sovereign debt a month at the conclusion of a two-day meeting today.
 Vagit Alekperov, the company’s billionaire chief executive officer, also said May 23 that he’d use his 2013 dividend payout of about $600 million to buy Lukoil shares.
 “Lukoil remains our top pick in the sector,” Ildar Davletshin, an oil and gas analyst at Renaissance Capital who has a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note yesterday.
 Of 17 analysts covering Lukoil, 14 recommend that investors buy the shares, while three have hold ratings.
 “Hence, better to spend all the money on buying shares than pursuing other projects” Lukoil managers led by Alekperov and Vice President Leonid Fedun have pledged to keep adding to holdings they bought last year.
 Transactions in the interbank market include loans to other financial institutions and resale agreements, or pacts between two banks under which one borrows from another by using assets as collateral and agrees to buy them back at a later date.
 in Mumbai, who has a buy recommendation on the Havells.
 Revel AC Inc’s casino in Atlantic City has filed for bankruptcy twice since opening in 2012, and is now seeking a buyer at auction.
 Bernstein & Co, who recommends buying the shares.
 The company’s investigation into Charney delved into the sexual-harassment claims and also found he misused company resources, including buying plane tickets for family members and using corporate housing for friends and himself that wasn’t related to company business, said a person familiar with the situation who asked to not be identified because the details of the review aren’t public.
 agreed to buy a 199 percent stake in 58com Inc.
 Tencent will buy 368 million Class A and B ordinary shares in Chaoyang, China-based 58com at $20 each, according to a statement distributed through PR Newswire yesterday.
 Tencent in March agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in JDcom and transfer some of its own assets to build a stronger competitor to Alibaba.
 The carrier will pay about 400 million euros for the stake and will also buy a majority in the company that runs Alitalia loyalty program, said the people, who asked not to be named as the talks is private.
 Founded in 1996, the firm buys stakes in businesses it considers undervalued and then lobbies for changes to boost investor returns.
 - - had been regarded as possible buyers for any cabin assets that B/E might make available for sale.
 Another option under discussion is for Vnesheconombank, the state development lender, to buy Mechel shares or bonds rather than the creditor banks, the people said.
 Reed Elsevier declined 07 percent to 9355 pence after Barclays cut its rating on the stock to equal weight, similar to neutral, from the equivalent of a buy recommendation.
 “It’s apparent that these are issues from the previous government and the current emir is trying to weather these events” Under the 34-year-old emir’s father, Sheikh Hamad Bin Khalifa Al Thani, Qatar used the world’s third-largest gas reserves to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, Volkswagen AG and purchased London’s Harrods department store.
 health-care real estate investment trust by market value, on its agreement to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 Aviva Life & Annuity Co, based in Des Moines, Iowa, alleged in a complaint filed in December that it was induced to buy the secured notes in April 2010 by Steven Davis, Dewey’s former chairman; Stephen DiCarmine, its former executive director; and Joel Sanders, the ex-finance chief.
 UBS cut its rating on the stock to sell from buy and reduced its price target to HK$334 from HK$521.
 Higher fuel costs may stoke inflation in a country that buys about 80 percent of its crude from abroad, undermining Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s efforts to curb consumer prices and revive economic growth from near the weakest level in a decade.
 raised Russian stocks to the equivalent of buy from the equivalent of sell, citing the “fading of the Ukraine crisis,” according to an e-mailed note today.
 Investors are buying shares ahead of the July 15 ex-dividend date, according to Sergey Vakhrameev, an analyst in Moscow at AnkorInvest LLC.
 “It has shown strength in international development and we believe the integration of UC and Alibaba will bring more change and imagination to the industry” Florence Shih, a spokeswoman for Alibaba, confirmed by e-mail that Alibaba is buying the rest of UCWeb.
 The company tried and failed to buy a casino in Atlantic City.
 “He’s like, ‘Buy it, buy as much as you can as soon as you can,’” Rengan Rajaratnam told his brother on the call.
 One option is the iPhone app Shout, which lets users buy and sell bookings among themselves.
 The buyer of that spot then has to use the original person’s name.
 Issuance rose to the most since $135 billion on May 22 with borrowers taking advantage of demand from bond buyers who bet that central banks would maintain support of fixed-income markets.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Dai-ichi Life Insurance Co, Japan’s second-largest life insurer, is in talks to buy Protective Life Corp.
 Dai-ichi Life said it’s considering buying a US.
 policies from Axa SA and expanded in 2006 by buying insurance units from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 agreed to buy the Irish company for $429 billion.
 jumped 19 percent after agreeing to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Marsh & McLennan Cos will buy a 34 percent stake in Alexander Forbes Ltd.
 Mercer Africa Ltd, a subsidiary of New York-based Marsh & McLennan, the biggest insurance broker by market value, will buy 149 percent of Alex Forbes at the time of the initial public offering and a further 191 percent after regulatory approvals, the Johannesburg-based company said today in an e-mailed statement.
 Shareholders met on June 20 to decide whether to sell shares on the bourse or consider offers from potential trade buyers.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- The biggest surge in oil prices in a year would usually be a reason to buy the securities of energy producers.
June 9 (Bloomberg) -- Man Group Plc, the world’s largest publicly traded hedge-fund firm, agreed to buy a New Jersey investment firm that manages about $1 billion as it tries to add clients and assets in the US.
 Last month, Man Group said it was considering buying Boston-based Numeric Holdings LLC, a computer-driven money manager with $139 billion of assets that primarily trades equities.
 The pre-sale high estimate, excluding buyer’s fees, was 24 million yuan.
 rates will stay low “for a considerable time” after the monetary authority ends its bond-buying program.
 Perpetual Energy jumped 20 percent to C$196 as Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce raised its rating to the equivalent of buy from the equivalent of hold.
 said it would buy the company in a $345 million stock transaction.
 rose 26 percent to C$2110 after saying it would buy assets from UK-based Projection Lighting Ltd.
 Barclays falsified marketing materials to hide how much high-frequency traders were buying and selling, according to a complaint filed today by Eric Schneiderman.
 With trading profits so thin, few people can transact shares in the volume necessary to keep exchanges supplied with offers to buy and sell.
 Merlin is a new company formed to buy and manage real estate as the Spanish market emerges from a crash.
 Credit Suisse’s Spanish brokerage was the biggest net buyer, acquiring 37 million shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Oracle agreed to buy Micros for $53 billion on June 23.
 In this model, the yieldcos sell electricity from power plants, using the revenue to buy more projects, typically from their developer parent companies and other ventures.
 “That reduces uncertainty when we start a project because we’ve got a buyer,” he said.
 has closed its second deal this month to buy solar power from renewable-energy developer First Wind Holdings Inc.
 Rocky Mountain Power, a unit of PacifiCorp, will buy 320 megawatts under 20-year contracts, First Wind said today in a statement.
 buys Beats Electronics for $3 billion, giving the world’s most valuable company a hip, upscale line of music products and a nascent streaming service to rejuvenate its iTunes business and sell existing customers even more products and services.
 Manufacturers including Boeing and Airbus will deliver to buyers about 1,600 aircraft worth $100 billion this year, according to an analysis by Bloomberg Industries.
 buy Boeing jets didn’t properly assess the impact on US.
 The stock is rated the equivalent of buy at 37 firms, with 10 holds and only one sell.
 That gives it an average rating of 448 based on Bloomberg’s system where buys get a score of 5 and sells a 1.
 Calls to buy the shares this week reached the most expensive since at least 2006 relative to puts to sell, data on six-month options show.
 They rate the stock as a buy and expect it to rally 35 percent to $450.
 Emirates, the biggest buyer of the A380 aircraft, made the decision after reviewing its fleet requirement, Airbus said.
 The company said it didn’t get an offer that matched its expectations, following discussions with several potential buyers.
 The Dutch maker of animal-nutrition products and fish feed undertook a four-month sale process to find a buyer for the cash-generative business.
 Harold Schwartz, Morse’s father, started selling tracts in Florida in the 1960s, after buying a few thousand acres about 60 miles (100 kilometers) northwest of Orlando.
 reached an agreement to buy the rest of Augusta Resource Corp.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Agrokor dd, Croatia’s largest company, reached final agreement to buy a majority of Slovenian rival Mercator Poslovni Sistem, in a deal worth 13 billion euros ($18 billion), the largest takeover in the Balkans.
 in buying real estate in London, which has emerged as a haven for foreign wealth.
 Ping An Insurance, the second biggest, agreed to buy in July 2013 the Lloyd’s of London building from a Commerz Real AG-managed fund for 260 million pounds, according to people familiar with the matter.
 The bond- and derivatives-trading network is seeking to offer investors a way to buy and sell corporate debt at a time when asset managers are struggling to transact in the $98 trillion US.
 Regulatory Squeeze New regulations and declining profits have spurred banks to hold fewer debt securities, making it harder for money managers to find the bonds they want to buy or sell.
 The change is an alert that notifies any investor on the MarketAxess or BlackRock system if an incoming order matches a bond they want to buy or sell, the person familiar with how it works said in November.
 The growth comes as health-conscious consumers are buying less soda, and follows a 2012 US.
 can proceed with a $1 billion plan to build a new vehicle for New York City’s taxi fleet in an appeals court defeat for cab operators who opposed being forced to buy a specific model.
 The commission in September 2012 designated the Nissan NV200 as the official “Taxi of Tomorrow” and required owners of medallions, which confer the right to operate yellow cabs in New York, to buy the $29,700 vehicles.
 Taxi fleet operators sued the city in December 2012 seeking to block the requirement, and a judge halted the program five months later, saying it violated the administrative code because it didn’t allow medallion owners to buy hybrid vehicles.
 The city then revised the rules to let medallion owners buy hybrids until Nissan develops a hybrid version of the NV200.
 Mitsubishi also offered to buy as much as 10 percent of Alstom, a stake valued at about 900 million euros.
 He’s turning some of his largest shops into wholesale outlets that cater to bulk buyers, a format known as cash-and-carry that was popularized in the country by Wal-Mart and German rival Metro AG.
 “With fuel costs where they are, no one will drive out of town to buy groceries” Rental costs average 15 percent of sales for Indian retailers, compared with the 8 percent global average, according to consultant Technopak Advisors Pvt.
 Despite the wave of recalls, 17 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg recommend buying GM, while 3 say sell.
 By comparison, Americans are expected to buy 161 million new cars and trucks industrywide this year, according to the average of analysts’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc’s deal to buy Covidien Plc will make the medical device maker No.
 Investors are buying shares on good economic reports” Japan’s Topix index gained 08 percent as the nation’s industrial production expanded 05 percent in May from April, when it shrank 28 percent, a report showed today.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Japanese businesses left behind this year as global equities rallied to a record found a winning strategy in buying back shares the rest of the world preferred to avoid.
 The buybacks are limiting losses in the world’s worst-performing developed equity market: Companies using the strategy have gained even as the Topix slid.
 The combination of record cash, cheap shares and a government-led drive to buoy return on equity is making buybacks irresistible to Japanese executives at a time when the MSCI All-Country World Index is trading at unprecedented highs.
 Japan’s biggest trading company said on May 8 it would buy back as much as 60 billion yen ($589 million) of shares, the most in seven years.
 Net Sellers Foreign investors, which account for about 60 percent of market turnover, reduced holdings of Japanese shares in all but one month this year just as buybacks surged.
 “Share buybacks have the effect of supporting the market when it’s weak,” Daiwa Securities Group Inc.
 The buybacks can also suggest a company has run out of things to spend money on, curbing its growth potential.
 While gross domestic product expanded 67 percent in the first quarter, it’s forecast to contract 44 percent in the second, reflecting buying before a tax increase.
 More Investments Even if buybacks continue, companies need to increase investments at a faster pace, according to Coutts’ Calder, a harder choice compared to improving return on equity with share repurchases in the short term.
 The amount of cash they hold means companies should able to afford both buybacks and capital investments, he said.
 “Capital investment directly boosts the economy, so I think for now, they should invest more money there” Since the start of January, 152 companies on the Topix announced buybacks worth 25 trillion yen, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Companies unveiled an average 567 billion yen in annual buybacks over the decade through 2013, the data show.
 “Companies are increasing buybacks at an incredible pace,” said Tomohiro Okawa, a Japan equity strategist at UBS AG in Tokyo.
 “We wanted to send out a message that management is very much concerned with returns on equity,” Mitsubishi Chief Executive Officer Ken Kobayashi told reporters in Tokyo on May 8 after unveiling the 60 billion-yen buyback.
 NTT Docomo, which announced Japan’s biggest buyback by value this year on April 25, said it will spend as much as 500 billion yen.
 It said March 26 it plans to buy back 360 billion yen of stock, its first such purchase in five years.
 Brokerages are touting stock-picking based on who’s next to buy back shares.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- The world’s biggest pension fund should consider sitting on cash after selling Japanese sovereign bonds, said the government’s top adviser on the overhaul, after the Topix index of stocks rebounded 10 percent amid anticipation of retirement-plan buying.
 GPIF should avoid buying into markets that have rallied on bets its purchases will boost prices, he said.
 “It’s OK if there’s a gap in timing between selling JGBs and buying Japanese stocks and overseas assets,” Ito, a professor at the National Graduate Institute for Policy Studies in Tokyo, said in a June 19 interview.
 “If they hold cash and short-term bills, they also have the option of buying back some bonds after yields finish rising” The Topix has surged 10 percent from a May 21 low, outpacing a global stock rally, as investors speculated that inflows from the world’s biggest pension fund would accelerate.
 GPIF is already selling local debt and there are indications it’s buying equities.
 Trust banks, which often buy and sell on behalf of pension investors, added money into local stocks for seven straight weeks through June 13, exchange data show.
 Under the partnership, Ritz-Carlton will also manage the apartments for homebuyers and offer them services including in-residence spa treatments, in-house dining and catering and concierge facilities, according to Oberoi Realty.
 McEwan said an IPO was a better option for RBS than a sale of the unit to a trade buyer or to private equity.
 are working to bridge a $1 billion valuation gap with the owners of Formula One, as they seek to buy a 49 percent stake in the auto-racing series, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “We advise people to buy cheaper stocks because those have a more reasonable margin of safety” Check Point trades at 176 times estimated profit, compared with an average of 158 over the past five years, Bloomberg compiled data show.
 Energy Future’s $19 billion loan proposal, which it says is a crucial part of a larger borrowing to refinance costly debt from a 2007 buyout, is up for court approval next week.
 The company, taken private in a record $48 billion leveraged buyout in 2007, is trying to exchange costly loans for ones with lower interest.
 The average rating on Goldman Sachs shares has fallen to 321, according to data compiled by Bloomberg that assigns a score of 5 to ratings of buy or the equivalent, 3 to holds and 1 to sells.
 Univision, the largest Spanish-language broadcaster in the US, has been contacting companies to seek a buyer for the business and may also consider an initial public offering, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Univision’s owners, which took the company private in 2007 in a $123 billion leveraged buyout, are now seeking a valuation of more than $20 billion, two people said.
 Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s largest Internet company, added 26 percent in Hong Kong after SocGen-Ji Asia raised it to buy from neutral.
 “There’s a feeling from most people that it overshot to the downside, and that’s likely where the bid in the options market is coming from,” Rob Sanderson, an analyst at Stamford, Connecticut-based MKM Partners LLC who has maintained a buy rating, said in a May 29 phone interview.
 Selling Puts “You’ve got people buying calls waiting for the bounce and people selling puts, trying to get into the stock,” Mark Sebastian, director of trading and investments at Swan Wealth Advisors Inc, said by phone from Chicago.
 Our idea is to clean up the bank, if needed, to reduce its capital and to negotiate with potential buyers” VTB Group, Russia’s second-biggest lender, holds 99 percent of Corporate Bank and “has expressed interest in discussing support” for the lender, Iskrov said.
 DuPont Potential DuPont, Monsanto’s largest seed competitor, could also be seen as a potential suitor because it already has seed license deals with Syngenta, Liberum Capital, which raised its rating on the stock to “buy” today, said in a note to investors.
 Partnerships As well as adding the latest technology in agrochemicals, buying Syngenta would also allow Monsanto to remove a competitor that was putting time and money into building a rival seed business.
 The survey, conducted by the Private Equity Growth Capital Council, showed 34 percent of buyout executives favoring energy over investment areas such as health care, consumer goods and financial companies.
 Apple last month agreed to buy Beats Electronics LLC for $3 billion, partly because of the Beats Music service that gives the iPhone maker a foothold in Internet-based streaming.
 is in talks to sell 747-8 jumbo jets, the four-engine model that has struggled to attract buyers, to the commercial finance arm of China’s biggest lender, three people familiar with the matter said.
 is considering buying 747-8 freighters to place with South Korea’s Asiana Airlines Inc, which flies 10 older cargo versions of the 747, two people said.
 The insurer, which is majority-owned by a fund managed by Apollo, also plans to buy at least some of AmeriHome’s loans that aren’t eligible for government-backed programs, known as non-agency debt, they said.
 and Angel Oak Capital Advisors LLC in seeking to buy new mortgages or invest in originators.
 That company, known as PennyMac, has since expanded past buying distressed loans to become the ninth-largest home lender, originating $5 billion last quarter, according to newsletter Inside Mortgage Finance.
 AmeriHome is seeking to use a similar focus on buying mortgages from other lenders, known as correspondent business, to increase volumes and add loan-servicing contracts, the people said.
 drugmaker, agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The Newport Beach, California-based investment manager has been buying Russian equities amid a decline which, at the height of the conflict with Ukraine, pushed the average dividend yield for the benchmark Micex Index above its estimated 12-month price-to-earnings ratio for the first time since at least 2009.
 Valuations slumping below payout levels can signal a buying opportunity to investors.
 In April, Kenya’s telecommunications regulator granted approval for Safaricom and Airtel to buy yuMobile and it’s considering awarding licenses for at least three more telecommunications companies.
 This is Canadian Solar’s largest order in that country and the second from these buyers as “we are expanding our presence and solidifying our competitive position in Turkey,” Chief Executive Officer Shawn Qu said in the statement.
 announced on June 23 that it was buying Integrys Energy Group Inc, and Exelon Corp.
 That’s important for all buyers” After releasing its A350 model into commercial service this year, Airbus will enter a long stretch without new programs, making the upgrade of existing platforms a key task.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity with their pension savings.
 Lower fuel costs may ease inflation in India, which buys about 80 percent of its crude from abroad.
 Numis raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from hold, saying that first-half earnings will probably climb 16 percent.
 Exane BNP Paribas raised its recommendation on European personal and household-goods companies to overweight, which is similar to buy, from underweight, citing the industry’s growth potential.
 Global Asset Capital, Deka Group and Merlin Properties SA are among investors buying or looking to purchase commercial property in the country.
 The company said it may also buy buildings in Portugal.
 Deka, Germany’s biggest manager of real estate mutual funds, said in April it was interested in acquiring more office properties in Lisbon after buying a building, rented to postal service CTT-Correios de Portugal, for 43 million euros.
 “There will be no way out -- it will be very difficult to find the next buyer” The deserted area underscores the challenge facing China’s leaders in dealing with the fallout from a record credit-fueled investment spree while sustaining growth and jobs in the world’s second-biggest economy.
 Sales of bonds by local-government vehicles to repay bank loans are just “buying time,” he said.
 “The Fed is still buying assets and there’s still a lot of money sloshing around the system and the rest of the world is now in an easing cycle” A measure of fluctuations on the MSCI All-Country World Index, which tracks stocks in both developed and emerging markets, dropped to 477 yesterday, the lowest level since 1996, according to 30-day historical data compiled by Bloomberg.
 While the Federal Reserve has reduced stimulus, it’s still buying $45 billion of bonds a month to lower borrowing costs.
 Strugger recommends buying June 14 calls on the VIX and offsetting the cost by selling October 28 calls.
 “It is the right next step that will give time for a more considered process that can protect not only the bondholders, but also the tenants and the city” Fortress Investment Group LLC was preparing a $47 billion bid to buy the complex, a person with knowledge of the plan said last month.
 CWCapital said it’s continuing to “evaluate disposition alternatives” The complex could still be sold to an outside buyer in the second half of the year, the company said.
 China Central Television, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8, and it quoted a professor calling the software a potential threat to China’s information security.
 announced in September that because Macquarie had “decided to exit the wealth-management business from Asia, including India,” it was buying the Sydney-based bank’s share in their joint venture.
 A spokesman for FMS declined to comment on the buyer of the US.
 Even after yesterday’s gains, buyers can get it on the cheap: The company remains a penny stock and traded at the lowest sales multiple of any similar-sized retailer.
 Charney could also team up with another buyer to take the company private, Brean Capital said, estimating a deal valuation of $150 a share, or about $500 million including debt.
 The company’s strong brand may appeal to buyers, said Craig Johnson, president of Customer Growth Partners LLC, a New Canaan, Connecticut-based consulting firm.
 A larger company could buy it for access to “a customer that they don’t really get” With a price-sales multiple of 012, American Apparel is cheaper than any specialty apparel retailer valued at more than $100 million, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “That customer is kind of trendy, yet buys a lot of different stuff,” Black, chief executive officer of the Lake Oswego, Oregon-based firm, said in a phone interview.
 Still, suitors may be hesitant to buy a company that’s so unstable financially, said Jaime Katz, a Chicago-based analyst at Morningstar Inc.
 “It would be hard to think about who a strategic buyer for that sort of business would be” American Apparel’s stock has been plummeting since 2007, as sales growth slowed and a costly new distribution center didn’t perform as expected.
 If a strategic buyer is too wary to pursue a transaction, Beder of Brean Capital said Charney could find a partner to help him take the company private.
 Berkshire agreed last year to buy Hartford’s UK.
 “We still feel like we have the superior, best VR out there” Prototype Devices Facebook said in March that it planned to buy Irvine, California-based Oculus for $2 billion.
 Previous Efforts The industry itself is already trying to address the distrust between sellers and buyers of the debt in the wake of the crisis, though previous efforts have failed.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- ReNew Power Ventures Pvt, majority owned by Goldman Sachs Group Inc, has agreed to buy 101 megawatts of wind turbines from Suzlon Energy Ltd.
 Investors should buy short-dated periphery notes to benefit from the policy, Michael Leister, a senior fixed-income strategist at Commerzbank AG in London, wrote in an e-mail today.
July 1 (Bloomberg) -- Sotheby’s sold 931 million pounds ($1593 million) of contemporary art in London yesterday as wealthy buyers around the globe chased trophy works by postwar and contemporary artists.
 Prices include buyer’s commission; estimates do not.
 At least six buyers competed for the work that went to a telephone client of Wong.
 about a joint bid to buy Alstom SA’s energy business and counter a $17 billion offer by General Electric Co.
 One option being discussed is for Mitsubishi Heavy to buy Alstom’s steam turbine and grid business and Siemens to get the gas turbine operations, people familiar with the matter said earlier today, asking not to be identified because the matter is not public.
 ‘Creative Trick’ A joint bid with Mitsubishi Heavy “seems to be a creative trick from Siemens, but it’s debatable whether it matches the French government’s thinking,” said Stuttgart-based Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg analyst Volker Stoll, who recommends buying Siemens shares.
 Siemens’s plan to buy Alstom’s energy assets comes as the German company is cutting jobs to slash about 1 billion euros ($135 billion) in costs.
 cut its rating on the stock to neutral from buy, citing weak demand.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Nokia Oyj agreed to buy analytics firm Medio Systems Inc, the Finnish wireless-technology company’s second acquisition in two weeks to bolster its Here mapping unit against Google Inc.
 Nokia built its location-technologies business by buying Chicago-based map provider Navteq Corp.
 Slim’s attempt to buy The Hague-based KPN floundered after an independent foundation built a blocking stake, causing the Mexican company to withdraw its plans in October.
 “If you look at every top we’ve lived through,” he wrote then, “they each have certain ingredients -- internal market deterioration; rationalizations and lulling; using up buying power even though you used to know better; and waiting and waiting for the bell to go off, which proves in hindsight to be rather more of a little tinkle that you thought you heard but weren’t sure enough of to act upon.
 As a market technician, Mamis focused on price movement and trading volume for clues on when to buy or sell stocks, rather than economic data and company earnings, which drive fundamental analysis.
 magazine from 1980 to 2000 -- wrote that technicians “want to know such objective data as whether there are more sellers than buyers, how strong each competing side is, and who -- professional or odd-lotter -- is on which side.
 that it’s time to buy.
 Bank of America Corp, which has had a buy rating on Russian stocks since September, reiterated its bullish view on June 17.
 Dendreon was seeking a buyer last year, Bloomberg reported, even as it cut jobs and Provenge sales slid 13 percent to $2837 million.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Loews Corp, the holding company controlled by New York’s Tisch family, agreed to buy the InterContinental Chicago O’Hare Hotel to expand its portfolio in the US.
 Loews is purchasing the 556-room property from New York’s Amalgamated Bank and expects the sale to be completed in late July, said Sarah Murov, a spokesman for the buyer.
 The company has plans for a separate Chicago hotel, in the city’s downtown, to open next year, and announced weeks ago that it reached a deal to buy a 255-room property in Minneapolis from Graves Hospitality Corp.
 yesterday agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Companies have held off from buying hepatitis C-focused biotechnology companies since Bristol-Myers Squibb Co.
 removed the stock from its conviction-buy list.
 Booker Group retreated 22 percent to 1427 pence after Goldman Sachs removed the British food wholesaler from its conviction-buy list, saying it expects sales to decline at the company’s Makro division this year and next.
 Orange SA, which has held talks with Bouygues SA about buying its telecommunications business, dropped 14 percent to 1263 euros.
 Iliad SA made an informal offer to buy Bouygues Telecom for 4 billion euros to 5 billion euros within the last few weeks, people familiar with the matter said late yesterday.
 Monte Paschi’s investors can exercise rights to buy stock from June 9 to June 27, while the rights can be traded from June 9 to June 20.
 The trade was probably initiated by a buyer betting on a decline, according to Wilkinson.
 agreed to buy ABB Ltd’s Meyer Steel Structures unit for about $600 million as the Swiss company sells assets acquired in the purchase of Thomas & Betts Corp.
 For buyers keeping watch of Annie’s, it’s never been cheaper.
 Given lackluster revenue growth in much of the food industry, the likelihood of a strategic buyer stepping in for Annie’s is increasing, according to David Palmer, a New York-based analyst at RBC.
 Asset Purchases The Fed trimmed bond-buying by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion, keeping it on pace to end the program late this year.
 The policy-making Federal Open Market Committee repeated it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 Even if GoPro can’t boost revenue from the videos, they function as advertisements that encourage more users to buy the hardware, said Mediatech Capital Partners LLC’s Porter Bibb.
 30, and is instead focusing on short-term fixes to buy time.
 Depending on the portfolio, one way to express that is to buy puts, derivative contracts that bet on a decline in the underlying security, he said.
 agreed to buy it.
 Dai-Ichi Life Insurance Co, Japan’s second-largest life insurer, is in talks to buy Protective Life for about 500 billion yen ($49 billion), said people with knowledge of the matter.
 Dai-Ichi Life said it’s considering buying a US.
 “This is not a good starting point for buying equities at this price.
 Leucadia agreed to buy Jefferies in 2012 and made Handler, who was running the investment bank, CEO of the combined company.
 He predicts profit growth will slow to 14 percent for the year and has a buy rating on the stock.
 Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch raised its rating on the shoemaker to buy from underperform.
 The company also will seek to buy high-balance mortgages from other members of the government-chartered system through a new facet of the Chicago FHLB’s mortgage partnership finance program, according to a statement today.
 Mill Valley, California-based Redwood will be the sole buyer of the loans through the initiative for three years, the companies said.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- AT&T Inc, operator of the TV-and-broadband business U-verse, told regulators that buying DirecTV would lead to a bundling of services that creates price competition with Comcast Corp.
 “The deferment will be a setback for explorers,” said Dhaval Joshi, a Mumbai-based analyst at Emkay Global Financial Services Ltd, who has an accumulate rating for Reliance and a buy rating for ONGC.
 “We’re almost at a point where it’s hard to calculate what is on television versus what’s on the Web” Nike says its TV ad buying during the World Cup is declining as it increasingly uses Facebook, Twitter and YouTube to reach fans in a battle with Adidas AG for supremacy in the global soccer-products market, which NPD Group estimates will grow by 8 percent this year to about $17 billion.
 pipeline operator, rose the most in more than five years after promising a 32 percent dividend increase after it buys control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion, creating among the biggest natural-gas transporters.
 He rates Williams as a buy and owns no shares.
 Just as Apple has the iTunes store so consumers can buy music and videos, and the App Store for downloading mobile apps, Amazon now has similar services.
 The Fed trimmed its monthly bond buying by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion, keeping it on pace to end the program late this year.
 raised Russian stocks to the equivalent of buy from the equivalent of sell, citing the “fading of the Ukraine crisis,” according to an e-mailed note today.
 Better Estimates “The July-September period may be one of the best quarters for Indian steel companies as alloy prices remain high and costs for buying coking coal fall,” said Giriraj Daga, analyst at Mumbai-based Nirmal Bang Equities Pvt.
 Electricite de France SA’s renewables unit agreed to buy 88 megawatts of equipment, Aarhus, Denmark-based Vestas said today in a statement on its website.
 and Bain Capital Partners LLC agreed to pay a total of $121 million to settle claims they cheated investors by suppressing competition in some of the biggest deals of the leveraged buyout boom before the financial crisis.
 Shareholders of companies that were acquired accused Goldman Sachs, Bain and banks and private-equity firms of conspiring to carve up the market for large leveraged buyouts, suppressing prices and depriving investors of billions of dollars.
 The case, which covers buyout deals for Clear Channel Communications Inc.
 “We continue to believe the case is meritless and baseless, but ultimately determined that it was best for our investors and our firm to put this matter behind us in light of the costs and distraction of six years of litigation” Freescale Deal Kirk Dahl, the lead plaintiff in the case, said he and others in the proposed class of investors owned shares in Freescale in 2006 when the chipmaker announced a buyout by firms including Carlyle and Blackstone for $176 billion.
 The firm was often both an investor and lender in leveraged buyouts before the 2008 financial crisis.
 Dallas-based Energy Future Holdings filed for bankruptcy in April, ending the biggest leveraged buyout on record and wiping out most of the $83 billion of equity that investors -- led by three of the world’s largest private-equity firms -- sank into the company.
 TXU marked the climax of an era when buyouts stretched into the tens of billions on dollars and Carlyle’s David Rubenstein predicted there would be a $100 billion LBO.
 After many of those deals faltered in the global financial crisis, private-equity investors mostly shied away from companies valued at $20 billion and up, arguing that such buyouts are often overpriced, overburdened with debt and too big to exit easily.
 Since the end of 2008, two private-equity buyouts priced above $20 billion have been announced, both in 2013.
 I just buy and hold” While falling interest rates have accelerated the demise of the industry, the disappearance of so many funds underscores how Taiwan’s relatively young population has little interest in plowing pension savings into bonds.
 While funds focused on local debt have vanished, the number buying foreign debt in Taiwan has more than doubled in 10 years to 49, according to the Securities Investment Trust & Consulting Association in Taipei.
 for its chip-manufacturing business, according to people familiar with the matter, after searching for a buyer for the money-losing unit since last year.
 The Armonk, New York-based company had been seeking a buyer for the division since at least last year, a person said at the time.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion.
 Deutsche Bank AG fell 38 percent after offering shareholders a discount of more than 20 percent to buy new stock.
 “If you buy something and it doesn’t work, you take it back,” he said.
 Yet when financial markets convulsed in 2008, the bank had to buy back the debt and the utility was locked into paying a higher rate.
 Senator Richard Blumenthal, however, called Valukas’s findings “the best report money can buy” and said it “absolves upper management, denies deliberate wrongdoing and dismisses corporate culpability” Lance Cooper, a lawyer for crash victims, said the report can help draw out more details in civil cases.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- Canada Pension Plan Investment Board is close to buying a 49 percent stake in Manhattan’s 1 Park Ave, a prewar office tower controlled by Vornado Realty Trust, according to a person with knowledge of the deal.
 Canadians are the biggest foreign buyers of commercial property in America, spending $114 billion in 2013, Real Capital data show.
 “Canadians, particularly institutional money managers, REITs, pension funds, are flush with capital due to the strong environment in Canada, and frankly they’ve run out of things to buy,” Fasulo said in a telephone interview.
 Partial Sale While Vornado sought a buyer for the entire 1 Park Ave.
 “The rich dont need to take loans, they buy cash,” he said.
 About 40,000 square feet of retail space and about 100,000 square feet of offices are available to be leased, providing the buyers with an opportunity to increase revenue, the people with knowledge of the agreement said.
 Pfizer’s record of presiding over large-scale layoffs after buying companies including Wyeth and Pharmacia Corp.
 took the power producer private for $48 billion in 2007 in the largest leveraged buyout on record.
 “We need to spend time talking with investors to get them buying in Europe and trading in the US,” he said at CNH’s UK.
 Similarly, White called for having dark pools disclose more about how they process buy and sell orders, a step that has already been adopted by some dark pool operators.
 Herbalife said the ruling, which holds that the practice of recruits buying merchandise for their own use doesn’t constitute a pyramid scheme, “validates” its business methods, which have been criticized by New York hedge fund manager Bill Ackman and are being investigated by the FTC.
 “This decision is good for Herbalife and good for the network-marketing industry because it clarifies the issue of paying commissions” to distributors buying products, he said by phone.
 “We do take some solace in that this new decision clarifies the law and, for the first time, recognizes the legitimacy of sales made to the many distributors who join a multilevel marketing company so that they can buy products at a discounted price for their own personal use,” Steinberg said in an e-mail.
 Customers could buy the music or purchase a retailer package enabling them to sell music and earn rewards to buy more music.
 They buy products at a discount and sell them at a markup.
 has agreed to buy electricity from the solar farms under a 15-year contract.
 Cornerstone Investors So-called cornerstone investors have committed to buy as much as A$17 billion of stock in the offering, Cooke said.
 lost 34 percent to C$253, the lowest since January, after agreeing to buy Papillon Resources Ltd.
 In September, Norway’s sovereign-wealth fund agreed to buy a 45 percent stake in nearby 7 Times Square for $684 million from Boston Properties.
 entered this fiscal year bracing for a yearlong slump in the third-biggest car-buying nation, with the industry’s trade group forecasting a record 16 percent sales plunge.
 The company reiterated its willingness to buy platinum mines following South Africa’s longest and most costly strike that’s been running since Jan.
 Corporate fliers are prized because they fly often and typically buy more-expensive, last-minute fares.
 agreed to buy a 199 percent stake in the company.
 “People are probably buying LightInTheBox on the guidance lift, given its low valuation,” Ella Ji, an analyst at Oppenheimer & Co.
 Since then, she’s prospered with a style of investing long associated with Fuss, who’s built among the best track records in the industry by buying bargain assets from stocks to high-yield bonds and avoiding Treasuries.
 While Gaffney considers many corporate bonds overvalued, she will buy them if she is getting paid for the risk.
 in January 2013 after founder Michael Dell began talks to take the Round Rock, Texas-based company private in a leveraged buyout.
 Gaffney continued buying Dell as prices fell.
 Cash in the fund has built to almost 15 percent from 7 percent as of March 31, because there are fewer attractive things to buy, said Gaffney.
 The transaction’s contracts included an “untested and rigid” process for forcing JPMorgan or other originators of the underlying loans to buy back misrepresented debt, S&P said.
 Corporate borrowing costs have plunged since the central bank announced its about 7 trillion yen a month buying of sovereign notes in April 2013 to banish deflation.
 That’s the message Ornskov offered yesterday in saying why his board and the company’s investors should leave Shire’s day-to-day management to him instead of handing it over to AbbVie Inc, which has bid to buy it.
 He said yesterday that Shire’s sales will double to $10 billion by 2020, spurred by treatments for rare diseases and by Lifitegrast, the experimental treatment for dry eye disease that Shire gained by buying SARcode Bioscience Inc.
 have climbed since AbbVie’s offer was disclosed, in speculation Shire may buy one of those companies as a defensive strategy, Tim Lugo, an analyst at William Blair & Co.
 Policy makers decreased the monthly pace of debt purchases by $10 billion, to $35 billion, the fifth cut of that amount since officials first announced they would taper bond buying in December.
 Fed View The policy-making Federal Open Market Committee repeated today that it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 The contracts give investors the right but not the obligation to buy or sell a security at a certain price.
 Frank Kendall, the Pentagon’s top weapons buyer, said last week the plane has yet to demonstrate sufficient reliability.
 Calls to buy Whole Foods shares are near the most expensive level since 2007 relative to puts, according to data on three-month options compiled by Bloomberg.
 Proceeds from the phone operator’s debut bond sale will go toward refinancing a 21 billion-euro bridge loan taken to buy the 53 percent stake in Maroc Telecom in November, Chief Financial Officer Serkan Okandan said in April.
 The company also operates in Nigeria and in November, it expanded its presence in Africa by agreeing to buy Vivendi SA’s stake in Morocco’s biggest wireless carrier for about 42 billion euros.
 Lumina began the process of looking for a buyer two years ago as Argentina fell out of favor with some foreign investors after the South American country moved to expropriate oil producer YPF SA.
 “We ran a thorough strategic process and we found the best buyer for this project,” he said, declining to identify other companies that may have been in competition with First Quantum for Lumina.
 The notice escalates the conflict between Las Vegas-based Caesars, purchased in a 2008 buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital, and some of its creditors.
 The buyout firms are among at least six groups exploring the purchase of Americana from the biggest shareholder, the Al-Kharafi family, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 Shell is selling 783 million shares to investors, while the Australian company is buying back the same amount of stock from Shell, The Hague-based company said today in a statement.
 Woodside CEO Peter Coleman, who scrapped a deal last month to invest as much as $26 billion in an Israeli gas project, said today the buyback won’t affect his company’s capacity to pursue acquisitions.
 Woodside also agreed to buy back shares for A$3649 each, a 15 percent discount.
 M&A Risk Although the buyback helps remove uncertainty surrounding Shell’s holding, “the upside in Woodside looks unclear,” Neil Beveridge, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Sanford C.
 unit for buying and selling the fuel, two people with knowledge of the appointment said.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Level 3 Communications Inc, which helps route traffic across the Web, agreed to buy TW Telecom Inc.
 As home automation technologies spread, appliance makers must educate buyers on security, said John Yeo, a director at Spiderlabs, Trustwave’s research unit.
 The applications requires buyers to create a username and password.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Canada’s two largest pension funds are expanding their holdings of New York real estate, announcing separate deals today to buy stakes in Manhattan office towers.
 Canadians were the biggest foreign buyers of commercial property in America last year and the second-largest in New York, behind the Chinese, according to Real Capital Analytics Inc.
 who rates Rockwood the equivalent of hold and Air Products buy.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Validus Holdings Ltd, the Bermuda-based reinsurer, agreed to buy Western World Insurance Group Inc.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- LGT Group, the bank owned by the family of the prince of Liechtenstein, agreed to buy more than 10 billion Swiss francs ($112 billion) of client assets from HSBC Holdings Plc’s Swiss private bank.
 A group of institutional investors, including ABN Amro Group NV and BNP Paribas SA, which is buying a stake will own 3336 percent of Euronext’s stock, ICE said.
 The changes won’t add to Comcast’s market power in program buying, the filing said.
 stocks we’re trying to buy came down on the negative news, and now it’s up,” said Michael, whose firm oversees C$900 million.
 Ex-Im arranges financing that helps foreign airlines buy jets, a service that Boeing said last month would support $10 billion of 2014 sales.
 Silver Age B-share markets, where foreign institutions and Chinese individuals are allowed to trade, were set up in 1992 to give local companies a way to raise funds from global investors banned from buying securities denominated in yuan.
 “After all, many international strategic investors are limited to buying stakes in Hong Kong, and are restricted in the mainland.
 China’s new-home prices last month fell from a year earlier in half the cities tracked by the government for the first time in two years as a slowing economy and excess supply deterred buyers.
 Instead, to meet the estimates, he entered into a secret side deal with EMC to buy more of the ZeusIOPS product than the customer had intended, in exchange for an undisclosed discount, the agency said.
 It will use the revenue from selling electricity to buy more power plants and to pay dividends.
 NextEra will own about 83 percent of NextEra Energy Partners following the offering, the prospectus shows, excluding an overallotment option for the underwriters to buy additional shares.
 The relationship isn’t a conflict of interest because it’s reviewed by independent directors at both companies, and it’s common for oil and gas companies to buy services from affiliates, Evans said.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Brookstone Inc, the luxury-gadget retailer, won bankruptcy court approval of its plan to sell the chain to a group of Chinese buyers for about $174 million that will be used to pay creditors.
 The buyers will continue operating almost all the 242 stores, closing two at most.
 The unusual disclosure of the e-mails was intended to bolster Allergan’s argument that Valeant is a flawed buyer -- and shows how antagonistic the battle between the two pharmaceutical companies has become.
 On June 17 it agreed to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
 recommended buying the stock.
 Piper Jaffray raised its rating on the search-engine company to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from neutral, saying its 23 percent stake in Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 increased 3 percent to $21015 after agreeing to buy Consorcio Comex SA for about $23 billion, picking off the Mexican coatings and paint company that competitor Sherwin-Williams Co.
 failed to buy.
 Sherwin’s attempt to buy the Mexican portion of the company was blocked by local antitrust regulators.
 Geberit gained 17 percent to 3093 Swiss francs after Goldman Sachs raised its rating on the company to buy from sell, citing the likelihood of further market-share gains in Europe and emerging markets.
 AT&T last month announced a $485 billion bid to buy satellite-television company DirecTV.
 She may well be right” The Federal Open Market Committee repeated yesterday it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after bond-buying ends.
 Eugene Gourevitch, a former friend and adviser to Maksim Bakiyev, the son of ex-Kyrgyzstan President Kurmanbek Bakiyev, was given a 63-month sentence today in federal court in Brooklyn, New York, for his role in a 2012 fraud involving a plan to buy shares in Facebook Inc.
 The Federal Reserve said today that while growth is bouncing back and the job market is improving, interest rates will stay low for “a considerable time” after it stops buying back bonds.
 There were 139,184 bids to buy wind, hydropower and biomass credits, the most since March, according to data from trader REConnect Energy Solutions Pvt.
 Regulators have imposed fines on distribution companies in northern Uttarakhand state and the Union Territory of Dadra and Nagar Haveli in western India, prodding the government-run utilities to buy credits to meet their obligations.
 Standard General will loan Charney funds to buy at least 10 percent of outstanding shares, according to the SEC filing yesterday.
 discount retailer, borrowed $2 billion in a two-part offering to buy back as much as $1 billion of notes.
 Nijdam has a buy recommendation on the stock with a 12-month price target of 24 euros.
 The IPO followed an earlier agreement by institutional investors -- including ABN Amro Group NV and BNP Paribas SA -- to buy 33 percent of Euronext at a 4 percent discount to yesterday’s offering price.
 “We believe operationally the company remains on track,” he said, reiterating his buy rating on American Apparel.
 Carl Icahn Investigators are reviewing large option trades in Clorox ahead of Icahn’s attempt to buy the company in 2011, as well as trading by golfer Phil Mickelson and sports gambler William Walters in Dean Foods in 2012, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 and 3G Capital agreed to buy HJ Heinz Co.
 While UBS strategist Bhanu Baweja reversed his long-term bearish view on the Indian rupee amid expectations Modi’s government will revive growth, he’s advising clients to sell Russia’s ruble and buy credit default swaps on Brazil to profit from the country’s worsening fiscal balance.
 Naspers is unlikely to make any significant acquisitions in the immediate future though it may explore opportunities in the online travel business after buying redBus, an Indian online ticketing platform, for about 1 billion rand last year.
 The actions will target online transaction platforms and group-buy websites, the agency said.
 China Modern Dairy Holdings Ltd, the nation’s largest raw-milk producer, added 36 percent to HK$320 after being raised to buy from hold at Jefferies Group LLC.
 “It’s up to the buyers to take the premium away, since underwriters haven’t negotiated this thing at arm’s length,” said Bruce Foerster, president of South Beach Capital Markets and co-author of the Capital Markets Handbook, who worked in equity issuance on Wall Street from 1974 to 1994.
 Canada Pension Still, the profitable company already has lined up a potential buyer of shares in Canada Pension Plan Investment Board, which has indicated interest in investing as much as $450 million to take a 10 percent stake through a private placement, the prospectus shows.
 “As we see more mission-critical workloads moving to the cloud, that plays to the strength of SAP,” said Sherlund, who recommends buying the company’s shares.
 It agreed to buy SeeWhy, a Boston-based maker of marketing software, on May 20 and earlier last month completed its acquisition of Fieldglass Inc, a maker of online human-resources software.
 Verizon closed a deal earlier this year to buy out Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in their wireless venture for $130 billion.
June 27 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG and ECE Projektmanagement GmbH, Germany’s largest shopping-center operator, are in talks to buy the Palais Quartier complex in Frankfurt for more than 800 million euros ($11 billion) from Rabobank Groep, according to two people with direct knowledge of the matter.
 Deutsche Bank, in a joint bid with ECE, plans to buy the commercial property for investment funds managed by its Deutsche Asset & Wealth Management unit, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 Investors are buying German commercial properties to benefit from steady rental returns in Europe’s largest economy, amid scarce investing opportunities in other fixed income markets as interest rates remain low.
 The issue for investigators is that if all of that is legal, is it illegal to buy a stock based on the information?” Is this just a case of the SEC and Justice with a new law and itchy trigger fingers, or is it all really this bad? *** All this over the see-through pants? Lululemon goofed with those too-sheer yoga pants a little more than a year ago, and it’s been downhill ever since.
 The company is trying to hold off founder and former Chairman Dennis Wilson, who the Wall Street Journal says hired Goldman Sachs to “shake up” the board, sell his stake or work with private-equity firms on a buyout.
 Have you ever been to Indiana, Pennsylvania? You could buy the entire town, the college there and the Jimmy Stewart Museum commemorating the actor’s boyhood home for $12 billion.
 And the cement industry buys tons of limestone.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- China Mobile Ltd, the world’s largest mobile-phone company by subscribers, agreed to buy an 18 percent stake in Thailand’s True Corp.
 China Mobile last year scrapped an agreement to buy a stake in Taiwan’s Far EasTone Telecommunications Co.
 In February, Facebook agreed to buy startup WhatsApp Inc.
 The cash will be used to finance buyouts of mid-sized firms.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks were little changed, with the Stoxx Europe 600 Index capping its fourth straight quarterly gain, as contracts to buy previously owned US.
 Bank of America cut the senior and subordinated bonds of the Portuguese lender to underweight from overweight, similar to a change to sell from buy.
 Hensarling, a Texas Republican, has called for the abolition of the bank, which helps foreign companies buy US.
 “I think the imperative for Ex-Im is there” Timmons said recent legislative proposals to prevent companies from buying overseas counterparts to lower their tax bills -- a practice known as an inversion -- underscore the need for comprehensive changes to the tax code, including a corporate rate below 25 percent.
 Medtronic’s Deal The prospect of lower tax rates through a tax inversion are a reason in Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion purchase of Covidien Plc and Pfizer Inc’s more than $100 billion effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 As the Fed pares its bond buying program and economists forecast a more robust expansion in the US, Wall Street prognosticators said at the start of the year that yields had to rise as central banks started tightening monetary policies.
 He outperformed 99 percent of peers in 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, by being early to see the weakness in the housing market, and trailed 66 percent of similar funds in 2013 when the debt he held lost value after the Fed hinted it would begin to scale back its bond buying program.
 fell 8 percent as the miner announced a pact to buy Cadillac Mining Corp.
 Amaya Gaming jumped 42 percent to C$20 after announcing the $49 billion deal to buy PokerStars.
 Pilot Gold lost 8 percent to C$150 after saying it would buy Cadillac at a 121 percent premium to its closing price on June 12.
 After trimming its monthly asset purchases by $10 billion yesterday, the Federal Open Market Committee said it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after bond-buying ends.
 Indian Airlines agreed to buy the Airbus planes after it got guarantees that the aircraft sold by the manufacturer would not cost more than those bought by Southeast Asian carriers.
 “The more things change, the more they stay the same” Under last week’s IFT ruling, Televisa and America Movil are forbidden from buying exclusive rights to the Mexican soccer league finals, the Mexican national men’s soccer team matches, the Summer Olympics opening and closing ceremonies and a selection of World Cup soccer matches.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP represented Element Financial Corp, the Toronto-based equipment finance company, on its agreement to buy PHH Corp’s North American fleet-management business for $14 billion.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- Shire Plc became a hot property in health care by buying promising drugs, not developing them in-house.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Numericable Group, the cable carrier that agreed in April to the $23 billion acquisition of mobile operator SFR, agreed to buy Virgin Mobile in France from Virgin Group Ltd.
 A BNDES official said that the loan is part of the bank’s program called Special Agency for Industrial Financing, known as Finame, which requires companies that borrow money to buy their equipment from local producers.
 tapped Jefferies Group LLC to lead a $725 million term loan backing its purchase of landscape business ValleyCrest Companies LLC, using a different group of underwriters than the one that arranged debt for its buyout just six months ago, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 and Royal Bank of Canada were among lenders who helped finance the buyout, and aren’t involved in the financing for the ValleyCrest deal, Bloomberg data show.
 You could buy a spottedowl a spotted Corvette with that.
 “As a buy-and-hold investor with a core focus on credit discipline, we are excited to partner with Varagon,” Brian Schreiber, deputy chief investment officer for AIG, said in an e-mail.
 It has committed to buy 87 jetliners, with a list value of about $487 billion, for deliveries scheduled through 2021.
 to buy 76 shopping centers from American Realty Capital Properties Inc.
 In January, Blackstone teamed up with DDR to buy 46 US.
 DDR has the right of first offer to buy 10 of the assets, according to the statement.
 In 2011, he pushed for a sale of bleach maker Clorox Co, whose brands include Glad trash bags and Hidden Valley salad dressing, even offering to backstop the process with his own bid if a buyer wasn’t found.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 A pickup in inflation lessens the threat of a prolonged drop in prices that hurts economic growth, giving Fed officials reason to continue to scale back their unprecedented bond-buying program.
 Some 62 percent of 58 economists in a Bloomberg survey predict the Fed will halt bond buying at its October meeting.
 Deal Structure In order for the combined company to be based in Canada, the deal is structured as if QLT is buying Auxilium.
 Buyers Missing “Over the past year, when the market was on new highs, customers were very aggressive buyers of VIX calls and call spreads,” Mark Caffray, who brokers contracts on the index for clients at Chicago-based PTR Inc, said in an interview.
 “There really has not been aggressive buyers and the market has continued to make new highs.
 agreed to buy the life insurer for 5822 billion yen ($57 billion).
 The discount retailer said in a conference call that it plans to spend $11 billion on share buybacks.
 scrapped an agreement last month to buy a quarter of Leviathan, Israel’s largest gas field, for as much as $26 billion.
 and Shire Plc as potential Santhera buyers.
 The buyout firm acquired a “significant” stake in December 2012.
 While energy investors are trying to sue the government, the dispute isn’t cause for concern for those buying and selling Norwegian kroner, according to HSBC Bank Plc.
 Crew Group Inc’s buyout shoes.
 Express, the clothing retailer targeting shoppers in their 20s, would be valued at $23 to $27 a share in a sale based on similar retail buyouts in recent history.
 Comparable transactions include the Hot Topic buyout, as well as deals for J.
 Leveraged buyouts have lost their popularity in the past year as US.
 The EU’s investigation found that Santa Clara, California-based Intel impeded competition by giving rebates to computer makers from 2002 until 2005 on the condition that they buy at least 95 percent of chips for PCs from Intel.
 Federal Trade Commission in August 2010 and agreed not to give computer makers discounts or other inducements in exchange for promises they will buy chips exclusively from Intel.
 “We are now taking buy-and-hold investing up a level with greater choice and flexibility,” Patrick Dunne, iShares’ head of global markets and investments, said in the statement.
 The policy-making Federal Open Market Committee repeated it expects the benchmark interest rate to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond buying ends.
 People who saw it said they were 30 percent to 40 percent more likely to buy the product.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Neste Oil Oyj, a Finnish oil refiner, agreed to buy algae oil from US-based Renewable Algal Energy to turn into clean diesel.
 Amaya Gaming Group Inc, a maker of gambling equipment and systems, is near an agreement to buy the parent of PokerStars, the world’s biggest poker website, according to a person with knowledge of the process.
 agreed to buy DBApparel, a French lingerie and underwear maker, from Sun Capital Partners Inc.
 advised investors to buy shares in the Spanish lender.
 Banco Popular gained 46 percent to 545 euros after JPMorgan upgraded its rating to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from neutral.
 Institutional investors including Blackstone Group LP will buy 168 million Gecina shares for 92 euros each, Metrovacesa said in a statement on June 7.
 New York time today its commitment to buy Tower for $250 a share, as the company faces increased supervision from a Massachusetts regulator.
 That agreement called for buying Tower for $3 a share, a price that was later lowered to $250.
 “There is no other solution than to progressively switch to a market-based approach for our long-term contracts” European gas buyers tied to long-term contracts with suppliers including Russia’s Gazprom and Norway’s Statoil ASA have sought a link to regional spot rates rather than crude as the two prices diverged when the 2008 crisis curbed demand and made gas available at hubs cheaper.
 That pushed companies from EON SE to Eni SpA to seek reviews of long-term contracts through talks or arbitration as they incurred losses buying gas at higher oil-linked prices and selling it to customers at lower market rates.
 Even as Boeing talks with Emirates about an order for the upgraded 747-8, the carrier played down the chances of a deal because it’s buying 150 Boeing 777X jets.
 “With the RBA clearly going no where for a long time to come, whenever volatility falls the carry attraction of the Aussie increases, which seems to be overriding every other factor at the moment” In carry trades, investors buy high-yielding assets using money from nations with lower interest rates.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Linn Energy LLC agreed to buy oil and natural gas-producing acreage across six US.
 Linn was formed to buy already producing oil and gas fields and seek to boost output.
 who rates Linn at buy, LinnCo at strong buy and owns neither.
 who rates Devon at buy and doesn’t own the shares.
 The two buyout firms have met with investment banks in the past month to discuss potential offers for the assets, which may fetch more than 5 billion euros, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 Blackstone Group is among the buyout firms that have decided against bidding, one person said.
 Boeing’s talks with Emirates are at an early stage, and Wojick didn’t say how many aircraft the gulf carrier may want to buy, speaking in an interview in Doha, Qatar, at the annual general meeting of the International Air Transport Association.
 More Jumbos Even with 90 superjumbos still to be delivered, Emirates is prepared to buy additional double-decker jumbos should Airbus commit to adding new engines with better fuel efficiency, Emirates Chief Commercial Officer Thierry Antinori said in a May 20 interview.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- WinWater Home Mortgage LLC, a buyer of the loans affiliated with former Deutsche Bank AG banker Neil Ahuja’s Premium Point Investments LP hedge fund, is planning its first sale of bonds without government backing, according to a person with knowledge of the deal.
 The non-agency mortgage-bond market has contracted as banks seek jumbo mortgages to hold as investments and bond buyers demand higher relative yields, after showing signs of reviving from its paralysis following the 2008 financial crisis.
 Arabtec is in talks to buy a large European company and may tap the bond market in the second half to pay for the deal, Ismaik said in April.
 He first worked for Wal-Mart in 1994 as a manager trainee and an assistant buyer.
 Palo Alto Networks, based in Santa Clara, California, and founded by former Juniper employees, will pay $75 million in cash as well as $100 million in common shares and warrants to buy common stock, according to a May 28 statement from Juniper.
 “We’re buying protection, not because we’re negative, but because it’s so cheap that why wouldn’t we?” Burchell, who helps oversee about C$7 billion ($65 billion), said by phone on June 12.
 “People may be buying protection at a very good price, but maybe protection they don’t need,” John Manley, New York-based chief equity strategist at Wells Fargo Funds Management, said in a phone interview on June 12.
 In that transaction, the car-rental business will keep the name Hertz and get cash proceeds of about $25 billion to pay down debt and support a $1 billion share buyback.
 “While the continuing and increased accounting issues make us apprehensive, we would point out that so far they are all non-cash and non-fleet issues,” said Daddino, who has a buy rating on the shares.
 The lender, which operates 631 branches in the UK, has already pledged to give individual investors one free share for every 20 they buy to a maximum value of 2,000 pounds.
 Insurer Allianz SE in February agreed to buy an 833 percent stake in Bayern Munich for 110 million euros, deepening its sponsorship of the Bundesliga title-holder.
 Investors will be able to buy 18 stapled securities for every 100 they already own at subscription price of HK$684 a share, the company said in a filing.
 HKT agreed in December to buy the CSL mobile-phone business in Hong Kong as Li seeks to boost scale in a market with about twice as many subscribers as people.
 The Melbourne-based company lost more than A$2 billion ($19 billion) writing down assets after buying wireless and cable businesses in Asia.
 Jonathan Collegio, vice president of public affairs for the National Automobile Dealers Association, said that “it’s up to each state and their legislature to determine what’s best for their residents and the good news is we’re seeing that happening” Organizations including the Consumer Federation of America and the Center for Auto Safety have supported the push by Tesla, saying buyers would benefit from having a choice.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Yandex NV, Russia’s largest web search engine, agreed to buy car information and advertising site Autoru for about $175 million to expand into the classifieds business.
 Treasury yields have defied expectations by falling, not rising, even as the Fed curtails its bond buying.
 “There would be significant interest from strategic and financial buyers who could recognize massive synergies from an acquisition” Icahn disclosed earlier this month that he’d amassed a 94 percent stake in the discount retailer and planned to seek talks with management.
 In 2011, he pushed for a sale of bleach maker Clorox Co, whose brands include Glad trash bags and Hidden Valley salad dressing, even offering to backstop the process with his own bid if a buyer wasn’t found.
 He succeeded in pushing Apple to boost its buybacks and dividend.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The arrangement comes as Medtronic is seeking to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc for more than $40 billion, according to a person familiar with the talks.
 Price Increases Increasing property prices hurt affordability for prospective buyers trying to get into the market, at the same time they also help homeowners feel wealthier and may keep boosting profits for developers.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 This has made it more important for investors to find alternative ways to buy and sell, and to glean accurate information on their own about what prices they can feasibly attain.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA is in talks to buy Mediaset SpA’s 22 percent stake in Distribuidora de Television Digital SA to gain full ownership of the Spanish pay-TV company, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Telefonica said on June 2 that it agreed to buy a 56 percent stake in DTS from Promotora de Informaciones SA for 750 million euros to increase its holding to 78 percent.
 Mediaset Espana has 15 days from when the DTS board informs it of terms of the deal to exercise a preferential right to buy the asset.
 offer alternatives to paying for a cable subscription, though require customers to buy hardware that can cost hundreds of dollars and limit users’ ability to watch live broadcast programming.
 “It’s going to be essential that who they hire as a successor buys into the vision or strategy CIBC has” Whoever the board chooses, the new CEO will have to outline a new strategy for growth, said investors including Barry Schwartz of Baskin Financial Services Inc.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc, the second-biggest manufacturer of jetliner engines, signaled that it’s ready to sit out a boom in industrial mergers, opting instead for a 1 billion-pound ($17 billion) share buyback.
 company will use proceeds from the sale of energy assets to Siemens AG to reward shareholders and that “no material acquisitions are planned” Rolls-Royce said in January it had failed to buy Waertsilae Oyj, the No.
 1 maker of marine engines for tankers, cruise vessels and warships, while Daimler AG in April compelled it to buy full control of a diesel-engine venture at a cost of 243 billion euros ($33 billion).
 “This is now removed, at least for the foreseeable future” Liberum analyst Ben Bourne said that Rolls would have been able to renew a takeover bid for Helsinki-based Waertsilae post July, adding that the buyback represents a “massive vote of confidence in their cash flow,” especially coming so soon after the transaction with Daimler.
 Armstrong has also faced suits by consumers claiming they were misled by him into buying energy drinks and his autobiographies.
 “It would have a double-digit rise at least if subsidies were eliminated,” Luana Helsinger, an oil and gas analyst at brokerage GBM Brasil, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock and expects output growth of this year of about 6 percent, said by telephone from Rio.
 “We consider it a net positive development since we prefer New World Development to focus its investment on Hong Kong rather than China properties” New World Development, controlled by the family of Hong Kong billionaire Cheng Yu-tung, proposed in March to buy shares of the China unit for HK$680 each, a 32 percent premium to the last price before the offer.
 “It facilitates vote rigging in both directions” The headcount rule also came into spotlight during the attempted buyout of telecommunications company PCCW Ltd.
 Aspen has spurned Endurance, saying the would-be buyer has no experience making large transactions and that the two Bermuda-based insurers wouldn’t be a good match.
 Earlier this month, Facebook also said it was buying Pryte, a provider of technology that lets smartphone users download applications using temporary mobile data allowances.
 “The extensions will give the firms additional time to address the capital-planning weaknesses identified by the Federal Reserve” The tests help determine whether a bank can increase dividends and stock buybacks.
 Corbat’s Plan Chief Executive Officer Michael Corbat, 54, has said previously that Citigroup will focus on preparing for the 2015 stress test rather than requesting additional buybacks or dividend increases this year.
 The company also will seek to buy back a warrant for more than 2 million shares that was given to the Treasury as part of the bailout package that allows the holder to buy common stock at $67 each.
 A buyback would need approval from the Treasury, which could opt to sell the warrants to the public.
 “The bet that the broader entertainment consumer would buy the console this early in the cycle hasn’t panned out,” said Brian Blau, an analyst at Gartner Inc.
 The serious gamer is “the person who is going to buy the console today” The focus on TV, music and movies put off some gamers who fretted they were no longer the priority.
 “What we’ve seen in the past is that early in the generation most of the people that buy consoles early end up buying both,” Mehdi said.
 It will seek to buy equity or debt in distressed or stressed businesses with an eye toward eventually taking control of the companies.
 The Las Vegas-based company has been exploring a sale for two months, hosting management presentations for would-be buyers, Reuters reported, citing people familiar with the matter.
 IGT could be sold for more than $20 a share, according to Steven Wieczynski, an analyst at Stifel Nicolas & Co, who has a buy rating on the shares.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- European natural gas buyers that renegotiated supply contracts with Russia’s OAO Gazprom in the past 14 months got a price rebate of as much as 20 percent, the International Center for Natural Gas Information said.
 European natural gas buyers are pushing to renegotiate long-term supply contracts after the premium of oil-linked fuel to that on hubs rose to the most since 2009.
 Those include nine for supplies from the BP Plc-led Shah Deniz project in Azerbaijan with European buyers.
 The company also announced in January a $5 billion stock buyback plan.
 Under the new proposal, Mitsubishi would offer to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s grid and renewables units instead of 20 percent, and Siemens would offer to create a rail-signaling joint venture with Alstom, said Claude Mandart, a representative of the CFE-CGC union who met with the minister.
 Spurred by such App Store downloads, people keep coming back to buy the latest iPhones and iPads, which generate more than 72 percent of Apple’s annual $171 billion in revenue.
 Apple rolled out new search tools to help customers find programs to download, as well as app bundles so they can buy a batch of apps at a discounted price.
 “You need to spend hours in line to buy milk, corn flour and now pants” Consumer Shortages The situation showcases the hardships of doing business in Venezuela, where a shambolic economy has led to shortages in everything from dollars to toilet paper and medicines as the country grapples with 61 percent annual inflation, the highest in the world.
 “It was good to buy here today as I could buy three blouses for 1,000 bolivars when it’s only possible with that money to buy one from street vendors in downtown Caracas,” she said.
 Default Odds Caesars was purchased in 2008 in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital and is fighting with its creditors over the March deal that moved the Bally’s, Quad and Cromwell casino-hotels in Las Vegas, as well as Harrah’s New Orleans, from its operating unit to affiliate Caesars Growth Partners LLC.
 “Clearly Yahoo’s valuation is almost entirely driven at the moment by what’s happening with Alibaba” He has a buy rating on the stock.
 Investors have been awaiting these additional details as they weigh whether or not to buy shares in the IPO.
 and Rio Tinto Group, the world’s two biggest mining companies, may need to rein in the size of widely anticipated share buybacks if this year’s 30 percent slump in iron ore deepens in the second half.
 “The most pertinent question is whether Rio will be bold enough to proceed with a much-mooted share buyback in early 2015 if iron ore ends 2014 on a weak note,” Macquarie analyst Jeff Largey wrote in a June 24 report.
 The bank estimates BHP could buy back 5 percent of its market value and Rio 10 percent, about $19 billion of shares at yesterday’s prices.
 “We question whether Rio may look to limit the scope of a potential buyback,” Largey said.
 “A weaker-than-expected iron ore price and a share buyback may limit future funding flexibility” Rio Chief Executive Officer Sam Walsh said in a December interview that the company’s drive to strip out more than $23 billion of costs since the start of 2013 would provide the board with options to return cash to investors.
 If the price of iron ore averages below $100 a ton this year, BHP and Rio “may struggle to justify a share buyback program and expect to meet credit metrics,” Largey said.
 Still, if the price rebounds toward the bank’s estimated second-half average of $108 a ton, a buyback could be justified, he said.
 It may buy back $3 billion to $5 billion of shares next year, Jefferies LLC analyst Chris LaFemina estimated after Rio reported $102 billion of underlying 2013 profit in February.
 Rigid mortgage standards and higher prices are tipping would-be buyers into the rental market, while employment growth is increasing the pool of potential tenants, said Jonathan Miller, president of New York-based Miller Samuel.
 Homebuyers last year rushed to complete deals as a spike in mortgage rates from near-record lows in May threatened to make homes more expensive.
 “My concern is that we are being asked to buy stocks now at price-earnings multiples and price-to-book values significantly higher than the levels of, say, 18 months ago,” Ambrose said.
 Walgreen owns 45 percent of Zug, Switzerland-based Alliance Boots GmbH and is considering buying the rest of Europe’s largest pharmacy chain, according to a report in the Sunday Times of London.
 Discussions had been held with several potential buyers, including private equity firms, before the divestment process ground to a halt, Chief Financial Officer Gosse Boon said in an interview today.
 Time will tell” The Dutch company, based in Amersfoort, undertook a four-month sale process to find a buyer as it focuses on animal-nutrition and fish-feed products.
 Prior to either company making a bid, Hillshire had itself made a $66 billion offer to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, producer of brands including Vlasic pickles.
 For JBS, which slaughters and packages beef and poultry, buying Hillshire would push it further into higher-margin, branded prepared foods.
 A condition of both the Tyson and Pilgrim’s earlier offers is that Hillshire scrap an agreement to buy Birds Eye frozen-foods maker Pinnacle Foods.
 ECB President Mario Draghi told a press conference in Frankfurt the central bank will buy “simple and transparent” notes that are backed by non-financial private sector assets.
 Fed Target In the US, where policy makers are still buying $35 billion of bonds per month, Fed Chair Janet Yellen has said the central bank plans to keep its interest-rate target low for a considerable time after its completes the process of winding down purchases.
 He recommends buying shares of companies from Indonesia, Taiwan and Vietnam.
 Beltone Financial Holding SAE and two other investors is seeking to buy a 20 percent stake in EFG-Hermes Holding SAE a day after Saudi Arabia’s King Abdullah called for an international effort to raise funds for the country’s battered economy.
 Deutsche Bank analysts led by Vivian Hao cut their rating on SouFun from buy on June 12, saying in an e-mailed research note that there is a “fair chance” the company will lower its 2014 earnings guidance because of its plan to discount some listing fees by 40 percent.
 Another e-mail from April 2007 shows that managing director Peter Sack said that he was inclined to securitize loans that are “close calls or marginally non-compliant” and risk having to buy the loans back “rather than adding to sludge in inventory” Financial Crisis Credit Suisse is one of a group of lenders sued by MBIA in the wake of the financial crisis and accused of making misrepresentations about the characteristics of loans underlying mortgage-backed securities in order to induce the insurer to guarantee the bonds.
 Past declines in industry software sales “are largely cyclically driven and the industry is poised to grow sustainably in late ’14,” said Olson, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the retailer’s shares.
 Riley & Co, wrote in a research note today that Google “could be aggressive with this service and the uncertainty should create an overhang for the next few months” He reduced his rating for Webcom shares to the equivalent of a hold from buy.
 The registration tool lets businesses easily buy and transfer domains and then send feedback on the experience.
 The shares earlier climbed as much as 43 percent after the Wall Street Journal reported that Wilson is considering selling his stake or working with private-equity firms on a buyout of the company.
 The slump left Lululemon trading near its lowest earnings multiple since 2009, which may encourage an opportunistic buyer to make an approach, said Scott Rostan, founder of Training the Street.
 Adidas AG also would make sense as a buyer because the $22 billion sporting-goods maker could use its international expertise to help guide Lululemon’s overseas expansion, Wedbush Inc.
 Valeant has twice raised its bid to buy Allergan as part of its strategy to become one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers.
 Williams Cos, the company that controls Williams Partners, agreed to buy control of Access Midstream from Global Infrastructure Partners II, Williams said in a statement today.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Saudi Arabia’s Olayan Group is in talks to buy a majority stake in beverage maker Gulf Union Food Co.
 ‘Oil prices drive energy stocks’’ ETFs, which allow investors to trade shares that represent a broader index of stocks, are gaining popularity as a way to invest in industries such as oil and natural gas without having to buy multiple equities.
 Consumers have so far continued buying GM cars and trucks with little regard for the recalls, and the company’s stock has remained buoyant on signs that sales are holding up in the crucial US.
 Among 24 analysts tracked by Bloomberg, 17 say to buy the stock and only three say sell.
 sales probably fell 3 percent, which is in line with the company’s lower incentives last month, John Krafcik, president of car-buying website TrueCar Inc, said last week.
 “It’s very easy for the consumer to look at it and say, ‘This is different; it was a different time and these cars are at least worthy of my consideration’” Testament to Detroit’s comeback is GM, which is growing even as it moves this year to recall 14 million vehicles in the US, including the 259 million small cars no longer in production for a faulty ignition switch linked to 13 deaths -- suggesting buyers see the flaws as a legacy of the past company, rather than a defining moment of today’s GM.
 “Breaking through the clutter and reaching younger buyers through traditional advertising is proving more and more difficult in this always-on, digital generation,” Tom Peyton, assistant vice president of advertising and marketing for Honda’s US.
 agreed to buy 112 acres (45 hectares) from Union Pacific Corp.
 The railroad chose Miami-based Lennar as the buyer after a bidding process that attracted other suitors, said the person, who asked not to be named because the agreement is private.
 The banks knew the loans underlying trillions of dollars of residential mortgage-backed securities were misrepresented and failed to invoke their rights to force the sellers to buy them back or act against servicers, causing billions of dollars in losses, according to complaints filed June 18 in New York State Supreme Court in Manhattan.
 It has more than 110,000 customers and expects to install as much as 1 gigawatt this year, using panels it buys from other companies, mostly in China.
 Musk has said having control over production capacity will drive down Tesla’s costs, just as buying Fremont, California-based Silevo Inc.
 corporate legal case at the time, Texaco struck a 1984 deal to buy Getty for $101 billion after Pennzoil, formed from a company co-founded by George HW.
 Bush, claimed it had a prior agreement to buy Los Angeles-based Getty.
 Drawn by the Reserve Bank of Australia’s decision to stop lowering interest rates, Japan’s money managers have been net buyers every month this year through April, purchasing a total of 3564 billion yen ($35 billion) of the country’s sovereign debt.
 “Japanese tend to see any yen strength as an opportunity to buy Australian assets” At 382 percent for 10 years, Australia’s debt has the highest yield of bonds holding top credit grades from the three main rating companies.
 The company said in a statement it may buy back up to 35 percent of its outstanding shares.
 We’ll use that to invest much more aggressively in the US” Under the terms of its agreement to buy Covidien, Medtronic has the right to cancel the takeover if Congress changes the tax laws in a way that results in the combined company being considered a US.
 Most importantly, companies can get an offshore address by buying a smaller foreign company, as long as the overseas firm’s shareholders end up owning at least 20 percent of the combined company.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee has pared its monthly asset-buying to $45 billion and said further reductions in measured steps are likely.
 Chopra estimates about 15 of India’s 21 gigawatts of wind capacity was built for investors buying projects to claim accelerated-depreciation benefits.
 New York-based Pfizer also agreed to buy about 10 percent of the French biotechnology company’s capital through newly issued shares at 925 euros apiece, 49 percent above yesterday’s close.
 Orix expressed interest in buying Hyundai Securities and its two financial units, Yonhap News Agency reported May 30.
 A group led by buyout firm Warburg Pincus LLC that includes Singapore’s Temasek Holdings Pte agreed to the purchase, which values the businesses at 975 million euros ($133 billion), the Santander, Spain-based lender said today in a filing.
 While equity investors appeared willing to chalk it up to a brutal winter and look forward to forecasts of growth in the rest of the year, bond buyers markets appeared more cautious.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- A cottage that sold for C$74 million ($69 million) in Ontario’s Muskoka region highlights the increasing trend of younger, wealthier buyers investing in vacation spots as they profit from housing booms in major cities.
 Families and investors have more cash to buy a second home as a booming real estate market increases the value of their residences, according to a report Re/Max released today.
 As a result, you’re seeing an increase in the number of cottages changing hands and a steady price increase” The average buyer in Port Carling, a strip of land bordered by three lakes, is 35 to 45 years old, younger than previous years, according to the report.
 “Before coming to buy a project here, Chinese companies will now do more research before making a decision,” Gao said in an interview.
 aluminum producer agreed to buy UK.
 investors who buy into their precarious VIE structures” Revenue generated through Alibaba VIEs only accounted for about 12 percent, or 617 billion yuan, of sales in the year ended March, according to its SEC filing.
 solar-panel manufacturer, agreed to buy Skytron Energy from AEG Power Solutions GmbH to gain access to European photovoltaic power-plant control systems and expertise.
 Traders who are ready to buy or sell shares as needed, known as market makers, are paid rebates by an exchange.
 Most stock exchanges charge about 30 cents per 100 shares to firms that trade against standing buy and sell requests.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- European natural gas buyers are pushing to renegotiate long-term supply contracts as the premium of oil-linked fuel to that on hubs rises to the most since 2009.
 That has helped boost trading on regional hubs, with German volumes gaining 42 percent last year and buying and selling in the Netherlands climbing 10 percent, according to Trayport Ltd.
 Revisions, Refunds European buyers tied to long-term contracts with suppliers including Gazprom and Norway’s Statoil ASA have sought a link to spot rates rather than crude as prices diverged after the 2008 crisis curbed demand.
 “If you are a buyer under long-term oil-indexed contracts, bankruptcy is not far from the center of your mind,” Howard Rogers, director of gas research at the Oxford Institute of Energy Studies, said last month in Amsterdam.
 “If that rebate goes, you are buying high and selling low.
 It’s very difficult for buyers to play that game and win” Supplier’s Risk Traditional long-term contracts ensure secure supplies as they set annual volumes the producer needs to meet, Sergey Komlev, head of contracts structuring and price formation at Gazprom, said last month.
 The Federal Housing Administration, a mortgage insurer run by HUD that helps lower-income borrowers buy houses, is on pace to back only 500,000 loans for purchases this fiscal year, about half the number in fiscal 2010.
 At the hearing, Castro said he plans to navigate between helping lower-income homebuyers and avoiding the kind of financial stress that led to a bailout of the FHA in 2013.
 “My perspective, whether it relates to requirements for down payments or other measures, is that we achieve this balance to stay within the historic mission of the FHA to ensure that first-time homebuyers, that folks of modest means who are creditworthy, that they have the opportunity to reach the American dream of homeownership,” Castro said.
 Priced Out The FHA was created in the wake of the Great Depression to help first-time buyers and others without significant savings own a home.
 Last month they announced a program to cut premiums by about $300 a year for homebuyers who undergo housing counseling, and said the effort could reach about 100,000 borrowers in its first year.
 As a result, entry-level buyers are kept out of the market.
 The two companies buy loans and package them into guaranteed securities.
 In May he announced that he is loosening the rules under which banks are forced to buy back loans with origination flaws.
 And while we’re not anywhere near where we need to be yet, millions of families have been able to come up for air because they’re no longer underwater on their mortgages” Obama then introduced Castro, who recalled that his mother of Mexican descent had raised him and his twin brother Joaquin in rental housing because she couldn’t afford to buy a home.
 “I think it is great if someone wants to buy us,” Gehl said of comments from the head of Emirates Group’s Dnata ground-handling operation.
 A yen issue would attract interest from investors seeking securities with good ratings and an offering such as this would help boost secondary-market trading in the current buy-and-hold environment, he added.
 ‘Hard Time’ Bank of Tokyo-Mitsubishi’s sukuk plan comes amid speculation borrowing costs will soon increase with the Federal Reserve on track to end its bond-buying program by year-end and start raising interest rates in 2015.
 New Plant Instead of big-ticket acquisitions like Hillshire, BRF is considering buying smaller, local food companies in the Middle East, Galeazzi said.
 BRF completed the $649 million purchase of Abu Dhabi-based Federal Foods in April and agreed to buy 40 percent of Al Khan, a Sadia distributor in Oman, for $685 million in February.
 The company, which is buying diamond jewelry maker Hearts On Fire for $150 million, expects demand for jewelry to continue to rise as it joins luxury goods retailers including Burberry Group Plc and Coach Inc.
 analysts, including Edwin Fan, wrote in a note today reiterating a buy rating on the stock.
 “But we have a very high base from last year, and the economic uncertainties may limit our near-term growth” Cheng said the company will probably post a slower pace of sales growth this fiscal year on weaker economic expansion and as a government anti-corruption campaign deters some buyers.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc, Japan’s second-biggest bank by market value, would consider buying BNP Paribas SA’s US.
 It doubled its stake in Bank of East Asia Ltd, Hong Kong’s largest family-run lender, to 95 percent in 2012 and agreed to buy 40 percent of Indonesia’s PT Bank Tabungan Pensiunan Nasional for about $15 billion last year.
 won EU approval to buy Telefonica’s Irish business by pledging to help a virtual operator transform into a network operator.
 Leverkusen-based Bayer is seeking to buy Merck’s unit as it shifts its focus to brand-name treatments that can be sold directly to consumers.
 offered to buy Australian developer Australand Property Group for A$26 billion ($24 billion) in the Singapore real-estate company’s biggest proposed acquisition, trumping a bid by Stockland.
 “Geopolitical risk is causing some safe-haven buying that is giving support to Treasuries” Treasuries rose earlier as Iraq’s sectarian violence showed no sign of abating.
 KKR, which loaded First Data with debt to fund a $275 billion buyout before the onset of the financial crisis, marked it at 81 percent of cost as of March 31.
 It committed $12 billion of the new investment, with KKR’s balance sheet providing $700 million and its 2006 buyout fund another $500 million, according to a statement today from the New York-based firm.
 The Atlanta-based company, which processes payments for retailers, financial institutions and credit-card issuers, was hit hard by the pullback in consumer spending during the recession, losing money each quarter since the buyout, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Regardless of the choice, the capital injection is a significant positive, Gilbert said“It buys some time” Default Risk A gauge of First Data’s default risk dropped to the lowest since June 2007.
 KKR has had mixed success turning around deals made from its 2006 buyout fund.
 The agency that helps overseas companies buy US.
 The lender last year approved 3,842 requests to buy US.
 The owner says there are no buyers for the mine’s gold and even though the company pays income taxes and respects labor laws, it could be targeted by the police.
 “There’s a lot of resource development going on across the country and communities see where they are on the sidelines waiting, when in fact they would perhaps be able to buy an equity portion,” she said.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Nuance Communications Inc, the maker of speech-recognition software, rose the most in more than five years after reports the company is considering a sale and has talked to potential buyers including Samsung Electronics Co.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Moeller-Maersk A/S that make booking international freight as easy as reserving a hotel room or buying a sweater online.
 “To the extent that we can automate processes, we can speed up the processing time and make more accurate booking confirmations and invoices” Solutions range from shippers developing their own software to independent companies trying to make booking freight more like buying a plane ticket.
 in 2011 fended off an attempt by Elliott Advisors, part of a New York-based hedge fund founded by Paul Singer, to replace the board and seek a buyer.
 The Lima-based bank maintains a buy rating on both stocks.
 Goel said he and Raj Rajaratnam were “very good friends” and that Raj, a billionaire, loaned him $100,000 to buy a home in 2005 and $500,000 more the next year when Goel needed to support his ailing father.
 Xander, APG Xander Group, with about $2 billion of equity capital in property assets, and a consortium led by Dutch pension fund asset manager APG announced a $300 million venture in May that will buy commercial assets across India’s main office markets.
 ‘Aggressive Buyers’ Blackstone has become an “aggressive buyer” in the past two years as developers faced “liquidity issues and prices corrected,” said Bhaskar Chakraborty, a Mumbai-based analyst at IIFL.
 Most investors are buying completed offices that are income producing assets, said V.
 Retail investors are in a frenzy to buy” Infosys Ltd, India’s second-largest software maker, rose 19 percent, the most in two weeks.
 raised its rating on the stock to a strong buy from outperform and the price of gold climbed the most in two weeks.
 The unit was formed after JBS agreed to buy Seara food-processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais ($26 billion) in June 2013.
 rose 17 percent after saying it would buy Kentz Corp.
 fell 23 percent to C$1005 after saying it would buy August Resource Corp.
 Lonestar West Inc, an oil services company, gained 24 percent to C$386 after buying assets from Vamp Oilfield Services Inc.
 The IPO would follow Facebook Inc’s plans to buy WhatsApp Inc.
 Carney’s new limits may not be enough to tame risks emanating from the capital, where a shortage of properties and overseas buyers using cash are driving up home prices.
 makes its boldest bid yet to lure younger buyers to its laggard Lincoln line, incoming Chief Executive Officer Mark Fields has a chance to show he has the turnaround touch of predecessor Alan Mulally.
 Chief Operating Officer Fields, set to become CEO tomorrow when Mulally retires, convinced his boss that Lincoln was worth saving, to give Ford buyers a luxury brand to move up to when they’re ready to spend more, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the discussions were private.
 “And the propeller is hard to beat, it has a certain cachet” VanDyke said Lincoln hopes to attract buyers from Cadillac, Honda Motor Co.
 and its Acura brand, Toyota’s Lexus luxury line and from Ford buyers who want to move up.
 “We’ll be able to attract younger, first-time buyers, either young couples or those with small families,” VanDyke said.
 Achievable Estimates Equities are still worth buying because economic growth will pick up and make earnings estimates achievable, according to Samy Chaar, an investment strategist at Lombard Odier in Geneva.
 North-American investors held about 32 percent of shares in DAX companies at the end of 2013, followed by Continental European buyers with 19 percent, and Germans with 18 percent, the study, published yesterday, showed.
 companies to buy overseas counterparts in part to lower their bills.
 The desire for such an arrangement, known as a tax inversion, is a factor in Medtronic Inc’s $429 billion purchase of Covidien Plc and Pfizer Inc’s more than $100 billion effort to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 Strategic Sense While the inversion deals are likely to continue, tax savings wouldn’t be the sole factor driving a buyer, said Ferdinand Mason, a partner at the law firm Jones Day in London.
 company must buy a foreign company whose market value is at least 20 percent of the combined company.
 Aerion already has 50 letters of intent to buy, backed up by deposits of $250,000, Nichols says.
 That leaves some industry insiders doubtful that even billionaires will clamor to buy one.
 Last year, the company launched the fastest private jet on the market -- the $65 million G650, which can achieve an almost-supersonic speed of Mach 0925 -- and buyers lined up.
 Valeant dropped 23 percent as regulators rejected a drug being developed by Allergan Inc, which Valeant is trying to buy.
 The automaker, which also offers wholly online car purchases, is following larger competitors Bayerische Motoren Werke AG and Audi AG in developing a retail format that targets younger, media-oriented buyers in urban areas.
 That included buying plane tickets for family members and using corporate housing for friends and himself that wasn’t related to company business, according to the person.
 “It wouldn’t surprise me if someone else or another company makes an offer for NPSP at some point in the future also” Other Bidders? Other possible buyers for NPS include Sanofi, which acquired rare-disease drugmaker Genzyme Corp.
 ended an effort to buy AstraZeneca last month after the London-based company rejected its last bid.
 Muscular Dystrophy Shire also could consider buying Prosensa or Sarepta Therapeutics to expand in therapies for Duchenne muscular dystrophy, a rare genetic disorder, said Malik of Cenkos.
 Daiichi Sankyo rose 17 percent to 1,765 yen after Mizuho Securities raised the company’s rating to buy from neutral, saying new products will drive earnings growth.
 may sell sovereign bonds and and buy stocks to improve profitability ahead of the expected listing of parent Japan Post Holdings Co.
 16, 2011, the day Peltz offered to buy the company for up to $60 a share.
 The same question from 2011 remains: Who’s going to buy it? Analysts said at the time that Peltz’s offer could spur interest from Dollar General.
 A tie-up of the two retailers still makes sense, according to Daniel Binder, a New York-based analyst at Jefferies, who recommends investors buy both stocks because of the potential for a deal.
 David Tovar, a spokesman for Bentonville, Arkansas-based Wal-Mart, declined to comment on whether the company is interested in buying Family Dollar.
 drugmaker bidding to buy Shire Plc, raised its outlook for 2014 on prospects for its experimental cancer and multiple sclerosis drugs.
 Rocky Mountain Power, a unit of PacifiCorp, is buying the electricity under a 20-year contract.
 is buying OpenTable Inc.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Here’s a brain twister: Some investors have grown tired of junk-rated loans, but others are more eager than ever to buy the same debt bundled together and sliced into pieces.
 Principals at the private-equity firm Stone Point Capital LLC are seeking to capitalize on this boom in demand by starting a new closed-end firm focused mainly on buying the lowest-ranked tranches of CLOs.
 Those figures are indicative of the race to buy riskier assets that’s permeating almost every corner of the global debt markets.
 The dichotomy is in part a big buyer versus little buyer phenomenon.
 There’s evidence to give buyers such conviction: Moody’s Investors Service has predicted the global speculative-grade default rate will decline to 21 percent at year-end from 23 percent in May.
 private-equity firm is considering buying a stake in ASR, which has been government-owned since 2008, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private and no final decision has been made.
 Original Offer ASR will “formally engage in talks with several parties that could participate in a bid” after the finance minister’s plans are debated in Parliament, Daan Wentholt, a spokesman for ASR, said in an e-mail, declining to identify the potential buyers.
 With little growth in food sales, Tyson was salivating to get one of the few large, brand-name meat producers left to buy, the people said.
 “A lot of these legacy brands just can’t build, they need to buy it” Combining Tyson and Hillshire will create a company with $394 billion of annual sales and $12 billion of net income, according to data compiled by Bloomberg based on trailing 12-month figures.
 In 2010, Brazilian meat producer JBS SA, which owns 75 percent of Pilgrim’s Pride, made a run at buying Sara Lee mainly to get the Hillshire business, people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 Three months later, on May 12, Connolly announced an agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, maker of Birds Eye frozen foods and Vlasic pickles, among other brands, for $66 billion.
 While investors didn’t like the deal, pushing down Hillshire shares 32 percent the day it was announced, it sent a signal to JBS and Tyson that they needed to act quickly if they wanted to buy the company.
 Meanwhile, Hillshire said it hasn’t yet changed its agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods or made any recommendation on the Tyson offer.
 Debt stripped of protections for lenders is being raised for private-equity firms seeking to buy companies including Gates Global Inc.
 Gates’s buyout financing, which also included bonds, was marketed to investors with total leverage exceeding regulators’ guidelines.
 The outflows from loan mutual funds this year have been mitigated by newly formed CLOs, which are the biggest buyers of leveraged loans and whose pace of issuance has accelerated.
 Individual investors have deposited this year a net $21 billion in funds that buy US.
 The pools, which fueled the leveraged buyout boom in 2005-2007, raised about $83 billion last year.
 Investors have become more selective in what they buy as London has its busiest year in terms of IPOs since 2007.
 Acromas Holdings Ltd, owned by the private-equity firms, will retain 31 percent of the company after the sale to the investor group and plans to sell that to other buyers at the same valuation.
 “It’s more suited to India in the longterm” Indian e-commerce marketplaces get almost all their revenue from commissions they charge buyers on transactions, unlike Alibaba which is heavily reliant on advertising, said Sandeep Ladda, who runs the Indian technology practice of PricewaterhouseCoopers in Mumbai.
 Smartphones “Globally a lot of money comes from ads,” Ladda said in a phone interview“If you really want to make good money, you will need the ad pie” Flipkart said it charges buyers commissions of 3 percent to 25 percent.
 Smith & Wesson had benefited as concerns of tighter regulation following the December 2012 massacre at Sandy Hook Elementary in Newton, Connecticut, spurred enthusiasts to buy more guns.
 In the absence of new regulation, after the Senate rejected gun-buyer background checks a year ago, the frenzy has faded.
 “Long gun sales will decline about 25 percent in FY2015 and become a smaller percentage of Smith & Wesson’s sales” Krueger rates the shares buy.
 The outlook comes as the number of background checks carried out on people seeking to buy firearms declined in February, March and April, from the year earlier period, according to figures from the FBI’s National Instant Criminal Background Check System (NICS).
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm run by billionaires Henry Kravis and George Roberts, will buy a one-third stake in Acciona SA’s renewable-energy assets outside Spain for 417 million euros ($567 million).
 If GE buys Alstom, Mitsubishi Heavy will be no match for the enlarged company.
 Mitsubishi also offered to buy as much as 10 percent of Alstom, a stake valued at about 900 million euros, while Siemens will explore combining its rail assets with Alstom’s.
 Higher Valuations A year ago, analysts estimated that the company would be worth 44 percent more if the businesses were separated, in part because it would make it easier for a buyer to take over one or both divisions.
 Billionaire John Malone’s holding company, Liberty Media Corp, had offered to buy Barnes & Noble for about $1 billion in 2011, then dropped the bid in favor of buying $204 million in preferred shares.
 The firm also offered to buy 51 percent of the Nook business as an alternative deal.
 OAO Uralkali, the world’s largest potash producer, climbed 2 percent after Sberbank CIB raised the stock to buy on valuations and bets the potash market is recovering.
 Qatar Holding was part of an investor group that agreed to buy a stake in American Express Co’s business-travel unit for $900 million in March, while former Qatari Prime Minister Sheikh Hamad Bin Jassim Bin Jabr Al Thani is providing Deutsche Bank AG with a 21 billion-euro ($29 billion) cash infusion.
 before subsidies are reduced and is considering whether to buy new panel-making equipment.
 “The export figures weren’t as good as expected, and some investors seem to be buying dollars thinking the bottom of the dollar-won exchange rate is firmly set,” said Park Daebong, a Seoul-based currency trader at Nonghyup Bank.
 The idea, abandoned after market conditions worsened, was to drive holders of such credit-default swaps to sell and help Goldman Sachs traders buy at reduced prices, according to the report.
 “Farmers are spending less bags of soybean to buy the same amount of fertilizer, so they are anticipating the purchases to hedge their cost of production” After tumbling 13 percent against the dollar last year, the Brazilian real is the best performer among major emerging-market currencies this year, gaining 44 percent.
 While there are no plans to do so, it’s still “a possibility” that Deutsche Boerse could buy NYSE Euronext, Beninca said.
 (KW) are among an influx of overseas buyers of Irish real estate as the market recovers from a crash in 2008.
 The disagreement spilled into public view last month when Amazon tried to dissuade its customers from buying Hachette titles on its website, removing discounts from some books or delaying shipments by as much as five weeks when items typically ship within three to five days.
 Other retailers, meanwhile, are seeking to take advantage of the spat by winning over publishers and book buyers.
 Books were traditionally sold under what is known as the wholesale model, with retailers buying at wholesale and setting their own price to consumers, typically double the wholesale cost.
June 15 (Bloomberg) -- Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd, a Japanese industrial group, is offering to buy a stake of about 10 percent in Alstom SA, the Nikkei newspaper reported.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- While AT&T Inc’s $95-a-share bid to purchase DirecTV puts a lid on prices of contracts to buy the stock, options traders are willing to dish out more for protection in case the deal falls apart.
 He almost doubled the profit of Time Warner Cable through the growth of its Internet business and delivered about $7 billion in stock buybacks.
 In October, toward the end of his tenure, Time Warner Cable agreed to buy DukeNet Communications LLC for $600 million.
 Some banks, which typically own the highest-rated slices of CLOs, are trying to induce managers to alter the terms of their existing funds by refusing to buy their new ones unless they do, according to Sajid Zaidi, global head of CLO origination and structuring at Morgan Stanley in New York.
 The buyers have a right to sell the stake back if FL Mobile doesn’t complete a qualified initial public offering within 12 months after the sale, according to the statement.
 “If the BOJ maintains its easing, the market will be able to absorb the impact of the GPIF’s bond sales in its portfolio rebalancing,” Nobuyuki Hirano, chairman of the Japanese Bankers Association, said at a news conference in Tokyo today.
 The BOJ has been buying about 7 trillion yen of sovereign notes each month, as part of a strategy announced in April last year to achieve 2 percent inflation.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA offered to buy Mediaset SpA’s 22 percent stake in Distribuidora de Television Digital SA for 295 million euros ($400 million) to gain full ownership of the Spanish pay-TV company.
 Telefonica said on June 2 that it agreed to buy a 56 percent stake in DTS from Prisa for 750 million euros to increase its holding to 78 percent.
 It will also buy and sell gold, copper and palladium and trade in sovereign debt through London-based CFH Clearing Ltd, its prime broker.
 Of the 14 analysts who cover Arabtec, none recommend investors buy the shares and their average 12-month price target is 452 dirhams.
 Aabar Investments in 2010 canceled a plan to buy most of Arabtec for an estimated $17 billion, saying they would work instead on a “strategic partnership” Aabar delisted from Abu Dhabi’s exchange the same year.
 Levinson, said judges considering misrepresentation claims should presume that investors will take any public misstatement into account before buying shares.
 equities, they’re just buying euro-zone stocks more,” Stewart Richardson, who helps oversee about $100 million as chief investment officer at RMG Wealth Management LLP in London, said by phone.
 Draghi also said the ECB would consider buying asset-backed securities.
 “We may buy into something that’s already there” or pick up acreage in the 14th onshore licensing round, he said.
 agreed to buy last month to become one of the largest shale explorers, has acreage in the Forth Valley of Scotland.
 is preparing to buy Protective Life Corp.
 The company said in a statement through the Tokyo Stock Exchange that it’s considering buying a US.
 said it would buy commercial insurer Philadelphia Consolidated Holding Corp.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Royal Bank of Canada should pay hefty damages for undisclosed conflicts of interest that tainted a $438 million buyout of Rural/Metro Corp.
 A judge ruled in March that bankers at RBC Capital Markets misled Rural/Metro directors about the ambulance company’s value, seeking to drive a quick sale to buyout firm Warburg Pincus LLC and generate fees for the bank.
 Laster’s March 7 decision about Royal Bank’s handling of the Rural/Metro deal was another in a series of Delaware corporate-law rulings reining in banks’ and investment firms’ conflicts in buyout cases.
 Laster ruled in 2011 that Barclays Plc had conflicting interests while serving as Del Monte Foods Co’s adviser in a $53 billion sale because it also arranged financing for buyer KKR & Co.
 Smaller Damages Royal Bank contends that settlements with other defendants involved in the buyout mean the Toronto-based bank should be on the hook for substantially less than the more than $203 million shareholders of Scottsdale, Arizona-based Rural/Metro seek in damages.
 Rural/Metro’s former directors and Moelis & Co, an investment bank that also advised the company in the Warburg deal, agreed to pay a total of $116 million to settle investors’ claims over the buyout.
 Two years after buying the company, Warburg officials put it into bankruptcy to cut its debt and smooth the way for a cash infusion.
 Rural/Metro shareholders sued over the buyout, claiming the board accepted Warburg’s lowball offer after getting advice from conflicted RBC bankers, who botched the effort to shop around the emergency services company to other bidders.
 The firms should also consider adopting an agency-trading model where they seek to put buyers and sellers together on SEFs, he said.
 Previous Efforts The industry itself is already trying to address the distrust between sellers and buyers of the debt in the wake of the crisis, though previous efforts have failed.
 The Boston-based startup hosts an online marketplace where apps that attract few users or fail to make much money -- including an animal-hunting game and a program that lets people send drawings to one another -- can try and sell themselves to buyers such as other app makers.
 For Peanuts The size of the deals are a far cry from the multibillion-dollar acquisitions made recently by Facebook Inc, which said in February it would buy mobile messaging startup WhatsApp Inc.
 “They’re going to be careful and selective about what they’re doing as opposed to more broad-based activity” Not every company is interested in finding a buyer.
 He continues to rate the stock as an equivalent of buy, with a price target of $65.
 Analog Devices jumped 5 percent after agreeing to buy a chipmaker for about $2 billion.
 agreed to buy the drugmaker.
 recommended buying shares in Banco Popular Espanol SA, saying lenders in euro area’s most-indebted countries would benefit from the ECB’s measures to combat inflation, which include a package of cheap loans for banks.
 A price in the middle of the range would represent a 13 percent discount on the value of NN as seen by UBS, which recommends clients buy ING stock.
 Those investors have also agreed to buy 113 billion euros of subordinated ING notes that are convertible to NN stock in three tranches.
 raised Russian stocks to the equivalent of buy from the equivalent of sell, citing the “fading of the Ukraine crisis,” according to an e-mailed note today.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- France sold a 15 billion euro ($2 billion) stake in GDF Suez SA, the country’s largest natural-gas distributor, as it seeks cash to buy a holding in Alstom SA.
 France has proposed to buy as much as a fifth of Alstom from Bouygues SA as part of a $17 billion deal for General Electric Co.
 to buy Alstom’s gas-turbine unit.
 France has 2 billion euros from sales of holdings in Safran SA, a maker of aircraft engines, and Aeroports de Paris that may also be used to buy the Alstom stake, Montebourg said yesterday.
 Kandarian, MetLife’s chief executive officer, has called regulatory uncertainty the primary challenge to meeting profit targets as he shuns stock buybacks amid concerns that the insurer will face tighter capital rules.
 He also retains the memory of MetLife failing a Fed stress test in 2012, when it was still a bank-holding company, and the rejection of his plan to boost dividends and buy back stock.
 Liquidity Risk AIG is better positioned than MetLife or Prudential to deal with potential restrictions on buybacks that stem from being designated systemically risky, according to analysts at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 While MetLife raised its dividend in 2013 and this year, the company hasn’t authorized a buyback since 2008.
 insurer Prudential Plc, which is also a top pension provider, earlier this year bought 25 percent of NextEnergy Solar Fund Ltd, a newly-listed 856 million pound ($144 million) fund that seeks to buy plants in the UK.
 The South African Government Employee Pension Fund, the continent’s largest for retirement savings, said earlier this month it will buy a 40 percent equity stake in a concentrated photovoltaic project Soitec SA is building in the African country.
 You can invest large volumes over long periods with interesting returns” While institutional investors generally seek to buy parks starting at 5 megawatts to 10 megawatts, they “also invest indirectly via securitized vehicles of pooled smaller parks,” Seherr-Thoss said by phone from Berlin, where the company is based.
 The technique involves buying one volatility gauge financed by selling contracts on another.
 For example, a trader could buy VIX futures and sell Europe’s VStoxx Index with the aim of profiting from the difference.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Hachette Book Group agreed to buy Perseus Books, a trade publisher, in a deal that strengthens the company’s nonfiction portfolio with a business that produces about 700 new titles a year.
 Instead of buying expensive new routers and switches that move Internet traffic, they’re opting for networks that rely more on software and inexpensive hardware.
 “I’m a tinkerer, I need to see under the hood,” said Mike Dawson, an Indianapolis-based networking consultant who used to buy equipment from Cisco and Juniper until he decided last year to set up a cloud-computing company for schools, businesses and government agencies.
 Instead of buying hundreds of thousands of dollars worth of equipment from brand-name suppliers, Dawson spent less than $10,000 on switches from TAM Networks Inc, a San Ramon, California-based manufacturer that builds bare-bones equipment in China.
 Still, the company requires customers to buy its hardware.
 It also frees buyers from being locked into buying new equipment from the same vendor to ensure that network machines work together.
 “Deutsche Telekom, Telefonica, British Telecom, NTT and China Telecom are all telling suppliers they want to build their networks in a new way” Lock In SDN is also making it easier for carriers to roll out cloud-based services to companies that would rather pay a monthly fee for a virtual firewall or videoconferencing system, rather than buying and operating devices to handle these jobs.
 In advance of the test, Laura Grego, a senior scientist at the Union of Concerned Scientists in Cambridge, Massachusetts, had said in an e-mailed statement that even a success “would demonstrate little about the kill vehicle’s capability and reliability” “It would be the first time in three tries that it hit its target, but 33 percent is still a failing grade -— and not a good argument for buying more,” she said.
 Individuals coming to stocks now are buying into a rally that is more than 5 years old, exceeding the average length of 41 years for bull markets since the end of World War II, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “With money-center banks, people are seeing no earnings growth and taking a little risk off” Bahl & Gaynor doesn’t own shares in any of the large money-center banks and doesn’t plan on buying any, McCormick said.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen has previously said that the central bank would consider a rate increase six months after the conclusion of its monthly bond-buying program.
 BNDES in 2012 halted loans for developers buying equipment from turbine makers that didn’t get at least 40 percent of their components from local suppliers.
 “The risk/reward of going long at current levels is poor over the next one to two months,” Krinsky wrote, citing the prospects for anyone wanting to buy shares.
 Any weakness will be an opportunity to buy before the group’s advance resumes, the report said.
 “New supply just isn’t an issue now” REITs buy property-linked assets and are exempt from taxes as long as they pay out 90 percent of their taxable income in dividends, making them attractive to investors seeking steady returns.
 Bernanke spoke last May about the central bank scaling back its bond-buying program, sending interest rates higher.
 While revenue and subscriber rolls are improving, Wind couldn’t afford to buy more capacity in the government’s last spectrum auction and hasn’t been able to count on financial backing from its main investor, Amsterdam-based VimpelCom Ltd, Lacavera said today in a speech at an industry event in Toronto.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc, the second-largest maker of medical devices, agreed to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion in cash and stock as it transforms into a broader-based company bolstered by new tax advantages.
 plans to start buying non-agency mortgages the way a gentleman orders a bespoke suit.
 The bond firm, with $469 billion in assets, will take on the role typically played by Wall Street banks, specifying to lenders the mortgages it wants them to make -- from interest-only to those with higher debt-to-income ratios -- then buying them.
 Government-run Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac limit themselves to buying loans that conform to some of those requirements.
 Legg Mason Inc’s Western Asset plans to buy mortgages made to self-employed borrowers who may not have the documentation for qualified mortgages as well as interest-only loans, said Travis Carr, chief operating officer of the firm’s mortgage real estate investment trust.
 The firm may also buy loans with debt-to-income ratios above 43 percent if borrowers have other assets.
 “And if you originate this, you will have access to us where we will be buying them along the way” The rates charged to borrowers of the non-qualified loans will be 1 to 2 percentage points above conforming rates, Carr said.
 have said they’re also on the hunt to make or buy non-QM or other non-agency loans.
 Mortgage lender and servicer Caliber Home Loans said this month it was adding four new products focused on foreign buyers of US.
 DoubleLine, with about $50 billion in assets, may be interested in buying the senior-most or lower-ranking classes of bond deals, depending on the structure, he said.
 Energy Transfer was nearing a deal to buy the companies for more than $15 billion in cash and stock, people familiar with the situation said.
 The deal would be the largest ever orchestrated by billionaire Kelcy Warren, who expanded Energy Transfer through a $13 billion buying spree in 2010 and 2011 into the country’s fourth-biggest pipeline company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “It will also give investors a new option for buying into Sri Lanka” Sri Lanka has encouraged banks and companies to tap cheaper interest rates by borrowing in foreign currencies, to help boost credit and economic growth since the end of the island’s civil war in 2009.
 The firm also received client interest in co-investing in the fund’s deals, Whitestone said, which would increase the vehicle’s buying power beyond $1 billion.
 If your endorser is struggling with cramps and appears to be using one product over another, there’s risk to the perception of the product’s quality” No Changes Swangard said the social media discussion probably wouldn’t cause people to immediately change their sports drink buying habits, but James’s struggles did create an interesting dialogue.
 Zoopla and PrimeLocation let users search for property to rent or buy, find brokers and compare rental and sale prices in different towns.
 Customers can search for a home based on commute time, and can also get advice on decoration or buying in France.
 Analog Devices jumped 5 percent after agreeing to buy a chipmaker for about $2 billion.
 agreed to buy the drugmaker for $39 billion.
 “With the merger activity, I think people are trying to buy growth” Six of the 10 main S&P 500 groups advanced today, with industrial shares adding 06 percent to pace gains.
 Jefferies Group LLC raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold after Icahn’s purchase of Family Dollar shares.
 Wynn Macau Ltd, a resort owned by the Las Vegas-based company and traded on the Hong Kong Stock Exchange, was downgraded to hold from buy at Deutsche Bank by equity analyst Karen Tang.
June 21 (Bloomberg) -- Want to buy Shire Plc? Get in line.
 Three Times AbbVie said in a statement dated June 19 that Shire rejected three escalating offers to buy the maker of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder drugs.
 Irish Address For Allergan, buying Shire and redomiciling in Ireland may help it fend off advances from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, said Divan of Credit Suisse.
 If you look back 14 to 15 years, PayPal was a strange thing that was out there in e-commerce, and now it’s fairly mainstream” Bitcoin users can already buy everything from digital cameras online to cupcakes in regular stores.
 agreed to buy Namo Media Inc.
 “Compared with four years ago, when buyers would accept anything, developers now have to make sure they provide good finished spaces” Africa Expansion Hotel chains including Hilton and Marriott International Inc, the owner of the Ritz-Carlton and Renaissance brands, are expanding in Africa to take advantage of rising disposable incomes and demand for business travel.
 “Development zones get a lot of buying interest if you have a major hotel chain,” Martins said.
 will extend a plan to buy back its US.
 The central bank will start to buy asset-backed securities within a year, according to three-quarters of 33 respondents in a Bloomberg Monthly Survey published on June 16.
 Lennar’s orders were less than some analysts expected, “indicating core buying demand was relatively flat compared to last year’s spring selling season,” Adam Rudiger, an analyst at Wells Fargo & Co, wrote in a note today from Boston.
 The company builds homes for first-time and move-up buyers, retirees and multiple-generation households in 18 states.
 “It is an excellent opportunity for foreigners to buy quality state-run companies,” Jagannadham Thunuguntla, chief strategist at SMC, said by phone from New Delhi.
 He declined to say whether that was because of a lack of interest from potential buyers.
 “I don’t want to say there was no interest or little interest from buyers,” he said.
 advanced 27 percent to C$6761 after BMO Capital Markets raised its rating on the methanol producer to outperform, the equivalent of buy, from market perform.
 sales last month, helped by cheaper models and fashionable crossover vehicles, as brands gained traction with new buyers enjoying rising disposable income.
 Mercedes, BMW and Audi are among luxury-auto makers expanding with lower-cost models as they seek to capture new buyers while retaining wealthier customers loyal to their market.
June 9 (Bloomberg) -- OAO MegaFon, Russia’s second-largest wireless operator, agreed to buy at least $600 million of equipment from Huawei Technologies Co.
 Lew spent about A$209 million ($197 million) buying 53 million David Jones shares between May 9 and June 16, according to a June 18 regulatory statement.
 of Tokyo, is nearing an agreement to buy T-Mobile, which has become the fastest-growing US.
 Monsanto announced a $10 billion stock buyback plan and an intention to repurchase $6 billion of shares on an accelerated basis after ending preliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that would have cut its tax bill.
 Transport Group Under the proposed German-Japanese offer, which may get announced as early as today, the French government and Mitsubishi Heavy may buy the 29 percent stake in Alstom held by Bouygues SA, the people said.
 and Sanderson Farms Inc, which buy corn for livestock feed.
 “Our biggest focus right now is on the 85 million Xbox 360 customers to give them enough to make them want to buy Xbox One this holiday,” Yusuf Mehdi, vice president for Xbox marketing and strategy, said in an interview.
 He had to shave the asking price for the house in Maricopa, Arizona, to draw in buyers unfamiliar with the financing arrangement.
 “You’ve got another layer to add on top of finding a buyer for the house.
 For many potential buyers, a solar lease is a liability rather than an asset, and may drive some people away, said Adomatis, who wrote the Residential Green Valuation Tool, a guide offered by the Appraisal Institute trade group.
 “Some buyers just won’t be on board” with assuming a solar lease, said Nick Culver, a solar analyst at Bloomberg New Energy Finance in New York.
 “Even if you save money every month, you limit yourself to a certain subset of buyers” SolarCity Corp, the solar installer backed by billionaire Elon Musk with 110,000 lease customers, has transferred ownership of about 1,500 contracts to date and says the new owners typically will continue to enjoy lower power costs.
 The lease made the deal more complicated because the buyers were reluctant to take over the contract and asked him to pay off the balance in advance, about 10 years of payments.
 After the sale closed, the buyers opted to pay off the lease, and Vineberg installed another SolarCity system at his new home.
 The house sold for $140,000 in March, and the buyer took over the lease with the same rates.
 Potential buyers, he said, were “scared of the solar lease” That may change as leases become more common.
 The buyer’s credit score was a few points short of the solar company’s minimum, and was initially rejected.
 In the “vast majority of cases,” buyers who qualify for a mortgage will also qualify to take over a solar lease, Martin DeBono, a SunPower vice president, said by e-mail.
 Most of them transferred the lease to the buyer.
 He said the issues stemmed from buyer furnished equipment, referring to components purchased and supplied by the future owner of a plane.
 agreed to buy the Irish company for $429 billion.
 jumped 19 percent after agreeing to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion.
 Policy makers meet this week, with a decision on rates and bond buying due June 18.
 stock-market debuts in the past year have rewarded their buyers with the best returns among global peers, fueled by demand for Internet and e-commerce shares from Asia’s biggest economy.
 supported the drugmaker’s attempt to buy Allergan Inc.
June 20 (Bloomberg) -- Vontobel Holding AG, an investment bank and asset manager based in Switzerland, plans to buy back a 125 percent stake owned by Swiss Raiffeisen amid legal wrangling concerning a cooperation agreement.
 Raiffeisen said Vontobel has the right to buy the stake in an e-mailed response to questions.
 Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc advanced the most since October 2011 after announcing a 1 billion pound ($17 billion) share-buyback program.
 The Federal Open Market Committee trimmed monthly bond buying by $10 billion for a fifth time, to $35 billion.
 The world’s second-largest maker of commercial-aircraft engine, which last month agreed to sell its energy assets to Siemens AG for $13 billion, said it will use the proceeds to buy back shares.
 Man Group Plc climbed 6 percent to 1051 pence, a two-month high, after agreeing to buy Numeric Holdings LLC.
 Supergroup Plc rallied 68 percent to 9295 pence after Canaccord Genuity Group Inc said the recent decline in the stock price offered a buying opportunity and that the likelihood of another cut in the company’s profit forecasts is low.
 “Nobody should buy anything in Ukraine,” Lutz Roehmeyer, who helps manage $11 billion of emerging-market assets at the fund manager known as LBB-Invest, said by e-mail June 10.
June 6 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private equity firm run by billionaires Henry Kravis and George Roberts, led a group that agreed to buy a stake in a meat-processing unit of China’s Cofco Group for $270 million, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 currency strengthened before the central bank concludes its meeting tomorrow amid speculation it will further reduce monthly bond-buying and discuss potential interest-rate increases next year.
 Officials have reduced monthly buying to $45 billion this year, from $85 billion in 2013, amid signs of growth.
 to explore its options, had already attracted interest from at least one potential buyer so far this year, LG Household & Health Care Ltd.
 Separating Brands To open itself up to more buyers and command a higher valuation, the company could sell its core brand separately from the fragrance business, said David Wu, a New York-based analyst at Telsey Advisory Group.
 Sales for the Elizabeth Arden brand don’t reflect how well-known the name is, leaving room for a buyer to try to narrow that gap, he said.
 An acquirer with a strong distribution network and R&D capabilities could help drive stronger top-line growth” Elizabeth Arden hired Goldman Sachs to contact private-equity firms and other potential buyers, a person familiar with the matter said in April, asking not to be identified because the matter is private.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP and A&L Goodbody advised Medtronic Inc, the second-largest maker of medical devices, on its agreement to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion in cash and stock.
 Willkie, Wachtell on Level 3’s $57 Billion TW Telecom Deal Willkie Farr & Gallagher LLP acted as legal counsel to Level 3 Communications Inc, which helps route traffic across the Web, on its agreement to buy TW Telecom Inc.
 LSE climbed the most since July 2013 as it agreed to buy Frank Russell Co.
 The exchange agreed to buy the Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.
 To buy the drugmaker, Valeant teamed up with Pershing Square Capital Management LP, activist investor Bill Ackman’s hedge fund, that owns 97 percent of Allergan shares -- a stake amassed specifically to drive the deal.
 So things happen” Valeant wants to buy Allergan as part of its plan to join the ranks of the world’s top five drugmakers.
 luxury vehicle buyers, after trailing its German competitors for three years.
 rallied to its highest level since August 2011 on report that the gas supplier plans to buy stake in more shale-gas assets in the US.
 “Any major correction should be utilized to buy” Indian Oil and Hindustan Petroleum Corp.
 are among companies vying to buy the debt.
 For much of its 111-year history, Harley sold choppers as fast as it could to buyers it knew well: wealthy, middle-aged American white men.
 After reviving from the paralysis caused by the 2008 financial crisis the debt helped spark, issuance of non-agency securities had slowed after the middle of last year as banks seek jumbo loans to hold as investments and bond buyers pay less for the debt.
 will buy a stake in Pioneer’s audio-visual business, according to a statement to the Tokyo bourse yesterday, confirming an earlier Nikkei newspaper report.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Chubu Electric Power Co, Japan’s second-biggest purchaser of liquefied natural gas, plans to increase its use of a type of LNG contract that allows buyers more flexible terms and competitive prices.
 “We, in return, want to have economic LNG and more flexible terms” Chubu Electric agreed in May to buy about 720,000 metric tons of LNG annually for 20 years from Royal Dutch Shell Plc through its third long-term portfolio contract.
 The price level is “very competitive” compared with typical deals among Asian buyers, Sato said.
 utility owner, agreed to buy a 20-megawatt solar farm in central California from a US.
 Dale Harvey, general manager of West Palms Event Management in California, a producer of top equestrian events, said in an e-mail that McCourt is buying into what has become “the most prestigious” show jumping in the world.
 supplier Centrica Plc said it buys energy in advance, meaning that changes in wholesale prices take time to feed through to the retail market.
 “Bankers is a lower risk investment alternative that provides predictable and growing production on a significant reserves and resource base,” Darren Engels, an analyst at FirstEnergy who rates the company a buy, said this month.
 The company has 14 buy recommendations, three holds and no sell recommendations, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 It does seem he has an issue with the board right now” The former chairman could be in disagreement about the company’s increased investment to improve its supply chain or its more aggressive international expansion, said Andreeva, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- Nigerian mobile-phone manufacturer Tingo Mobile agreed to buy a majority stake in Mass Telecom Innovation Nigeria Plc for about 4 billion naira ($25 million) to develop rural broadband in Africa’s most populous country.
 “When you buy an ETF, one trade, you’re done” At the top of Wiedman’s target list are insurance companies, pension funds and banks that still buy individual stocks and bonds.
 He cut the fees on six existing ETFs and added four new products that created a lineup of low-priced, broad market funds designed to appeal to buy-and-hold retail investors.
 jumped 34 percent to 1,059 yen after the regional lender said it will spend as much as 12 billion yen ($118 million) to buy back shares.
June 14 (Bloomberg) --China Eastern Airlines Corp, the nation’s third-largest carrier, agreed to buy 80 737 jets valued at $74 billion, marking the Asian country’s biggest order from Boeing Co.
 China Eastern will buy a mix of 737-800 and upgraded Max models, to be delivered starting in 2016, the company said in a statement to the Shanghai stock exchange yesterday.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy mortgages and package them into securities on which they charge fees to guarantee payments of principal and interest.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Saab AB agreed to buy the Swedish marine defense unit of ThyssenKrupp AG for 340 million kronor ($50 million), expanding the maker of Gripen jet fighters’ business to manufacturing submarines and stealth corvettes.
 Lacking Capability In April, Sweden proposed buying more jets and submarines to expand its Baltic Sea capabilities amid an increase in geopolitical tensions after Russia annexed parts of Ukraine.
 and Europe boost output and slower economic growth limits demand in China, the largest buyer of whole milk powder, Rabobank International said April 28.
 Three rounds of bond buying have helped propel the S&P 500 higher by as much as 188 percent from its bear-market low in March 2009.
 stock transactions ahead of a buyout bid.
 Alstom has become the object of an international bidding war since April when General Electric Co’s interest in buying its energy business was reported.
 Woolworths will pay A$17 a share to buy out Lew and other minority shareholders in clothing retailer Country Road, the Cape Town-based suitor said today.
 “If successful, the offer will allow Woolworths to delist Country Road, allowing Woolworths to simplify its group structure and fully integrate the businesses” Building Stake Lew spent about A$209 million buying 53 million shares in David Jones between May 9 and June 16, according to a June 18 regulatory statement.
 After an eight-year probe, Intel was fined by the EU for giving computer makers rebates for buying most of their chips from the Santa Clara, California-based company, thwarting efforts by its nearest rival, Advanced Micro Devices Inc, to gain customers.
 Responding to its May 2009 fine, the company said it “has never required a customer to agree not to buy from AMD in order to obtain a discount, nor raised a customer’s prices when it decided to buy from AMD” Intel went on to argue at hearings two years ago that EU regulators ignored exonerating evidence to build an “extreme case” The European Commission was also faulted by the EU’s ombudsman for failing to take notes of a meeting with an executive from Dell Inc.
 The EU’s investigation found that Intel impeded competition by giving rebates to computer makers from 2002 until 2005 on the condition that they buy at least 95 percent of chips for PCs from Intel.
 Federal Trade Commission in August 2010 and agreed not to give computer makers discounts or other inducements in exchange for promises they will buy chips exclusively from Intel.
 Last year, he said the firm could post a 10 percent ROE by 2014 if regulators allowed it to return a “reasonable” amount of capital to shareholders through dividends and buybacks.
 Rising use of palladium by carmakers means mine output and supplies of recycled metal will be less than demand for a third straight year, the longest supply deficit since 2000, forcing buyers to dig deeper into inventories, Johnson Matthey estimates.
 to buy all the palladium the US.
 Boeing has struggled to find buyers for 11 of its earliest 787 Dreamliners valued at $11 billion after two airlines dropped orders for the holdover models from the jet’s troubled birth, people briefed on the plans had said earlier.
 Williams Cos, the company that controls Williams Partners, agreed to buy control of Access Midstream from Global Infrastructure Partners II, Williams said in a statement yesterday.
 Port Inventory The sustained increase in inventory at China’s ports also provides buyers with a quick source of supply and turns pricing power in their favor, Morgan Stanley said.
 may improve its $17 billion offer as it competes with Siemens AG to buy energy assets of power-equipment maker Alstom SA.
 The Tokyo-based company is offering to buy a stake of about 10 percent in Alstom, the Nikkei newspaper said today.
 French Plan? Economy Minister Arnaud Montebourg presented union representatives with a plan for the government to team up with Mitsubishi Heavy to buy a stake in Alstom, Gabriel Artero, chairman of the metal-worker federation of the CFE-CGC union, said June 13.
 Valeant has twice raised its bid to buy Botox maker Allergan as part of its strategy to become one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers.
 The SEC claims the lender failed to file documents with the regulator that it gave potential investors in the securities, which later plummeted in value, obscuring the fact the buyers got false information.
 The SEC “is wrong on this” because the investors “hadn’t committed to buying the securities,” he said.
 Kristin Wilhelm, the SEC’s lawyer, told Cogburn the bank was misinterpreting the rules, and that Bank of America was required to turn over all documents given to investors both before and after the investors decided to buy the securities.
 Six years after buying the Amazon jungle deposit and investing $400 million in its San Rafael mine in Peru, Minsur’s sales have almost doubled as soaring demand for solder used in electronic devices caused shortages of tin.
 In 2010, the government rejected Melbourne-based BHP Billiton Ltd’s bid to buy Potash Corp.
 The company was stripped of its AAA at S&P in 2010 after agreeing to buy railroad Burlington Northern Santa Fe for $265 billion.
 The billionaire has used funds from insurance units including Geico to buy stocks and make acquisitions.
 “It’s a buyer-beware sort of market,” Boyle said.
 “The buy-side’s become empowered, and they’re doing a much more vigilant job of watching” Battalio told a US.
 By sending clients requests to buy or sell shares to markets that pay the most, rather than those offering the best price, brokers get a bad deal for their customers, Battalio said in his testimony.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Tencent Holdings Ltd, Asia’s largest Internet company, agreed to buy a $736 million stake in a Craigslist-like site to bolster its online content as it seeks to compete with Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 Tencent will buy a 199 percent stake, amounting to 368 million Class A and B ordinary shares in Chaoyang, China-based 58com at $20 each, the company said in a statement distributed through PR Newswire late on June 27.
 Tencent in March agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in JDcom and transfer some of its own assets to build a stronger competitor to Alibaba.
 Enerflex soared 79 percent to C$1762, the biggest increase since 2011, after agreeing to buy Axip’s international contract compression and processing business as well as its after-market business.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP is close to an agreement to buy a group of select-service hotels from Clarion Partners LLC for about $800 million, according to a person with knowledge of the deal.
 Blackstone, the largest real estate private-equity firm, has been buying select-service hotels -- properties with limited food and beverage and other services -- amid a recovery in the US.
 In September, an affiliate of the New York-based company agreed to buy 16 hotels from Hersha Hospitality Trust for $217 million.
 “The IPO of NN Group will provide investors with an interesting opportunity to invest in one of the industry’s strongest free cash flow and and capital generators” De Wit has a “buy” rating on the stock.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The banks knew the loans underlying trillions of dollars of residential mortgage-backed securities were misrepresented and failed to invoke their rights to force the sellers to buy them back or act against servicers, causing billions of dollars in losses, according to complaints filed yesterday in New York State Supreme Court in Manhattan.
 Men’s Wearhouse agreed in March to buy its smaller competitor for about $18 billion in cash after a five-month takeover battle.
 George said Panorama has an advantage over larger buyout firms because it won’t compete for large or public investments, instead using its Midwest location to find family-owned businesses that seek long-term owners.
 The maker of mining equipment was raised to buy from neutral by Bank of America Merrill Lynch.
 The consumer-review website was raised to buy from neutral at Bank of America Corp.
 rose the most in six weeks after Nomura Securities reiterated a buy rating on the online brokerage based on expectations for the company’s capital and liquidity plans.
 “It’s a tough decision, but it’s the right decision,” said Chris Rolland, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets in New York, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Broadcom stock.
 “Should no buyer be found, we expect to wind down the baseband business and to exit” Sales in Broadcom’s mobile division slumped 15 percent to $846 million in the first quarter.
 Quebecor took advantage of a lack of competition in a government auction this year to buy access to spectrum in British Columbia, Alberta and Ontario.
 “If you look at the long-term Aussie-euro swap curve you see that from an Australian issuer’s perspective it’s improved over the past 12 to 18 months” Australian investors bought 51 percent of the notes, with 22 buyers participating in the total transaction.
 Chief Operating Officer Atsushi Yoshikawa’s compensation swelled 69 percent to 270 million yen, and Chairman Nobuyuki Koga’s increased 23 percent to 192 million yen.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- PetroLogistics LP, a producer of propylene used to make paints and packaging, was sued by an investor claiming a $21 billion all-cash buyout offer from a unit of Koch Industries Inc.
 The buyout is designed to discourage rival offers, partly by barring Houston-based PetroLogistics from soliciting alternative proposals, Klemesrud said.
 McClendon announced plans on June 18 to expand his growing shale empire into the pipeline business, with backing from buyout firm The Energy & Minerals Group.
 refiner by market value, has been supportive of lifting the crude export ban, refiners will probably reap lower profits if they are forced to pay higher prices to compete with international buyers for US.
 Modest Range “We are starting to see some appealing premium plug-ins, particularly the i8, yet they still have modest battery range,” said John Krafcik, president of TrueCar Inc, an auto-buying website, and a former top executive of Hyundai Motor Co.
 “People are rushing to buy their second car, not to mention those who haven’t gotten their first one” to beat potential curbs, said Guotai Junan’s Chen.
 has agreed to buy power from both solar plants under 25-year contracts, according to the statement.
 meat company, agreed to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 Both Pilgrim’s Pride and Tyson had insisted when agreeing to enter the talks that Hillshire would drop its earlier agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, the producer of brands including Vlasic pickles, for $66 billion including debt.
 “It makes a lot of financial sense to buy Hillshire now that they have low debt levels, they have very strong cash flow,” Bryan Agbabian, San Francisco-based sector head for agricultural equities for Allianz Global Investors, said by phone earlier.
 Insurers should give consumers better information about no-claims bonuses when they buy insurance and their rights after an accident, the watchdog said in a statement.
 Some 62 percent of 58 economists in a Bloomberg News survey predict the Fed will halt bond buying at its October meeting.
 Boliden Upgraded Boliden climbed 35 percent to 9525 kronor after Nordea upgraded the Swedish company’s shares to buy from sell, citing earnings growth from the second quarter that will exceed market expectations.
 slid 39 percent to $1,18930 after agreeing to buy OpenTable Inc.
 jumped 29 to a record $8578 after agreeing to buy Renesas SP Drivers Inc, a maker of chips for smartphones and tablets.
 Schaeffler is seeking to reduce debt from an attempt to buy a limited stake in Continental that backfired amid the global recession of 2008.
 said it remains committed to buying six Airbus A350-800, a rare vote of confidence for a jet that’s rapidly lost in popularity in recent years as customers migrate to the two larger variants.
 The future of the smallest A350 hangs in the balance as more buyers opt for bigger planes and Airbus studies an upgrade of its popular A330 wide-body with new engines that would encroach on the A350-800s niche.
 He described plans to borrow about $4 billion, using $3 billion to buy forestry assets in China, and $1 billion to buy “a portfolio of marketable securities” He said the cash flow from the investments, after making repayments on the debt, would go to the charity.
 Contracts to buy Amazon shares are the most expensive since at least 2006 relative to bearish wagers, according to data on six-month options compiled by Bloomberg.
 Kessler cut his rating on the shares to outperform from strong buy after the company announced quarterly earnings on April 24.
 The European Commission is advocating that securitizations of loans to small businesses and consumers including car buyers be allowed to count for as much as 15 percent of the buffers banks will be required to hold under the rule, according to an EU document obtained by Bloomberg News.
 Baring Vostok stands to potentially make a more than 700-fold gain on its investment after buying 36 percent of Yandex together with partners in 2000 when the entire company was valued at less than $15 million.
 The nation’s third-biggest steelmaker plans to buy as much as 6 million metric tons, or about a quarter of its needs, in the year ending March 31 from overseas, compared with a “few thousand tons” last year, Group Chief Financial Officer Seshagiri Rao said in an interview.
 Authorities are curbing money flows to the world’s largest gambling hub by making it harder for bettors to buy expensive items that they exchange for cash.
June 9 (Bloomberg) -- Petroamerica Oil Corp, a Calgary-based oil producer focused on Colombia, plans to more than triple output in two to three years after buying Suroco Energy Inc, and is on the lookout for more acquisitions.
 Institutional investors including Blackstone Group LP will buy 168 million Gecina shares for 92 euros each, a 10 percent discount to the Paris-based company’s net asset value, Metrovacesa said in a statement today.
 Norges Bank will acquire 9 percent of all Gecina shares, Credit Agricole Assurances will buy 47 percent, a jointly owned affiliate of Blackstone and Ivanhoe Cambridge Inc.
 will buy 69 percent and a Blackstone affiliate will purchase 15 percent, Metrovacesa said.
 Moody’s reduced the Memphis, Tennessee-based company’s rating today to Caa3 from B3 and expects a distressed exchange or a bankruptcy filing if Verso is unable to close on its $14 billion deal to buy paper company NewPage Holdings Inc, according to a statement from the credit grader.
 Verso, which is controlled by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC, announced the buyout in January, which is becoming less likely to be completed as the Justice Department continues its review of antitrust and compliance issues, according to Moody’s.
 Investors have been content to buy the notes since the easing in the sovereign debt crisis in mid-2012, the ECB said in its review.
 In 2012, Chinese state-owned Aluminum Corp of China Ltd, also known as Chalco, offered to buy SouthGobi for $926 million.
 Current shareholders will be given a 30-day rights period to buy the convertible bonds, with the proceeds going to pay debt, according to a presentation on the company’s website.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Bilfinger SE, the German builder transforming itself into a provider of factory and property services, still has 700 million euros ($955 million) for industrial acquisitions after buying two UK.
 “Valuations that are lower than rivals provide adequate reasons for buying into them” Ten companies have started the share-listing process since June 10, with an average price-to-earnings ratio of 178, according to the China Securities Regulatory Commission.
 Speaking in New York, Cifu addressed public relations problems in high-frequency trading, the catch-all term for automated strategies that buy and sell stocks and other securities thousands of times a second.
 Drillisch, a small carrier that doesn’t own a network, will buy 20 percent of the capacity of all mobile networks that will be controlled by Telefonica Deutschland Holding AG after the E-Plus deal over five years, Telefonica said today.
 is buying video-editing startup SnappyTV to make it easier for television broadcasters and others to share videos of their shows and events on its microblogging service.
 Charm last month announced that a buyout group, Engadin Parent Ltd, had offered $470 for each of its American depositary receipts.
 “The merger is the product of a hopelessly flawed sales process that was designed to ensure the sale of Charm to the buyout group, on terms preferential to the consortium at the expense of plaintiff’s and the company’s other public ADS holders,” Pappas, who lives in Connecticut, said in the complaint.
 McDonald’s plans to return as much as $20 billion to shareholders by 2016 through dividends and share buybacks, as much as 20 percent more than in the previous two years, the Illinois-based company said in a May 28 statement.
 Areva is still discussing a proposal for Namwater to buy a stake in the facility, Mbako said.
 “The bond market has a lot of momentum here and it’s a well-known brand that people know and most like their business model” Ryanair agreed to buy five more Boeing Co.
 Under the new proposal, Mitsubishi would offer to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s grid and renewable units instead of 20 percent, and Siemens would offer to create a rail-signaling joint venture with Alstom, said Claude Mandart, a representative of the CFE-CGC union who met with the minister.
 Bed Bath & Beyond, which also owns the Buybuy Baby and World Market chains, has been investing in its online and mobile operations to combat increased competition from e-commerce merchants such as Amazoncom Inc.
 companies looking to buy other firms for their addresses in lower-taxed jurisdictions has doubled in proportion to all overseas deals, according to data compiled by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 agreed to buy biotechnology firm QLT Inc.
 Concordia’s status as an inversion target may be forefront in investors’ minds because of recent Canadian inversions, including Endo Health Solutions Inc’s purchase of Paladin Labs and Valeant, which has soared since it announced plans to buy Biovail Corp.
 analyst, said in a June 3 note starting coverage of the stock with a “buy” rating.
 Concordia buys medicines that are late in their lifecycle or off patent as well as US-designated orphan drugs, which treat rare diseases and receive special government incentives and patent terms.
 The London-based buyout firm asked banks to pitch next week for a mandate to arrange the offering, which could raise $350 million to $500 million, two of the people said, asking not to be identified as the process is private.
 The Fed repeated that it will probably reduce asset purchases in further “measured steps” and that it expects rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 The Fed trimmed bond-buying by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion, keeping it on pace to end the program late this year.
 central bank signaled its asset-buying program could be trimmed if the economy showed sustained improvement.
 Information compiled by data brokers from public records and credit card transactions can reveal where a person shops, the food they buy, and whether they smoke.
 Buying Cigarettes For a patient with asthma, the hospital would be able to score how likely they are to arrive at the emergency room by looking at whether they’ve refilled their asthma medication at the pharmacy, been buying cigarettes at the grocery store and live in an area with a high pollen count, Dulin said.
 The system may also score the probability of someone having a heart attack by considering factors such as the type of foods they buy and if they have a gym membership, he said.
 A more balanced market, including a wider selection of properties, smaller price gains and still-low borrowing costs, may encourage more Americans to buy as employment strengthens.
 First-time buyers accounted for 27 percent of all purchases and are still having trouble getting into the market, Yun said.
 The drop reflects the slump at the beginning of the year as unusually frigid temperatures kept prospective buyers indoors, he said.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 Increasing property prices hurt affordability for prospective buyers trying to get into the market, at the same time they also help homeowners feel wealthier and may keep boosting profits for developers.
 Winters based his allegations on media reports, which suggest Buffett is considering a buyout of Coca-Cola with private-equity firm 3G Capital, using their takeover of HJ.
 Stock Reaction After Winters discussed the idea of a Buffett buyout this morning on the Fox Business network, shares of Coke climbed as much as 13 percent.
 In a separate interview with Bloomberg News today, Winters said that a Coca-Cola buyout is “possible” even if the chance of a takeover is low.
 is in talks to buy cement assets from Jaiprakash Associates Ltd, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “The Rewa unit is a very large and profitable unit,” said Gupta, who has a buy rating on Jaiprakash.
 Jaiprakash, the builder of India’s only Formula One race track, is also seeking buyers for cement assets in Himachal Pradesh, one of the people said.
 UltraTech agreed last year to buy a Jaiprakash cement unit based in Gujarat state for an enterprise value of 38 billion rupees.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc’s agreement to buy Cobra Automotive Technologies SpA marked the mobile-phone company’s first foray into automotive software as more cars are connected to the Internet.
 Vodafone said today it agreed with the main shareholders of Varese, Italy-based Cobra to buy their combined 74 percent stake, and offered to buy the rest.
 Vodafone also agreed with some shareholders of Cobra’s telematics unit to buy their 20 percent holding if the bid for the parent is successful.
 FDR’s Program The bank helps foreign companies buy US.
 Delta has asked for changes in the rules to limit the ability of its foreign competitors to buy wide-body Boeing jetliners more cheaply.
 China Shipping Development Co, a Shanghai-based commodities transporter, jumped 66 percent to HK$483 after UBS AG upgraded the stock to buy from neutral.
 “If there are no charging stations and generous subsidies that lower the transaction price, what’s the point in buying one?” said Koji Endo, an analyst at Advanced Research Japan.
 Chinese-Australian billionaire William Han paid A$12 million for Lindeman Island in 2012, a 10th of what Club Mediterranee SA had spent to buy and expand it in the early 1990s.
 Managers then try to profit by buying and selling based on those forecasts.
 “It’s just the start of summer and guys are kind of out there flogging the old reliable story that Exxon’s about to buy somebody really cool,” Andrew Coleman, a Houston-based analyst for Raymond James & Associates Inc, said in a phone interview.
 Built for a potential sale by former Chief Executive Officer James Hackett, a renowned deal maker, the $547 billion company may have outgrown all but a few possible buyers.
 A buyer would get a presence in fields including the Niobrara formation in Colorado, Texas’s Eagle Ford shale basin, and offshore Africa.
 “There aren’t many stories left to play aside from buying stocks like Surgut, Gazprom, Rosneft before the dividend cutoff date,” Evgeny Loktyukhov, an analyst at OAO Promsvyazbank in Moscow, said by phone today.
 SunEdison said in a filing today that it’s in talks to buy solar developers and power plants in the US, Canada, Chile and the UK.
 Nineteen of 25 analysts covering Yandex are giving it a buy recommendation this month, the most ever, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 orders, a five-year jet-buying frenzy may give way to a more sober approach as carriers adjust to the challenges of intense competition and inadequate infrastructure.
 last month offered to buy Aquila in a deal that valued the Australian company at A$14 billion and that would give them a half stake in the West Pilbara project.
 telecommunications deals if he decides to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 Telephone-service provider AT&T last month announced its $485 billion bid to buy satellite-television company DirecTV.
 closed a deal earlier this year to buy out Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in their wireless venture for $130 billion.
 Hess, Bunge Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 AT&T plans to buy DirecTV, the largest US.
 will buy full control of a styrene plastics joint venture with BASF SE for 11 billion euros ($15 billion) in a bet it can extend a move into more-profitable products for the electronics and automotive industries.
 Rolle, Switzerland-based Ineos had a call option to buy its German partner’s share in the partnership under an agreement reached in 2011, they said.
 announced a $10 billion stock buyback plan.
 With the end of the quarter approaching, investors should expect about $20 billion in selling of equities and some buying of bonds as pension fund managers rebalance their portfolios, Boris Rjavinski, a strategist at UBS AG, estimated in a June 23 report.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- France is seeking buyers for as much as 179 billion euros ($244 billion) of shares in GDF Suez SA, the nation’s biggest natural gas distributor, as the government seeks to raise funds to buy a stake in Alstom SA.
 Under an agreement announced June 22, the government will buy as much as 20 percent of Alstom from Bouygues SA, allowing General Electric Co.
June 27 (Bloomberg) -- Marfrig Global Foods SA, Brazil’s third-biggest meatpacker by market value, rallied after Grupo BTG Pactual recommended buying the stock as the company reduces debt and plans to take two units public.
 Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc jumped 81 percent after saying it will buy back 1 billion pounds ($17 billion) of its own shares.
 Man Group Plc rallied 6 percent after agreeing to buy Numeric Holdings LLC.
 “The committee will likely reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps at future meetings,” policy makers said in a statement, adding that rates will stay low after bond buying ends.
 Rolls-Royce surged 81 percent to 1,092 pence after the world’s second-largest maker of commercial-aircraft engines said it will pay for the share buyback with the proceeds from selling its energy assets to Siemens AG.
 Man Group jumped 6 percent to 1051 pence after the world’s largest publicly traded hedge-fund manager agreed to buy the Boston-based equity manager for as much as $494 million.
 1 buyer.
 Order-Book Hit At the Dubai Air Show last year, Emirates said it would buy 150 777Xs, the re-engined version of the Boeing wide-body, and take out 50 options with a total value of $76 billion.
 “Airbus is very confident in its A350 program,” the company said in the release, adding that the order book stands at “a healthy 742 firm orders” While the planemaker would like to have Emirates as an A350 buyer, airlines are “hungry” for planes of that size and it should “pick up business elsewhere,” Strickland said.
 The A350 will enter commercial service with Qatar Airways, which remains the biggest buyer of the twin-jet that’s largely made of light composite materials.
 The companies face the challenge of finding buyers in an industry suffering from weakened margins for commoditized PVC used in window frames and doors.
 and last month agreed to buy Vinnolit, a German maker of PVC, from Advent International Corp.
 Time Warner has no interest in buying out Fox’s stake, the people said.
 “Over the past months, it was specifically the Ukraine factor that prevented investors from buying the Russian markets,” Yuri Selyandin, a money manager who helps oversee about $2 billion at GHP Group in Moscow, said by phone.
 “The declines led to some value buying in bonds today, which was aided by the rupee and oil moves” The yield on the 883 percent government bonds due November 2023 fell five basis points, or 005 percentage point, to 860 percent today, prices from the Reserve Bank of India’s trading system show.
 According to Jakob Magnussen, an analyst at Danske Bank A/S, Dong’s hybrid bonds have also benefited from a general appetite from investors for yields and “risk-taking” He recommends investors to buy into Dong’s two most recent hybrid bonds with call options in 2018 and 2022, respectively, as the bonds carry a limited risk to get extended.
 “At this level we’re starting to see good buy opportunities, but this doesn’t seem to be the opinion of the majority of the market players” The market may not recover until September, he said.
 “Not only do you alienate the men, you actually alienate a lot of women, because a lot of women won’t want to buy a feminine brand” The strategy helps show the variety of ways automakers are seeking to carve out their place in the world’s biggest auto market, with more than 100 nameplates targeting an estimated 1 billion drivers within a decade.
 and Germany, and vies globally with Daimler AG’s Smart brand, Fiat SpA’s 500 and Volkswagen AG’s New Beetle for buyers of small urban cars.
 To attract male buyers, Mini is being “overtly masculine in some of the communication style,” said Green, who was previously head of sales and marketing for the brand in 26 European markets.
 “I didn’t intend to buy a Mini,” said Chen, 32, who nicknames his car “Little Blue” “After I test drove one, I changed my mind within half an hour.
 “It’s one of the challenges you have, whenever you have a small car, you tend to move toward the female buyers,” Green said.
 People use Pinterest to gather online pictures related to what they’d like to buy, make or do.
 Some players are investing in buy-to-let properties in London’s Chelsea and Mayfair districts and “quite a few” are spending on art, according to Lee Dixon, a former Arsenal defender who is a match analyst for broadcaster ITV.
 Taipei’s apartments aren’t for living, they’re for selling” First-time buyers like Huang have been shut out of the market after home prices in Taipei almost tripled in the past 10 years, spurred by low mortgage rates.
 “It’s a consensus that young people can’t afford to buy a home,” said Stanley Su, an analyst at Sinyi Realty Co, Taiwan’s only listed real estate broker.
 On a recent Saturday, prospective buyers were entertained by live jazz, lectured on healthy eating, and offered a French meal in a makeshift building that doubled as a sales office on the vacant land where construction will begin in July.
 Student Protests “Taiwan’s fixed-income rates are low and you can’t buy that many stocks, so a lot of money was put into real estate,” said So.
 Members buy stock in the institutions and get access to low-cost, wholesale funding in return for pledging collateral such as mortgages.
 “The Moma asset is world-class and replacement value for a similar project far exceeds the value placed on Kenmare in today’s offer,” said Troy O’Dwyer, an analyst in London with Panmure Gordon & Co, who has a buy rating on Kenmare shares.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Angola’s government plans to buy trains and power generators from General Electric Co.
 Koch subsidiary Georgia-Pacific LLC announced yesterday that it agreed to buy Dallas-based paper-goods supplier SPG Holdings LLC for an undisclosed sum.
 “Things are gradually getting better, but we still have plenty of problems” Elevated fuel prices amid turmoil in Iraq and limited wage gains are weighing on Americans’ moods and squeezing buying power even as the job market improves.
 to solicit bids for Direct Principal Investments in February, is now looking for options besides selling the unit, including creating a separate subsidiary for the buyout arm, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 have spun off their buyout units to comply with the legislation.
 Direct Principal, which provides $25 million to $75 million in funding for leveraged buyouts and businesses seeking to grow or restructure, has held stakes in firms including UK-based oil-services company Viking Moorings Ltd.
 The buyout firms may not satisfy European regulators’ demands of creating new competitors through the sale, one of the people said.
 Any buyer that makes an offer deemed satisfactory to address European concerns would be the frontrunner in an auction, one of the people said.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Marubeni Corp, a Japanese trading house that offers water services to more than 6 million people globally, said it agreed with a partner to buy a Portuguese utility that also owns Brazilian assets.
 of Japan, or INCJ, will each buy 50 percent of Administração e Gestão de Sistemas de Salubridade SA, one of Portugal’s largest water utilities, the Tokyo-based company said today in a statement.
 The partnership gives Rosneft the ability to buy stakes in Exxon’s North American projects.
 Thus CTC can legally buy services from Video International, benefiting Rossiya.
 agreed to set up a $125 billion fund to buy energy infrastructure assets.
 First Reserve, a Greenwich, Connecticut-based company that was one of the earliest private-equity firms to focus on energy, agreed to buy an interest in Petrofac’s floating production facilities in Malaysia and Thailand for about $450 million.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Monsanto Co, the world’s largest seed company, intends to offer senior notes to help buy back $10 billion of shares in its biggest stock repurchase plan.
 The seed producer announced the stock buyback plan to boost investor returns after ending preliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that would have cut its tax bill.
 With price swings in euro-area bonds and equities collapsing, interest rates near record lows and inflation subdued, international investors are buying riskier assets in a search for yield.
 Last year, he said the firm could post a 10 percent ROE by 2014 if regulators allowed it to return a “reasonable” amount of capital to shareholders through dividends and buybacks.
 “You could have very low bank capital requirements; it still doesn’t mean that end investors are going to want to buy the product, and if that is the case it doesn’t bring any new credit into the system,” he said.
 “I think that he will, and I think he will in the very near future” Wright, a former managing director at Canada’s largest buyout firm, took a leave of absence from Onex to become Harper’s top aide in 2011.
 The positive news is that the free float may exceed 25 percent if the majority holder doesn’t buy stock, he said.
 Fly 540 Wind-Down That’s allowed the carrier to apply a standard revenue-management system for low-cost carriers, with early bookers paying $20 plus tax one way and customers buying tickets on the day charged more than $200, according to Winter.
 For now, he’s happy to wait and see whether anyone actually wants to buy them.
 “If a market for smart objects on the wrist really develops, then we’ll be there” While Hayek wouldn’t name clients who buy components for intelligent wrist devices, he said they include a US.
 buy niche brands to widen their product ranges.
 Including the buyback of 8 percent of its stock held by Nestle SA, slated to close this month, L’Oreal will have spent more than $5 billion on deals this year.
 The analyst, who recommends buying L’Oreal shares, estimates the French company paid at least two times NYX’s annual revenue.
 Monsanto Co, the world’s largest seed company, is one of the latest to complete its biggest-ever bond deal, selling $45 billion of notes yesterday to help fund a share buyback.
 Ullman’s Plan Credit swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 That was like firing their customers,” said Mary Ross Gilbert, a managing director at Imperial Capital LLC in Los Angeles, who recommends buying JC.
 Even with declines in unemployment, “a broader assessment of indicators suggests that underutilization in the labor market remains significant” The Federal Open Market Committee trimmed bond-buying by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion, keeping it on pace to end the program late this year.
 ‘Measured Steps’ Yellen repeated that the Fed is likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the buying ends.
 Steady labor-market gains have bolstered confidence among policy makers that they can wind down asset-buying without endangering the five-year expansion.
 “The degree of demand in the investment-grade credit market in particular is off the charts” Insurers seeking more long-maturity corporate bonds are among the buyers, he said.
 Lukoil will buy a 375 percent interest, while New Age will increase its existing shareholding by 125 percent to 375 percent, according to a regulatory filing from BowLeven, which will retain the remaining 25 percent.
 on its books while there’s still a chance that the Indian carrier might find a buyer which would require new aircraft.
 “If Kingfisher finds a new buyer for the airline that buyer would need single-aisle planes, so for that reason we’ll keep them until the airline is completely shut down,” Kiran Rao, Airbus’s executive vice president of sales and marketing, said in a briefing at the company’s base in Toulouse, France.
 stock-market debuts in the past year have rewarded their buyers with the best returns among global peers, fueled by demand for Internet and e-commerce shares from Asia’s biggest economy.
 Lending to small businesses, major infrastructure projects and first-home buyers will be a priority, the CBRC said.
 “Everybody and their dog has got an MLP now in the US,” Iain Reid, a London-based analyst for BMO Capital Markets who rates Shell a buy and owns none of the shares, said today by phone.
 said it will pay $6 billion to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP, the pipeline operator taken public in 2010 by Chesapeake Energy Corp.
 ‘Off Guard’ “Even though it’s an old number, people were still caught off guard, and that led to buying in the Treasury market,” said Ian Lyngen, a government-bond strategist at CRT Capital Group LLC in Stamford, Connecticut.
 Founded in 1996, Relational buys stakes in companies it considers undervalued and then lobbies management and boards for changes to boost investor returns.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Brookfield Property Partners LP is close to filling most of the lower Manhattan office space formerly rented by Merrill Lynch & Co, the investment bank whose buyout was a symbol of the financial crisis.
 Bank of America Corp, which agreed to buy Merrill in 2008 as the investment bank was close to collapse, left behind about 3 million square feet of offices at the former World Financial Center complex, renamed Brookfield Place.
 In the case of Abril, firms including KKR & Co, Carlyle Group LP and Apax Partners LLP had been in talks to buy a stake in the company, two people involved in the negotiations told Bloomberg in February.
 He has a price estimate of 4040 reais for the units, with a recommendation which is equivalent of buy.
 Last year KKR agreed to buy a 249 percent stake in Nephila Capital Ltd, a Bermuda-based firm that makes reinsurance-related investments.
 Barrick Gold Corp, the world’s biggest producer, last month failed to buy its largest competitor, Newmont Mining Corp, a merger that was partly driven by cost savings.
 Asahi Group Holdings Ltd, another beermaker, posted a record closing high after announcing a share buyback.
 Japan’s biggest beverage producer by market value will spend as much as 50 billion yen to buy back as much as 432 percent of outstanding shares, the company said.
 “The deal on buying back part of the secured debt is interesting because the offer is higher than the current price,” Erste’s Bartek said.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC co-founder Josh Harris isn’t buying Steve Schwarzman’s pitch that individual investors will be significant contributors to private equity.
 The minimum commitment to the largest buyout pools is typically $5 million to $20 million, according to fund agreements.
 agreed to buy the Dublin-based company for $429 billion in cash and stock.
 climbed 22 percent after agreeing to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion.
 That spurred BlackRock, whose $44 trillion under management makes it the world’s biggest money manager, to buy eastern European stocks like Turkiye Halk Bankasi AS on valuations not seen since the financial crisis.
 Investors should mitigate risks by buying into a recovery in the euro zone, Reid says.
 At the time, CBS Outdoor Chief Executive Officer Jeremy Male said the company would seek to buy smaller US.
 By splitting off from CBS and becoming a REIT, the business will have the ability to buy competitors in the 25 biggest US.
 For CBS, the IPO and REIT conversion will provide about $5 billion for share buybacks and possible acquisitions.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Shunfeng Photovoltaic International Ltd, which is planning a HK$6 billion ($770 million) share sale to build solar plants, said it is in negotiations to buy additional clean-energy assets as the company expands.
 Shunfeng is in “advanced” talks to buy geothermal-pump, energy-storage and hydrogen-power technologies in addition to a solar services provider, the Hong Kong-based company said in a filing today.
 Shunfeng is controlled by Hong Kong real estate tycoon Zheng Jianming, who owns a 30 percent stake and has spent or pledged more than half a billion dollars to buy solar assets once worth almost $20 billion.
 “Whether that plays out or not remains to be seen but the knee jerk is to buy Germany on these aggressive actions.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- DTE Energy Co, the Detroit-based utility owner, agreed to buy a 75-megawatt wind farm from a subsidiary of NextEra Energy Inc.
 Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes including stock buybacks, Atlanta-based Home Depot said in a regulatory filing.
 Five out of eight analysts tracked by Bloomberg recommend investors sell the stock, with two rating it a hold and one a buy.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- B2Gold Corp, the Vancouver-based miner that has announced at least one acquisition in each of the past three years, agreed to buy Papillon Resources Ltd.
 The Boersenverein des Deutschen Buchhandels, the country’s association of booksellers, asked the Federal Cartel Office to probe Amazon’s negotiation practices when buying rights for e-books.
 won France’s support to buy Alstom SA’s energy assets, beating Siemens AG and putting Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Immelt a step closer to the company’s largest acquisition ever.
 The transport business makes the TGV high-speed trains, which Alstom will keep as it buys GE’s rail-signaling operations.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 GE will buy 100 percent of Alstom’s gas turbine business and related servicing operations.
 Separate Deal Depending on the IPO’s success, Merlin will buy 100 percent of the share capital of Tree Inversiones Inmobiliarias SA, which owns commercial properties leased to Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA, Spain’s second-largest bank, according to the filing.
 Makers of mid-priced and cheaper smartphones tend to buy modems combined with another component, the application processor, to reduce costs, said Roger Sheng, an analyst at Gartner Inc.
 Under the new proposal, Mitsubishi would offer to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s grid and hydro units instead of 20 percent, using one single holding company rather than the three joint venture structure originally proposed.
 It still proposes to buy 40 percent of Alstom’s steam business.
 where investors buy and sell stocks anonymously.
 Insurers, pension funds and sovereign wealth funds are buying German commercial property as a way to boost returns at a time when other fixed-income assets are paying low interest rates.
 Investors will probably buy offices, shops and warehouses valued at as much as 40 billion euros in 2014, according to a forecast by Jones Lang LaSalle Inc.
 To fund them, buyers are using a little creative thinking and a lot of common stock to fuel the best quarter for global takeovers since 2007.
 For buyers with public listings, all-cash offers made up about one-third of the takeovers announced in the second quarter, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 In some cases, massive price tags meant buyers had to use shares: AT&T Inc, which ended March with just $36 billion in cash and equivalents, is paying $485 billion for DirecTV with two thirds of that in its own stock -- a move that will help protect its creditworthiness.
 tax laws, that kind of deal -- known as a tax inversion -- requires the buyer to use its shares as part of the deal.
 European Shift European buyers have made the biggest shift away from cash, the data show, with all-cash purchases falling to just 28 percent of the $88 billion of takeovers announced by public companies during the quarter, compared with 68 percent from 2008 to 2013.
 buyers, all-cash purchases accounted for 31 percent of the $331 billion in deals announced, compared with 45 percent in the five years through 2013.
 Empire Co, which operates grocery stores, gained 46 percent after Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce raised its rating to sector outperform, the equivalent of buy, from sector perform.
 Pershing Square Capital Management LP, which is working with Valeant to buy Allergan, agreed that Allergan’s poison pill wouldn’t be triggered by a special shareholders’ meeting.
 “I don’t see anything wrong with buying anything that pays me 35 percent yield” The S&P 500 utilities sub-index pays shareholders 35 percent, the lowest dividend yield in six years.
 Credit-default swaps pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities or the cash equivalent should a borrower fail to adhere to its debt agreements.
 This month, it agreed to buy its partner Promotora de Informaciones SA, also known as Prisa, out of the venture for 750 million euros.
 An ad on Alpargatas’s website shows Romario, a former Brazilian national team striker, buying a pair of Brazil-themed flip-flops and asking that each sandal be bagged separately.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- Henderson Group Plc agreed to buy US-based Geneva Capital Management Ltd.
 acquisition in February, buying Global Index Advisors Inc.
 will buy Protective Life Corp.
 policies from Axa SA and expanded in 2006 by buying insurance units from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 pipeline company, is in advanced talks to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for about $3 billion, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Williams would buy the stake from Global Infrastructure Partners, which owns almost one-third of Access Midstream as well as half of its general partner, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The latest deal would have it buying the other 50 percent of the general partner, which manages Access’s operations, determining how it will borrow and invest, among other things, the people said.
 “Alibaba’s numbers look as if revenue growth is slowing down and margins are lower than expected,” said San Francisco-based Sinha, who has a buy rating on Yahoo.
 Investors have been awaiting additional details as they weigh whether or not to buy shares in Alibaba’s IPO -- which could be the largest ever in the US.
 Active buyers on Alibaba reached 255 million in the 12 months ended March, from 172 million a year earlier.
 Monsanto announced a $10billion stock buyback plan and an intention to repurchase $6billion of shares on an accelerated basis after endingpreliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that wouldhave cut its tax bill.
 “I’m well aware that my job is to create long-term shareholder value and I can assure you that my management team and I are focused on doing that” CIT, which has $486 billion of assets, got permission from the Federal Reserve last year to reinstate a quarterly dividend and buy back shares.
 “They don’t have to do anything with it, but as it sits there on the balance sheet, it’s unproductive” CIT said Tuesday it agreed to buy Direct Capital Corp, a Portsmouth, New Hampshire-based lender with assets of about $500 million.
 Thain said today that CIT will look for other acquisition opportunities, including buying another bank.
 “From an operational standpoint, the company is moving forward slowly” Of the 20 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg, Palmer and 12 others rate CIT a buy.
 “It hasn’t gone anywhere past that, but they did show up and opened up to us and in turn we opened up to them” Carbon Group Mark Zuckerberg, Facebook’s CEO, said in March that he was buying Oculus to help usher in the next era of computing, betting that people will eventually use virtual reality to experience everything from conference calls to sporting events.
 “We see any selloff as an opportunity to buy as we are still positive about this market” Portuguese 10-year yields rose nine basis points, or 009 percentage point, to 365 percent at 4:45 pm.
 Caesars is still burdened by debt from a $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008 led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- Green Plains Inc, which just became the first major ethanol producer to buy its own cattle-feed yard, has plans to milk it for more -- by buying the cattle too.
 The move marks a shift for the Omaha, Nebraska-based company from selling distillers grain, a byproduct of ethanol production known as DDGS, to directly feeding it to cattle that the company plans to eventually buy, Todd Becker, Green Plains’ chief executive officer, said in a telephone interview today.
 Eighty percent went to first-time buyers.
 The mortgage guarantees were made available in October, extending an existing program that provided interest-free loans for buyers of newly built homes.
 Investors have piled more than $900 billion into taxable bond funds since the 2008 financial crisis, buying stock-like shares of mutual and exchange-traded funds to gain access to infrequently-traded markets.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- Dufry AG agreed to buy Nuance Group for about $17 billion, unifying the Swiss duty-free store operators and securing growth in the Mediterranean, the world’s largest travel destination.
 “With this transaction, Dufry becomes the clear leader in the global travel retail industry,” said Rene Weber, an analyst at Bank Vontobel who recommends buying Dufry shares.
 Most proceeds will be returned to investors through share buybacks.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire John Gokongwei is scouting chains of mom-and-pop outlets to buy into faster-growing Philippine towns as part of a plan to compete with retail stores controlled by the nation’s richest man, Henry Sy.
 “The pitfall is when they know that a company is in a buying mode, the seller jacks up the price and asking terms” Competitor Puregold, which has grown through acquisitions in the past two years, now plans to rely on opening its own outlets, Lucio Co, founder and chairman, said May 14.
 The companies announced the agreement as negotiations continued for France to buy a 20 percent stake in Alstom from shareholder Bouygues SA.
 GE is buying Alstom’s gas turbine operations and creating joint ventures in the steam turbine, renewable energy and electrical-transmission businesses, while Alstom gets GE’s rail-signaling operations for $825 million (602 million euros).
 Reddy’s +15% * CNX Nifty -04%; BSE 100 -07%; BSE 500 -07% * BSE 100 gainers: Kotak Mahindra Bank +32% after stk raised to buy from hold at Deutsche Bank; Godrej Cons +3%; Glenmark +19%; Hero MotoCorp +15%; Asian Paints +14% * BSE 100 losers: HDIL -84%, Unitech -72%, Jaiprakash Associates -54%; GMR -53%; DLF -53% * Index movers incl.
 The speech also said the Pensions Tax Bill will allow people over 55 to withdraw savings without the requirement to buy an annuity, as announced in Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s budget in March.
 Oriel Securities Ltd’s Marcus Barnard reiterated his buy rating on Standard Life yesterday, saying that while the change was a potential burden to employers, the industry “has little to fear” from the plans.
 GE is buying Alstom’s gas turbine operations and creating joint ventures in the steam turbine, renewable energy and electrical-transmission businesses, while the French company gets GE’s rail-signaling operations for 602 million euros ($825 million).
 Voting Rights Bouygues said today its deal with the state would allow the French government, or any other entity of its choice, to buy as much as 20 percent of Alstom.
 France will buy its stake “at the market price with a standard discount, on condition that this price is higher or equal to the equivalent of a theoretical adjusted price of 35 euros per share,” the company said today.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 Laster ruled in 2011 that Barclays Plc had conflicting interests while serving as Del Monte Foods Co’s adviser in a $53 billion sale because it also arranged financing for buyer KKR & Co.
 Royal Bank said that settlements with other defendants involved in the buyout mean the Toronto-based bank should be on the hook for substantially less than shareholders of Scottsdale, Arizona-based Rural/Metro seek in damages.
 Rural/Metro’s former directors and Moelis & Co, an investment bank that also advised the company in the Warburg deal, agreed to pay a total of $116 million to settle investors’ claims over the buyout.
 Two years after buying the company, Warburg officials put it into bankruptcy to cut its debt and smooth the way for a cash infusion.
 Rural/Metro shareholders sued over the buyout, claiming the board accepted a lowball offer from Warburg after getting advice from conflicted RBC bankers, who botched the effort to shop around the emergency services company to other bidders.
 to buy properties that fall outside the company’s typical investing parameters.
 The partnership plans to buy, renovate and lease homes, the company said, without specifying the types of residences that would qualify.
 Institutional buyers have invested more than $20 billion and acquired as many as 200,000 houses since 2012, according to Keefe, Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 Prices, Affordability Increasing property prices hurt affordability for prospective buyers trying to get into the market, at the same time they also help homeowners feel wealthier and may keep boosting profits for developers.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- Dufry AG, the Swiss duty-free store operator buying Nuance Group to create the world’s largest travel retailer, said it intends to raise about 725 million Swiss francs ($812 million) in a rights offering to fund the acquisition.
 Shareholders will have the right to buy three new shares for every 17 they hold, the Basel, Switzerland-based company said in a statement today.
 Dufry said June 4 it agreed to buy Nuance for about $17 billion, its biggest-ever purchase.
 One dollar buys about 102 yen based on today’s prices.
 Colbun will holdan option to buy stakes once its complete.
 WinWater, created last year to buy jumbo mortgages to package into bonds, sold $81 million of top-rated notes paying 35 percent coupons at 1004 cents on the dollar, according to a person with knowledge of the offering who asked not to be identified citing a lack of authorization to speak publicly.
 After reviving from the paralysis caused by the 2008 financial crisis the debt helped spark, issuance of non-agency securities has slowed as banks seek jumbo loans to hold as investments and bond buyers pay less.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on Micron’s stock.
 Mitsubishi UFJ Financial Group Inc, Japan’s biggest lender, added 12 percent after Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch unit rated the shares a buy.
 Chubu Electric lost 14 percent to 1,221 yen after the utility’s was cut to neutral from buy at Citigroup.
 Mitsubishi UFJ added 12 percent to 602 yen after its rating was raised to buy from neutral at Merrill, which raised its price target to 810 yen from 710 yen.
 He settled with his father’s creditors in 1975, and formed Jay Paul Co, which he used to buy up inexpensive office properties in places such as Long Beach, California.
 “It does suggest there will be at least some captive buyers.
 Under an agreement announced June 22, the French government will buy as much as 20 percent of Alstom from Bouygues SA, allowing General Electric Co.
 Carrefour will buy back Distribuidora Internacional de Alimentacion SA’s French business, it said last week.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac were sued by Massachusetts for failing to comply with a state law that lets nonprofit organizations buy foreclosed homes to sell them back to their former owners.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac require nonprofits that buy foreclosed homes and re-sell them to their former owners to pay the full amount of the mortgages or the properties’ fair market value, whichever is higher, according to a complaint filed today in state court in Boston.
 About $40 billion a year of iron ore is mined in China, the country that’s also the world’s biggest buyer of the steelmaking component.
 Alco, an employee-owned manufacturer that produces goods such as agricultural chemicals, electrical insulation materials and tools, had $134 million of revenue in fiscal year 2013, according to a document sent to prospective buyers.
 Alco Industries, which is based in Norristown, Pennsylvania, was formed through a management buyout by former manufacturing executives of Alco Standard Corp.
 “We see this announcement as positive for buy-rated Eaton” with $500 million “far below” the judgment it might have been ordered to pay at trial, Timothy Thein, an analyst with Citi Research in New York, said in a note to investors.
 Espirito Santo recommends buying Edelweiss and Motilal shares.
 It was designed to reduce weapons costs, streamline the weapons-buying bureaucracy and provide incentives for companies to improve their internal processes.
 Chen is placing Cenkos’s buy rating on the bank’s stock on review, he said.
 is leading calls for changes, requesting an end to the bank’s lending to help airlines backed by foreign government buy wide-body Boeing jets.
 He disagrees with those investors, has a buy rating on Valeant’s stock and said he feels that Valeant can “more than hold its own” ValueAct has been invested in Valeant since at least 2007.
 Pershing Square filed on June 2 to have a special meeting of shareholders to overthrow Allergan’s board to make way for the buy out.
 Manufacturers apply for foreign exchange at 10 bolivars per dollar in weekly auctions, while importers of non-essential products, and individuals, can buy currency in restricted amounts for 50 bolivars per dollar in the daily government-run currency market.
 Nike is benefiting from consumers increasingly buying athletic apparel and gear for everyday wear, not just when working out or playing sports.
 The company had been struggling to maintain growth in China, its second-largest market, as shoppers there became choosier about which brands they buy.
 He maintained an overweight rating on the stock, the equivalent of a buy, and projects it may reach $30 by the end of the year.
 Investors who had bet against the shares may also be buying the stock to cover their positions, Arvind Bhatia, an analyst at Sterne Agee Group Inc, said today in a note.
 cable-TV company, is buying No.
 has agreed to buy DirecTV, the largest satellite provider, for $485 billion, and wireless companies Sprint Corp.
 Investors may demand a yield of about 7 percent to buy the securities, less than the 748 percent yield on similarly rated Zambian bonds, according to Raza Agha at VTB Capital Plc in London.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Edita Food Industries, the Egyptian snacks maker part-owned by buyout firm Actis LLP, is close to hiring Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 ‘Brutally Honest’ “She was brutally honest in acknowledging GM failed, plain and simple,” said Michelle Krebs, senior analyst for car buying website AutoTradercom.
 Senator Richard Blumenthal, however, called Valukas’s findings “the best report money can buy” and said it “absolves upper management, denies deliberate wrongdoing and dismisses corporate culpability” Lance Cooper, a lawyer for crash victims, said the report can help draw out more details in civil cases.
June 20 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Kelcy Warren’s attempt to buy Targa Resources Corp.
 The purchase would be the largest ever orchestrated by Warren, who expanded Dallas-based Energy Transfer through a $13 billion buying spree in 2010 and 2011 into the country’s fourth-biggest pipeline company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Tyson’s $63-a-share offer constitutes a superior proposal and Hillshire recommends that its shareholders vote against buying Pinnacle, Chicago-based Hillshire said today in a statement.
 “I assume Pinnacle will continue to try to improve their brand positioning and there are maybe other suitors out there that would want to buy them” Phone calls seeking a comment from Thuy-An Wilkins, a spokeswoman for Pinnacle, weren’t immediately returned.
 The transcript on Wprost’s website shows Belka allegedlydiscussing options for the central bank to buy government bondsin an emergency situation by providing liquidity to state-ownedlender BGK and state-controlled PKO Bank Polski SA.
 It would be best not to resort to bond buying by thecentral bank because of the “huge” difficulty in returning tonormal debt sales afterward, he was cited as saying.
 The government’s agenda shows the cabinet will discussamendments to the central bank law, including allowing thecentral bank to buy bonds on the secondary market outside ofopen-market operations, at its June 17 meeting.
 A few years ago, her card was used to buy $25,000 in party supplies in New York, while she was more than 2,000 miles away on a trip in Seattle.
 31 said it agreed to buy a stake in the operator of the existing pipeline operator, Transportadora de Gas del Peru.
 Casa dos Ventos is buying 230 megawatts of turbines for 805 million reais to replace a previous order with Enercon GmbH’s Wobben Windpower, which told the developer it’s unable to fulfill its contract, said one of the people, who asked not to be named because talks are private.
 Casa dos Ventos will make a decision within two weeks whether to buy an additional 150 megawatts of turbines, worth 525 million reais, from GE for a wind park it may acquire from Industrias Metalurgicas Pescarmona SA, or Impsa, said two people.
 “If you don’t have a low tax rate, you can’t bid against the other guy with the same aggressiveness” in seeking to buy future products, said Samuel Isaly, a managing partner at OrbiMed Advisors, which owns shares in both AbbVie and Shire.
 Consumers’ Claims Armstrong has fared better defeating consumers’ claims that they were misled by him into buying energy drinks and his autobiographies.
 A federal judge in Los Angeles in March threw out a lawsuit by buyers of FRS products, saying a reasonable consumer wouldn’t believe Armstrong’s success could be attributed to an energy drink.
 Buyers of Armstrong’s books, who claimed they were misled into buying what were really works of fiction, last year dropped a lawsuit filed in Sacramento after the judge in that case dismissed the claims against the publishers.
 Chief Executive Officer Larry Ellison is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 “This is a shocker for investors who were expecting a slight beat in the quarter -- new license sales were weak and it’s quite clear the company has a lot of heavy lifting in front of it,” said Daniel Ives, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets & Co, who rates Oracle the equivalent of a buy.
 Oracle made another acquisition in cloud computing today, with an agreement to buy LiveLOOK, a real-time technology for co-browsing and screen-sharing.
 The companies said last month that First Reserve Corp’s Houston-based Sabine Oil agreed to buy Denver-based Forest Oil in an all-stock transaction, without giving a value for the deal.
 With the end of the quarter, investors should expect about $20 billion in selling of equities and some buying of bonds as pension fund managers rebalance their portfolios, Boris Rjavinski, a strategist at UBS AG, estimated in a June 23 report.
 UBS AG cut the oil explorer to neutral from buy, citing the company’s failure to find reserves in an offshore Gabon field.
 Last month, Atos offered to buy rival Bull for about 620 million euros, underscoring demand for cybersecurity and cloud-computing services.
 Foschini gets more than half its revenue from customers that buy on credit, making it vulnerable to loan defaults as shoppers struggle with high inflation and unemployment.
 of South Africa agreed in April to buy Australian retailer David Jones Ltd.
 Exane BNP Paribas cut its rating on the natural-gas producer to neutral from outperform, similar to a buy rating, saying investors underestimate the reorganization challenges facing the company’s new chief executive officer.
 During the silver fix, the three member banks declare how much metal they want to buy or sell for clients as well as their own accounts.
 Used as a benchmark to price holdings at, the fixing also allows participants to physically buy and sell metal.
 Chief Executive Officer Larry Ellison is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 “This is a shocker for investors who were expecting a slight beat in the quarter -- new license sales were weak and it’s quite clear the company has a lot of heavy lifting in front of it,” said Daniel Ives, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets & Co, who rates Oracle the equivalent of a buy.
 With parliament’s Finance Committee accusing the bank of navigating a “failed” currency policy and manufacturers urging it “to wake up out of its coma,” the BOI is under pressure to consider another rate cut, step up dollar buying and set a shekel floor.
 The currency has advanced to a near three-year high since policy makers kept borrowing costs unchanged at 075 percent on June 23, prompting the bank to buy about $400 million four days later, according to a report by Mizrahi Tefahot Bank Ltd.
 Because the purchase had a limited effect on the currency, weakening it by 01 percent, “the bank is either going to have to buy dollars more aggressively, or in the end will be forced to cut the rate,” said Yshai Shilo, a bond trader at Israel Brokerage & Investments Ltd.
 “I think they will keep buying, see that it doesn’t have a huge impact, and in the end will cut” The shekel has strengthened about 6 percent in the past year.
 FXCM, a trading firm based in Tel Aviv, said the decision to hold interest rates unchanged “gave speculators incentive to buy the shekel” “Even if the decision was correct, the bank will have to deal with the risk inherent in the shekel’s appreciation,” it said.
 Last year, non-traditional bond funds did outperform when markets tanked in May and June on concern that a tapering of the Fed’s debt-buying would send yields soaring.
 “We do know that markets cannot stay one way forever” The go-anywhere fund buyers are ready for the reversal.
 The gauges for current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved to the highest level since January.
 “If the bank takes action on staff, it could be that the regulator reduces the fine, but we still don’t know what the cost will be,” Stefan Bongardt, an analyst at Independent Research GmbH who recommends investors buy BNP shares, said by telephone from Frankfurt.
 With new Gallup data showing that social media ads don't affect the buying purchases of 63% of people, companies are radically rethinking why they're on Facebook and how they can best reach and communicate with their customers.
 Fed policy makers on June 18 trimmed bond buying by $10 billion for the fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion per month, while reiterating that they plan to keep the main rate close to zero.
 Wells Fargo Securities cut the rating on the second-largest operator of security exchanges to the equivalent of hold from the equivalent of buy.
 5 that Deutsche Securities provided officials from three pension funds with benefits totaling 63 million yen from 2010 to 2012 to persuade them to buy financial products.
 The bank argued that the buyers were sophisticated financial institutions.
 Economy Watch Three rounds of Federal Reserve bond buying have helped propel the S&P 500 higher by as much as 188 percent from its bear-market low in March 2009.
June 9 (Bloomberg) -- Lloyds Banking Group Plc has buyers for all the shares of its TSB Bank Plc after offering the stock to investors at a discount, said two people with knowledge of the matter.
 “They just want to get it done” Investors have become more selective in what they buy as London has its busiest IPO year since 2007.
 Should TSB sell shares at the midpoint of the IPO range, it would have a price-to-book-value ratio of about 085, almost half Lloyds’s own 14 price-to-book ratio, said Oriel’s Raja, who has a buy rating on Lloyds.
 Sevelda told shareholders that the Ukraine crisis was “damaging economically,” while not presenting an “existential risk” for Raiffeisen, and that investors would resume buying Raiffeisen’s stock once the crisis abates.
 The Thai unit of Aberdeen Asset Management Plc, which runs the nation’s second-best performing fund, is also buying amid inflows from local clients.
 The foreign outflows from Thailand contrast with Vietnam’s stock market, where overseas investors have been buying shares amid riots against a Chinese oil rig in disputed waters.
 He rates the shares the equivalent a buy with a price target of $48.
 Takeover Opportunities “The Sycamore buyout of Express has a better than 50 percent chance of being completed; however, we believe the transaction will be prolonged,” Jaffe wrote.
 Sycamore, which was started in 2011 by two executives from buyout firm Golden Gate Capital Corp, has been looking for opportunities in a retail economy battered by shaky consumer confidence and declining mall traffic.
 for about $5335 million last year and was in talks to buy Billabong International Ltd.
 Exchanges in Shanghai and Hong Kong agreed in April to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreign investors while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 “To put them in an index when most of the investors can’t buy those shares, because of the various restrictions that the Chinese have, doesn’t make sense,” Mark Mobius, who oversees about $50 billion as the executive chairman of Templeton Emerging Markets, said in April.
 China will expand its programs to allow foreign investors to buy local shares and will scrap quotas when conditions allow, the People’s Bank of China reiterated in its annual report for 2013 posted on its website today.
 drugstore retailer, withdrew its financial goals for fiscal year 2016 as it considers buying the remainder of Alliance Boots GmbH and possibly moving overseas to lower its tax bill.
 Investors should buy HSBC Holdings Plc, ING Groep NV, Nordea Bank AB, Swedbank AB and UBS AG as they stand to profit in the long-term by adapting to the environment and managing their costs and risk, Berenberg said.
 Janet Yellen repeated that the Fed is likely to “reduce the pace of asset buying in further measured steps” and that interest rates are expected to stay low after the buying ends.
 Nomura raised its rating on the company to buy from neutral, citing expectations for greater improvement in the glass business over the next three years.
 “I don’t think the company ever wants to put itself in a position where they feel like they’re not delivering a product that’s good enough to at least keep pace with inflation,” said Morris, who owns no MSG shares and gives MSG a buy rating.
 AT&T agreed in May to buy satellite provider DirecTV for $485 billion, an acquisition that could quickly turn the company into one of the largest TV distributors in the US.
 Hon Hai in May announced it would buy 583 million shares in Taipei-based Asia Pacific Telecom Co.
 With the policy toolbox now virtually exhausted and much hinging on whether banks boost credit themselves, failure to spur consumer prices will leave Draghi with little option but to enter the uncharted terrain of US-style bond buying.
 ABS Buying That still won’t be enough in the eyes of economists at HSBC Holdings Plc, who forecast the ECB will start bolstering the money supply and thus inflation by buying securities including government bonds sometime next year.
 Officials could buy “simple and transparent” securities backed by loans to companies -- a measure which would require a regulatory overhaul to permit such instruments, he said.
 A full-blown program of quantitative easing with sovereign-bond purchases that those central banks previously implemented might be even thornier for the ECB to contemplate than just ABS buying as the euro region lacks a unified government debt market that would be its obvious target.
 It would also be politically-charged amid questions -- especially in Germany -- over whether the ECB has the authority to buy sovereign debt and could flop given government bond yields are already at record lows.
 agreed to buy 76 percent of Turkey’s Tekstil Bankasi AS for $316 million in April, while Commercial Bank of Qatar bought Alternatifbank AS last year.
 Bank Asya last week issued a statement denying unspecified “media reports,” after Hurriyet newspaper reported that state-run lender TC Ziraat Bankasi AS was interested in buying the lender.
 is buying two small companies to boost its advertising and wireless technologies as part of an acquisition binge.
 today said it is buying video-editing startup SnappyTV for an undisclosed sum.
 Proprietary traders who use computers to buy and sell stocks in milliseconds would have to register with the SEC under recommendations made public yesterday by White in New York.
 Operators of dark pools, broker-owned venues that compete with exchanges and don’t publish bids and offers, would have to provide the regulator with their rules for matching buyers and sellers, White said.
 Mercuria agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s commodity unit for $35 billion.
 Overseas Expansion The game maker partnered with its biggest shareholder, SoftBank Corp, last year to buy a controlling stake in Supercell Oy, developer of games Clash of Clans and Hay Day.
 Others who were ready to buy couldn’t because there wasn’t enough stock available to satisfy demand.
 The explosion of fixed-income derivatives trading also speaks to the difficulty investors are having buying and selling bonds.
 “If approached by any government entity to buy my stake, I would consider the offer,” Ismaik, who was appointed CEO in February 2013, said by telephone.
 “Even if foreigners were to maintain the brisk pace of their Treasury buying in H2, primary US.
 The Fed is unwinding bond buying under the quantitative-easing strategy it has used to support the economy, reducing monthly purchases to $35 billion from $85 billion last year.
 locations in Mexico, agreed last year to buy Vips restaurants from Wal-Mart de Mexico SAB for 82 billion pesos.
 He began a wide ranging revamp that included job cuts to counter slumping demand before buying Sued-Chemie for $25 billion to add higher-margin catalysts.
 Retirement and insurance funds are buying up renewable-energy projects that can generate electricity for more than 20 years and receive state subsidies.
 Allianz has been buying clean energy assets since 2005 and spent more than 400 million euros ($548 million) in the industry last year.
 Redomiciling in a lower rate country means “you have a bigger wallet to do things” Valeant has performed the best among tax-inversion companies, gaining 707 percent since it announced plans to buy Biovail Corp.
 has had the worst performance, declining 89 percent since it said it would buy Canopius Holdings Bermuda Ltd.
 Canada’s second most populous province will also create a C$1 billion ($914 million) fund to buy equity stakes in mining and oil and gas companies, many of which operate in the province’s remotest regions, Leitao said yesterday in Quebec City as he unveiled his budget for the fiscal year that began in April.
 Apart from agreeing to buy WhatsApp, Facebook has said it will acquire virtual-reality goggles maker Oculus VR Inc.
 Prior to agreeing to buy WhatsApp, Facebook was struggling with the rise of mobile messaging, as the apps threatened people’s usage of the social network.
 “It’s the credits that developed-market investors tend to buy which have done the best, and that trade has largely played out,” Barclays strategist Aziz Sunderji said in a June 4 telephone interview from New York.
 “Prices had fallen a great deal, so with a decent deposit and us both working, getting a mortgage and buying a house finally became easier,” Molinero said.
 “It’s stopped declining and has started to increase again, but it’s coming off a very low base” Spanish banks’ lending standards remain tight, with loans going only to the most creditworthy home buyers, said Jesus Encinar, founder of real estate website Idealistacom.
 Acuna estimates that about 40 percent of Spain’s unsold properties won’t attract buyers in the next five to 10 years because of their undesirable locations, lack of amenities and a high unemployment rate that will exclude a large proportion of Spaniards from the mortgage market.
 During the peak of the housing boom in 2006 and 2007, Spaniards were buying 900,000 homes per year.
 “It’s no longer an individual who decides whether they will buy themselves a house; the bank has the final say” Molinero took out a 35-year variable-rate mortgage with a loan-to-value ratio of 80 percent at Euribor plus 259 with ING Bank.
 Banks now demand that would-be buyers demonstrate they have savings equivalent to 20 percent of a property’s purchase price, and are in stable employment with permanent contracts, Encinar said.
 Molinero, the Madrid homebuyer, agrees.
 Her next address, on June 18, might provide as good a reason as any to buy stocks.
 The biggest stock decline on a day when Yellen opined was a 061 percent slide on March 19 when she said borrowing costs could start rising “around six months” after the Fed stops buying bonds.
 Soriot cited the forecast last month in rejecting Pfizer Inc’s bid to buy his company for $117 billion (694 billion pounds).
 Pfizer ended its six-month attempt to buy AstraZeneca May 26, the deadline imposed by the UK.
 “AstraZeneca can genuinely boast a potentially exciting pipeline but promise and sales do not necessarily match up in this risky and competitive industry and furthermore its ex-pipeline assumptions will likely be seen as optimistic” Whether or not Pfizer returns, AstraZeneca will consider its own acquisitions, and will look at buying small to mid-size companies, Soriot said.
 “What we will not do is look for an acquisition that is purely defensive to try and escape,” a buyout, he said.
 life insurer, announced its first stock buybacks since 2008 as Chief Executive Officer Steven Kandarian seeks to reward investors.
 Kandarian, 62, had previously refrained from buybacks at MetLife while preparing for the prospect of increased oversight from US.
 He had previously said the company favored dividends over buybacks because the outlays are smaller.
 While avoiding buybacks, MetLife last year increased its dividend for the first time since 2007 and purchased Chilean pension provider AFP Provida SA for about $2 billion.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- A case of Chateau Petrus 1990 fetched $45,938 and 12 bottles of the same producer’s 1989 vintage sold for $42,875 to lead a Sotheby’s wine auction in New York dominated by buyers from North and South America.
 The auction shows renewed buyer appetite for older Bordeaux vintages and rare Burgundies following price declines for younger wines, particularly first-growth claret.
 Both top lots went to a Latin American buyer while nine bottles of Chateau Lafite Rothschild 1982 Bordeaux sold for $27,563 to a US.
 American Buyers North American buyers accounted for 58 percent of the sale on June 21, which fetched a total of $172 million, according to Sotheby’s.
 Asian buyers made up 25 percent, South American 16 percent and European 1 percent.
 Meanwhile, the business model of hackers has evolved, with the ability to buy and sell malware packages in black markets, which enables anyone to perform cyber espionage, she said.
 Typical buyers range from governments to companies that “use it for cyber espionage or basically to get information about their competitors,” Boo said.
 “The suppressed price levels may provide good buying opportunities over time, but for now it’s worth staying away from the stock,” David Sandor, an analyst at KBC’s Equitas unit in Budapest, wrote in an e-mailed report on the placement today.
 Four out of 17 analysts recommend buying the stock, nine say hold and four advise to sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 upgraded the British maker of Mr Kipling cakes to buy from neutral.
 Bank of America Corp, which agreed to buy Merrill in 2008 as the investment bank was close to collapse, left behind about 3 million square feet of offices at the former World Financial Center complex, renamed Brookfield Place.
 Bad Timing The group aged 35 to 44 fared badly in part because its members had taken on debt to buy real estate at just the wrong moment, said William Emmons, senior economic adviser at the St.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- Banks are buying into Turkey’s ambition to create one of the world’s busiest aviation hubs as they prepare to finance the country’s largest corporate loan.
 Lululemon’s stock rose as much as 43 percent to $4194 in New York, the biggest intraday gain since May 13, after the Wall Street Journal reported that Wilson is considering selling his stake or working with private-equity firms on a buyout of the company.
 The slump left Lululemon trading near its lowest earnings multiple since 2009, which may encourage an opportunistic buyer to make an approach, said Scott Rostan, founder of Training the Street.
 Adidas AG also would make sense as a buyer because the $22 billion sporting-goods maker could use its international expertise to help guide Lululemon’s overseas expansion, Wedbush Inc.
 “Consumers don’t want to just buy a product, they want to buy a set of values,” Beccari said.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Threats of penal capital and liquidity rules for asset-backed securities are stopping investors buying the debt that the European Central Bank is promoting as a savior for the region’s economy.
 Imperial is better placed to buy any Reynolds-Lorillard brands that may become available than most of its peers, including Japan Tobacco Inc, which has also been named as a potential buyer, said Chris Wickham, a tobacco analyst at Oriel Securities in London.
 While it may make sense for Imperial to buy brands that might be sold after a Reynolds-Lorillard merger, it could depend on which brands end up for sale and the company’s finances.
 Financial Stretch While it could be a financial stretch for Imperial to buy any brands that may shake loose from a Reynolds-Lorillard deal, the chance to increase the company’s presence in the US.
 homebuilders have reported surging sales and profit this year after mortgage lending rebounded to a six-year high and government policies reduced the amount needed by first-time buyers for down payments.
 debt were left with the largest share of a Treasury 10-year note auction in almost a year as buyers from a investor class that includes foreign central banks stepped away.
 Investors are holding off on buying Danaher shares until the $56 billion company, known for its dealmaking, gets back in the game with a transaction big enough to spark some growth, said Longbow Research.
 “They’ve got plenty of balance sheet to buy a wide variety of firms,” Knight, a New York-based analyst, said in a phone interview.
 That’s the company’s longest stretch without a deal of that size since it agreed to buy Radiometer A/S in 2003, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Both deals ended up going to buyout firms.
 If it sits toward the low end of its range, you’ll see more investor discontent” Dividend Projection Another possibility for Danaher if it doesn’t do a deal is to increase its dividend or buy back shares.
 Rail, Bouygues Alstom’s transport business makes the TGV high-speed trains, which the French company will keep as it buys GE’s rail-signaling operations.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 GE will buy 100 percent of Alstom’s gas turbine business and related servicing operations.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Owners of Univision Communications Inc, the largest Spanish-language broadcaster in the US, have been contacting companies to seek a buyer for the business, people familiar with the matter said.
 Univision is approaching buyers eight years after it agreed to a $123 billion buyout by a group of investors including Haim Saban.
 A buyer of Univision would gain access to programming aimed at the US.
 Univision’s buyout group was led by Saban Capital Group Inc.
 I think it is because they are Canadian” Magic Tricks Schwartz, a measured 72-year-old whose serious demeanor masks a secret delight in performing magic tricks and a pretty good Ronald Reagan impersonation, has been in the leveraged buyout game since its beginning.
 Better Reputation “We were able to buy a company almost entirely based on our reputation,” Schwartz said.
 Between late 1987 and early 1990, Onex didn’t buy a single business - leaving it in position to pounce when a recession hit in the early 1990s.
 Seller’s Market Schwartz sees some straws in the wind that a buyer’s market may be returning.
 grocery chain, settled investors’ lawsuits challenging Cerberus Capital Management LP’s $92 billion buyout by agreeing to turn over proceeds from future real-estate sales.
 While Safeway officials agreed to resolve investors’ claims, they said in a statement earlier today they still considered investors’ suits challenging the buyout to be “entirely without merit” As part of the deal, Safeway investors will receive about $40 a share, consisting of $3250 in cash, plus stock, valued at about $395 a share, in the gift-card unit Blackhawk Network Holdings Inc, company officials said in March.
 Under the original buyout offer, Cerberus would have received those sale proceeds, he said.
 Esteves gained recognition after he joined former partners in 2009 to buy UBS AG’s Brazilian investment bank, UBS Pactual, at a 19 percent discount to the $31 billion they had sold it to the Swiss bank for in 2006.
 “The company has looked to list on more than one occasion before and encountered similar circumstances last autumn when a number of airlines started speaking cautiously” Investors have become more selective in what they buy as London has its busiest year for initial share sales since 2007.
 The Federal Reserve’s pledge to keep its benchmark interest rate low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying program ends has put a lid on borrowing costs and propelled a rally in stocks that will support the expansion.
 Acceleration in economic activity has helped the Fed stay on pace to end its unprecedented bond-buying program late this year.
 ‘Exotic Rates’ The group uses a variety of strategies to beat returns available from simply buying mortgage bonds, one person said.
 They also can generate losses when interest rates fluctuate, especially if the desk borrows to buy assets and juice profits, according to Josh Siegel, a former Citigroup banker and now CEO of StoneCastle Partners LLC in New York.
 Metacapital Management LP’s largest hedge fund, the industry’s best-performing in 2012, lost 10 percent in a quarter last year amid speculation about Fed bond-buying and refinancing policies.
 “As soon as the Fed stops buying these bonds, it’s going to be like musical chairs” Raytcheva came to the US.
 The company has already entered into binding agreements to buy an acute-care, multidisciplinary hospital in Switzerland and is in talks to acquire outpatient facilities in the country.
 The stock sale represents about 5 percent of equity capital and buyers will be entitled to a final dividend of 68 cents a share to be paid June 23, the company said.
 automotive market than their counterparts during the next four years as they woo buyers with new products such as Ford’s aluminum F-150 pickup.
 Murphy’s estimates for his report are based on the assumption that consumers swayed by new products are drawn to dealer lots to buy vehicles.
 Car buyers flocked to showrooms last month, encouraged by strong stock and housing markets, rising consumer confidence and a jobless rate that’s hovering at an almost 6-year low.
 About two weeks before the first bid from Pilgrim’s, Hillshire had itself made an offer to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, producer of brands including Vlasic pickles, for $66 billion including debt.
 A condition of both Tyson and Pilgrim’s Pride’s earlier offers was that Hillshire scrap an agreement to buy the Birds Eye frozen-foods maker.
 “JBS’s BB rating is already below investment grade, and they don’t seem to bother about taking on more debt” Prepared Foods For JBS, which slaughters and packages beef and poultry, buying Hillshire would push it further into higher-margin, branded prepared foods.
 Imports to Japan, the biggest buyer of LNG and once Asia’s largest nuclear-power producer, may rise 14 percent in 2014 before falling by 128 million tons next year as the nuclear plants restart, according to Energy Aspects.
 The early start of Exxon’s Papua New Guinea project, some buyers holding high inventories and the weather outlook in key markets have caused prices to slip recently, he said.
 Falling Prices LNG into northeast Asia has dropped to $1195 a million Btu in the week ended June 16, the lowest since April 2011, amid “continued weak buying interest and a comfortable supply outlook,” according to the Energy Intelligence Group’s World Gas Intelligence publication.
 “Spot prices will be stable at current levels in coming months and rise somewhat, but not to levels close to those of last year during the winter-demand season” Sabine Pass Asia’s LNG buyers, accounting for about three-quarters of global consumption in 2013, are also considering North American supplies after a surge in extraction from shale deposits.
 buys the crop alongside companies like Alliance One International Inc.
 Infosys in a separate stock exchange filing said a news report about a share buyback plan was “speculative” ‘Locking Gains’ “The stock had run up in the past two days on the rumor of a buyback and Nandan Nilekani returning,” Ambareesh Baliga, managing partner of global wealth management at Edelweiss Financial Services Ltd.
 Amada Co, a company left out of the JPX-Nikkei Index 400 when the gauge started this year, pledged last month to pay out about half its profit in dividends and spend the other half on stock buybacks.
 Indexes matter because institutional investors as well as government bodies buy stocks they include in order to tie returns to the success of a broad swathe of the economy.
 The buying can increase the value of those companies, allowing them to raise more capital for expansion.
 Handing money back to investors through dividends and buybacks improves the return on each yen of remaining equity.
 The buybacks aim to please institutional investors while the higher dividends are for attracting individuals to the stock, Isobe said.
 “Foreign investors request better capital efficiency, share buybacks and so forth,” Isobe said.
 By spending all of its profit on dividends or buybacks for the next two years, Amada hopes to be picked for the index when it conducts its annual revamp of members in the summer of 2016.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- Starwood Capital Group, the investment firm run by Barry Sternlicht, agreed to buy seven US.
 reiterated its buy rating on the endoscope maker.
 recently and China’s economic numbers and comments are helping to see some upside buying in Japan,” said Stuart Beavis, head of institutional equity derivatives at Vantage Capital Markets in Hong Kong.
 agreed to buy Karoon Gas Australia Ltd’s stake in a ConocoPhillips natural gas project for about $800 million, giving the seller’s shares the biggest gain in more than five years.
 Thus far, he hasn’t succeeded in rejuvenating Alfa Romeo, with models such as the Brera hatchback and the 159 sedan failing to win over buyers.
 The heart of any firm such as Getco is its computer code that automatically buys and sells stocks, futures and other products.
 would probably appeal to buyers in China, Japan and South Korea as a feedstock for gasoline and petrochemical production, according to Ehsan Ul-Haq, senior market consultant at KBC Energy Economics.
 One of the best things you could do in the stock market over the last three years has been to buy shares from short sellers, who borrow stock with the aim of replacing it once the price falls.
 Funds that buy domestic shares have received $48 billion this year, compared with deposits of $25 billion in bonds.
 “We’ll buy some protection maybe at these levels, just in case something happens” The S&P 500 trades at 165 times estimated profit, about the same as the end of the last bull market in late 2007, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 This time it’s the end of the Fed’s asset-buying program and high valuations for Internet stocks that’s fueling concern.
 “The founders didn’t buy the data, only Telegate did,” Kuehnen said.
 “Antitrust rules only protect consumers or buyers, not shareholders of the buyers” Deutsche Telekom has faced lawsuits for a decade filed by directory-service providers who said they were being charged too much for the data that Germany’s former phone monopoly was required by law to provide.
 to Rio Tinto Group expanded output, deepening a global surplus as growth slowed in China, the world’s largest buyer.
 Higher fuel costs may stoke inflation in a country that buys about 80 percent of its crude from abroad, undermining Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s efforts to curb consumer prices and revive economic growth from near the weakest level in a decade.
 is legal, an appeals court ruled, overturning a judge who said the city’s Taxi and Limousine Commission overstepped its authority by requiring owners to buy a specific vehicle.
 The commission in September 2012 designated the Nissan NV200 as the official “Taxi of Tomorrow” and required owners of medallions, which confer the right to operate yellow cabs in New York, to buy the $29,700 vehicles.
 Taxi fleet operators sued the city in December 2012 seeking to block the requirement, and a judge halted the program five months later, saying it violated the administrative code because it didn’t allow medallion owners to buy hybrid vehicles.
 The city then revised the rules to let medallion owners buy hybrids until Nissan develops a hybrid version of the NV200.
 offered to buy it for a $68 a share.
 Altice will use 529 million euros of the proceeds to fund its purchase of a 14 percent stake in Numericable from buyout firms Cinven Group Ltd.
 “This is not a good starting point for buying equities at this price.
 We all know that investors are induced into risk assets by central bank policies, which keep your safer options very unattractive” Exchange-traded and mutual funds that buy US.
 Stock Outflows Individuals investing through the funds only started buying stocks in 2013 after the S&P 500 more than doubled from its 2009 low.
 and one of the first investors to buy when stocks were bottoming after the 2008 financial crisis, is also skeptical of the idea stocks valuations will falter amid low market breadth.
 Value Traded Record prices may contribute to a drop in the number of shares changing hands because it takes more money to buy the same amount of stock.
 The Fed pared its monthly asset buying to $45 billion in April.
 offered to buy the Botox maker for about $54 billion.
 pipeline operator agreed to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion, creating one of the biggest natural-gas transporters.
 Policy makers reiterated that they will probably “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and will keep rates low after the bond buying ends.
 offered to buy it for a $68 a share.
 Oracle agreed buy the company for about $46 billion as Chief Executive Officer Larry Ellison seeks to reignite slowing growth by adding software for hotels and restaurants.
 While not mandatory, recycling in Zurich or Basel saves people money as they are only charged for residual waste, for which they typically buy bags from the municipality.
 As part of today’s agreement, Barnes & Noble will buy at least 1 million devices from Samsung within the first 12 months.
 Buying Plans More Americans indicated in today’s confidence survey that they plan to buy automobiles, appliances and previously owned homes in the next six months.
 Provided stabilization continues, “Best Buy will be well-positioned to begin repurchasing shares by early 2015” Rifkin rates the shares an equivalent of a buy.
 “An auction is very good for certain items, but there are many private clients who wouldn’t consider buying from auction, and not everybody wants that huge publicity,” Steven Smith, a director at London-based violin appraiser and dealer J & A Beare Ltd.
 While the company that Sprint is negotiating to buy only operates in the US, parent Deutsche Telekom also sells the T-Mobile brand in Europe.
 T-Mobile has been the fastest-growing carrier of late, yet the company only started its “un-carrier” marketing initiatives a little more than a year ago when it was still reeling from AT&T’s failed attempt to buy the company.
 “Tesla will be able to win over people who’d normally buy a BMW.
 “For buyers looking for an all-electric premium sedan that seats up to seven, there is a choice of one -- the Model S,” said Tesla spokesman Simon Sproule.
 “For buyers still wanting to put gas in a tank, the choices have never been broader” Tom Cruise The BMW sports car, which has already made a cameo alongside Tom Cruise in a “Mission: Impossible” movie, is part of a broader effort by BMW to polish its image as an innovator with the “i” eco-friendly subbrand.
 The compact all-electric i3 has an order book stretching for the next six months and is helping win over new customers with 80 percent of the buyers fresh to the brand, Robertson said.
 climbed 36 percent after confirming reports that it will buy US-based Protective Life Corp.
 Credit Suisse raised its rating on the stock to outperform from neutral on three buy signals; potential rebound of the domestic inventory cycle; recovering spreads between raw material prices and steel product prices; and signs the shares are oversold.
 The insurer will buy US.
 housing market is getting a boost from low borrowing costs and government incentives to buyers as well as an improving economy.
 The Oil Ministry said it will continue to track shipments and prosecute buyers of crude supplied by the KRG, which it said is exporting crude illegally in violation of Iraq’s constitutional accords and at discounted prices.
 The KRG confirmed the sale of its second shipment by pipeline to Turkey in a statement on its website on June 20, without identifying the buyer.
 The Federal Open Market Committee continued to trim bond-buying that has fueled a rally in equities around the world and helped push the S&P 500 up 189 percent from a bear-market low in 2009.
 The FOMC repeated today that it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and to keep rates low after the bond-buying ends.
 “Now that the Fed has not interpreted that in a way that means the economy is overheating, I think the market will be pleased with that result” Reduced Threat A pickup in inflation lessens the threat of a prolonged drop in prices that hurts economic growth, giving Fed officials reason to continue to scale back their unprecedented bond-buying program.
 after buying OK Industries Inc.
 “Without question there are mergers and acquisitions in the pipeline for the company” Mayorga has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock and a target price of 6030 pesos.
 Investors may be at risk if they buy into small or previously inactive stocks seeking to enter the business after Canada moved to commercial production of the drug on April 1, Canadian Securities Administrators said today in a statement.
 Energy companies, financial firms and Asian buyers expanding in the US.
 “The market has expectations about further loosening of monetary policies and that’ll attract some buying sentiment” The CSI 300 Index gained 11 percent to 2,17642.
 UBS cuts its recommendation on the London-based company to neutral, similar to hold, from buy, saying management needs to do more to control costs as lower reserve growth in the life insurance business damps profitability.
 Pipes rates the shares a buy.
 We see deflation as a real risk” With the recovery struggling to gather momentum in the first quarter as stronger growth in Germany failed to offset weakness across the region, Balls said he sees a better-than 50 percent chance the ECB will have to go even further and buy assets under a quantitative-easing program, similar to those adopted by the Federal Reserve and the Bank of England.
 6 that the department had blocked its deal to buy $39 billion of servicing rights from Wells Fargo.
 “Walter is buying loans, and in the last few months we’ve seen a slowdown in the acquisitions by Ocwen and Nationstar,” said Douglas Harter, a director and servicing analyst at Credit Suisse Group in New York.
 “Now you’re seeing rental booming, but today’s renters are going to be tomorrow’s condo buyers” Builders broke ground on 22,000 for-sale multifamily residences last year, up 48 percent from 2012 and 47 percent from the post-crash nadir in 2010, Census Bureau data show.
 Condo builders were burned during the market’s collapse because buyers -- often investors -- were able to cancel purchases once prices started falling.
 High-end condo construction started to perk up three years ago in Manhattan, San Francisco and Miami, which attracted wealthy, international buyers bearing cash.
 Condo buyers pay a premium to live in higher-cost, higher-density areas, according to David Crowe, chief economist for the Washington-based National Association of Homebuilders.
 First Stop “There’s a lot of pent-up demand from first-time homebuyers and condos are a good first stop,” Crowe said in a telephone interview.
 Rather than relying solely on bank financing, Miami-area builders often pay for condo construction with buyer deposits for sometimes more than half the retail price of the units.
 Unlike the bubble years, buyers probably won’t walk away from these deals because they have so much skin in the game, said Jenny Huertas, the broker for CVR Realty in Miami.
 “We don’t see a bubble happening because the deposits are so big and that means real buyers” Lender Reluctance Banks are still reluctant to lend beyond New York, said Claudio Guincher, head of Continental Properties LLC, a Bellevue, Washington-based company building a 117-unit condo project in Seattle.
 They’re much more open to lending for apartments, where they view it as much lower risk” Condos are more dicey than rental projects because they rely on buyers getting mortgages and on opening for sale when the market cycle is still strong, said Burns, CEO of John Burns Real Estate Consulting.
 “We’ll do a handful of condo conversions this year” Lenders may not offer mortgages to buyers in condo buildings with large numbers of renters.
 The Federal Housing Administration, the biggest source of financing for first-time buyers, requires 50 percent owner occupancy to issue home loans in existing condo buildings.
 That hasn’t been a deterrent in high-cost markets with limited housing stock, where cash-bearing buyers often win in bidding wars.
 “Collecting art is a highly personal endeavor” Bacon, Warhol The Hills started buying art in 1980.
 Blackstone has been the most successful of the large private-equity firms to expand beyond leveraged buyouts, gathering assets under management of $272 billion.
 “What am I passionate about? What is good and what is great? If you’re thinking about an increase in value, you shouldn’t buy it.
 While there were a record $71 billion of food deals announced in the six months through May, most buyers are looking to diversify into products that target health-conscious, on-the-go consumers or expand their geographic reach, according to Ken Shea, an analyst for Bloomberg Industries.
 and Tyson Foods Inc, whose offers are contingent on it not buying Pinnacle.
 Other suitors are unlikely to emerge for Pinnacle, at least right now, according to Shea of Bloomberg Industries, which said industry buyers have been more attracted to pure-play companies.
 “There are no buyers that I see coming along for Pinnacle now,” Villere said in a phone interview.
 “Their buying record is awful,” Amir Anvarzadeh, manager of Japanese equity sales at BGC Partners Inc.
 “There is no obvious target they need to buy” Investment Writedowns Losses from NTT Docomo’s US.
 NTT Docomo in 2000 announced deals to buy stakes in AT&T Wireless Group, KPN Mobile NV in the Netherlands and Hutchison 3G UK Holdings Ltd.
 Flexibility Needed To profit from overseas acquisitions, a buyer needs to be flexible, willing to make compromises and able to understand the local culture, Edwin Merner, president of Atlantis Investment Research Corp.
 Few Opportunities To be sure, NTT Docomo may fail to find anything to buy.
 this month agreed to buy an 18 percent stake in the Bangkok-based company.
 “It doesn’t have to expand overseas” Rather than buy up more assets in other countries, NTT Docomo has room to increase its dividend, said Ramler at Macquarie.
 The company also announced a 500 billion-yen share buyback in April.
 Credit Suisse advised clients to “await a better entry point” to buy shares of BNP, said Barclays’s weak capital position will weigh on its strategic plan, and said compounding issues at HSBC Holdings Plc “create significant tail risks” Legal ‘Nightmare’ US.
 The buyers purchased the club using a bank loan personally guaranteed by Walters.
 After the buyers defaulted in 2008, Community Bank of Nevada told Walters he had to make good on the loan.
 In 2006, one of his companies sold Stallion Mountain in a transaction structured so that its 26 buyers could roll over proceeds from previous investments while deferring taxes.
 The course’s buyers sought to recover for their investment losses.
 At the trial, Dennis Kennedy, Walters’s lawyer, told jurors that his client didn’t cheat the buyers.
 He accused the buyers of damaging the course’s finances by installing property managers who replaced 38 acres of turf with desert landscaping to reap water rebates.
 On July 15, 2011, shares in Oakland, California-based Clorox rose after Icahn offered to buy the company for about $102 billion.
 The buyers’ lawsuit is FSP Stallion v.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Home sellers are lowering their expectations as buyer demand cools.
 More inventory should be coming onto the market, investor activity is declining and affordability is worsening” Nationally, asking prices gained 8 percent last month from a year earlier, the slowest pace in 13 months, amid damped demand from both traditional buyers and investors, Trulia said.
 Contracts to buy previously owned houses in the US.
June 25 (Bloomberg) -- Bavaguthu Raghuram Shetty, the entrepreneur buying a controlling stake in Travelex Holdings Ltd, is seeking about $600 million to finance his share of the deal, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The event follows last week’s announcement that Apple is buying headphones and music-streaming company Beats Electronics LLC for $3 billion, another move to boost growth.
 Google agreed to buy digital-thermostat maker Nest Labs Inc.
 A Harvard Business School graduate, Nunnelly joined the buyout shop from corporate-consulting firm Bain & Co.
 Among other deals, Nunnelly in the last 15 years helped engineer leveraged buyouts of Domino’s Pizza Inc, Houghton Mifflin Harcourt Publishing Co.
 That has helped persuade investors that potential losses will be limited, while interest payments of as much as the 115 percent from Madrid-based Banco Popular Espanol SA have lured buyers into the asset class.
 It’s becoming a much more institutional asset class and moving away from hedge funds and private banks that used to be the main buyers” Under European Union rules, banks can count additional Tier 1 debt equivalent to 15 percent of assets weighted by risk when calculating certain ratios.
 in May agreed to buy the company for $48 billion.
 Like other value investors, Klarman is willing to hold cash when he cannot find enough things to buy.
 “If the bank takes action on staff, it could be that the regulator reduces the fine, but we still don’t know what the cost will be,” Stefan Bongardt, an analyst at Independent Research GmbH who recommends investors buy BNP shares, said by telephone from Frankfurt.
 agreed to buy Consorcio Comex SA for about $23 billion, picking off the Mexican coatings and paint maker that competitor Sherwin-Williams Co.
 failed to buy because of antitrust issues.
 agreed to buy the life insurer for 5822 billion yen ($57 billion).
 Dai-ichi, Japan’s second-largest life insurer, will buy the company in the biggest foreign acquisition by a Japanese life insurer.
 The sportswear retailer was raised to buy from hold at Jefferies, which cited its long-term sales potential, the brand’s growing popularity among young people and women, and its valuation after recent declines.
 luxury handbag maker had its rating downgraded to neutral from buy at Sterne, Agee & Leach.
 CSN, controlled by Brazil’s Steinbruch family, last year was a leading contender to buy two unprofitable steel mills in Alabama and Brazil’s Rio de Janeiro state from ThyssenKrupp.
 agency that helps foreign companies buy American-made products is facing the biggest test in its 80-year history as House Republicans press to shut the US.
 The bank offers loan guarantees and other financing to foreign companies that borrow money to buy American products, which were valued at $374 billion in 2013 alone.
 The buyer decided to get financing from Korea’s export-credit agency instead, forcing FirmGreen to furlough three employees and get a loan through Wells Fargo & Co.
 Gail, which agreed to buy US.
 Anadarko Petroleum Corp, based in Woodland, Texas, said in March that it has signed deals to sell LNG from its Mozambique fields to Asian buyers at a price linked to both oil and US.
 Asia’s LNG buyers, accounting for about 74 percent of global consumption in 2013, are considering North American supplies driven by a boom in extraction from shale deposits.
 Gail agreed to buy 35 million tons of LNG a year for two decades from Cheniere’s Sabine Pass terminal in western Cameron Parish, Louisiana.
 One option being considered is for Mitsubishi to buy Alstom’s steam turbine and grid business and Munich-based Siemens to get the gas turbine operations, people familiar with the matter said.
 While bringing Mitsubishi into the contest is a “creative trick” by Siemens, it is unclear whether that will satisfy France, said Volker Stoll, a Stuttgart-based Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg analyst who recommends buying Siemens shares.
 Barclays falsified marketing materials to hide how much high-frequency traders were buying and selling, according to a complaint filed yesterday by Eric Schneiderman.
 That would limit the amount homebuyers can borrow and could stifle value gains.
 MModal, acquired by New York-based JPMorgan’s One Equity Partners in a $114 billion leveraged buyout in August 2012, filed for bankruptcy on March 20.
 Of the 46 lots offered only four failed to find buyers as Russian, Asian and American collectors competed for works by Pablo Picasso and Wassily Kandinsky.
 The prices include buyer’s premium; the estimates don’t.
 New Group “We are seeing a whole new group of buyers,” Philip Hook, Sotheby’s senior international specialist, Europe, said after the sale.
 The buyer was David Breuer-Weil, a collector and artist.
 would no longer be able to buy engines from his country to launch the satellites.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- The New Jersey Assembly approved a bill to allow consumers to buy electric cars directly from a manufacturer.
 CaixaBank, Spain’s third-biggest bank, and Sabadell, the fifth-biggest, have expressed interest in buying the unit, said the people, who asked not to be identified by name because the information isn’t public.
 In a separate announcement, Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne said that mortgages taken out under Help to Buy, a government program that guarantees loans to homebuyers with small down payments, will be capped at 45 times income.
 drugmaker, which agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
June 6 (Bloomberg) -- Japan Prime Minister Shinzo Abe ordered an earlier review of the biggest pension fund’s portfolio, Health Minister Norihisa Tamura said today, amid speculation the fund is already buying more stocks.
 Trust banks, which often buy and sell on behalf of pension investors, are putting the most money into local stocks in five years as foreigners sell, fueling speculation that GPIF is already buying.
 GPIF Speculation “Given that it’s the biggest net purchase since stock prices plummeted during the financial crisis, you’d have to speculate that GPIF or corporate pensions were doing the buying,” said Shoji Hirakawa, chief equity strategist at Okasan Securities Co.
 The market was expecting them to buy next fiscal year, but it looks like they’re already doing it” Sumitomo Mitsui Trust Bank Ltd, Mitsubishi UFJ Trust & Banking Corp.
 That contrasts with 2013, when Topix’s 51 percent surge was accompanied by record foreign buying and the banks dumped 4 trillion yen of shares.
 Japanese stock rallies are often characterized by foreigners buying shares from local investors.
 They added 2771 billion yen in overseas stocks, according to the data, which doesn’t specify whether the buyers were trust banks or other investors.
 “Chinese traders think prices at this level are a good buy in the medium term,” Ivan Szpakowski, an analyst at Citigroup Inc.
 “Once you get a couple of people starting to buy, you’ll quickly get a few follows because they think it’s a value buy” Prices have slumped 30 percent this year, reaching $9180 on May 30, the lowest since Sept.
 Blackstone Group LP’s deal to buy the Cosmopolitan resort and Genting Bhd’s proposed resurrection of an abandoned project on Las Vegas Boulevard are further signs of investor confidence in the nascent recovery.
 “Over the last year we really got the blood pumping now, and things are moving fast” Blackstone, the world’s largest alternative-asset manager, agreed last month to buy the two-tower Cosmopolitan complex on the Las Vegas Strip from Deutsche Bank AG for $173 billion.
 They’ve since climbed 46 percent, fueled in part by investors such as Blackstone buying foreclosed single-family houses to rent out.
 Billionaire investor Carl Icahn won court approval in January 2010 to buy the casino resort for $156 million after it went into bankruptcy.
 said the combination of gates and a floating-share price “would make those funds a product no rational investor would ever buy” BlackRock Inc, another large provider of money funds, has said many clients would abandon funds that can suspend redemptions.
 The handset features 3-D viewing and image-recognition technology to make it simpler for users to buy items from Amazon’s Web store.
 The handset’s image-recognition technology, called “Firefly,” will let the device figure out what a customer is looking at so the user can buy the item online.
 “I’m going to buy a whole lot more things with this technology than I ever have before,” said Ralph De La Vega, head of AT&T’s mobile business, at the event.
 A decade of currency controls has made dollars scarce in the South American country, making it harder for importers to buy goods and foreign companies to repatriate their cash.
 Manufacturers apply for foreign exchange at 10 bolivars per dollar in weekly auctions, while individuals and importers of non-essential products can buy currency in restricted amounts for about 50 bolivars per dollar in the daily government-run currency market.
 In their version of the story, dark pools serve as havens for institutional investors tired of seeing orders to buy and sell stocks front-run on public exchanges.
 I don’t know” Climbing Ranks Barclays was so bent on lifting its private trading venue to the upper ranks of Wall Street dark pools that it falsified marketing materials to hide how much high-frequency traders were buying and selling, the complaint said.
 In a June 5 speech, SEC Chair White said dark pool owners would have to provide the regulator with their rules for matching buyers and sellers.
 The document quotes one former senior director saying the bank “was doing deals left and right with high-frequency firms to invite them into the pool to be trading partners for the buy side,” referring to long-term investors such as mutual funds.
 “They would trade with the buy side.
 The buy side would pay the commissions.
 “And the buy side would totally be taken advantage of because they got stuck with the bad trade,” he said, according to the complaint.
 Still, the goal was less to win than to remind affluent buyers that the German brand remains focused on performance, even if the majority of the vehicles it sells are suited to shuttling kids and carrying groceries.
 Our idea is to clean up the bank, if needed, to reduce its capital and to negotiate with potential buyers” Shareholder Rift A VTB Group spokeswoman in Moscow declined to comment on the affiliate’s seizure today, saying it is a matter for its investment banking unit.
 after buying assets from its parent, China’s first state-owned investment company, including financial services, energy and property.
 and Kuok (Singapore) Ltd, controlled by the family of Malaysian billionaire Robert Kuok, will buy a combined $200 million of stock, according to yesterday’s filing.
 cut the stock’s rating to sell from buy.
June 16 (Bloomberg) -- Corporate-bond buyers are increasingly becoming stock pickers.
 Buying Stocks Junk-bond buyers earned 346 percentage points more than benchmark rates to own US.
 insider trading investigation of Carl Icahn’s attempt to buy Clorox Co.
 In July 2011, Bloomberg News reported that options traders who bought Clorox calls on July 11 could profit almost eightfold just days after Icahn bid to buy the bleach maker.
 Most Active More than 16,000 calls to buy the Oakland, California-based company changed hands on July 11, the most since October 2010 and 10 times the number of puts to sell, as the shares rose 28 percent.
 “‘It struck me as very unusual that someone was buying these earlier in the week.
 recommended buying the shares.
 Barratt advanced 12 percent to 3616 pence as Goldman Sachs upgraded its rating on the housebuilder to buy from neutral, citing the stock’s recent weakness.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- A partnership including Thor Equities LLC agreed to buy a 26-story office and retail building on Manhattan’s Fifth Avenue for $595 million.
 About 40,000 square feet of retail space and about 100,000 square feet of offices are available to be leased, providing the buyers with an opportunity to increase revenue, the people with knowledge of the agreement said.
 Iliad SA made an informal offer of between 4 billion and 5 billion euros in recent weeks to buy Bouygues Telecom, people familiar with the matter said.
 Numericable SA in April agreed to buy SFR from Vivendi SA, adding a mobile arm to its broadband services.
 Traders speculate the moves are likely to boost the region’s bond and stock markets, bolstering their appeal and the currency needed to buy them.
 QE refers to quantitative easing, or when a central bank resorts to buying bonds to lower borrowing costs and inject cash into the financial system.
 “People are going into asset markets because they think they should be buying European stocks or peripheral bonds, and that’s typically counter with a weaker currency from a pure flow perspective,” Eric Stein, a money manager at Eaton Vance Corp.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- British Airways parent IAG SA plans to buy new aircraft for its Iberia arm after the Spanish unit cut losses, according to Chief Executive Officer Willie Walsh, who had made fleet renewal contingent on improved earnings.
 IAG closed a deal to buy Deutsche Lufthansa AG’s UK-based BMI in 2012, securing scarce operating slots at BA’s London Heathrow base, and completed its takeover of Vueling last year.
 As central banks around the world keep interest rates near zero and investors struggle to find ways to boost returns, managers of Japan’s $125 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund said in minutes of a March meeting released in May that they’re considering loosening their practice of only buying investment-grade debt and venturing into junk bonds.
 While the current spreads make him “nervous,” he said, “you’ve got to get a fair return, you can’t be buying Treasuries at these levels” To contact the reporter on this story: Caroline Chen in New York at cchen509@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Shannon D.
 Others who were ready to buy couldn’t because there wasn’t enough stock available to satisfy demand.
 The shares’s local trading will increase liquidity as they will be available to some institutional investors that can only buy domestic securities, he said.
 Of the 60 lots offered, 20 failed to find buyers, including works by Pablo Picasso, Piet Mondrian and Alberto Giacometti.
 “We’ve had a number of requests from overseas hedge funds saying they’d like to buy the bonds if they come on the market” Informal Agreement Goldman Sachs and Aiful have reached an informal agreement that the US.
 BOJ Stimulus Borrowing costs have fallen in Japan as the BOJ buys about 7 trillion yen of sovereign bonds a month to spur inflation.
 In November, the pension fund contributed $200 million to an alliance with the Shapoorji Group to buy office buildings in major Indian cities.
 “We can use the joint venture to buy other toll road assets,” he said.
 Treasury two-year note yields climbed to the highest level since September as Fed officials debated the slowing of asset-buying and when to start raising interest rates before tomorrow’s announcement.
 “It’s a new way of presenting goods as the kitchen section is followed by the cookery shop where you can buy glasses, porcelain, pots and pans before you get to the section with dining tables and chairs,” Ferber said.
 With the end of the quarter, investors should expect about $20 billion in selling of equities and some buying of bonds as pension fund managers rebalance their portfolios, Boris Rjavinski, a strategist at UBS AG, estimated in a June 23 report.
 Running and basketball gear drove sales in North America and the company is benefiting from consumers increasingly buying athletic apparel and gear for everyday wear, not just when working out or playing sports.
 The maker of single-cup coffee brewing systems was raised to “buy” from “hold” by Argus Research Corp.
 There has to be some risk borne by the intermediary institutions and the borrowers themselves” The housing agency should require home buyers who need insurance to pay a deductible as is common for other types of policies.
 “At some point, they’re going to have to make some real money off of their media business,” said Charlie Anderson, an analyst at Minneapolis-based Dougherty & Co, who rates the stock a buy.
 Azar joined Barclays’s investment banking division as a managing director in 2010 after running New York-based buyout firm KKR& Co’s business in the Middle East and North Africa for two years.
 To keep settlements difficult to manipulate, the LME records ring sessions with microphones and video cameras to capture traders barking at one another to buy and sell aluminum, copper and zinc, among other metals.
 Some simultaneous buying and selling of contracts for different delivery dates, known as carry trades, can be done faster and in bigger amounts in the ring.
 After Mumbai-based Cipla bought its South African distributor and raised its stake in a Ugandan manufacturer to gain more control of exports, buyers may have to offer at least $97 billion to convince the founders to sell, said Angel Broking Ltd.
 This month, it agreed to buy Labrys Biologics Inc, a US.
 Mylan Deal Mylan Chief Executive Officer Heather Bresch said in February the $19 billion company was “poised for a transaction this year” The drugmaker -- named by Bino Pathiparampil, an analyst at IIFL, as a possible buyer for Cipla -- had its second bid for Sweden’s Meda AB rejected in April.
 While Cipla could attract interest, the Hamied family may be reluctant to sell and a buyer would have to offer 6 to 8 times the drugmaker’s projected sales for the year ending March 2015, said Centrum analyst Kapadia.
 Among Indian peers, only Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, India’s largest drugmaker by market value, has the financial clout to buy Cipla, said IIFL’s Pathiparampil.
 Such a deal is unlikely after Sun agreed to buy rival Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 All the same, for a buyer such as Teva, a purchase would land it a network of factories and a range of respiratory medications to bolster its own products in that area, CIMB’s Agarwal said.
 The private-equity firm, which spent about 84 million pounds to buy a minority stake in the firm from founder Norman Foster in 2007, will receive about 108 million pounds from the sale of its minority stake to his partners and the repayment of loans, according to a statement today.
 “Foreign companies” are buying up gas storage and may be able to control supplies for “strategic purposes,” the Bavarian chancellery in Munich said today in a statement.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Det Norske Oljeselskap ASA, controlled by billionaire Kjell Inge Roekke, will buy Marathon Oil Corp’s Norwegian business for $27 billion in a transformational deal that will boost output 14-fold and settle questions on funding.
 The strategy should also include buying producing assets to boost cash flow and exploit its tax position through deducting investments from income, Aker CEO Oeyvind Eriksen said.
 “It’s a fortunate side-effect of buying production and having a lot of capex,” he said.
 For Woolworths, buying David Jones would increase its presence in Australia and make it more competitive with fast-fashion operators such as Inditex SA’s Zara and Hennes & Mauritz AB.
 Woolworths Bid Woolworths agreed to buy David Jones for A$4 a share on April 9, and the Sydney-based company’s shareholders are due to vote on the deal July 14.
 While shares of David Jones traded as low as A$379 this month on concern Lew may block the deal, they climbed 4 percent to A$394 yesterday after Woolworths offered to buy Lew’s shares and other remaining minority stakes in Country Road.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG agreed to buy Genia Technologies Inc.
 The European Central Bank said on June 5 it’s preparing plans to buy the debt to boost lending in the region.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- OC Oerlikon AG, a Swiss maker of textile machinery, closed its $11 billion deal to buy the coatings units of crosstown rival Sulzer AG earlier than planned and raised its full-year sales forecast.
 executive Koch has been tasked with integrating Sulzer’s coatings division, which Oerlikon agreed to buy earlier this year for 1 billion Swiss francs.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, agreed to buy GE Money Bank AB, the consumer finance business of GE Capital in Sweden, Denmark and Norway, for about 700 million euros ($953 million).
 “The deal is positive since it allows Santander to diversify both geographically and in terms of the type of business lines they buy” The bank agreed to buy 51 percent of the finance unit of El Corte Ingles SA, Spain’s largest retailer, for about 140 million euros in October.
 Current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic all improved this month, today’s figures showed, indicating mortgage rates close to historically low levels and a strengthening job market are sustaining demand.
 The group’s gauge of prospective buyer traffic rose to 36 from 33 the prior month, while the index of current single-family home sales increased to 54 from 48.
 Investors should sell after the bond rally as reduced demand cuts prices for iron ore, according to Michael Roche, an emerging-market strategist at Seaport Group, which this month started recommending clients buy debt from Southern Copper Corp.
 Encana has been selling gas fields and buying oil fields to boost profit by producing the more valuable fuel.
 “Valuations that are lower than rivals provide adequate reasons for buying into them” Casino operators advanced in Hong Kong after Macau’s finance secretary commented on payment card devices used by jewelry and watch retailers within gaming houses.
 The company was rated a new buy at Daiwa, which said snack sales growth in China will top soft drinks in the next three years.
 announced a $10 billion stock buyback.
 The panel is scrutinizing the Ex-Im Bank, which helps foreign companies buy US.
 The bank gives foreign buyers loan guarantees, loans and credit insurance, and last year backed $37 billion in exports, about 2 percent of the total of US.
 is pushing for change, including preventing the bank from providing loan guarantees to help government-backed foreign competitors, such as Dubai’s Emirates Airline, buy wide-body Boeing jets.
 Gains were spurred by optimism the city’s government may relax the timeline on the double stamp duty refund, giving buyers will more time to sell their existing homes to qualify for a refund of the additional tax from a new property purchase.
 to hold from buy, Hong Kong-based analyst Karen Tang wrote in a note yesterday.
 and Canada from which it may need to buy power and real-time data on fuel supplies at power plants.
 Energy Management Participants like Downs sign up to have their homes wired down to the circuit to track power use and in return get rebates for buying and using home energy management systems, electric vehicles and solar panels.
June 28 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Carlos Slim will buy out AT&T Inc’s stake in America Movil SAB for $557 billion, propping up his Latin American mobile-phone company’s stock price as his longtime partner from the US.
 AT&T is selling its holdings of Slim’s company after a 24-year relationship to avoid a conflict of interest because the company is buying DirecTV, which competes with America Movil for pay-TV customers across Latin America.
 is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 agreed to buy Fusion-io Inc, which provides storage to Facebook Inc.
 “This would really be an acquisition for their retail arm and it would add another leg to their growth stool as they are more focused on their e-commerce and cloud strategy,” said Daniel Ives, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets & Co, who rates Oracle the equivalent of a buy.
 into the luxury-car segment show that wealthy drivers are ready to buy upscale green cars, if they get noticed.
 Global investors, through the Hong Kong Stock Exchange, will be able to buy into Citic’s diverse lines of business.
 Measures of current sales, the outlook for future purchases and prospective buyer traffic were the highest since January.
 and Rio Tinto Group are battling a price slump as growth slows in China, the world’s largest buyer.
 While the $56 billion retailer may not want to sell at this level, the drop could encourage an opportunistic buyer to make an approach, said Scott Rostan of Training The Street.
 Adidas AG also would make sense as a buyer because the $22 billion sporting-goods maker could use its international expertise to help guide Lululemon’s overseas expansion, Wedbush Inc.
 With the stock drop, Lululemon hasn’t been this cheap for potential buyers since July 2009, one month after the end of the worst US.
 Adidas, which is based in Herzogenaurach, Germany, and gets more than 75 percent of its sales from outside North America, also could be a logical buyer should a deal occur, said Corinna Freedman an analyst at Wedbush.
 “I don’t know that they’d be successful in pressuring, but I think there’s clearly an opportunity for someone to come in” The drop may also be dramatic enough to entice buyers to approach on their own, said Frank Beck, president of Austin, Texas-based Beck Capital Management LLC.
 “The drop has at least gotten the valuation down low enough that, heck, if it went down a little lower, I’d probably consider buying shares myself,” Beck said in a phone interview.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Henkel AG agreed to buy France’s Spotless Group SAS for 940 million euros ($13 billion) as the maker of Loctite glue and Persil detergent overcame concerns about overpriced deals to seal its second takeover in a week.
 Previous owner Axa Private Equity created the company in 2005 after buying homecare-product maker Eau Ecarlate and then adding six cleaning-product brands in Italy, the UK.
 Timken, B/E Founded in 1996, Relational buys stakes in companies it considers undervalued and then lobbies management and boards for changes to boost returns.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Payment Due The utility, which raided its capital budget last month to buy fuel, has $86 billion of debt, with about 70 percent not covered by bond insurance, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The cabinet today approved speeding up plans to buy anti-tank rockets from the US, authorizing Defense Minister Sven Mikser to hold talks to purchase the missile systems “in a somewhat bigger scope and on a quicker timetable than initially planned,” the government press office said by e-mail.
 Providing Standard General’s funds are able to purchase at least 10 percent of outstanding shares in the retailer, it will loan Charney funds to buy the stake, charging annual interest of 10 percent, according to a filing yesterday.
 The Financial Times reported yesterday that Emirates will hold talks with Airbus and Boeing in late 2014 or 2015 about buying A350s or 787s, citing President Tim Clark.
 A similar deal for Cencosud to sell the credit-card units to Itau Unibanco Holding SA was called off in December, and the next month the Brazilian lender agreed to buy Chile’s Corpbanca.
 Global Leadership The change in policy, which would exempt new entrants from having to buy an existing automaker, is necessary because the window of opportunity for China to seize global leadership in electric vehicles is closing fast, he said.
 The company has also agreed to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility unit.
 Defense Department and the Department of Homeland Security, buy the IBM servers, according to an analysis by Bloomberg Industries.
 Investors have asked for about 24 percentage points of extra yield on average since April 1 to buy the debt instead of benchmark securities.
 “They have very ambitious goals in natural foods” Wolf recommends buying the shares.
 Interviews/Commentary Muni-Bond Buyers May Overpay on Trades, SEC’s Gallagher Says Retail investors buying municipal bonds may overpay for their trades because brokers aren’t always required to disclose their commissions, US.
 France said yesterday it will back GE’s bid, turning aside an offer by Siemens AG, provided that the state buy a 20 percent stake in Alstom from Bouygues.
 Alstom’s transport business makes the TGV high-speed trains, which the French company will keep as it buys GE’s rail-signaling operations.
 GE’s attempt to buy US.
 GE will buy 100 percent of Alstom’s gas turbine business and related servicing operations.
 GE is buying Alstom’s gas turbine operations and creating joint ventures in the steam turbine, renewable energy and electrical-transmission businesses.
 As part of the deal, the French state will buy as much as 20 percent of Alstom.
 The stock sale “should bring some calm to the constant concern the bank is weakly capitalized as it deals with its litigation bills,” said Ingo Frommen, an analyst at Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg who raised his recommendation for the stock to buy from hold.
 The Netherlands is the biggest buyer of cocoa.
 Rexam, focusing on its main business after selling plastic-container units, plans to buy more companies after purchasing 51 percent of a can manufacturer in Saudi Arabia in February.
 Rexam in February agreed to buy a stake in United Arab Can Manufacturing Ltd, or UAC, in Saudi Arabia for $122 million, with the deal to close in the third quarter.
 Lew, a billionaire former board member of Reserve Bank of Australia, spent about A$209 million ($195 million) buying 53 million shares in the Australian department store chain between May 9 and June 16, according to a regulatory statement today.
 “Maybe he’s just buying at A$388 so he can sell for A$4? That’s quite a reasonable thing to do” Lauren Thompson, a spokeswoman for Lew, declined to comment on his investment.
 Acromas Holdings Ltd, the buyout firms’ investment vehicle, received about 12 billion pounds in the IPO after selling all its shares.
 The comfort gauge is a composite of ratings on the economy, personal finances and buying climate.
 The metric for personal finances fell one point to 511, while the outlook on the buying climate gained 07 point to 327, its best in seven weeks.
 Bright Food is open to buying domestic and overseas companies and it isn’t interested in deals that are “too small” and prefers to work on one acquisition at a time, Chairman Lv Yongjie said in an interview on June 18, without providing further details.
 “Imported foods are also growing in popularity in China and they may also be seeking foreign food brands to address the trend” Bright Food, which controls Shanghai-listed Bright Dairy & Food Co, reached a preliminary agreement last month with private-equity firm Apax Partners LLP to buy its 56 percent in Tnuva for about $960 million, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 The share sale could give Bright Food additional financial resources to expand the unit and help fund future buyouts, Guosen’s Yang said.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Kai Yuan Holdings Ltd, an investor in Chinese steelmakers and real estate, said it agreed to buy the Paris Marriott Hotel Champs-Elysees for 3445 million euros ($468 million).
 In December, it agreed to buy a 90-room, 32-story property in Hong Kong’s Sheung Wan district for HK$488 million ($63 million).
 Lloyds said individual investors are buying about 30 percent of the shares.
 “Authorities need to come up with a range of enforcement measures, including testing the fuel and looking at companies’ invoices of what they are buying compared with what they actually are consuming,” he said by phone on June 3.
 agreed to buy mobile-advertising company TapCommerce, seeking to make more money outside of its main microblogging service by expanding promotions on smartphones and tablets.
 TapCommerce targets people on their mobile phones or tablets with ads for things they’ve already expressed interest in buying, urging them to complete the purchase.
 The acquisition will give advertisers “access to additional off-Twitter inventory and buying opportunities,” Alfonsi said in an interview yesterday.
 Twitter’s deal to buy MoPub for $350 million was its biggest acquisition to date.
 The company has five buys, five holds and three sells from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “That puts Molson Coors in a very strong position to buy that 58 percent at a very low price,” Holland said.
 “They’re not buying 12 packs of the Miller Lights of the world.
 They’re buying a 6-pack of a craft beer and enjoying the flavor more” Craft beer sales rose 17 percent in the US.
 Sycamore, which was started in 2011 by two executives from buyout firm Golden Gate Capital Corp, has been looking for opportunities in a retail economy battered by shaky consumer confidence and declining mall traffic.
 for about $5335 million last year and was in talks to buy Billabong International Ltd.
 made its biggest acquisition yet in agreeing to buy Kentz Corp.
 The company was said to have first looked at buying Kentz last year, when the share price was less than 500 pence.
 In December, the company agreed to buy Valerus Field Solutions for $435 million in cash to expand in US.
 Diamond companies rely on financing, with dealers using credit to buy rough stones from miners and to fund gem-trading and the cutting and polishing of stones for jewelry production.
June 11 (Bloomberg) -- Swiss Re Ltd, the world’s second-biggest reinsurer, agreed to buy the UK.
 Admin Re, one of the three business pillars of Zurich-based Swiss Re, buys and manages blocks of closed life and health insurance funds, mainly in the US.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his March budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity with their pension savings.
 to a buy from a hold after the equipment auctioneering company on June 6 reported a 30 percent increase in May gross auction proceeds to $299 million, compared with $230 million a year ago.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- SunEdison Inc, the best-performing solar company this year, agreed to buy solar projects in Massachusetts with 50 megawatts of capacity from BlueWave Capital LLC.
 Asos Plc advanced 74 percent, after plunging 31 percent yesterday, as UBS AG advised investors to buy shares in Britain’s largest online fashion retailer.
 UBS raised its rating on company to buy from neutral, saying that the investments Asos had made to expand the business will help deliver sales growth of above 20 percent per year for the next five years.
 Issuance of CLOs, which helped finance some of the biggest leveraged buyouts in history during the last credit boom, has picked up following an early 2014 slump after the Volcker Rule said banks can’t invest in CLOs that own bonds.
 requirement put in place in April 2013 has contributed to the increase in yields, because it says banks with more than $10 billion in assets that buy CLOs must designate them as ’’higher-risk’’ holdings.
 The recent surge in CLO issuance also has allowed investors to be selective and choose not to buy a deal if interest rates are too low, Preston said.
 “If there’s not as much supply from one region, that increases the capacity of the buy side to absorb more issuance elsewhere,” Peter Lannigan, managing director at broker-dealer CRT Capital Group LLC, said in a telephone interview from Stamford, Connecticut.
 While mid-sized companies are benefiting from fiscal stimulus, the State Council’s latest action underscores the importance of reducing financing costs for companies and home buyers, he said.
June 19 (Bloomberg) -- Shares in Man Group Plc, the world’s largest publicly traded hedge-fund manager, rose the most in more than three months after it said it would buy Boston-based Numeric Holdings LLC for as much as $494 million.
 Pine Grove The deal “makes strong strategic sense,” Philip Middleton, an analyst at Bank of America Corp, who has a buy rating on Man Group’s stock, wrote in a note to clients.
 Man Group said this month it would buy Pine Grove Asset Management LLC, a New Jersey-based investment firm that manages about $1 billion.
 To stream recorded shows to tabletsor other devices instead of the TV, customers must buy anotherdevice for $12999.
 Tostream live broadcast programming, a customer must buy anotherdevice with an antenna from Really Simple Software Inc’sSimpleTV for $19999 to $34999.
 “For me to be able to do the same thing via TiVo or anyother DVR product, not only would I have a high upfront cost tobuy the box, but they also require a monthly fee for just havingthe guide,” said Cliff Lipple, a 28-year-old managementconsultant from Atlanta.
 As smartphones become increasingly more useful, buyers are paying up for the companies that develop the most popular apps.
 Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd, the state-backed electricity supplier, agreed to buy the power from the two solar farms, which are near Douglas, South Africa, in the Northern Cape Province, according to the statement.
 government will allow the company to access $16 million in student-aid funds as it seeks buyers for most of its 107 campuses.
 agreed last month to buy BCX for about 27 billion rand ($253 million) as Africa’s largest fixed-line operator boosts cloud-based offerings of information and communication technology services.
 gained 28 percent in Tokyo as Barclays Plc recommended buying the pharmaceutical manufacturer’s shares.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen testified to lawmakers May 7 that the central bank will probably end bond-buying in the fall if the labor market continues to improve.
 Europeans, like buyers in New York, Hong Kong and Dubai, are increasingly drawn to their amenities and convenience.
 International buyers are growing particularly interested in Frankfurt, said Joachim Poes, head of city development at Nassauische Heimstaette Wohnungs- und Entwicklungsgesellschaft mbH, which is building the 19-story Praedium in the Europaviertel district near the city’s exhibition grounds.
 International Buyers Almost half of the buyers at the Praedium, whose developers promise residents “living like on Central Park,” are from countries including China, Brazil, the UK, and Russia, said Poes.
 Flowers & Co, Christopher Flowers’s leveraged-buyout firm, raised 134 million pounds ($224 million) in an initial public offering of British lender OneSavings Bank Plc.
 Pershing Square, headed by Chief Executive Officer Bill Ackman, is pushing Allergan to accept a $542 billion buyout offer from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc.
 The plan allows shareholders to buy large amounts of stock at a discount if anyone obtains 10 percent of the company, making a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.
 Rare Diseases In addition to a lower tax rate, buying Shire offers access to the fast-growing market for treatments against rare diseases.
 agreed to buy Covidien Plc, a maker of hospital supplies and medical devices, for $429 billion.
 “If you buy C$15 billion of assets, you could pay C$150 million to C$200 million,” Desjardins said.
 That included buying plane tickets for family members and using corporate housing for friends and himself that wasn’t related to company business, according to the person.
 Stones from Catoca, the world’s fourth-biggest mine, are sold through Angola’s Sodiam state marketing unit to preferred buyers at an average of about $100 a carat, while they can fetch about $150 on the world diamond market, they said.
 That year, Meehan led a leveraged buyout of about $49 million for the 52 percent of the stock she didn’t already own, the Los Angeles Times reported.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 agreed to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 agreed to buy Fusion-io Inc, which provides storage to Facebook Inc.
 He led Oracle Team USA to victory in the America’s Cup last year and agreed in 2012 to buy most of the Hawaiian island of Lanai for an undisclosed sum.
 In December, Oracle agreed to buy marketing-software maker Responsys Inc.
 Legere, a self-styled rebel, has branded T-Mobile the un-carrier and gained subscribers by making aggressive moves like financing phone purchases and buying out contract penalties for customers that switch service.
 “There is an inherent clawback” in using this sort of method, Ehrhart said, referring to a private-equity concept that allows investors to take back fees paid to managers if early gains in buyout funds are wiped out by subsequent losses.
 Credit Suisse recommended buying the shares along with those of MGM China Holdings Ltd, citing strong growth in the Macau mass-gaming market.
 Hydro-Quebec under a 20-year contract has agreed to buy electricity from the 235-megawatt Temiscouata I wind farm, which is expected to be operational in December.
 We’re losing money at the beginning but we’re betting that a huge number of people will buy the robots” Maisonnier declined to give a timeframe for the sales projection.
 The buyout included job cuts to help the company reduce annual costs by about 20 million pounds ($34 million), it said in a statement at the time, without disclosing the number of dismissals.
 Chief Executive Officer Larry Ellison is nearing a deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 “This is a shocker for investors who were expecting a slight beat in the quarter -- new license sales were weak and it’s quite clear the company has a lot of heavy lifting in front of it,” said Daniel Ives, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets & Co, who rates Oracle the equivalent of a buy.
 Oracle made another acquisition in cloud computing today, with an agreement to buy LiveLOOK, a real-time technology for co-browsing and screen-sharing.
 The comments today came after Finance Minister Joe Oliver said Canada’s crude reserves are “effectively landlocked” and the country needs buyers of its oil other than the US.
 Dekkers, 56, cut the second-largest deal in Bayer’s history in May, agreeing to buy Merck & Co’s consumer-health unit for $142 billion to solidify Bayer’s position near the top of that market.
 “And more of that will be swung behind consumption related commodities like energy, like food and fertilizers and middle-income metals” China, the biggest buyer of metals, is in transition from an infrastructure driven economy to a consumer economy, Mackenzie said.
 China buys about a fifth of the $20 billion in global potash shipments to enhance crop yields in the world’s most populous nation.
 It has also given details of proposals that allow some junior creditors to buy shares in the company at a discount so Punch can repay junior notes in the Punch A securitization for less than face value.
 People were wondering, what do you do next?” Wisconsin Energy shareholders will be assured higher cash flow as the company takes over projects planned by Integrys, said Parker, who rates Integrys at buy and Wisconsin Energy at hold.
 nuclear-power plants, agreed to buy Pepco for $68 billion in cash in April.
 is buying Alabama Gas Corp.
 The number of customers he has won since his pledge last year to buy the plane: zero.
 While Emirates is also the biggest buyer of the A380, that aircraft has failed to attract a new airline customer in two years, raising pressure on both Lapidus and Airbus to show their leasing model, so far unique to the A380, will pay off.
 Emirates’ cancellation, announced yesterday, revealed a preference for Boeing Co’s planned 777X, for which the carrier has committed to buy at least 150.
 General funds also are used to buy books or pay teachers.
 a little over a year after buying the taxi firm, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 “We’re waiting for an opportunity for share prices to make another correction so we can buy at a cheaper level,” Win said.
 Because Trinity’s terminals are approved by the FHWA, state highway departments that buy them are often eligible for federal reimbursements.
 government reimbursed up to 100 percent of local buyers’ costs for highway projects.
 On the way out of the junkyard, Harman asked whether he could buy the wreck to preserve it as evidence.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Dubai’s stocks rose, spurred by funds from money managers tracking the MSCI Emerging Markets Index who had yet to buy into the world’s best-performing gauge.
 “It’s residual buying as the funds that have not allocated yet are gradually making allocations,” Talal Touqan, the head of research at Abu Dhabi-based Al Ramz Securities, said by phone.
 It agreed to buy Autoru website for $175 million this week to enter the classifieds business.
 Ventas, based in Chicago, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 Ventas also said it will buy 29 independent senior-housing communities in Canada from Lake Oswego, Oregon-based Holiday Retirement for C$980 million ($900 million) in cash.
 Competition is strongest for medical offices and senior housing among real estate buyers, he said.
 scrapped rules pushing retirees to buy an annuity in Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne’s March budget and capped the fees that pension funds are allowed to charge savers.
 shares, a step toward returning some cash to the buyout firm’s investors after the biggest initial public offering of a US.
 The underwriters will be allowed to buy another 135 million shares if they sell the initial amount.
 The New York-based firm’s $26 billion purchase of Hilton in 2007 came at the tail end of the buyout boom.
 Companies are investing in plant and labor after having run up piles of cash and devoted much of what they did spend to buying back stocks or issuing dividends.
 Another option under discussion is for Vnesheconombank, the state development lender, to buy Mechel shares or bonds rather than the creditor banks, the people said.
 yesterday raised Russian stocks to the equivalent of buy from the equivalent of sell, citing the “fading of the Ukraine crisis,” according to an e-mailed note.
 Shenzhen’s sale of lottery tickets offering a chance to buy shares in August 1992 drew hundreds of thousands of investors to the southern city and sparked days of violence after application forms ran out.
 “Their costs won’t rise as they needn’t buy from outside” The shares of Mumbai-based Tata Steel gained 38 percent, the most since May 14, to 49290 rupees at the close in Mumbai.
 Expanding funding options for the firms may also be a boon for property buyers and real-estate markets that the system is meant to bolster.
 In return for buying stock in the institutions and pledging collateral such as mortgages, highly rated bonds or other assets, the members receive access to low-cost, wholesale funding.
 Ladder Capital uses its FHLB funding from Indianapolis to buy mostly AAA rated bonds, CEO Brian Harris said last month in a conference call.
 The REITs are diversifying their investments and funding sources after struggling to navigate the Federal Reserve’s moves to scale back its monthly bond buying, as well as facing dwindling returns on distressed debt.
 Officials have reduced monthly buying to $45 billion this year, from $85 billion in 2013, amid signs of the economy is beginning to respond.
 Chief Executive Officer Robert Kotick must face investor claims that he improperly benefited from an $82 billion buyout of Vivendi SA’s stake in the video-game maker, a judge ruled.
 The shareholders contend directors wrongfully let a group led by Kotick and Activision Chairman Brian Kelly buy a piece of Vivendi’s Activision stake amounting to 25 percent of the company at the same discounted price Activision paid for another block of shares.
 The shareholders properly raised questions about the directors’ willingness to let Kotick and Kelly form an investment group to buy $234 billion of Vivendi’s stake as part of the $82 billion recapitalization, Judge Travis Laster concluded today at a hearing in Wilmington, denying a bid by directors, as well as Kotick’s and Kelly’s group, to have the case thrown out.
 No ‘License’ “The fact that a company can show there was a benefit to shareholders doesn’t provide a license to skim or grab” a corporate opportunity such as buying shares at a discount, Laster concluded.
 The investors also said Kotick used threats to quit to strong-arm directors into allowing his investment group to buy a sizeable chunk of the French conglomerate’s stake and then blocked Activision from considering alternative deals, according to court filings.
 Instead, Kotick and Kelly pushed directors to have Activision buy back almost $6 billion of Vivendi’s stake and allow the executives to form an investment group that would purchase almost $25 billion worth of shares.
 Buyout Cleared Kotick’s and Kelly’s demands that they be allowed to participate in the Vivendi-stock buyback amounted to a “diversion of an economic opportunity” available to Activision, Joel Friedlander, an attorney for investors, told Laster today.
 “The company could not buy enough shares to satisfy Vivendi’s desire” to sell most of its Activision stock, Robert Sacks, a lawyer for the investment group, argued today.
 Independent directors who signed off on Kotick’s and Kelly’s involvement in the stock-buyback transaction evaluated other potential deals and found the investment group’s offer was the best option, said William Savitt, a lawyer representing the board members.
 Until its deal to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc, though, Merck lacked a candidate that hit the same target as Gilead’s Sovaldi, blocking a viral protein critical for replication.
 Merck’s $385 billion deal announced yesterday to buy Idenix gave them that drug, allowing the company the chance to combine it with two others that have been shown to work well in combination.
 Though Molson Coors would consider buying new brands, it’s not in a hurry to do so, Swinburn said.
 We have a belief that we can buy, build or borrow” The big beer companies also could see more consolidation, though Swinburn doesn’t expect the kind of merger mania that created Anheuser-Busch InBev NV and SABMiller Plc in the first decade of the 2000s.
 The contracts give investors the right but not the obligation to buy or sell a security at a certain price.
 There is no meeting ground” The breakdown in talks and uptick in attacks raises questions about Sharif’s strategy and threatens to disrupt his plans to attract investors to buy stakes in state-run companies as part of an International Monetary Fund road map to revive the economy.
 Some 62 percent of 58 economists in a Bloomberg survey predict the Fed will halt bond buying at its October meeting.
 Daiichi Sankyo rose 17 percent to 1,765 yen after Mizuho Securities raised the company’s rating to buy from neutral, saying new products will drive earnings growth.
 While Shire’s Chief Executive Officer Flemming Ornskov has said AbbVie’s offer undervalues the company, he also has said he isn’t fundamentally opposed to a buyout if it adequately compensates Shire’s shareholders.
 court ruling blocking generic versions of its best-selling product, a decision that may force AbbVie to raise its price to buy the drugmaker, according to Barclays Plc.
 “With Vyvanse 30 percent of Shire’s earnings, a stronger case for 2023 expiry reduces uncertainty for a potential buyer and adds weight to Shire’s assertion of its fundamental valuation,” Saurymper said in the note.
 Sales will double to $10 billion by 2020, spurred by treatments for rare diseases and by lifitegrast, the experimental treatment for dry eye disease that Shire gained by buying SARcode Bioscience Inc, Ornskov said.
 Canadian securities regulators are investigating high-frequency trading, a catch-all term for automated buying and selling at paces far faster than humans can perceive.
 “Today some financial institutions are interested in buying Taiwan’s government bonds as the yield seems quite attractive” The yield on the new 1125 percent sovereign notes due June 2019 fell one basis point, or 001 percentage point, to 1202 percent, prices from GreTai Securities Market show.
 aluminum producer agreed to buy UK.
 London Stock Exchange Group Plc rose 61 percent after agreeing to buy Frank Russell Co.
 aluminum producer, which agreed to buy the UK.
 LSE to Buy Frank Russell for $27 Billion to Boost Indexes Kirkland & Ellis LLP represents the London Stock Exchange Group Plc, which agreed to buy Frank Russell Co, a unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, for $27 billion to bolster its FTSE International Ltd.
 In that time, the Fed has reduced the amount of assets it buys to stimulate the world’s largest economy as officials debate an exit to its ultra-loose monetary policy.
 companies have been looking to buy rivals in the UK.
 agreed to buy Covidien Plc, also a maker of rare disease medicines, for $429 billion.
 In addition to a more favorable tax rate, buying Shire offers access to the fast-growing market for treatments against rare diseases.
 who has the equivalent of a buy rating for Cisco.
 Some of their customers are starting to shift away from buying expensive new routers and switches, opting instead for networks that rely more on software and inexpensive hardware.
 instead of buying from lead server makers such as Hewlett-Packard and Dell Inc.
 Setting a short means borrowing and selling an asset in anticipation of making a profit by buying it back after its price has fallen.
 “You can be very rich, but if there’s nothing to buy it doesn’t help you,” he said.
 Founded in 1996, Relational buys stakes in companies it considers undervalued and then lobbies management and boards for changes to boost investor returns.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The German automotive and defense-equipment supplier was boosted to buy from hold at Berenberg Bank.
 Berenberg cut shares of the offshore oil-services provider to hold from buy, saying its order backlog will decline after it lost project opportunities in West Africa to rivals in the past year.
 Natixis SA also cut its rating on the London-based company to neutral from buy.
 Louis, Missouri-based manufacturer of equipment for power plants and technology for refrigerators, has sold units for a combined $456 million in the past five years and spent $35 billion on buying businesses, data combined by Bloomberg show.
 Horton Inc, the largest in the industry, starts a brand aimed at first-time buyers with prices starting at $120,000.
 LGI, based in The Woodlands, Texas, is catering to homebuyers who have been left behind in the two-year-old real estate recovery.
 first-time purchasers, historically about 40 percent, was 27 percent in May as slow wage growth, tight mortgage standards and rising prices put buying out of reach for many Americans, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 For those who can qualify for a mortgage, buying is now 38 percent cheaper than renting, according to San Francisco-based Trulia, an online real estate information firm.
 Record Prices That’s created an opportunity for homebuilders, which since the housing crash have been focusing on buyers with easier access to credit who can afford larger, more expensive properties near employment hubs.
 “My goal is, how do you increase the pool of affordable buyers?” Tomnitz said at a May Wells Fargo & Co.
 But if you’re not getting help from the job side, then how do you change your product offering?” ‘Overlooked’ Buyers Stephen Kim, a New York-based housing analyst with Barclays Plc, said companies that take the lead in serving entry-level buyers have “first-mover advantages,” because they’re stockpiling lower-cost land before competitors.
 Public homebuilders, many of which have mortgage units, are often able to “handhold” buyers through the loan process, he said, making new homes more attractive than existing properties for first-time owners.
 LGI covers closing costs and works with mortgage and insurance companies to streamline underwriting for government loans that require no down payment -- or a small one -- for buyers who meet minimum credit requirements.
 Early Start Unlike most builders, LGI starts houses before they’re under contract so that buyers don’t have to wait months to move in.
 It’s the only builder with the equivalent of a buy rating from all the analysts tracking the company, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 They like to close quick” While the goal of creating more affordable housing is laudable, risks arise when entire communities belong to buyers with low down payments and fragile finances, said Jack McCabe, a housing consultant based in Deerfield Beach, Florida.
 “There’s a possibility that we’re going to see neighborhoods in future years devastated by foreclosures because people didn’t have a stake in their homes” Credit History Some builders aren’t trying to reach entry-level buyers because banks are afraid of being penalized for giving them mortgages if something goes wrong, according to John Burns, a housing consultant based in Irvine, California.
 The company offers advice on how to raise credit scores so potential buyers can make deals in the future.
 While the homes come with extras that can include granite kitchen countertops, buyers don’t get to choose from a menu of upgrades.
 He is advising some builders to develop in outlying locations because demand from entry-level buyers will grow as the economy improves.
 Not all builders are convinced it’s a good idea to target buyers who need to “drive until they qualify” for a mortgage.
 “We’ve seen during the downturns that fringe locations are the first to get hit, the hardest hit and the last to recover” KB Home KB Home, the Los Angeles builder that traditionally targeted entry-level buyers, now constructs about 48 percent of its houses for the move-up and senior markets.
 “Between a lack of job growth in a lot of cities and lack of mortgage availability, it’s really hurting the first-time buyer,” CEO Jeffrey Mezger said at a JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 She married June 14 after deciding to buy the house.
 The Major Oak offer would set a floor for other potential buyers at a proposed Aug.
 reaches a deal to buy T-Mobile, Legere is likely to run the combined company, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 is in advanced talks to buy control of Access Midstream Partners LP for about $3 billion, according to people with knowledge of the matter, in a move to boost growth for the fourth-largest US.
 Williams would buy the stake from Global Infrastructure Partners, which owns almost one-third of Access Midstream as well as half of its general partner, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The latest deal would have it buying the other 50 percent of the general partner, which manages Access’s operations, determining how it will borrow and invest, among other things, the people said.
 The company has sold assets, transferred properties between units, refinanced some borrowings and sold equity as part of efforts to repay loans taken on in the $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008, led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 Last week, Revel AC Inc, which owns the city’s newest casino, filed for bankruptcy court protection for the second time in two years, telling employees it may close in August if a buyer isn’t found.
 Though the company has more than 100 million readers every month across all its publications, it typically sells advertising by individual magazines, making it more difficult for marketers who prefer to buy large swaths of audiences in a single purchase.
 The changes will take time to implement, said Ryvicker, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock and values the shares at $27 to $29.
 initiated coverage yesterday on the largest supplier of semiconductor-manufacturing equipment, rating it a buy with a price target of $28.
 The discount retailer said in a conference call that it plans to spend $11 billion on share buybacks.
 “This morning’s news is clearly disappointing and, while strike action has been called off for next week, the damage caused by the proposed strikes has been done,” said David Holohan, an analyst at Merrion Capital, who recommends buying the stock.
 Bayerische Motoren Werke AG rose 28 percent after UBS AG advised investors to buy shares in the world’s largest luxury-car maker.
 Aviva Plc retreated 11 percent to 5045 pence after UBS downgraded the insurance company to neutral from buy.
 UBS upgraded the luxury automaker to buy from neutral, saying its investments in electric-car models confer a competitive advantage over its rivals.
 CGG SA added 29 percent to 1104 euros after Societe Generale SA upgraded the shares to buy from hold.
 is buying Pryte, a provider of technology that lets smartphone users download applications using temporary mobile data allowances.
June 2 (Bloomberg) -- Element Financial Corp, the Toronto-based equipment finance company, agreed to buy PHH Corp’s North American fleet management business for $14 billion in cash to expand in the US.
 “People buy the stock and buy the calls and more people buy the stock and the calls” Smart Money It’s never obvious who’s buying options, though investors may believe it’s people who have developed special insights into a stock, even illicitly.
 “It’s definitely become easier to watch options flow technology and broker’s platforms have evolved to the point where options flow that used to be well under the radar is now quickly caught by traders who specialize in that” Another way options influence equities is that market makers need to hedge the buying and selling of puts and calls with transactions in the underlying stock, according to a 2014 paper by Jianfeng Hu of Singapore Management University.
 So market makers must constantly adjust their hedging” Spending $10,000 each to buy RadioShack, Clorox and Molson Coors shares in the minute after the options trades would have generated almost $1,000 in profit if the positions were sold at the end of the day, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Other times traders are speculating a company is a good buyout candidate.
 “It may be rumors, but it might also be the activist buying calls before his announcement,” Schwartz said by phone June 3.
 I don’t think it surprises anybody” Icahn Calls Investigators are reviewing large option trades in Clorox before Icahn’s attempt to buy the company in July 2011, as well as trading by golfer Phil Mickelson and sports gambler William Walters in Dean Foods Co.
 More than 16,000 calls to buy shares of Clorox changed hands on July 11, 2011, the most since October 2010 and 10 times the number of puts to sell, as the shares rose 28 percent.
 Because low stock market volatility has depressed options prices, investors are buying more calls to hedge or replace equity holdings in their portfolios, according to Michael McCarty, managing partner at New York-based Differential Research LLC.
 Market makers, who must sell the contracts to interested buyers in order to meet demand, are buying the stock of the company being traded to neutralize their positions, McCarty said.
 Fed policy makers on June 18 trimmed bond buying by $10 billion for the fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion per month, while reiterating that they plan to keep the main rate close to zero.
 Fitness Center Ekovich said he represents a buyer of a rural 18-hole course north of Atlanta who plans to add a medical center and residential units.
 The broker, who said he couldn’t disclose the buyer because of confidentiality agreements, said he expects the sale to close within 30 days.
 Schmidt, the owner of Woodmont in Florida, said that while buying the property “wasn’t the most intelligent business decision” he’s made, things are picking up at the club, which was pummeled in 2004 and 2005 by three hurricanes that uprooted trees.
 Schmidt said residential development may sell out within three years, if not sooner, given strong interest from potential buyers.
 agreed to buy 80 737 jets valued at $74 billion.
 China Eastern, the nation’s third-largest airline, will buy a mix of 737-800 and upgraded Max models, to be delivered starting in 2016, the company said in a statement to the Shanghai stock exchange today.
 “This contract will weigh more on Petrobras’ stretched balance sheet” Petrobras shares fell the most in six weeks yesterday and Banco Bradesco SA and UBS AG lowered their ratings to the equivalents of hold from buy following the announcement.
 UBS AG boosted its rating on the world’s largest coffee-shop chain to buy from neutral and its stock-price estimate to $87 from $80.
 started covering the stock, giving it an outperform rating, the equivalent of a buy.
 BTIG also initiated coverage of the shares with a buy.
June 30 (Bloomberg) -- TreeHouse Foods Inc, a maker of private-label foods for retailers, agreed to buy Flagstone Foods for $860 million in cash to expand in healthy snacks such as dried fruits.
 “That is where the growth is today” Hundley recommends buying TreeHouse shares.
 ‘Significant Interest’ “There’s a growing trend among sovereign wealth funds to buy on margin,” said Bernardo Bortolotti, director of the Sovereign Investment Lab, a research unit at Bocconi University in Milan.
 agreed to buy 60 million Deutsche Bank shares at 2920 euros, the Frankfurt-based bank said May 18.
 buyout firm TDR Capital LLP, may be sold in an initial public offering that would value the company at about 1 billion pounds ($17 billion), said two people with knowledge of the matter.
June 23 (Bloomberg) -- William Lyon Homes, a homebuilder focused in the Western US, plans to buy a residential building business from Polygon Northwest Company LLC to expand its reach.
 The Edge attracts buyers willing to spend more on a new model, said Jim Farley, Ford’s global marketing chief.
 “The average customer buying a utility stretches more than other customers,” Farley said yesterday at a briefing in Dearborn.
 “Edge buyers will spend nearly 40 percent of their average income on their Edge” The refreshed SUV goes on sale in Europe in the second half of 2015, Farley said.
 “If I’m the ordinary consumer I’m rolling my eyes” AT&T’s plan to buy satellite-television provider DirecTV for $485 billion follows Comcast Corp’s proposal to acquire Time Warner Cable Inc.
 cable-TV company, proposed buying No.
 after buying control of Sprint Corp.
 EFG-Hermes Holding SAE increased 04 percent after the investment bank said HC Securities & Investment, an independent adviser hired to examine an offer to buy a 20 percent stake by billionaire Naguib Sawiris and Beltone Financial Holding Co, valued the shares at 2293 pounds each.
 The figure excludes a one-time adjustment of $309 million for the repatriation of foreign earnings to fund a share buyback of as much as $450 million, Lululemon said.
 The share buyback will be completed over two years, Lululemon said.
 About two weeks after Chicago-based Hillshire offered to buy Pinnacle, JBS SA’s Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 Nam Long received a $75 million IFC investment this year to finance mid-income homebuyers in Ho Chi Minh City.
 You just have to provide the right choice for the buyer” The company’s shares have gained about 35 percent this year on the Ho Chi Minh City Stock Exchange.
 EPM, based in Medellin, is in advanced negotiations to buy about 30 percent of Taesa from private-equity firm Fundo de Investimento em Participacoes Coliseu, said the person, who asked not to be identified discussing private information.
 A final agreement may take more than a month to reach as the buyer conducts due diligence, the person said.
 Coliseu owns about 44 percent of the common shares in Taesa and has a joint control agreement with Cemig, which owns about 42 percent of voting shares and needs to approve any new buyer.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 last month offered to buy Aquila in a deal that valued the Australian company at A$14 billion ($13 billion) They would get a half stake in the A$74 billion West Pilbara iron ore mine, port and rail project in Australia.
 Aquila doesn’t know the identity or intentions of the buyer, which is required to file a shareholder notice by 9:30 am.
 The Baosteel offer signaled a possible resumption of Chinese companies buying up global resources to take advantage of a price slump.
 Fortress, a New York-based private-equity firm, reviewed Aramid’s portfolio in 2010 as part of a potential buyout, according to court filings.
 It didn’t make an offer for any of Aramid’s assets and used information about the Sony investments to buy the outstanding balance of Citigroup’s stake, $2267 million, for 50 cents on the dollar, according to the suit.
 said it agreed to buy the oil-engineering company.
 The airline has focused its European network on flights that feed lucrative long-haul service while buying Spanish low-cost leader Vueling Airlines SA.
 Juniac also said his airline would be ready to reconsider an investment in Alitalia SpA after Etihad Airways PJSC has finished buying a 49 percent stake, adding that there is no rush to do anything.
 The ouster leads him to suspect that “they have a buyer or they want to sell the company,” he said.
 “Today’s actions will not impact cash buyers and foreign buyers who do not need a UK.
 “None of this does anything to solve the underlying problem of a lack of supply in London and the South East, not that the BOE can do anything about that” Lloyds said on May 20 that it would impose limits on lending to homebuyers to counteract rising house prices in London, capping lending at four times salary on loans of more than 500,000 pounds ($852,000).
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- RBI Solar Inc, a maker of structures for attaching solar panels, will buy Centrosolar Group AG’s German mounting company Renusol GmbH.
 Arabs to put in $6 billion,” Raj Rajaratnam told his brother, adding he was “buying 250 for you” Raj was referring to his purchase 250,000 AMD shares on Rengan’s behalf in a Galleon account, according to prosecutors.
 If we have that, then the financial challenges for Airbus will be met” Bregier’s upbeat outlook came under strain this week when Emirates, the largest buyer of the a380 double-decker, canceled its entire order for the A350 valued at $16 billion, in a blow to Airbus’s most innovative aircraft and endorsement of the competing Boeing Co.
 “I’m approaching the quarter with a positive bias, I’m not expecting any major negative surprises” Eyal, one of four analysts covering the stock, has a buy rating on the shares and raised his price target to $13 after the first-quarter earnings report.
 Still, three of the four analysts covering the company maintain a buy rating on the stock.
 Copyright India to Buy Rights to Bollywood Films for Embassy Screenings India’s foreign ministry is buying rights for 25 Bollywood films it has been screening at embassies and consulates, Kolkata’s Telegraph newspaper reported.
 The market has been able to withstand less demand from the Fed -- its biggest investor -- because issuance is slumping as home sales fail to keep up with 2013’s pace and property-buyers make purchases with just cash.
 “There’s not a lot of bonds that have been created that need to be absorbed,” said David Finkelstein, head of agency, or government-backed, mortgage-bond trading at New York-based Annaly Capital Management Inc, the largest real-estate investment trust that buys debt.
 “There’s been real scarcity and, as a result, the Fed has had to take out bonds from existing holders” Sales Drop The supply slowdown, whose size has confounded research teams and debt buyers alike, has essentially erased the Fed’s retreat as it pares its economic stimulus.
 Reconsidering Views The issuance slump has meant the central bank’s buying of fixed-rate mortgage bonds this year has comprised 68 percent of sales from December through May, according to Bank of America data that includes reinvestments.
 The mortgage market should be able to weather the end of the Fed’s mortgage buying without turmoil, according to Annaly’s Finkelstein.
 surged 21 percent after Sycamore Partners said it plans to buy the clothing chain.
 dropped 3 percent after agreeing to buy OpenTable Inc.
 Policy makers meet next week, with a decision on rates and bond buying due June 18.
 Galeazzi said the division would provide foreign buyers with instant scale in a market with high barriers to entry.
 “For a company like Lala to get into Brazil, they’d have to buy local brands,” Miguel Mayorga, a Latin America food analyst at Mexican brokerage Corporativo GBM SAB, said in a telephone interview.
 “Lala needs to buy something, because the amount of cash they have isn’t generating the value that shareholders want” Lala now controls more than half of Mexico’s milk market, according to company reports citing research by AC.
 A pickup in inflation lessens the threat of a prolonged drop in prices that hurts economic growth, giving policy makers reason to continue trimming a bond-buying program as they start a two-day meeting today.
 spurred investors to buy riskier securities.
 Murat Ulker, the Turkish billionaire who controls Godiva, said he has at least $500 million in cash for acquisitions this year after buying DeMet’s Candy Co.
 was sued by a California prosecutor over claims it deceived buyers by intentionally concealing defects rather than fixing them.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- The Brazilian real’s three-year slide and a stock market that trades at a discount to regional peers are making the Latin American nation a buyers’ market, especially for buyers from overseas.
 “The valuations now are at a mid-point, an equilibrium, not too low for sellers and not too pricey for buyers,” said Fernando Meira, who works with Itau’s Iunes as head of M&A.
 Home Prices Increasing property prices hurt affordability for prospective buyers trying to get into the market.
 aluminum producer, agreed to buy UK.
 orders, a five-year jet-buying frenzy may give way to a more sober approach as carriers adjust to the challenges of intense competition and inadequate infrastructure.
 Securities and Exchange Commission are probing whether inside information was used to trade in securities of Clorox ahead of a buyout bid by Icahn.
June 5 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Bank AG, Europe’s biggest investment bank, offered shareholders a discount of 24 percent to buy new stock as it sought to raise a total of 85 billion euros ($116 billion) to strengthen its finances.
 Deutsche Bank’s sale of the 2998 million shares allows investors to buy five new shares for every 18 they hold, according to today’s statement.
 In China, 18 percent of the securities on the Shanghai Composite Index have fewer buy ratings now than they had in March, compared with 34 percent for Russia’s Micex Index and 40 percent for India’s Sensex Index.
 Homebuilder Gafisa SA had the most downgrades of any Brazilian company, losing three of its five buy ratings in the past three months, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 proposed buying Hillshire for $45 a share on May 27, kicking off a bidding war that ended when Tyson upped its offer to $63 a share this week.
 Hillshire hasn’t made any recommendation to shareholders on Tyson’s $77 billion offer, nor has it terminated its May 12 agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc, a condition of both the Tyson and Pilgrim’s proposals.
 Sanderson Farms’ focus on meat processing, a more commoditized business, means a takeover probably wouldn’t yield as many ways to boost revenue and cut costs for a buyer like Pilgrim’s, Feng said.
 phone company, agreed to buy all the electricity from a 225-megawatt Welsh wind farm under a deal valued at about 100 million pounds ($167 million) over 15 years.
 The Boersenverein des Deutschen Buchhandels, the country’s association of booksellers, asked the Federal Cartel Office to probe Amazon’s negotiation practices when buying rights for e-books.
 Blitzer, whose private-equity firm historically has to control companies it buys, was fine taking a minority stake in a Goldman cash cow.
 In October, he struck a $297 million deal to buy 285 percent of Rothesay, with Singapore’s sovereign fund taking an equal share.
 “We haven’t seen anything of this scale” The structure is different from private-equity and also hedge funds, which have the latitude to buy exotic or wide-ranging assets.
 Blackstone will invest over a period of three years, compared with the five to six years for a buyout fund.
 Peterson founded the firm to mainly buy companies with borrowed money.
 The private-equity unit headed by Joseph Baratta that buys companies has $66 billion; Blackstone’s hedge-fund business, run by Tom Hill, oversees $58 billion and the credit arm manages $66 billion.
 Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, twice raised its bid to buy Allergan as part of its strategy to become one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers.
 Allergan’s anti-takeover provision allows shareholders to buy large amounts of stock at a discount if anyone obtains 10 percent of the company, making a hostile takeover prohibitively expensive.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Aspire Mining Ltd, the Australian firm developing coking coal assets in northern Mongolia, said it agreed to buy 50 percent of a venture with Noble Group Ltd.
 “There is an inherent clawback” in using this sort of method, Ehrhart said, referring to a private-equity concept that allows investors to take back fees paid to managers if early gains in buyout funds are wiped out by subsequent losses.
 Com Hem has also added new businesses, buying Phonera Foretag AB this year to gain products for small companies.
 started coverage of the shares with a buy recommendation, citing its growth prospects.
 UBS cut the oil explorer to neutral from buy, citing the company’s failure to find reserves in an offshore Gabon field.
 raised its recommendation to buy from neutral.
 “We therefore upgrade the shares to buy and add it to our conviction list” Credit Suisse shares were up 16 percent to 2676 francs at 12:20 pm.
 More savvy ones request a two-way price, which shows guaranteed rates at which a client may buy or sell regardless of how the market moves.
 telecommunications deals if he decides to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 Telephone-service provider AT&T last month announced its $485 billion bid to buy satellite-television company DirecTV.
 closed a deal earlier this year to buy out Vodafone Group Plc’s stake in their wireless venture for $130 billion.
 Carrefour will buy back the stores for an enterprise value of 600 million euros ($816 million), the Boulogne Billancourt, France-based company said today in a statement.
 The company will buy the loans and later may have them securitized by a Wall Street bank, Carr said.
 Demand for the private mortgages, known as non-agency, is growing after the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau’s regulations on qualified mortgages took effect this year, and government-controlled mortgage-finance companies Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac limited themselves to buying loans conforming to those rules.
 The stock was rated as a buy by 14 of the 26 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 “Also, we were afraid that if we buy Japanese, it would be smashed if anti-Japan protests broke out again” When Honda brought the ninth-generation Accord to China last year, the company expressed confidence it could compete with the A4 and the VW Passat.
 Scotiabank will buy 51 percent of the financial-services unit and take over the entire loan portfolio, transferring an additional $12 billion to Cencosud, the companies said in separate filings to Chile’s securities regulator.
 Cencosud will have an option to buy back Scotiabank’s 51 percent stake after 15 years.
 The latest deal follows Scotiabank’s May 8 agreement in Canada to buy a 20 percent stake in Canadian Tire Corp’s financial-services business, giving it access to the retailer’s customers.
 While defense officials have cited progress for the F-35, Frank Kendall, the Pentagon’s top weapons buyer, has said it hasn’t yet demonstrated sufficient reliability improvements.
 To help achieve that goal, Europe’s largest telecommunications provider is on an acquisition binge, buying fixed-line assets from the UK.
 Last year, it paid 124 times Ebitda to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG.
 Negotiating Position “Fixed-line assets aren’t freely available to buy, this isn’t a liquid market,” Oriel Securities analyst John Karidis said in a phone interview.
 “In situations where Vodafone feel they need to buy, this weakens their negotiating position” Vodafone has forecast that because of higher spending and weaker underlying operating trends its Ebitda will decline by between 5 percent and 9 percent this year on a comparable basis.
 If Vodafone sees better value in building rather than buying the remaining fixed-line networks it requires, it can use the 7 billion pounds of the Verizon Wireless sale proceeds that it put aside for Project Spring, an organic investment program focused on bolstering mobile and fixed networks across all of its markets.
 In his letter to the SEC and CFTC, Levin asked if the regulators had found evidence that investors pay a higher price to buy or receive a lower price to sell and any evidence linking high-frequency trading to exchange-related problems or concerns.
June 3 (Bloomberg) -- Tokyo Electric Power Co, Japan’s biggest buyer of LNG, is considering purchases of the fuel from natural gas export projects being developed on the West Coast of North America, said three people with knowledge of the matter.
 Tepco intends to buy as much as 10 million tons a year of lean, or low-energy LNG from projects such as those fed by North American shale gas.
 The utility agreed to buy a total of 12 million tons a year from Sempra Energy’s Cameron LNG facility in Louisiana on the US.
 Tepco is in talks with Mitsui to buy more gas from the project, he said.
 To break even on its investment, the government would need to find buyers for its remaining 1935 million shares at about 2590 euros each, more than twice the current stock price, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Supporters of the tick-size test, which will last a year, say it will encourage market makers that facilitate trading to buy and sell more shares and create conditions that would persuade more companies to go public.
 Opponents of the change, including Fidelity Investments, say it will cause investors to pay more when they buy the shares of small-cap companies.
 Much of the song and dance performed by computer algorithms is an effort to buy or sell large chunks of stock without throwing off a scent to high-frequency trading computers trying to sniff out big buyers and sellers in the market.
 But here’s the thing: HFT firms won’t go near a huge offer to buy or sell that is thrown into the market all at once.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy loans and package them into guaranteed securities, take over the homeowners’ insurance payments when mortgages they back undergo foreclosure.
 Shares of the company, upgraded to buy from neutral at Goldman Sachs last month, declined 09 percent to 1,588 yen as of 2:17 pm.
 Claren Road Asia’s LNG buyers, accounting for about three quarters of global consumption in 2013, are considering North American supplies after a surge in extraction from shale deposits pushed the price of gas to a decade low in the US.
 Months after New Zealand last year implemented curbs on the riskiest mortgages to tame prices, buyers are turning to lower fixed-rate loans that could re-ignite the property market and pressure Wheeler to raise the cash rate more aggressively.
 Home buyers are insulating themselves from rises in variable home-loan rates, which move in line with the cash rate.
June 26 (Bloomberg) -- London Stock Exchange Group Plc agreed to buy Frank Russell Co, a unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, for $27 billion to bolster its FTSE International Ltd.
 Wind said it plans to use the proceeds to buy back bonds maturing in 2018 and refinance part of its senior loans.
 Canada’s PSP, which controls about 67 percent of voting rights, wants a lower price because it will maintain its 37 percent stake, and therefore is effectively a buyer, the people said.
 “We remain optimistic on the stock in the long term,” Chen, who has a buy rating on the shares, said in an interview.
 raised the stock to a strong buy as new products will help the shares rebound from the worst tumble in eight years.
 EZchip shares are “significantly” undervalued as the Yokneam, Israel-based company has new products that will expand its customer base, according to Jeffrey Schreiner, an analyst at Feltl, who raised his rating from buy.
 “The business has clearly turned a corner,” Jay Srivatsa, an analyst at Chardan Capital Markets in New York which rates EZchip a buy, said in a phone interview June 19.
 Cell Site Solutions Cessao de Infraestruturas SA, backed by Goldman Sachs Group Inc, and American Tower are among the potential buyers that sent letters of interest to Tim, the people said last month.
 “All it takes is one or two deep-pocketed buyers who establish a new floor for the price, and that’s what has happened” Potential Buyers Christie’s is auctioning the microchip, another prototype and a document written by Kilby’s team member Tom Yeargan.
 Spicer said the potential buyer pool in this price range is shallow because the cost is out of reach for most museums.
 “I was scratching my head about who might be a potential buyer” Texas Instruments keeps one of the original microchip prototypes used by Kilby and another microchip belongs to the Smithsonian Institution in Washington, said Whitney Jodry, a spokeswoman for the Dallas-based semiconductor company.
 The auction market has been strong overall as international buyers spend billions of dollars for art, wine and other collectibles.
 Postage Stamp An anonymous buyer on June 17 set a stamp record with the $95 million purchase of a one-cent postage from 1856 sold by Sotheby’s in New York.
 McClendon’s American Energy Partners LP agreed to buy shale-drilling rights from West Virginia to Texas in three transactions for a total of $425 billion, the closely held Oklahoma City-based company said in dual statements today.
June 4 (Bloomberg) -- RAG Stiftung, the majority owner of German chemical maker Evonik Industries AG, said it’s getting “lots of calls” from Mittelstand enterprises, or smaller manufacturers in the country, that are seeking a buyer.
 to shore up the payment processor’s balance sheet and reduce interest payments, seven years after the New York-based private-equity firm and its clients loaded it with debt to fund a $275 billion buyout.
 The Atlanta-based company, which processes payments for retailers, financial institutions and credit-card issuers, was hit hard by the pullback in consumer spending during the recession, losing money each quarter since the buyout, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The firm’s 2006 buyout fund added an additional $500 million.
 KKR’s original equity in the 2007 buyout was $64 billion, according to an October 2007 Moody’s Investors Service report.
 “It buys some time,” he said, to improve the company’s financials before again considering an IPO or sale to a strategic buyer.
 Mixed Success KKR has had mixed success turning around deals made from its 2006 buyout fund.
 announced its largest stock buyback plan to boost investor returns after the seed company ended preliminary talks about a takeover of Syngenta AG that would have cut its tax bill.
 The share buybacks are bigger than expected and will lower the share count by about 15 percent, said Mark Gulley, a New York-based analyst at BGC Financial LP.
 “They have listened to shareholders and they are taking advantage of very strong fundamentals,” Gulley, who recommends buying the shares, said by phone today.
 Monsanto said in April it spent more than $15 billion to buy back almost 3 percent of its shares over 12 months.
 De Persgroep will buy the publishing group for 155 pence a share, or about 196 million pounds ($334 million), according to a joint statement.
 Last month, Atos offered to buy competitor Bull for about 620 million euros, underscoring demand for cybersecurity and cloud-computing services.
 When a potential customer likes an item, they can buy it or click to “fancy” it, giving it higher prominence on the site.
 Blackstone Group LP, the world’s largest alternative-asset firm, is close to an agreement to buy a group of select-service hotels from Clarion Partners LLC for about $800 million, adding to its already sizable portfolio of such properties, a person with knowledge of the deal said yesterday.
 Whoever is the buyer doesn’t have to put much into them to see returns quickly” Highest Total Last year’s $62 billion in select-service hotel deals was the highest total since before the last recession, according to Jones Lang LaSalle data.
 NorthStar Realty Among other buyers in the sector is NorthStar Realty Finance Corp, which said earlier this month that it bought 47 limited-service hotels for $9339 million in a joint venture with Chatham Lodging Trust.
 The deal would follow a transaction in September, when a Blackstone affiliate agreed to buy 16 hotels, including Hampton Inn and Holiday Inn Express properties, from Hersha Hospitality Trust for $217 million.
 Onex, Canada’s biggest buyout firm, estimates credit assets under management for 2014 of $47 billion.
 Investors bet the ECB might have plans to buy bonds under quantitative easing.
 Would-Be Buyers L’Estrange, the son of a cattle dealer, said he’s got almost 30 clients prepared to buy pubs for as much as 4 million euros each.
 “Your pub buyers are owner-operators or they’re buying a premises with a tenant in mind,” said Hoban, whose firm has sold almost 12 million euros of bars across Ireland since 2011.
 “People are interested in getting back into the pub game but they’re being very, very judicious about what they buy” Troika Officials This year’s most eye-catching deal was the sale of Foley’s, a Dublin landmark close to where officials from the troika of the European Central Bank, European Union and International Monetary Fund stayed while negotiating Ireland’s bailout.
 The potential buyer pool in this price range is shallowbecause the cost is out of reach for most museums, Dag Spicer, asenior curator at the Computer History Museum in Mountain View,California, said in an interview before the auction.
 “That price is in the stratosphere,” he said yesterday“I was scratching my head about who might be a potentialbuyer” Kilby, who died in 2005, used the chip to demonstrate hisinvention of the integrated circuit when he worked at TexasInstruments Inc.
 The auction market has been strong overall as internationalbuyers spend billions of dollars for art, wine and othercollectibles.
 Stamp Record An anonymous buyer on June 17 set a stamp record with the$95 million purchase of a one-cent postage from 1856 sold bySotheby’s in New York.
 jumped more than 31 percent as analysts recommended buying the shares.
 That to me suggests that the Fed, in looking at that, could say we run the risk of inflation being hot and could suggest pulling forward an increase of rates” A pickup in inflation lessens the threat of a prolonged drop in prices that hurts economic growth, giving Fed officials reason to continue to scale back their unprecedented bond-buying program.
 Some 62 percent of 58 economists in a Bloomberg survey predict the Fed will halt bond buying at its October meeting.
 Morgan Stanley upgraded the maker of medical devices to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from equal weight, citing potential returns from its deal to buy Covidien Plc.
 Credit Suisse and RBC Capital Markets also recommended buying the stock.
 Netflix, Expedia Netflix jumped 31 percent to $44365 as Morgan Stanley analyst Benjamin Swinburne recommended buying shares of the video-streaming service.
 Susquehanna Financial Group LLLP analyst Brian Nowak upgraded the shares to positive, the equivalent of a buy, from neutral.
 The fastest traders now have the ability to buy and sell in times measured in nanoseconds, or billionths of a second.
 Defenders of high-frequency trading argue that they provide a valuable service to markets, serving as a lower-cost alternative to the human market makers that once facilitated buying and selling.
 agreed to buy Fusion-io Inc.
June 17 (Bloomberg) -- Bond buyers are betting more than ever on the mercy of Mother Nature as they seek to boost yields being suppressed by central banks.
 NGL, a Tulsa, Oklahoma-based propane company, will also buy physical inventory from Morgan Stanley for as much as $550 million depending on prevailing commodity prices, a person briefed on the terms of the agreement said today, asking not to be named because some details aren’t public.
 “It’s time for Adobe to smell the roses,” said Brent Thill, an analyst at UBS, who has a buy rating on the shares.
 2 medical device maker, is negotiating to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc for more than $40 billion, a person familiar with the talks said, in what may become the latest deal driven by potential tax savings from relocating overseas.
 Metropolitan Bank, the third-largest Philippine money manager, has been avoiding PSE shares and has no plans to buy.
 Investors poured a net $79 million into all Russia-dedicated funds in May, a sign of long-term buying, said Cameron Brandt, research director at EPFR Global, a Cambridge, Massachusetts-based company that tracks fund flows.
 The developer program follows Nest’s announcement last week that it’s buying home-video security company Dropcam Inc.
 Building from scratch was expensive,however, so the company shopped for existing refineries that itcould buy or take a stake in.
 unitnegotiated the buyout independent of the company’s Rioheadquarters and therefore the parent shouldn’t be bound by thedeal, court records show.
 Market Value Foster said April 15 that while the company has had offersto buy the refinery, the board doesn’t recommend selling.
 About 62 percent forecast that the Fed will end its bond-buying program at the October meeting.
 The central bank has been buying about 7 trillion yen ($684 billion) of government bonds a month since April 2013.
 The exchange operator has been studying the matter internally for several months and hasn’t reached out to any buyers, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The growth of trading in stock options - contracts which give their investors the right to buy or sell shares of a company at a specified price within a certain time-frame -- averaged 3 percent in the five years through 2013, data from Options Clearing Corp.
 Foreign investors were net buyers of Dubai stocks today.
 Fund, designed to buy stocks that benefit most from growth-boosting policies, returned 40 percent in the three months through June 18, the best advance among 64 Indian equity funds tracked by Bloomberg.
 The decision comes amid General Electric Co’s effort to buy Alstom SA, which prompted Economy and Industry Minister Arnaud Montebourg to say he was concerned about the loss of a corporate decision-making center in the country.
 The idea, abandoned after market conditions worsened, was to drive holders of such credit-default swaps to sell and help Goldman Sachs traders buy at reduced prices, according to the report.
 A $500 premium would make up about 21 percent of total buying costs.
 Borrowers that were subject to leveraged buyouts by private-equity firms were often able to take advantage of a low interest-rate environment and investors’ willingness to accept minimal debt covenants.
 “Apollo had 21 deals, 12 of which defaulted and six of those are low rated, which is a relatively high percentage to go bad over time” ‘Minimal Defaults’ KKR & Co, the buyout firm run by Henry Kravis and George Roberts, ranked lowest with a 10 percent default rate.
 “Companies in which Apollo funds have invested have been among the most active in using opportunistic exchange offers and buybacks to reduce debt and extend maturities,” Fran McGill, an Apollo spokesman at Rubenstein Associates, wrote in an e-mail.
 speculative-grade non-financial companies with an estimated senior unsecured rating of B1 or lower, excluding borrowers owned by the buyout firms.
 ‘More Accessible’ Shlemov at UBS rates Moscow Exchange a buy, with a price target of 74 rubles.
 Hebei is obligated under the pact to buy 60 percent of Kami’s annual output to a maximum of 48 million tons of the first 8 million tons of concentrate each year.
 By comparison, Americans are expected to buy 161 million new cars and trucks industrywide this year, according to the average of analysts’ estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Fund Sales Thanks to the market discount on Great-West, the stock is a great investment, according to John Aiken, an analyst at Barclays Plc in Toronto who rates the stock a buy.
 They can buy and sell credits to meet the standard.
 agreed to buy it.
 Carrefour will buy back DIA’s French business for an enterprise value of 600 million euros ($816 million), less than three years after Carrefour spun off the retailer.
 surged 29 percent to a record after the touch-screen technology provider agreed to buy display chipmaker Renesas SP Drivers Inc, combining products in high demand from phone and tablet makers.
 “They’re expanding their addressable market and acquiring an asset that’s been growing revenues at a rapid clip,” said Bernardez, who recommends buying the stock.
 Apple, the maker of iPads and iPhones, was in talks to buy Renesas SP Drivers for as much as $1 billion, the Wall Street Journal reported April 2, citing people familiar with the matter.
 Associated should explore a sale to Litt or a private-equity buyer because its shares are cheap while appetite for apartment assets is strong, Litt wrote in a letter to the company’s board today.
 “We feel confident that we would be able to submit a competitive bid to buy the company” Rising property taxes and utilities costs are squeezing operating margins at real estate investment trusts that own apartments, putting pressure on them to merge and sell assets.
 A sale of Associated to a financial buyer makes the most sense because publicly traded real estate investment trusts only want to buy assets on the East and West Coasts, Litt said.
 Financing for buyouts is readily available in the capital markets, and Associated is deeply undervalued, he said.
June 18 (Bloomberg) -- First Quantum Minerals Ltd’s deal to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
 homes probably increased in May to the highest level this year, according to a Bloomberg survey, as lower mortgage rates spurred buyers.
 probably increased in May to a four-month high, according to a Bloomberg survey, as buyers responded to cheaper borrowing costs.
 Medtronic is a more plausible buyer of the UK.
 agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc, a maker of medical equipment.
 At the same time, AbbVie would boost share buybacks if the deal went through, Chief Financial Officer William Chase said on the call.
 The country sought to strengthen its status as the world’s largest energy exporter by signing a long-term gas-supply deal with China last month that will reduce its dependence on buyers in the EU.
 Hillshire said it hasn’t made any recommendation on the Tyson offer nor changed its agreement to buy Pinnacle Foods Inc.
 Hillshire agreed May 12 to buy Pinnacle, the producer of brands including Vlasic pickles, for $66 billion including debt.
 ‘Low Debt’ “It makes a lot of financial sense to buy Hillshire now that they have low debt levels, they have very strong cash flow,” Bryan Agbabian, San Francisco-based sector head for agricultural equities for Allianz Global Investors, said by phone earlier.
 Shire said today that its management team had discussions with AbbVie and rejected three offers to buy the company.
 Total Energies Nouvelles Activites USA has agreed to buy $250 million of the convertible debentures, which mature in June 2021, San Jose, California-based SunPower said today in a statement.
 Sony previously agreed to sell its PC division, which produces notebooks under the Vaio brand, to buyout firm Japan Industrial Partners Inc.
 “I wouldn’t buy them -- you don’t know what’s left,” InSight’s Legaspy said.
 The transcript on Wprost’s website shows Belka allegedly discussing options for the central bank to buy government bonds in an emergency situation by providing liquidity to state-owned lender BGK and state-controlled PKO Bank Polski SA.
 It would be best not to resort to bond buying by the central bank because of the “huge” difficulty in returning to normal debt sales afterward, he was cited as saying.
 The government’s agenda shows the cabinet will discuss amendments to the central bank law, including allowing the central bank to buy bonds on the secondary market outside of open-market operations, at its June 17 meeting.
 It will send information to prospective buyers by the end of the month, Timothy Woodall, the Perth-based managing director at Miro Advisors, said yesterday by phone.
June 13 (Bloomberg) -- Residents of Stuyvesant Town-Peter Cooper Village, Manhattan’s largest apartment complex, rallied at City Hall today to keep rents affordable and give tenants a chance to buy the property as it is prepared for a sale.
 For some buyers, “it’s the bottom line, not the human element.
 opposes reauthorization of the bank and says taxpayers shouldn’t make it easier for foreign competitors to buy jets.
 agreed to buy Doris Inc, North America’s third-largest marketer of branded ladies legwear for C$110 million ($1016 million) to expand into women’s intimates.
 T-Mobile has gained subscribers by financing phone purchases and buying out contract penalties for customers who switch service.
 Ventas, based in Chicago, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust for cash and shares, according to a June 2 statement.
 upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, citing cost savings and revenue-growth potential.
 “There’s definitely an XP refresh factor here, and it’s going to be multiquarter,” said De Silva, who recommends buying Intel stock.
 Energy Future has been embroiled in fights and negotiations with creditors since long before its April 29 bankruptcy filing as it tries to cut debt costs after a record 2007 buyout by KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners.
 thinned out during the 2010 games in South Africa as buyers and sellers put watching soccer before global politics and economic reports, according to the ECB’s 2012 study.
 boosted its 2014 revenue forecast, while predicting adjusted earnings per share will come in at the lower end of an earlier range, as more wireless customers opt to buy new phones on installment plans.
 About half of customers buying new phones opted for Next, AT&T’s financing plan, the company said in a statement.
 London Stock Exchange Group Plc in May said it was in exclusive talks to buy Russell.
 Harris Associates started buying Tesco shares after the grocer said in January 2012 that the failure of its “Big Price Drop” campaign was weighing on sales and profit.
 He continued buying over the past year, he said, attracted by the strength of Tesco’s balance sheet, a large freehold store base, its leadership in online grocery and a commitment to boost multichannel services.
 To keep settlements difficult to manipulate, the LME records ring sessions with microphones and video cameras to capture traders barking at one another to buy and sell aluminum, copper and zinc, among other metals.
 Some simultaneous buying and selling of contracts for different delivery dates, known as carry trades, can be done faster and in bigger amounts in the ring.
 may be more willing to open its door to potential buyers.
 Don’t count out Coty as a possible buyer either, she said.
 Those are benefits that might appeal to a potential buyer” Direct Selling Tupperware, the direct seller of household containers, could also be interested, said Weiser of B.
 Private Benefits Avon’s cash-flow potential is “huge” and it’s trading at a “trough level,” making it a candidate for a buyout, said Strauss of Pekin Singer Strauss.
 “For a private-equity firm, this is a good business,” Strauss said in a phone interview, estimating a financial buyer could make a deal work with a bid of about $20 a share, a 40 percent premium.
 That would be better done as a private company” No Sense Not all buyers will have the “strong stomach” needed to acquire Avon, Ali Dibadj, a New York-based analyst at Sanford C.
 “If you try to buy Avon, what do you get?” Dibadj said.
 Regulators need to ensure that the buying and selling on the markets they oversee is bona fide, said DeWaal, who previously served as general counsel to futures brokerage Newedge Group SA.
 In a five-year bundle, for example, an investor buys or sells the underlying 20 Eurodollar contracts at once rather than in 20 individual transactions.
 Each credit can be used to lower a firm’s trading fees for buying and selling more Eurodollars.
 Legacy firms either receive 10, 20 or 30 credits for each bundle or pack they trade, depending on what they buy or sell.
 A legacy market maker who trades a single five-year bundle of Eurodollars is actually buying or selling the underlying 20 contracts.
 It costs $2 in execution fees for CME Group’s biggest customers to buy or sell 20 Eurodollar futures.
June 24 (Bloomberg) -- Joyalukkas Group, a gold and diamond retailer in India, is offering 12 free BMW cars and two kilograms (44 pounds) of bullion in a lucky draw as it fights a lean season in the world’s second-biggest buyer of the yellow metal.
 1 buyer.
 Morgan Stanley lowered its rating to equal weight from underweight, meaning that it no longer recommends buying shares in the world’s second-biggest brewer.
 Proprietary traders who use computers to buy and sell stocks in milliseconds would have to register with the SEC under recommendations made public yesterday by White in New York.
 Operators of dark pools, broker-owned venues that compete with exchanges and don’t publish bids and offers, would have to provide the regulator with their rules for matching buyers and sellers, White said.
 The SEC is preparing a new rule that would require more oversight by traders of their algorithms, formulas that automate the buying and selling of shares, White said.
 Traders buying direct feeds from exchanges get orders and prices faster than investors relying on the public ticker, a gap highlighted in Lewis’s book and criticized by New York-based trading-platform provider IEX Group Inc.
 “Over the course of time, there comes to be more consensus around the fact that something needs to be done about these issues” Operators of dark pools will also have to provide more information about their clients and how they process buy and sell orders, White said.
 The firm, based in Minneapolis, christened “Never, Never” as an homage to legendary value investor Benjamin Graham that reverses his concept of “Net, Nets” Graham’s nickname referred to companies that are good buys because their assets minus liabilities and accounts such as overvalued inventory are valued higher than their stocks’ market capitalizations.
 The index of Never, Never candidates was created by considering firms with more than $1 billion in market capitalization, annual revenue growth of at least 10 percent, operating expenses that grow faster than revenues and companies that show an absorption of capital, those that, for instance, don’t buy back stock or pay off debt.
 In a short sale, an investor sells borrowed shares to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back cheaper and pocket the difference.
 A Bloomberg index of the companies with the biggest buybacks over the previous 18 months rose 57 percent from its October 2007 inception to May 27, more than double the S&P 500’s return.
 Under Fourtou, Vivendi has been revamping its strategy around television and music, and it plans to return 5 billion euros ($68 billion) to shareholders by 2015 through dividends and share buybacks after completing planned divestments.
 Private-equity firms have had a difficult time exiting the brick-and-mortar retailers they picked up during the buyout boom that ended in 2007, as sales growth slowed when consumers shifted to online shopping.
 The investor withdrew its offer to buy Family Dollar as part of an agreement that added Trian’s Edward Garden to the board.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 Blackstone Acquisition Bond investors were paid a yield of 120 basis points more than the benchmark swap rate to buy the bonds rated BBB and maturing in four years in the June 3 sale.
 He has a buy recommendation on the stock with a 12-month price estimate of 6626 zloty, implying a 95 percent return from yesterday’s closing price.
 The central bank reduced its monthly asset buying to $45 billion in April after the fourth straight $10 billion cut.
 Underwriters for online beauty product seller Jumei International Holding Ltd’s May initial offering exercised their option to buy an additional 16 million shares.
 The sale is part of a broader funding package to cover the 67 billion euros needed to buy full control of Scania and deepen a three-way alliance between the Soedertaelje-based company, VW’s own commercial-vehicle unit and Munich-based MAN SE, which VW also controls.
 The release follows Facebook Chief Executive Officer Mark Zuckerberg’s rebuffed offer to buy Snapchat last year for $3 billion and is part of a broader effort to draw in younger users to the world’s biggest social-networking service.
 Apart from agreeing to buy messaging service WhatsApp, he’s hiring EBay Inc’s PayPal president David Marcus to run the Facebook Messenger application.
 and trading in the stock surged as the Chinese semiconductor maker agreed to an increased buyout offer made by a Shanghai government-run company.
 The chipmaker said its board of directors approved Shanghai Pudong Science and Technology Investment Co’s buyout offer of $2260 per share.
 “I always thought the offer was too low and there would be a higher offer” Srivatsa cut the stock to neutral from buy after the rally because a higher offer than the current one is unlikely.
 Mitsubishi also offered to buy as much as 10 percent of Alstom, a stake valued at about 900 million euros, while Siemens will explore options to combine its rail assets with Alstom’s.
June 29 (Bloomberg) -- Saab AB agreed to buy the Swedish marine defense unit of ThyssenKrupp AG for 340 million kronor ($50 million), expanding its business to manufacturing submarines and stealth-technology corvettes.
 Users can also buy coupons and enjoy group discounts in the same way as on Groupon Inc.
 “You have to still favor buying Brent as opposed to WTI on the whole, because it’s more directionally supported by the uncertainty about Iraq” Gasoline futures for July delivery rose 022 cent to $31277 a gallon on the Nymex, the highest settlement since July 16.
 And then you could go take it to the track on the weekend” BMW along with Daimler AG Mercedes-Benz brand are among luxury carmakers expanding with lower-cost models as they look to capture new buyers.
June 10 (Bloomberg) -- Macau’s government plans to further restrict the use of China UnionPay Co’s debit cards at casinos, curbing money flows to the world’s largest gambling hub by making it harder for bettors to buy expensive items that they exchange for cash.
 Deutsche Bank AG lowered Macau’s casino revenue growth estimate to 12 percent from 15 percent on VIP risks and downgraded SJM and Wynn Macau to hold from buy, Hong Kong-based analyst Karen Tang wrote in a note published June 9.
 China Resources Land, which UBS downgraded to neutral from buy, dropped 3 percent to HK$1424.
 Deutsche Bank cuts its rating to hold from buy on the supplier of audio systems used in Apple Inc.
 gauge reached an all-time high yesterday as the central bank said growth is bouncing back and repeated it will keep borrowing costs down for a “considerable time” The Fed trimmed monthly bond buying to $35 billion from $45 billion, on pace to end the program late this year.
June 12 (Bloomberg) -- Maria Lindholm, who with her partner is buying an apartment in Stockholm’s Soedermalm district, said they’ll probably opt for the riskiest variable-rate loan to cover part of the sale price.
 Petrobras, Ambev Petrobras rose 05 percent to 1729 reais today, rebounding from the biggest weekly decline since December after saying on June 27 that it will save $18 billion in discovery costs after buying rights to one of country’s top two finds.
 Even as consumers keep buying GoPro’s tiny video cameras that adventurers strap onto their bodies to record their exploits, investors are locking in their gains after the company’s strong stock run, said Alex Gauna, an analyst at JMP Securities.
 “It looks clean to me,” said Gauna, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 “The knee-jerk reaction has been buying of the yen and some general risk aversion trades,” said Thomas Averill, a managing director in Sydney at Rochford Capital, a currency and rates risk-management company.
 Crude oil’s longest slump since 2009 and rising equity valuations have led traders to buy up protection against losses in the iShares Standard & Poor’s/TSX 60 Index exchange-traded fund, a measure of Canada’s largest companies.
 The Topix surged 14 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid signs Japan is weathering the sales-tax increase and speculation the nation’s $12 trillion pension fund will buy more domestic shares.
 Intel’s outlook indicates demand is starting to recover among consumers, who may be buying laptops and desktops again after years of opting for smartphones and tablets instead.
 “The market just needs to see them make some early strides,” said Suji De Silva, an analyst at Topeka Capital Markets, who recommends buying Intel shares.
 This week, JPMorgan head Jamie Dimon escalated the buyback issue between lenders and the government, saying he questioned whether his bank should end its decades-old relationship with the Federal Housing Administration, a last resort for lower-income Americans seeking mortgages.
 He said Wells Fargo just needs clarity about what triggers a buyback demand.
 “The goal is to get more credit appropriately to borrowers who want to own homes and who can afford homes” Nonbank lenders like LoanDepotcom that started after the housing crash in 2007 or didn’t make subprime loans are not burdened with the buyback issue, said Anthony Hsieh, chief executive officer of LoanDepotcom.
 The companies, which were on the brink of insolvency in 2008 and seized by the government, buy mortgages from lenders and package them into securities that are sold to investors.
 If loans later prove to have errors in them, the companies may lack the ability to make good on buyback demands, resulting in losses for taxpayers, it said.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac have recovered almost $100 billion from lenders stemming from buyback demands since the 2008 financial crisis, the report said.
 Banks may focus more on mortgage lending once there’s more clarity around buybacks and the housing recovery regains momentum, said Hsieh of LoanDepotcom.
 “I’m glad I bought it over the Ford Focus, which I was also considering” Skoda is aiming to reach more potential buyers by increasing its Chinese dealerships by at least 10 percent to about 360 by the end of the year, according to Hafemann.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- TeliaSonera AB agreed to buy Tele2 AB’s Norwegian business for 51 billion kronor ($744 million) to boost its share of the mobile-phone market in Scandinavia’s richest economy and approach the reach of Telenor ASA.
 The purchase will probably reduce the number of networks in Norway to three from four in a move that mirrors Telefonica SA’s deal to buy Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit in Germany.
 Picard claims Mack benefited from the fraud because her late husband used customer money to support her and buy homes.
 But an exception to the 2004 law for companies buying foreign competitors has spawned a second wave of inversions.
 competitor in buying desirable assets.
 With a deal to buy Abbott Laboratories’ generic drugs line, her company will move its legal tax address abroad, as Actavis Plc did last year.
 New Growth BT is looking for new growth, buying rights to top soccer and rugby matches and ultimate fighting to attract users to its packages of phone, television and broadband products.
 buy niche brands to widen product ranges.
 Including the buyback of 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA, L’Oreal has spent more than $5 billion on deals this year, and it is looking for more targets.
 “If you buy Time Warner stock at $83, is Murdoch coming back and how high would he pay to make sense for shareholders?” Paulson said at the CNBC conference.
 Instead the first response has been potentially Fox buying Time Warner.
 Mylan this week said it’s buying Abbott’s generic-drug business in established markets and forming a new company that would be incorporated in the Netherlands, cutting its taxes.
 They have paid HK$150,000 ($19,354) to enter a lottery that prioritizes buyers of apartments at City Point, a seven-tower development that billionaire Li Ka-shing’s Cheung Kong Holdings Ltd.
 More than 5,000 homebuyer-hopefuls are vying for 442 units, or about 11 for every home that went on sale the weekend of June 14.
 A drop in mortgage rates and discounts from builders are luring back buyers of new homes after their price fell as much as 20 percent since October.
 They made up as much as a third of buyers in the city during the boom years and now account for about 12 percent.
 The primary market is the one with movement, and if developers want to sell today, they have to price it 10 percent below market” People Shouting Inside Fortune Metropolis mall, which is owned by Cheung Kong-controlled Fortune Real Estate Investment Trust, buyers in a snaking queue wait to pick a home from a display board after their tickets are drawn.
 Hayley Kam, a 24-year-old teacher, is in the line with her father as they make their third attempt to buy a City Point home.
 Those who don’t end up buying an apartment are refunded the amount they paid to obtain a ticket.
 companies to buy smaller foreign businesses and move their addresses for tax purposes.
 real estate website, is seeking to buy No.
 The companies help buyers and renters find information on homes, generating revenue by selling advertising and charging Realtors to place their listings prominently.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG, the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs, agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Cynk will still be branded on OTC’s website with the skull-and-crossbones icon denoting a “buyer beware” warning.
 Of 29 analysts tracked by Bloomberg, 14 recommend buying the stock, 14 recommend holding it, and one recommends selling.
Telefonica SA (TEF) agreed to buy MediasetSpA (MS)’s stake in Distribuidora de Television Digital as it seeksfull ownership of the Spanish pay-TV operator to strengthenofferings and stem declining revenue.
 Vodafone Group Plc (VOD), the world’s second-largest wireless carrier, agreed in March to buy Spanish cableoperator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in a 72 billion-eurotransaction to bolster capabilities in TV and broadband.
 Herecommends buying Telefonica shares.
 In June, Telefonica agreed to buy 56 percent of DTS fromPrisa for 750 million euros, and that deal is now awaitingregulatory approval.
 Telefonica said last month that Drillisch AG, a smaller carrier that doesn’t own a network, would buy 20 percent of Telefonica/E-Plus network capacity over five years.
 Drillisch will have the option to buy an extra 10 percent of the merged company’s capacity.
 buy the solar output and bundle it with cheaper coal-fired electricity, according to Goyal and the draft rules.
 Users aren’t required to buy DirecTV’s satellite dish or TV service to get live streams of games happening outside their local market.
 agreed to buy DirecTV in May for $485 billion, a transaction that will require regulatory approval.
 recommended investors sell Russian equities, citing the latest sanctions as the catalyst, after saying last month it was time to buy.
 “It bears mentioning that by virtue of this fraud the bank defendants managed to unload a vast portfolio of risky assets on unwitting buyers and were thereby able to reduce the risk on their own balance sheet at a crucial moment in time,” Rakoff said in today’s ruling.
 “Indeed Countrywide’s introduction of the HSSL program coincided with a severe contraction of the market for riskier mortgages and Countrywide’s understanding that it would no longer find unwilling buyers for the subprime mortgages” The case is US.
 ministers will make the initial purchases under a program to buy more than 150 ultra-low emission vehicles, the nation’s Department for Transport said yesterday in London.
 “London streets are cramped, you can’t go that fast and there are all sorts of limitations and fees for gasoline-powered vehicles, so there’s a logic to buying electric cars,” said Karl Brauer, senior industry analyst for Kelley Blue Book in Irvine, California.
 are in talks to buy defaulted bonds from holders including Elliott Management.
 policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 “Facebook just has a better advertising offering now,” said Shyam Patil, an analyst at Wedbush Securities who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 “We will buy shopping centers and offices that have tenants in place,” Louis Schnetler, 50, who will take over as chief executive officer on Aug.
 In 2004, Alibaba started Aliwangwang, a personal computer-based instant messenger for buyers and sellers that is now used for negotiating prices, customer services and delivery notifications on its Taobao marketplace.
 Introbiz offers services to buy contact information of various types of people, including celebrities such as Nicole Kidman and Johnny Depp.
 The website says that for about $50, it is possible to purchase e-mails and phone numbers that would put the buyer in touch with celebrities.
 is negotiating to buy six road projects valued at 20 billion rupees ($333 million), said Parvez Umrigar, co-head of its structured investment group.
 Modi’s pledge to spend $25 billion on roads, airports, ports and smart cities to unclog Asia’s third-largest economy and spur expansion is encouraging investors to buy stalled road and power projects.
 We will enter when the contractors want to churn their portfolio” Reliance Infrastructure, whose shares have risen 78 percent this year, expects more deals to close now as the asset valuation mismatch between the buyers and sellers narrows, Lalit Jalan group director for strategy and corporate affairs told reporters on July 18.
 An economic revival may widen the valuation gap between the buyers and sellers, hindering deals, said BlackRock’s Singhania, unless a road builder was “extremely starved of funds and being forced by its bankers” Piramal expects the deal stalemate to ease as developers try to either repay their debt or seek to exit from projects they have invested for 5 or 10 years, to free up their funds.
 The currency has held near the strong end of its permitted range of HK$775 to HK$785 since July 1, prompting the Hong Kong Monetary Authority to buy dollars to defend the peg.
 State-run oil producer Petroleo Brasileiro SA climbed after Barclays Plc recommended buying the stock ahead of Brazil’s elections.
 The oil producer stands to benefit from an administration that would allow it to boost domestic fuel prices, Barclays analyst Paul Cheng said after lifting his recommendation on the stock to the equivalent of buy from hold.
 Charney then took out a loan from the New York-based fund to buy the shares at about 71 cents apiece.
 Standard General has warrants to buy that stock back and purchase 10 percent of Charney’s original stake at that 71-cent price.
 LLC who upgraded ADM to buy from hold, said by phone today.
 Cantor Fitzgerald LP raised its recommendation on the UK’s biggest supermarket owner to buy from sell, citing a reorganization of its operations, and growth in its online and convenience sales.
 generic-drug maker that tried to buy Meda in April, in a deal valued at about $53 billion.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- First Quantum Minerals Ltd, which agreed to buy an Argentinian copper project last month, is on the lookout for more deals as it sees a supply shortage of the metal by the end of the decade.
 Last month it agreed to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
 Only certain materials can be printed in the MakerBot machine -- metal cannot -- and customers will still have to go to the store to buy the materials for the printer.
 TransForce also agreed to buy Contrans Group Inc.
 Expansion in iron ore output and improved earnings may prompt BHP to begin a share buyback program, according to Tim Schroeders, a portfolio manager who helps oversee about A$1 billion ($940 million) in equities, including BHP shares, at Pengana Capital Ltd.
 BHP could buy back 5 percent of its market value, Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Universal Music, the world’s biggest label, had a 14 percent stake in Beats Electronics LLC before Apple swooped in and said it would buy Beats for $3 billion earlier this year.
 “It will take something to ignite it and to get the interest back” Glencore Xstrata Plc’s $135 billion acquisition of Caracal Energy Inc, a driller in Chad, and Qatar’s Al Mirqab Capital SPC’s offer to buy Heritage Oil Plc for $15 billion along with some other deals in April and May encouraged some industry analysts, including Anish Kapadia from Tudor Pickering Holt & Co, to report investor interest in the European oil industry is reviving.
 technology companies may lose as much as $35 billion in the next three years from foreign customers choosing not to buy their products because of concerns they cooperate with spy programs, according to Daniel Castro.
 is moving closer to buying Shire Plc and moving the legal address to Ireland.
 is buying the generic drug business of Abbott Laboratories and forming a new company incorporated in the Netherlands.
 companies from gaining foreign addresses by buying smaller competitors.
 During the last year it has slowed the bond buying it began in December 2008 as financial panic gripped the world.
 Immelt, who failed to find a buyer for the unit early in the financial crisis, opted to invest $1 billion in new factories and products to make the business more competitive against global companies such as Korea’s Samsung Electronics Co.
 Applied Materials agreed in September to buy Tokyo Electron for $939 billion in stock to add scale as a shrinking base of clients makes earnings of suppliers more volatile.
 now buy the majority of the production machines deployed by the industry and are the top three customers of both companies, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 As more consumers buy high-mileage vehicles, they’ll begin noticing the shortfalls if the tests aren’t revised, Becker said.
 India’s CNBC television channel reported last month that Wal-Mart is in talks to buy some of the French retailer’s stores in India.
 Fed Stimulus Policy makers tapered monthly bond-buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the asset-purchase program in October.
 The energy producer was cut to neutral from buy at Societe Generale SA.
 The Leap-1A engines from CFM International would power 100 Airbus Group NV (AIR) A320neos that EasyJet agreed to buy in 2013, said the people, who asked not to be identified because details are private.
 “We’ve made it very clear that we are evaluating both the CFM and Pratt & Whitney engines” EasyJet, Europe’s second-largest low-fare carrier, agreed in June 2013 to buy 135 Airbus planes, split between 35 current-generation A320s and 100 Neos.
 At one station, in Fort Brown in Brownsville, Texas, agents trained to patrol the border “routinely” wound up buying sandwich fixings and drinks for the kids at local grocery stores and taking the children’s blankets to wash and dry “off-site” -- whether at a laundromat or at their own homes, the report doesn’t say.
 stock indexes at all-time highs are keeping private-equity investors at bay this year, driving down the volume of leveraged buyouts to the lowest since 2009, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 companies valued at $1 billion to $10 billion that look cheap relative to the free cash flow they generate and have low enough leverage to pile on debt for a buyout, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Their profitability also trails their peers, signaling there may be an opportunity for financial buyers to cut costs and boost margins.
 buyouts by private-equity firms so far this year, down 59 percent from the same period a year earlier, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Instead of purchasing whole companies, financial buyers are increasingly going after bits and pieces of businesses.
 The three largest agreed-upon buyouts so far in 2014 are for units, including the $21 billion deal for Darden Restaurants Inc’s Red Lobster chain and the sale of Johnson & Johnson’s diagnostics business for $4 billion.
 While surging equity prices are one explanation for the dearth in LBOs, another is the disappearance of “club deals,” when firms team up to pursue a big target, said Mel Cherney, a partner at law firm Kaye Scholer LLP in New York who has represented private-equity buyers.
 Bloomberg News screened for targets a single buyer could digest, that have the traits private-equity firms find appealing: an undervalued stock, high cash generation, low leverage and a business that could use some sprucing up.
 With Guess shares down 14 percent this year, the company has become increasingly attractive for a buyout, Randal Konik, a New York-based analyst at Jefferies, wrote in a report last month.
 It’s also a lot smaller now for financial buyers, with a market value yesterday of $7 billion, versus $11 billion less than a year ago.
 after the energy company promised a 32 percent dividend increase when it buys control of Access Midstream Partners LP for $6 billion.
 have already reduced the amount of their own money they’re willing to use for trading in the face of new regulations, making it more difficult for investors to buy and sell on demand.
 Gorman later rejoined the board after buying the interests of a Westech investor.
 will buy $26 billion of jet engines from a General Electric Co.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Onex Corp, Canada’s largest buyout firm, agreed to buy York Risk Services Group Inc.
 Onex struck a deal in 2012 to buy USI Insurance Services LLC from a fund run by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Cash Uses He said other potential uses of the cash would include increasing its commitment to its Onex Partners IV fund or Onex’s credit products, share buybacks, private equity co-investments, or increasing its dividend.
 “People look at the credit of Vale and they are very comfortable buying the yield that it was showing and holding on to it,” Fabiano Santin, a fixed-income analyst at XP Investimentos CCTVM SA, said in a telephone interview from Sao Paulo.
 Continued strength in China’s economy, the world’s biggest buyer of ore, could result in Vale’s bonds rallying further, Santin said.
 “Capacity has been expanded over the past couple years, you’re caught with effectively a buyer’s market,” Roche said by phone from in New York.
 Potential buyers must have experience running a network and the financial wherewithal to invest, Slim’s company said.
 AT&T Candidate? Slim’s carrier has to persuade regulators to sign off on its breakup plan, so it must find a single strong, viable buyer that can make the market more competitive, Arturo Elias, a vice president at America Movil, said in a Mexico City radio interview this week.
 AT&T, which parted ways this year with Slim by selling its stake in America Movil after 24 years, is a viable candidate for buying the assets, said David Heger, an analyst at Edward Jones & Co.
 with a buy rating on AT&T stock.
 Among other companies that fit America Movil’s description of potential buyers, Vodafone has experience in emerging markets such as India and enough leeway to explore acquisitions after its $130 billion sale of its Verizon Wireless stake, GBM’s Legarreta said.
 Star Member Following the Swissair collapse LOT joined the Star Alliance led by Deutsche Lufthansa AG, which went on to buy the Swiss operator’s successor together with Austrian Airlines and a stake in Belgium’s biggest carrier.
 Sandler analysts led by Edward Shields today cut the company to hold from buy, saying its price-to-book ratio is now comparable to industry rivals after the shares rallied from the IPO.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Abraaj Group, the emerging market-focused buyout firm, is considering a bid for Amoun Pharmaceutical Co, one of the largest drugmakers in Egypt, according to three people with knowledge of the matter.
 The company’s owners include emerging market-focused private equity arms of Capital Group Inc, New York-based Concord International Investments, and the Rohatyn Group, which bought Citigroup Inc’s buyout business last year.
 Abraaj, the Middle East’s largest buyout firm, teamed up with TPG Capital to bid for Saudi Arabian fast food chain and the two are seeking funding for the potential acquisition, three people with knowledge of the matter also said last month.
 Capital Group, Concord and Citigroup’s former buyout business bought Amoun, which makes both veterinary and human drugs, for about $450 million in 2006.
 In court filings yesterday, Energy Future made clear that it won’t meet its original timetable to exit bankruptcy by early next year as it seeks to restructure debt taken on in a record 2007 buyout.
 plans to borrow in the lease-financing market to buy about $110 million of equipment for a waste disposal deal with New York City, according to Chief Financial Officer Brad Helgeson.
 “There won’t be much downside for individual investors,” Nobuyuki Fujimoto, a senior market analyst at SBI Securities Co, Japan’s largest online brokerage, said yesterday.
 That move typically makes the business less attractive to prospective buyers -- something PetSmart investors wouldn’t appreciate, Jana said in today’s letter.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 ‘Best Idea’ While home-loan bonds slumped further after the purchase in the wake of Bear Stearns Cos’s collapse, many buyers in that period don’t regret it, said David Castillo, a Los Angeles-based managing director at Odeon Capital Group LLC responsible for mortgage sales and trading.
 “I can remember three different times in my career when buying seemed like probably the best idea ever, and during the crisis was the best of the three,” Castillo said in a telephone interview.
 Last November, the company agreed to buy back the Stability Fund’s assets for $38 billion.
 Australia, the world’s largest iron ore exporter, last month cut its price estimates for this year and 2015, predicting that surging output will spur the closure of suppliers in China, the biggest buyer.
 made a fourth offer to buy the drugmaker.
 “It’s not that I’m buying a new TV because of the World Cup” Three Recessions Consumer sentiment in the Netherlands, the fifth-largest economy in the euro area, has been negative since October 2007.
 “We do see that due to the World Cup people buy more drinks and snacks, so it is indeed good for sales,” Anoesjka Asperslagh, a spokeswoman for Albert Heijn, said by phone, though she declined to give details.
 It may face stronger competition after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc agreed to buy Sky Italia and Sky Deutschland AG stakes last week from Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 Premium Partner Telefonica agreed this month to buy an 11 percent stake in Premium for 100 million euros.
 Mediaset is also looking for another partner to buy a stake in Premium.
 Our brand means they buy well” The strategy would allow the company to increase its exposure to the larger in-store retail market, Borer said in an interview July 29.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team for a record $2 billion.
 Azul plans to buy 30 of the E195-E2 model and become the first operator of the plane, the biggest version of Embraer’s updated regional-jet family.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Banks are handing out mortgages of as much as $10 million to the wealthy in record numbers while first-time homebuyers struggle to get loans.
 “These high-net-worth borrowers do act differently than first-time buyers, who borrow because they have to,” said Gorman, who serves as the national mortgage sales director at Bank of New York Mellon’s wealth management group based in Boston.
 The number of loans from $1 million to $10 million to buy single-family homes in the 100 largest metropolitan areas surged to more than 15,000 in the second quarter, the highest ever, according to property data firm CoreLogic.
 At the same time, banks are restricting home loans to first-time buyers who don’t have high credit scores.
 In June, about 28 percent of total existing-home sales involved new buyers compared with an average of 35 percent since October 2008, according to the National Association of Realtors.
 Cash Deals “Those who are buying in the super-jumbo space often have more complex financial situations,” said Kendall, whose bank received 20 percent more jumbo loan applications in the second quarter compared with the prior year.
 We still feel comfortable you can justify having the ability to repay by going into the next layers” Some wealthy homebuyers still prefer to use cash rather than provide lenders with documentation of their assets, said David DeSantis, a Washington-based partner and managing broker at Sotheby’s International Realty.
 Others avoid mortgages because they don’t want to lose a bidding war to all-cash buyers, said Elyse Arbour, a real estate agent with Rodeo Realty in Brentwood  All-cash sales made up 32 percent of existing home transactions in June compared with 31 percent a year ago, according to data from the National Association of Realtors.
 The rule relaxations come as the stock exchanges of Hong Kong and Shanghai work on a mutual access plan that will allow investors to buy shares listed in Hong Kong via the Shanghai exchange, and vice versa.
 Under the new plan, Chinese investors will be able to buy stocks traded on both the Hang Seng Composite Large Cap Index and the Hang Seng Composite Mid Cap Index, as well as companies traded on the Hong Kong and Shanghai exchanges.
 Yaskawa, based in Kitakyushu, will buy through a US.
 Today they manage more than $6 billion, buying stakes in public companies they consider undervalued and lobbying executives and directors for changes to boost returns.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Chipmakers are rushing to find partners or buyers in the busiest year for industry deals since 2011.
 are also being pressured to use their cash after years of it being parked overseas, making them potential buyers, Sterne Agee Group Inc.
 24, the day it said it was buying TriQuint Semiconductor Inc.
 Companies such as Texas Instruments Inc, which has excess capacity in its plants, may look to buy smaller rivals such as Atmel Corp.
 “If you’re not out buying stuff and your competitors are, you could be at a disadvantage,” he said.
 The private-equity owners of ConvaTec, a medical-supplies company that was once a unit of Bristol-Myers Squibb Co, have been approached by investment bankers and potential buyers to discuss a sale that could value the company at $8 billion to $9 billion, people familiar with the matter said.
 agreed last month to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion and take its Irish tax address, and giants including Pfizer Inc.
 One potential buyer is 3M Co, one of the people said, though 3M is probably too large a buyer to use ConvaTec to change its tax domicile.
 If Avista and Nordic find a buyer for ConvaTec, it would end almost seven years of ownership.
 owner of storage terminals for oil products and chemicals, agreed to buy the 50 percent of International-Matex Tank Terminals it doesn’t already own for $103 billion in cash and stock.
 Macquarie Infrastructure said it will buy the remaining stake for $910 million in cash and $115 million in stock.
 Non-Arabs were the biggest net buyers today, having bought 886 million dirhams in shares, the data show.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- China’s home sales rose 33 percent in June from the previous month as price cuts by developers lured buyers.
 The central bank in May called on the nation’s biggest lenders to accelerate the granting of mortgages and urged them to give priority to first-home buyers.
 sends a letter demanding the bank buy back mortgages packaged into $47 billion of bonds.
 16, 2010: Moynihan says the bank is waging “hand-to-hand combat” over investor demands that the firm buy back mortgages.
 Outstanding buyback demands climb to $136 billion.
Seems like just a couple days ago wewere discussing the greet-the-week column on investors who havebeen buying defensive stocks at the expense of missing the movesin biotech and small-cap shares, and how they were gettingcaught leaning the wrong way again.
 “But we have gained share and expanded margin” The distiller has been expanding outside its European heartland and the US, its largest region, pushing sales of pricey liquor in emerging markets and buying assets in countries from India to Turkey.
 agreed to acquire LiveRail, a startup that helps businesses buy more relevant video advertisements, its first move into serving video promotions on the Web beyond its own social network.
 The insurer spent $375 million in the second quarter on buybacks, repurchasing about 4 million shares at an average price of $9295.
 A private-equity buyer can’t be ruled out either, he said.
 ZF is a highly motivated buyer, though, and may be tough to beat, Brian Johnson, an analyst at Barclays Plc, wrote in a July 17 report.
 In the last three years, the company sold its lighting business, exited complex Chinese joint ventures and agreed to buy Johnson Controls Inc’s electronics business.
 Safety Matters Tenneco is another company that buyers would be able to get for a relative bargain.
 Rising stock prices may dissuade some buyers from pouncing.
 Even so, ZF’s discussions with TRW signal that “buyers and sellers are coming closer to reaching agreements on price,” said Langan of UBS.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, stepping up bets on Spain’s economic recovery, is buying about 64 billion euros ($87 billion) of mortgages from CatalunyaCaixa SA for 36 billion euros.
 FROB, the state bank rescue fund that controls Spanish lenders nationalized in a process that led the country to seek 41 billion euros in European bailout funds in 2012, is now seeking a buyer for CatalunyaCaixa after cleaning up its balance sheet.
 Blackstone last year agreed to buy a group of Madrid apartments for 1255 million euros.
 AbbVie, the North Chicago, Illinois-based maker of the top-selling arthritis drug Humira, made a fourth offer yesterday to buy Shire Plc for 301 billion pounds ($516 billion).
 agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc, a maker of medical equipment.
 Still, Comte said a higher offer would be justified given that Shire is “a high-growth company with unique assets in the space, plus with potential tax optimization for some buyers” Gonzalez said he hasn’t ruled out going hostile, which may force Shire’s board to the negotiating table, Guillaume Van Renterghem, an analyst at UBS AG, said in a telephone interview.
 may also be interested in buying Shire, analysts have said.
 Amplats, as theJohannesburg-based unit is known, is seeking buyers for theassets after first-half profit collapsed 88 percent because of afive-month strike that ended on June 24.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 “He’s like, ‘Buy it, buy as much as you can as soon as you can,’” Rengan Rajaratnam told his brother on the call.
 Outotec Oyj surged the most in more than two years amid reports that Weir Group Plc may be interested in buying the mining-equipment maker.
 Weir may consider buying the Finnish company after it failed in a bid for mine-equipment supplier Metso Oyj earlier this year, according to newspapers including the Daily Mail, which said Weir could offer 12 euros a share.
 is nearing an agreement to buy Wild Flavors GmbH, a maker of natural food ingredients backed by KKR & Co, for about 25 billion euros ($34 billion), people familiar with the matter said.
 “The majority of local investors are momentum traderscompared to international investors and they would sell on theway down and buy on the way up,” Ramez Merhi, director of assetmanagement at Dubai-based Al Masah Capital, which manages $545million, said by e-mail.
 and Jefferies Group LLC recommended investors buy shares of the Asian country’s second-largest e-commerce site.
 Analysts at Barclays and Jefferies started coverage of JDcom with buy recommendations, citing the Beijing-based company’s leading position in the online retail market and its partnership with Tencent Holdings Ltd, China’s biggest Internet company by market value.
 Beijing-based JDcom has a business model similar to Amazoncom Inc’s, meaning it handles much of its own logistics for package delivery, rather than providing a platform connecting buyers and sellers the way Alibaba does.
 Four analysts out of 10 rated JDcom a buy while six gave it a hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 and Carscom that sell leads of interested car and truck buyers.
 Fund, designed to buy stocks that benefit most from growth-boosting policies, returned 42 percent this year, beating 96 percent of its peers, the data show.
 Standard General already used $10 million of the money to buy a high-interest loan that was deemed in default by the lender.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The $62 billion company could expand its presence in the diabetes market by buying Insulet or Tandem Diabetes Care Inc, said Leerink Partners LLC, which also sees diagnostic-equipment maker Volcano Corp.
 Perrigo, the $21 billion company that gained an Irish address by buying Elan Corp.
 More than 15 companies have announced plans to do so since 2010, including AbbVie Inc, the drugmaker that split from Abbott last year and is attempting to buy Dublin-based Shire Plc.
 Analysts named Abbott as a potential buyer for Volcano last year after activist investor Engaged Capital LLC took a stake in the $839 million company and said it was an attractive acquisition candidate.
 Yandex said it completed a plan to buy back 15 million shares and authorized a repurchase of 3 million more.
 The company tends to reward shareholders via buybacks rather than dividends, Libin said.
 The fees that jewelers pay importers and bankers to buy gold had dropped to $10 an ounce over the London cash price yesterday from $25 last week in anticipation of a reduction in curbs, Bamalwa said.
 The carriers each said yesterday that they would buy back $1 billion in stock amid a turnabout after bankruptcies and consolidation.
July 1 (Bloomberg) -- Sotheby’s sold 931 million pounds ($1593 million) of contemporary art in London yesterday as wealthy buyers around the globe chased trophy works by postwar and contemporary artists.
 Prices include buyer’s commission; estimates do not.
 At least six buyers competed for the work that went to a telephone client of Wong.
 Intel’s outlook indicates demand is starting to recover among consumers, who may be buying laptops and desktops again after years of opting for smartphones and tablets instead.
 The Santa Clara, California-based company said it intends to buy back about $4 billion of stock in the current quarter, and expects sales growth of about 5 percent for the year, higher than previously projected.
 “The market just needs to see them make some early strides,” said Suji De Silva, an analyst at Topeka Capital Markets, who recommends buying Intel shares.
 buying as much as 15 million tons from abroad as local supplies dwindle, it said.
 As the technology firm’s top dealmaker, Perica has upped the pace of acquisitions, culminating in this year’s $3 billion agreement to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the headphone maker and music-streaming service.
 Mitsubishi UFJ agreed to buy Charlotte, North Carolina-based Bank of America’s 49 percent stake in their private bank venture in December 2012.
 Russia’s largest oil producer will buy 61 land drilling crews and a fleet of workover rigs in Russia from Weatherford and six land-drilling rigs in Venezuela, according to Weatherford’s regulatory filing today.
 “The company right now is being held accountable for its execution of its turnaround plan more than anything else” TNK-BP Assets Meanwhile, Rosneft has pushed to build its own drilling business to cut costs, buying rigs from VTB Group earlier this year, as other Russian oil producers including OAO Lukoil, OAO Gazprom Neft and TNK-BP have sold units.
 Weatherford, which has 14 buy ratings from analysts, 13 holds and two sells, rose 25 percent to close at $2244 in New York.
 “If their routes can take this additional capacity, then that’s more revenue for them” Industry consultants said Boeing is likely to find buyers for the as-yet unnamed 737 Max 8 variant outside the US.
 31, and Revel, the $24 billion mirrored-glass casino that was supposed to usher in a resurgence for the city, is searching for a buyer while in bankruptcy.
 Mazzeo said a buyer could emerge to rescue Trump Plaza and save jobs.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Klepierre SA offered to buy Dutch competitor Corio NV for about 42 billion euros ($56 billion) to solidify its position as Europe’s second-largest publicly traded-shopping mall operator as euro region economies recover.
 Jimenez identified eye care as one of three key divisions, along with branded and generic drugs, in announcing a $285 billion restructuring of the company in April that involved selling off the vaccines and animal-health units and buying GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer business.
 De Beers is overhauling how it sells diamonds by picking customers based on their financial strength and track records as buyers at earlier offerings.
 “In Italy, Hutchison Whampoa will be a buyer not a seller,” Vincenzo Novari, chief executive officer of 3 Italia, said in an interview a year ago.
July 26 (Bloomberg) -- CIT Group Inc, the lender that struck a deal to buy Steven T.
 OneWest, backed by billionaires John Paulson and George Soros, hired Goldman Sachs this year to find a buyer while it also prepared for a possible initial public offering.
 “In desperation, I called my local CVS to explain the whole mess and ask how much it would cost to buy mycophenolate out-of-pocket.
 “It’s a bit of a surprise,” said Mark McKechnie, an analyst at Evercore Partners LLC in San Francisco, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 The behavior of buyers today would be “completely ridiculous, unless there’s an implicit assumption that there’s going to be capital gains involved, and that’s a mentality that you see in these long upswings in prices,” Ben Rabidoux, president of North Cove Advisors Inc, a research firm that specializes in housing, said in a phone interview last week.
 He said he didn’t buy the Royal Bank bonds last week.
 agreed to buy rival messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 Tinkler, who’s trying to buy the Queensland mine through his Singapore-based company Bentley Resources Ltd, missed a June 30 deadline for the payment, the Australian Financial Review reported, citing people it didn’t identify.
 that have sought to build bigger news operations, or buyers like Google Inc.
 “You have to consider the franchise it has,” Porter Bibb, managing partner at Mediatech Capital Partners, told Tom Keene and Scarlet Fu in a radio interview on “Bloomberg Surveillance” CNN’s global reach, with outlets from Latin America to India, could attract buyers from outside the US, he said.
 If a bidding war among buyers were to erupt, CNN could go for as much as $10 billion, another person said.
 Murphy Chief Executive Officer Roger Jenkins said in May that the company was in talks with potential buyers for the refinery, though a sale could take as long as one year.
 LafargeHolcim will start talks with suitors immediately, Lafont said, adding that more buyers may come forward now that a list of asset is public.
 LafargeHolcim already received about 50 “marks of interest” from financial and industrial buyers, Fontana said.
 JPMorgan’s Mowat, who cut Chinese stocks to underweight in October, recommends buying “high beta” stocks including brokerages and property companies with low valuations, along with construction and railroad companies.
 Rejection matters as investors including the $12 trillion government pension fund buy and sell shares to emulate the gauge’s movements.
 GPIF, BOJ Japan’s Government Pension Investment Fund, which is being urged to buy more stocks and use the JPX-Nikkei 400, said earlier this month it had about $15 billion of its more than $205 billion in local stocks tracking the measure by the end of March.
 The Bank of Japan is considering buying exchange-trade funds based on the JPX-Nikkei 400, people familiar with the central bank’s discussions told Bloomberg News this month.
 Record Buybacks Companies are buying back their own shares at the fastest rate ever, with about $28 billion of announced purchases by Topix companies so far this year.
 Energy Capital will continue to buy waste from Waste Management under long-term contracts, said Tyler Reeder, a partner in the private equity firm.
 Some 56 percent of respondents said they would sell Indonesian assets and 13 percent said they would buy if Prabowo won, Deutsche Bank AG said in a June 9 report based on a survey of 70 investors.
 A victory by Widodo, known as Jokowi, would lead 74 percent to buy, while 6 percent said they would sell.
 Both candidates say they will maintain Indonesia’s ban on mineral ore exports and Widodo, known locally as Jokowi, has pledged to buy back the state’s stake in telecommunications company PT Indosat.
 The risk is that buyers will be hard to find in the event of a selloff, underscored this month when financial concerns at one of Portugal’s biggest banks roiled markets.
 The automaker never gave those car buyers a chance to have their say in his court during its 2009 bankruptcy, their lawyers contend.
 By contrast, one lawyer with a car-price suit has demanded as much as $10 billion so customers can buy new vehicles.
 Gerber originally told the car buyers to hold off on their lawsuits at least until September while he decided whether they have a right to sue.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Bed Bath & Beyond Inc, facing a stock slump after delivering a disappointing forecast last month, plans to buy back $2 billion in shares during the next fiscal year.
 The latest buyback will be completed in fiscal 2016, which begins around the end of February.
 “Our strong operations should allow us to continue to invest in our infrastructure and maintain our ability to take advantage of opportunities as they may arise” Bed Bath & Beyond, which owns the Buybuy Baby and Cost Plus World Market stores in addition to its flagship chain, is contending with e-commerce competition from Amazoncom Inc.
 Over the past decade, Bed Bath & Beyond has returned about $66 billion to its shareholders through stock buybacks.
 “It’s a short-term cash buy-off that has nothing to do with the overall health of the industry, and it does nothing to address the monopoly that Amazon enjoys and the bigger monopoly they want” Amazon’s offer to writers was reported earlier by the Wall Street Journal.
 “The tightness in credit conditions has limited the pool of prospective buyers” The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index extended a record as Facebook Inc.
 First-Time Buyer Jeffrey Mezger, chief executive officer at KB Home, said last month he’s seeing some signs that the first-time homebuyer is returning.
 “The growth that they delivered from the Rockies was phenomenal,” said James Sullivan, an analyst at Alembic Global Advisors, who rates the stock the equivalent of buy and doesn’t own shares.
 The company is likely to seek a sale of rights to future royalties that could be worth $614 billion, cash that would be used to buy back as many as 10 percent of shares, Arun Jayaram, an analyst at Credit Suisse AG, said July 28 in a note to investors.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-largest oil and gas producer, defended a plan to buyback about $27 billion of stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc amid concern investors may reject the deal.
 “Our judgment is that this is in the best interest of all shareholders” Woodside’s buyback is part of last month’s $5 billion deal in which Shell, Europe’s largest oil company, will trim its 23 percent stake in the Australian company.
 1 will block the buyback, according to Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Ownership Matters Pty, a shareholder advisory company in Melbourne, recommended voting against the buyback, Martin Lawrence, its governance analyst, said today by phone.
 Woodside agreed to buy back shares for A$3649 each, a 15 percent discount.
 The buyback is a “great deal” for Shell with Woodside trading at three-year highs and the generous allocation of franking credits, which reduce an investor’s tax bill by recognizing that the company has already paid a levy on its profits, according to the Macquarie report.
 “In the case of buying back Shell’s shares, it’s part of a two-part transaction,” Chaney said.
 Orders for Airbus’s newest A350, due for first delivery this year, and the Boeing 787 Dreamliner, in service for less than three years, may still flow, though neither plane will be available to air-show buyers before 2020.
 founder Steven Udvar-Hazy one candidate, though he said in Doha last month that he’d prefer to buy after the big twin-jet has proven itself with airline operators.
 AirAsia would also seem sure to buy, with Chief Executive Officer Tony Fernandes this month describing the A330neo as a “killer” model that would finally make long-haul discount flights truly viable.
 The shift may trigger a retreat from prime funds that are big buyers of the short-term corporate IOUs, precipitating an increase in borrowing costs.
 The crisis calmed only after the Treasury Department temporarily guaranteed shareholders against losses and the Fed began buying fund assets at face value to help them meet redemptions.
 “You have to tread carefully with price cuts because buyers get used to them,” said Frank Biller, an analyst at LBBW in Stuttgart, Germany.
 Combined European sales by General Motors Co’s twin Opel and Vauxhall marques rose 12 percent in June, as the Mokka compact SUV and Corsa small car won buyers.
 Shares maintained gains in the afternoon after the Bank of Japan kept its bond-buying program unchanged.
 is buying Japanese shares for the first time in at least five years, speculating they will rise as the Government Pension Investment Fund purchases shares and the global economy expands.
 due to phone-financing plans and contract buyout offers.
 to buy 888 percent of Hyundai Logistics Co.
 As part of the restructuring, Hyundai Group will buy the 1995 percent stake in Hyundai Elevator Co.
 Orix and Hyundai Merchant are buying the stake in Hyundai Logistics from Hyundai Group, Hyundai Global Co, Hyundai Securities and Chairwoman Chairwoman Hyun Jeong Eun.
 Orix will own 70 percent of the buyers consortium with Hyundai Merchant owning the rest.
 Demand for the city’s currency continued to be strong, prompting the Hong Kong Monetary Authority, the city’s de facto central bank, to buy $410 million during New York and London hours to defend the city’s peg to the US.
 added as much as 29 percent after Citic rated the shares a buy, saying the end of the anti-graft drive will remove negative factors hanging over the company’s operations.
 “It is very hard to buy construction companies, so if we do anything, we’re cautious.
 “The main surprise through the course of the quarter came in the form of lower natural gas and ethane prices” compared with the start of the year, Ahmed, who recommends buying Dow shares, said in a July 14 note.
 In May, Third Point applauded some moves made by Dow since the hedge fund’s concerns became public knowledge, including an increase in the company’s dividend, $45 billion of planned share buybacks and expanding a program to sell underperforming assets.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Sky Deutschland AG’s second-largest shareholder said that British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc’s offer to buy out investors is too low and it won’t sell without a premium.
 BSkyB agreed to buy Murdoch’s 57 percent holding in the German cable television company for 29 billion pounds ($49 billion) in cash last week.
 About a quarter of the casino jobs that propped up the city for more than three decades are on the line as one gambling house closed in January, two more plan to in the next two months and a fourth -- the $24 billion Revel that promised to transform the town from a bastion of blue-haired slots addicts into a destination for the glitterati -- is seeking a buyer in bankruptcy.
 Deutsche Boerse said it probably won’t start a new share buyback program in the next quarter.
 “An additional share buyback program requires a material increase in trading volumes,” Pottmeyer said.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Gtech SpA agreed to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in cash and stock, uniting the world’s largest provider of lottery systems with the biggest slot-machine maker.
 While there isn’t an explicit requirement to disclose cyberattacks, public companies are obliged to tell investors about material events that could influence their decision to buy or sell shares.
 “We’re not seeing any reluctance to buy the GTF based on the CSeries incident.
 Dodd-Frank regulations are designed reduce risk by having most interest-rate, credit-default and other swaps guaranteed at central clearinghouses that accept collateral from buyers and sellers.
 Banks shouldn’t buy, hold or sell virtual currencies until regulators develop safeguards to protect their integrity, the European Banking Authority said earlier this month, citing risks including identity theft and the possibility that hackers could target a trading platform.
 Merchant Banking On its website, OmniView describes itself as a “merchant banking and financial advisory firm” which provides strategic funding to privately owned, middle-market firms to facilitate growth plans, management buyouts, capital restructuring, acquisitions and other deals.
 would buy Vancouver-based Mercator.
 sanctions against Russia “are also creating uncertainties” Schneider said today it will buy back about 6 million shares in the second half.
 The New York-based firm uses complex mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities, and manages about $20 billion.
 Orders were placed for about $11 billion, and buyers included insurance companies and pensions, he said.
 Results aren’t as bad as initially expected” The Topix surged 14 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid signs Japan is weathering a consumption-levy increase from that month and speculation the nation’s $12 trillion pension fund will buy more local shares.
 Still, share declines may be limited because “it looks like the Japanese government pension fund or other pensions are buying stocks” More than 1,300 of the 1,809 companies on the Topix are scheduled to report earnings this week or next.
 Did the buyer know how much the trader made? Probably not.
 Securities and Exchange Commission Chairwoman Mary Jo White said last month her agency is working with regulators to require bond dealers to disclose markups when they buy securities to fill a customer’s order.
 interest rates will probably stay low for a “considerable period” after the central bank ends the bond-buying program it has used to support the economy, the Federal Reserve said last week.
 unit will acquire the Mexican assets while Sao Paulo-based JBS will buy the Brazilian business, Tyson said today in a statement.
 Earlier this month, Tyson agreed to buy Hillshire Brands Co.
 “As stock indices hit new highs, there are those that fear further gains, given defensive positioning, but more worry about buying in now just in time for a severe pullback” The Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility Index, the measure known as VIX that tracks investors’ volatility expectations for the S&P 500, jumped 98 percent yesterday from a seven-year low.
 Cheong worked on both the buy and sell side for various financial institutions for almost a decade before taking a job as an analyst on the credit trading desk of Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc in 2011.
 Home sales in China slid 102 percent by value in the first five months of the year, the statistics bureau said June 13, and would-be buyers are being offered no-money-down purchases to clear stock.
July 4 (Bloomberg) -- San Miguel Corp, the biggest Philippine company, is prepared to spend as much as $10 billion to buy assets in Southeast Asia, President Ramon Ang said.
 Loans helped finance some of the biggest leveraged buyouts during the last credit boom.
 Issuance of leveraged loans continued to be “rapid” during the first half of 2014 and sales of collateralized loan obligations, which buy the debt, also reached “very high levels” from February to April, according to the report.
 are all logical buyers and could drive up the price for the company, this person said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The New York-based company, which rebuffed an offer from Rupert Murdoch’s Twenty-First Century Fox Inc, isn’t in talks with any other potential buyers, this person said.
 Time Warner plans to make a case for its independence directly to shareholders in the coming days, outlining a plan to create value without selling to Murdoch or another buyer, the person said.
 for $45 billion, while AT&T is seeking to buy DirecTV for $48 billion.
 “If you’re thinking about buying a home, it’s a pretty good time,” said Brian Jones, a senior economist at Societe Generale in New York, who correctly forecast in the jump in builder sentiment.
 An index of current single-family home sales increased to 57, the best reading since January, from 53, while the group’s gauge of prospective buyer traffic rose to 39 from 36.
 “As employment increases and those with jobs feel more secure about their own economic situation, they are more likely to feel comfortable about buying a home” Hiring Gains Payrolls rose by 288,000 in June following a 224,000 gain the prior month that was bigger than previously estimated, Labor Department figures showed earlier this month.
 While borrowing rules remain strict, “we are seeing signs of loosening among the mortgage companies, and in our served markets, we are beginning to see evidence of the re-emergence of the first-time homebuyer,” Chief Executive Officer Jeffrey Mezger said in a June 27 conference call.
 The real estate investment trust agreed to buy 50 percent of 530 Fifth Ave.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Continental Gold Ltd, a Canadian company exploring for the precious metal in Colombia, has received interest from potential buyers as regional acquisition activity rebounds along with the metal’s price.
 Imperial is lining up $7 billion to buy some brands that Lorillard and Reynolds would sell off to assuage any concerns raised by the US.
 Chief Executive Officer Robert Kotick faced firing over his demand that he lead a group helping to buy out most of Vivendi SA’s stake in the video-game company he ran, according court filings.
 25% Stake Some Activision stockholders said directors wrongfully allowed Kotick and Kelly’s group, which included Chinese video-game publisher Tencent Holdings Ltd, to buy 25 percent of Vivendi’s Activision stock at the same discounted price Activision paid for $583 billion of the shares.
 Kotick told Activision board members “he would not cooperate with a debt or equity offering or any other process that involves a result other than” the offer by his investment group to buy Vivendi’s shares, according to the filing.
 Capron said in a June 1, 2013, e-mail he’d been in contact with Richard Sarnoff, one of Activision’s independent directors, who indicated he opposed allowing Kotick’s group to participate in the buyout, especially if they got shares at a discount.
 Sarnoff was part of a board committee negotiating the terms of the Vivendi buyout.
 Ultimately, Vivendi executives bowed to Kotick’s demands that his investment group, which included Davis Advisors and Leonard Green & Partners, buy a block of the French company’s Activision stake.
 After Activision’s independent directors including Sarnoff concluded the company needed Kotick’s and Kelly’s support for the buyout of Vivendi’s majority holdings, the French company acquiesced, shareholder Anthony Pacchia alleged in the amended suit, filed June 25.
 Pacchia and another Activision investor fault directors for allowing Kotick and Kelly to reap a windfall as insiders by participating in the buyout group.
 ‘Huge Deal’ Pacchia said Kotick and Kelly considered a management-led buyout of Vivendi’s stake as early as 2012, when they approached Peter Nolan, an ex-Activision director who was managing partner at Los Angeles-based private-equity firm Leonard Green.
 Laster last year issued an order barring the Vivendi buyout from proceeding.
 will pay 455 Canadian cents per share, a 31 percent discount to SouthGobi’s last traded price in Toronto yesterday, the Hong Kong-based buyer said in a statement today.
 of China Ltd, China’s biggest aluminum producer known as Chalco, dropped a bid to buy 60 percent of SouthGobi for C$925 million.
 As part of the deal, London-based Imperial Tobacco Group Plc will buy some brands from Reynolds and Lorillard in an effort to head off any antitrust concerns that the US.
 Imperial is lining up as much as $7 billion to buy some brands that the companies would sell off to assuage any antitrust concerns raised by the US.
 He’s maintaining a “buy” recommendation on the shares even as results fell short of his expectations.
 The buyback will be “in that ballpark,” he said, referring to the amount spent in the second quarter.
 Banca Popolare dell’Emilia Romagna SC advanced 62 percent to 676 euros after Kepler Cheuvreux recommended buying the stock.
 Jefferies, which maintained its buy rating on the company, boosted its share price target to 1,650 yen from 1,400 yen.
 properties, agreed to buy Park Avenue Tower in New York for about $750 million, said three people with knowledge of the transaction.
 At the same time, Blackstone is buying office buildings where it sees potential for gains through new leases or property improvements.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Speculation that Lululemon Athletica Inc’s founder wants to sell the yoga-gear retailer has options traders stretching toward calls to buy the shares.
 as potential buyers for Lululemon.
 Wilson’s time with Lululemon could end if he opts to sell his stake in the company rather than attempt to buy it, a possible alternative reported by the Wall Street Journal.
 “If somebody wants to take a risk and buy this company and have Chip Wilson be involved, well good luck to them,” Dunn, who rates the company as neutral, said by phone.
 “His history with negative PR is certainly something a buyer would have to consider if he would remain involved” In its first-quarter earnings report, Lululemon said that fiscal 2014 is about expansion.
 The buyout firms are among at least six groups exploring the purchase of Americana from the biggest shareholder, the Al-Kharafi family, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- China’s stocks rose the most in a month as automakers got a boost from the government’s pledge to buy more alternative-energy cars, while utilities and consumer-staples shares gained on speculation profit will beat estimates.
 “The new policy by the government to buy more alternative-energy cars is boosting hopes that auto sales will increase,” Zhang Yanbing, an analyst at Zheshang Securities Co, said from Shanghai.
 Robeco is using its quota under China’s Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program to buy mainland consumer and industrial firms with dual listings in Hong Kong, anticipating the price gaps will narrow as an exchange link with Shanghai makes it easier for money to move between the two bourses.
 While the mainland discount has grown as local investors exit the Chinese market and international money managers await details of the exchange tie-up, Arnout van Rijn, Robeco’s chief investment officer in Hong Kong, says those who buy now and have the resolve to hold their positions will be rewarded.
 Company Outlook Aecom was upgraded to buy from hold by Adam Thalhimer, analyst at BB&T Capital Markets.
 Once activist investors buy more than 5 percent of a company’s stock, they’re required to flag their intention to engage with executives and directors by disclosing the holding in a Form 13D filing with the US.
 agreed to buy Australia’s Talison Lithium Ltd, owner of the world’s largest open-pit lithium mine.
 The partnership between Airbus and Boeing and their suppliers is pivotal, said Jeff Knittel, the CEO of CIT Group Inc’s leasing company, which agreed to buy re-engined A330s aircraft at the show alongside Boeing Dreamliners.
 He was also given a one-time option grant to buy 500,000 shares, according to the filing.
 Gupta Role Gupta will be working on strategic investments as Twitter continues to buy companies to bolster its advertising business.
 Twitter is paying $100 million for TapCommerce, according to a person with knowledge of the matter, its biggest acquisition since buying MoPub for $350 million in October.
 Apple agreed to buy Beats for $3 billion in May, its biggest-ever acquisition, with founders Dr.
 ministers will make the initial purchases under a program to buy more than 150 ultra-low emission vehicles, the nation’s Department for Transport said yesterday in London.
 “London streets are cramped, you can’t go that fast and there are all sorts of limitations and fees for gasoline-powered vehicles, so there’s a logic to buying electric cars,” said Karl Brauer, senior industry analyst for Kelley Blue Book in Irvine, California.
 Wilmar had originally approached the baker and discussed a takeover after buying a 10 percent stake in February 2012.
 Dana Weinberg, a sociology professor at Queens College, City University of New York, said that lower e-book prices don’t necessarily increase the number of consumers buying digital books.
 Both brokerages kept their buy ratings.
 soared 33 percent to 30 Hong Kong cents after parent Celestial Asia Securities Holdings Ltd said it’s in talks with a third party interested in buying a majority stake in its stocks and futures broking unit.
 The Federal Reserve is expected to taper its bond-buying program for the sixth time at a two-day policy meeting that ends tomorrow.
July 13 (Bloomberg) --- BOC Aviation Pte, the Asian aircraft leasing company, wants to buy about 35 Airbus A320 aircraft and a larger number of competing Boeing Co.
 Banco Nacional de Desenvolvimento Economico e Social, as the state lender is officially known, in 2012 halted loans for developers buying equipment from turbine makers that didn’t get enough of their components from local suppliers.
 “That dovetails into saying it now becomes an even more attractive acquisition target because it’s a combination of the two instead of having to go buy both” Deal Discount James Henderson, a spokesman for Denver-based Kodiak, said he couldn’t comment on speculation of future deals.
 “The very large companies -- whether it’s the Exxons or Statoils of the world -- they’re going to have to have to be getting a very large scale to go through the process of buying somebody,” Wangler said.
 It just means the list of buyers is shorter and likely limited to the so-called majors, the top-tier of international energy explorers, he said.
 agreed to buy June 3, Bristow said.
 Facebook is testing a “buy” button on browsers and mobile devices that lets users make purchases through advertisements, the world’s largest social network said in blog post yesterday.
 Twitter’s acquisition of San Francisco-based CardSpring is the first major move by Nathan Hubbard, the former president of Ticketmaster, who was hired last year to find ways to let people buy goods directly from tweets.
 Social Commerce Dick Costolo, chief executive officer of San Francisco-based Twitter, has said that the social network is seeking to eventually offer “commerce in the moment” Facebook’s new buy button service is being tested in the US.
 Facebook is testing the buy button even after saying earlier this year that direct purchases wouldn’t be the best strategy to serve marketers.
 *** + ADM agreed to buy Wild Flavors GmbH for about 22 billion euros ($299 billion) in cash.
 Rapid credit growth fueled bank earnings and economic growth until 2008 as clients borrowed to buy homes, cars and consumer goods.
 A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces PetroChina to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project from the Canadian company, based on a 2010 agreement.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Neil Woodford has stuck to buying Britain’s largest drugmakers and cigarette makers for his new equity income fund, industries considered resilient to economic downturns.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Legg Mason Inc, the money manager that’s struggled with more than five years of net redemptions, agreed to buy Martin Currie to expand into active international stock funds.
 In March, it agreed to spend as much as $41 million to buy QS, which split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010 and had $41 billion in funds under management and $100 billion in advisory assets.
 who rates Microsoft stock the equivalent of a buy.
 “Nadella is not wearing rose-colored glasses” The reductions may add 30 cents a share to Microsoft’s profit in fiscal 2016, estimated Kirk Materne, an analyst at Evercore Partners Inc, who rates Microsoft the equivalent of a buy.
 Given the stock’s gains in recent months on optimism about Nadella’s plans, it’s time for the company to post earnings growth that validates that enthusiasm, said Brent Thill, an analyst at UBS AG, who recommends buying the stock.
 The offering probably will cut earnings per share by 10 percent next year, assuming underwriters exercise their option to buy an additional $75 million of stock within 30 days, according to David George, a Robert W.
 “It’s not clear to me that a buyout does anything,” Sean McGowan, an analyst at Needham & Co.
 The company spent about $4854 million buying back stock in the year through Feb.
 Revenue from selling power provides funds for the yieldco to buy more plants as they are built and also pay dividends to investors.
 Proceeds of its offerings will be used for expenses and also to buy buy projects from SunEdison and other companies.
 “The alpha heyday of all risk premiums is over” Pimco, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, expects returns to fall as the Federal Reserve unwinds bond buying under the quantitative-easing strategy it has used to support the economy, reducing monthly purchases to $35 billion from $85 billion last year.
 Given Japan buys about 100 cargoes a month, the impact on the LNG market is “very limited,” Tamamizu said.
 Olayan Financing Co, a unit of the Saudi group which is also the top shareholder in Credit Suisse Group AG, will buy a 51 percent stake in Gulf Union, the companies said today in a joint statement.
 Olayan, one of the most prominent Saudi Arabian family-owned firms, was in talks to buy a majority stake in Gulf Union in a deal potentially worth about 500 million riyals ($133 million), people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 “I didn’t need to go to Taiwan and I didn’t need to buy a microwave oven, but with this extra money, why not?” said retired schoolteacher Yin, 60, as she put receipts into her pink purse at an Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- BG Group Plc is seeking buyers for its largest operations in the North Sea as the British company attempts to overhaul its portfolio, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Calpine is buying back its 8 percent bonds maturing in 2019 and putting out a tender and consent solicitation offer on its 7875 percent notes due in 2020 and 75 percent debentures maturing in 2021.
 The company is offering to buy back the $880 million of 7875 percent debentures due July 2020 for as much as 1105 cents on the dollar, the Houston-based company said in its statement.
 The company, which was the target of a management buyout that failed in 2011, saw its stock-market value plummet to $372 million yesterday from as high as $275 billion in 2010.
 “Some people are spooked because one of the games is delayed out of the quarter,” said Michael Pachter, an analyst with Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles who recommends buying the stock.
 Proposed changes to South Africa’s 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Energy Future Holdings Corp, the Texas power company taken private in a record buyout seven years ago, may scrap a reorganization plan negotiated before it filed for bankruptcy unless it can reach new terms with creditors.
 ‘Drive-Thru Donut’ He has dismissed money laundering as an overly broad category of crime, “like buying a drive-thru donut in a stolen vehicle” He once wrote that being a customer of bitcoin companies that work with regulators to stop crime “feels like buying weed from the Drug Enforcement Administration” Under Matonis, the foundation has hired a new Washington-based global policy counsel, Jim Harper of the libertarian Cato Institution.
 They agreed to end their bond-buying program in October if the economy holds up.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- SSE Plc agreed to buy Energy Solutions Group Topco from Bridgepoint Development Capital Ltd.
 Liquidnet and ITG are agency brokers, which means they don’t buy and sell for themselves.
 More Appetite “Low volatility definitely increases the appetite on the part of the buy-side to cross,” Selway said, referring to large traders.
 He has dismissed money laundering as an overly broad category of crime, “like buying a drive-thru donut in a stolen vehicle” He once wrote that being a customer of bitcoin companies that work with regulators to stop crime “feels like buying weed from the Drug Enforcement Administration” Under Matonis, the foundation has hired a new Washington-based global policy counsel, Jim Harper of the libertarian Cato Institution.
 This firm then used this information to buy a rival greeting-card company, according to court papers An appeal followed the February 2013 jury trial and $31 million judgment.
 “Most of them must leave their office early to pick up their kids before daycare centers close” Yamaguchi, the accountant, started asking recruiters to help her find a job similar to the management position she had at a multinational company in Japan before she took a buyout package as the company downsized.
 He has a buy recommendation.
 airline shares represent a buying opportunity, Michael Linenberg, a Deutsche Bank analyst, said in a report yesterday.
 producer by buying up failed rivals and has lost money in five of the last 10 years.
 is interested in buying the CNN news channel if it becomes available.
 Time Warner shares jumped this week after the company said it rejected an unsolicited $75 billion buyout offer from Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 If a bidding war among buyers were to erupt, CNN could go for as much as $10 billion, according to the person.
 Chongqing Iron & Steel Group agreed to buy the magnetite iron ore project in Western Australia for as much as A$280 million ($262 million), the official Xinhua News Agency reported in November 2009.
 NRG also received a warrant to buy an additional 2 million shares of FuelCell for $335 each.
 “If you buy a new house you need new furnishing,” Rahul Kapoor, a Singapore-based analyst at Drewry Financial Services Ltd.
 “The next few months will be important in seeing how much of this strength we’ve seen in the last month was this pull-forward factor from the potential West Coast port strike,” said Long, who has an overweight rating on CSX, the equivalent of buy.
 withdrew from an agreement to buy two hydro-power projects from the Indian company.
 While the companies have agreed on the broad outlines of a merger in which Sprint would buy T-Mobile for about $32 billion, the agreement isn’t likely to be announced until August, the people familiar with the matter have said.
 “We have had consortiums and JVs bidding together to buy spectrum.
 What we haven’t had is two of the top carriers in the country banding together to buy spectrum,” he said.
 to find buyers for Calpers’s stake in its growth equity fund, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the fund is private.
 Su and the other individuals were seeking information that they could match to buyers or customers willing to pay a significant price, prosecutors said.
 “We expect a positive reaction to this strong set ofresults, particularly the surprise profit in Europe, somethinginvestors place outsized importance upon,” wrote Ryan Brinkman,an analyst at JPMorgan Chase & Co, who rates the shares theequivalent of buy.
 in Chicago, who rates Ford theequivalent of buy.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Realogy Holdings Corp, owner of brokerage brands Coldwell Banker and Century 21, agreed to buy ZipRealty Inc.
 ZipRealty’s board unanimously approved the buyout and will recommend the transaction to its shareholders, according to Realogy’s statement.
 “If we try to do some short-term patch, all we’ll end up doing is accelerating the trend of foreign companies buying US.
 Baker continues to recommend buying Lowe’s shares and maintained his hold rating on Home Depot.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Surging consumption of chocolate in Asia is pushing cocoa-bean prices to the highest level in three years as buyers including Barry Callebaut AG expand their search for more supply.
 British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc dropped 55 percent after saying it agreed to buy 21st Century Fox Inc’s pay-TV businesses in Germany and Italy.
 Aabar is in talks with former CEO Hasan Ismaik to buy at least half of his 289 percent stake, Bloomberg News reported July 16.
 After filing for bankruptcy almost four months ago with plans to sell its business, the Richmond, Virginia-based company has delayed an auction twice without announcing a buyer.
 Credit Suisse cut the stock from the equivalent of buy, citing high valuations.
 A policy announced last year to favor buying weapons from domestic manufacturers may force foreign companies to create tie-ups with Indian firms to avoid missing out on contracts, according to Gaurav Mehndiratta, who advises defense companies that invest in India.
 Amazon is shipping this week its Fire smartphone, a $199 handset that lets users take a picture of a product to find and buy it quickly from Amazon.
 The ECB cut its benchmark interest rate to a record-low 015 percent and introduced negative deposit rates on June 5, while the Federal Reserve has kept paring a bond-buying program that spurred fund flows to emerging markets.
 Some 56 percent of 70 investors surveyed by Deutsche Bank AG said they would sell the nation’s assets, while 13 percent would buy, should Prabowo win the election, according to a report dated June 9.
 A victory by Widodo would prompt 74 percent to buy and 6 percent to sell.
 persuaded a judge not to force it to post warnings on its websites about the company’s dire financial condition after telling him that notices would scare off prospective students and buyers and put it into a “death spiral” The for-profit owner of career schools defeated a bid by California Attorney General Kamala Harris for a court order forcing it to disclose that it’s at risk of financial collapse and will sell or close schools.
 “Sponsoring the final teams is the grand prize for the apparel brand,” said John Kristick, global chief executive officer of ad buying agency GroupM, part of WPP Plc.
 Cravath Advised Mylan on Adding Abbott Unit for Tax Advantage Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP represented Mylan Inc, which is buying Abbott Laboratories’ generic-drug business and forming a new company that will be incorporated in the Netherlands, allowing for a lower-cost tax base.
 after Carlyle Group LP agreed to buy the company for $475 billion including current debt, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Lee, a 40-year-old Boston buyout firm, will receive more than $17 billion through the sale of a majority stake it acquired for about $500 million three years ago, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the information isn’t public.
 Lee joins a host of buyout firms that are exiting investments to take advantage of stock markets near record highs.
 Over the last 12 months, the median multiple for announced North American buyouts was 109 times Ebitda, just below where values stood in 2007 at the buyout market’s peak, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Deal Volume Washington-based Carlyle, the world’s second-biggest manager of alternatives to stocks and bonds, completed the highest volume of deals among global buyout firms in the second quarter, investing $26 billion of its funds’ equity, according to Credit Suisse Group AG research.
 leveraged buyouts, a $13 billion pool that finished gathering capital in November.
 Globally, leveraged buyouts’ deal volume stood at $616 billion this year through yesterday, a 39 percent decline from the same period last year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Those actions would free cash for share buybacks and reduce spending risks, according to Jana’s July 22 letter to investors.
 as a major positive” The company is in early discussions with potential buyers for its stake in the $27 billion Wheatstone liquefied natural gas project in Australia, people familiar with the matter said earlier this month.
 Sterling filed a $1 billion antitrust lawsuit against the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team.
 “His dad wants to buy him a new job at the top of his state” The crowd reacts to the trust-funder trashing with delight, though one supporter is absent: Hassebrook’s honorary campaign co-Chairman Susan Buffett, the daughter of Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 Voters “see those ads as an implication of who you are and that you’re trying to buy the race” Exciting Supporters The Buffett support has helped excite supporters, said Hassebrook, the former director of the Center for Rural Affairs, a Lyons, Nebraska-based non-profit that advocates for small farms, renewable energy and health care.
 Building Base “In ’06 I put a lot of my own money into the race, some people took away that I was trying to buy the race,” Ricketts, 49, said in an interview.
 “The cyclical recovery should accelerate from the fourth quarter onwards,” Frankfurt-based DZ Bank analyst Jasko Terzic wrote in a note to clients, reiterating his buy recommendation.
 is aiming to get a deal done to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 is better off without Rupert Murdoch, who proposes to buy the entertainment giant for more than $75 billion.
 However, she is buying mostly at a discount, having snapped up Mini Boden-brand items at Nordstrom Inc’s recent sale.
 The company in June announced a 1 billion-pound share buyback, and Rishton told investors at the time that he preferred to reward shareholders rather than chasing major acquisitions, following the sale of energy assets to Siemens AG.
 He rates Boeing the equivalent of a hold, while Canaccord’s Herbert recommends the stock as buy.
 He sold it short last week around $6 -- which means selling stock you don’t own with a plan to buy it cheaper soon, pocketing the difference.
 Market-makers who had sold the shares short got nervous and scrambled to buy them to close their positions, driving the price even higher, Laresca said.
 “If you’re short, you have to buy it within five days,” Laresca said of market-making rules.
 “I have no clue” Cynk, which lists headquarters in Belize, as said on its website that it’s a service to buy contact information for people like celebrities.
 offered to buy the text-messaging service.
 BNP Paribas cut the company’s rating to hold from buy, saying most positives have been priced in and that investors should wait for the release of Apple’s iPhone 6 to spur momentum.
 China Qingdao International plans to buy the rest of the company after acquiring about 57 percent stake for HK$4287 million.
 The balance of people saying the next 12 months are a good time to buy a home slumped to 5 percentage points in the second quarter from 34 in the previous three months, the mortgage unit of Lloyds Banking Group Plc said.
 The report adds to evidence that a boom that has driven house prices to record highs may have peaked, with Halifax reporting a “sharp rise” in the proportion of people citing values as a barrier to buying.
 “It appears that we’ve reached a tipping point with the equilibrium between buyers and sellers much more out of sync,” Craig McKinlay, mortgages director at Halifax, said in a statement.
 The Bank of England took action last month stop rising house prices leading buyers to take on risky debts and new rules came into force in April requiring tougher affordability tests.
 Concerns about interest-rate increases have risen over the past year, although raising a deposit was the most commonly cited obstacle to buying a home, according to the Halifax survey, which questioned 1,959 people July 4-14.
 Standard General also agreed not to buy any more shares of the company until after its 2015 annual meeting.
 He rates the shares a buy.
 Manager Stakes AMG in April agreed to buy a majority stake in Veritas Asset Management LLP, a global equity manager with $17 billion in assets.
 broadband customers, many of them younger, who don’t buy traditional cable TV, the people said.
 The venture wants to attract customers by offering to buy solar power from their rooftops at an attractive rate and giving energy-saving tips, Yoshiyuki Furukawa, a Panasonic official in charge of the project, said.
 Some non-utility power companies are offering to buy solar power at a higher rate than that set by the government.
 They can do that because clean-energy buyers get reimbursed after the avoidable cost is deducted, allowing them to virtually source electricity at a rate cheaper than the wholesale rate.
 Panasonic’s venture is offering to buy solar power 1 yen higher than the government-set tariff per kilowatt hour.
 “Those who installed panels will be happy if we buy the power at a rate as high as possible,” Furukawa said.
 “Those without panels will also benefit because we sell the power we buy cheaper” Market Opportunities So far, the market served by non-utility power companies is only slightly more than 4 percent of all generated power in Japan, according to government figures for the year through March 31.
 Some municipal governments are among the customers already buying power from the companies, known collectively as power producers and suppliers, or PPS.
 HTA agreed yesterday to buy 3,100 African towers from New Delhi-based Bharti Airtel Ltd.
 The nation holds a presidential election next week and candidate Joko Widodo, who is leading in opinion polls, plans to allow foreigners to buy apartments in an effort to raise tax revenues, Setyo Maharso, a member of his campaign team, said on July 3.
 Japan’s exports of special higher-grade zinc used to prevent steel from rusting have dropped to the lowest since 2011 while China has been buying the metal at the quickest pace in five years.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Silver Lake Partners agreed to pay $295 million to settle an antitrust lawsuit alleging it conspired to limit competition in the leveraged buyout boom that preceded the financial crisis, according to a filing yesterday in Boston federal court.
 Shareholders of companies that were acquired accused Goldman Sachs, Bain and banks and private-equity firms of conspiring to carve up the market for large leveraged buyouts, suppressing prices and depriving investors of billions of dollars.
 Silver Lake is a private equity firm that specializes in buyouts in the technology sector.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- CNP Assurances SA agreed to buy 51 percent of Banco Santander SA’s consumer-finance insurance units, a deal that gives the French insurer access to a host of European countries including Germany.
 “We will be buying additional interests in the deepwater Gulf of Mexico, to complement our portfolio, in the hundreds of millions of dollars” The company in May announced a $31 billion sale of Texas shale properties to Encana Corp, which it followed a day later with a deal to buy positions in Gulf of Mexico projects from Apache Corp.
 are now improving, particularly in commercial real estate, is increasing interest from funds that buy distressed loan books,” said David Ellis, Sydney-based analyst at Morningstar Inc.
 for $570 million as part of his plan to simplify XL and free up capital for share buybacks.
 “It’s a sign of the trust that the market is putting in the government’s ability to deliver on its promises,” Joe Kogan, an emerging-market strategist at Bank of Nova Scotia who recommends buying Pemex debt, said in a telephone interview from New York.
 The company, which is buying satellite carrier DirecTV, already had raised its 2014 sales forecast and cut its range of earnings estimates on June 3 due to the effect of the installment plans, called Next.
 To bolster its video offerings, AT&T agreed in May to buy El Segundo, California-based DirecTV for $485 billion.
 who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Microsoft.
 The cuts could involve 5 percent to 10 percent of a workforce that swelled to about 127,000 employees with the addition of Nokia, according to Rick Sherlund, an analyst at Nomura Securities who has a buy rating on Microsoft.
 who has a buy rating on Apple.
 has agreed to buy that division for $23 billion, pending a US.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on Menlo Park, California-based Facebook.
 Yahoo is projected to bring in about $10 billion from the deal, and shareholders will look for any comments on how much of that, after taxes, will be distributed through buybacks or dividends.
 He has a buy rating on Yahoo.
 Litigation between holders of the junior and senior debt may slow progress toward a permanent owner for the complex, whose tenants have been seeking to buy and keep its apartments affordable.
 gained 29 percent after a report that the yoga-wear company has explored a buyout by a private-equity firm.
 on options including shaking up the board and partnering with a buyout firm.
 The maker of energy-efficient lighting products was raised to outperform, the equivalent of a buy, from market perform, or hold, at Oppenheimer & Co.
 and a $75 billion buyout offer for Time Warner Inc.
 agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 Banks have seen profits hurt in recent quarters as the Fed slows its bond buying and fixed-income clients make fewer bets amid low volatility.
 Carry funds that invest in buyouts gained 5 percent in the quarter and 13 percent through June, Washington-based Carlyle said today in a statement.
 “It’s about a good second quarter, a healthy outlook for the second half and investors buying into the growth story for 2015” VMware customers are re-signing multiyear deals for virtualization software that can help them trim corporate network costs and at the same time are adding on VMware’s tools for managing those setups, said Abhey Lamba, an analyst at Mizuho Securities USA Inc.
 with a buy rating on the stock, in a note.
 Elliott has held talks for several months with potential buyers of EMC without the VMware piece, a person with knowledge of Elliott’s campaign has said.
 “But because you have a desire to work and make better, I continued” Calderon, 68, is one of at least 16 Latinos in the Chicago area who’ve filed consumer complaints with the Illinois attorney general, saying Herbalife duped them into buying tens of thousands of dollars worth of products they couldn’t sell.
 To market the products, Calderon said he outfitted a nutrition club thinking customers would buy the Herbalife merchandise as soon as he made it available.
 Jefferies Group LLC raised its rating on the copper miner to buy from hold.
 natural gas producer that almost ran out of money last year, is spending $171 billion to expand access to oil-soaked shale in Wyoming and buy back preferred shares that were a drain on cash.
 will pay its first dividend since 1980 and repurchase $1 billion in stock, matching a buyback by United Airlines’ parent as the once-struggling industry returns more cash to investors.
 The company resumed its dividend in September, then boosted the payout in May and announced a $2 billion stock buyback.
 Denardi had projected that American and United would issue dividends or buy back shares perhaps in early 2015.
 He rates both carriers as buy.
 The stock buyback will be completed no later than the end of 2015, American said.
 The industry has been transformed through a lot of pain to a point where we can return cash to investors and we’re doing it” United’s Buybacks United said it expects the buyback program to be completed within three years.
 “He’s like, ‘Buy it, buy as much as you can as soon as you can,’” Rengan Rajaratnam told his brother on the call.
 He rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 Standard General already used $10 million of the money buy a high-interest loan that was deemed in default by the lender.
 A Sprint acquisition of T-Mobile, though, would probably be challenged by the Justice Department, which sued to block AT&T Inc’s plan to buy T-Mobile in 2011, First said.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Arabtec Holding Co’s second-largest shareholder is in talks to buy at least half of a 289 percent stake held by the construction company’s former chief executive officer, a person with knowledge of the situation said.
 Newcrest has lost almost three-quarters of its market value since in 2010 buying the Lihir gold mine, which chalked up a $32 billion charge last fiscal year.
 agreed to pay 758 million euros ($1 billion) for a controlling stake in Italian appliance maker Indesit Co, its largest acquisition since buying former rival Maytag Corp.
 The acquisition follows Whirlpool’s deal last year to buy a majority stake in Hefei Rongshida Sanyo Electric Co.
 This month, Twitter also agreed to pay almost $100 million to acquire TapCommerce, which targets people on mobile phones or tablets with ads for items they’ve expressed interest in buying around the Internet, urging them to complete the purchase.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Imports of palm oil by India, the world’s largest buyer, probably dropped for a second month as a shrinking discount to soybean and sunflower oils cut its appeal.
 With both newcomers and regular issuers relying more on the market this year to fund their lending operations, asset-backed bond buyers should focus on lesser-known issuers to boost returns, Wells Fargo analysts led by John McElravey wrote in a report this week.
 Subprime Boom Auto debt, the largest part of the asset-backed market with $50 billion of sales this year as measured by Wells Fargo, has fueled much of the growth in recent years amid a boom in lending to car buyers with spotty credit.
 Twitter’s implied volatility, or the cost to buy options, was 623 on average in its first week of options trading, according to data on three-month contracts closest to the stock price.
 31, and Revel, a $24 billion mirrored-glass casino that was supposed to usher in an era of opulence and resurgence for the city, is searching for a buyer in bankruptcy.
 Mazzeo said a buyer could emerge for Trump Plaza to rescue the property and save jobs.
 In addition to the patents it receives from its own research, Google is a prolific buyer of patents from companies like International Business Machines Corp.
 “Normally that would eventually provide a buying opportunity at least for a snap back but clearly the timing is uncertain.
July 4 (Bloomberg) -- Before she can buy a loaf of bread at her local Shoprite in the northern Nigerian city of Kano, Binta Isa has to clear security.
 “You can buy a good company, but if you have paid too much it will put a strain on your shareholders” Addressing David Jones shareholders, Chairman Gordon Cairns today described Woolworths’ offer for Country Road as a “sideshow” The result “unequivocally demonstrates the overwhelming support among our shareholders” for a sale to Woolworths, Cairns said in a prepared statement read to reporters after the meeting.
 The combined group would have had about $6 billion in revenue during its 2013 fiscal year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, giving it greater buying power than Abercrombie & Fitch Co.
 Silent Solomon Woolworths may now buy Lew’s minority shareholding in Country Road, having offered A$17 a share to add to its existing 8788 percent holding.
 Acquiring PanAust would give the buyer control of mines in Laos as well as the Frieda River project in Papua New Guinea, described by the target as one of the world’s largest undeveloped copper and gold deposits.
 “I’d be surprised and I don’t suppose the meeting would last very long” PanAust agreed last year to buy Glencore Plc’s stake in Frieda River, estimating the development costs at as much as $18 billion.
 Potential buyers include Electrica as well as investment funds, the State Grid Corporation of China, RWE AG, which has recently opened an office in Romania, and Electricite de France SA, according to Bernstein, RBC Capital Markets and others.
 The Italian utility is also seeking a buyer for its 66 percent stake in Slovakia’s largest utility, Slovenske Elektrarne AS, which operates two nuclear stations and is building two new reactors.
 Potential buyers include Czech utility CEZ AS, whose CEO Daniel Benes said in April that he’d be open to bidding for Enel’s stake if it came up for sale.
 Women ages 25 to 45 make up more than 60 percent of buyers, he said.
 is buying Abbott Laboratories’ generic drug business in established markets like Europe and forming a new company that will be incorporated in the Netherlands, cutting its taxes.
 Abbott has been expanding the portion of its generic-drug business that operates in emerging markets, including the deal to buy Chile’s CFR Pharmaceuticals SA in May.
 The announcement comes as AbbVie Inc, the company split off from Abbott last year, today moved a step closer to buying Shire Plc after the Dublin-based company said it’s willing to back a fifth offer of 314 billion pounds ($537 billion), which would be the biggest industry deal this year.
 The larger of the two apartments may fetch as much as S$575 million ($463 million), according to asking prices of similar units on propertygurucom, a search portal for home buying and rentals.
 is buying startup Songza Media Inc, bolstering its music services as it tries to draw users away from rival Apple Inc.
 The company also offers a locker that lets users store thousands of songs and that includes a feature for buying new songs.
 “The government won’t be willing to take in the short-term pain, so they are following a two-step approach: buy time, and if the economy stabilizes, then they will focus more on the reforms,” Shen Minggao, Citigroup Inc’s head of China research, said by phone from Hong Kong on July 2.
 agreed to buy Banco Comercial Portugues’s Romanian unit to buttress its presence in the neighboring country as the Ukrainian crisis hits the profitability of Hungary’s largest lender.
 Charney last week returned fire by buying 274 million shares, boosting his stake in American Apparel to 746 million shares, according to regulatory filings.
 and Morgan Stanley say buyers are unwise to bet $115-a-barrel crude can fix a broken economy.
 The extra yield investors demand to buy Venezuela’s bonds due in 2022 instead of US.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Bed Bath & Beyond Inc, the owner of Buybuy Baby in addition to its flagship chain, sold $15 billion of bonds in a three-part deal to fund share repurchases.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co’s $26 billion buyout of its publicly traded credit business KKR Financial Holdings LLC amounts to an insider deal that unfairly shortchanges shareholders, a lawyer for investors argued.
 KKR’s acquisition of KKR Financial, commonly known as KFN, in an all-stock deal, amounted to a controlling-shareholder buyout that didn’t provide enough to stockholders, Stuart Grant, a lawyer for KFN shareholders, told a judge today.
 Arguments over the KFN buyout come two weeks after KKR, led by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, agreed to buy a stake in hedge fund BlackGold Capital Management LP as it continues a push to develop business beyond leveraged acquisitions, a person with knowledge of the deal told Bloomberg News.
 Blackstone in February used client funds to buy a piece of Senator Investment Group LP.
 No Control In the KFN case, KKR’s lawyers refute investors’ claims that the buyout fund controls the board of the holding company, say in court filings that KKR owns less than 1 percent of KFN’s stock and has no power over KFN’s directors.
 Grant countered in court filings that under KFN’s management agreement with KKR, the buyout firm handles all operations and KFN has no employees.
 Bouchard said he’d rule later on whether KFN investors can proceed with the suits over KKR’s buyout.
 A preliminary agreement between the carriers was announced today during a visit by German Chancellor Angela Merkel to China that included a range of agreements including signature on a deal for China to buy Airbus Group helicopters.
 Zekauskas is one of 17 analysts with a buy recommendation on the stock, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The Russian carrier also agreed to buy eight current-version A330s.
 The partnership between Airbus and Boeing and their suppliers is pivotal, said Jeff Knittel, the CEO of CIT Group Inc’s leasing company, which agreed to buy re-engined A330s aircraft at the show alongside Boeing Dreamliners.
 European Shares British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc fell 55 percent after offering to buy 21st Century Fox Inc’s Sky Italia unit and 57 percent stake in Sky Deutschland AG to expand in Europe.
 Options traders are buying up protection against a potential drop in Time Warner stock, wary of risks that include the board’s resistance to a merger and potential antitrust issues.
 Chief Executive Officer Lowell McAdam considered buying Time Warner and then passed, not wanting to take on additional debt after acquiring the rest of Verizon Wireless earlier this year for $130 billion, according to people familiar with Verizon’s discussions.
 “From a strategy standpoint, we can get the rights to the content that will make us successful without needing to buy the content,” Fran Shammo, Verizon’s chief financial officer, said this week, without directly addressing whether there were talks.
 The company also said it agreed to buy Swiss watchmaker Ulysse Nardin, without disclosing the price of the purchase, which is expected to be finalized during the second half of 2014.
 Energetica de Minas Gerais agreed to buy a 50 percent stake in a 6762-megawatt wind project in Brazil’s northeastern state of Bahia.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Hellman & Friedman LLC has set a goal of more than $10 billion for its latest buyout fund, making it part of an elite group of private-equity firms seeking that much capital after the financial crisis.
 Apollo Global Management LLC, Carlyle Group LP and Silver Lake Management LLC gathered funds of more than $10 billion in 2013, contributing to the strongest year for buyout capital raising since 2008.
 Founded in 1984 by Warren Hellman, who died in 2011, and Tully Friedman, who now heads San Francisco-based private-equity firm Friedman Fleischer & Lowe LLC, Hellman & Friedman participates in buyouts, restructurings and minority deals.
 The authority has been negotiating with banks for time to make payments on credit lines used to buy fuel.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Standard Chartered Plc’s private equity arm led a group to buy a 28 percent stake in a Longfor Properties Co.
 pack features into cheap phones to lure budget buyers.
 The company took a step to strengthen the division in May when it agreed to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter products, including the allergy medicine Claritin, for $142 billion.
 Dirks, the 51-year-old chief executive officer of Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit that Telefonica is buying, has undercut Deutsche Telekom AG and Vodafone Group Plc for years with 20 euro-a-month ($27) voice and data packages.
 “He knows what he’s doing’ Telefonica yesterday won European Commission approval for its 855 billion-euro deal to buy E-Plus, combining the third-and fourth-largest German wireless operators.
 that provides an option to lease or buy 767-300ERW aircraft.
 WestJet exercised options to buy five more Bombardier Inc.
 ‘Didn’t Kill’ “It was a good quarter, not a great quarter,” Desai, who rates the shares a buy and doesn’t own them, said in a phone interview.
 Schlumberger, which has 35 buy and three hold recommendations from analysts, fell 2 percent to close at $11236 in New York.
 Besides delays from Indian manufacturers who are seeking to replicate a weapon Sweden designed three decades ago, plans to buy 1,500 mid-range howitzers have also failed to be executed.
 “The fact India has not been able to buy artillery is symptomatic of the problems of governance within its armed forces,” said Harsh Pant, a defense studies professor at King’s College in London who has written books on India-China ties.
 What’s left is used mostly to buy weapons from abroad because India’s state-run factories aren’t able to meet the army’s needs, leaving tanks without shells and soldiers without bulletproof vests, according to a parliamentary defense committee report published last year.
 “Companies like Lockheed have targeted India as one of the most important and appealing weapons buyers over the next two decades,” said Loren Thompson, an analyst with the Lexington Institute, an Arlington, Virginia-based research organization, and a consultant to defense companies including Bethesda, Maryland-based Lockheed Martin.
 India surpassed China in 2010 to become the world’s largest arms importer, and now buys three times as many weapons as its northern neighbor, according to SIPRI.
 Ford is betting a lightweight, aluminum-bodied pickup with fuel economy that may approach 30 miles (48 kilometers) per gallon on the highway will entice buyers to pay a premium for the F-Series, its top selling and most profitable model.
 said yesterday it’s receiving interest from potential buyers but is rebuffing bids until it gets a modified environmental license on its Buritica project in Colombia.
 The 80-year-old bank founded during the New Deal helps foreign companies buy US.
 Froneman, 54, chief executive officer of Sibanye Gold Ltd, said the inequality, violence, high costs and low productivity that plague South Africa’s mining industry are creating an opportunity to buy platinum assets on the cheap and replicate the turnaround strategy that made his company the world’s lowest-cost major gold producer.
 If capital falls below a lender’s individual requirement, the FSA can shut down the bank in question if it’s unable to raise capital or find a buyer.
July 4 (Bloomberg) -- The French government has had its ability to buy Alstom SA shares in the open market capped by regulators, raising the potential cost of becoming an anchor investor while General Electric Co.
 An agreement with shareholder Bouygues SA for the state to buy as much as 20 percent of its Alstom stake, alongside an option to acquire freely traded shares, may create an unfair situation, the Autorite des Marches Financiers said in a release yesterday.
 In ruling that the government and Bouygues are acting together, the regulator has left the state little leeway for buying shares in the open market, unless the French construction and telecommunications group first lowers its stake.
 Its option to buy 20 percent of Alstom from Bouygues only starts when GE’s purchase of most of the energy units is completed and Alstom has returned some of the proceeds to shareholders.
 Grillo, in an interview in Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung today, said “it can’t be that America can weaken the European financial system and at the end of it perhaps buys the one or the other bank” The situation posed by the US.
 Santander said in April it would offer to buy back about 25 percent of its Brazilian unit in a transaction valued at 47 billion euros.
 Last month he signed GE’s biggest acquisition: $17 billion to buy Alstom SA’s energy assets.
 Adjusted earnings rose to $432 a share, 1 cent higher than analysts’ estimates, boosted by cost-cutting and share buybacks.
 More Buybacks IBM ended the quarter with $97 billion in cash on hand, little changed from the end of March, after spending $11 billion on dividends and $37 billion on share buybacks.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion, pending a US.
 Bouygues Telecom, France’s third-largest mobile operator, was looking for a buyer as profitability and cash generation declined.
 Orange could have facilitated such a deal by buying 1,800 megahertz spectrum from an enlarged entity, said Virginie Deterck, an analyst at Paris-based Amundi Asset Management.
 “There was mounting pressure on Clarence” With the company’s meeting coming up, “they may have felt they needed to make a change prior to that or they were going to lose a lot of seats,” said Collier, who has a buy rating on the shares.
 But one day they’ll grow up and buy a tiny house.
 You make a pretty good living at one of Silicon Valley’s biggest names, buying what you want when you want it, but, as we all know, you’re still not satisfied.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest manager of alternatives to stocks and bonds, said second-quarter profit surged 89 percent as rising markets boosted the value of holdings and the firm began collecting profits from its biggest buyout fund.
 Blackstone, under Chief Executive Officer Stephen Schwarzman, has been the most successful leveraged-buyout firm to expand beyond takeovers and into real estate, credit and hedge funds.
 Its outlook for collecting earnings in cash was boosted by the performance of the $217 billion Blackstone Capital Partners V fund, which was raised from 2005 to 2007 and is the largest buyout pool ever.
 Blackstone is seen as a bellwether for the buyout industry given its size and reach across markets.
 Buyout Economics Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul and then sell them.
 Executives at the firm’s investor day last month said they plan to begin raising new global buyout and real estate funds next year.
 Blackstone has been more selective in choosing buyouts as rallying stock markets have made potential investments more expensive.
 boosted its recommendation on the Los Gatos, California-based company to buy from neutral, citing the potential for global subscription growth.
 “While the charges and provisions for litigation do hit reported profits, we believe that the underlying business is doing well, with the most important performance indicators improving,” Andreas Venditti, an analyst with Vontobel Holding AG in Zurich who recommends buying the shares, said in a note.
 Any slump in the market will be temporary and represents a good time to buy, said Craig Hodges, manager of the $14 billion Hodges Small Cap Fund that’s beaten 99 percent of its peers over three years.
 “We have a list of 15 to 20 names that we’d like to buy at a cheaper price, and so we kind of like days like today, where some of the weak holders get shaken out of stocks,” he said in a phone interview yesterday from Dallas.
 That presented an opportunity for his firm to buy.
 “We’re getting our buy tickets ready” Hodges said his firm holds about 10 percent in cash, and on its watch list are airlines such as United Continental Holdings Inc.
 Trimming Equities Not everyone treated the market pullback as a buying opportunity.
 The drop will eventually turn into a buying opportunity as equities resume their advance later in the year, he said.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- GIC Pte, Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund, backed out of buying a Tokyo property from Lone Star Funds, according to people familiar with the transaction.
 “Gajoen would be among those that will continue to attract potential buyers” Lone Star, which typically focuses on assets that have a real estate component, made its name buying distressed loan portfolios and lenders in Asia starting in the late 1990s, with investments ranging from golf courses in Japan to office towers in Seoul.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Deepak Gulati, chief executive officer of hedge-fund firm Argentiere Capital AG, recommends buying options to profit from widening price swings in global indexes.
 Gulati recommended buying options on stock indexes in Japan, Korea and China; European financial stocks; US.
 Josh Birnbaum, chief investment officer of New York-based Tilden Park Capital Management and a panel member, recommended buying mortgage putbacks.
 He said many small businesses depend on the lender, which provides financing to help foreign companies buy US.
 “The guidance suggests a challenging passenger yield environment, especially given continued competition from the Middle Eastern airlines,” HSBC Holdings Plc said in a report today, downgrading Singapore Air’s stock to neutral, or hold, from overweight, or buy.
 “That and the joint venture on their Duvernay acreage keeps getting deferred” A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces PetroChina to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project from the Canadian company, based on a 2010 agreement.
 In a similar agreement, it took Athabasca 10 weeks to get paid after triggering a put option in 2012 that forced the Chinese company buy the rest of the Mackay River oil-sands project.
 They said improving “in-stocks” -- a measure of how much merchandise is available for shoppers to buy -- was a top focus for Wal-Mart.
 “There’s been a little bit of yen buying and I would attribute that to a certain degree to a risk-off type of trade” The yen gained 05 percent to 13685 per euro at 5 pm.
 TeliaSonera plans to buy Tele2 AB’s Norwegian business to bolster its No.
 BNP Paribas submitted claims to the USDA as early as April 2005 for losses from Mexican buyers who had defaulted on purchases of the grain, the DOJ said.
(Updates with CEO comments from third paragraph) By Sarah Jones July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Friends Life Group Ltd, the insurer created by Clive Cowdery, plans to return cash to shareholders after Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy its European wealth-management unit for as much as 356 million pounds ($610 million).
 The insurer said it plans to return 261 million pounds to shareholders through a share buyback.
 We are very confident that we have a very strong capital base even post the buyback” The insurer’s predecessor, Friends Provident, acquired Lombard for 265 million euros ($361 million) in 2004 to expand internationally and boost revenue from wealthy clients.
 It tried to sell the unit, which today has about 208 million pounds in gross assets, in 2008 and couldn’t find a buyer.
 agreed to buy it.
 Not since the bull market began has buying dips been a surer way of making money.
 The Theale, England-based company will consider buying the remainder of the company in 2016.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Even a buyout offer wasn’t enough to inspire confidence in NQ Mobile Inc, the mobile-security service provider that short-seller Carson Block has accused of overstating revenue.
 offered to buy the company out at a 42 percent premium.
 Bison Capital, an investment firm in Beijing, proposed yesterday to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR, compared with the closing price of $690 on July 29.
 The tepid market reaction to the buyout offer suggests investors are concerned about the risk of a deal not being completed, according to Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at Albert Fried & Co.
 The buyers have a right to sell the stake back if FL Mobile doesn’t complete a qualified initial public offering within 12 months after the sale, according to a May 30 statement.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Aberdeen Asset Management Plc, the third-biggest shareholder in Wing Bank Bank Ltd, agreed to sell its shares in the lender to Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, moving the Singaporean buyer closer to a full takeover.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- CME Group Inc, owner of the world’s biggest futures market, agreed to buy GFI Group Inc.
 Malaysia Airports increased its Sabiha Gokcen holding to 60 percent from 20 percent after buying a stake from GMR Infrastructure Ltd.
 “Notwithstanding the disappointment of further below-the-line charges, we believe that Lloyds continues to make good underlying progress,” said Gary Greenwood, an analyst at Shore Capital in London, who has a buy recommendation on the shares.
 and Azure Power India Pvt, for 130 megawatts of capacity, agreeing to buy photovoltaic power at tariffs ranging from 8,001 rupees ($133) a megawatt-hour to 9,330 rupees, according to the agency.
 The new status doesn’t guarantee the shares will trade since buyers and sellers may not agree on prices following a 10-day halt.
 Cynk will still be branded on OTC’s website with the skull-and-crossbones icon denoting a “buyer beware” warning.
 Mark Mobius, executive chairman of Templeton Emerging Markets Group, says it’s not too late to buy into the rally in Chinese stocks.
Two years after Mexico President Enrique Pena Nieto won election on a promise to boost growth, foreign investors are buying his vision.
 The biggest Mexico-focused ETF in the US, iShares MSCI Mexico Capped ETF, with a market capitalization of $288 billion, saw shares outstanding increase 26 percent amid buying over the same period.
 Cutting Forecasts Some withdrawals by local investors may reflect an interest in buying individual Mexican stocks instead of broader indexes, according to Jorge Lagunas, who manages $200 million at Grupo Financiero Interacciones.
 forces it to seek a new buyer at short notice for a customized and half-painted plane that’s been tough to sell even in mint condition.
 “Outfitting for a different customer could mean significantly new wiring” Airbus is already struggling to find any new or follow-up buyers for its largest and more expensive jet, with some key customers, including Deutsche Lufthansa AG, Air France-KLM Group and Qantas Airways Ltd.
 Any airline taking A380s typically requires four to serve a daily city pair, so two planes available at short notice may not prove an attractive proposition for any buyer.
 Amedeo, a lessor that signed to buy 20 Airbus A380s in February, has yet to line up a single customer for any of those planes.
 The Fed is scaling back the bond-buying program it has used to support the economy, after increasing the size of its balance sheet to a record $441 trillion.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd’s plan to buy back shares from Royal Dutch Shell Plc for $27 billion is at risk of being rejected by shareholders as it falls short of the votes needed to proceed.
 Without that, “it looks like the resolution is headed for defeat” The buyback is part of Shell’s deal last month to raise $5 billion, trimming most of its 23 percent stake in Australia’s second-largest oil producer.
 The buyback is a great deal for Shell with the generous allocation of franking credits, which reduce an investor’s tax bill, and Woodside trading at three-year highs, Macquarie said.
 After an “equal-access” buyback, Shell would still be a substantial holder in Woodside with about 11 percent of the shares, according to UBS.
 Woodside said June 17 it had agreed to buy back the shares for A$3649 each, a 15 percent discount to the previous day’s closing price.
 OCBC is buying Wing Hang as it seeks more access to the Greater China region, allowing it to offer banking services to Chinese companies expanding in Southeast Asia.
 The buyer’s current ownership level indicates Elliott Capital tendered at least a part of the shares it held.
 Hong Kong lenders are luring foreign buyers seeking to tap China-related business in a city that is the biggest center for offshore yuan trading.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Elementia SA, the Mexican cement maker backed by billionaires Carlos Slim and Antonio del Valle, is in talks to buy out partner Lafarge SA in their joint venture, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Elementia has the right to buy Lafarge’s 47 percent stake under an option described in the original terms of the Mexico partnership, said two of the people, who asked not to be identified discussing private negotiations.
 Lafarge may be forced to offer its stake at a discount to convince the Mexican company to buy, the person said.
 Macquarie Infrastructure Co, which owns storage terminals for oil products and chemicals in the US, will buy the 50 percent of International-Matex Tank Terminals it doesn’t already own, it said in a statement yesterday.
 The bank agreed in August to buy 45 percent of Singapore’s Helios Terminal Corp.
 Macquarie Infrastructure said it will buy the remaining stake for $910 million in cash and $115 million in stock.
 The company had 42 percent of its assets in stock funds and 39 percent in funds that buy bonds as of June 30.
 is ending a service that lets friends send digital gift cards to each other, as the social-networking service revamps how users can buy goods and services.
 Facebook, which has 132 billion users, has already been working on new online commerce features, such as a trial “buy” button on browsers and mobile devices that lets users make purchases through advertisements.
 “The more people buy online, the more people buy things they discovered through their mobile phones, the more people discover things from a News Feed and go on to purchase, the more important we are in driving e-commerce,” Sandberg said in a call with investors.
 Facebook’s new buy button service is being tested in the US.
 Fred Hochberg, the bank’s president, today defended its role in helping overseas companies buy US.
 “For institutional investors that are buying bonds for the long term, real yields can look very attractive in certain parts of the periphery” The gains coincided with a report today showing euro-region consumer prices rose an annual 05 percent in June, stuck at the lowest rate since 2009.
 Louis who recommends buying Target shares, said in an e-mail.
 agreed to buy US.
 The idea is to lure shoppers with everyday needs in the hopes they visit more often and buy the cool stuff one aisle over from the milk and eggs.
 The company said on May 9 it agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 companies buytheir goods and whose authorization is set to expire Sept.
 (And even if you are headed to work, maybe you’ll arrive with the smell of beach in your tousled mane) Sticky summer days will surely send some buyers to the Bentley dealership for a test-drive of the Volkswagen AG unit’s four-seat Continental GT V8 S convertible.
 The NICS records the number of people seeking screening in order to buy a gun.
 New Products Ruger announced it will expand its share buyback program from $25 million to $100 million and declared a dividend of 45 cents a share for the second quarter.
 “Riverbed’s poor performance this quarter reveals its decision to stonewall prospective buyers to be a serious and costly mistake,” New York-based Elliott said in a statement.
 who has a buy rating on Yahoo’s stock.
 When the Hong Kong dollar reaches the so-called strong end of the trading range, the HKMA offers to buy US.
 However, there’s no reason to buy right now either” Futures on the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index slid 01 percent.
 Barbara Strougo of New York filed her case today in Manhattan federal court, claiming she and other buyers of Barclays American depositary shares lost money after the attorney general brought his lawsuit June 25.
 The bank falsified marketing materials to hide how much high-frequency traders were buying and selling and failed to disclose that “significant” revenue was made by favoring those traders over other clients of the dark pool operation, known as Barclays LX, according to Strougo’s lawsuit.
 They have already received “high quality” interest in the assets, and banks advising on the sales will send out initial information to potential buyers next week, Lafont said.
 The derivatives, which can be used to hedge against losses or to speculate on creditworthiness, may be a sign that some bondholders are also buying contracts and may profit more from a default than avoiding one.
 Credit swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since its buyout.
 Fed policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee reiterated at it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve can send all the warnings it wants about froth in the junk-loan market, but some of the biggest buyers aren’t listening.
 CLO Demand Bigger buyers are swooping in to pick up any slack in demand as the smallest investors lose interest in high-yield loans.
 But the longer it keeps benchmark interest rates at about zero, the longer some investors will see a green light to buy.
 “I think investors expected headwinds,” said Colin Gillis, an analyst at BGC Partners who has a buy rating on EBay’s shares.
 who recommends buying the stock.
 Spain’s former phone monopoly has acquired rights to broadcast football and Formula 1 racing and is buying out a pay-TV venture as part of a push to keep clients from defecting to rivals’ cheaper plans.
 Telefonica Brasil SA and Telefonica Deutschland Holding AG, which received European approval this month to buy Royal KPN NV’s E-Plus unit, yesterday reported earnings that met analysts’ estimates.
 Robeco is using its quota under China’s Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program to buy mainland consumer and industrial firms with dual listings in Hong Kong, anticipating the price gaps will narrow as an exchange link with Shanghai makes it easier for money to move between the two bourses.
 While the mainland discount has grown as local investors exit the Chinese market and international money managers await details of the exchange tie-up, van Rijn says those who buy now and have the resolve to hold their positions will be rewarded.
 The Shanghai and Hong Kong exchanges agreed on April 10 to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 interest rates will probably stay low for a “considerable period” after the central bank ends the bond-buying program it has used to support the economy.
 This year’s tally doesn’t include Puerto Rico’s $35 billion deal in March, the biggest junk-rated muni sale ever, which was tailored to nontraditional muni buyers such as hedge funds.
 Proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes that may include share buybacks, acquisitions or debt repayment, the company said in a regulatory filing.
 Investors are turning to Italy after buying up troubled assets from the UK, Ireland and Spain, where banks have been deleveraging to meet new capital regulations.
 “The potential upside is very high” Investors profit from loans that are close to, or in default by buying the debt at a discount and then waiting for it to either be repaid or increase in value.
 “It’s a bit of a surprise,” said Mark McKechnie, an analyst at Evercore Partners LLC in San Francisco, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 (APA), the energy company thathas announced $98 billion of asset sales in the past year, isseeking a buyer for its interests in the Wheatstone liquefiednatural gas project, people familiar with the matter said.
 The oil and gas producer is in early discussions withpotential buyers for its holdings in Chevron Corp.
 Proceeds could be used to fund further sharebuybacks, according to the report.
 Chinese energy companies may be interested in buyingApache’s Wheatstone holdings, Nik Burns, a Melbourne-basedanalyst at UBS, said today by phone.
 Kufpec may also considerbuying the stake, he said.
 He recommends buying Danske shares.
 For one, Aereo would most likely have to buy entire channel bundles to gain access to broadcast channels, he said.
 Fredrik Lundberg, Nordic Trustee’s head of corporate bonds, said in a June 24 phone interview from Oslo that the ship has attracted some potential buyers, without being more specific.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- A California real estate developer who sold billionaire Mark Zuckerberg rights to buy the house behind his Palo Alto home says the Facebook Inc.
 Voskerician was in contract to buy a house in Palo Alto that he planned to replace with a new one when he learned that Zuckerberg lived on the other side of the property’s fence, according to his lawsuit.
 Facebook’s Headquarters In a series of meetings at the property and Facebook’s headquarters, Zuckerberg said he wanted to buy the property from Voskerician, who’d already been offered $43 million by another developer to sell his rights to the house, according to the complaint.
 “There are a lot of people wanting to get their hands on these assets,” said Gheit, who rates Anadarko the equivalent of a buy and doesn’t own shares.
 reported a slowing in monthly home-price inflation in June, with the latter saying buyers became more cautious on the outlook.
 “It’s about a good second quarter, a healthy outlook for the second half and investors buying into the growth story for 2015” VMware customers are re-signing multiyear deals for virtualization software that can help them trim corporate network costs and at the same time are adding on VMware’s tools for managing those setups, said Abhey Lamba, an analyst at Mizuho Securities USA Inc.
 with a buy rating on the stock, in a note.
 Elliott has held talks for several months with potential buyers of EMC without the VMware piece, a person with knowledge of Elliott’s campaign has said.
 Sweeping measures may include a proposal to ban Europeans from buying new debt or stock issued by Russia’s biggest banks, the Financial Times reported, citing a proposal it’s seen.
 Slow Recovery Four of 16 analysts covering SodaStream rate the stock a buy, with two, Barclays and Stifel, rating them sell.
 SodaStream benefits from the so-called razor-blade model of retailing where profits rely on customers repeatedly buying complementary products such as carbonation cannisters and flavors.
 The company’s main problem is that customers haven’t been buying these extra items, forcing management to spend more on marketing to bring in new buyers of its machines, said Stifel’s Duffy.
 The firms should also consider adopting an agency-trading model where they seek to put buyers and sellers together on SEFs, he said.
 borrowed $265 billion last month for general purposes and to help integration of JPMorgan’s commodities unit the company agreed to buy.
 The company’s biggest competitor for TV customers, British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc, has announced plans to buy Sky Italia and a stake in Sky Deutschland AG, which would give BSkyB access to 20 million subscribers in five countries.
 Bitcoins, which emerged last year as an alternative to currencies, can be used to buy everything from gummy bears to computers and hotel stays.
 Both Fiat and its biggest investor denied the report that Europe’s largest carmaker made an approach to buy all or part of the Italian competitor.
 He declined to say whether the company plans to buy or lease the jets, and wouldn’t identify the aircraft that WestJet is considering -- other than to say that the planes are used.
 “I wouldn’t say it’s 100 percent of a buyer’s market but we’re happy with what we have sourced to date in terms of the quality and the price,” Cummings said.
 “Due to the much slower movement by other companies I’m becoming very doubtful something will happen this year” Froneman plans to buy platinum assets in South Africa to sustain the company’s dividend as its gold mines reach the end of their lifespans.
 expressed an interest in buying African gold mines from Newmont Mining Corp.
 At the same time, they should buy Horizon stock because with or without a Roc deal, its prospects are positive, he said.
 There, he and his team review the risk-weighted yields of bonds out to more than 20 years, deciding which to sell, hold and buy that day.
 Debt Triples The BOJ, led by hand-picked Abe governor Haruhiko Kuroda, has been buying about 7 trillion yen a month of sovereign notes since 2013 to fuel 2 percent inflation in a nation where monthly consumer-price rises have averaged 03 percent since 1991.
July 8 (Bloomberg) -- Sunshine Oilsands Ltd, a Canadian energy producer backed by Chinese investors, is abandoning a plan to issue a $325 million bond after failing to attract buyers, two people with direct knowledge of the deal said.
 “It was probably the sweetener that convinced them to buy what is essentially a selection of third-tier brands” Market Leader The purchase failed to prevent a 37 percent drop in Imperial Tobacco shares yesterday as the extent of the Davidoff maker’s increased presence in the US.
 The company sells the USA Gold, Sonoma and Fortuna brands in about 20 states after buying Kentucky-based Commonwealth Brands in 2007.
 Keeping itself a minority investor in Reynolds leaves the door open for BAT to potentially buy the UK’s Imperial Tobacco Group Plc instead, said Jefferies Group LLC.
 “You don’t need to buy a cow when you just want a glass of milk,” Chris Wickham, a London-based analyst at Oriel, said in a phone interview.
 Rating Drop Vodafone’s spending plans, as well as 18 billion euros ($24 billion) in deals to buy Spain’s Grupo Corporativo Ono SA and Kabel Deutschland Holding AG, spurred credit-rating provider Moody’s Investors Service to strip the company of its A3 ranking this week.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd, the drugmaker buying patents from Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA in a deal that will allow it to move from the US, initially proposed buying the Italian company outright.
 Salix, based in Raleigh, North Carolina, agreed this week to buy patents to three gastrointestinal drugs from Lainate, Italy-based Cosmo for about $27 billion in stock, allowing the US.
 To allow for a base in Ireland, the deal is structured so that Cosmo’s Irish subsidiary buys Salix, and investors in Salix receive one share of the new company for each Salix share.
Cocoa grinder Euromar Commodities GmbH is slowing processing at its German factory as it can’t find buyers for all its powder even as buoyant demand pushed prices for cocoa butter to the highest in almost 30 years.
 Chocolate makers who had held off buying because of high butter prices have realized they’re not well covered, according to Haws.
 “Some manufacturers waited to buy and used up inventories instead,” he said.
 Penny stocks, trading at low values a share, are particularly vulnerable to manipulation schemes because “it’s very easy for people to buy up large amounts,” Lynch said.
 is cutting the amount of unsecured debt it must repay within three years by 47 percent, buying itself time to focus on flying.
 provided an Ontario town along the proposed Energy East pipeline route with cash to buy a rescue truck on conditions that include the municipality not comment on the company’s operations.
 The money for Mattawa will be used to buy a new rescue vehicle for first-aid services along Highway 17, known as the Trans-Canada, near the community about 300 kilometers (186 miles) northwest of Ottawa, according to the agreement.
 Federal Reserve continued to trim monthly asset purchases, tapering monthly bond buying to $25 billion to stay on pace to end the program in October.
 “Takeover season has returned and in a new twist, the buyers’ stock prices are also advancing in response to announced deals, enabling companies, including some of our shorts, to see gains as acquirers -- even of other troubled companies,” Greenlight wrote in the letter.
 Mallinckrodt on April 7 agreed to buy the company for $56 billion.
 Greenlight said it established a new long position in Lam Research Corp, a maker of semiconductor equipment that it believes will benefit from chip manufacturers buying more of the company’s tools as transistors continue to become smaller, and the implementation of designs becomes more difficult.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Volkswagen AG said takeovers aren’t on the agenda at the moment after both Fiat SpA and its biggest investor denied a magazine report that Europe’s largest carmaker made an approach to buy all or part of the Italian competitor.
 FiveT came to American Apparel founder and then-Chief Executive Officer Dov Charney’s rescue earlier this year, buying about half of the shares in a stock offering that the retailer used to raise cash and stave off a default.
 “This is a kind of policy-easing as the government is trying to boost buyers’ confidence,” said Liu Yuan, a Shanghai-based researcher at Centaline.
 Residents of the provincial capital of Inner Mongolia, previously limited to how many properties they could buy, no longer need to show ownership proof of home purchases.
 Non-residents will also be allowed to buy homes in the city, according to a statement on the local housing authority’s website.
 Murray is asking an Illinois court to prevent Foresight’s Williamson Energy from buying or leasing mining rights that would “interfere” with its longwall coal operations in the region, the St.
 The company also seeks to force Foresight to offer mining rights to the disputed properties and an award of “substantial damages” Williamson began buying rights to land “directly in the path” of Murray’s planned mines a year after being given access to that confidential information when the company’s Illinois coal operations were up for sale, according to a complaint filed in state court in Harrisburg, Illinois, on July 3.
 SunEdison is planning to buy Riverstone’s share of Silver Ridge’s stake in the Tenaska Imperial Solar Energy Center West project in 2016, according to the statement.
 The support from Japan, the country with the world’s biggest debt burden, is poised to exceed the level of inducements that China offers for buyers of electric vehicles.
 The subsidies would also be more than triple the rebate currently offered to buyers of Mitsubishi Motors Corp’s all-electric i-MiEV, which qualifies for a 950,000 yen subsidy in most prefectures.
 In Beijing, buyers of an EV can get as much as 114,000 yuan ($18,400) off the sticker price after central and local government rebates, while owners in Shanghai are issued free license plates that cost about 70,000 yuan for conventional vehicles.
 offers a $7,500 per vehicle federal tax credit to electric vehicle buyers.
 States also provide additional incentives: buyers in California, for example, are eligible for $2,500 rebates, local utilities offer discounted electricity and drivers are permitted to use high-occupancy vehicle lanes.
 in March announced a $95 billion accord, including paying $63 billion in cash to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac and buying back $32 billion of mortgage bonds from them.
 SapuraKencana emerged as the world’s largest operator of tender rigs last year after buying part of Seadrill Ltd’s business for $29 billion.
 agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien Plc, a maker of medical equipment.
 Attaching the lender’s renewal to government funding would force House Republicans to decide between preserving the bank -- which provides loans, loan guarantees and credit insurance to foreign buyers of US.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- The man who helped name the world’s biggest pension pool is back as one of its money managers, and says the fund’s new approach to buying stocks will rub off on other retirement investors.
 Under pressure to achieve higher returns, the 1266 trillion yen ($12 trillion) Government Pension Investment Fund changed how it buys Japanese shares in April, adding more foreign and lesser-known firms as external managers.
 Dimensional buys small-cap stocks for GPIF with the MSCI Japan Small Cap Index, with 860 members, as its benchmark.
 As GPIF moves to buy more shares, other public pensions with about 50 trillion yen in assets are set to do the same.
 A buyer may be chosen before the end of July, according to two people, with the Esas-Actera alliance best-placed to win the contest.
 The introduction of REITs will provide a new source of cash to Indian developers that have struggled to reduce debt with interest rates among the highest in Asia, while giving investors the ability to buy into the country’s property market.
 in the 1960s and are publicly traded, pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 Packer, chairman of Australia’s Crown Resorts Ltd, is in talks to develop a Las Vegas Strip resort on land once occupied by the New Frontier Hotel & Casino after buying a piece of a loan backed by the property, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 and Tshuva’s Elad Group paid $12 billion to buy the property in 2007 from Phil Ruffin and had the New Frontier hotel demolished that November.
 Oaktree’s Investment Oaktree, the world’s biggest distressed debt investor, now owns more than half of the abandoned project’s loan after buying the debt at a discount of as much as 50 percent, the people said.
 Packer, who is also developing casinos in Sydney and Sri Lanka, tried earlier this year to buy the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas hotel and casino, the Australian Financial Review reported in April.
 Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy the property.
 Authorization for the bank, which provides low-cost loans that help foreign companies buy exports from US.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Mortgage-bond buyers, facing a supply shortage as their market shrinks and trading slows, get a chance tomorrow to bid for securities at the largest auction of its type since at least 2010.
 Given insurers can’t easily buy them and the July timing of the sale, a dealer may end up holding a fair amount of the bonds, “but this has worked out well in the past,” they said.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc, which agreed this month to buy US.
 If the $25 billion deal to buy Lorillard is cleared by antitrust regulators, the transaction will bring Reynolds new brands and help it cope with a shrinking market.
 agreed to buy patents to three gastrointestinal drugs from Cosmo Pharmaceuticals SpA for about $27 billion in stock, allowing the US.
 For the combined company to be based in Ireland, the deal is structured so that Cosmo’s Irish subsidiary, Cosmo Technologies Ltd, buys Salix.
 Medtronic Inc, a medical-device maker based in Minneapolis, said June 15 it would buy Covidien Plc and take the legal residence of the Dublin-based company.
 In May, the UK’s ITV Plc agreed to buy a controlling stake in Leftfield Entertainment Group, producer of “Pawn Stars,” for $360 million.
 clinched a deal to buy All3Media in a deal valuing the company at 550 million pounds ($932 million).
 Slovenske Elektrarne’s potential buyers include Czech utility CEZ AS, whose CEO Daniel Benes said in April that he’d be open to bidding for Enel’s stake if it came up for sale.
 “The biggest failure in CEZ’s history was that we didn’t buy Slovenske Elektrarne,” Benes said in an interview with Bloomberg News.
 “CEZ is the natural first-choice buyer” Rosatom Corp, Russia’s state nuclear company, was cited as another potential bidder in media reports including Slovakia’s Sme and Hospodarske Noviny newspapers.
 While solid economic news should be pushing mortgage costs even higher, the Federal Reserve “is still buying mortgage-backed securities and treasuries, both intended to keep rates low” After a slow start to 2014, housing demand is gaining strength.
 Contracts to buy previously owned US.
 The company also agreed to buy Secusmart GmbH, a provider of anti-eavesdropping technology whose clients include German officials such as Chancellor Angela Merkel.
 Novartis said in April it would buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer business, sell its own vaccines and animal-health units and set up a consumer health joint venture with Glaxo in a set of deals worth as much as $285 billion.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- If Emily Parsitau wanted to light her home to ward off lions and intruders, she had to walk for an hour to buy kerosene at the nearest store.
 “At the moment it’s very hard for people in Africa to buy online,” MTN’s Chief Marketing Officer Pieter Verkade said in an interview.
 The incentives for people to keep paying include a phone-charging USB port and radio, which remove the need to travel to kiosks to pay for their mobile devices to be charged or to buy batteries for their radios.
 Now she uses the cash to buy treated water from a borehole.
 China is already one of Switzerland’s most important foreign trade partners and the largest buyer of Swiss industrial products in Asia.
 tumbled 53 percent, leading losses among phone stocks as France’s Iliad SA offered to buy a stake in T-Mobile US Inc.
 The Fed yesterday cut its monthly bond buying to $25 billion in its sixth consecutive $10 billion reduction.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee reiterated that it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
 Retirement funds are buying index-linked securities as their financial position improves and encourages them to switch out of stocks so they can make revenue more predictable by reducing vulnerability to price swings and inflation.
 Sales of the A3 model range surged 49 percent in the first half, while Q3 SUV deliveries jumped 37 percent and the Q7 SUV won 21 percent more buyers.
 The compact range, which includes the A-Class hatchback and van-like B-Class as well as the new CLA four-door coupe and GLA SUV, won 24 percent more buyers.
 “I came here to buy bread because it seems that this war is rolling though in the end, there will be a truce,” he said.
 “They’re the largest player, and they’re gaining share,” said Youssef Squali, an analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald, who rates the stock a buy.
 Apollo needs holders of at least 75 percent each of Verso’s second-lien and subordinated bonds to agree to an exchange that will reduce the company’s debt, allowing it to close a $14 billion deal to buy Miamisburg, Ohio-based NewPage and avert bankruptcy.
 Mercuria agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s commodity business for $35 billion.
 PBC, which planned to use the Agence Francaise de Developpement funds to buy cocoa beans and build sheds and depots for the current season, expects to conclude a deal in the next harvest, Joseph Osei Manu, deputy managing director responsible for finance and administration, said in an interview in the capital, Accra, yesterday.
 Accra-based PBC is looking to cut repayment costs on the loans it needs to buy the chocolate ingredient as profit after tax in the six months through March dropped 45 percent to 39 million cedis ($11 million), it said April 29.
 “It’s very easy to see what’s going on in the world from the markets we attract” With violence continuing in Ukraine and President Vladimir Putin pushing to reduce reliance on the West, wealthy Russians are buying fewer high-end goods from furs to Ferraris, and doing less business with the city’s law firms and investment banks.
 “The sanctions have ended that business” as wealthy Chinese prefer chauffeured cars and African buyers are more restrained in their spending, he said.
 to buy unlisted PetroChina Kunlun Gas Co, the two people said, asking not to be named as the discussions aren’t public.
 China Petroleum & Chemical Corp, known as Sinopec, and ENN Energy, offered HK$153 billion to buy China Gas in 2011, at a multiple of 15 times, a deal which ultimately failed.
 “As stock indices hit new highs, there are those that fear further gains, given defensive positioning, but more worry about buying in now just in time for a severe pullback,” New York-based Levkovich wrote.
 “Whilst the pace of ongoing decline at mechanical and electrical engineering is a concern, the market should take some comfort from the fact that the remaining 90 percent of the business is on track,” analysts at Liberum in London, including Joe Brent, wrote in a report to customers, reiterating a buy recommendation on the stock.
 Continued job growth and greater balance between supply and demand will be needed to bring some potential homebuyers back into the market.
 The number of Americans who signed contracts to buy previously owned homes unexpectedly declined in June, falling 11 percent from the month before, figures from the National Association of Realtors showed yesterday in Washington.
 Talisman last year solicited offers for its half of the Eagle Ford operation but couldn’t find a buyer in part because Statoil wasn’t ready to sell, people familiar with the matter said in May.
 Traders are buying up protection against a potential drop in Time Warner stock, wary of risks including the board’s resistance to a merger and potential antitrust issues.
 Adding Wagner may signal more deal-making under Cook, who has stepped up the pace of acquisitions since becoming CEO, culminating in a $3 billion deal in May to buy headphone maker and music-subscription service Beats Electronics LLC.
 made a fourth offer to buy Shire Plc, raising the price to about 301 billion pounds ($515 billion) in an effort to force negotiations.
 may also be interested in buying Shire, analysts have said.
 TeliaSonera AB and Tele2 AB advanced after the Swedish company agreed to buy Tele2’s Norwegian business.
 cut its rating on the stock to neutral from buy and lowered its full-year profit estimates for 2015, 2016 and 2017 because of higher-than-expected costs needed to increase subscribers.
 The brokerage said volume for exchange-traded derivatives will remain weak, and the German exchange operator will struggle to buy back shares or increase dividends in the near term.
 Helvetia Holding AG said it will buy a majority stake in Nationale Suisse, valuing it at about 18 billion Swiss francs ($2 billion).
 raised its rating on the shares to overweight, similar to a buy recommendation, from neutral.
 Nomura values the Media-Saturn chain at 3 billion euros, and “anything above that is a positive” Customers still want to go to electronics outlets to feel the weight of a camera or laptop, or compare items side by side, said Gupta-Chaudhary, who recommends buying Metro shares.
 The $13 billion would buy the Navy 12 Boeing Growlers, according to the committee.
 Austal could also stand to gain from the additional $200 million included to buy another High Speed Vessel.
 It will use the money to refinance debt at lower interest rates, retiring notes that are secured by power plants and eliminating restrictive covenants that may limit its ability to buy or sell assets.
 Calpine is essentially losing all significant covenants and that would allow them in the long term to do more asset sales, juice up buybacks or pursue M&A deals” Investor Demand Brett Kerr, a spokesman for Calpine, said he couldn’t immediately comment on the company’s bond offering.
 A measure of the strength of junk-bond covenants that are written into offering terms to protect buyers is about the weakest since Moody’s Investors Service started tracking the data in 2011.
 The power producer is seeking to buy back some or all of its $320 million of 8 percent bonds maturing in August 2019, according to a statement yesterday.
 “It gives them additional flexibility in terms of being able to buy and sell assets,” Shea said in a telephone interview.
 “If you’re thinking about buying a home, it’s a pretty good time,” said Brian Jones, senior US.
 OCBC is trying to buy Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 OCBC, which won regulatory approval for the deal last month, is buying Wing Hang because it offers a foothold in a growing international hub for yuan trading.
 In April 2008, minority shareholders of Pacific Century Premium Developments Ltd, then 16 percent-owned by Elliott, blocked a buyout by parent PCCW Ltd.
 OCBC has already met its most important goal -- buying more than half of Wing Hang, CEO Tsien said in the interview.
 Giving shoppers the opportunity to play with products virtually can make them more likely to buy, he said.
 “With some of them you end up looking like a painted doll” Makeup Genius lets customers be more experimental with cosmetics, widening what they might buy, said Rudd, who expects L’Oreal to develop similar applications for skincare and haircare.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Wall Street banks, burned by commitments to fund leveraged buyouts before the credit crisis, are reducing the chances they’ll be stuck with junk-rated loans again by getting investors to take on that risk.
 During the financial crisis, banks were stuck holding $200 billion of loans financing buyouts including KKR & Co’s takeover of First Data Corp.
 During the buyout boom of 2006 and 2007, banks were sometimes paid an additional fee on top of their underwriting payment when they were forced to commit to financings for several months before acquisitions would close, according to Arcella.
 Barclays Plc led a group of banks arranging a $2175 billion term loan this year for Ortho-Clinical Diagnostics to fund the company’s buyout by Washington-based Carlyle.
 Investors who buy CLO slices receive interest payments.
 Cybercrime StubHub Scam Leads to Arrests in US, London, Canada, Spain StubHub, EBay Inc’s online ticket exchange, was targeted by hackers who used stolen passwords and credit card numbers to buy and sell thousands of tickets for pop-music concerts and Yankees games, New York authorities said.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy mortgages and package them into securities on which they guarantee payments.
(Corrects spelling of Advent in headline) July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Advent International Corp, the $32 billion Boston-based buyout firm, said it engaged William Johnson, the former HJ Heinz & Co.
July 8 (Bloomberg) -- The soybean crop in India may tumble to a five-year low as the weakest monsoon since 2009 delays planting, potentially boosting cooking oil imports to a record in the world’s largest palm buyer.
 “I want them to say sorry” Tesla had contacted Zhan in 2012 about buying over the trademark, according to an e-mail provided by Zhan that’s written in Chinese by a Tesla employee on behalf of Diarmuid O’Connell, who is in charge of business development at the automaker.
 They met in November that year in Hong Kong, where Tesla offered $50,000 to buy the trademark, Zhan said.
 jobs data, and that’s a reason to buy Japanese stocks,” said Naoki Fujiwara, Tokyo-based chief fund manager at Shinkin Asset Management Co, which oversees about 640 billion yen ($63 billion).
 MetLife in June announced its first stock buyback since 2008, saying it would repurchase as much as $1 billion of common stock.
 Kandarian had refrained from buybacks while preparing for the prospect of increased oversight from US.
 Sotheby’s sold it in 1999 for $11 million to an anonymous buyer.
 automaker has surprised analysts with strong sales in its home country as well as in China, consumers in Canada aren’t buying as many Chevys and GMC trucks.
 There are 14 analysts with buy ratings, five with holds and three with sells, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “This increase was primarily attributable to a stronger market” and buyback agreements with Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd.
 Just one of six analysts has a buy rating on the stock, with the rest rating it hold.
 “If you offer free Wi-Fi in certain areas, you make it more attractive to come to those areas, stay longer and buy more,” said Levin, who helped create the FCC’s 2010 National Broadband Plan.
 Verizon added some of that debt to buy Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in its wireless unit offering as much as $51 billion in extra interest to get the record $49 billion sale done in September.
 He declined to discuss the store’s price, buyer or possible uses for the property.
 Hotel Plans Lawyers representing an unidentified party interested in buying the Hustler store visited the Community Development Department of the City of West Hollywood to discuss a conversion of the site into a hotel “a couple of months ago,” said John Keho, assistant director at the department.
 Just three weeks later, buyers started rushing back to the United Arab Emirates’ 48 brokerages.
 Even though they don’t have the same belief in how long this recovery will last, many have returned to their old habits” Leveraged buying, the dominance of retail investors and concern over corporate governance are exposing the vulnerabilities of a market that rose almost threefold in the past 18 months.
 A 22 percent drop in stocks last month, driven in part by the central bank’s warning that the property sector is overheating, has almost been reversed in July as investors resumed the buying on bets troubled builder Arabtec Holding Co.
 The selloff was exacerbated by margin calls, or offers by banks and brokerages to offload stocks to pay back some of the money that was borrowed to buy them, according to both Yasin and Rantisi.
 Aabar is in talks to buy at least half of former Arabtec Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik’s 2885 percent stake, a person with knowledge of the situation said today.
 “If the retail investors are dominant, then it is their buying and selling patterns that tend to dictate the day-to-day trend in the market,” Hann said by phone from London July 15.
 During mortgage-backed securities sale negotiations, he lied to buyers and sellers, falsifying prices and keeping the difference for his company, the US.
 Even with the decline, the estimated pace would indicate buyers are still responding to a recent drop in mortgage rates.
 “I have no idea who pays my bills and I don’t care” Austin has received several offers to buy his company and says selling it is out of the question.
 Activist Investing Hohn is well-known for his activist investing, buying large stakes in companies and pressuring management to make changes that might drive up the share price.
 “All investors know that at times like this, you don’t sell, you actually buy,” Tusch-Lec said by phone on July 10.
 Of course, the debt-underwriting party may not go on forever, especially in a market where buyers are starting to push back.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- Cooper Tire & Rubber Co’s failure to honor terms of a buyout agreement doomed a $25 billion sale of the US.
 Apollo originally offered to buy the US.
 Chinese Opposition Officials at the Chinese joint venture who opposed the deal denied Cooper executives access to tire-making facilities in that country and refused to provide financial records demanded by Apollo as part of the buyout.
 Apollo officials also argued that Cooper’s mishandling of labor negotiations with the United Steelworker’s union left it unable to satisfy the buyout agreement’s terms.
 The changes, to be put into effect in two years, will force funds that cater to institutional investors and buy corporate debt to abandon their traditional $1 share price.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore exports to China from Australia’s Port Hedland declined from an all-time high last month amid record stockpiles at ports in the world’s largest buyer of the steel-making raw material.
 Stockpiles at ports in China reached a record in June and provided buyers with a quick source of supply, according to Morgan Stanley.
 Stockpiles assure consumers of supply should they choose not to negotiate in the seaborne market, turning so-called pricing power in the favor of the buyer, Morgan Stanley said June 12.
 Meda said today it agreed to buy Rottapharm for about 212 billion kronor ($31 billion) to add consumer-health products that aren’t subject to pricing negotiations with governments.
 Tesco, based in Cheshunt, England received warrants to buy as much as 10 percent of the reorganized chain’s equity, and Fresh & Easy got a 225 percent stake.
 The Yucaipa buyer also offered to take on some of Fresh & Easy’s liabilities, valued at about $130 million.
 “The market is at attractive levels and needs consolidation and sideways movement to confirm the bottom, but buyers seem to be more assertive at these levels” The UAE.
 Deals Wachtell Lipton Advises in Gtechs $47 Billion IGT Acquisition Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz advised Gtech SpA, which agreed to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in cash and stock, uniting the world’s largest provider of lottery systems with the biggest slot-machine maker.
 to develop its delivery infrastructure and buy technology companies, Bansal said.
 “The buyers are entrepreneurs, and they understand entrepreneurial capitalism, and they have a vested self-interest in not messing with the editorial” Forbes, a two-time US.
 Forbes was originally seeking at least $400 million when it hired Deutsche Bank AG to run the sale after receiving interest from potential buyers, a person familiar with the matter said at the time.
 The family got a $400 million buyout offer from fashion publisher Conde Nast in 2004, which it turned down because it wasn’t high enough, according to Pinkerton’s book.
 Picking up the pieces are licensing firms whose sole mission is to buy castoff patents and then demand royalties from other companies in a strategy to make a profit.
 “There’s a whole industry of buying and selling patents,” said Innography Chief Executive Officer John Martin.
 One Canadian dollar buys 9317 US.
By Devin Banerjee July 14 (Bloomberg) -- KKR & Co, the private-equity firm led by George Roberts and Henry Kravis, agreed to buy a stake in hedge fund BlackGold Capital Management LP as it continues to grow beyond buyouts, said a person with knowledge of the deal.
 KKR, like competitors Blackstone Group LP and Carlyle Group LP, has diversified its business beyond leveraged buyouts, in part by acquiring stakes in hedge-fund firms.
 Blackstone in February did its first such deal, using client funds to buy a piece of Senator Investment Group LP.
 Hill in February said Blackstone intends to “dominate” the practice of buying stakes in hedge-fund firms.
 After Chengdu Tianqi outbid Rockwood to buy Talison, it agreed to sell a 49 percent stake in the mine to Rockwood.
 “With no exclusivity agreement in place and a ‘for sale’ sign officially on Rockwood with only a minimal premium, we believe there may be other potential bidders” McNulty, who recommends buying Rockwood shares and doesn’t rate Albemarle, didn’t identify any companies that may make competing bids.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- EBay Inc’s online ticket exchange StubHub was targeted by hackers who used stolen passwords and credit card numbers to buy and sell thousands of tickets for pop-music concerts and Yankees games, New York authorities said.
 Elton John Two of the Russians stole personal data online and used it to buy tickets on StubHub for events including Elton John and Justin Timberlake concerts, the “Book of Mormon” on Broadway and prime seats at Yankees Stadium, Vance said.
 Vadim Polyakov, 30, and Nikolay Matveychuk, 21, are charged with using stolen data to buy the tickets, according to a statement from Vance’s office today.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Sankaran Naren studies the Indian weather bureau’s website about four times a day to help decide the bond-buying plans for the $20 billion of funds he oversees.
 Airbus’s most loyal buyer for the A380 is Emirates, with 50 in service and a total of 140 on order, almost half the backlog.
 One of these firms, Tata Realty and Infrastructure Ltd, is already looking to buy distressed road assets.
 Apache, responding to pressure from activist investor Jana Partners LLC, said it’s exiting two liquefied natural gas projects and may seek a buyer for its international assets, a decision that’s “consistent with the company’s ongoing repositioning for profitable and repeatable North American onshore growth” For Occidental, domestic oil production climbed 65 percent to 278,000 barrels a day for the second quarter, with output from Permian Basin in Texas increasing more than 21 percent, Chief Executive Officer Stephen Chazen said in a statement.
 The company continues to seek a buyer for its Middle East assets.
 The company said on May 9 it agreed to buy oil broker PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 Separately, London house price rose at their slowest pace in 15 months in June and values are expected to fall as the BOE attempts to cool the property market deter buyers, the Royal Institution of Chartered Surveyors said.
 That will keep the long end of the Treasury curve in a lower range than it would be otherwise” Fed officials said their bond-purchase program would end with a final reduction of $15 billion in buying at their October meeting if the economy progresses as they expect, according to minutes of the central bank’s June 17-18 meeting.
 As large investors such as American Homes gain access to lower-cost capital and develop greater management efficiencies, they will be positioned to buy smaller operators, said Singelyn, whose Agoura Hills, California-based company owned 25,505 homes at the end of the first quarter.
 Now that housing prices have rebounded 26 percent from their post-recession trough in March 2012, some single-family landlords are seeking buyers for their properties.
 and buyout firm KKR & Co, “ran into a little bit of a problem because they didn’t have the scale, having 1,350 homes or so, to be able to compete for financing capital with players like ourselves,” Singelyn said.
 Taking Stock “The pool of available buyers is relatively small relative to a very large pool of potential sellers,” Stelmach said in a telephone interview.
 “When we look at potential sellers, and those sellers who will accept stock as a form of payment for their homes, they’ll want to partner with the best operators or the stock that trades with the best prospects of going up” Singelyn said his company will continue to buy about 2,000 homes per quarter one by one at foreclosure auctions and in the open market.
 The now-bankrupt Petroplus Holdings AG closed sites across the region after struggling to find buyers, while France’s Total SA accepted union demands, promising not to shut any sites until next year.
 or European Union economic sanctions, and the company started to look for buyers for its US.
 has agreed to buy Severstal Columbus in Mississippi and AK Steel Corp.
 as a potential buyer for a medical nutrition unit, a person familiar with the matter said.
 Hospira, a Lake Forest, Illinois-based maker of injectable drugs, appears to be the most likely buyer, the person said.
 Salesforce, a San Francisco-based maker of online customer-management, support and HR software, may buy companies in Germany that make cloud-computing applications or help customers integrate them with their existing computer systems, Benioff said in Munich, where he’s scheduled to give a keynote address at the company’s Salesforce1 customer conference today.
 Apple agreed to buy Beats for $3 billion in May, its biggest-ever acquisition, with founders Dr.
 agreed to buy Muscle Milk maker CytoSport Holdings Inc.
 agreed to buy Michael Foods Inc.
 The company’s agreement to buy Benicia, California-based CytoSport is subject to conditions, including the receipt of regulatory approvals, and is expected to close within 30 days, according to the statement.
 plans to buy shares in Mota-Engil Africa, a construction company that will begin trading in London next week, to tap into demand for building spurred by the energy and mining industries.
 The company paid a premium on its record-breaking $49 billion bond sale in September, which was used to help fund its buyout of Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless.
 Bouygues Telecom, France’s third-largest mobile operator, was looking for a buyer as profitability and cash generation declined, before revealing last month plans to eliminate 17 percent of its workforce.
 “What happens if policy changes and investors head for the exits? Low liquidity means the door is getting smaller” In credit, the RBS model gauges daily trading as a percentage of bonds outstanding, dealer inventories and the gap between what it costs to buy and sell a US.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- Bill Ackman, chief executive officer of hedge fund Pershing Square Capital Management LP, said Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc’s offer to buy Allergan Inc.
 That can change effectively overnight” Pershing Square has teamed with Valeant in its bid to buy Allergan, the maker of the wrinkle treatment Botox, amassing 97 percent of Allergan’s shares.
 During today’s call with investors, he said Allergan’s board may take “value destructive actions to thwart the offer,” including bidding to buy another company for $10 billion or more without investor approval.
 Valeant Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 40 companies since he took the helm in 2008 as he aims to make Valeant one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers by the end of 2016.
 as the most scrutinized foreign buyers of American assets, CFIUS said in its most recent annual report to Congress.
 agreed to buy the drugmaker for 5248 pounds ($8980) a share.
 SolarCity installs rooftop solar systems for customers who typically pay little to nothing up front and sign long-term agreements to buy the electricity.
 Higher wages giveAmerican households the wherewithal to withstand recentincreases in food and gasoline costs that had chipped away atbuying power.
 and DBO Partners to contact potential buyers and gauge interest, Reuters reported unnamed people as saying.
 Alstom will also buy GE’s rail-signaling operations for about 600 million euros.
 Canada Pension and other pension plans would probably jump at the chance to buy the stake from SNC, said Durand and analysts such as Canaccord Genuity’s Yuri Lynk.
 “There are large strategic buyers out there,” Lynk said in a telephone interview from Montreal.
 BBC America is probably worth about $200 million, according to Amy Yong, an analyst at Macquarie Securities in New York, similar to the value of Fuse TV, which NuvoTV agreed to buy earlier this year.
 consumers restraining discretionary spending since it was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout put together by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital at the peak of the last takeover boom in 2008.
 WellPoint today raised its full-year forecast for earnings except certain items by 20 cents, to $860 or more per share, as the industry starts to see gains from customers buying new insurance plans through the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act known as Obamacare.
 The industry is adjusting to life under the 2010 health-care overhaul that levies fees on them and adds coverage requirements, and also offers subsidies to help people buy their products through new state- and US-run marketplaces.
 WellPoint said those buying Obamacare plans in the second quarter were younger than those who purchased coverage earlier in the year, an indication a late surge of enrollees could help profits.
 The offshore oil-services provider increased its share buyback by $200 million as it posted better-than-projected profit and sales.
 “Coal means families can buy homes and put food on the table -- mining companies are the largest taxpayers in Moffat and Routt counties,” Kinkaid said.
 In January, Liberty Global agreed to buy Dutch cable provider Ziggo NV for 49 billion euros ($66 billion) after gradually boosting its holding.
 The company, which is 39 percent owned by Fox is in talks to buy Fox’s Italian and German units.
 Debt-Funded Buyout With almost twice as much earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization than debt, PetSmart’s leverage ratio may be low enough for a debt-funded buyout, the data show.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 EBay doubled its buyer base in Russia last year, Jones said, without disclosing the sales volume for 2013.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Grupo BTG Pactual, the only investment bank publicly traded in Brazil, agreed to buy Assicurazioni Generali SpA’s Swiss private-banking unit for 15 billion Swiss francs ($17 billion) to help build a global private-banking platform.
 Louis who rates the stock buy and doesn’t own any, said in a phone interview before the results were released.
 Share Buyback Occidental is also trying to sell a 40 percent stake in its Middle Eastern business to raise cash for drilling and share buybacks, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 The company has 21 buy ratings and 11 holds from analysts.
 The obvious one to buy it against is the euro” The pound was little changed at 7919 pence per euro at 5:13 pm.
 “They’ve been buying longer-dated paper on the flight-to-quality,” CIBC’s Tucci said.
 The company is the second in the region 3i is considering for sale, with the London-traded buyout firm also holding talks with advisers about options for inspection and testing business Inspecta, two people with knowledge of the talks said today.
 By buying the technology, the US.
 The company, led by Chief Executive Officer Ginni Rometty, spent $37 billion on buybacks in the three months starting in April.
 With the second-quarter buybacks, IBM has surpassed the $50 billion in repurchases the company projected in 2010 that it would spend through 2015.
 They have gained 26 percent this year, aided by the buyback campaign.
 The buybacks were about 37 percent more than the company spends annually on research and development.
 Free cash flow doesn’t include buybacks.
 “The long-term ability to keep doing the buybacks could diminish if you don’t see free cash flow spike back up,” Daryanani said.
 producer of nuclear power, agreed to buy fuel-cell power plants with 21 megawatts of capacity that Bloom Energy Corp.
 SoftBank advanced 23 percent, providing the biggest boost to the Topix, after a report the wireless carrier reached an agreement to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 “The supply-and-demand balance is clearly a plus, as there are expectations that public pensions and the Bank of Japan may be buying,” said Shoji Hirakawa, chief equity strategist at Okasan Securities Co.
 Industrial Output “There’s no strong reason to buy Japanese shares, but it’s rising to make up for the five-day fall last week,” said Yoshihiro Okumura, a general manager at Chiba-Gin Asset Management Co.
 The Bank of Japan started a two-day policy meeting today, with all 34 economists surveyed by Bloomberg expecting the monetary authority will maintain the pace of its monthly bond-buying.
 to buy T-Mobile from Deutsche Telekom AG, the Nikkei newspaper reported.
 After holding an auction, Park Hill recommended RCP accept an offer from Strategic Partners Fund Solutions, a firm Blackstone acquired last year from Credit Suisse Group AG that buys fund stakes, said the people, who didn’t disclose how Blackstone’s offer compared with the other bidders.
 The reality is the seller is very sophisticated, and that Blackstone and Park Hill ran a thorough process with many bidders” The deal shows how Blackstone risks becoming vulnerable to conflicts of interest as it expands beyond its traditional private-equity funds into advisory and buying stakes in funds from other investors.
 In the final days of Ramadan, the nation’s shopping malls and bazaars are packed as people buy clothes or material for traditional outfits and purchase everything from pineapple tarts to flower arrangements as they prepare to welcome visiting relatives, some returning from abroad for the holiday.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Airbus Group NV is seeking to persuade some buyers for its A380 superjumbo that they should take the double-decker earlier in order to fill delivery slots that remain open as the plane struggles to find customers.
 The A380 has become an increasingly tough sell for Airbus, with no buyers so far at the air expo, where a test aircraft participated in the daily flight displays.
 That makes it harder for Airbus to move forward buyers.
 Airbus must know who the buyer is about nine months before any delivery to complete the cabin work.
 Dubai-based Emirates, the largest airline by international traffic, has been the planemaker’s most loyal buyer, coming back several times with repeat orders that now represent 140 jets, almost half the total volume.
 Blackstone acquired the Strategic Partners unit last year from Credit Suisse Group AG, expanding its traditional buyout business to include the practice of buying and selling stakes in private-equity funds.
 The group is investing its fourth real estate fund after starting to buy property fund stakes in 2000, according to the statement today.
 airlines, each disclosed plans to return cash to shareholders through dividends or share buybacks.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- Traders are betting Danone will buy baby-formula maker Mead Johnson Nutrition Co.
 Going out and buying scale by buying Mead Johnson doesn’t solve the problem” It’s conceivable that if Danone doesn’t buy, it could get bought.
 “Options can include M&A” China Growth Rather than buying Mead Johnson, he’d prefer that Danone raise its almost 10 percent stake in China Mengniu, which has a market value of $95 billion, as well as pursue deals with other Asian dairy producers.
 “It’s important to buy local-based producers as China will also shift to declaring these sectors key strategic industries,” which may limit opportunities to purchase them in the future.
 “I would probably prefer the company do bolt-on deals and use any additional funds in, say, a buyback, which would be a sure signal that it regards its own stock as undervalued” Yakult would be another possible acquisition target for Danone because it already has a 20 percent stake in the Japanese company, according to Fabio Fazzari, an analyst at Equita SIM in Milan.
 BRF Executive Officer Claudio Galeazzi said the division, which the company is selling so it can focus on meat, would provide foreign buyers with instant scale in a market with high barriers to entry.
 Still, buying Mead Johnson would be a “strategically good investment,” Fazzari said.
 Price gains have moderated since Chief Executive Leung Chun-ying imposed the latest round of curbing measures in February last year, adding onto taxes to deter overseas buyers and speculators.
 “At first, it was difficult not to buy Russian medicines,” Krivitskaya said.
 Blanket Policy “A blanket no-buy policy on Russian goods, such as gasoline and natural gas, among Ukrainian households is impossible,” Sologub said.
 Gas War Serhiy Vovk, the 36-year-old head of the Center for Transport Strategies, a Kiev-based research institute, said the only thing from Russia he used to buy was gasoline for his car.
 Even my three-year-old son knows now that I won’t buy him something if it’s a Russian product” The anti-Russian mood can be seen along Kiev streets, where T-shirts and tote bags with anti-Putin slogans have become a hit.
 Made-in-Ukraine Alina Kocharovska, the daughter of a Kiev-based designer and maker of leather goods, said the number of clients who buy their $100 handmade leather bags and shoes has risen by half since March.
 “It’s very trendy now to buy Ukrainian-made goods,” she said at the showroom on the second floor of a residential building in downtown Kiev.
 But they come here and want to buy our shoes.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Breitburn Energy Partners LP agreed to buy QR Energy LP for about $167 billion in stock and cash, saying it would become the largest master-limited partnership that produces mostly oil.
 Before joining Perkins Coie, both were partners at Reed Smith LLP in Pittsburgh focusing on the representation of buy-side clients such as investment funds, financial institutions and treasurers of public corporations.
 The forecasts don’t include any contribution from the acquisition of Fusion-io Inc, which SanDisk said it was buying for about $11 billion on June 16.
 currency into Chinese yuan to purchase shares in Shanghai, without first buying Hong Kong dollars, he said.
 The buyer wasn’t identified.
 may buy 20 of Boeing’s 737 Max single-aisle jet and six 777 wide-bodies, while BOC Aviation Ltd.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- The self-proclaimed godfather of the aircraft-leasing industry enjoys an edge over other buyers of Boeing Co.
 “Otherwise, exiting the market is an option worth thinking about” While Nestle is far bigger than the American market leaders, it’s unlikely to buy either.
 Nestle declined to comment on whether it has ever considered buying Stover or Lindt, but executives have long said the company aims to be No.
 JPMorgan lowered its rating to neutral from overweight, similar to a change to hold from buy, citing the recent rally in the stock.
 advised investors to buy the stock.
 JPMorgan raised its recommendation on the stock to overweight, or buy, from neutral.
 “I don’t think the market is overpriced, but investors just don’t have catalysts to buy further” The Topix rebounded 11 percent from a May 21 low on signs the economy is weathering an April sales-tax increase and amid optimism Japan’s $12 trillion pension fund will buy more domestic stocks.
 The parties settled, with Mylan buying a license to sell a generic version of the drug, the judge wrote.
 Fed Effect The dollar index tumbled 04 percent on June 18 after Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen said the central bank plans to keep its interest-rate target low for a considerable time after it ends bond-buying.
 BAE has sought to make itself less reliant on British and American defense spending by establishing five other “home markets” around the world while seeking to boost civil sales and develop or buy new technologies in areas such as cyber-security.
 is in talks to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II, an owner of about $3 billion of medical properties in the US.
 The potential buyout is the latest for real estate companies seeking to take advantage of the growing demand for medical services and senior housing as the US.
 health-care REIT by market value, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 Caesars is suffering from a slump in gambling revenue and is struggling to restructure debt from its $307 billion buyout by Apollo and TPG Capital in 2008.
 “Middle America buys annuities, not rich people,” said Stan Haithcock, an annuity salesman in Ponte Vedra Beach, Florida.
 jumped 75 percent after the watchmaker said it will buy back about 125 billion yen ($123 million) in shares.
 Saunders built up the pipeline, buying Aptalis Pharma to add treatments for gastrointestinal ailments and cystic fibrosis.
 Polar Opposites “Generics are all about being savvy with patent litigation and settlements,” while with branded drugs, “customers are not so much the buyers, it’s the physicians and managed-care companies,” Davis said.
 Actavis has been the most active buyer of drug companies since January 2011, making $355 billion of purchases, including the Forest acquisition, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Bigger crops also increases the chances of lower costs for buyers including Tyson Foods Inc.
 The companies are building a platform for collectors and first-time buyers to browse and purchase collectibles including art, jewelry and fine wine, according to a statement today.
 Sotheby’s and Ebay are seeking to tap a growing number of customers that are buying art online, with such sales projected to reach $13 billion by 2020, the companies said.
 Colgate shares are a good bet because it sells products that people need to buy even when economic growth slows, according to Lauren Lieberman, an analyst at Barclays Plc in New York.
 Comcast told the FCC in April it could offer advanced video services and spread high-speed Internet service without harming competition if it’s allowed to buy Time Warner.
 to buy DirectTV for $485 billion also “presents competitive concerns,” Dish said in the FCC filing.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Gulf Capital, an Abu Dhabi-based private-equity firm, is considering an initial public offering in what would be the UAE’s first listing of a buyout firm, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 El Solh, a former Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette leveraged buyout executive, declined to comment on the plans when contacted by Bloomberg News.
 banks to fail the Fed’s annual stress tests this year, preventing the firm from increasing dividends and boosting stock buybacks.
 Recent surveys suggest the property market may be cooling as rising prices stretch affordability and expectations of a BOE interest-rate increase as early as this year deter buyers.
 Bank of America resubmitted a capital plan in May, saying it scaled back an initial request to raise the dividend to 5 cents a share from 1 cent and to buy back $4 billion of stock.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Suez Environnement, Europe’s second-biggest water utility, will buy the 24 percent stake in Barcelona water company Agbar that it doesn’t already own from La Caixa for stock and 299 million euros ($404 million) in cash.
 and Siemens AG’s agreement in May buy most of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy assets.
 Temasek agreed to buy 25 percent of the retail arm of Hutchison in March for HK$44 billion ($57 billion), which pushed back plans for an initial public offering for the unit.
 It followed up with another acquisition in Africa in earlier this year, buying a stake in Nigerian closely held energy company Seven Energy International Ltd.
 Satghare initiated coverage of Latham, New York-based Plug after the close of trading yesterday with the equivalent of a buy rating and an $8 price target, saying the company is likely to increase sales to existing clients, and is also well-positioned to reach the European market.
 lessor said it would buy as many of 24 of the planes, which were grounded after an engine blowout and have struggled to win orders.
 The buyout firm is paying “just over” eight times adjusted earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization for the last 12 months through June, Solvay said in a statement today.
 Chief Executive Officer Jean-Pierre Clamadieu is delivering a deal ahead of a year-end deadline to announce a buyer for the business, as he looks to enhance the Belgian company’s focus and profitability.
 last year to find potential buyers for the stake, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Lonmin may contemplate buying Anglo American Platinum’s stake in the two companies’ Pandora joint venture, which Lonmin operates, Magara said.
 The world’s largest producer is seeking a buyer for the stake and other assets, it said July 21.
 With the benchmark Shanghai Composite Index down 66 percent from its peak in 2007, the government has been opening up its capital markets by doubling the daily trading band of the yuan and allowing foreign investors to buy the nation’s shares through Hong Kong’s stock exchange.
 Iraq resorted to buying Russian fighter jets only because the Pentagon has been too slow in delivering promised F-16s, Faily said.
 “Our first choice was to buy American-made F-16s,” Faily said.
 Gol Linhas Aereas Inteligentes SA, the biggest Brazil-based airline, said yesterday it’s considering flying regional routes, a step that would require buying smaller jets than its Boeing Co.
 Neeleman said in an interview last week that he intends to buy 30 updated Embraer SA jets to expand Azul’s fleet in part to meet new demand he expects under subsidized flying.
 is poised to buy $26 billion of jet engines from a General Electric Co.
 The 200 Leap-1A engines would outfit 100 Airbus Group NV A320neos that American agreed to buy in 2011, said the people, who asked not to be named because the talks are private.
 Reynolds American Inc, 42 percent ownedby BAT, this month agreed to buy Lorillard Inc, leaving theUS.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Vornado Realty Trust is leading a partnership to buy the retail portion of the St.
 Three analysts have a hold ratings, while one advises clients to buy the shares.
 Homeowners are more likely to buy a solar system than lease one if they’re not worried about maintenance, Billy Parish, founder and president of Oakland, California-based Mosaic, said yesterday.
 Now homeowners buying systems with loans can be similarly covered by Enphase, a Petaluma, California-based solar provider, Parish said.
 Homeowners considering panels may seek loans through Mosaic’s website to buy systems with little or no money down.
 Deals Streak This month, Twitter also agreed to pay almost $100 million to acquire TapCommerce, which targets people on mobile phones or tablets with ads for items they’ve expressed interest in buying around the Internet, urging them to complete the purchase.
 Fed officials have said their bond-purchase program would end with a final reduction of $15 billion in buying at their October meeting if the economy progresses as they expect.
 The market is about as one-way as ever and buyers are accepting yields that are hovering around the lowest level since 2007 relative to benchmark Treasuries.
 In high yield, though, there’s not as much of a consensus about whether these securities are good buys.
 Fed Stimulus At a time when the Federal Reserve holds about a fifth of outstanding Treasuries, and insurance companies to sovereign-wealth funds are hoarding investment-grade notes, it’s getting harder to find top-tier debt to buy.
 As some buyers get pushed out of high-grade and into junk, those yields are plunging.
 Investors are buying whatever they can find, betting that it’s better to be in a broad US.
 Any acquirer of Fleury would have to make an offer to buy out the minority shareholders’ stakes at the same price paid to the controlling stakeholders.
 Now, in addition to pipeline giants like Kinder Morgan Energy Partners LP, the ranks of publicly traded partnerships include Blackstone Group LP, the leveraged-buyout firm.
 Investors should buy the shares as a probe into former parent company head Zhou Yongkang signals an anti-graft campaign is close to coming to an end, Citic Securities Co.
 “Some of them doubled or tripled the value of the assets by putting them into an MLP,” said Gheit, who rates Hess a buy and doesn’t own the shares.
 As investors buy new shares such as Samsung Everland, “they will have to sell other stocks, since there is limited money piling into the market these days,” Lee said by phone on July 9.
 While credit still shows signs of froth -- with new funds to buy junk-rated loans popping up left and right -- investors are increasingly anxious about when the market will turn.
 After all, it’s paid off to be a buyer in pretty much every selloff since the 2008 crisis, and Yellen has signaled she plans to keep benchmark interest rates near zero for a while.
 “We expect a positive reaction to this strong set of results, particularly the surprise profit in Europe, something investors place outsized importance upon,” wrote Ryan Brinkman, an analyst at JPMorgan Chase & Co, who rates the shares the equivalent of buy.
 in Chicago, who rates Ford the equivalent of buy.
 who rates Tesla a buy.
 Reaching China Model S deliveries to China, the world’s largest auto market, started in April and as many as 1,000 people there may have received cars in the quarter, according to analysts Brian Johnson of Barclays Plc, who rates Palo Alto, California-based Tesla the equivalent of a hold, and Wedbush Securities’ Craig Irwin, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 Magnit has five buy, five hold and one sell recommendation, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The SEC’s rules require all exchanges and brokers to connect to one another to ensure that investors receive the best available prices when they buy shares.
 The so-called “maker-taker” model pays rebates to traders who stand ready to buy or sell shares as needed, while charging those on the other side of the transaction.
 “We plan to keep the distributors in surplus for the years to come so they have enough money to buy electricity and provide power to Delhi,” he said.
 Beazer Pre-Owned has acquired more than 1,300 rental houses since 2012 with $100 million in initial backing from investors led by buyout firm KKR & Co.
 “It’s all about finding alternative ways to continue to grow” REITs, private-equity firms and hedge funds have spent at least $20 billion to buy as many as 200,000 US.
 The largest buyers, such as Blackstone Group LP, have slowed acquisitions as home prices climbed and their focus shifted to efficiently managing thousands of properties scattered across several cities.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court inLos Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team for arecord $2 billion.
 Great-West is seeking to buy firms or their assets that would make it a bigger player in pension management, capitalizing on fee income from the baby boomer generation that’s looking to earn returns for retirement.
 “It has been growing its assets under management -- the problem is that it’s not translating into bottom line profitability,” said John Aiken, Toronto-based analyst at Barclays Plc, who rates the stock a buy.
 The agency, called Prepa, uses the lines of credit to buy fuel.
 It used $416 million from reserves to pay bondholders $4176 million on July 1 after raiding $100 million from its capital fund in May to buy fuel.
 Telecommunications services revenue in the region is forecast to increase by about a quarter during the same period, making up a 112-billion-euro market, as more people buy mobile phones, the researcher said.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Failing to buy AstraZeneca Plc with the drug industry’s largest-ever deal hasn’t stopped Pfizer Inc’s Ian Read from looking far and wide for acquisitions.
 “You’d be hard-pressed to find another IPO that’s had a four-day run like this one right out of the gate,” said Minneapolis-based Anderson, who recommends buying the stock.
 Kindred offered this week to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva after the company rebuffed two takeover bids, a change in strategy to try to force the company to enter talks.
 That’s the most Kindred can buy without triggering a “poison pill” takeover defense as it seeks to force a deal with Gentiva.
 The service has said it may buy as many as 100 of them in a program that may top $55 billion, generating billions of dollars in revenue for the contractor chosen to build it.
 The company has struggled to cope with a slowdown in gambling and a debt load of more than $23 billion, the result of a 2008 leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 Bright agreed to buy a 60 percent stake in British cereal maker Weetabix Ltd.
 Ltd, a group of Indian state-run metal and mining companies, will buy the assets, the London-based producer said today in a statement.
 of China Ltd, China’s biggest producer, dropped a bid to buy 60 percent of SouthGobi for C$925 million.
 Turquoise Hill will maintain a 26 percent stake in SouthGobi after the deal, the buyer said in its statement.
 to buy coking coal mines overseas.
 A slow land-buying process, environmental objections and elevated interest rates are among the other impediments.
 LP (KKR) are among buyout firms that have been approached to form a consortium for the Dublin-based firm, which changed ownership six times since 1999, said three people, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 Fortress, which bid with Italian asset manager Prelios SpA, offered to buy the company including its bad loan assets, said one of the people.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- The Bank of Japan’s low-interest loan program has spurred buying of higher-yielding sovereign debt.
 The gauge has risen 16 percent this year as the BOJ continues to buy about 7 trillion yen of government notes a month.
 “As long as banks lend, they can get double the amount of funds to buy whatever they want,” said Bank of America’s Fujita.
 Institutional Landlords Bulk buyers such as Blackstone Group LP and American Homes 4 Rent as well as small investors have underpinned local markets after the crash and helped underwater borrowers with investments in homes that may have otherwise stood empty, according to Jed Kolko of Trulia Inc.
 “Lenders have become much more uptight, and this is a big problem for the person who wants to buy a starter home,” Willen said in an interview.
 Shareholding Changes Edelman held 78 percent of the company after the initial transaction, buying shares from founders Rui, Steven Cao and Howard Hong, it said in the statement.
 Provident Financial retreated 2 percent to 2,156 pence after Berenberg downgraded the shares to hold from buy.
 First-time homebuyers took advantage of easier financing and interest-rate reductions as the country joined the single European currency.
 Kalantonis said his bank will negotiate with distressed borrowers to restructure their loans or offer to let them stay in their properties and pay whatever they can while the lender seeks a buyer for their homes.
 Investors buying bitcoin-related Web addresses in hopes of a fast resale are fueling a domain-name boom.
 The Arlington, Virginia-based company, which sells more than 140,000 products in transactions using bitcoins and other virtual currencies, is refusing to buy bitcoinshopcom, whose owner is asking for $100,000, he said.
 owners of the i3 can buy the charger, about half the size of a standard refrigerator, for $6,548.
 Kicillof’s comments came as a group of international investment banks met with Elliott and the other so-called holdout creditors to propose buying securities they own from an earlier default in 2001, according to a bank official who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 In May, JPMorgan agreed to buy about $5 billion of government bonds that Argentina gave to Spanish oil producer Repsol SA as compensation for the takeover of its local unit in April 2012.
 The loans cover a funding gap between the commodity companies’ payments to suppliers and the receipt of payments from buyers.
 Molchanov rates Exxon the equivalent of a buy and doesn’t own the shares.
 The company, which has a market value of $432 billion, has 14 buy ratings from analysts, 13 holds and five sells.
 recommended investors buy shares of the maker of mining and construction equipment.
 Citigroup lifted its rating on the Glasgow-based company to buy from neutral, citing its exposure to positive trends in the oil and gas market, and possible merger and acquisition activity.
 said today it agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 Wheeler’s proposal falls short of reserving the authority the rules would need to survive legal challenges, and the fast-lane proposal threatens to let big companies buy superior access, crowding out small startups, according to Union Square Ventures’ Grossman.
 Startup financiers, including Ron Conway and Om Malik, told Wheeler in a May 8 letter that the Internet “will no longer be a level playing field” if established companies can buy faster speeds.
 CCTV, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8 operating system.
 CNH Industrial NV, the maker of Iveco trucks, is “viewed as a potential suitor” for DAF, which may cost about $25 billion to buy.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Oversea-Chinese Banking Corp, which is buying Wing Hang Bank Ltd, achieved the “most important thing” by gaining control of more than 50 percent of the Hong Kong lender, Chief Executive Officer Samuel Tsien said.
 OCBC, as the Singapore lender is known, will forge ahead to garner more Wing Hang stock even as hedge fund Elliott Capital Advisors LP buys shares of the Hong Kong bank, Tsien said in an interview in Singapore yesterday.
 Bakala’s BXR Mining NV, which owns a majority of NWR, would buy 75 million euros ($102 million) of the new shares, the company said.
 In May, the company agreed to sell $31 billion of Texas oil and gas assets to Encana Corp, and announced a day later it would use part of the proceeds to buy stakes in deep-water Gulf of Mexico projects from Apache Corp.
 Occidental had been trying to sell 40 percent of the operations to a group comprising the governments of Oman, Abu Dhabi and Qatar, people have said, to raise cash for drilling and share buybacks.
 and Oman Oil were seeking to buy the stake, people with knowledge of the matter had said.
 Business Secretary Vince Cable brushed aside calls for a tighter public-interest test on takeovers following Pfizer Inc’s abandoned attempt to buy AstraZeneca Plc.
 supermarket chain, agreed to buy online retailer Vitacostcom Inc.
 Saab, based in Sweden, announced this week that it plans to buy ThyssenKrupp AG’s submarine-making unit.
 The coup has kept some institutional money managers from buying because of restrictions preventing them from investing in countries with military rulers, said Thanomsak Saharatchai, the head of research at KT Zmico.
 The 29-year-old psychotherapist in Beverly Hills, California, considered buying a Mercedes, but said the model she test drove “felt like I was in a Honda” Yaymadjian ultimately settled on a black A3 with black leather seats, taking delivery in April for about $38,000.
 A buyer willing to spend $30,000 on a car can now add Mercedes and Audi to a shopping list that includes the Ford Fusion, Chevrolet Malibu and Honda Accord.
 Mercedes has an advantage in that its parent can resort to discounting and other ways to incentivize buyers, said Toprak of Carscom.
 “Mercedes buyers respond to lease deals and if Benz goes very generous on them, they may attract additional buyers,” he said.
 They have a lot of resources” Even so, Audi has the loyalty of younger buyers on its side.
 The median age of an Audi buyer is 51, compared with 52 for BMW, 56 for Mercedes and 62 for Lexus, according to Strategic Vision.
 ‘Very Disappointed’ “I would be very disappointed if the administration believes the answer to dealing with companies going offshore is to make it harder to be an American company,” Portman said, adding that the proposal would encourage companies in other countries to buy US.
 Each share came with a warrant to buy one half of a share for 85 cents that expires in August 2019.
 Research firms such as Gotham City, Prescience Point and Muddy Waters LLC study a company’s financial statements and try to profit by borrowing shares and selling them with the aim of buying the stock back at a lower price and pocketing the difference.
 Verso, owned by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC, needs bondholders to agree to a debt-reducing exchange in order to close a $14 billion deal to buy NewPage Holdings Inc.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- As takeover talk swirls around Talisman Energy Inc, the chief executive gave prospective buyers a hint today about what he reckons his company is worth: more than the market thinks.
 or Softbank buying Yahoo! Inc, according to a Forbes report.
 Jefferies downgraded its recommendation on the game-console maker to hold from buy and reduced its price target on the shares to 12,400 yen from 19,000 yen.
 While Russia’s already slowing economy will be further pressured by the sanctions, there may still be pockets of opportunity for stock buying among companies that depend on domestic consumption, according to Mirae Asset Global Investment.
 Unlike recent Internet takeovers that helped buyers branch into new services, this merger would mimic the GrubHub deal by bringing together two very similar businesses -- and reduce marketing and overhead expenses so significantly that CRT Capital Group LLC sees the combined entity getting close to turning a profit.
 This could pave the way to these companies becoming more profitable more quickly” Stock Surge Zillow is seeking to buy Trulia for as much as $2 billion in cash and stock, according to people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 It’s possible that a technology giant such as Google could someday look to buy Zillow, said Macquarie’s White.
 The Tel Aviv-based company is in talks to buy three malls in Sao Paulo and is looking to double the number of shopping centers it owns in Brazil, part of a global strategy to snap up prime commercial property in densely populated cities and sell off suburban assets.
 “These are good long-term investments,” Ella Fried, an analyst at Bank Leumi who has a buy rating on Gazit-Globe shares, said in a telephone interview from Tel Aviv yesterday.
 Four out of five analysts have a buy rating on the shares, which will climb 99 percent in the next 12 months to $1488, according to the average estimate compiled by Bloomberg.
 who rates Gazit-Globe shares outperform, similar to a buy recommendation, said by phone from Tel Aviv July 8.
 Bouygues Telecom, France’s third-largest mobile operator, was looking for a buyer as profitability and cash generation declined.
 Multiplus has been losing business to Smiles, which has a 36 percent profit margin, as corporate clients such as banks push to buy points more cheaply, said Felipe Silveira, an analyst at brokerage Coinvalores.
 Cheaper Tickets Smiles spent 12409 reais ($5577) per 10,000 redeemed points to buy tickets from Gol in the three-month period ending March 31, Daltozo said.
 “On average, we get tickets at a price that’s lower than the price our competitor gets from the tickets it buys” Multiplus started a study to review the way the tickets it buys from Latam are priced and will probably release its results by the end of this month, according to Daltozo, the analyst at Banco do Brasil.
 While the Fed’s debt purchases are helping to lower trading volumes by suppressing volatility, that dynamic should change as the central bank finishes its buying later this year, he said.
 Shao, who joined JPMorgan in 2009, oversaw a China expansion that included the formation of a domestic securities venture, buying stakes in a trust and a guarantee company, and establishing a locally incorporated bank.
 Inter RAO said it may need government aid or to sell its stake in OAO Irkutskenergo to buy back 314 billion rubles ($918 million) of its shares from Vnesheconombank.
 “That’s really the time when we see these higher prices” And while most airlines are buying new planes, most of them are being used to replace less fuel-efficient, older models instead of expanding fleets and flights.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Takeovers in Russia tumbled in the first half to their lowest value in four years as the crisis with Ukraine led companies to delay acquisitions and sanctions dissuaded foreign buyers.
 Andy Slavitt, the principle deputy administrator of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, would not promise that the site, healthcaregov, will be “fully ready” in November, when people can start buying insurance plans for 2015.
 “The question is how long will this traffic stay with UP and will some of it be permanent,” said Landry, who has an outperform recommendation, the equivalent of buy, on Union Pacific’s stock.
 ‘Didn’t Kill’ “It was a good quarter, not a great quarter,” Desai, who rates the shares a buy and doesn’t own them, said in a phone interview.
 Schlumberger, which has 36 buy and two hold recommendations from analysts, fell 14 percent to $113 at 5:31 pm.
 A Brazilian company and an international buyer are negotiating to acquire a significant portion of Impsa’s 810 megawatts of wind farms that either are in operation or under construction in the country, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the deals haven’t been completed.
 Airbus acted “proactively” in scrapping a deal for six double-deckers with Japan’s Skymark Airlines Inc, and is confident it can place two already-built planes with another buyer, he said.
 Enders said Airbus would be content with more repeat business from existing buyers because it’s easier to build planes and customize the interiors with proven specifications.
 Enders told analysts that Airbus’s decision to cancel Skymark’s order before installing buyer-furnished equipment such as seats and in-flight entertainment would make it easier to re-market the first two planes that had been built but not customized.
 Mattar reiterated a “buy” recommendation on the stock.
 central bank may scale back its bond-buying program, fueling investor concern that tapering stimulus would reduce capital flows to emerging economies.
 Last month, the central bank trimmed bond buying by $10 billion for a fifth straight meeting, to $35 billion, keeping it on pace to end the program late this year.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Alexander Philips joined the rush to buy foreclosed US.
 “That consolidation phase will be bigger than the original buy phase,” Tom Barrack, whose Colony American Homes is the third-largest single-family landlord, said during an interview today at Bloomberg’s Los Angeles bureau.
 The biggest buyers have slowed such acquisitions as home prices climbed, focusing on efficiently managing properties, retaining tenants, and minimizing costs.
 The debt provides leverage to increase returns on investment and buy more properties.
 The industry is being bolstered by increased demand for rentals after more than 5 million homes were lost to foreclosure and as tight lending standards limit buying.
 Beazer, which started in 2012 with $100 million in backing from investors led by buyout firm KKR & CO, was too small to compete, Singelyn said.
 “They just didn’t think they had the scale to compete effectively” The larger companies have found different ways to use their scale to reduce costs and increase efficiencies, buying paint, flooring and appliances wholesale from national suppliers, for example.
 That’s the key to this long term, keeping the houses occupied and getting out bad tenants that aren’t paying” Getting Picky While big landlords are making bulk purchases, they also are getting choosier about the homes they buy from other operators, according to Jack Bevier, partner at Dominion Group, which purchases and renovates homes to rent in Atlanta and Baltimore.
 California Homes Gregor Watson, whose Dwell Finance now owns about 5,000 rentals, has sold about 200 of the first houses he bought, mostly in the San Francisco Bay area, where prices have climbed more than 60 percent since 2009, when he began buying in the post-bubble trough.
 Almost all of the buyers were owner occupants, who pay a higher price than institutional landlords, since they don’t have expenses such as property management, leasing fees or vacancies, according to Watson.
 The negotiation process is also easier with individual buyers, said Jonathan Shechtman, portfolio manager for residential strategies at Axonic Capital LLC, a $21 billion investment firm based in New York.
 Larger firms also are diversifying strategies as the homebuying spree fades.
 and Axonic are also buying nonperforming loans to expand their holdings of rental properties.
 Instead of increasing his wager on single-family rental housing, Philips of Twinrock started buying apartments six months ago.
 Instead, investors should buy US.
 The government has said it may buy as many as 100 of the planes to replace the aging B-2 stealth bomber built by Northrop, generating billions of dollars in revenue for the contractor chosen to build the new model.
 are among buyout firms considering offers for about 50 percent of Spanish car-parking company Empark Aparcamientos y Servicios SA, according to people familiar with the matter.
 is helping Madrid-based Empark find a buyer for the stake, which may fetch as much as 200 million euros ($272 million), two of the people said, asking not to be identified because talks are private.
 Cinven agreed to buy Gas Natural SDG SA’s telecommunications unit for 510 million euros last month, and Bahrain-based Investcorp Bank BSC is working with JPMorgan to sell Spanish ceramics-products maker Esmalglass SA.
 agreed to buy for about $2 billion earlier this year, acquired software startup RakNet to make it easier to add features like chatting to video games.
 Last month, the Irvine, California-based company also agreed to buy Carbon Design Group, which has worked on products such as Microsoft Corp’s Xbox 360 controller.
 Chief Executive Officer Steven Kandarian, who last month announced the insurer’s first stock buyback since 2008, said it’s hard to commit to additional repurchases as he awaits clarity on US.
 We have to do that consistent with a regulatory environment in which we find ourselves, and as we learn more about that we’ll have more to say” MetLife said last month that it would buy back $1 billion of shares, a sum that Kandarian called “modest” The repurchase offsets the dilution of units that were converted into common stock as part of the 2010 purchase of American Life Insurance Co.
 Hartford Financial Services Group Inc, a smaller rival, yesterday increased its buyback plan to about $28 billion for this year and next.
 Randy Binner, an analyst at FBR Capital Markets, asked Kandarian on a conference call whether he could conduct buybacks beyond those needed to offset equity dilution.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- GSO Capital Partners LP, the $66 billion credit unit of Blackstone Group LP, is seeking more than 200 million euros ($272 million) for a publicly traded fund that will buy European loans and help the firm create new investment pools.
 Investors are stepping up their buying of exchange-traded funds that hold Treasuries tied to cost-of-living increases, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 interest rates will probably stay low for a “considerable period” after the central bank ends the bond-buying program it has used to support the economy.
 Banks have seen a tapering of profits in recent quarters as the Fed slowed its bond buying program and fixed-income clients made fewer bets amid low volatility.
 reached an agreement to buy its rival for $274 billion including debt.
 “Financial institutions are having to invest in securities since their lending isn’t increasing, so they’re taking a degree of risk” Investors are buying bonds from issuers with higher spreads such as Orient and Hikari Tsushin Inc.
 Borrowing Costs The BOJ’s about 7 trillion yen in monthly debt-buying has pulled down borrowing costs.
 The Beijing-based online marketplace raised $2 billion in its May IPO, making it the biggest example of a trend where mainland-based technology companies attracted buyers in US.
 Creating Interest “Investors always like to buy what’s worked,” said Greg Lesko, a New York-based fund manager at Deltec Asset Management LLC, which oversees $800 million including emerging-market stocks.
 “The loan market needs tools” to make it easier for buyers to slip in and out, Morgan Stanley analysts led by Sivan Mahadevan wrote in a July 11 report.
 Some smaller investors aren’t in a position to buy junk-rated loans and may want to go long through such a synthetic wager, according to the Morgan Stanley analysts.
 To fund them, buyers are using a little creative thinking and a lot of common stock to fuel the best quarter for global takeovers since 2007.
 For buyers with public listings, all-cash offers made up about one-third of the takeovers announced in the second quarter, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 In some cases, massive price tags meant buyers had to use shares: AT&T Inc, which ended March with just $36 billion in cash and equivalents, is paying $485 billion for DirecTV with two thirds of that in its own stock -- a move that will help protect its creditworthiness.
 tax laws, that kind of deal -- known as a tax inversion -- requires the buyer to use its shares as part of the deal.
 European Shift European buyers have made the biggest shift away from cash, the data show, with all-cash purchases falling to just 28 percent of the $88 billion of takeovers announced by public companies during the quarter, compared with 68 percent from 2008 to 2013.
 buyers, all-cash purchases accounted for 31 percent of the $331 billion in deals announced, compared with 45 percent in the five years through 2013.
 Honda is also considering whether to continue buying airbags from Tataka, he said.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Bidvest Group Ltd, South Africa’s second-biggest company by revenue, agreed to buy the banking unit of Grindrod Ltd.
 America Movil is still analyzing which assets to sell and prefers a single buyer to create a strong competitor, he said.
 Grupo Televisa SAB may be a potential buyer for some of the assets, Lara wrote.
 technology companies may lose as much as $35 billion in the next three years from foreign customers choosing not to buy their products over concern they cooperate with spy programs, according to an earlier study by the Washington-based Information Technology and Innovation Foundation.
 The revelations affected sales in China and caused customers in other countries to hesitate when making decisions about buying products, John Chambers, chairman and chief executive officer for the San Jose, California-based company, said during an earnings conference call in November.
 Still, the M3’s fearless reputation was enough to bring in many buyers who didn’t really care how well it handled as long it impressed their peers.
 Yet the majority of buyers will go for the seven-speed automated manual, which changes the gears for you.
 Each has its own character, and the decision to buy depends on both the driver’s personality and the price point.
 Goldman Sachs repeated its conviction-buy rating on the company in a note dated yesterday, citing improving cost control, capacity growth and its strong competitive position.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA, the biggest European telecommunications investor in Latin America, said it’s in talks over a deal in Mexico, following a report that it is seeking to buy Grupo Iusacell SA.
 rose to the highest price since before a sale of the struggling smartphone maker fell apart last year, in a sign that investors are starting to buy into Chief Executive Officer John Chen’s turnaround plan.
 Kindred, based in Louisville, Kentucky, is seeking 149 percent of Atlanta-based Gentiva’s shares, the most it can buy before triggering a “poison pill” takeover defense.
 BG Group Plc advanced 2 percent after Canaccord Genuity recommended buying the shares.
 BG Raised BG increased 2 percent to 1,2725 pence as Canaccord Genuity upgraded the natural gas explorer to buy from hold.
 Wisconsin Energy announced plans to buy Integrys Energy Group Inc, owner of utilities in Wisconsin and three other states, for $57 billion in June.
 The exchanges agreed to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 Market Support While MSCI’s Lieblich says it’s unclear when China will clarify the tax rules or what policy makers’ decision will be, the fund tracker Howbuy predicts authorities will delay enforcing a capital gains tax until they’re confident shares can weather such an announcement.
 “Like elsewhere in the world, the regulators actually care very much about market performance,” Zeng Linghua, the Shanghai-based head of research at Howbuy, said in a phone interview.
 PetSmart could take on debt to buy back shares, according to Wedbush Inc.
 or a buyout by a private-equity firm, says Credit Suisse Group AG.
 that have recently been targeted by buyout firms or activists in part because of their attractive free cash flow.
 Potential Gains There are three main options for PetSmart: a leveraged buyout, a merger with Petco or returning cash to shareholders through more stock repurchases, said Daniel Johnson, of River Road Asset Management LLC, which oversees about $10 billion and owns PetSmart shares.
 A merger with closely held Petco, either as the buyer or seller could boost the stock into the $80 range, while a leveraged buyout could take place in the mid to high $70s, he said.
 retail buyout by a private-equity firm and the largest since 2007, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in a bet the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares more cheaply and pocket the difference.
 Whether the activism leads to an LBO, merger or buybacks, as long as it boosts PetSmart’s valuation it may be all the same to shareholders.
 “Normally, geopolitical risks give you an opportunity to buy back because shares tend to rebound.
 The Topix had rebounded 98 percent from a May 21 low on signs the economy is weathering an April sales-tax increase and amid optimism Japan’s 1266 trillion yen pension fund will buy more domestic stocks.
 said it agreed to buy rival messaging service WhatsApp for as much as $19 billion.
 Sky Deutschland AG added 14 percent after British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc offered to buy the German broadcaster.
 Kronen tausend985 GmbH, a subsidiary of BSkyB, offered to pay 675 euros per share for the rest of Sky Deutschland after agreeing to buy 21st Century Fox Inc’s 574 percent stake in the German broadcaster.
 As a seller of equipment to both mining and construction companies, Komatsu is particularly vulnerable to fading growth in China, the world’s second-biggest economy and its biggest buyer of raw materials.
 is interested in buying the CNN news channel if it becomes available.
 In the US, he plans to buy a regional food chain to boost its reach, he said.
 shares, but it’s not there to announce “thar lie the booty, mateys!” Rather, the jolly roger is meant to signify “caveat emptor,” or “buyer beware,” because the market operator believes there may be some sort of shenanigans involved with the stock, such as pump-and-dump spam promotions or other assorted frauds by people seeking to profit from manipulating the stock price.
 “This process just takes some time” There’s an obvious lesson to be learned from this fiasco, and it probably doesn’t need to be said, but let’s say it anyway: “Just because you see something promoted on Twitter, you shouldn’t go buy it, you should go do some fundamental research,” Coulson said.
 and Washington Capital Management Inc, the buyers said today in a statement.
 The venture, Harbour Energy Ltd, will own and operate energy extraction and processing assets, with Noble the preferred buyer and re-seller of its products, the venture partners said today in a statement.
 after the company was upgraded to a buy rating by Jefferies Group LLC.
 Yet for a buyer of a property worth more than 500,000 euros ($682,000), the kind Diallo helps build, a visa can come with the purchase deeds.
 “If I had half a million euros to buy a house all my problems would be over,” Diallo said in fluent Portuguese during an interview in downtown Lisbon.
 A reputation for discretion made Greenberg valuable to corporate raiders including Donald Trump, Henry Kravis and Irwin Jacobs when they tried to buy shares of target companies quietly.
 Chinese banks trimmed lending to developers and homebuyers in the first quarter as authorities kept liquidity tight to curb shadow financing.
 In Haikou, the capital city of the southern island province of Hainan, a number of property development sales offices were told by the local housing regulator that a limit on the number of homes a person could buy had been scrapped, Sinacom reported, without saying where it got the information.
 The Fed is scaling back the bond-buying program it has used to drive growth, and it will reduce its monthly purchases to $25 billion from $35 billion after a two-day meeting starting today, based on a Bloomberg News survey of economists.
 Policy makers kept their pledge to buy about 7 trillion yen ($69 billion) of government debt a month.
 “Investors tend to stand by to buy JGBs rather than to sell, capping yields,” said Shuichi Ohsaki, a rates strategist in Tokyo at Bank of America Merrill Lynch, another primary dealer.
 Alibaba founder Jack Ma has been buying or investing in smaller US.
 In 2010, Alibaba agreed to buy online marketplace companies Vendio Services Inc.
 moved a step closer to buying Shire Plc after the Dublin-based company said it is willing to back a fifth offer of 314 billion pounds ($537 billion) just four days before the deadline to strike a deal.
 were rumored as being interested in buying Shire, there’s little chance a counterbidder will make an offer, said Guillaume van Renterghem, an analyst at UBS AG in London.
 Trade Representative, nobody at the Department of Commerce, nobody at some congressional oversight body is saying, ‘Guys, what is going on here?’ It just puzzles me that nobody is concerned” Casey Letter Senator Robert Casey, a Pennsylvania Democrat on the Senate Finance Committee, sounded a rare discordant note this week, asking the SEC to show how it’s addressing risks for buyers of stock in Chinese offerings structured like Alibaba’s.
 Even as the industry events at the show wind down today, the manufacturers will be working to ensure that the pledges to buy planes eventually are booked as firm orders.
 MG Aviation, a leasing company, agreed to buy two 787-9, the mid-sized version of the Dreamliner model.
 Only one buyer formally expressed interest in Airbus’s competing A350 this week: Air Mauritius Ltd.
 Goldcorp also expressed interest in buying African gold mines from Newmont Mining Corp.
 of Japan will buy and operate three of the ships, according to the four people, who asked not to be identified because the order hasn’t been announced.
 Almirall SA jumped 79 percent to 1160 euros after AstraZeneca Plc agreed to buy the rights to the Spanish drugmaker’s respiratory medicines for $875 million.
 “3M is heavily investing outside the US, enhancing its growth prospects” Arnold recommends buying the shares.
 The company said last week it would buy Sumitomo Electric Industries Ltd’s 25 percent stake in a joint venture for $885 million.
 Rio Tinto gained 3 percent to 3,2025 pence after Bank of America raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from neutral, citing its valuation.
 Before XPO, he used the same roll-up strategy, buying hundreds of companies, to build United Rentals Inc.
 I want to establish us as the buyer of choice” XPO, based in Greenwich, Connecticut, said yesterday it agreed to purchase New Breed Holding Co, a closely held provider of supply-chain technology to large companies and government agencies.
 It also was because the country’s mortgage market, which had been growing, is shrinking with interest rates at a five-year high, forcing most buyers to pay cash in hard-to-get dollars.
 More than two years of restrictions on buying the US.
 Homebuyers are demanding more value for their dollars as the biggest economic contraction since 2008 and soaring inflation increase demand for hard currency.
 President Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, who in July 2012 banned most dollar purchases outright after tightening controls in October 2011, this year authorized Argentines to buy foreign currency worth 20 percent of their average monthly salaries, with a limit of $2,000 per month.
 Widening Gap At current mortgage rates, borrowers would have to pay about 7,000 pesos per month on a loan to buy a $100,000 apartment, said Roberto Arevalo, director at Argentina’s Real Estate Chamber.
 With the money he obtained from the house, he’ll buy a smaller property, on which he also expects to get at a reduced price.
 Clearinghouses such as LCH Clearnet, majority owned by the London Stock Exchange Group Plc, and Deutsche Boerse AG’s Eurex Clearing operate as central counterparties for every buy and sell order executed.
 said he’s been raising cash, selling riskier stocks and buying safer ones on concern the market is vulnerable to a selloff.
 who has a buy rating on Yahoo’s stock.
 “I am bullish on China’s travel sector for its long-term growth outlook” Guo has a buy rating on the stock with a $70 price target.
 “Its volume will keep going up at a very fast pace driven by investments in product and branding,” Hou, who has a buy rating, said by phone from Beijing July 24.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- SMBC Aviation Capital Ltd, the Japanese plane lessor, said it will buy $118 billion of aircraft from Airbus Group NV in the largest single-aisle aircraft order ever placed by a leasing company amid a surge in Asian travel demand.
 The lessor may consider buying A330neo planes at a later point, SMBC Aviation Chief Executive Officer Peter Barrett told reporters in Farnborough, England today.
 The fund used the proceeds to buy 14 million shares of Dorian LPG Ltd, according to filings.
 After his presidency, he served as a senior adviser to the Asia advisory board of Carlyle, the Washington-based buyout firm.
 Some of the schools could be attractive to buyers, said Trace Urdan, an analyst with Wells Fargo Securities in San Francisco.
 China’s banking regulator is allowing some local governments including Shanghai’s to set up asset-management companies to buy bad loans from financial institutions, said three people with knowledge of the matter who asked not to be identified.
 The Federal Reserve is expected to taper its bond-buying program for the sixth time at a two-day policy meeting that ends tomorrow.
 reiterated its buy rating, citing prospects for increased revenue at the bourse operator as China implements market reforms.
 Bank of Baroda jumped to a two-week high, sending the S&P BSE India Bankex higher, after the central bank allowed global investors to buy more shares of the lender.
 jumped 25 percent to an all-time high after agreeing to buy natural gas assets for C$100 million in cash.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc’s deal to buy Lorillard Inc.
 Opponents such as Jefferson and Emanuel say the menthol flavor makes it harder for targeted buyers to quit and vulnerable populations, particularly young black smokers, are disproportionately targeted.
 That’s more than three times the amount of dollar Islamic bond sales, which are open to overseas buyers.
 - The penalty for not buying health insurance in the US.
 cut its rating on the company to neutral from buy after the company lowered its forecast for revenue growth.
 Itochu will buy an HK$66 billion stake ($852 million) in Hong Kong-based unit CP Pokphand Co.
 Itochu will also spend as much as 110 billion yen on a share buy back over the next year, the company said in its filing.
 The cross shareholdings will help the two boost sales and cut the cost of buying raw materials as well as reduce asset running costs, Tokyo-based Itochu said today.
 Chinese and Hong Kong-listed firms last year spent the most in a decade to buy or invest in food, drink or farming assets, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 The bank helps foreign customers buy US.
 “There’s still a lot more that the ECB are expected to do and certainly they are in a much more capable position to start activating real quantitative easing in the form of buying government bonds,” said Craig Veysey, London-based head of fixed income at Sanlam Private Investments Ltd, whose parent company manages assets of about 40 billion pounds ($68 billion).
 “There’s been buying of Portugal.
 We like buying the Australian dollar versus the kiwi” A long position is a bet a currency will appreciate.
 Proceeds will help 1MDB pare its 25 billion ringgit ($78 billion) of outstanding debt after buying energy assets from Malaysian billionaire T.
 Chinese buyers, including people from Hong Kong and Taiwan, spent $22 billion on US.
 Vancouver’s real estate market has also seen the impact, having been “fueled tremendously in the last couple of years by high-end wealthy Chinese and Hong Kong buyers,” according to real estate agent Malcolm Hasman.
 CCTV, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8, and it quoted a professor calling the software a potential threat to China’s information security.
 said it’s in talks to buy the cigarette maker.
 The Benton Harbor, Michigan-based company agreed to pay $1 billion for a controlling stake in Italian appliance maker Indesit Co, its largest acquisition since buying former rival Maytag Corp.
 “My direction is clear” Manhattan Resources is buying two companies with access to mining concessions in Xinjiang, a northwestern province in China.
 backer Standard General LP is close to buying Lion Capital LLP’s $10 million loan to the retailer, avoiding a potential default, according to three people familiar with the situation.
 In buying the loan, Standard General is choosing not to let American Apparel pay the debt itself as originally planned.
 Standard General considers buying the Lion loan part of that capital commitment, so when the deal is completed there will be $15 million remaining, said one of the people.
 Charney Loan After failing to hold a special shareholders’ meeting, he turned to Standard General and borrowed $20 million to buy 274 million shares and increase his stake to 43 percent.
 Standard General also has the right to buy the shares back from Charney.
 may be interested in buying the German maker of flavors and fragrances.
 Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s agreed deal to buy Wild Flavors for 23 billion euros ($31 billion) earlier this week is spurring speculation of further consolidation in the ingredients industry against a backdrop of a limited number of larger available targets.
 + Aecom agreed to buy URS Corp.
 + Lindt agreed to buy Russell Stover Candies.
 + Whiting Petroleum agreed to buy Kodiak Oil also for $6 billion including debt.
 *** While the ECB will take longer to prepare buying of asset-backed securities as a stimulus measure, it will come to banks with cheap, easy money approaching $1 trillion to spur lending, according to Bloomberg survey of economists.
 is nearing a 25 billion-euro ($34 billion) agreement to buy Wild Flavors GmbH, a maker of natural food ingredients backed by KKR & Co, people familiar with the matter said.
 In 2011, they shot down AT&T Inc’s attempt to buy T-Mobile from Deutsche Telekom.
 TerraForm Power Inc, a solar power plant owner developed by SunEdison that sold shares last week in an initial offering, has an option to buy the plant when complete.
 Some buyout firms concluded that Nobel Biocare is too expensive to buy, the people said.
 Potential buyers include Swiss rival Straumann Holding AG, Johnson & Johnson, Medtronic Inc, Dentsply International Inc, Zimmer Holdings Inc, Henry Schein Inc, Sirona Dental Systems Inc, and 3M Co, according to the note.
 In April, Zimmer said it agreed to buy Biomet Inc.
 Potential suitors for Nobel would be buying a company whose sales and stock price still haven’t recovered from the recession and financial crisis that began in 2008.
 “A lot of companies were reluctant to go out and buy spot coal because they weren’t sure it would get delivered,” he said in a July 2 telephone interview.
 Coal buyers, producers and shippers responded to shrinking imports by idling or reallocating equipment, Kolojeski said.
 “If you are on the Atlantic Coast, you have a chance to buy imported coal,” Stevenson said.
 and Cnooc Ltd, has received two approaches from potential buyers it didn’t name, potentially complicating the merger proposal.
 Gtech SpA gained 41 percent after agreeing to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion.
 is adding Japanese stocks for the first time in at least five years, speculating they will rise as the world’s biggest pension fund buys shares and the global economy expands.
 The government has been urging the pension to speed up a portfolio review and buy riskier assets as the Bank of Japan spurs inflation that will erode the value of bonds.
 PZU Expansion The Treasury wants PZU to continue its expansion at home and abroad after buying Baltic insurers from RSA Insurance Group Plc this year, Kowalczyk said.
 “Investors are buying cyclicals amid anticipation that the federal budget will propose measures to boost infrastructure and revive growth,” Alex Mathews, head of research at Geojit BNP Paribas Financial Services Ltd, said by phone from Kerala, southern India.
 Hindalco surged 67 percent after CLSA raised its rating on the stock to buy, saying the stock will surge on a “multi-year deleveraging cycle” Tata Steel Ltd.
 Standard General already used $10 million of the money to buy a high-interest loan that was deemed in default by the lender.
 in London, who recommends buying Barclays shares.
 ‘Terrible Performers’ “The shares have been terrible performers of late so the profit beat and good progress on capital should come as a welcome relief to the market,” said Gary Greenwood, an analyst at Shore Capital, who has a buy rating on Barclays’s shares.
 The stock surged 94 percent on July 24 amid reports that the Lod, Israel-based company is in talks with an investment firm about a buyout.
 Better-than-estimated earnings help boost the prospects of a buyout, said Larry Peruzzi, a senior equity trader at Cabrera Capital Markets LLC in Boston.
 Several private-equity funds have been looking at SodaStream for a leveraged buyout, one person who asked not to be identified because the discussions are private said July 24.
 agreed to buy Total SA’s South African coal unit, the fifth-largest producer in the country, to gain expanded reserves and rights at the main export harbor for the fuel.
 Some hedge funds have turned to Europe to buy non-performing loans and lend to cash-starved companies in the region, said Sudhir.
 “A lot of the distressed guys have moved away from high-yield that has more volatility and into these areas” Global Challenge Firms that deploy distressed strategies are navigating the same challenges as the rest of the hedge-fund industry as central banks globally push down benchmark interest rates, reduce volatility and encourage investors to buy riskier assets.
 The company, formerly called TXU Corp, was the largest leveraged buyout.
 in 2010 agreed to pay a $78 million civil fine to settle claims that some stores in California and Nevada allowed criminals to buy cold medications that were used to make methamphetamine.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago entered the debate over whether financial markets are fair, proposing limits on high-frequency trading firms and incentives to bring more buying and selling into public view.
 Tutor is buying the company from Charlesbank Capital Partners LLC, a Boston-based private equity firm.
 She declined to name the buyer or the reason behind the sale.
 The developments have “stiffened” lawmakers’ resistance to buying the US.
 advanced 16 percent as Deutsche Bank AG advised investors to buy the stock.
 lender to buy from hold.
 lowered its recommendation on the Milwaukee-based motorcycle maker to market perform, the equivalent of hold, from strong buy.
 “We’re very much focused on what’s going on in the market in terms of transitioning from traditional brick-and-mortar to e-commerce” Bain Capital LLC and Advent International Corp, both private-equity firms, agreed in March to buy Ballerup, Denmark-based payments processor Nets Holding A/S for about $31 billion to expand in Scandinavia.
 Imperial is lining up $7 billion to buy some brands that Lorillard and Reynolds would sell off to assuage any concerns raised by the US.
 In return, Rosneft has the option of buying into Exxon’s portfolio of exploratory projects in the US.
 investor sued to block its $25 billion acquisition by Reynolds American Inc, claiming the deal favors the buyer.
 The Zurich-based insurer plans to buy Itau Unibanco Holding SA’s high-risk insurance business in a Brazil deal announced July 4 for about $685 million, and also expanded in nations such as Mexico and Thailand.
 Sklar recommends buying the shares.
 “As we get closer to the Fed tightening, the front end remains under pressure” Lederer said investors should sell shorter-term Treasuries and look to buy longer-dated debt when prices decline.
 Ader recommended buying five-year notes versus 10-year securities if the spread moves back to more than 80 basis points.
 Ajani doesn’t have a university degree, he should be given one” Ajani founded Cosmo in 1997 after buying a contract manufacturing business on the outskirts of Milan from Parke Davis, now part of Pfizer Inc.
 She rates Cosmo a buy.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA’s sale of zloty-denominated asset-backed securities targeted foreign buyers for the first time, clearing the way for more issuers seeking lower borrowing costs, according to Citigroup Inc.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said on June 5 the monetary authority will buy “simple and transparent” notes backed by non-financial private sector assets to boost lending.
 “When you go into a situation like that you have to accept that the state is going to participate” The changes to the 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
 The company expects about half the car’s buyers to be 55 years old and over.
 The boxy Mercedes A-Class in 1997 became known as a car for pensioners rather than wooing younger buyers as planned.
 ‘Downright Bullying’ Britain’s 50,000 pubs are split into three parts: managed outlets, controlled by companies like Wetherspoon; tenanted or “tied” pubs, where the property is run by individual tenants who pay rent and buy their beer from a corporate landlord such as Punch Taverns; and free houses, which operate independently.
 Founder Peter Borg-Neal uses the same meat supplier as royal residence Windsor Castle, and spends about 1 million pounds refurbishing the pubs he buys, adding dining rooms, cozy outdoor areas and services like Orderella, a smartphone ordering app.
 Santander said in April it would offer to buy back about 25 percent of its Brazilian unit in a share transaction valued at 47 billion euros.
 A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces a PetroChina subsidiary to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project in northeastern Alberta, based on a 2010 agreement.
 Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc, Britain’s largest government-owned lender, agreed to sell its remaining stake in its buyout unit to Adams Street Partners LLC in May, while HSBC Holdings Plc hired Campbell Lutyens & Co.
 Citic Pacific is raising funds through share sales in order to buy $36 billion of assets from its state-owned Chinese parent.
 is in talks to buy what could be the South African oil and gas company’s first production asset, Chairman Tito Mboweni said.
 SacOil is buying assets in Nigeria and has operational blocks in Malawi, Botswana and Democratic Republic of Congo, whose government has opened up dozens of exploration blocks.
 “This comes a bit earlier than the market expected, but given that it’s a high-growth bank and the industry is challenged by margin compression and asset-quality deterioration, it’s better to be prepared,” said Zheng Chunming, a Shanghai-based analyst at Capital Securities Corp, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 “The preferred shares can alleviate the financial pressure on the bank and enhance its return on equity, and the common shares are necessary but not urgently required,” Huang Jie, a Beijing-based analyst at China International Capital Corp, wrote in a note today, maintaining a buy rating.
 Ping An Insurance plans to buy 45 percent to 50 percent of shares in the banking unit’s latest sale, while its asset-management unit agreed to acquire 50 percent to 60 percent of the preferred shares, according to yesterday’s statements.
 Swift returned to the stock market in December 2010, more than three years after co-founder Jerry Moyes took the company private in a leveraged buyout valued at $27 billion.
 CCTV, the national broadcaster, said a provincial government was told not to buy computers with Microsoft’s Windows 8 operating system.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Public Service Enterprise Group Inc’s solar unit agreed to buy a 13 megawatt project from Juwi Solar Inc.
 Malaysia Weeps In the final days of Ramadan, the nation’s shopping malls and bazaars are packed as people buy clothes or material for traditional outfits and purchase everything from pineapple tarts to flower arrangements as they prepare to welcome visiting relatives.
 The new arm is initially seeking clients for a fund of funds that will invest in the New York-based firm’s buyout, real estate, credit and hedge funds.
 The average pension fund has almost 20 percent of its money allocated to alternatives such as buyout and hedge funds and endowments devote 26 percent, while the comparable figure for wealthy investors averages 2 percent to 3 percent, he said.
 Carlyle, taking a different approach to wooing individuals, last year created a pooled vehicle that employs Central Park Advisers LLC to allocate capital committed by investors to various Carlyle buyout funds.
 Credit Suisse Group AG set up a Direct Equity Partners program that will enable private-banking clients to back individual buyouts, as well as real estate and venture capital transactions, on a deal-by-deal basis, according to a separate SEC filing last month.
 agreed to buy Itau Unibanco Holding SA’s high-risk insurance business for 152 billion reais ($684 million) to become the biggest property and casualty insurer in Brazil.
 Ace is buying Itau Seguros Solucoes Corporativas SA, which provides property and marine coverage for large corporate accounts, the Zurich-based firm said today in a statement.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Suzano Papel e Celulose SA, the company with the cheapest stock in Latin America, is a buy at Banco Bradesco SA and Coinvalores on prospects a new plant will bolster earnings at the Brazilian paper maker.
 The company is considering selling bonds to buy back more expensive debt and extend maturities, Chief Executive Officer Walter Schalka said in a May 12 telephone interview from Sao Paulo.
 “With a more significant contribution from the Maranhao mill, pulp volumes should show progress” Bradesco Corretora is among the 11 firms out of 17 tracked by Bloomberg that have a buy recommendation for Suzano’s shares.
 will pursue its offer to buy Australand Property Group for about A$26 billion ($24 billion) in the Singapore real estate company’s biggest proposed acquisition after trumping a bid by Stockland.
 “It would be damaging if they lost the NBA” He has the equivalent of a buy rating on Time Warner.
 will give the combined company 30 million TV subscribers, while AT&T Inc’s bid to buy DirecTV will give it a total of about 25 million subscribers.
 Surpluses may further erode Chicago futures that have slumped 12 percent from a peak in April, cutting costs for buyers including Dallas-based Dean Foods Co.
 Stricter Rules Global imports for whole-milk powder more than doubled since 2008 as the economy grew in China, the most-populous nation and biggest buyer.
 agreed to buy its three existing hydro-power plants valued at $17 billion.
 withdrew an agreement to buy two of Jaiprakash’s plants, the Indian company said in a July 24 statement, citing a change in the strategy of the Abu Dhabi company, known as TAQA.
 Reliance has agreed to buy Jaiprakash’s Baspa and Karcham Wangtoo plants in the northern state of Himachal Pradesh and the Vishnuprayag plant in neighboring Uttarakhand, according to the statement.
 to seek buyers for Proserv Group AS, a supplier of equipment for undersea oil drilling, according to people familiar with the matter.
 The group is attracting interest from other private-equity investors and Goldman Sachs is offering financing to potential buyers, one of the people said.
 IBM and USAA, based in San Antonio, worked for about nine months to develop the tool to answer questions specific to customers leaving the military, like whether to seek out veteran’s benefits or how to buy a home, said Eric Engquist, assistant vice president of military transitions at USAA.
 ‘Conscripted Consumption’ Last week, Richard and Ackman said distributors at Herbalife clubs use false promises of riches and a fraudulent training program to force poor Latinos to buy weight-loss shakes one at a time.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Spain’s 30 billion-euro ($41 billion) plan to buy heavy armament, including Krauss-Maffei Wegmann GmbH’s Leopard battle tanks, will put the country’s defense budget under pressure, according to a report from opposition party UPyD.
 Figee said investors are being drawn by the prospect of cost-cutting that may result should ASR buy Reaal, and of a future rise in interest rates that would increase the value of insurance companies.
 Users can also buy coupons and enjoy group discounts in the same way as on Groupon Inc.
 The company also said it will renew a share-buyback program, regardless of the outcome of its Time Warner offer.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- Public Service Enterprise Group Inc’s solar unit agreed to buy a 36-megawatt photovoltaic plant in Vermont from closely held Juwi Solar Inc.
 “I think investors expected headwinds,” said Colin Gillis, an analyst at BGC Partners who has a buy rating on EBay’s shares.
 who recommends buying the stock.
 Carlyle, like peers Blackstone Group LP and KKR & Co, has diversified its business beyond traditional leveraged buyouts by bolstering assets dedicated to real estate and credit investments, reducing reliance on volatile LBO earnings.
 All of Carlyle’s funds from which it can collect a slice of profits, including buyouts, real estate, energy and certain Global Market Strategies pools, appreciated 5 percent in the quarter.
 The value of buyout holdings at private-equity firms affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric depends on quarterly “mark-to-market” valuations of those investments.
 European Gains European investments helped boost Carlyle’s earnings, with the firm collecting carried interest, or its share of deal profits, from its third buyout fund dedicated to the continent.
 GAAP Income Carlyle, like other publicly traded buyout firms, reports profit that differs from US.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Deal Volume Carlyle completed the highest volume of deals among global buyout firms in the second quarter, according to Credit Suisse research, investing $34 billion of its funds’ equity.
 leveraged buyouts, a $13 billion pool that finished gathering capital in November.
 ’Strong Fundraising’ David Rubenstein, who shares Carlyle’s chief executive officer title with Conway, said he expects to finish raising the firm’s fourth Asia buyout fund and its first international energy fund above their targets in the third quarter.
 Graham Brown, an analyst at Canaccord Genuity, raised his recommendation on the shares to buy from sell, “reflecting the improving prospects the business has demonstrated” with better than expected organic growth and more work ahead.
 remains our main focus” Parker, 45, also sees potential in financial services, where Capita is buying Crown Mortgage Management Ltd, a processor of residential and commercial loans, for 75 million pounds.
 The stock, which trades at about $10, or 40 percent below the value of its holdings, could double if the assets perform as expected and the company buys stock at discounted prices, the New York-based firm wrote.
 GSO Capital Partners LP, the credit unit of Blackstone Group LP, raised 2605 million euros ($350 million) this month for a fund to buy European loans and invest in CLOs after Marathon Asset Management created a CLO equity fund, according to a regulatory filing.
 Now he faces another crisis as a plan to buy Airbus Group NV A380 jets turns sour.
 “Concerns about the airline’s finances are coming to the fore with the news of Airbus’s cancellation” Nishikubo, who took flying lessons and became a pilot after purchasing his stake in Skymark, said yesterday he still wanted to buy A380s.
 International Flights He announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 The company was taken private in a record $48 billion leveraged buyout in 2007.
 Export-Import Bank, which helps foreign companies buy American goods.
 Arabtec’s second-largest shareholder, Aabar Investments PJSC, is in talks to buy at least half of a 289 percent stake held by the construction company’s former Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik, a person with knowledge of the situation said July 15.
 “If Aabar decides to buy anything more than 50 percent of Ismaik’s ownership, it will be positive for the stock” The Abu Dhabi state-owned investment company is negotiating a price of 5 dirhams to 6 dirhams a share, the person said.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- Spanish and Italian government bonds climbed amid speculation the European Central Bank won’t be able to prevent banks from using its cash to buy higher-yielding sovereign debt.
 ‘Cheap Money’ “The convenience to use the ECB cheap money to buy government bonds is much less” than in a previous funding round, which started in December 2011, Draghi said in testimony to the European Parliament in Strasbourg, France, yesterday.
 Qatar Airways said it wants to buy an additional 50 of the largest twin-engine model, after firming up a deal for the same number announced at the Dubai expo in November.
 MG Aviation, a leasing company, agreed to buy two 787-9, the mid-sized version of the Dreamliner model.
 “Hedge funds have been buying them up to play with the stock, and there’s been a lot of positives on India’s economic front of late” Bond broker Orbit Investment Securities Services has facilitated trades in Suzlon’s 2012 convertible bonds at about 135 cents on the dollar, and its 2016 notes at about 115 cents over the past two weeks, Shah said by phone today.
 Espirito Santo Financial Group borrowed more than 100 million euros from Nomura to buy the shares in Banco Espirito Santo, Portuguese newspaper Expresso reported, without saying how it got the information.
 property owners with just one rental house can now get cash from Wall Street to buy more.
 investor-owned or vacation houses were without a mortgage as of last month, based on data from property-research firm RealtyTrac, implying investors in about 7 million homes could get cash-out mortgage financing to buy more real estate or make other investments.
 Small landlords have struggled to get financing until the last couple of years and most offers came with high interest rates, said Hicks, whose company advertises on billboards that say “We buy ugly houses” with a picture of a cartoon caveman.
 The lower-interest deals can come with strings, such as such as requiring an analysis of the cash flow from rents, a turnoff for many HomeVestors franchisees, who usually buy properties based only on the price, according to Hicks.
 Stagnating wages and an increase in student debt are keeping younger people from qualifying or even wanting to buy, said Laurie Goodman, director of the Housing Finance Policy Center at the Urban Institute in Washington.
 Home sales will fall this year as higher prices and interest rates limit people’s ability to buy, according to Fannie Mae economist Douglas Duncan.
 Instead it’s buying already originated loans on single assets, she said.
 It agreed to buy a 30 percent stake in an exploration block in Aruba, subject to approval by the national oil company.
 Samsung’s ascent was propelled by its ability to meet the needs of high-end customers, budget buyers and those looking for a hybrid of a smartphone and tablet computer.
 home sales as buyers start their hunt for homes and mortgages online and rely less on real estate agents, a migration that has taken longer than in industries such as music or travel.
 While Zillow is unlikely to compete directly with brokers, whose ad dollars are its top revenue source, buying Trulia gives it more command over marketing fees, sparking concerns among Realtors such as Stephen FitzMaurice that costs will rise.
 Listings, Values The companies help buyers and renters find information on homes, generating revenue by selling advertising and charging Realtors to place their listings prominently.
 He has said that the company won’t compete directly with brokers on buying and selling homes.
 “Nobody forces agents to buy advertising with us.
 About 42 percent of homebuyers last year started the process by looking for properties online, up from 35 percent in 2011, according to a survey from the Realtors group.
 Only one in 10 buyers found their real estate agent through a website.
 Broker Relationships The falling homeownership rate, the growth of Wall Street-backed landlords and the increase of houses sold at auctions are all nibbling away at the dominance of the real estate agent-buyer relationship, according to Rick Sharga, executive vice president at Auctioncom LLC, the largest US.
 “In the Internet age, consumers are going to go online for real estate information, but they will continue to rely on local experts when they buy and sell property,” the group said in an e-mailed statement this week.
 “Re/Max would take our 200,000 listings off their site” Younger Shoppers The migration away from the traditional real estate model will accelerate as younger, tech-oriented shoppers become homebuyers, increasingly reliant on the web for pricing information and services, according to Stefan Swanepoel, a consultant and author on real estate trends.
 Zillow’s advantage is using its big data capabilities to become indispensable to both buyers and sellers as “the strongest aggregator of real estate information ever created,” Swanepoel said in a telephone interview.
 If the portals become a first stop for buyers and sellers, “Zillow-Trulia becomes powerful for agents.
 is buying Abbott Laboratories’ generic-drug business and forming a new company that will be incorporated in the Netherlands.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Luis Sans, who tailors suits for former King Juan Carlos and jackets for Banco Santander SA Chairman Emilio Botin, is buying more cashmere as Spain’s recovery rekindles bankers’ desire for fine threads.
 “Our clients may have lots of money but if they aren’t confident about their business or the economy in general, they won’t buy” Lopez Larrainzar said he expects sales to increase this year for the first time since 2010 as clients, including top Spanish bankers as well as nobles and European royal family members, buy suits with a starting price of 2,000 euros.
 Martin buys his suits at Boggi, an Italian brand, and Jaime Gallo, a Madrid suit-maker whose clients have included Spain’s new King Felipe VI and bullfighter Francisco Rivera Ordonez.
 “The money has changed hands and the rich people now aren’t necessarily the same as they used to be” Gentlemen’s Suits While bankers keep buying his trademark blue and grey business suits, artisan tailors in Madrid and Barcelona face longer-term challenges, said Lopez Larrainzar.
 Several private-equity funds have been looking at SodaStream for a leveraged buyout, one of the people said.
 in February agreed to buy a 10 percent stake in Keurig Green Mountain Inc, which is developing a product similar to SodaStream’s, for about $125 billion.
 The company said today it expects a share buyback by Tsogo that formed part of the deal will be completed Sept.
 In her eyes, buying food in grocery stores was something only rich people did.
 She has turned away from buying from street vendors, choosing instead to shop for items like Nestle SA-made cereal and Unilever’s Close Up toothpaste at a Spar International outlet near the shantytown she lives in.
 While Nigerian stocks overall are cheap relative to regional peers, consumer shares have been bid up to lofty levels by international buyers including Silk Invest Ltd.
 The $82 billion of risk-sharing securities sold in the last year by government-controlled Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac can shift their losses from homeowner defaults to bond buyers.
 The Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac risk-sharing notes, tied to loans made in a post-crisis period of tightened standards and soaring home prices, have attracted buyers from mutual funds, hedge funds and real-estate investment trusts to pensions, insurers and banks, the issuers have said in statements.
 takeover attempt, is building up its respiratory business by buying the rights to Almirall SA’s lung medicines for $875 million.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Ghana’s biggest mutual fund is buying debt in the West African nation for the first time since 2011 as accelerating inflation drives up Treasury bill yields.
 Foreigners Deterred While local investors are buying the nation’s debt, foreigners have been deterred by the weakening currency, irrespective of rules that restrict overseas investors to participate only in auctions of securities maturing in three years or more.
 “It’s hard to paint a persuasive case to buy anything locally in fixed income,” Stuart Culverhouse, the global head of research at Exotix Partners LLP in London, said by phone June 20.
 He’s buying banks and reducing stakes in manufacturing companies that depend on imports and may be hurt by the cedi’s slide.
 said it would buy the drugmaker for about 32 billion pounds ($548 billion).
 The price is more than 50 percent above Shire’s closing level on May 2, before AbbVie made its first proposal to buy the company.
 agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 “It was probably the sweetener that convinced them to buy what is essentially a selection of third-tier brands” Including the Blu brand in the deal was needed to get Imperial to the table and reduced antitrust concerns from having the products in the same company as Reynolds’s Vuse e-cigarettes, said a person familiar with the matter.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Bond buyers are pouring record amounts of money into exchange-traded funds in Europe that buy debt as central bank largess boosts demand and makes investors less willing to part with their fixed-income assets.
 “They offer much greater transparency than is available in the bond market and shine a spotlight on the pricing of bonds” ‘Underlying Fragility’ Lack of buying and selling in Europe’s bond market was highlighted as a concern by the ECB and the Bank of England in their latest stability reports.
 “The vehicle of choice is going to be ETFs because you don’t need an army of traders to move your portfolio around but you can have access to a whole market segment via a single ETF” Investors poured $14 billion into the iShares Core Euro Corporate Bond UCITS ETF, which buys investment-grade corporate bonds, making the fund the most popular this year among 309 fixed-income ETFs tracked by Bloomberg.
 Emerging Markets The funds gaining the most favor invest in markets where bonds are less frequently traded and buyers have less confidence in the true price of the securities.
 Emerging-market debt ETFs were three of the seven most-popular funds by inflows, while a fund that buys junk bonds was also among the top seven.
 Vodafone gained 1 percent after winning approval from the European Union to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA.
 The European Commission said late yesterday that the British wireless carrier got anti-trust approval to buy Spanish cable operator Ono as the deal did not raise competition concerns.
 Verso, controlled by Apollo Global Management LLC, has been trying to convince second-lien and subordinated bondholders to go along with an exchange that will clear the way for its $14 billion deal to buy NewPage.
 The underwriters have a 30-day option to buy an additional 15 percent of the common stock.
 The shares, which have 13 buy and seven hold recommendations from analysts, fell 09 percent to $8172 at the close in New York.
 KKR, like larger competitors Blackstone Group LP and Carlyle Group LP, has broadened its business beyond traditional leveraged buyouts by underwriting stocks and bonds, managing funds of hedge funds, and investing in infrastructure and real estate.
 Blackstone’s buyout holdings climbed 84 percent in the latest quarter, Carlyle’s appreciated 5 percent and the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index of large US.
 The value of a private-equity firm’s buyout holdings affects economic net income because the metric relies on quarterly “mark-to-market” valuations of those investments.
 KKR’s measure of ENI, a type of accounting used by publicly traded buyout firms, differs from US.
 Brazil, Ethiopia Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 KKR in April agreed to buy Aceco TI, a Brazilian data-center business, and last month agreed to buy a stake in Afriflora, an Ethiopian flower farm.
 BNP Downgrade BNP lost 21 percent to 5020 euros after Macquarie Group downgraded the stock to neutral from outperform, which is similar to buy.
 Deutsche Bank AG upgraded the property company to buy from hold, citing the possibility of better-than-expected growth in the second half of the year and a pickup in deal momentum.
 “The ECB continues to have an easing bias and therefore investors are happy” to buy Europe’s higher-yielding bonds, he said.
 The problems will be contained and investors should consider a “cautious long” in Portuguese bonds by buying notes due in 2018 against their Spanish counterparts, according to Societe Generale SA.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Helvetia Holding AG agreed to buy a majority stake in Nationale Suisse in a transaction valuing the company at about 18 billion Swiss francs ($2 billion) to create Switzerland’s third-largest insurer.
 New buyers from China and other international markets are boosting prices for top postwar and contemporary artists, as the works are being increasingly seen as strong investments.
 Twenty-three of the 27 lots offered found buyers.
 Prices include buyer’s commission; estimates don’t.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion, pending a US.
 To boost earnings in the meantime, Rometty has also sold debt to fund share buybacks, laid off workers and slashed the company’s tax rate.
 IBM ended the quarter with $97 billion in cash on hand, even with the end of March, after spending $11 billion on dividends and $37 billion on share buybacks.
 The justices said today they will hear the energy companies’ arguments that the suits filed by natural gas buyers are pre-empted by federal law.
 “We continue to believe strongly in London” Investors have been competing to buy London office buildings to gain from rising values and rents.
 Developers that are buying buildings to demolish for new projects face stiff competition, pushing up prices, according to Thomlinson.
 Petrobras, as Brazil’s state-controlled company is known, has been using equipment on hand instead of buying new supplies, Tenaris Chief Executive Officer Paolo Rocca said on a conference call today with investors and analysts.
 $741 Million Gain Results also benefited from a $741 million gain after AstraZeneca Plc exercised its option to buy Merck’s interest in the drugs Nexium and Prilosec.
 Mobius Outlook Mark Mobius says it’s not too late to buy into the rally in Chinese stocks.
 It now competes with Facebook Inc, which tried to buy Snapchat for $3 billion last year and started its own product to send ephemeral photos and videos after being rebuffed.
 is buying Culver City, California-based Maker Studios for almost $1 billion.
 “Polls favorable to opposition candidates spurred investors to buy stocks.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- RFR Holding LLC, the investment firm that owns New York’s Seagram Building and Lever House, is in talks to buy a Berlin skyscraper that’s due to be completed in 2017, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 He wouldn’t comment on potential buyers or the price.
 Property investors are buying commercial buildings in Berlin to take advantage of jobs growth in the capital of Europe’s largest economy.
 in Kenya to expand its presence in Africa after buying a stake in a Ghanaian milk producer nine months ago.
 downgraded the stock to hold from buy.
 The online travel-booking service agreed yesterday to buy Australia’s Wotifcom Holdings Ltd.
 raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold after ADM said it will acquire Wild Flavors GmbH for $3 billion.
 Vontobel said last month it will buy back a 125 percent stake owned by Swiss Raiffeisen amid legal wrangling related to a cooperation agreement.
 Book retailers already sought a German probe of Amazon’s negotiation practices for buying rights to e-books in a dispute with Amazon over delays for deliveries of Bonnier AB physical books to force it to accept lower prices, according to a complaint filed last month.
 Schneider said today it will buy back about 6 million shares in the second half.
 The field, named after a whisky like others in the area, will be linked to the nearby Glenlivit find in which Total will buy 60 percent, the company said in a statement.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Bich Ngoc, who earns less than $60 a week and has a newborn son, cobbled together four months of savings to buy the latest iPhone so she could impress her colleagues who have older versions of the device.
 She held off buying her first iPhone until FStudio opened in Hanoi for fear of buying a fake device, a common concern among Vietnamese consumers.
 The list of potential buyers is limited to five pharmaceutical companies, according to a Jefferies Group LLC note.
 The stock extended gains after Chief Executive Officer Lowell McAdam said on CNBC that Verizon was not interested in buying a satellite company.
 Dollarama receives a handling fee and has an option to buy control of the company beginning in February 2019.
 The stock has 14 buy ratings, two holds and one sell according to ratings compiled by Bloomberg.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- China awarded Germany a quota of 80 billion yuan ($129 billion) that will allow domestic investors to buy securities in China under the Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program.
 The buyer hired VolkerWessels to upgrade it so traders could use the site as one link in a chain stretching between Frankfurt and London, Roose said.
 “Someone paid a lot of money for it” While Roose said he doesn’t know the identity of the buyer, he said Belgian government officials told him the purchase price was 5 million euros.
 He declined to name the buyer.
 last month agreed to buy BR Towers for about $1 billion, and Tim Participacoes SA, the mobile-phone provider owned by Telecom Italia SpA, has hired Morgan Stanley for its own sale of towers for about $1 billion, people familiar with the matter have said.
 Tower buyers have been drawn to Brazil as consumers in the country buy more smartphones and demand faster Internet access, prompting some companies to bid on wireless infrastructure to profit from the industry.
 Brazil-made cars and trucks are too expensive, given high labor costs and taxes, to send abroad and go mostly to local buyers.
 “There would be times when people buy it and times when they wouldn’t,” he said.
 There may be buying opportunities for investors if the referendum is rejected, Mike Sales, a managing director at TIAA Henderson Real Estate, said in an interview in London yesterday.
 agreed to buy BP Plc’s headquarters in the city for 64 million pounds, Property Week reported in March.
 “The refinancing of the emirate’s debt with Abu Dhabi, and the general outlook provides investors with confidence to keep buying Dubai assets” Dubai refinanced $10 billion of bonds owed to the central bank and a loan of the same amount due to Abu Dhabi’s government at a fixed interest of 1 percent on both, state-run news agency WAM reported in March.
 Consumers were also less enthusiastic about the buying climate, a reflection of stagnant paychecks.
 Buying Climate The gauge of the buying climate in today’s report decreased to 319 from 333 the week before.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee continued to trim asset purchases, reducing monthly bond buying to $25 billion from $35 billion and staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 “There’s nothing significant that we can see that’s changed with our customer; they’re still being conservative, they’re still buying very close to need,” Greg Sandfort, the company’s chief executive officer, said on a July 23 earnings call.
 VimpelCom Stake In January 2013, Orascom entered into an agreement to buy out Lacavera and take control of the company.
 Bill Wolfe, a Toronto-based analyst with Moody’s Investors Service Inc, said the lack of a clear exit may be a deterrent because of shorter investment timelines for buyout firms.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- Chilean builders Salfacorp SA and Besalco SA rallied the most in 10 months after politicians agreed to a tax plan that will maintain benefits for homebuyers.
 Rather than advancing money at interest, they’re buying a portion of someone’s future sales at a discount, they say, and therefore don’t have to follow state usury laws that cap interest rates or be licensed by state regulators.
 and Morgan Stanley, the second half has proven a much better time to buy during the past decade.
 The level is down from a 2014 high of 16 percentage points in January and suggests investors are demanding less compensation when buying the securities.
 “The EU’s promise to introduce its severest sanctions ever erases temptations to start buying Russian assets even at current low levels” The 14-day relative strength index for the Micex fell to 284 today, below the level of 30 which to some analysts signals the gauge is oversold.
 AbbVie has yet to secure a deal agreement with Shire Plc, which it’s trying to buy for about $50 billion.
 A lot of institutions have been buying in” Bear Market Dubai’s share gauge entered a bear market June 23 after warnings from the UAE’s central bank that the country’s property market may be overheating.
 Russian President Vladimir Putin is pivoting to Asia as a buyer of his nation’s gas to bolster the economy as relations sour with the US.
 Germany, which has been buying Russian gas for 40 years, imported 402 billion cubic meters of Gazprom’s fuel last year.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- LinkedIn Corp, owner of the largest professional-networking website, agreed to buy business-marketing startup Bizo Inc.
July 29 (Bloomberg) -- China’s banking regulator is allowing governments in five places including Shanghai to set up asset-management companies to buy bad loans from financial institutions, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The firms can buy local soured loans from banks, trust and finance companies and leasing firms, the people said.
 While Europe’s benchmark issuer has leaned on its AAA credit rating to avoid posting collateral on its debt in the past, buyers of one-way collateralized swaps and regulators are demanding more guarantees to limit risk.
 That hasn’t stopped investors from expressing interest in buying a stake, according to a central bank official.
 The Bank of Cyprus official said some shareholders are concerned hedge funds that have expressed their willingness to participate in the offering will securitize these loans and buy them at low prices.
 Market Complacency After prematurely dumping bonds last year on concern that the Fed’s tapering would send borrowing costs higher, debt buyers have grown increasingly comfortable with the idea that rates will remain relatively low for some time.
 Crossover Competitions Crossovers, first introduced in the 1990s, won over more buyers, spurring competition, Libby said.
 Younger buyers can move up from a small, entry-level car into something mid-range as they start families, while older drivers can switch to something smaller from their larger SUVs or trucks.
 Cost estimates for the $3986 billion F-35 program have climbed 71 percent in inflation-adjusted dollars since the Pentagon signed its initial contract with Lockheed in 2001, even as plans were adjusted to buy 409 fewer aircraft.
 and Italy have both committed to buy the variant, which is designed for short takeoffs and vertical landings on ground fields and aircraft carriers.
 The lingerie company said in a London trial that its brand was famous, and that its customers were young women, not the older professionals who might buy shirts and ties from Thomas Pink.
 Calbee Inc, Japan’s biggest seller of potato chips, is considering buying yogurt makers or food companies as part of its plan to diversify from its snacks-making business, Chief Executive Officer Akira Matsumoto said in an interview.
 China is the biggest buyer of industrial metalsGold declined 03 percent to $1,30295 an ounce.
 The buyer of the 400-acre (162-hectare) site at Cherrywood can build 37,800 square meters (407,000 square feet) of stores, more than 3,800 homes and about 220,000 square meters of office buildings, Savills Plc said in a statement today.
 “We’re growing and, what’s more, we’re growing profitably” First-half deliveries of the top-of-the-line S-Class more than doubled, while the Mercedes compact range, which includes recently introduced models such as the CLA four-door coupe and GLA sport-utility vehicle, won 24 percent more buyers, Daimler said earlier this month.
 New clients represented 24 percent of all buyers in the first half as the auction house expanded in Hong Kong and China.
 “There’s an increase in the buyer pool and that has increased prices.
 Our clients are buying art they love and want” Top Lot Postwar and contemporary art sales of 7999 million pounds, with fees, rose 20 percent from a year earlier.
 About 27 percent of online buyers were new.
 The companies are building a platform for collectors and first-time buyers to browse and purchase items including art, jewelry and fine wine, according to a statement.
 Sotheby’s sold 492 lots for more than $1 million so far this year and 26 percent of buyers were new clients.
 The gold producer assessed interest among possible Chinese partners in buying a minority stake in the Natalka project in the Magadan region of Russia’s far east, the people said.
 The surrendered power will need to be allocated to other buyers, Sinha said.
 is being weighed down by the inefficiency of some old coal-based plants it buys from because they consume more fuel leading to higher costs that the buyer has to bear.
 Ever since the government allowed fuel cost increases to be passed on to distributors last year, producers began buying more coal from overseas at a higher cost to plug local shortages left by monopoly supplier Coal India Ltd.
 Rising energy demand is spurring companies such as Reach Energy to buy and develop smaller oil and gas fields ignored by their larger international counterparts.
 Malaysia’s Sona Petroleum Bhd, also a special-purpose acquisition company, finalized an agreement this week to buy a stake in two Thai oil and gas blocks of UK-based Salamander Energy Ltd.
 “With the confidence of these institutions, this paves the way for us to grow the business” Blank Check Special-purpose acquisition companies, or SPACs, are known as blank-check entities as they sell shares to raise money to buy existing business that they haven’t yet identified.
 Cornerstone buyers include state-run pilgrim fund Lembaga Tabung Haji, Hong Leong Asset Management Bhd, CIMB-Principal Asset Management Bhd, MTD Capital Bhd.
 BCS, the biggest broker on the Moscow Exchange, reiterated its buy recommendation on Sberbank yesterday even as it cut its 12-month price target to 130 rubles from 15328 rubles.
 Although Sberbank remains “the most attractive” Russian bank, “geopolitical factors, sanctions and slowing economic growth remain the main risks to the stock,” Andrey Klapko, an analyst at OAO Gazprombank in Moscow who reiterated a buy recommendation on the lender, said by phone yesterday.
 ‘Easy Fixes’ “It’s not clear to me that a buyout does anything,” Sean McGowan, an analyst at Needham & Co.
 The company spent about $4854 million buying back stock in the year through Feb.
 Avondale Partners LLC said Dollar Tree faces fewer regulatory hurdles as a buyer, which may give the $11 billion company an advantage.
 “There’s hope that a strategic buyer might step in,” Dutch Fox, an analyst at FBR & Co, said in a phone interview.
 Dollar General was analysts’ buyer of choice at the time, though it has yet to make a public approach.
 “Dollar Tree kind of came out of nowhere as a contender and now as a buyer for Family Dollar,” Poonam Goyal, a retail analyst at Bloomberg Intelligence, said in a phone interview.
 “It was not the most-talked about buyer in the past” Dollar Bin The deal makes sense though, said Joseph Feldman of Telsey Advisory Group.
 and private-equity firms have also been speculated as potential buyers.
 For buyout firms, the price may be too high, said Keith Moore, an event-driven strategist at MKM.
 “The buyers could have gone on strike and not bought this,” said David Beattie, senior credit officer at Moody’s Investors Service, said by phone from Toronto.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Sales at Ames Ford Lincoln in Iowa have risen fivefold in the last 18 months as buyers embrace low-cost financing on popular models like the Fusion sedan and F-150 pickup from Ford Motor Co.
 and other automakers are luring buyers to dealerships in droves and prompting analysts, already bullish about the industry’s prospects, to issue even more optimistic projections.
 A change in buying habits is also making owning a new car more affordable over time with leasing and longer-term loans attracting buyers, she said.
 Strong sales figures over the past three months have allowed the industry to compensate for a sluggish start to the year, when frigid winter weather in the Northeast and Midwest kept buyers away from dealer lots, Caldwell said.
 The Irvine, California-based company could also take on debt to buy back shares and push up the price of its stock, he said.
 ‘Very Generous’ Ackman, whose Pershing Square took a 97 percent stake in Allergan to drive the deal, said last week that financing commitments “don’t last forever” and that the bullish conditions in the credit markets could “change effectively overnight” Valeant Chief Executive Officer Michael Pearson has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 40 companies since he took the helm in 2008 as he aims to make Valeant one of the world’s five biggest drugmakers by the end of 2016.
 “They improve the margin of the companies they buy” To contact the reporters on this story: Christine Idzelis in New York at cidzelis@bloombergnet; Caroline Chen in New York at cchen509@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Shannon D.
 Sebastian Palla, head of investment banking at Banco Macro SA in Buenos Aires, will present a proposal from members of the Adeba local banking association to buy defaulted bonds from investors who won a lawsuit for full repayment, said a bank official who asked not to be identified because she isn’t authorized to speak publicly about the plans.
 I thought maybe you always needed that amount of money to put down on a home” Minorities like Jett, who is black, have been disappearing from the ranks of homebuyers who seek and receive conventional loans backed by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, a trend that poses risks for them and for the US.
 With minorities growing as a share of the population, their homebuying patterns will have an increasing impact on housing sales.
 The decline of black and Hispanic buyers could also sap demand in the broader economy, since homeownership has been one of the best ways for Americans to build wealth.
 By 2025, minorities could make up almost half of the population between the ages of 24 and 34, when most first-time buyers enter the market, according to a June report by Harvard University’s Joint Center on Housing Studies.
 “Instead, prime African Americans are being served by FHA and more credit-constrained minorities aren’t being allowed to buy at all” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac have more resources than the FHA, an arm of the US.
 The two companies buy mortgages from banks and package them into securities, on which they charge fees to guarantee payments of principal and interest.
 Advocacy groups are also urging FHFA, which oversees the companies, to change their pricing policies and set new affordable housing goals requiring them to buy loans in disadvantaged communities.
 He required Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac to begin charging riskier borrowers more for loans, which has excluded some homebuyers with good credit scores who don’t have significant savings.
 They require that Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy a certain percentage of their loans in underserved neighborhoods.
 Republicans have blamed the goals for inflating the housing bubble, saying they forced the two companies to begin buying riskier mortgages.
 Homebuyers who receive financial education are less likely to default.
 They’re also more likely to buy a house in the first place, said Marcia Griffin, founder of HomeFree-USA, a Maryland-based homebuyer assistance organization.
 “If I’m coming in and trying to buy a home with a 660 credit score, as an example, I’m going to get the runaround half the time,” she said.
 He said he was encouraged to learn that it’s possible to buy a house with far less than the $20,000 he was originally told he’d need.
 Backflip Studios in Boulder, Colorado, has discovered that consumers who buy its apps on Amazon tend to spend 50 percent more money on in-game features than users who buy it in other Android stores, said Dale Thoms, co-founder of Backflip.
 “Authorities are saying, we’re going to buy dollars and basically lean into the wind to prevent further appreciation,” Benoit Anne, the head of emerging-market strategy at Societe Generale SA in London, said by phone on July 14.
(Corrects ninth and 10th paragraphs to reflect that Cliffs approved the Casablanca nominees purely to avoid triggering the buyback of senior notes) July 29 (Bloomberg) -- Activist investor Casablanca Capital LP said it won control of the board of Cliffs Natural Resources Inc.
 “The new Indian government is very, very determined to stop large blackouts and that’s the reason we will see electricity demand continuing to rise” Clogged Network Coal India Ltd, the world’s biggest miner of the commodity, has failed to keep pace with increasing demand, forcing power stations, aluminum producers and cement factories to buy coal from overseas.
 analyst William Katz wrote in a note today, reiterating his “buy” recommendation on the stock.
 Legg Mason agreed in March to spend as much as $41 million to buy QS Investors, a global quantitative equity firm that split from Deutsche Bank AG in 2010.
 Legg Mason agreed on July 24 to buy Edinburgh-based Martin Currie to expand into active international stock funds.
 Amazon is shipping this week its Fire smartphone, a $199 handset that lets users take a picture of a product to find and buy it quickly from Amazon.
July 28 (Bloomberg) -- Not since the bull market began has buying dips in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index been a surer way of making money.
 The consistent gains have encouraged individual investors to buy stocks.
 Revealing Strength “Willingness to buy on a dip implies confidence,” Stacey Nutt, chief investment officer at ClariVest Asset Management LLC in San Diego, California, said in an interview July 22.
 raised its forecast for growth in the Iberian nation and Societe Generale SA said it’s Europe’s “star performer” Spanish 10-year securities were set for their first weekly advance this month as SocGen analysts recommended buying the debt instead of German bunds.
 In response, the Treasury Department temporarily guaranteed shareholders against losses and the Fed began buying fund assets at face value to help them meet redemptions.
 Investors will only have to account for gains and losses once a year, instead of tracking all the prices at which they buy or sell.
 The New York-based hedge fund, which uses complex mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities, was started in 2001 by David Siegel, a former chief technology officer at Tudor Investment Corp, and John Overdeck, a former managing director at DE.
 BSkyB will buy the shares from another Murdoch company, 21st Century Fox Inc.
 The senior Murdoch “knows he’s going to be unable to buy BSkyB in the foreseeable future after the difficulties last time around,” said Roddy Davidson, an analyst at Westhouse Securities in London.
 In a statement, Fox said it plans to disclose details of a new share-buyback authorization next month.
 Rules stipulate it must offer to purchase shares from all stakeholders under the same conditions, although it may not need to buy all shares for sale.
 On July 24, after Alfa raised its stake in the company to 141 percent, Conrads said it’s a “bit surprising they keep buying” Bolanos said he thinks the most likely outcome is for Alfa and Pacific Rubiales to form a joint venture, though the odds of a takeover have increased as share purchases mount.
 for $140 million in cash to gain wireless-radio capabilities, joining an industry buying spree.
 Contracts to buy previously owned US.
 Strict credit standards are holding back some buyers who may want to take advantage of the drop in loan costs from the beginning of 2014.
 Still, he said, “there are so many more things we should be dedicating taxpayer resources to than handing it out to some select companies” Speaker John Boehner of Ohio hasn’t said how he’ll vote on the bank, which provides financing for foreign companies to buy US.
 The analyst cut MBIA shares last week to “neutral” from “buy,” a recommendation he had on the stock since at least 2011, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 soccer jersey is selling for 35 percent off in some stores in the host nation ahead of the World Cup semifinal as many fans are buying fake versions instead.
 The initial jersey price of 229 reais -- almost one-third of the monthly minimum wage -- is prohibitive for most of Brazil’s 200 million people, many of whom are buying from a “gigantic” black market of national-team apparel, Amir Somoggi, a sports marketing consultant in Sao Paulo, said.
 “There are lots of diamonds out there but that doesn’t mean Tiffany has lost its value, people still want to buy the authentic one,” Swinand said.
July 23 (Bloomberg) -- BCE Inc, Canada’s biggest telecommunications company, agreed to buy the shares of Bell Aliant Inc.
 The RBI defined affordable housing to include loans to individuals for as much as 5 million rupees ($83,000) to buy property in the nation’s six biggest cities, and 4 million rupees in other locations.
 announced plans to buy DirecTV for $485 billion three months later in response.
 13 after Comcast agreed to buy the media provider.
 central bank is done with its bond buying.
 The Fed has been reducing its purchases in $10 billion increments and is buying $35 billion of securities each month, down from $85 billion in December.
 Yields on two-year notes were about two basis points from falling to negative after European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said yesterday that risks to the region’s economic outlook are to the “downside” Spanish securities advanced even as Draghi said in testimony to the European Parliament yesterday that banks shouldn’t count on a fresh round of ECB cash to buy sovereign debt.
 The moment hasn’t yet arrived where we’ll see a sustained recovery but it’s one step closer” The Fed trimmed monthly bond buying to $35 billion from $85 billion last year, while holding the key interest-rate target in a range of zero to 025 percent since 2008 to support the economy.
 The decline may have been amplified by so-called margin calls, attempts by banks and brokerages to offload stocks to pay back some borrowed money that was used to buy them, brokers and analysts said at the time.
 Staff Dismissal Aabar, which has investments in the real estate, aviation and energy industries, is in talks to buy at least half of former Arabtec Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik’s 2885 percent stake, the person said, asking not to be identified as the plan is private.
 “Would you buy a car that you knew had been having problems and the manufacturer hadn’t been able to straighten out?” Bombardier is about 100 orders shy of its sales target for the jet, which the company has projected will garner $8 billion in sales later this decade, and so far counts only one of the world’s top 20 airlines by traffic among its buyers.
 You can shake all the hands you want, but buyers want Bombardier to show them they are going to deliver on time.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- The engine fire that led the Pentagon to ground its fleet of F-35 fighters may have been caused by an isolated flaw, according to the Defense Department’s top weapons buyer.
 on its failed hostile bid to buy Potash Corp.
 Switzerland’s Xstrata Plc made a successful bid in 2006 for nickel producer Falconbridge Ltd, the year Brazil’s Vale SA agreed to buy Toronto-based miner Inco Ltd.
 The list of potential buyers is limited to five pharmaceutical companies, according to a Jefferies Group LLC note.
 raised the Tel Aviv-based holding company to a buy from neutral and increased its price estimate to 2,600 shekels.
 Severstal has been looking for a buyer since December “so the agreement to sell those assets has nothing to do with the Russia-West tensions over Ukraine” Severstal may use the proceeds to pay dividends, which will support its share price, Kolomytsyn said.
 Case Study Reynolds, who had been preparing a case study on Crumbs for one of his classes, said he began buying the chain’s stock after CNBC reported on July 10 that Lemonis, the chief executive officer of Camping World, was putting together an acquisition offer and financing.
 “It’s not yet a time when investors are selling their investment positions in stocks, but they’re trying to hedge their tail-risk exposure by buying puts,” Eugenio Montersino, a London-based quantitative and risk strategist at Lombard Street Research Ltd, said by phone.
 The London-based bank is facing various legal battles around the world over allegations of past misconduct, with a potential bill that could rise to as much as 7 billion pounds ($12 billion) over the next four years, analysts at Nomura International Plc led by Chintan Joshi, who has a buy rating on the stock, wrote today in a note to clients.
July 4 (Bloomberg) -- Volkswagen AG will upgrade the Passat, its best-selling sedan, with safety technology inspired by fighter jets to lure buyers away from upscale nameplates.
 That means luring buyers with technology normally reserved for luxury models.
 Until the new SUVs arrive, VW needs the eighth generation of the Passat to woo buyers from BMW.
 “The inevitability of consolidation -- which would presumably feature Interpublic Group being sold at some point -- has become increasingly understood” Dentsu, Publicis Wieser, who recommends buying Interpublic shares, added that a deal could still take years to come together.
 No M&A? Following last year’s announcement that Publicis and Omnicom planned to merge, Roth said in an internal memo to employees that “as this weekend’s surprising news shows, there’s no telling what might take place, but we don’t see the need for major M&A to keep delivering on our plan to move Interpublic forward” The advertising company is the latest target for New York-based Elliott, which has been pressing for a breakup of EMC Corp, a sale of Riverbed Technology Inc, and earlier this year pushed through changes at Juniper Networks Inc, including cost cuts and a buyback.
 One technique Elliott has repeated: making a takeover offer for a targeted company to flush out higher-paying buyers.
 “Sorry can’t buy Trib group or LA Times - cross-ownership laws from another age still in place,” Murdoch wrote in a tweet yesterday, referring to US.
 Trading Range The 10-year Treasury note yield is trading in a range of 250 percent to 275 percent as the market awaits clarity on the Fed’s plans to exit bond buying under its quantitative-easing strategy, according to Sharon Stark at DA.
 Lake Forest, Illinois-based Hospira appears to be the most likely buyer for the Danone business, which makes products including the Nutrison tube-feeding system for people whose diets are restricted by illness, the person said.
 Danone earlier held talks with potential buyers including Nestle SA and Fresenius SE about the business, which could be valued at more than 3 billion euros ($4 billion), Bloomberg News reported in May.
 said it would buy satellite-TV service DirecTV for $485 billion.
 to make a $75 billion bid to buy Time Warner Inc.
 “With the economic news fairly positive and expectations high for the second quarter, the market is having a bit of a run” Individuals coming to stocks now are buying into a rally that is more than 5 years old, exceeding the average length of 41 years for bull markets since the end of World War II, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Instead, GDF Suez is studying “interesting” possibilities and will spend about 2 billion to 3 billion euros annually buying “small and medium-sized” assets in the next three years.
 “I’m a supporter of reproductive rights, but the ruling doesn’t really impact me much in terms of where I’m going to shop,” Suzie Frazier, 43, said yesterday outside a Hobby Lobby in Canton, Michigan, west of Detroit, as she prepared to buy sidewalk chalk for her son.
 Intro aims to tap London City’s corporate appeal to turn CityJet profitable after buying the former Air France-KLM Group unit in April.
 It took a step closer to becoming a national wireless operator in February after spending C$233 million ($217 million) to buy airwaves across the country.
 Carrefour last month agreed to buy back the French stores of discounter Distribuidora Internacional de Alimentacion SA as it seeks to cement a revival at home and strengthen sales in Europe, Latin America and China.
 Airbus has lined up enough early buyers to proceed, including AirAsia Bhd and several lessors, two of the people said, though a final go-ahead requires board approval.
July 28 (Bloomberg) -- Fewer Americans than forecast signed contracts to buy previously owned homes in June, a sign residential real estate is struggling to strengthen.
 Limited availability of credit and sluggish wage growth are making it harder for prospective buyers to take the plunge, threatening to throttle the pace of the housing recovery.
 A reading of 100 corresponds with the average level of contract activity in 2001, or “historically healthy” home-buying traffic, according to the NAR.
 Supply Shortage “Supply shortages still exist in parts of the country, wages are flat, and tight credit conditions are deterring a higher number of potential buyers from fully taking advantage of lower interest rates,” the group’s chief economist Lawrence Yun said in a statement.
 The housing market has been slow to emerge from a lull induced last year as rising interest rates, tight lending standards and higher home prices combined to make it difficult for some buyers to enter the market.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 Federal Reserve policy makers reduced monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10-billion cut, remaining on pace to end the stimulus program in October.
 Investors should buy the shares as a probe into former parent company head Zhou Yongkang signals an anti-graft campaign is close to coming to an end, Citic Securities Co.
 in Rye, New York, who recommended buying shares of both companies.
 have led a round of television-station buyouts.
 “If Wall Street, after poring over all known data, comes up with a target and we’re already there, and you still see individual investors buying and they’re typically the ones that are late to the party, it would seem there is limited upside,” Terry Morris, a senior equity manager who helps oversee about $28 billion at Wyomissing, Pennsylvania-based National Penn Investors Trust Co, said in a July 8 phone interview.
 “It’s going to surprise us because I still don’t think we’ve got to a point where water is boiling yet” Birinyi, one of the first analysts to advise clients to buy when stocks were bottoming after the 2008 financial crisis, predicts the S&P 500 will rise to 2,100 by December.
 will buy more gas-powered turbines in a single year than Europe in a decade, and that consolidation in the industry will benefit all players.
 Service Specialists To beef up its energy business, Siemens in May agreed to buy most of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy assets for $13 billion.
 After agreeing in May to let his wife sell the team, Sterling reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy it.
 Buying Properties Lodha agreed to buy a Canadian diplomatic property in central London’s Mayfair district in November for C$530 million ($495 million).
 “Traders were buying the rumor and selling the fact.
 They recommend investors buy the shares.
 Aabar Investments PJSC, is in talks to buy at least half ofa 289 percent stake held by the builder’s former chiefexecutive officer, Bloomberg News reported yesterday, citing aperson with knowledge of the matter.
 Quebecor, which runs the country’s third-largest cable operator and has a mobile-phone business in the French-speaking Quebec province, took a step closer to becoming a national wireless operator in February after spending C$233 million ($218 million) to buy airwaves across the country.
 In November 2013, private equity firm Advent International agreed to buy Dutch cloud-software maker Unit4 for about 115 billion euros.
 are among four bidders shortlisted to buy real estate loans with a face value of more than 400 million euros ($547 million) from Ireland’s bad bank, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Nationale Suisse shares soared to the highest in almost 25 years after Helvetia Holding AG won a bidding contest to buy the company, valuing it at about 18 billion Swiss francs ($2 billion) and creating Switzerland’s third-biggest insurer.
 agreed to buy mobile-advertising company TapCommerce, seeking to make more money outside of its main microblogging service by expanding promotions on smartphones and tablets.
 TapCommerce targets people on their mobile phones or tablets with ads for things they’ve already expressed interest in buying, urging them to complete the purchase.
 The acquisition will give advertisers “access to additional off-Twitter inventory and buying opportunities,” Alfonsi said in an interview yesterday.
 Twitter’s deal to buy MoPub for $350 million was its biggest acquisition to date.
 “Because of reduced buying of coal domestically, the price has fallen, therefore there’s less incentive to import,” Georgi Slavov, head of raw materials research at Marex Spectron Group, an energy and shipping derivatives brokerage in London, said by phone on July 23.
 China was the largest buyer of the two ores from Indonesia before the ban, according to data from the International Trade Centre’s TradeMap, a venture between the World Trade Organization and United Nations.
 He also predicts a similar process in India as steel mills buy more low-cost coking coal from Australia.
 retreated 28 percent after agreeing to buy cloud services provider ViaWest Inc.
 ‘Terrific Way’ “If you chose to buy a bucket without attributes and show up with a bag, you probably should pay for it,” Powers said.
 Bond Buying Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10-billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 Gorman’s plan relies in part on increasing dividends and share buybacks.
 The firm announced a $1 billion stock buyback plan for the 12 months ending next March and doubled its dividend to 10 cents a share.
 Workers Warned Revel, which employs about 3,140 people, told workers last month that it may be forced to close for good if it fails to attract a buyer.
 HBOS Plc, which Lloyds agreed to buy in 2008, also tried lowering its submissions to make itself look more attractive financially.
 *** - Dollar Tree just agreed to buy Family Dollar.
 Or do they? “Willingness to buy on a dip implies confidence,” ClariVest Asset Management’s Stacey Nutt tells Wang.
 Alternative investment managers are attracting investors seeking returns regardless of the market’s direction at the same time that banks cut the amount of money they use to buy and sell riskier debt in the face of new regulations.
 Should the regional program be a success, Azul could buy or lease additional Embraer SA jets, Neeleman said.
 Azul has already announced that it will buy 30 E195-E2 jets with an option to buy another 20.
 The company spent about $600 million to buy a stake in Iraq’s Atrush oil field in 2012 and is investing an additional $300 million to start pumping crude next year at a rate of 30,000 barrels a day.
July 16 (Bloomberg) -- Rupert Murdoch wants HBO so badly, he’s willing to buy all of Time Warner Inc.
 “The opportunity here is very large -- both companies are growing extremely fast,” said Ron Josey, an analyst at JMP Securities who rates Zillow the equivalent of a buy.
 Rascoff said in an interview that the deal to buy Trulia signals that Zillow is creating a portfolio of online real estate brands, which lets the company appeal to the broadest audiences and attract the biggest set of real estate advertisers.
 “Portals like Zillow and Trulia have created a whole new additional category of real estate lifestyle surfing for consumers who are interested in home prices and community information, even though they may not be in the market to buy or sell a home in the immediate future,” said Stefan Swanepoel, a consultant and author on real estate trends.
 “You’re not going to be buying these discretionary purchases unless you’re part of the 1 percent,” Riggs said.
 The buying-climate gauge climbed to its second-highest reading in more than six years, offsetting a decline in views on the economy and finances.
 The weekly buying-climate index advanced to 347 from 324 the prior week.
 agreed to buy Family Dollar Stores Inc.
 Icahn said on his blog today that there were “a handful of potential buyers” that could benefit from a merger with Family Dollar.
 To protect home buyers, the law also boosted the number of documents that must be provided by sellers, leading to a decline in home sales and longer transaction times.
 “A host of complex regulations have been introduced and, most importantly, buyer sentiment has suffered.
 “You can’t buy justice with money,” he said.
 Exelon plans to buy gas from the Eagle Ford shale formation in south Texas as well as from the interstate pipeline system to supply the Annova facility.
 Picking up the pieces are licensing firms whose sole mission is to buy castoff patents and then demand royalties from other companies in a strategy to make a profit.
 “It is a world-class project with world-class reserves” Chevron and Apache had already been seeking a buyer to acquire part of their interests in Kitimat LNG to defray costs.
 Buyers Search After that, the project struggled to find buyers for its gas.
 Wynn Resorts had to buy the rights from certain mainlanders, though the Land Public Works and Transport Bureau said it wasn’t aware about their involvement, according to the Macau Business report.
 to buy.
 “For the past five quarters, they guided below Street estimates, and this is the first quarter for the past five quarters that they’ve guided above Street estimates -- it’s definitely a positive,” said Neil Doshi, an analyst at CRT Capital Group LLC, who rates the stock a buy.
 Product Expansion LinkedIn’s professional networking service has been expanding into new product categories and last week said it agreed to buy Bizo Inc, a business-marketing startup, for $175 million.
 Mainland Chinese buyers purchased a total 561 tons in June including scrap, compared with 672 tons in May and 1126 tons a year earlier, data from the Hong Kong government showed.
 Today they manage more than $6 billion, buying stakes in public companies they consider undervalued and lobbying executives and directors for changes to boost returns.
 With Relational pushing the world’s largest home-improvement chain to improve its use of capital, the retailer ousted CEO Robert Nardelli and sold its contract supplies unit months later for $85 billion, using the proceeds to buy back stock.
 ‘Orderly Runoff’ GE Capital said it would liquidate “using a combination of going-concern business platform sales, specific asset sales, and orderly runoff of assets” Potential buyers include banks and private equity funds, according to the document.
 Using cash generated from selling its 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless this year, Vodafone has agreed to spend almost 18 billion euros ($24 billion) buying Spanish cable operator Grupo Corporativo Ono SA and Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG.
 Potential buyers could get the company for a bargain right now.
 A department store would be the “perfect owner,” strengthening the potential buyer’s sales channels while preserving Yoox’s independence, she added.
 Retail Relationships Kering SA could be interested in buying Yoox, should the owner of Saint Laurent dresses and Bottega Veneta handbags decide to take its relationship with the company one step further, said Rotelli of Mediobanca.
 Financiere Richemont SA, which last year sought to quash speculation that it was in talks to sell its online fashion retailer Net-a-Porter to Yoox, may instead decide to buy Yoox, said Pedraza of the Luxury Institute.
 has been buying the funds on the belief that they will do well in a world of a low interest rates that he predicts.
 Closed-end funds appeal to income-oriented investors because they tend to have higher dividend yields than mutual funds that buy similar assets, boosted by the use of leverage.
 Bernanke in May signaled that the central bank might begin to scale back its bond buying program.
 Municipal Defaults Funds that buy municipal bonds were especially hard-hit because investors worried about possible defaults in places such as Detroit and Puerto Rico.
 Gross said he prefers to buy funds that sell at a discount or “at the right price” The large gains racked up by closed-end funds in 2014 have not diminished Gross’s enthusiasm for the investments.
 Clearinghouses such as LCH Clearnet Group Ltd, majority owned by the London Stock Exchange Group Plc, and Deutsche Boerse AG’s Eurex Clearing operate as central counterparties for every buy and sell order executed.
 Their presence as potential buyers would lead to a truer auction and set a higher price on the company, the person said.
 Comcast is awaiting approval to buy Time Warner Cable, while AT&T needs clearance for its takeover of DirecTV.
 Dutra said today that the company’s first priority is to invest behind its brands, though the company will “always be ready to look at opportunities if and when they arise” Dutra said the company’s optimum net debt to Ebitda level would be about 2 times, and after that AB InBev will explore a return of cash to shareholders through dividends or buybacks.
 Potential buyers of Revel AC Inc’s Atlantic City, New Jersey, casino must submit bids by today.
 “The mortgage insurers are a bellweather for consumers -- particularly Genworth is a bellweather for first-time homebuyers,” Nick LeBlanc, a financial analyst at DBRS Ltd, said by phone yesterday.
 He struck the deal with Standard General in which he borrowed about $20 million to buy shares.
 Charney’s Stake The fund also has warrants to buy back the shares Charney purchased as well as 10 percent of his original stake.
 Lion also holds warrants to buy 245 million shares with an exercise price of 66 cents each, according to public filings.
 terminated its offer to buy Aspen Insurance Holdings Ltd.
July 9 (Bloomberg) -- EBay Inc’s Braintree unit, an electronic-payment system for businesses acquired last year, is seeking to make it simpler for e-commerce companies to get customers to buy on mobile devices.
 “The entire e-commerce world has to rewire their buying experience, given that consumers are moving to mobile devices as their primary computing device” Braintree already helps e-commerce companies easily accept payments online with major credit cards using different currencies.
 Intel’s outlook indicates demand is starting to recover among consumers, who may be buying laptops and desktops again after years of opting for smartphones and tablets instead.
 Rome-based Gtech SpA agreed to buy the world’s biggest slot-machine maker for $47 billion.
 “You could argue they’ve been a victim of their own success,” said John Guy, an analyst at Berenberg Bank in London who recommends buying the shares.
 While investors initially worried the change of auditor would fuel short-seller allegations that NQ Mobile has misrepresented financial data, the announcement triggered buying later in the day on speculation the move can clear the path for the filing of an audited 2013 annual report.
 agreed to buy it for about $85 billion.
 Stocks slumped earlier in the day as fewer Americans than forecast signed contracts to buy previously owned homes in June, a sign residential real estate is struggling to strengthen.
 Not since the bull market began has buying dips been a surer way of making money.
 The policy-making committee last month repeated it’s likely to “reduce the pace of asset purchases in further measured steps” and that it expects interest rates to stay low for a “considerable time” after the bond-buying ends.
 Derivatives are a broad group of securities that let buyers guard against a borrower’s missed debt payments.
 ‘Standardized Approach’ Twenty-one of 44 analysts tracked by Bloomberg say investors should buy Deutsche Bank shares, while Lim and four others recommend selling.
 Seventeen of 38 analysts say investors should buy BNP stock, while three recommend selling.
 raised its rating on the maker of Gauloises cigarettes to buy from neutral.
 Where would my wife sit? Instead I settled on a family-appropriate vehicle I’ve actually considered buying, the diesel version of the Porsche Cayenne, which has an EPA rating of 29 miles per gallon on the highway and is still good fun on back roads.
 European Delivery And if I were to buy the Cayenne, I would surely opt for the European delivery, a little-known program that lets purchasers drive around Europe in their very own new car.
 and international tax matters, including mergers, acquisitions, divestitures, tax-free spinoffs, leveraged buyouts, initial public offerings and fund formation, the firm said.
 As more than half a million of the small cars have been brought in for repairs, many owners have become customers again: buying GM’s new and better models.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore posted a second straight monthly increase this year on speculation that demand for imports in China may be improving, helping to absorb a global surplus as local supplies in the largest buyer are displaced.
 forecast in a July 9 report, saying that it’s now cheaper for steel mills in China to buy seaborne supply rather than domestic material.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- Petroleo Brasileiro SA, Brazil’s state controlled oil producer, was upgraded to the equivalent of buy by Barclays Plc, which sees the company’s refining unit reversing losses with the possible arrival of a new government.
 Giang recommended investors buy shares in consumer, logistics and building materials companies.
 Moving to a market in which both companies are issuing common securities may have implications for everyone from home buyers and lenders to taxpayers.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- Total SA, Europe’s third-biggest oil company, stopped buying shares in Russian partner OAO Novatek after a Malaysian Airline System Bhd.
 “We stopped buying shares in Novatek the day of the airplane accident after considering all the uncertainty that it created,” he said on a conference call about second-quarter earnings.
 The mobile app, which recently became available for Google Inc’s Android operating system, is free to download and charges users for buying tools that help them win.
 The Export-Import Bank provides loan guarantees, loans and insurance to help foreign companies buy US.
 Still, he said, “there are so many more things we should be dedicating taxpayer resources to than handing it out to some select companies” Speaker John Boehner of Ohio hasn’t said how he’ll vote on the bank, which provides financing for foreign companies to buy US.
 The ECB is also undertaking preparatory work to buy “simple and transparent” ABS.
 About 35 million people in Britain are interested in buying a retirement home, according to McCarthy’s website.
 (TKG) is buyingBusiness Connexion Group Ltd.
 While Vox has received some expressions of interest fromtrade buyers, it hasn’t heard from South Africa’s largestwireless operators MTN Group Ltd.
 The advisory firm said its opinion was related to the proposed board expansion, and not the merits of the buyout offer.
 While defending his strategy, the CEO has increased the common-stock dividend, announced buybacks and expanded a program to divest underperforming units.
 “People have come to view the dilution from the preferreds as a manageable issue,” based on prospects for high earnings and share buybacks, Roberts said.
 “His main goal is to buy more operating businesses,” said Sims, whose firm counts Omaha, Nebraska-based Berkshire among its largest holdings.
 Niel then tried to buy Bouygues Telecom, a deal that was stymied by a $4 billion price gap.
 He has thrown in his lot with Standard General, forging a deal that involved borrowing about $20 million to buy more shares and using his current stake as collateral.
 Despite what happens with its loan, Lion has the right to name two people to the board because it has warrants to buy 245 million shares that would equal a 12 percent stake in the company, according to public filings.
 Money-Losing Unit The company had been seeking a buyer for the division since at least last year, a person familiar with the matter said in February.
 agreed to buy for $23 billion.
 Grand Bargain One risk for bond buyers is that gains could be undone by a retreat in US.
 “The reforms mean more jobs, more spending and more economic growth,” said Omar Saavedra, a strategist at Bank of Nova Scotia in Mexico City, who recommends buying fixed-rate peso-denominated government bonds due in 2018.
 upgraded the French maker of defense electronics to overweight, the equivalent of buy, from neutral.
 Khadem Al Qubaisi, chairman of both companies, said at a press conference after close of trading yesterday that Aabar was considering buying more shares in the builder.
 The company this month agreed to buy the 24 percent stake in Barcelona water company Sociedad General de Aguas de Barcelona it doesn’t own for stock and 299 million euros in cash.
 Applied Materials agreed in September to buy Tokyo Electron for $939 billion in stock to add scale as a shrinking base of clients makes earnings of suppliers more volatile.
 now buy the majority of the production machines deployed by the industry and are the top three customers of both companies, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “I still believe the deal gets done,” said Ho, who recommends buying Applied Materials stock.
 Duerr also gained voting rights over 758 percent of its target and is seeking to buy the rest of the company, it said.
 “We have very high market share already in our core business and wouldn’t be able to buy further auto businesses,” said Dieter.
 James’s and Knightsbridge saw gains of more than 70 percent since the last trough in 2009 as a weakened pound and economic turmoil overseas drew buyers.
 rose to a record after agreeing to buy Apple & Eve LLC.
 Lassonde jumped 74 percent to C$11803, closing at the highest price since September 1988, after the producer of food products from barbecue sauce to baked beans announced it was buying a 90 percent stake in juice-maker Apple & Eve.
 “There are issues in Portugal that are getting worked through -- it’s translated into buying bunds, gilts and Treasuries,” said Dan Mulholland, head of Treasury trading at BNY Mellon Capital Markets in New York.
 The Bapo will use those funds to buy about 13 million Lonmin shares and the company will transfer 09 percent in the two mining units to a development trust, it said.
 will buy 75 percent in its Pandora venture with Anglo American Platinum Ltd.
 Maybe they’re thinking of buying and all of a sudden stocks got a lot cheaper” The gain in the S&P 500 erased almost all of yesterday’s 12 percent decline in the S&P 500 as the market resumed an advance that has added more than $1 trillion to share values in 2014.
 fell to a 19-year low as rising prices and tight credit kept many first-time buyers out of the property market.
 Housing has become less affordable and more difficult to finance for entry-level buyers, even as mortgage rates have held close to record lows.
 “The first-time buyers are the ones who would be the net addition to homeownership,” Millan Mulraine, deputy head of US.
 Marshall of CI Investments was offered a coupon of 15 percent to buy Sunshine’s unrated five-year notes.
 Mark Pibl, the New York-based head of high-yield research and strategy at Canaccord Genuity Inc, said Sunshine’s failed transaction will make buyers more skeptical about early-stage producers in the future.
 Rosneft is also set to buy a stake in the Seadrill unit, which it could increase to as much as 50 percent over time, people familiar with the deal said in May.
July 4 (Bloomberg) -- Ten Network Holdings Ltd, weighing a possible sale, is so cheap that acquirers can buy the Australian television channel for less than the value of its broadcasting license.
 on options that may include seeking a buyer, people familiar with the matter said, asking not to be identified discussing private matters.
 The Australian Financial Review reported last month that buyout firms were considering bidding for Ten, whose shares have languished below A$1 for more than three years.
 An acquirer may be able to rebuild Ten’s audience by buying rights to air more sports, and the company’s license alone is worth 13 percent more than its A$697 million ($653 million) market value at yesterday’s close, Credit Suisse Group AG said.
 “It could be a very good deal and a very astute bit of timing for a would-be buyer,” Greg Smith, head of research at Sydney-based Fat Prophets Pty, said by phone.
 “I’m sure a lot of people will be running the numbers” Providence Equity Partners LLC, a Providence, Rhode Island-based buyout firm focused on media, has started work on a potential bid for Ten, the Australian Financial Review reported June 23.
 Law Change Changes to existing media laws raised in a discussion paper last month by the Australian government could enhance Ten’s appeal to potential buyers, said Angharad Lewis, a lawyer in Clifford Chance LLP’s Australian M&A and media team in Sydney.
 “Any change to current regulations could allow international or domestic players to buy Ten and add other businesses to it, like a regional network or other radio licenses,” said Lewis.
 “As a potential buyer, you’re potentially getting an asset at or near the bottom,” said Smith.
 Semiconductor Research IBM, based in Armonk, New York, had been seeking a buyer for the division since at least last year, a person with knowledge of the matter said in February.
 Before that, it passed legislation extending its ability to block foreign attempts to buy French companies in energy, transport and health care.
 ‘Right Move’ The central bank in May called on the nation’s biggest lenders to accelerate the granting of mortgages to first-home buyers.
 Some Chinese cities started to relax property curbs to stimulate the market, while developers have cut prices since March to lure buyers.
 The London-based buyout firm may raise about $500 million from the offering, two of the people said, asking not to be identified as the process is private.
 exports, tight domestic butter supplies are contributing to higher costs that buyers including Panera Bread Co.
 Domestic stockpiles that in May 2013 were the highest in 20 years have slumped with a surge in shipments to buyers including Saudi Arabia, Morocco, Egypt and Iran, government data show.
 The price change means importers who signed three-month and six-month contracts to buy US.
 After record monthly shipments last year of as much as 5 million pounds of butter, the rally in prices has slowed demand, leaving the dairy cooperative “very close to winding down” all of its contracts to supply overseas buyers, Mikhalevsky said by telephone from Visalia.
 “If there’s anything investors hate, it’s either uncertainty or risk, and we’ve got both those right now with the telecoms” Rogers Results Crandall recommends holding shares of Rogers and BCE and buying Telus and Quebecor stock.
 BCE, Canada’s biggest telecommunications company, announced today that it plans to buy the shares of Bell Aliant Inc.
 analyst Glen Campbell lowered his rating on Telus and Rogers to hold from buy after the government said earlier this month it would set aside a new block of wireless spectrum for small players.
 The buyout and credit manager, which is based in New York and led by billionaire Black, said in a May earnings call that it planned to revamp compensation to better align its partners’ incentives with those of its public shareholders.
 Under the new plan, the team overseeing the $184 billion private-equity fund the firm completed raising in January will use some of their incentive income to buy restricted shares of Apollo that vest over three years.
 Buffett Model As Fosun’s founders plotted their overseas expansion, they considered different business models -- from the property-to-ports conglomerate built by Li Ka-shing, Asia’s richest man, to buyout titans like Carlyle Group LP and Bain Capital Partners LLC that use leverage to bolster returns.
 Fosun paid $725 million to buy 1 Chase Manhattan Plaza, the largest purchase of a New York building by a Chinese buyer.
 buyout firm Apollo Management International LLP.
 The price of contracts that fix the conversion rate for buying dollars with rupees in three months dropped 110 basis points, or 11 percentage points, from this year’s high of 968 percent.
 World Cup Carrefour, which agreed in June to buy back discount stores in France, is focusing on price and convenience as it seeks to cement a domestic revival.
 sought firm purchases for its embattled CSeries after getting commitments to buy the planes.
 agreed to buy 50 of the E175-E2 model, Embraer said today at the Farnborough Air Show near London.
 The E175-E2 lists for $483 million; buyers typically get discounts.
 He raised his rating on the stock from hold to buy.
 Elliott wants EMC to separate from its publicly traded software company VMware and pursue strategic buyers for the remainder, a person with knowledge of the plans has said.
 Elliott has held talks with potential buyers of EMC without VMware for several months, and will meet with EMC management next week, the person has said.
 2 fiber carrier, has 730,000 customers after buying Tele2 AB’s network last year.
 Last year, it beat Malone’s Liberty Global to buy Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for more than $10 billion.
 It would expand an existing ban to cover companies that changed addresses after buying a smaller foreign company, perhaps capturing Tyco International Ltd.
 ‘Buy American’ “By any protectionist standard, these proposals exceed even the most extreme ‘buy American’ legislation enacted during the Great Depression,” wrote Christian Zur, senior director of government procurement policy at the nation’s largest business group.
 Now, buyers “want their bedroom to have its own bathroom.
 Following a review of its 396 percent holding in the Johannesburg-based company, SABMiller will divest the stake in a two-stage transaction involving a sale to institutional investors and a buyback of shares by Tsogo Sun, the maker of Peroni and Castle Lite said today in a statement.
 “We support Tsogo Sun in buying back the shares,” said Johnny Copelyn, CEO of the casino operator’s biggest shareholder Hosken Consolidated Investments Ltd, which now owns 47 percent of the company.
 This year, BAAM also set its sights on buying stakes in hedge-fund firms.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- TPG Capital, the private investment company with $59 billion globally, will buy a stake in Hong Kong’s HS Group Ltd.
 About two weeks after Chicago-based Hillshire offered to buy Pinnacle, JBS SA’s Pilgrim’s Pride Corp.
 The two buyout firms and others, including Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC and KKR & Co.
 Nishikubo, who took flying lessons and became a pilot after purchasing his stake in Skymark, said earlier this week he still wanted to buy A380s.
 The airline announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s current model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 A trip to Beverly Hills costs 4 game “dollars,” while 400 will buy a necklace.
 in New York, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Glu Mobile and expects the stock to rise to $6 in the next year.
 Investors have been competing to buy London offices to gain from rising values and rents.
 Slovenske Elektrarne’s potential buyers include Czech utility CEZ AS, whose CEO Daniel Benes said in April that he’d be open to bidding for Enel’s stake if it came up for sale.
 “The biggest failure in CEZ’s history was that we didn’t buy Slovenske Elektrarne,” Benes said in an interview with Bloomberg News.
 “CEZ is the natural first-choice buyer” Rosatom Corp, Russia’s state nuclear company, was cited as another potential bidder in media reports including Slovakia’s Sme and Hospodarske Noviny newspapers.
July 7 (Bloomberg) -- Apache Corp, the energy company that has announced $98 billion of asset sales in the past year, is seeking a buyer for its interests in the Wheatstone liquefied natural gas project, people familiar with the matter said.
 The oil and gas producer is in early discussions with potential buyers for its holdings in Chevron Corp’s A$29 billion ($27 billion) project in Western Australia, said the people, who asked not to be identified as the matter is private.
 Proceeds could be used to fund further share buybacks, according to the report.
 Chinese energy companies may be interested in buying Apache’s Wheatstone holdings, Nik Burns, a Melbourne-based analyst at UBS, said today by phone.
 Kufpec may also consider buying the stake, he said.
 The buying and selling of off-plan properties for a quick profit, known as flipping, was seen as a major cause of the crash in 2008.
 The authorities may also introduce new contract forms for real estate transactions and a property investor law to protect the rights of buyers and sellers, according to the IMF.
 “Having those boards up and preserving those properties from arson, loss of value -- once we started seeing the market pick back up, buyers were willing to come in and rehab,” said Matt Lasko, assistant director of Cleveland’s Detroit Shoreway Community Development Organization, which hired Toepfer to work in a neighborhood along Lake Erie.
 “In the next three years our buying activity will probably be 80 percent opportunistic, whereas through 2012 it was 80 percent core,” Reilly said in an interview.
 “Our buy activity shifts as the capital market shifts” Investors like JPMorgan Asset Management, which holds about $63 billion of real estate, rushed to the safety of Europe’s most stable income-producing properties after the financial crisis.
 The proportion of buyers seeking the highest quality buildings with tenants in place dropped to 35 percent from 56 percent.
 The JPMorgan unit will focus on buying offices in large cities including Paris, Berlin, Hamburg, Munich, Frankfurt and the English cities of Birmingham and Manchester.
 Wynn Resorts had to buy the rights from certain mainlanders, though the Land Public Works and Transport Bureau said it wasn’t aware of their involvement, according to the Macau Business report.
July 25 (Bloomberg) -- AbbVie Inc, the drugmaker buying Shire Plc to lower its tax rate, reported profit that beat analysts’ estimates on strong sales of the arthritis drug Humira.
 It may have also played a role driving real estate prices lower by discouraging officials from buying multiple properties.
 said its Dutch domicile could make it the next tax-inversion target, with potential buyers including Sigma-Aldrich Corp.
 could also be potential buyers, according to Exane BNP Paribas.
 That may give it a valuation that dissuades some buyers, Kumar said.
 I think buyers can stretch to $30, but can they go to like $35? I’m not sure whether we have buyers at those levels” Even so, Qiagen’s low tax rate and attractive businesses make it a potential target, said Haresco of JMP.
 That usually signals to investors an opportunity to buy because the fund’s price is lower than the value of its assets.
 Fortress, which, went public in February 2007 at $1850 a share to become the first US-listed buyout and hedge-fund manager, has declined 15 percent this year.
 The private-equity business, which manages $138 billion in assets, is raising a new buyout fund, Wes Edens said on the call.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 based in Liverpool, England, who has a buy recommendation on shares.
 Chen has a buy recommendation on the shares.
 The company expects to buy back as much as $8 billion in shares in 2014 and 2015, of which it has already purchased $16 billion in the first half of the year.
 rose 13 percent after Barclays Plc advised investors to buy shares in the world’s biggest company by market value.
 Three rounds of Fed bond-buying have helped propel the S&P 500 higher by more than 190 percent during the current five-year bull market.
 Apple climbed 13 percent to $9645 after Barclays raised its recommendation on the technology company to overweight, or buy, from a rating similar to hold.
 cut its rating for the vacation planning company to neutral from buy, saying the shares are at full valuation.
 The company is buying Abbott Laboratories’ generic-drug business and forming a new company that will be incorporated in the Netherlands, allowing for a lower-cost tax base.
 offered to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva for $16 a share as the company seeks to become the largest shareholder in the provider of home health-care services.
 McDonald’s, meanwhile, buys chicken, pork, beef and lettuce from OSI in the Shanghai area, Heidi Barker, a company spokeswoman, said in an e-mail.
July 14 (Bloomberg) -- Bond buyers are cashing in on profitable wagers in the $2 trillion junk market and hunkering down for a selloff.
 “But most of these same market participants also say they plan to buy on pullbacks” Investors are using the easiest ways to reduce their junk holdings, hanging on to the illiquid securities that would be more difficult to buy again if their sentiment changed.
 It’s finding ready buyers chasing yield, Sarah Mulholland reports.
 Change Capital agreed to buy the stake from JH Partners LLC for an undisclosed sum, the company said an e-mailed statement today.
 Whiting is buying a company that more than doubled production last year while its own output growth slowed as costs to bring new wells online surged.
 CLOs helped finance some of the biggest leveraged buyouts during the last credit boom.
 and other firearms companies are leaving their traditional manufacturing hub in the Northeast, known as Gun Valley, and shifting production to Southern states more friendly to gun buyers as they seek to boost flagging sales.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Varo Energy, a venture of oil trader Vitol Group and private equity firm Carlyle Group LP, is buying storage and distribution assets from Total SA’s Swiss unit to add resources in the land-locked Alpine country.
 Vitol teamed with sovereign wealth fund Abu Dhabi Investment Council to offer $26 billion to buy Royal Dutch Shell Plc’s refining and fuel station assets in Australia in February.
 With the buyout firms ready to exit, Alexander Forbes opted for a listing and a partial sale of 34 percent to Marsh & McLennan Cos’s Mercer unit which will be an anchor investor, according to Kieswetter.
 slumped 15 percent in Seoul after saying it will buy a stake in Mirae Asset Life Insurance.
 The brokerage said it will buy a stake in Mirae Asset Life Insurance for 3202 billion won ($310 million) from Mirae Asset Capital.
 The Anglo American Plc unit held talks with labor organizations prior to announcing on July 21 that it is seeking buyers for four mines in South Africa and possibly stakes in two joint ventures, Franz Stehring, head of mining at union UASA, said today by phone.
 Amplats would consider a separate listing for the assets if it can’t find a buyer, Chief Executive Officer Chris Griffith said July 21.
July 3 (Bloomberg) -- Swiss Re Ltd, the world’s second-biggest reinsurer, agreed to buy a Chinese unit of the UK’s RSA Insurance Group Plc as it shifts capital to regions with higher premium growth prospects.
 The company, based in Zurich, is buying Sun Alliance Insurance (China) Ltd.
 acquired Lloyds Banking Group Plc’s Lloyds TSB Registrars shareholder-services business in a management buyout.
 China unveiled a plan in April that will connect the Hong Kong and Shanghai bourses, allowing investors to buy shares listed in Hong Kong via the Shanghai exchange, and vice versa.
 Under the dual access plan, Chinese investors will be able to buy stocks traded on both the Hang Seng Composite Large Cap Index, and the Hang Seng Composite Mid Cap Index, as well as companies traded on the Hong Kong and Shanghai exchanges.
July 10 (Bloomberg) -- Kingdream Plc, an oil and drilling equipment maker controlled by Asia’s biggest refiner, said it plans to sell shares in a private placement to raise funds to buy assets from parent China Petrochemical Corp.
 after milder-than-usual temperatures cut demand in Asia, the world’s biggest buying region.
 Russian Stocks The stock valuations are flashing a buy signal to Barclays Plc, according to Dennis Jose, a global and European equity strategist in London.
 IPO Revival Brazil’s second-biggest sugar-cane processor revived its IPO less than a year after a first attempt failed, with Dreyfus buying 12 percent of the deal.
 John Kratochwil, analyst at Canaccord Genuity, reduced Fortuna’s rating to a hold from a buy.
 AstraZeneca Chief Executive Officer Pascal Soriot didn’t comment on the Pfizer buyout attempt on conference calls with analysts or reporters, citing UK.
 Yesterday, AstraZeneca announced it was buying the rights to Almirall SA’s respiratory drugs for $875 million, and could pay an additional $122 billion if the drugs meet development and sales goals.
 The Johannesburg-based company agreed to buy Alucan, a Nigerian packaging company, for 33 billion rand ($307 million) in its biggest ever deal last year and is studying an option to buy a plastics manufacturer in the continent’s largest economy.
 A number of potential buyers submitted letters of intent that were “significantly below the first threshold” of the bonus plan, Warren A.
 Revel, which employs about 3,140 people, told workers last month that it may be forced to close for good if it fails to attract a buyer.
 Seven of 23 analysts recommend investors buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Pearson has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 40 companies since 2008.
 Why the lack of response? To London-based Derrick, the answer lies in the ECB’s failure to press the bond-buying button and the reason for that lies at the feet of Bundesbank President Jens Weidmann, who recently spoke in favor of a strong currency and against the ECB purchasing assets.
 “Now more than ever there are economic reasons not to buy government bonds,” Weidmann told Sueddeutsche Zeitung newspaper in May.
 Both pieces of debt will be used to buy the stock of Perpetual Corp.
 The company, which has $33 billion of debt, initially planned to fund the buyout with $12 billion of term loans, it said in September.
 Sinclair said in March it would restructure the Allbritton deal to meet objections from the Federal Communications Commission, selling a station in three markets where it proposes to buy an affiliate of Walt Disney Co’s ABC network from Allbritton.
 are raised, it may mean higher costs for investors to buy Chinese shares,” JG Capital’s Guo said.
 “Inevitably when you buy something that you’ve only really been able to see on paper you hold your breath a little bit,” Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Robert Gannicott said in a phone interview last week.
 Last week, Dominion said it agreed to buy out one of Ekati’s minority partners, Chuck Fipke, for about $67 million.
 There are eight buy ratings on the company and one hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Frasers had planned on achieving several key strategic objectives over the medium term, including increasing the proportion of overseas earnings and recurring income as well as enhancing our platform in Australia” Frasers agreed to buy the five-star Sofitel Sydney Wentworth hotel in the city’s center from LaSalle Investment Management for A$201 million, according to an e-mailed statement from broker Jones Lang LaSalle Inc’s hotel division in May.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Shutterfly Inc, which turns digital photos into printed albums, is working with boutique investment bank Qatalyst Partners LLC to find buyers for the company, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Shutterfly is seeking a buyer as large Internet and technology companies including Google Inc.
 for $18 billion earlier this year, today said it would buy LiveRail, a startup that helps business buy more relevant video advertisements.
 Barry Callebaut AG, the top cocoa processor and biggest maker of bulk chocolate, said in an earnings statement last week that the cocoa powder market was ‘‘challenging’’ Euromar Commodities GmbH, a unit of processor Transmar Group, said last month it reduced output at its German factory because it can’t find buyers for its powder even as demand for butter is strong.
July 31 (Bloomberg) -- Petroleos de Venezuela SA is seeking a buyer for Citgo Petroleum Corp, its US.
 By creating a master-limited partnership for those assets and getting better-than-expected returns from the refineries, a buyer could get “a return on that price,” Margolin said today in a telephone interview.
 “Nobody should have a problem getting financing even up to that $15 billion level” Potential buyers include Gulf Coast refiners looking to capitalize on the region’s rising crude supply, and those operators seeking entry, Margolin said.
 A buyer could reduce Citgo’s tax burden because partnerships don’t pay federal income tax.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Venezuela’s benchmark bonds due in 2027 instead of US.
 Deals Covington, Skadden on $13 Billion Aristocrat Leisure Deal Covington & Burling LLP advised Aristocrat Leisure Ltd, which agreed to buy Video Gaming Technologies Inc.
 Calls to buy shares in the pet-care retailer trade close to the most expensive level in almost a decade relative to bearish puts, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 PetSmart’s strong free cash flow makes it an attractive target for private-equity bidders, said Albert Saporta at Makor Capital Ltd, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Airlines typically buy at a discount to the catalog price, which is $1028 million for the A320neo.
 In most places, the customers don’t have a choice of who they buy their electricity from.
 Crane is concerned electricity may get “so distributed and so simplified that our biggest competitor becomes Home Depot,” where people could buy panels and put them on their rooftops themselves, he said.
 Demand in July “grew sharply primarily due to the participation of a distribution company,” REConnect said in an e-mail without disclosing the buyer.
 Companies are buying more robusta after its discount to arabica reached the widest in more than two years in April.
 Cheung Kong, the best performer on the Hang Seng Property Index this year, offered discounts to lure buyers after both Hong Kong and mainland China stepped up measures to thwart a property bubble.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 “Institutional investors like insurance companies and foundations are buying more aggressively now than ever in order to reach their yield targets” US.
July 18 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP and KKR & Co, defendants in a lawsuit alleging a group of private-equity firms colluded to keep leveraged-buyout prices low, are in talks to settle with the plaintiffs, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Leveraged Buyouts The complaint had listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions, in which the private-equity firms were alleged to have shortchanged shareholders in the target companies by agreeing to suppress takeover bids.
 luxury sales, Audi is luring buyers in a crucial market for the segment: younger owners new to the brand, said Jesse Toprak, an analyst at Carscom.
 “Buyers in key, high-volume luxury markets, especially first-time buyers, prefer Audi more and more because it’s more unique.
 HBO and its growth prospects are a big part of why New York-based Time Warner rejected a $75 billion buyout offer from Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc, saying it will be better off independent.
 The plan relies on more aggressive marketing, an upgraded HBO Go app and expanded access to the network for broadband-only customers of companies like Comcast who don’t want to buy a full cable-TV package.
 broadband customers, many of them younger, who don’t now buy cable TV.
 Plepler, an executive made in the Time Warner mold, has often lectured on the importance of HBO’s culture and likes to quote a line, usually attributed to management theorist Peter Drucker, that “culture eats strategy for breakfast” HBO’s standout original programming makes it a must-buy in many homes.
July 24 (Bloomberg) -- Breitburn Energy Partners LP agreed to buy QR Energy LP for about $167 billion in stock and cash, saying it would become the largest master-limited partnership that produces mostly oil.
 Deals Jones Day Advises Reynolds on $25 Billion Lorillard Acquisition Jones Day is advising Reynolds American Inc, which agreed to buy Lorillard Inc.
 Ferrovial rose 12 percent after the Spanish construction company posted first-half profit that exceeded projections and said it will buy back shares.
 Financial Conduct Authority are also weighing how and whether to curb so-called buy-outs, whereby a new employer compensates bankers for bonuses they were in line to receive had they stayed in their old job.
 and Mexico is an option as there are few opportunities to buy prize assets in emerging markets, Rorsted said in an interview in New York.
 Last month, Dusseldorf-based Henkel agreed to buy three US.
 reached an agreement to buy its rival for about $25 billion.
 Economic Data Three rounds of Fed bond-buying have helped propel the S&P 500 higher by more than 190 percent during the current five-year bull market.
 Bank Earnings Banks have seen profits hurt in recent quarters as the Fed slows its bond buying and fixed-income clients make fewer bets amid low volatility.
 FBR Capital Markets began coverage on the developer of fuel-cell systems with an outperform rating, similar to a buy recommendation, with a price estimate of $8 on the shares.
 JMP Securities LLP started coverage of the company, whose cameras let surfers, skiers and sky divers record their exploits, with a rating of market perform, similar to a buy recommendation.
 “Investors will buy into Germany again because the German economy and companies are the most efficient and competitive within the euro zone.
 Topix The Topix surged 14 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy, signs Japan is weathering a sales-tax increase from that month and speculation the nation’s $12 trillion pension fund will buy more local shares.
 policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 The gold producer assessed interest among potential Chinese partners in buying a minority stake in the Natalka project in the Magadan region of Russia’s far east, the people said.
 Proposed changes to the 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” Exxon Mobil Corp, Anadarko Petroleum Corp.
 “Institutional investors are buying more shares of exporters given a stabilizing won and the government’s plan to possibly boost dividends” The yield on the 35 percent sovereign notes due March 2024 dropped nine basis points, or 009 percentage point, to 295 percent in Seoul, Korea Exchange Inc.
 In February, the company said it would cut $160 million in expenses and return at least $3 billion to investors through stock buybacks and dividends.
 Property Prices In Hangzhou, where home prices fell the most in May among 70 Chinese cities watched by the government, Shanheng Real Estate Group is giving homebuyers an option to sell back their apartments in five years for 40 percent above the purchase price.
 The offers are the latest strategy by developers across China, including reducing prices, delaying project launches and offering incentives to potential buyers, as they seek to maintain sales targets.
 The SEC’s rules require exchanges and brokers to be deeply interconnected to ensure that investors receive the best available prices when they buy shares.
 The so-called “maker-taker” model pays rebates to traders who stand ready to buy or sell shares as needed, while charging those on the other side of the transaction.
 Deals Baker Botts Advises Linn Energy on Devon Well Purchase Baker Botts LLP advised Linn Energy LLC, which agreed to buy oil and natural gas-producing acreage across six US.
 The report also showed the buying-climate gauge climbed to its second-highest reading in more than six years.
 “Investors who bought at the auction did well, and everyone else, who expected to buy at higher yields after hearing the Fed minutes, is being forced to chase the rally” Ten-year notes sold at the auction yielded 2597 percent.
 “To me it seems as if it’s somebody trying to buy on the cheap.
July 17 (Bloomberg) -- As Steven Udvar-Hazy assesses whether to acquire new planes for the leasing company he runs, he enjoys an edge over other buyers: He can test-fly the jets himself.
 “Fly-before-buy was more the norm” into the 1970s, when executives with backgrounds in airline operations dominated the industry, said Bob Mann, an aviation consultant based in Port Washington, New York.
 “The process of companies buying massive amounts of homes and accessing capital markets has all happened really quickly.
 Trade Representative, nobody at the Department of Commerce, nobody at some congressional oversight body is saying, ‘Guys, what is going on here?’ It just puzzles me that nobody is concerned” Casey Letter Senator Robert Casey, a Pennsylvania Democrat on the Senate Finance Committee, sounded a rare discordant note this week, asking the SEC to show how it’s addressing risks for buyers of stock in Chinese offerings structured like Alibaba’s.
 The Obama administration is highlighting competition from abroad in its bid to sustain the agency, which provides loans, loan guarantees and credit insurance to foreign buyers of US.
 (753) with loans and guarantees to buy US.
 I don’t think that will change this week” The Topix has gained 09 percent this month after rising 51 percent in June on optimism that the economy is weathering an April sales-tax increase and Japan’s $12 trillion pension fund will buy more domestic stocks.
 The company was raised to strong buy from above average at Tokai Tokyo Securities Co.
 It’s just another indication that even with some pricing pressure internationally, particularly in the Pacific, these guys can put up some pretty good operating margins” Denardi, who recommends buying the shares, had forecast operating margins of 155 percent.
 “But, this is a company that is generating cash, generating profits, using the money to buy back stock, pay dividends, doing everything that airlines have never done before” Bastian and Chief Executive Officer Richard Anderson fielded questions from analysts today about a glut of seats in markets including Europe and Asia.
 A fourth state cash injection will buy time for Malaysian Air to improve its business by reducing its fleet size and headcount, according to Jerry Lee, an analyst in Kuala Lumpur at RHB Research, a unit of the nation’s fourth-largest lender, RHB Capital.
 The company has attracted interest from buyout firms including KKR & Co, Permira Advisers LLP, CVC Capital Partners Ltd.
 Rather than buying large local companies like its competitors, Molson Coors seeds brands through marketing and innovation, Anand said.
 The strongest of the measures are reserved for prime money funds, which cater to institutional investors and primarily buy riskier securities, such as commercial paper issued by banks.
 Investors will only have to account for gains and losses once, at the end of a year, instead of tracking prices at which they buy or sell.
 The crisis calmed only after the Treasury temporarily guaranteed shareholders against losses and the Fed began buying fund assets at face value to help them meet redemptions.
 markets are getting so expensive that landlords are choosing to build rather than buy, spurring the most development by real estate investment trusts in at least a decade.
 For REITs, which have to answer to shareholders seeking higher returns, building is often a better option than competing with institutional buyers.
 “They’re going out the risk-reward spectrum by starting more developments rather than buying” Projects in the works include Boston Properties’ $113 billion tower in San Francisco that will be the headquarters of Salesforcecom Inc.
 Institutional investors such as sovereign-wealth funds and pensions are buying properties in major markets in part because they view those areas as being less risky, Ryan Severino, senior economist at Reis Inc, said in a telephone interview.
 “They’re just going to capitalize the acquisition differently and they’re going to out-compete the public REITs for the same building” Goltra, who manages funds that own shares in REITs including Boston Properties, Vornado and SL Green, said he’d rather see publicly traded office owners construct new properties than buy a building for a cap rate under 5 percent.
 It’s December agreement to buy a 49 percent stake in Talison Lithium Ltd.
 After Chengdu Tianqi outbid Rockwood to buy Talison, it agreed to sell a stake in the mine to Rockwood.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team.
 “Loan growth was robust, accelerating from previous quarters,” Ken Usdin, an analyst at Jefferies Group LLC who has a buy rating on the stock, said in a note to investors.
 “You see lots of reasons to go out and sell but few reasons to go buy” Ecopetrol is scheduled to report earnings on July 31 according to its website.
 The former Economy Ministry official and current head of investment banking at Banco Macro had a plan to buy the defaulted bonds from their holders.
 Hebei is obligated under the pact to buy 60 percent of Kami’s annual output to a maximum of 48 million tons of the first 8 million tons of concentrate each year.
 He struck the investment deal with Standard General in which he borrowed about $20 million to buy the shares and used his current stake as collateral.
 Eurnekian, Argentina’s second-richest man, would buy the assets using Cia.
 General de Combustibles SA, in which he owns a majority stake, the person said, adding that CGC has the first right of refusal to buy two of the fields.
 Buenos Aires-based CGC may partner with another Argentine company to buy the other fields in southern Argentina, the person said.
July 30 (Bloomberg) -- South Africa’s government should consider buying one of the country’s banks to boost access to finance for its citizens and businesses, said Tito Mboweni, the former central bank governor.
 Fed officials are debating how long to keep the benchmark federal funds rate near zero after completing a bond-buying program that’s set to end late this year.
 Three rounds of Fed bond-buying have helped propel the S&P 500 higher by more than 190 percent during the current five-year bull market.
 As much as 80 percent of aluminum inventories may be tied up as collateral in so-called financing deal that make the metal unavailable to buyers, according to Societe Generale SA.
 The spinoff means “it hasn’t been able to attract a trade buyer on satisfactory terms,” James Edwardes Jones, an analyst at RBC Europe, said in a note today.
 It will buy all of the assets owned by parent Anhui Jianghuai Automobile Group for 64 billion yuan ($103 billion).
 The buyer was Apollo Global Management LLC, and Fortress was left after the sale with policies tied to Phoenix, said people familiar with the deal who asked not to be identified because the transaction was private.
 Fortress said in court papers that it is harder to find a buyer for Phoenix policies and faulted the insurer’s underwriting.
 ‘Buyer’s Remorse’ The Lima suit is a case of “buyer’s remorse through which a hedge fund seeks to lock in massive returns on a high-risk investment through judicial action,” Phoenix said in a court document.
 Part of Fortress’s statehouse push is to require that insurers respond to inquiries from prospective life-settlement investors about the validity of policies they want to buy.
 He recommends buying AMD shares.
July 2 (Bloomberg) -- Rainer Viete, who visits Florida from Venezuela about once a month, said he’s buying an apartment at the Hyde Resort & Residences hotel-condo project near Miami so he can order a meal or rent out his apartment when he wants.
 buyer agreed to pay $34 million for the two unfinished penthouses at Schrager’s Miami Beach Edition, scheduled to open later this year.
 During the last recession, some buyers of condo-hotel projects incorrectly assumed unlimited property-value appreciation and lodging demand that would supply lucrative returns.
 The project stalled, and some residential buyers sued after Donald Trump pulled out in 2009.
 Much of the buyer demand is coming from South American investors, according to CEO Jorge Perez.
 Perez, who had to restructure more than $15 billion in debt on mostly vacant Florida condos in 2010, is looking to protect himself from potential future downturns by requiring at least 50 percent equity from buyers.
 “The money that is coming in from buyers from Latin America and Europe is unprecedented today,” he said in a telephone interview.
 “When we talked to some of these potential buyers, a lot of them said they were investors.
 That’s why we are creating a hybrid product” Viete, the Venezuelan buyer at the Hyde Resort -- a Related development with Miami-based Fortune International Group -- said the ease of renting out his condo was another reason he was attracted to the project.
 She has a buy rating on the shares.
 Experimental Treatments The company said earlier this month it agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Roche agreed in June to buy Genia Technologies Inc.
 “We believe that gradually the European macro-economic backdrop will improve” ING’s Stake ING’s ownership may shrink to 681 percent if underwriters fully exercise an option to buy as many as 116 million additional NN shares, the firm said yesterday.
 “When they said it’s going to be toward the lower end, that was disappointing,” said Nick Setyan, an analyst at Wedbush Securities in Los Angeles who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Starbucks.
 jumped 54 percent after the lender said it would repay public funds by buying back preferred shares.
 “ There are good and bad earnings, and shares are reacting accordingly” The Topix surged 14 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid signs Japan is weathering a sales-tax increase from that month and speculation the nation’s $12 trillion pension fund will buy more domestic shares.
 The lender said it will buy back and cancel 235 billion yen of preferred shares as part of a plan to repay a government bailout in 2003.
 Nomura increased its investment rating on the stock to buy from neutral, and boosted its share-price target to 2,080 yen from 1,650 yen.
 The mobile carrier’s earnings are “increasingly likely” to recover from the next fiscal year, and “substantial buybacks” are also likely, Nomura analyst Daisaku Masuno wrote in a report.
 Hitachi Chemical also said it will cut about 1,000 jobs through buyouts, and raised its half-year net-income forecast to 12 billion yen from 11 billion yen.
 “Institutional investors are buying the highest-quality properties they can get their hands on” Prices Paid Google, owner of the world’s largest search engine, paid about $738 a square foot for 188 The Embarcadero, a 28-year-old building that hasn’t been renovated and is about two-thirds empty, two people with knowledge of the deal said last week.
 Mylan said July 14 it will buy Abbott Laboratories’ generic-drug business and incorporate the new company in the Netherlands.
 “We believe that gradually the European macro-economic backdrop will improve” ING’s ownership may shrink to 681 percent if underwriters fully exercise an option to buy as many as 116 million additional NN shares, the company said yesterday.
 is betting Americans are ready to buy $3,000 televisions.
 The shares have slid 25 percent this year as investors wait for him to revive sales and prove that Best Buy can survive in an era when many shoppers buy their gadgets online.
 While Americans continue to buy TVs to watch communal events like the Super Bowl in their living rooms, secondary sets for bedrooms and kitchens are losing out to tablets and computers, said Veronica Thayer, an analyst for IHS Technology based in Austin, Texas.
 TVs are upgraded about every seven years on average, so theoretically the millions of people who snapped up flat-panel sets last decade are prime candidates to buy again.
 “Most people are buying TVs less than 50 inches and they are sitting 10 feet away, and at that distance you really can’t tell the difference,” Morrison said in an interview.
 and Deutsche Bank AG, as well as asset managers and other firms that are traditional buyers, including BlackRock Inc.
 A regulatory requirement could also help buyers comply; asset managers are wary of giving up their ability to terminate deals because they could be broaching their fiduciary duties to their clients, one of the people said.
July 15 (Bloomberg) -- India’s rupee fell for a second day amid speculation importers were buying dollars to pay bills.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 The company has considered strategic options including making an acquisition that would add growth product lines or buying back shares to assuage investors and avoid being bought by Valeant, the people said.
 Applied Materials agreed in September to buy Tokyo Electron for $939 billion in stock to add scale as a shrinking base of clients makes earnings of suppliers more volatile.
 now buy the majority of the production machines deployed by the industry and are the top three customers of both companies, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “I still believe the deal gets done,” said Ho, who recommends buying Applied Materials stock.
 Not Enough The Manufacturers Association of Israel, which says its members account for 95 percent of industrial output, has urged the central bank to buy enough foreign currency to push the shekel to a floor of 38 per dollar and keep it there.
 Benoit Anne, head of emerging-markets strategy at Societe Generale in London, said in a research note that he expects the bank to “double up with aggressive USD buying” The Czech Republic is among countries whose central banks have acted to weaken their currencies by announcing a target level.
 Lautenschlaeger said work by the central bank on a program that could see it buy asset-backed securities is a “worthwhile aim” as a way to revive the market and inject liquidity into the financial system.
 Not only does this boost transaction fees, but also lifts trading as investors typically are the most active buying and selling debt in the first days after an offering.
 The ruble’s potential declines may curb appetite from overseas investors who borrow in countries where rates are low and buy riskier developing-nation assets, according to Dmitry Kosmodemiyanskiy, a money manager at Otkritie Asset Management in Moscow.
 His stake in Puma includes more than 4 million common shares and a warrant to buy 21 million shares for $16 each.
 to buy some assets and brands.
 may be interested in buying the German maker of flavors and fragrances.
 Imperial Tobacco confirmed it is in talks to buy some of those assets and brands.
 Platow Brief reported that Ajinomoto hired an investment bank to prepare a deal to buy Symrise.
 agreed earlier this week to buy Wild Flavors GmbH for 23 billion euros, spurring speculation of consolidation in the industry.
 Whirlpool, the American manufacturer of Maytag and KitchenAid appliances, agreed to buy a 60 percent stake that represents about 67 percent of the Italian company’s voting rights.
 Today’s dealmaking included AirAsia Bhd’s $138 billion accord to buy the new A330neo, earning Chief Executive Officer Tony Fernandes a kiss from Fabrice Bregier, who runs Airbus’s jetliner unit.
 As AirAsia became the first airline buyer for the A330neo, Bregier grabbed Fernandes and bussed him on the cheek.
 The A330neo’s first buyer at the show was Los Angeles-based Air Lease Corp, whose CEO, Steven Udvar-Hazy, had urged Airbus to offer the plane now known as the A330neo.
 AerCap, SMBC AerCap Holdings NV said it would buy 50 A321neos worth $514 billion, the first jet purchase since the world’s biggest independent aircraft lessor bought Hazy’s former company, International Lease Finance Corp, for $76 billion in May.
 CIT Group Inc’s leasing unit said today it would buy A330 wide-bodies as well as single-aisle aircraft valued at $47 billion, before Avolon Aerospace Leasing Ltd.
 Intrepid also got options for four more of the planes, and CIT said it would buy 10 787-9 Dreamliners.
 Costs for selling its TSB Banking Group Plc consumer unit may also weigh on statutory earnings, analysts at Deutsche Bank AG, led by Jason Napier, who has a buy recommendation on Lloyds’s shares, wrote in a note to clients.
 who has a buy recommendation on the stock.
 Pretax Disappoints While George reiterated a buy recommendation on Dunelm shares, he lowered his price prediction to 900 pence from 1,050 pence because the company said it anticipates reporting pretax profit of 116 million pounds for the year, less than he anticipated.
 McCarthy last month in a television interview said the bank’s authority to help overseas companies buy US.
 Reynolds American Inc, 42 percent owned by BAT, this month agreed to buy Lorillard Inc, leaving the US.
 The company is using existing resources and debt and suspending its 15 billion-pound share buyback program from today.
 That makes a big difference” The fired Demoulas has offered to buy the company, as have an unspecified number of others, according to the board.
 Louisville, Kentucky-based Kindred had offered on July 14 to buy a 149 percent stake in Gentiva for $16 a share after the company rejected two takeover bids.
 That’s the most Kindred can buy without triggering a “poison pill” takeover defense by Gentiva.
 Japanese banks are struggling to boost profit from domestic lending as interest rates decline amid unprecedented bond buying by the central bank to end deflation.
 Telefonica, the second-largest mobile-phone company in Mexico, “wishes to buy Grupo Salinas’s stake in Iusacell.
 founder Jeff Bezos to buy the Washington Post.
 Deal Landscape There’s been more buyouts in the pay-TV industry, and programmers say they’re concerned they may have to follow suit, bulking up to maintain negotiating leverage with content buyers like Comcast, which is acquiring Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Alcatel-Lucent, based in Paris, sought last year for a buyer for the submarine unit, which Kepler Capital Markets had valued at as much as 800 million euros.
 Record LBO Energy Future filed for bankruptcy on April 29, seven years after it was taken private in a record leveraged buyout.
 More Fees Energy Future said it worked many months to win over enough lenders to refinance the debt from the 2007 buyout by KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs.
July 11 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy the European wealth-management business of Friends Life Group Ltd.
 The insurer said it plans to return 261 million pounds to shareholders through a share buyback.
 Blackstone is buying the unit through a fund, meaning it’s a financial investment and separate from the firm’s efforts to sell its products directly to wealthy individuals.
 Oil Tankers The firm started raising money for Tactical Opportunities in 2011 to make investments that don’t fall within the boundaries of its other businesses, such as leveraged buyouts or hedge funds.
 The unit’s largest single investment prior to Lombard was a $297 million deal to buy a stake in insurer Rothesay Life Ltd.
 The gauge rallied as foreign investors pumped $272 billion into Korean stocks this month through yesterday and were again net buyers of the securities today, exchange data show.
 While only about one in five grown-ups has interest in buying a smartwatch, kids’ models might be an easier sell, said Benjamin Arnold, an analyst at NPD Group Inc.
 Amy Stellitano, a 37-year-old nurse from New York, is one mom who doesn’t plan to buy an entertainment-based smartwatch.
 Among 16- to 24-year-olds, 30 percent say they are interested in buying such a product, while 25 percent of 25- to 34-year-olds were.
 With help from private equity funds and bond investors willing to buy debt that’s seven levels below investment grade, McClendon is building an empire following the same playbook he used to turn Chesapeake into a drilling powerhouse.
 lowered its recommendation on the Pacific Rubiales to hold from buy after the decision to end the STAR pilot program.
 Investors had been buying these segments, which pay the highest returns but are the first to absorb losses, as bond yields held near record lows.
 “Aggressive buyers want to move out the curve a bit,” said Guy Haselmann, an interest-rate strategist in New York at primary dealer Bank of Nova Scotia.
 The operating company owes about 80 percent of the $23 billion in debt taken on by Caesars Entertainment in a 2008 buyout.
 Verso has been trying to persuade the creditors to accept an exchange that will reduce its debt, satisfying a prerequisite for its $14 billion deal to buy NewPage.
 “The coalition has fallen apart, laws haven’t been voted on, soldiers can’t be paid, there’s no money to buy rifles, there’s no possibility to store up gas,” Yatsenyuk told lawmakers.
 In a market dominated by 30-year loans, buyers from banks to real estate investment trusts have piled into debt tied to 15-year mortgages offering greater protection against rising interest rates.
 Cushioning Blows While 15-year mortgage securities look too expensive to most investors, the rate protection is more important to certain types of buyers, said Jason Callan, Columbia Management Investment Advisers LLC’s structured-products head.
 REIT Demand REITs that invest in mortgages shifted more into safer 15-year debt after their shares were rocked last year by the debt slump that followed the Fed’s signals it was approaching the start of a tapering of its then-$85 billion in monthly bond buying.
 Under the so-called beta test, players can buy a $499-a-month membership for unlimited access to four titles, including Madden NFL 25, Peggle 2 and Battlefield 4, Redwood City, California-based Electronic Arts said in a statement today.
 Even as consumers keep buying GoPro’s tiny video cameras that adventurers strap onto their bodies to record their exploits, investors are locking in their gains after the company’s strong stock run, said Alex Gauna, an analyst at JMP Securities.
 “It looks clean to me,” said Gauna, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA, the Brazilian steelmaker led by Benjamin Steinbruch, is seeking to buy steel assets in the US.
 The interest follows a failed attempt earlier this year to buy OAO Severstal’s assets in the US, he said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Japan’s Topix index rebounded from its biggest drop since May after a report the nation’s pension fund freed itself to buy more domestic equities and investors weighed geopolitical risks in the Middle East and Ukraine.
 Private Equity Carlyle Group LP, the second-biggest buyout firm behind Blackstone, has more than doubled in size to $2027 billion in assets from $89 billion in 2009.
 Also, the Piper analysts believe people who used to kill time by wandering around the malls are now killing time by wandering around the web and retailers need to make it easier to buy stuff on their phones.
 Astellas Pharma De Vaulx aims to meet those twin goals by buying companies whose value is unappreciated by the market.
 The company, said de Vaulx, has a strong drug pipeline, and unlike many Japanese businesses, pays a dividend and buys back stock.
 Caliber Options Triangle and buyout firm First Reserve Corp.
 Efromovich is also negotiating with potential buyers in the US, according to the board adviser.
 Venezuela Debt US, Chinese and Brazilian investors are among prospective buyers, Peres said.
 “Turkey’s business interests such as its exports, infrastructure projects etcetera in the region could be at risk if this instability continues” Stocks trimmed losses of as much as 13 percent as the lowest valuations since April helped attract buyers amid an increase in developing-country risk appetite.
 buy niche brands to widen product ranges.
 Including the buyback of 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA, L’Oreal has spent more than $5 billion on deals this year, and it is looking for more targets.
 “We are seeing some buying opportunities in Africa and are examining related infrastructure development and geopolitical risks there,” Wang said in an interview.
 “What we are interested in buying are those on the world gold mining belt with big sizes” Zijin set aside 4 billion to 8 billion yuan ($13 billion) for acquisitions this year, chief financial officer Hongying Lin told reporters at a press conference in Hong Kong today to discuss the company’s first-half earnings.
 The miner is looking to buy gold projects with more than 100 metric tons of metal reserves and copper projects with more than 1 million tons of reserves, Chairman Chen Jinghe said in March.
 beef business as a cattle shortage pushes up prices for livestock that the company buys to process at its slaughterhouses.
 The unit was formed after JBS agreed to buy the Seara food-processing assets from Marfrig Global Foods SA for 585 billion reais in June 2013.
 Expedia announced its plans to buy Wotifcom for about $658 million last month.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Li Ka-Shing’s Cheung Kong Group won a contest to buy Envestra Ltd, after a rival bidder for the Australian gas distributor said it would sell its shares in support of the A$24 billion ($22 billion) bid.
 Envestra’s independent directors in May recommended Cheung Kong’s cash bid for the company over APA’s proposal to buy the company either via stock or a combination of cash and stock.
 Dell, Soros Other managers buying puts on the same two stock market indexes, include MSDC Management LP, the fund adviser tied to Michael Dell’s family office.
 The Union Fenosa and BG plants in Egypt have been unable to fulfill long-term contractual commitments to European and Asian buyers as the country diverts gas to supply domestic consumers.
 Infineon’s Offer Infineon, Germany’s largest chipmaker, agreed yesterday to buy International Rectifier Corp.
 In the past five years, buyers have paid a 35 percent premium on average for semiconductor companies, according to data compiled by Bloomberg based on deals larger than $1 billion.
 said last week that it’s buying Avago’s Axxia business for $650 million.
 Credit-Default Swaps Banks including Citigroup Inc, which discussed finding a buyer for at least a portion of the securities, couldn’t agree on a price, a person briefed on the meetings said.
 The talks also stalled because the government wouldn’t provide sufficient guarantees for a bond buyback, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the discussions were private.
 “He’s going to spend money not to lose” Before Ballmer’s buy, the top price paid for an NBA team was $550 million for the Milwaukee Bucks in April.
 acquirer may buy a foreign company and change its headquarters to the target’s domicile.
 Caesars, with properties in Las Vegas that include Caesars Palace and Planet Hollywood, has had only one profitable year since 2008 as it has struggled to service $23 billion of long-term debt incurred in a leverage buyout, amid a drop in gambling in the US.
 Debt Restructuring The company, based in Las Vegas, was taken private in a leveraged buyout in 2008 by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 The currency zone’s persistent low inflation may also prompt investors to buy UK.
 Foreign investors can currently only buy shares on the exchange through swap agreements and exchange traded funds.
 “This trend isn’t going to reverse itself any time in the immediate future” Bed Bath & Beyond, which owns the Buybuy Baby and Cost Plus World Market stores in addition to its flagship chain, has dropped 21 percent this year as it lost customers to online retailers.
 “We decided to take down media buying until we can better understand how to adapt to the new changes in the market,” he said by phone from Tel Aviv on Aug.
 Four out of five analysts rate the stock a buy, predicting it will rise twofold in the next year, according to the average estimate compiled by Bloomberg.
 Mandelbaum has a budget of as much as $75 million to buy other startups.
 is buying Jetpac Inc, a software developer for analyzing digital pictures, as it seeks to organize the world’s information and deliver it alongside advertisements on desktops and mobile phones.
 Significant Questions The Sierra Leone iron ore producer, down more than 75 percent in London trading this year, has some significant questions to answer regarding the probe, Deutsche Bank analyst Rob Clifford, who changed his buy recommendation on the stock to no recommendation, wrote in a report dated yesterday.
 That would be a 30 percent decline from three years ago, according to the analysis, which assessed suppliers as buyers, sellers or financially distressed companies, using data and comments from executives.
 It seems rather weird that yields are dipping below 1 percent and we’re buying, but we’re just moving out of other government bonds in Europe where it feels like they’ve gone too low” German securities have been supported as conflict from Ukraine to Iraq boosted demand for the euro region’s safest assets.
 agreed to buy Siemens AG’s health information technology unit for $13 billion as the US.
 “CEO Kaeser is addressing businesses previously deemed ‘sacred’ within the company” Danaher Corp’s Beckman Coulter last month agreed to buy Siemens’s clinical microbiology business in a deal expected to close in the first quarter of 2015.
 surged the most in more than 17 months after it agreed to buy $625 billion of power plants in a bet that electricity prices in the US.
 NRG spent $42 billion in 2012 to buy rival GenOn Energy and about $3 billion to buy Edison Mission Energy’s assets while the company was in bankruptcy.
 He rates Duke and Dynegy at buy and owns neither stock.
 The company may use the cash to buy back stock, he said.
 Most of the generating capacity Dynegy is buying, 5,053 megawatts, consists of gas-fueled plants.
 Interviews/Commentary Banks Said to Form Argentine Disputed Debt Buyer Group International banks are looking to put together a group of investors to buy disputed Argentine debt and resolve a US.
 Abe’s policies and the BOJ’s about 7 trillion yen in monthly sovereign bond buying succeeded in depreciating the yen more than 18 percent last year.
 television network, sold $175 billion of notes to help buy back debt in its first bond offering in two years.
 The company plans a tender offer to buy back 8875 percent senior notes due in 2019, 7875 percent debentures due in 2023, 7875 percent senior debentures due 2030, and 7125 percent senior notes due 2023 of CBS Broadcasting Inc, a wholly owned unit of CBS Corp, the company said in a statement today.
 Last month while discussing a new Apple partnership with International Business Machines Corp, Cook made it clear that part of the rationale for the pact was to sell to corporations so they could “be a catalyst for future iPad growth” “The one weak spot for Apple has been the tablet market,” said Amit Daryanani, an analyst with RBC Capital Markets, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 3i has appointed the investment bank to find a buyer for the lingerie retailer, which is expected to fetch about 200 million pounds ($336 million), said the person, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 The company also said its agreement last month to buy Trunk Club, a men’s online clothing service, will reduce full-year earnings by as much as 5 percent.
 I can just hear people rolling their eyes saying, ‘Not again’” Lakner has a buy rating on the Seattle-based retailer’s shares.
 Remke has a buy rating on the stock.
 agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 It also agreed to buy Predator Midstream Ltd, according to a statement from the company yesterday.
 When Orb’s backers decided to liquidate the company and cut their losses, Costello put together a group to buy it instead.
 The company is landing bigger deals and has come up with a new payment option that lets facilities buy Enlighted’s networks for no money down, paying instead with savings from their power bills.
 With bigger bond transactions, potential buyers often seek ratings from either S&P or Moody’s Investors Service, the two largest credit graders, because of the nature of their investment guidelines.
 Investors who want to buy existing storage properties are stymied by high prices.
 Kirk has budgeted $500 million this year to buy storage properties; last year, it spent $586 million.
 has ended talks to buy T-Mobile US Inc, the No.
 In May, Ergen said he would be interested in T-Mobile if Sprint failed to buy it.
 He has a buy rating on Dish shares.
 You could offer a very interesting wireless video play, and you’d have the ability to have a ubiquitous footprint anywhere in the country” Dish announced in July that it plans to participate in the Federal Communication Commission’s spectrum auction, letting the company buy airwaves that can be used to accommodate the growing number of smartphones, tablets and other wireless-data services.
 16, people began approaching, wanting to buy one.
 “We’re back to doing exactly the same things that were done in the credit markets during the crisis” The vehicle, run by John Zito, will focus on so-called event-driven shorts, such as leveraged-buyout candidates and companies with regulatory risks, as well as companies with flawed business models or those facing competitive pressures.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Russia still offers attractive buying opportunities, according to Skagen AS, a Norway-based investor that’s delivered better returns over the past decade than funds run by some of Wall Street’s biggest money managers.
 Since his January call to ignore the advice of much of Wall Street and continue buying emerging market assets, the MSCI Emerging Markets Index has gained 87 percent.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- General Motors Co’s subprime-auto lender, which received a subpoena from the Justice Department this month, is offering buyers extra yield on an asset-backed bond deal above one it sold in June.
 Santander Consumer USA, the top issuer of asset-backed bonds linked to car buyers with poor credit, received a similar subpoena.
 Cautious Approach Relative yields on asset-backed securities linked to all kinds of consumer borrowing, including credit-card debt and auto loans, rose as investors took a more cautious approach to buying bonds, according to Wells Fargo & Co.
 Other buyout funds including Bain Capital LLC are also interested in Shutterfly, though it hasn’t attracted technology and Internet companies, one of the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 Before today, the shares had gained about 15 percent since July 2, when Bloomberg reported that Shutterfly hired Qatalyst Partners LLC to find buyers.
 (TWX), announced a $6billion share buyback and posted second-quarter profit that beatestimates.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- SMA Solar Technology AG wants to buy more power-plant operations and maintenance contracts as the biggest maker of inverters used by solar farms seeks to expand its service business to counter falling sales.
 SMA, which today reported widening losses from a year ago, is interested in buying groups in Europe’s key solar markets including Germany, Spain, France, Italy and later the UK, Chief Executive Officer Pierre-Pascal Urbon said today in a phone interview.
 The company yesterday announced it would buy Phoenix Solar’s European operations and maintenance activities including customer contracts in Germany, France, Spain and Italy.
 to buy the unit’s stake in a Finnish online game developer.
 homes unexpectedly rose in July to a 10-month high as low borrowing costs and an increase in inventory drew buyers.
 “But, the small letter b, as one guy said to me, is we like the way you move” As the Federal Reserve began tapering its bond buying in January, signaling a possible rise in interest rates, Gundlach wagered correctly that they would fall due to a sputtering US.
 Some investors may be fleeing MBS funds that invest mostly in agency bonds and choosing funds that buy corporate bonds for higher returns, said Flack, who’s based in Los Angeles.
 Higher Returns Others are pulling money from some MBS funds that have large holdings of agency-backed mortgage bonds on concerns that prices of the securities will drop if the Fed stops buying them at the end of the year, said S&P IQ’s Rosenbluth.
 Already North America’s fifth-largest lumber producer, Resolute has been assessing potential opportunities to buy or construct US.
 1 it agreed to buy two sawmills in Georgia, increasing its US.
 The Fed has begun to wind down its bond-buying program, known as quantitative easing, as the US.
 Loeb focuses on event-driven investing, buying and selling stocks or bonds of companies going through changes like spinoffs or mergers.
 OAO TMK jumped 22 percent as OAO Rusnano said it plans to buy new shares issued by the steel pipe producer.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA jumped 23 percent after saying it will extend a share buyback program.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Market Basket Inc, the New England supermarket chain whose family owners are battling each other for control, has received interest from as many as dozen possible buyers, a representative for the company’s board said.
 Finding a buyer would help end a feud over Market Basket between the two sides of the Demoulas family that culminated in the firing of Arthur T.
 doesn’t reach an agreement with his cousin, the board could sell the majority stake to another buyer.
 That buyer would have the option of trying to buyout Artie T.
 The sale effort comes during a period of consolidation in the grocery business with larger players such as Kroger and Cerberus, which is also in the process of acquiring Safeway Inc, buying rivals to build market share and lower costs.
 Market Basket would give an outside buyer greater market share in New England, where it has 71 stores.
 The bond buyback plan was scrapped in May, according to a May 23 notice to bondholders obtained by Bloomberg News.
 “A few solid companies would be affected but it’s unlikely to hurt their credit worthiness” Bond Investments Samsung Electronics has been an active buyer of bonds as it manages its balance sheet.
 OAO TMK jumped the most in more than two months after OAO Rusnano said it will buy a stake in the the world’s largest pipe producer by output.
 TMK climbed 41 percent to the highest since July 16 after Rusnano, a state-run nanotechnology venture capital company, said it will buy 6 percent of the company.
 Last quarter, overseas buyers struck a record $40 billion of deals for Australian businesses including department-store operator David Jones Ltd, the data show.
 and European Union allies helped spur buying since the Micex’s price-to-earnings ratio fell to 48 times 12-month projected earnings on Aug.
 and Italy have committed to buying the version, the F-35B, which is designed for short takeoffs and vertical landings on fields and aircraft carriers.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- TPG Capital is offering investors discounts on management fees as it tries to raise a $10 billion buyout fund after investing in soured deals including TXU Corp.
 TPG Capital, which controls more than $59 billion in buyout, credit and real estate assets, is dangling the incentives after disappointing returns from deals made during the buyout boom and financial crisis cast a shadow over more than two decades of investment success.
 Since 2009, the firm has made an average investment of $306 million and hasn’t participated in a consortium, or a takeover done by a group of buyout firms, the marketing document shows.
 Other buyout firms have adopted similar fee breaks.
 Winning Ways TPG is seeking to convince investors it’s returning to winning ways after backing two of the biggest money-losing deals of the boom era: a $48 billion buyout of Texas utility TXU, now Energy Future Holdings Corp, in which KKR and Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Results Improved TPG’s buyout results have improved since the Washington Mutual collapse, helped by a surge in asset values that enabled it to harvest gains on successful deals.
 North American buyout funds of at least $45 billion in size raised in 2006 posted a 68 percent median net IRR, according to data provider Preqin Ltd.
 While Pfizer shelved plans in May to buy the UK.
 “We prefer buybacks over takeovers,” said Barry James, who helps oversee $55 billion as president of James Investment Research Inc, a Pfizer shareholder in Xenia, Ohio.
 Jefferies on March 27 maintained its buy rating and raised its price target on Citic Pacific to HK$1710 from HK$1390 after Bloomberg first reported the possible asset purchases.
 Restrained increases give the central bank’s policy makers room to keep interest rates low well after the projected end of their bond-buying program in October.
 The Fed is on pace to wind down its third round of asset purchases in October after two years of buying Treasury and mortgage securities.
 Officials in July tapered monthly bond buying to $25 billion in a sixth consecutive $10-billion cut.
 announced a deal in May to buy the company for more than $48 billion to gain video subscribers in the US.
 to arrange a loan and seek partners for a possible management buyout, according to people with direct knowledge of the matter.
 They declined to specify the size of the loan, which is being arranged with other banks, or how many additional shares the executives would buy.
 “Personally, I haven’t signed any contract with Itau and Citi regarding a decision to buy shares.
 The company, Latin America’s largest non-state oil producer, hasn’t been approached by a potential buyer, CEO Pantin said on May 13 during an investor event in New York.
 Emaar doesn’t provide analysts or investors with guidance on the number of properties it expects to hand over to buyers each quarter to help predict revenue.
 The developer adopts an accounting method that recognizes property sales once the buyer is handed keys of the completed property, even though payments are made while construction is progressing.
 The company’s board has also approved a plan to buy back as much as $500 million in stock, according to a filing.
 “Japanese stocks are going strong on the back of strong appetite from domestic investors” The Topix has rebounded 13 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 fell 21 percent to 3,745 yen after jumping 15 percent yesterday as parent Roche Holding AG was said to be in talks to buy out the Japanese drugmaker.
 15 that Roche is in talks to buy remaining the 40 percent of Chugai.
 Consumers are upgrading to the new generation of game players, Sony Corp’s PlayStation 4 and Microsoft Corp’s Xbox One, and buying new titles with snappier graphics.
 He recommends buying the stock.
 buyout firms, posted its first full-year loss since listing in 2011 as it sold fewer bottles.
 “It would be quite clever to do some bolt-on acquisitions” to gain access to more wine supply, he said, adding that the company could also buy more wine directly from growers if needed.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- UOL Group Ltd, a luxury-hotel operator based in Singapore, agreed to buy a land plot in the City of London financial district from Heron International Ltd.
 “Where they really stood out was on their PC side,” said Jeffrey Fidacaro, an analyst at Monness Crespi Hardt & Co, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Caesars was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 “There are buyers of duration regardless of sentiment toward the Fed or the economy” The US.
 Copper and nickel assets will likely drive interest from potential buyers, E&Y said.
 Prospective buyers of the debt to be issued by Westfield Stratford City Finance Plc requested the bonds be retained in accordance with European rules for securitization that require originators or sponsors to keep at least 5 percent of a deal, according to a person with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified without authorization to speak publicly.
 The EU has blocked local investors from buying new stock and bonds issued by Sberbank and VTB along with other companies it’s sanctioned for Putin’s actions in Ukraine.
 The Topix rebounded 94 percent from a May 21 low on signs the economy is weathering an April sales-tax increase and amid that buying by GPIF will bolster demand for stocks.
 Cutrale, a closely held juice maker controlled by Brazil’s Jose Luis Cutrale, is partnering with banks owned by Joseph Safra, the country’s second-richest man, to buy Chiquita and cancel its purchase of Fyffes.
 lender’s Merrill Lynch unit is lead arranger and book-runner on the IPO, the first listing of a buyout firm in the United Arab Emirates, the people said, asking not to be identified as the information is private.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen has said officials will keep the benchmark rate low for a “considerable time” after the bond buying ends.
 Deerfield, Illinois-based Walgreen would have had to change the terms of its 2012 agreement to buy Boots to give the combined company a non-US.
 Buccaneer Energy Creditors Get $10 Million in Settlement Buccaneer Energy Ltd, the official creditors’ committee and AIX Energy LLC, the company’s proposed buyer and secured lender, reached a global settlement putting to rest objections to sale and a Chapter 11 plan.
 The buyer also will assume specified liabilities.
 The buyer’s parent is Angelcare Monitors Inc, according to the sale contract.
 The buyer is paying $14 million plus quantified amounts to cover specified contract, employee and other costs and will assume specified liabilities, according to court papers.
 Kid Brands and the buyer also entered into a transition services agreement.
 Carter’s and Disney-branded inventory held by Kid Brands may be transferred to the buyer, provided that it can’t be sold until Carter’s and Disney grant licenses to the buyer or there is further court action, according to the order.
 Originally, the buyer was to be Cerberus Business Finance LLC, as agent for the pre-bankruptcy and post-bankruptcy lenders.
 The buyer will pay about $125 million in cash to fund wind-down payments and pay specified priority claims and transfer taxes, according to the sale contract.
 The buyer will also pay designated claims to vendors and assume specified liabilities.
 “With the lack of space they have, they have to come up with some ingenious way of doing this” The area is especially flood-prone because of the proximity of buildings and roads to the river, which runs above-ground from near the busy Shibuya subway and train station to Tokyo Bay, according to the Tokyo government’s construction office.
 no longer wants to buy CNN now that it’s unlikely to be put up for sale, Chief Executive Officer Les Moonves said.
 Moonves had expressed interest last month in buying the 24-hour news channel if it became available after Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 “We are encouraged by the operating leverage in European materials which bodes well for a recovery in earnings,” said Robert Eason, an analyst with Goodbody Stockbrokers in Dublin who has a buy rating on CRH shares.
 Asked whether he would buy some of the assets for sale amid the planned merger of the world’s two largest building companies, Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd, Manifold said that “there are many opportunities” Holcim and Lafarge, seeking antitrust backing for their planned $40 billion deal, this year outlined an initial list of assets for sale to cut the importance of Europe to 20 percent of combined revenue and win regulatory backing.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen has said officials will keep its benchmark interest rate low for a “considerable time” after the bond buying ends.
 Bernanke signaled new bond buying that has pumped up the Fed’s balance sheet to a record $443 trillion.
 The biopharmaceutical company was raised to “buy” from “hold” by Deutsche Bank analyst Alethia Young.
 lost 54 percent, the most in the S&P 500, to $8844 after Jefferies Group LLC downgraded the stock to hold from buy, saying it is fully valued.
 agreed to buy a stake, pushing its valuation to 361 times estimated earnings.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Axa SA’s property unit agreed to buy a 50 percent stake in a shopping mall and other assets in the English city of Bristol from Land Securities Group Plc for 2678 million pounds ($450 million).
 Investors have been buying large shopping malls with leisure and entertainment facilities in Europe in the belief they will be less affected by Internet retailing.
 Banks and brokerages exacerbated the selloff as they offloaded stocks to pay back some of the money that was borrowed to buy them.
 “This discovery should help increase the attractiveness of the international portfolio to potential buyers,” Richard Tullis, an analyst at Capital One Southcoast Inc.
 The announcement came after Jana Partners LLC, a New York-based hedge fund, disclosed a $1 billion stake in the company and said it was pushing for a split to free up cash for share buybacks and reduce spending risks.
 The borrowing adds to signs Canadians are continuing to buy big-ticket items and tuning out warnings about unsustainable debt growth.
 “If you can’t put down 20 percent including taxes you aren’t ready to buy a car,” he said.
 Price, Payment “People don’t buy price, they buy a payment,” Cloutier, 59, said.
 Today’s buyer wants monthly payments around C$200, a goal made attainable by longer loan terms and low borrowing costs, he said.
 Higher interest rates could slow the market or lead some customers to buy a smaller or cheaper car.
 cut MagicJack from a buy to a hold yesterday and lowered its price target 36 percent to $14.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- There are simple exchange-traded fund strategies (“buy gold”) and more-ambitious exchange-traded fund strategies (“dynamically allocate across a basket of assets based on historical price momentum and volatility”) ALPS Distributors Inc.
 Oil Fund (strategy: buy oil, basically) as well as the more-ambitious varieties, such as those of the dynamically allocating persuasion.
 McDonald’s Japan is now buying items from Thailand, she said.
 McDonald’s China outlets started handing out vouchers for free hash browns and French fries as a compensation to customers who buy its burgers made without fresh vegetables, the restaurant chain said today.
 Alibaba also has the right to buy a stake of about one-third of Small & Micro Financial with the approval of Chinese regulators, according to the filing.
 is buying a 20 percent stake in the supermarket operator.
 He rates the stock buy.
 “It doesn’t appear that the cost of fuel will make a leap down, so the motivation to buy aircraft with lower operating costs is high,” Lawson said on a conference call with analysts.
 Merchants who buy Amazon’s reader and sign up before Oct.
 - Gannett agreed to buy the rest of Carscom for $18 billion.
 Federal Reserve moves closer to ending its bond-buying program and raising interest rates.
 More Congestion China Southern, Asia’s largest airline by passengers, and other local carriers are buying planes and adding flights in response.
 India buys almost all its gold from overseasand the country increased the import tax three times last year.
 We’ve been cherry picking many of these assets over the last couple of weeks and buying them because they’re trading at significant discounts to where we think fundamental value is” Record withdrawals from junk-bond funds helped push average US.
 “You should be buying the BBs, you shouldn’t be buying the 7 percent stuff,” he said.
 “Worst case, Oriflame is fined” Of the 17 analysts who cover the stock and share their ratings with Bloomberg, nine advise clients to sell, while six have hold recommendations and two have buy ratings.
 Ginnie Mae is mostly concerned about the liquidity of its servicers, which must buy the soured mortgages out of its securities before later getting repaid by insurers, he said.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 Gaijin says that about 20 percent of them buy upgrades, and those who do spend an average of $10 per month.
 At the same time, Murdoch’s company announced a $6 billion stock buyback authorization.
 The fund will probably pare positions in some semiconductor makers while buying Apple suppliers after the market retreats, said Shen Chien-hung, the acting manager of Taishin 2000 High Technology Equity Fund.
 added 32 percent after saying it will buy Wisconsin-based Waupaca Foundry Inc.
 That’s good for the market” The Topix rebounded 13 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 was looking for a buyer for its stake in gas fields off southern Vietnam after years of talks failed to reach agreement on the price PetroVietnam would pay for the fuel.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 The venture, Harbour Energy Ltd, will own and operate energy extraction and processing assets, with Noble the preferred buyer and re-seller of its products.
 Dresser-Rand is worth the expense, according to William Blair & Co, which says buyers will be drawn to the Houston-based company’s promising new subsea technology and steady cash flow from maintenance services.
 It just gives them better negotiating power” Sulzer could also be a logical buyer, Bergner of Gabelli said.
 The company may want as much as $90 a share in a takeover, which could be too much for potential buyers, said Daniel Leben, an analyst at Robert W.
 “Chinese equities are still attractively valued, offering investors a good buying opportunity” July economic data due over the next week will give a sense of how well growth is holding up after accelerating to 75 percent in the second quarter from a year earlier.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Dollar Tree Inc, the discount chain that’s in a bidding war to buy Family Dollar Stores Inc, cut the top end of its full-year earnings forecast amid acquisition-related costs.
 Last month, Dollar Tree agreed to buy Family Dollar for $85 billion, creating a sprawling discount chain with $18 billion in sales and more locations than any US.
 raised its recommendation on the platinum producer to “conviction buy” from neutral, saying that concerns over the company’s balance sheet and operations are overdone.
 Tully, the mayor of Downers Grove, Illinois, is a trial lawyer who represents domestic and multinational companies in complex commercial litigation matters  Tarkowski focuses her practice on complex litigation and consumer finance, representing clients in the debt-buying and debt-collection industry.
 companies to buy smaller foreign businesses and take their addresses for tax purposes.
 “His achievements at Arsenal speak for themselves and, above all, his reputation as a leader and team builder makes him, to my mind, a great fit to take our club forward” Lerner, former owner of the National Football Association’s Cleveland Browns, announced at the end of last season that he’s looking for a buyer for the Midlands-based team.
 Dibadj has the equivalent of a buy recommendation on the shares.
 “You have Polish Minister Sikorski talking about Russian forces poised to pressure or invade Ukraine and that’s all the buyers needed today to go into hiding” President Vladimir Putin ordered the government to prepare a response to US.
 The Fed last week cut its monthly bond buying to $25 billion in its sixth consecutive $10 billion reduction.
 The central bank reiterated that it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
 homes unexpectedly rose in July to a 10-month high as low borrowing costs and an increase in inventory drew buyers.
 In that transaction, the car-rental business would keep the Hertz name and get cash proceeds of about $25 billion to pay down debt and support a $1 billion share buyback.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said this month policy makers have intensified preparation to buy asset-backed securities.
 Svenska Handelsbanken AB upgraded the shares to buy from reduce, citing improved market conditions for the Swedish maker of sterilization systems.
 Claure, 43, will be appointed less than a year after SoftBank agreed to buy a majority stake in his mobile-phone distributor for $126 billion as part of the Japanese carrier’s push for international expansion.
 Chief Executive Officer Sergio Marchionne said before the meeting that buyout costs exceeding 500 million euros may make the deal ineffective.
 “We believe the selloff is based on a misunderstanding regarding the merger,” including an assumption that all investors opposing the transaction will seek a buyout and put the cost cap in range, George Galliers, an analyst at International Strategy & Investment in London, said in an e-mail.
 Risk Arbitrage The heightened deal flow can benefit managers such as Sandell who engage in risk arbitrage, a trading strategy that involves buying shares in the target of a takeover after the transaction has been announced.
 The company doubled its buyback and boosted the cash dividend.
 The buybacks and dividend increase countered a decline in revenue and operating income, as advertising sales fell.
 CBS increased its stock-buyback program to $6 billion from $3 billion, while raising the quarterly dividend 25 percent to 15 cents a share.
 Meatpacker JBS SA advanced the most on the gauge after Deutsche Bank AG raised its recommendation to buy.
 Tim Participacoes SA climbed the most since May as parent Telecom Italia SpA was said to be preparing an offer of as much as 7 billion euros ($94 billion) to outbid Telefonica SA in the race to buy Vivendi SA’s GVT.
 The phone company slumped earlier this month after Telefonica SA offered to buy GVT, spurring speculation Tim’s alternatives for expansion were shrinking.
 Alibaba Group agreed to buy 60 percent of the company, formerly known as ChinaVision Media Group Ltd, in March for HK$624 billion ($804 million) to gain rights to television dramas and English Premier League soccer.
 Suggestions that Russia will de-escalate the crisis in Ukraine supported buying, he said.
 Priceline’s investment in Ctrip, through a convertible bond and an agreement to buy Ctrip shares on the open market over the next year, means the company may own as much as 10 percent of Ctripcom, which is listed on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
 The company agreed to buy more than 2,000 towers from Etisalat Nigeria earlier this month and said it would invest further $100 million in the towers acquired.
 15, the longer-term trend has seen foreign investors selling rather than buying the securities.
 equities markets lately, it’s buying on dips.
 One 60-second commercial focuses on the case of a woman who lost her life savings after buying government notes to pay for the care of her 97-year-old father.
 Salix rose, naturally, which only adds to its market value and thus the expense of Valeant’s proposed buyout of Allergan should Allergan complete that deal.
 Allergan rose, probably because the prospect of a defensive acquisition bolsters its defense as well as adds the wrinkle of a possible inversion play: Salix itself is in the middle of trying to buy an Ireland-based unit of Cosmo Pharmaceuticals, the Journal reports.
 We tend to jump for anything Tara Lachapelle writes because the smartest stories make our job easier, and she finds that in the days following 21st Century Fox’s aborted attempt to buy Time Warner Inc, Scripps has risen to match Time Warner’s multiple based on expectations it’s going to be a target.
 He highlighted the companies that fit the bill and are rated buys at Sterne Agee: Comerica Inc, PrivateBancorp Inc, PNC Financial Services Group Inc, Fifth Third Bancorp and East West Bancorp Inc.
 Among them are buy-rated lenders Washington Federal Inc, Umpqua Holdings Corp, EverBank Financial Corp.
 buy with their raises.
 A month later, YPF agreed to buy assets from Apache Corp.
 agreed to buy a stake in the company.
 Coca-Cola agreed to swap some brands and buy a 17 percent stake in the company for about $215 billion, increasing its exposure to the growing energy-drink market.
 Sentiment about whether or not it’s a good time to buy waned last week, with the buying-climate index falling to 323 from 326.
 The benchmark equity gauge has almost tripled since March 2009 amid three rounds of bond buying from the Fed.
 Khazanah’s offer to buy the 306 percent stake it doesn’t already own in the Subang, Malaysia-based company at 27 sen per share is 125 percent higher than the stock’s Aug.
 Man Group said in June it would buy Boston-based Numeric Holdings LLC for as much as $494 million, and Pine Grove Asset Management LLC, a New Jersey-based investment firm that manages about $1 billion.
 Panmure Gordon analysts Keith Baird and Jeremy Grime downgraded their recommendation on the shares to hold from buy, citing a rally this year and “lack of visibility on earnings” “Investment performance was mixed with AHL doing better, but other areas like equities disappointed,” they wrote.
 who recommends buying Man Group, said he expects management fees to “edge up somewhat” in the second half.
 “We reiterate our buy with a 135 pence 12-month price objective” Investors began pulling money from AHL in 2011 after actions by politicians and central banks broke up trends in asset prices, contributing to losses for the hedge fund.
 The 58-year-old billionaire said opportunities to buy real estate in the region won’t last much longer and that he’s looking to purchase sites that can be developed to serve people he expects to move there because of the legislation.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Carlos Slim’s decision to buy out AT&T Inc’s stake in America Movil SAB has reaped him almost $1 billion in profits in just over a month.
 The CHART OF THE DAY shows the recent gain in America Movil shares just after Slim boosted his holdings in his flagship company by buying out AT&T Inc’s 83 percent stake at the end of June.
 Slim made “a good decision in terms of returns” by buying AT&T’s shares, said Valeria Romo, an analyst with Banco Monex SA.
 Shenyin Wanguo HK Ltd, which soared last week on its parent’s plan to buy Hong Yuan Securities Co, advanced 68 percent to HK$517.
 The panel decided to reduce monthly bond buying by $10 billion for the sixth straight time, staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 Housing sales in the city are on the rise as low interest rates lure buyers deterred by government curbs last year.
 Carry traders who sold the dollar and euro to buy a basket of five currencies including Argentina’s peso and Indonesia’s rupiah would have made almost nothing since the start of July, after receiving 92 percent from February to June, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Days earlier, it ended a recommendation to buy Hungary’s forint with a loss of about 1 percent.
 Balakrishnan are seeking a 112 billion-rupee ($18 billion) buyback by India’s second-largest software services company to boost the stock’s value.
 “The buyback would be an easy way to satisfy investors,” said Rossini.
 The former executives have also proposed Infosys should announce an ongoing buyback program of as much as 40 percent of the previous year’s profit “on a consistent basis” The company posted a net income of 106 billion rupees in the year ended March, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 companies to take a foreign address by buying a smaller business.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Persimmon Plc, the UK’s largest homebuilder by market value, said sales of houses and apartments rose 28 percent in the first half as demand from buyers increased.
 Yamato is taking advantage of a boom in online buying that has boosted express parcel deliveries more than 10-fold in the past three decades in Japan, as the number of mobile phones surged to 144 million last year from 200,000 in 1988.
 “The expansion of the use of mobile phones is making it easier to access the Internet and buy products from anywhere 24 hours a day,” Hiroaki Mochida, an analyst at Marusan Securities Co.
 Northam, where Paul Dunne took over as chief executive officer from Glyn Lewis in March, will consider buying mines and assets of other producers in South Africa and elsewhere to reach its 1 million-ounce production target, it said.
 While the reduction will allow smaller investors to afford more expensive shares, it won’t increase trading volume because they will redirect that money from lower-priced shares rather than buying more, Loh said.
 “Small investors can now buy blue chip such as Singapore Airlines, Keppel and the banks with the lowering of the board lots.
 Sven Richter, head of frontier markets at the RenAsset Management, which has offices in Johannesburg, Guernsey and London, is “still finding attractive stocks” to buy.
 “If Colgate is that lax in putting this kind of chemical in their product, I don’t think I’ll buy other Colgate-Palmolive brands,” Pollock said.
 “It’s definitely a buyer’s market,” Tom McNeill, director at Green Pool Commodity Specialists, said in an e-mail yesterday.
 “If they fall below 16 cents, the price of Thai sugar would become flat against New York, an attractive level for buyers” Thai sugar is competing aggressively in Asia with Brazilian supplies, which are also trading below rates in New York, Claudiu Covrig, senior analyst at Kingsman SA in Lausanne, Switzerland, said by e-mail yesterday.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Rupert Murdoch was deterred in his effort to buy Time Warner Inc.
 “Also, after what happened with Time Warner and Sprint, you put those two elements together and there’s likely to be more demand to add protection in deals” Reassessing Deal Gary Ellis, Medtronic’s chief financial officer, said in June that while the company plans to buy Covidien with or without the inversion, it would reassess the decision if the laws changed.
 to lower its corporate income tax bill, typically by buying a smaller foreign business.
 companies to buy smaller foreign businesses and take their addresses for tax purposes.
 Maureen McDonnell asked for a Rolex watch, which Williams said he produced, and a Range Rover sport utility vehicle, which he declined to buy.
 “I shouldn’t have had to buy things like that to get the things I needed,” Williams said.
 “It was a bad business decision” Williams said he declined Maureen McDonnell’s request to buy a Range Rover for one of her children because it would be “too visible” and because he didn’t want a car dealer to have a bank check that might link him to the McDonnell family.
 The majority of those surveyed by Westpac Banking Corp, the nation’s second-largest mortgage lender, were confident in buying a property to rent out and would only reconsider their plans if interest rates climbed 2 percentage points.
 Investors are driving sales, with the share of first-home buyer mortgage approvals matching a record low of 123 percent in April, according to government data.
 People have lost a lot of money and one is sympathetic” SARB will buy 7 billion rand of the bad bank’s 17 billion rand of loans and seek to recoup that money by collecting the debt.
 in London with a buy rating on Standard Chartered shares.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Onex Corp, Canada’s largest buyout firm, said its deal pipeline is heating up at a time when proceeds from asset sales are poised to reach a record.
 Onex made its first acquisition of the year in July with the $133 billion buyout of Parsippany, New Jersey-based insurance claims services provider York Risk Services Group Inc.
 Hohn is known as one of the few Europe-based activist investors, buying stakes in companies and pressuring management to make changes that might drive up the share price.
 The incentive for sending cargoes from the region to buyers in Asia is at its strongest in four years, data from PVM Oil Associates Ltd.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- As African Bank Investments Ltd’s bondholders calculate losses after a central-bank rescue of the South African lender that includes a debt write down, Banque CIC Suisse sees a buying opportunity.
 African Bank has been split into a “good” bank and “bad” book, with the Pretoria-based central bank buying the soured loans.
 I would buy into weakness” Abil, as the lender is known, collapsed after saying last week it needed to raise at least 85 billion rand ($803 million) to survive, causing the stock to drop 95 percent over three days and bond prices to fall by more than half.
 in a debt restructuring in 2012, agreed to buy 144 UK.
 The bill “will strengthen the bargaining position of potential foreign buyers of Russian gas,” creating excess competition among suppliers from the country, Deputy Chief Executive Officer Valery Golubev wrote to the Energy Ministry.
 Once customers have the option to buy deals on a website, instead of during a limited time typically associated with e-mailed deals, that reduces “the sense of urgency in purchasing,” Arvind Bhatia, an analyst at Sterne, Agee & Leach Inc, wrote in a research note.
 A new homebuyer would pay about three times that much for a mortgage on a similar property in their postcode.
 “There’s so much press at the moment about the sales market overheating that people are just not prepared to pay the prices” While it’s generally cheaper to buy a home in the UK.
 economic growth as foreign investors flooded into the market and buyers took advantage of the Bank of England’s record-low benchmark interest rates to borrow ever greater multiples of their income.
 On average, London buyers take out mortgages worth about 31 times their annual income, equal to the peak before the financial crisis and higher than any other UK.
 A person buying the average home where Morris lives would pay more than 7,100 pounds a month for a 25-year mortgage with a 20 percent down payment and an interest rate of 3 percent.
 He is considering buying a home next year in Chiswick or Wembley, outside prime central London.
 Christian Scheuring, a 32-year-old project manager at Internet marketing company Bazaarvoice Inc, said he wants to buy a home even though he gets a good deal on his rent in Wapping, between the City of London and Canary Wharf financial districts.
 The government has stimulated homebuilding by offering equity loans and mortgage guarantees to home buyers.
 “The idea was to try to clamp down on these kinds of practices, where certain investment advisers were trying to buy access or influence,” said Scott Kimpel, a partner at the Hunton & Williams law firm who worked at the SEC when the rule was passed by a 5-0 vote.
 “Elk-Antelope sits in a very attractive position” from a cost perspective, and Asian buyers will want to diversify their sources of supply, he said.
 So when his computer screen showed hourly earnings were unchanged in July, he knew exactly what to do: direct his traders to buy more Treasuries.
 “We’re buying into the view inflation won’t be a problem and that there is continuing scope for the Fed to exercise patience,” Wan-Chong Kung, a Minneapolis-based money manager at Nuveen Asset Management, which oversees more than $100 billion, said by telephone on Aug.
 The program, expected to start in October, will offer unprecedented access to China’s $37 trillion equity market while opening a route for wealthy mainland investors to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 10, according to data from Centaline Property Agency Ltd, even after the city introduced measures to cool the market and the Fed started winding down its bond-buying program.
 “We believe that down the road someone’s going to try to buy the resource, no doubt,” Tonken said.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Sunrun Inc, a closely held provider of rooftop power systems, agreed to buy as much as 100 megawatts of panels from REC Solar ASA, ensuring its supply amid concerns of a looming shortage.
 “There is a price at which we are sellers, there’s a price at which we are a buyer” Canada Pension reported gross investment return of 16 percent for the three months ended June 30, according to the statement.
 China buys 67 percent of global seaborne supply.
 “Any near-term upside surprise in demand will be a positive for prices” Iron ore rose in July for a second straight month on speculation that China’s demand for imports was improving, helping to absorb a global surplus as local supplies in the largest buyer are displaced.
 predicted a dramatic recovery in prices in second half, saying that it’s now cheaper for steel mills in China to buy seaborne supply rather than domestic material.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- SMA Solar Technology, the biggest maker of inverters, will buy a unit of Phoenix Solar AG to expand in operating and servicing photovoltaic power plants.
 SMA today signed a contract to buy Phoenix Solar’s European operations and maintenance activities including customer contracts in Germany, France, Spain and Italy, the Niestetal, Germany-based company said in a statement.
 The fund will focus on mid-market buyouts and capital investments in the US.
 won enough investor acceptances last week for the buyer to take its target private.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- The Nasdaq 100 Index’s highest level since the 2000 technology bubble has sent options traders rushing to buy protection.
 Contracts hedging against a 5 percent decline in QQQ, the biggest exchange-traded fund tracking technology companies, cost 42 points more than calls to buy, according to three-month implied-volatility data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “There’s been a focus on returning capital to shareholders through dividends and buybacks” Shares of Apple Inc, which has the highest weighting in the Nasdaq 100, surpassed a 2012 record this week as investors looked ahead to new products such as bigger-screen iPhones and a wristwatch-like device that may jump-start revenue growth.
 Apple is also returning $130 billion back to investors through buybacks and dividends.
 India buys almost all its gold from overseas and the country increased the import tax three times last year.
 The money could be used for stock buybacks or acquisitions, executives said at the time.
 Kapoor also entered new categories, outbidding Bayer AG to buy vitamin and supplement maker Schiff Nutrition for $14 billion in 2012, and last year added health care remedies in China and Latin America.
 “We’re hoping to sell this dark blend to those people that are still going to buy our original blend but are maybe looking for a different experience,” Chief Executive Officer Marc Caira said in an interview at a promotional event in Toronto yesterday, which featured a performance by Canadian singer Jann Arden.
 Home buyers, debt investors, lenders and taxpayers all have a stake in the effort to change the $54 trillion market for government-backed mortgage securities.
 The proposal lays the groundwork for a market in which bond buyers’ contracts to purchase mortgage debt could be filled by either Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac notes, FHFA officials said on a conference call with reporters.
 When questioned about College Portfolio Buyer, ITT spokeswoman Nicole Elam said that was a “generic” name used in the filing to identify an undisclosed potential buyer.
 The real estate deal was canceled after the buyer asked for additional time for due diligence, and ITT declined because it would have limited the company’s options to negotiate with other parties, ITT said.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Electrolux AB, the Swedish maker of AEG stoves and Frigidaire refrigerators, said it’s in talks to buy General Electric Co’s home-appliances business.
 “The second half of the year is going to look a good deal better than the first half” Employment growth, historically low mortgage rates and more properties from which to choose are giving would-be homebuyers the confidence to take the plunge, just as improving business investment is probably behind the pickup in manufacturing.
 The increase in supply is coming about as prices recover and an improving economy gives sellers confidence they’ll find buyers, the group said.
 “It’s jobs and wages, it’s traditional homebuyers and particularly first-time buyers” Existing home sales, which are tabulated when a purchase contract closes, are recovering from a 13-year low of 411 million in 2008 after reaching a record 708 million in 2005.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- When Dennis Bashaw last considered buying a sport-utility vehicle a decade ago, he saw them as gas-guzzling road hogs.
 Once built on a large, truck platform, the model was overhauled in 2011 with a unibody chassis, like a car, allowing for better fuel efficiency while offering the size and space Hurst and other SUV buyers look for.
 “With the uncertainty in the economy, that compounded that issue” Hoarding Cash Casualties of the slump include the former Hawker Beechcraft, which filed for bankruptcy in 2012 and abandoned jets before agreeing to a buyout by Textron Inc.
 The New York-based company fits the industry’s profile of a typical plane buyer as one with rising profits: Net income rose 35 percent to $776 million in fiscal 2014 from a year earlier.
 Because planes take so long to develop, Embraer is reaping the benefits from decisions made more than a decade ago to commit to built-from-scratch models in an industry where buyers prize the newest, most-innovative products, according to Foley, the consultant and former executive for Paris-based Dassault Aviation.
 agreed to buy a $50 million stake in Tesla and sold a shuttered California factory to its new partner for a mere $42 million.
 is in talks to buy a stake in Ivanhoe’s Kamoa project in the Congo, people with knowledge of the matter said in March.
 “The large businesses in China tend to buy where the government leads,” Frank Gillett, an analyst at Forrester Research Inc, said in an interview.
 Competitors’ Technology China’s procurement agency told departments to stop buying antivirus software from Symantec Corp.
 rivals in recent years by ramping up production in Germany as well as buying from countries that use the euro, Chief Finance Officer Martin Blom said by e-mail.
 Short-sellers borrow shares and sell them, expecting to buy them back later at a lower price for a profit.
 Aegon will buy a 51 percent stake in Banco Santander Totta SA’s insurance activities in Portugal, expanding a partnership with the Spanish bank that started last year, it said today.
 Middleware Market For Inspur, the deal could help convince potential customers to buy its hardware with the option to use IBM’s software.
 19 Plants Dynegy is buying 10 of its new plants from Duke for $28 billion as the larger utility sheds those riskier assets.
 Amlak and Tamweel were the two biggest mortgage providers in Dubai during a real-estate boom that began in 2002 when the government allowed foreigners to buy properties in some parts of the emirate.
 insurer created by Clive Cowdery, posted a 24 percent drop in the value of new business in the first half and increased its share buyback plan to 317 million pounds ($534 million).
 The share buy-back program rose from 261 million pounds.
 In March, Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 A negative yield means investors who buy a security and hold it until it matures will receive less than they paid to purchase it.
 Eighteen analysts who track the stock on Bloomberg recommend buying the GDRs, while two say hold and one says sell.
 Cheaper grain is bolstering profit for buyers including Tyson Foods Inc.
 It will take about 538 semi-truck loads, each capable of hauling 80,000 pounds of corn and soybeans, to get his anticipated harvest to buyers.
 “If they don’t get the value here, they are not going to give it away” Failed Sales The world’s second-biggest mining company opted to keep its diamond businesses after failing to find a buyer and deciding not to pursue an initial public offering of the unit, it said last year.
 and Workday Inc, who deliver software as a service via the Web, freeing users of the need to buy and maintain hardware.
 Meanwhile, Chief Executive Officer Bill McDermott and former co-CEO Jim Hagemann Snabe have spent more than $15 billion since 2010 buying suppliers of Web-delivered applications in areas including human resources and purchasing, as well as technologies such as database maker Sybase.
 Thai billionaire Charoen Sirivadhanabhakdi is in talks to buy the holding, Bloomberg News reported yesterday.
 That touched off a three-front bidding war for the two companies, with Heineken NV eventually buying Asia Pacific Breweries and Charoen beating out OUE Ltd.
 7 to buy Metro AG’s wholesale stores in Vietnam for $874 million including debt.
 plans to split into two publicly traded companies by spinning off its publishing business, including USA Today, and said it has agreed to buy full ownership of Carscom.
 In the deal announced yesterday, it said it will buy out the companies that own the rest of the company -- McClatchy Co, Tribune Media Co, AH Belo Corp.
 Caesars was purchased in a $307 billion leveraged buyout led by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 ‘Meticulously Careful’ Pershing Square began buying stock in the anti-wrinkle drugmaker in February, then started purchasing over-the-counter call options in March, amassing almost 10 percent to become Allergan’s biggest shareholder, according to regulatory filings.
 Allergan’s lawsuit accused Valeant and Pershing Square of secretly plotting with each other to let the hedge fund buy shares as the tender offer was being put together.
 Ackman, 48, said in a letter to his investors yesterday that Pershing Square was “meticulously careful” in its investment and sought advice from outside lawyers on buyout regulations.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Enquest Plc Chief Executive Officer Amjad Bseisu said he plans to buy more oil and gas assets in the UK.
 “The manifestation of geopolitical issues is compounding and adding to the buying,” said Aaron Kohli, an interest-rate strategist at BNP Paribas SA in New York, one of 22 primary dealers that trade with the Fed.
 yields higher than those of other government bonds lured buyers.
 While revenue was “light,” traders are overreacting to the earnings report because orders remain strong, said Alex Henderson, an analyst with Needham & Co, who rates the stock a buy.
 Six analysts have buy recommendations on Allot, while two rate it hold and one advises clients to sell the shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Hungarian company, scheduled to report second-quarter earnings tomorrow, has risen 15 percent this year on bets its parent may offer to buy outstanding shares after a similar step in the Czech Republic and other purchases in eastern Europe.
 Eight analysts recommend selling Magyar Telekom, while four have a hold rating and three say buy, according to data collected by Bloomberg.
 The company also said today it agreed to buy the 73 percent interest it doesn’t already own in Classified Ventures LLC, which owns Carscom, for $18 billion in cash.
 TeliaSonera plans to buy Tele2’s Norwegian business to bolster its No.
 companies to take a foreign address by buying a smaller business.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Tim Participacoes SA fell the most on Brazil’s benchmark stock index on speculation the mobile-phone carrier’s alternatives for expansion are shrinking after Telefonica SA offered to buy rival GVT.
 Its position in the Brazilian market has weakened” Telefonica offered to buy GVT for 67 billion euros ($9 billion) to expand in a fast-growing broadband market and address antitrust concerns in the country.
 The stock has 23 buy and four hold recommendations from analysts.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Yara International ASA, a maker of ammonia, nitrates and specialty fertilizers, agreed to buy 60 percent of phosphate producer Brazil’s Galvani Industria Comercio e Servicos SA to expand further in South America.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Nobel Biocare Holding AG, the Swiss maker of dental implants that’s exploring a sale, has attracted interest from potential buyers including EQT Partners AB and Danaher Corp, said people with knowledge of the matter.
 Nobel Biocare was initially approached by Swedish buyout firm EQT with an offer of about 17 Swiss francs a share, which would have valued the company at about 21 billion francs ($23 billion) said the people, who asked not to be identified because talks are private.
 and buyout firms are also expected to look at Nobel Biocare, the people said.
 Acquiring Nobel Biocare would allow some buyers to relocate their domicile to Switzerland to benefit from lower rates -- a so-called tax inversion.
 Potential buyers that are looking at the asset may decide against a bid, the people familiar said.
 Potential buyers include Swiss rival Straumann Holding AG, Sirona Dental Systems Inc, Johnson & Johnson, Medtronic Inc, Zimmer Holdings Inc, Henry Schein Inc, and 3M Co, according to a note on July 30 from Lisa Bedell Clive, a London-based analyst at Sanford C.
 “The company has performed well in share gains,” said Ho, who recommends buying the stock.
 Applied Materials, seeking to add scale and capture more market share, last year agreed to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 high-yield securities in the past month, or the $99 billion of cash pulled from mutual funds that buy the debt.
 Jefferies LLC’s David Zervos wrote in a note to investors this morning, “Maybe I have been looking at different data releases than the rest of the market, but I don’t see what all the fuss is about” On the other hand, Morgan Stanley strategists said in a report today that “investors shouldn’t feel pressured to buy aggressively” Regardless of who’s right, the world’s biggest economy is showing signs of accelerating, which ostensibly would help the most-indebted companies.
 Some say buy.
 Western Asset is in the buy camp, betting this rout will be like all the others in recent years: Short lived.
 It has also given details of proposals that allow some junior creditors to buy shares in the company at a discount so it can repay notes in the Punch A securitization for less than face value.
 Khazanah is in the process of buying up the 306 percent stake in Malaysian Airline System Bhd.
 The talks were already under way before Spain’s Telefonica -- which competes with Telecom Italia in Brazil’s phone market -- offered to buy GVT for 67 billion euros ($896 billion) this month.
 In its proposal to Vivendi, Telefonica would give the French company the right to buy almost all of its stake in Telecom Italia.
 The company will use $50 million of the proceeds from the private sale to buy back shares from the note acquirers as part of a previously announced $150 million repurchase program, according to a statement yesterday.
 Alibaba also gets the perpetual right to 375 percent of the finance arm’s pretax earnings and can buy a stake of about one-third if regulators approve.
 Yahoo Criticism The sale means the financial-services assets will be owned by Chinese nationals instead of the global investors that may buy shares in the IPO.
 The CFO this year repaid a 6 million-rand ($562,000) loan from the company that was used to buy shares after the transaction was found to have breached corporate rules.
 “She could show you where Alibabacom was heading and how it interacted with the rest of the group” Alibabacom’s stock soon tumbled after a decline in exports and more than 2,300 vendors were found to be using the website to defraud buyers.
 They and other supporters have given about $34 million to the effort to impose criminal background checks on those who buy firearms online or at gun shows.
 A competing gun-rights initiative has garnered about $11 million to require buyer background checks only when the seller is a firearms dealer, the current federal standard.
 “It’s blindingly obvious that everybody who buys a gun ought to get a background check,” said Barton, the Expedia founder who said he’s a gun owner.
 “Globally the car is limited to 250 units” The companies are bringing in top executives to meet directly with customers as high-end luxury buyers look for a different buying experience.
 Peter Grady, head of the Maserati brand in the US, said he planned to spend the weekend with customers who have less time and interest in buying a new car in the traditional way.
 Mercedes also works to leverage its classic-car business: helping enthusiasts buy parts, arrange restorations and make purchases.
 Lexus sales rose 19 percent in July, delivering 27,333 vehicles, as strong financing offers wooed buyers.
 Luxury-auto makers are adapting to a changing market by adding lower-cost models to attract new buyers, while retaining loyal wealthier customers with higher-end vehicles.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Infineon Technologies AG, Germany’s largest chipmaker, agreed to buy International Rectifier Corp.
 agreed to buy LSI Corp for $66 billion, and semiconductor-equipment supplier Applied Materials Inc.
 agreed to buy TriQuint Semiconductor Inc.
 “Surely that has been the correct strategy, ‘buy the dips,’ for the past two years, however this time feels different,” he said.
 “Our clients are pretty confident in the earnings recovery, so any major correction will be regarded as a buying opportunity” After mostly missing the first four years of the bull market that started in 2009, individuals are proving as stubborn about pulling out of the market.
 While the buying shows demand for equities is strong, it’s no guarantee prices will rise, said John Manley of Wells Fargo Funds Management.
 Revel AC Inc’s hotel and casino, which employs3,106 people, is seeking a buyer in bankruptcy.
 “If Amazon chooses not to sell Disney titles, then consumers will go and buy them elsewhere,” he said.
 The quantitative-easing program, in which the central bank buys bonds to hold down long-term borrowing costs, “was all five years-plus maturities,” he wrote.
 “Biggest buyer is disappearing” Fed Tapering The Fed cut the monthly pace of bond-buying by $10 billion for a sixth time on July 30.
 House Losing Las Vegas-based Caesars, the subject of a $307 billion leveraged buyout at the top of the market in 2008, has struggled since then to cope with its mountain of debt and declining revenue.
 In June, JPMorgan paid $147 million to buy a Jersey City building it had been leasing, according to the Record newspaper in nearby Hackensack.
 Infineon Technologies AG, Germany’s largest chipmaker, agreed to buy the company for about $3 billion in cash, adding to its power-management technology business.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- A subsidiary of Cantor Fitzgerald LP agreed to buy a Ranieri Real Estate Partners LP commercial-mortgage business that’s led by onetime Deutsche Bank AG executives Jon Vaccaro and Eric Schwartz.
 MGM put its Borgata interest into a trust and agreed to find a buyer.
 The most expensive option is to buy back as much as 15 trillion rubles of bonds to replace foreign debt, for instance, using money from the National Wellbeing Fund, the report said.
 offered to buy out minority shareholders in a restructuring plan for the national carrier that suffered two disasters this year.
 Khazanah will pay 27 sen a share for a total of 138 billion ringgit ($429 million) to buy the remaining 306 percent it doesn’t own, it said in a statement today.
 The hedge-fund firm began buying stock in the anti-wrinkle drugmaker in February, then started purchasing over-the-counter call options in March.
 and Och-Ziff Capital Management Group LLC in buying Allergan shares in the quarter.
 said yesterday that it agreed to buy his International Strategy & Investment Group LLC and the remaining 40 percent of its own equity business for as many as 81 million shares, or as much as $406 million at Evercore’s Aug.
 Schlosstein said today on a conference call with analysts that Evercore plans to buy back about half of the shares it will issue to fund the deal over the next five years, reducing the potential dilution for investors.
 Swiss Re’s corporate solutions unit, which sells insurance to corporate customers, last month agreed to buy a Chinese unit of the UK’s RSA Insurance Group Plc for 71 million pounds ($120 million) following a deal in February to buy 51 percent of Columbia’s Confianza.
 The group also agreed to buy the UK.
 Admin Re, one of its three business pillars, buys and manages blocks of closed life and health insurance funds, mainly in the US.
 Ro-Ro Isletmeleri AS won’t be disclosed, according to a statement from Esas, owner of Turkey’s biggest low-cost airline, and Actera, its top buyout specialist.
 “Whether investors move into government institutional money-market funds or just buy securities themselves, there will be a large demand” for short-dated debt, Jim Lee, head of US.
 That’s made finding buyers for the nation’s debt securities even more important.
 “I expect it will prove that net asset values don’t actually prove to really float much” ‘Principal Preservation’ The prospect of prime money-market funds falling below $1 a share, known as “breaking the buck,” has already prompted some companies to weigh a shift to those that buy US.
 That’s caused prices to tumble and costs to fall for buyers including Tyson Foods Inc, while it has reduced returns for growers to a four-decade low, a threat to the 12-year jump in farmland values.
 The investor has also pressured Bob Evans to spin off its packaged-food business, sell real estate and buy back shares -- moves that would return cash to shareholders.
 12 to buy contracts in California and already trades in PJM.
 Some investors also are being sidelined because they can’t buy a security without a rating from one of the two biggest graders, allowing hedge funds to fill the void and demand higher yields, they said.
 More Selective Banks last year started dropping Moody’s from the riskier portions of some transactions, which include as many as a dozen classes to meet differing risk appetites for buyers ranging from hedge funds to insurance companies.
 - Kinder Morgan is buying up its partnerships for $44 billion.
 Those who had been convinced at the start of the year that yields would rise have been flummoxed by (mostly) unforeseen events creating global instability that typically drive buyers to the safest securities, as well as wage growth constrained by, among other things, rising productivity.
 Which is why guys like NineAlpha Capital’s Jason Evans are ready to slam the buy button on bonds, why Janet Yellen’s leash on monetary policy appears to keep getting longer and why Bill Gross might be looking pretty prescient right now.
 “The ebb and flow of news related to Ukraine continue to set most of the current agenda in the European gas market” Ukraine passed a bill last week that enables the country to impose sanctions on Russia that may include banning Gazprom from transiting fuel through Ukraine and forcing European companies to buy gas at the Ukrainian border.
 Earnings Season The Topix climbed 13 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy, signs Japan is weathering a sales-tax increase and speculation the $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more local shares.
 The Spanish treasury last week sold 10-year bonds at record low yield of 27 percent as the European Central Bank pledged to hold down borrowing costs for an “extended period” Investors prefer Spanish debt to Italian paper, demanding an extra 24 basis points to buy 10-year debt issued by Italy, which unexpectedly slipped into economic recession in the second quarter as Rajoy said he plans to raise his forecast for Spanish growth.
 Phaidon, a publisher of art and design books, agreed to buy Artspace, the companies said today in a statement without disclosing the price.
 to expand its auctions to the online marketplace’s 149 million buyers.
 The company, which sells art and collectibles ranging from wine to Soviet space memorabilia, planned to use Artspace’s client list to solicit more consignments and attract new buyers, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 The biggest challenge for online art companies is not only to lure new clients but convert them into repeat buyers.
 “How do you make people decide to buy art? After all, it’s a discretionary purchase,” said Almgren, whose new online venture, Artfinder, allows customers to buy art directly from little-known artists.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Ingersoll-Rand Plc agreed to buy Cameron International Corp’s centrifugal compression unit for $850 million.
 Cameron expects proceeds from the sale of $600 million, which it will use to help fund stock buybacks, the Houston-based company said in a separate statement.
 jumped by the most in more than 14 years after parent Roche Holding AG was said to be in talks to buy out the Japanese drugmaker to secure full control of its cancer and arthritis drugs.
 Last month, Roche, the world’s largest maker of cancer drugs, agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Roche agreed in June to buy Genia Technologies Inc.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 and this may positively affect Tencent’s stock price, triggering people to buy call options” Shares of Tencent climbed 12 percent to HK$12980 today in Hong Kong, the biggest boost to the benchmark Hang Seng Index.
 “They want to limit their loss, so they’re using options instead of buying the underlying stock.
 London Stock Exchange Group Plc said in June that it will buy that business for $27 billion.
 This year, Tencent has also agreed to buy 199 percent of Craigslist-like 58com Inc.
 The company in 2004 started Aliwangwang, a PC-based instant messenger for buyers and sellers, that is now used for negotiating prices, customer services and delivery notifications on its Taobao marketplace.
 “We’ve had ebbs and flows” Lyngen recommends buying five- and seven-year notes on speculation they’ll outperform other maturities amid the debt sales.
 “If Sprint can’t buy T-Mobile it will be difficult for Sprint to do business,” Yoshihiro Nakatani, a senior fund manager at Asahi Life Asset Management Co.
 The Wall Street Journal reported earlier that Sprint dropped its plans to buy T-Mobile.
 when the government abandoned rules that had pushed consumers to buy the retirement products.
 Rather than buying hundreds or thousands of expensive and proprietary machines to handle specific jobs, Goldman and others are deploying software that lets them run cheaper networking equipment more efficiently.
 Instead of buying equipment, the company wanted Cisco to run its gear on the bottler’s behalf and charge a monthly fee to deliver the service.
 “We are delivering more flexible options for buying from Cisco,” David McCulloch, a spokesman for Cisco, said yesterday.
 “Now, customers will be able to test it in earnest” Most customers that want SDN are doing so in part because it lets them buy whatever brand of hardware they want, potentially disrupting Cisco’s ability to keep them locked in to its proprietary products.
 “Since fundamentals have not changed and the global economy is still headed in the right direction, I see the recent correction as a buying opportunity” European equities pared gains after the Bank of England lowered its forecasts for wage growth in the UK.
 Credit Suisse Group AG raised its rating on dental-implant maker, which is exploring a sale, to outperform, similar to a buy recommendation, from neutral.
 have shown interest in buying the business, people with knowledge of the matter said earlier this week.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Ali Babacan, deputy Turkish Prime Minister, said the government would support state bank TC Ziraat Bankasi AS buying Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, the Istanbul Islamic lender in partnership talks with Qatar Islamic Bank.
 ended talks over buying T-Mobile and joining the third- and fourth-largest US.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Equistone Partners Europe, a private-equity group spinout from Barclays Plc, plans to seek about 17 billion euros ($23 billion) for its second buyout fund since independence from the British bank, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Owen Clarke, chief investment officer of the firm, led the management buyout of the private-equity group from Barclays in 2011.
 It focuses on buyouts valued at 50 million euros to 300 million euros.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Ageas SA, the insurer that emerged from the collapse of Fortis, will return more cash to shareholders through buybacks after being found liable to compensate Fortis investors as insurance profit beat estimates.
 Ageas will spend 250 million euros on buybacks in the next 12 months and said it will receive about 195 million euros from the sale of its unprofitable UK.
 “The decision to announce a new and even higher buyback program is a very strong sign of confidence” The insurer needs to convince investors that shareholder litigation related to the Fortis collapse won’t wreck regular payouts of cash generated by its insurance businesses in Europe and Asia as it seeks to bolster profitability by allocating more capital to property and casualty insurance and its Asian partnerships.
 Earlier this year, Ageas agreed to buy the remaining half of a Portuguese joint venture with Banco Comercial Portugues SA.
 Bosch oversees a family-run empire started in 1911 by his grandfather, which invested $500 million last year to buy a stake in the Central America operations of Telefonica SA.
 He could become even richer if his partner, Millicom International Cellular SA, buys him out.
 In a two-year put and call option agreement that Millicom and Lopez struck in January, Millicom has the option to buy his stake for $18 billion.
 “The low interest rates are leading investors to buy riskier portfolios, which pushes along the sale of non-core assets,” Christian Hamann, an analyst at Hamburger Sparkasse AG, said yesterday.
 “European markets are pretty cheap on average so buying a bit now can be a good investment if you look ahead three to six months” Stoxx 600 companies trade at 151 times estimated earnings, down from last month’s four-year high of 157 and cheaper than the 162 multiple for S&P 500 firms, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The Spanish telecommunications company said it has offered to buy Vivendi’s Brazilian Internet-provider unit GVT.
 Chinese equities are still attractively valued, offering investors a good buying opportunity” Nikon tumbled 94 percent to 1,43550 yen in Tokyo, its lowest price since September 2010, after cutting its full-year profit forecast by 16 percent to 38 billion yen.
 “Interest rates can be as low as you like; if employment is low people won’t be buying houses or renovating homes” Last month, the insulation, roofing and ceiling supplier acquired Sodimat SAS, a French distributor of flat roofing products, for 44 million euros ($58 million).
 economy, marked by a 4 percent jump in gross domestic product in the second quarter, kept the annualized selling rate, adjusted for seasonal trends, above 16 million for the fifth straight month as buyers returned to dealer lots following the frigid winter.
 At the same time, average prices industrywide rose $800 per vehicle last month as car buyers shift to more costly SUVs.
 Revamped cars and trucks from Ford, GM and other automakers are luring buyers to dealerships in droves and prompting analysts, already bullish about the industry’s prospects, to issue even more optimistic projections.
 A change in buying habits is also making owning a new car more affordable over time with leasing and longer-term loans attracting buyers, she said.
 Restrained increases give the central bank’s policy makers room to keep interest rates low well after the projected end of their bond-buying program in October.
 He won a state appeals court ruling that sellers’ agents have a fiduciary duty to protect buyers’ interests, not just those of their clients, when there’s only one brokerage involved in a deal.
 If left standing, the decision could compel disclosure of confidential client information or force brokerages to drop out of transactions where they represent both buyers and sellers, threatening commissions on tens of thousands of deals.
 “The decision takes a large step away from what is current practice, and it would surprise me if brokers continue to have ‘dual agency’ deals if the ruling isn’t struck down” The issue of dual agency arises when the agents for both a home’s seller and its buyer work for the same brokerage.
 New Disclosures Coldwell Banker’s lawyers argue that agents will be forced to disclose information that buyers and sellers typically keep quiet, such as a homeowner needing a quick sale because of financial problems.
 “The buyer’s or seller’s only options are to 1) agree to this nightmare; 2) forgo the sale or purchase they wanted to consummate; or 3) fire their sales person,” Coldwell Banker’s attorneys said in a court filing.
 Billionaires’ Beach Cortazzo said in court filings and testimony that a Malibu ordinance allows for more of a property’s space to be counted in its square footage, and that he explained to potential buyers, including Horiike, why he used the larger size in his brochure.
 He retired in 2002, at age 44, with plans to buy a California mansion larger than anything he could find in Asia.
 International buyers spent $92 billion on American houses in the 12 months through March, led by a record $22 billion from Greater China, including Taiwan and Hong Kong, where Horiike resides much of the year.
 About 60 percent of the foreign buyers paid cash, according to a July report by the National Association of Realtors.
 A trial court jury, acting on the judge’s instructions, found that Cortazzo as the listing salesperson had no fiduciary duty to the buyer.
 It cited closing documents required under state law establishing that Coldwell Banker, as broker for both the buyer’s and seller’s agents, had “a fiduciary duty of utmost care, integrity, honesty and loyalty” that extended to Cortazzo as well.
 Cortazzo’s lawyers said in court filings that he removed the square footage from the official listing and put it at zero so he could personally explain to a potential buyer his rationale for using 15,000 square feet in the sales brochure -- which he said he did with Horiike.
 At the same time as announcing the split, Gannett said it agreed to buy the rest of Classified Ventures LLC, the parent company of Carscom, for $18 billion in cash.
 Will it be able to meet its revenue targets for 2014 or will it cut its sales forecast? I don’t rule out lowering Mail’s sales estimate for this year” Price Estimate UralSib has a hold rating on Mailru, while 20 of 23 analysts covering the company still recommend investors buy the stock.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Boralex Inc, the Montreal-based renewable power producer, bought the proposed 14-megawatt Calmont wind-power project in France from an undisclosed buyer for an undisclosed price.
 “The positive trend in operating figures will continue” Ustunisik recommends buying the stock, rating it at outperform.
 “It’s up to the board to make sure that they literally shake the tree as much as possible to get the best offer” Accepting the takeover proposal would force Charlotte, North Carolina-based Chiquita to scrap its plan to buy Irish competitor Fyffes Plc in a tax-advantageous inversion deal.
 In Play The bid for Chiquita comes five months after the banana producer agreed to buy Fyffes in an all-stock transaction that would create the world’s biggest banana producer.
 “How many times do you have a chance to buy a premium brand in a sector that doesn’t have too many?” Shah said.
 “Because you have the headline news with inversions, they’re basically saying, ‘OK, if we’re going to do something, this is our chance’” Cash Now Chiquita shareholders seem to prefer the role of target over buyer.
 “There is a thin buyer universe,” he said.
 rose 14 percent after a report the convenience store operator made the short list to buy a $16 billion stake in China’s Sinopec Sales.
 Evraz, partially controlled by billionaire Roman Abramovich, bought 25 percent of Highveld from Anglo American Plc in 2006 and increased its stake to 79 percent the following year after buying out Anglo’s remaining shares and stock from Credit Suisse Group AG.
 The sentiment has improved and “there are local institutions buying,” Khan said.
 Aker Solutions will maintain its policy of distributing 30 percent to 50 percent of profit to shareholders via dividends or buybacks, said Araujo.
 agreed to buy closely held International Strategy & Investment Group LLC in an all-stock transaction as it seeks to expand its research and trading business.
 Evercore will issue as many as 81 million share equivalents to buy both ISI and the 40 percent of its own equities business that it doesn’t already own, according to a presentation from the company today.
 Pfizer abandoned a 695-billion-pound ($116 billion) effort to buy London-based AstraZeneca on May 26, and under UK.
 The company, which is run from Parsippany, New Jersey, obtained its Irish domicile by buying Warner Chilcott Plc last year.
 than Pfizer’s AstraZeneca bid, and Valeant is tangled in a hostile attempt to buy Allergan Inc.
 Read could also make acquisitions and use the lower tax rate to instantly improve the profits of any US-based company that he buys.
 The day before, AstraZeneca announced it was buying Barcelona-based Almirall SA’s lung medicines for $875 million, and could pay another $122 billion if the drugs meet development and sales goals.
 He considers the businesses Berkshire’s “core” operation, even as he’s expanded in recent years by buying manufacturers, electric utilities and one of the largest railroads in the US.
 Locomotives, Generators Angola’s government announced plans in June to buy $1 billion of trains and power generators from GE.
 The introduction of REITs will provide a new source of cash to Indian developers that have struggled to reduce debt with interest rates among the highest in Asia, while giving investors the ability to buy into the country’s property market.
 in the 1960s and are publicly traded, pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 buyout firm TPG Capital are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 and Rio to announce share buybacks in the next six months.
 analysts have said they’re “not convinced a buyback is due or that it would be a responsible use of funds” for BHP.
 The talks were already under way before Telefonica offered to buy GVT for 67 billion euros ($896 billion) this month.
 Buy Ratings Chevron has 17 buy, two sell, and 12 hold recommendations from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 2014 Goal Along with Accord and Civic topping Toyota’s Camry and Corolla as the best-selling cars in their categories to individual buyers, Honda’s CR-V sport-utility vehicle ranks as the retail leader among SUVs and has the most total sales of any SUV in the US.
 The planned tie-up, scheduled to start around October, will give foreign investors unprecedented access to the mainland market while opening a route for wealthy Chinese investors to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 Philippine Long Distance will buy a 10 percent holding, consisting of new shares, for 333 million euros, Berlin-based Rocket said today in a statement.
 private equity had its best performance since 2006, returning 206 percent as buyout firms took advantage of a booming share prices to exit investments, according to Cambridge Associates LLC, a Boston-based researcher and consultant.
 Private-equity funds use borrowed money to buy companies, improve profitability and resell them.
 He said the company will take a balanced approach to using its cash by increasing the dividend, expanding the stock buyback program and maintaining a “smart” balance sheet.
 Top Performers Ji Jing, a 25-year-old from Beijing, traveled to Korea this month to visit filming locations for the show and buy cosmetics worn by the lead actress, Jun Ji Hyun.
 Chinese customers buy the company’s mascara and whitening creams at duty-free shops in Korea, along with Amorepacific’s Etude House and Laneige outlets in Hong Kong and China.
 is considering buying a golf course for a resort south of Brisbane, Chief Executive Officer Matt Bekier said in a phone interview, to entice Chinese gamblers who’ve driven a fourfold jump in Macau’s casino revenue over the last six years.
 Crown spent $100 million last fiscal year buying three Bombardier Inc.
 Chinese Investors Chinese buyers overtook Americans to become the biggest overseas investors in Australia’s property market in the 12 months ended June 2013, according to federal government data.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Meda AB, the Swedish drugmaker buying Rottapharm Madaus of Italy after spurning a takeover bid from Mylan Inc, fell the most in three months after cutting its sales forecast on difficulties manufacturing a skin treatment.
 Meda twice rejected advances from Mylan this year and instead chose to buy Rottapharm for about $31 billion, picking the family-owned company from a list of about 10 targets.
 ’Entry Point’ Johan Unnerus, an analyst at Swedbank AB, said the decline in the share price as a result of the manufacturing issues and pressure on two or three products could provide an opportunity to buy Meda stock, “given the steady progress for emerging markets and over-the-counter sales” He predicts the stock will rise to 135 kronor, implying an increase of about 45 percent.
 Frustrated in their attempt to find a company to buy, the partners took a tip from an investment banker and purchased debt-laden soda maker Hansen Natural Corp.
 Name Change On advice of a banker, they decided to buy family-owned soda maker Hansen Natural.
 Congressional Spotlight Coca-Cola explored buying Monster in 2012 and found the price too high, according to a person familiar with the matter who asked not to be named, Bloomberg News reported in January.
 Kunoch acquired the stake by buying Actis DB Holdings Ltd, which holds 148 percent of Nigeria’s Diamond Bank, the lender said today in a statement.
 Interest for Dutch software providers is increasing, with private-equity firm Advent International agreeing to buy Dutch cloud-software maker Unit4 for about 115 billion euros in November.
 The non-profit publication, which buys all the cars it tests, said the problems mostly emerged after the sedan had been driven more than 10,000 miles (16,090 kilometers).
 “The second quarter confirms our view that lower funding costs on deposits will be a major driver of net interest income,” Benoit Petrarque, an analyst at Kepler Capital Markets in Amsterdam who advises buying KBC, wrote in an investor note.
 Foot Locker put up these results despite a “challenging mall environment,” said McShane, who recommends buying Foot Locker shares.
 It agreed last year to buy Glencore Plc’s stake in Frieda River, estimating the development costs at as much as $18 billion.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Celsia SA, Colombia’s fourth-biggest power producer, is turning to Central America for its first international expansion, buying stakes in seven power plants in Panama and Costa Rica in a $840 million deal.
 The company will buy hydroelectric and thermal plants in Panama and a wind plant in Costa Rica from Courbevoie, France-based GDF Suez, according to an e-mailed statement yesterday.
 At one stage, we had 19 buy ratings and three holds -- you can only go one way from there” Henderson Group Plc became the latest UK.
 “We might slip back to flush out the remaining weak hands, but we’re recommending buying this dip” The S&P 500 slid 1 percent yesterday to the lowest level since May as tensions escalated over Ukraine.
 Time Warner also reported earnings that beat estimates and said it plans to buy back $5 billion of its shares.
 Fox climbed 33 percent as it authorized a $6 billion buyback plan.
 lender raised its quarterly dividend to 5 cents a share and dropped plans to buy back stock after the Fed approved its resubmitted capital plan for 2014.
 website for real-estate agents and prospective home buyers, also raised its annual sales forecast as advertising and listing revenue surges.
 “Agents are increasingly looking to Zillow as a lead-generation tool,” said Ronald Josey, an analyst at JMP Securities, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 Friends Provident, with almost 7 billion pounds in assets under management, reported a 44 percent slump in the value of new business, a measure of future sales, in the first half of the year, citing “challenging market conditions” Friends Life said in May that it would miss its earnings target this year after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne in his budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy annuities with their pension savings.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Shares in Kuwait Food Co, the Middle East operator of KFC and Pizza Hut restaurants, were suspended from trading on the Kuwait Stock Exchange today after Saudi Arabia’s Savola Group said it had held talks to buy a stake in the company.
 Savola, a food producer with a market value of about $12 billion, today confirmed a Bloomberg report that it may buy a stake in Americana.
 Premier Oil climbed 32 percent to 3368 pence after UBS raised its recommendation on the shares to buy from neutral.
 The brokerage said the company intends to narrow the gap between the stock price and net asset value and may boost its share buyback.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Asya Katilim Bankasi AS, the Istanbul-based lender known as Bank Asya, said exclusive partnership talks with Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ ended amid comments from Turkish officials that a local buyer is preferred.
 will continue to advise Asya on finding a buyer, Cengiz Onder, the bank’s head of investor relations, said by phone from Istanbul.
 Hurriyet newspaper reported in June that Ziraat was interested in buying Asya.
 Babacan’s comments were later contradicted by Yigit Bulut, chief economic adviser to Erdogan, who said that the state wouldn’t consider buying a bank with 28 billion liras of non-performing debt, according to televised comments on the Sky360 news channel on Aug.
 The bank hired Goldman Sachs to help find a buyer on June 11.
 health-care landlord by market value, agreed to buy HealthLease Properties Real Estate Investment Trust and formed a partnership for additional properties to expand in senior care.
 agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II for about $34 billion.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore sank to the lowest level in almost eight weeks as a credit gauge in China plunged, adding to risks that demand will slow from the world’s biggest buyer of the raw material.
 A decision to skip a widely anticipated share purchase will disappoint investors, who had expected a $3 billion buyback, Citigroup Inc.
 “The miscalculation was that there had clearly been a very significant expectation in the market for a buyback,” Paul Gait, a London-based analyst at Sanford C.
 From behind bars, Fetisov says any worries officials may have about his political goals or the influence his fortune can buy are misguided because he isn’t seeking Putin’s ouster.
 For now, the commercial aviation services unit, which manages maintenance, repairs and spare-parts inventory for airlines around the world, contracts out the job of dismantling the used planes Boeing buys to spur orders of its new 747-8 jumbos.
 “Rothesay is buying some certainty from us,” Phil Waldeck, senior vice president of pensions and structured solutions at Prudential Retirement, said by phone.
 By simplifying his empire’s corporate structure, Kinder will lower borrowing costs and unify the company under a single stock that he can use as currency to buy competitors, Bloomberg News reported.
 “Especially as they have not disclosed their future intentions toward the company” Electra takes minority and control positions in private companies alongside debt investments and stakes in other buyout firms, according to its website.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Enel SpA is shutting out potential Russian buyers for its unit in Slovakia, the nation’s biggest electricity supplier, amid European Union pressure over the crisis in Ukraine, people familiar with the situation said.
 With Russian companies out of the picture, Enel is looking for a European or Chinese buyer for its 66 percent stake in Slovenske Elektrarne, even though its Russian-designed nuclear reactors would make Rosatom a logical buyer, the people said.
 “If we’re going to be competitive, we have to do it” Without congressional action, the charter for the 80-year-old bank, which helps foreign companies buy US.
 “We won’t have as much business,” he said, saying the bank is a “catalyst and gives people the ability to buy now and pay later.
 Investors are keen to buy China stocks because of a planned Hong Kong-Shanghai bourse link, Bank of East Asia’s Lai said.
 So far, the developer has found buyers for 26 of the 36 luxury homes that have been offered for sale.
 For $1 million, you could buy about 15 square meters (160 square feet) of space, Knight Frank estimates.
 While Switzerland also has some of Europe’s lowest tax rates, it’s becoming less attractive to luxury homebuyers as the country’s financial secrecy laws are eroded amid a move toward a global standard of information exchange between tax authorities.
 “It’s becoming more and more like London by the sea” Bigger Demand Larger apartments are in demand from homebuyers moving their families to the principality.
 “The government was quite wise” to buy some of the apartments, Daniele Marzocco said.
 “You buy there not only for the environment, but also for the tax regime,” said Vaquier, who said he’s not interested in developing homes in the principality.
 Monaco will have to further expand into the sea and build more residential skyscrapers like Tour Odeon to cater to the expected influx of wealthy buyers, according to a May report by Savills.
 A short seller buys back the shares and returns them to their owners, pocketing the difference.
 Instead of giving exchanges trading fees, brokers could match buyers and sellers on their own systems.
 Nomura raised its share-price forecast to HK$115 from HK$90 while maintaining its buy rating.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- The end of Sprint Corp’s campaign to buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 and AT&T’s proposal to buy DirecTV, he said.
 “Sprint now has an opportunity to focus their efforts on robust competition” 27th Day Today is the 27th day of a projected 180-day review at the FCC of Comcast’s $452 billion proposal to buy Time Warner Cable, which would combine the two largest US.
 president to a Republican administration following the 2016 elections would improve regulatory prospects for a renewed effort by Sprint to buy T-Mobile, Gallant said.
 It has pushed back the date until later that month since the nuclear talks were extended, Kardor said  The contracts are “somewhere between a buy-back model and a production sharing agreement” and are designed to encourage long-term investors, he said.
 “They’ll be able to stay in the longer term, and access to oil will be provided for them” Legal Review Iran’s existing buy-back contracts require companies to pay for oil and gas exploration and recover their investment from any production at a prearranged rate of return.
 Activist investor Carl Icahn, who had pushed Apple to buy back more of its own stock earlier this year, said the rise in the company’s share price validated his earlier claim that the iPhone maker was undervalued.
 Spending Cash The stock’s rise shows investors are buying into the strategy outlined by Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook, who has been prodded to introduce bigger iPhones, give more money back to stockholders and introduce new devices.
 Apple is in the midst of a program to give back $130 billion through buybacks and dividends.
 He’s also been more active in acquisitions, including spending $3 billion to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 Women kept right on buying their skinnies.
 The goal is to get women to buy new wardrobes and jolt anemic apparel sales.
 New fashion trends, when they catch on, have a multiplier effect because women are forced to buy new shoes, blouses, jackets and so on.
 That’s what happened with skinny jeans, when women began buying a lot of boots, including Uggs, because they could fit their jeans inside them.
 YPF has five buy, five hold and one sell recommendations from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Fed Minutes Minutes of the Fed’s July 29-30 meeting, when the stimulatory bond-buying program was reduced by $10 billion for a sixth time, will be released today.
 Apache, responding to pressure from activist investor Jana Partners LLC, said it’s exiting two liquefied natural gas projects and may seek a buyer for its international assets, a decision that’s “consistent with the company’s ongoing repositioning for profitable and repeatable North American onshore growth” For Occidental, domestic oil production climbed 65 percent to 278,000 barrels a day for the second quarter, with output from Permian Basin in Texas increasing more than 21 percent, Chief Executive Officer Stephen Chazen said in a statement.
 The company continues to seek a buyer for its Middle East assets.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen has said officials will keep its benchmark interest rate low for a “considerable time” after the bond buying ends.
 agreed to buy a stake in the company.
 “It still has tremendous growth opportunities,” said Gilbert, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 The group’s appointed chairman, from one of the banks, adjusts prices to balance buying and selling.
 If there’s no match between buy and sell orders, an algorithm picks a new price for a second round of bidding.
 SMBC Aviation last month said it will buy $118 billion of planes from Airbus Group NV in the largest single-aisle aircraft order ever placed by a leasing company, while Hong Kong Aviation ordered 70 Airbus planes worth $77 billion the same month.
 Tractebel Energia SA and other utilities have been forced to buy energy at record spot prices when output at their dams fell short of supply commitments.
 Investors who buy options on the junk bond ETF often use the securities as a hedge for a broader portfolio, according to Todd Salamone, senior vice president of research at Schaeffer’s Investment Research.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Aga Rangemaster Group Plc, the British maker of cast-iron stoves owned by celebrities from Madonna to Prince Charles, predicted strong earnings growth this year as sales rise, helped by new products such as movable cookers aimed at younger buyers.
 “In the absence of material M&A activity, we consider the shares to be reasonably valued” Numis cut its rating on the stock today to hold from buy.
 “We have got more into the bulk annuity area so you will see more in the second half than in the first” About $6 billion was wiped off the UK insurance industry’s market value in March after Chancellor of Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity product.
 UBS boosted the stock to buy from neutral.
 The Topix has climbed 12 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy, signs Japan is weathering a sales-tax increase and speculation the $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 The buyback represents a premium of about $12 billion and makes the two US-owned mortgage-finance companies whole on the securities, the Federal Housing Finance Agency, the firms’ government overseer, said yesterday in a statement.
 announced a $95 billion accord in March, including paying $63 billion in cash to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac and buying back $32 billion of mortgage bonds from them.
 They recommended buying shares of Midea, Haier Electronics Group Co.
 that had discussed finding a buyer for at least a portion of the defaulted securities couldn’t agree on a price, a person briefed on the meetings said.
 While the idea was that the purchasers would be compensated by Argentina early next year, the talks also stalled because the government wouldn’t provide sufficient guarantees for an eventual buyback of the bonds, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the discussions were private.
 Vice President Al Gore sued Al Jazeera, claiming the satellite news provider owned by the Qatari royal family owes him and a partner $65 million from a deal to buy his network, Current TV.
 The men alleged that Al Jazeera illegally tried to seize $65 million in escrow funds tied to the $500 million buyout.
 hit an all-time high yesterday after keeping its full-year sales outlook of 48 percent growth, while boosting its earnings forecast, helped by an increase in share buybacks.
 Price appreciation is moderating as more properties are listed for sale and buyer demand slows, the group said.
 Twenty-two potential buyers participated in the auction, which was conducted by affiliates of Bank of America Corp, the McLean, Virginia-based company said today in an statement.
 It didn’t disclose the price, and won’t be naming the buyer, according to Tom Fitzgerald, a spokesman.
 Swiss Life’s status as a staid life insurer “will help them attract money from pension funds,” said Peter Casanova, a Zurich-based analyst with Kepler Cheuvreux who has a buy rating on the stock.
 “We don’t offer highly leveraged vehicles or complex products, we just buy fixed income and have a buy and manage strategy,” Frost said.
 Frost’s appointment “signals to investors that asset management will only gain in importance within the group,” said Daniel Bischof, a Zurich-based analyst with Helvea who has a buy rating on Swiss Life.
 He also said a smaller program to buy asset-backed securities won’t be ready any time soon.
 The banking regulator is allowing local governments in Shanghai, Guangdong, Zhejiang, Jiangsu and Anhui to set up asset-management companies to buy bad loans from financial institutions, people familiar with the matter said last month.
 It lowered bond-buying to $25 billion, on pace to end the stimulus program this year.
 “The average hourly earnings were unchanged, showing there’s still a lot of slack in the labor market” Pollack is buying municipal bonds for accounts with big tax concerns and corporate securities for accounts with income needs.
 Japan’s Government Pension Investment Fund, which is being urged to buy more stocks, said in July it had about $15 billion of its more than $205 billion in local stocks tracking the measure by the end of March.
 The Bank of Japan is considering buying exchange-traded funds based on the JPX-Nikkei 400, people familiar with the central bank’s discussions told Bloomberg News last month.
 Nestle SA added 34 percent after it announced plans for a share buyback as first-half revenue growth beat analysts’ estimates.
 The world’s largest food company will spend 8 billion francs ($88 billion) in its first share buyback in three years.
 “The company has performed well in share gains,” said Ho, who recommends buying the stock.
 Applied Materials, seeking to add scale and capture more market share, last year agreed to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 “The completed apartments will be in the marketplace sooner or later, and potential buyers will continue to expect prices to fall,” said Hua Changchun, China economist at Nomura Holdings Inc.
 Developers are responding with sales delays and discounts as well as incentives including no-down-payment purchases and buyback guarantees.
 On Sidelines “Developers have been unable to build up adequate client interest as buyers are still waiting on the sidelines,” said Zhang Haiqing, Shanghai-based research director at Centaline.
 The loosening hasn’t boosted sales, as mortgage restrictions from the central government remain in place and buyers are still hesitant, data provider China Real Estate Information Corp.
 1, according to UBS AG and Bank of America Corp, even as utilities in Asia buy more toward the end of the year.
 “That’s why when you’re buying Greek equities, you want to make sure you’re buying these businesses at a discount” While economists forecast Europe’s most indebted nation will post its first annual expansion since 2007, a report showed last week that the country’s gross domestic product dropped 02 percent in the second quarter, after a 11 percent decline in the first three months of the year.
 Buyback Tests The department also said it will conduct small-scale buybacks this fiscal quarter to test information-technology systems.
 In April, the Treasury Borrowing Advisory Committee recommended buybacks as an option to manage variations in seasonal financing needs.
 Fox, the film and TV company, last week withdrew its $85 a share offer for Time Warner and announced a $6 billion stock buyback authorization.
 That amount factors in the buyback, Cruetz wrote.
 for about $33 billion, excluding net debt, buying up a bigger rival as consolidation in the slot-machine industry accelerates.
 Two weeks ago, Gtech SpA agreed to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in cash and stock, uniting the world’s largest provider of lottery systems with the biggest slot-machine maker.
 agreed to buy the company in a push to expand in the wireless market.
 Federal Reserve Chair Janet Yellen has said officials will keep the benchmark rate low for a “considerable time” after the bond buying ends.
 agreed to buy a stake in the company.
 “If they are going to return capital, it’ll probably come as a share buyback rather than as some form of dividend, given the approach to capital management that they’ve shown,” Evan Lucas, a markets strategist in Melbourne at IG Ltd, said by phone.
 Rio may announce a share buyback of $3 billion to $5 billion in February, Jefferies LLC said in February.
 “I thought they’d hold back on talking about cash returns, but that’s pretty unequivocal that they are going to give returns,” Rob Clifford, a London-based analyst at Deutsche Bank AG, who has a buy rating on the stock, said by phone.
 Perhaps more significantly, a new pool of buyers is showing interest in KSM after Seabridge began announcing results from a high-grade copper section.
 Not Selling The four analysts who follow Seabridge, all of whom recommend buying the stock, have an average target price of C$3354 a share, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Demand for quality managers has increased as mom-and-pop investors and larger companies such as Blackstone Group LP and American Homes 4 Rent buy houses scattered over wide distances that require maintenance.
 The industry is being bolstered by increased demand for leasing after more than 5 million homes were lost to foreclosure and as tight lending standards limit buying.
 Meanwhile, you’re working with renters who at some point may want to become buyers” Dallas GTF, which does business as Get There First Realty, was formed in 1981 and manages more than $130 million of residential properties, mostly held by individual owners, according to the statement.
 “It will take some time for foreign investors, who determine the direction of the local market, to decide if it’s the right moment to start buying Polish stocks,” Jaroslaw Lis, who helps manage the equivalent of $956 million at mutual fund BPH TFI SA in Warsaw, said by phone today.
 Cisco has been buying software companies and working on new software-based businesses for the past three years, with some success.
 Competitive Pressure Cisco faces a challenging shift as customers move from buying hundreds or thousands of proprietary machines with gross margins of 60 percent or more to software-defined networks that can run more efficiently on cheaper gear.
 Duke’s renewables unit will buy the plant after construction is finished, according to the statement.
 Dominion Resources Inc’s North Carolina unit has agreed to buy electricity from the solar farm under a 15-year contract.
 to IFC Metropol have cut theirrecommendations on shares of MTS, as Russia’s biggest mobileoperator is known, reducing the number of buy ratings to 13, theleast since April 2013.
 MTS is hurt by the unpredictability of the Ukrainecrisis and the poor outlook of the economy” Hryvnia’s Plunge UralSib cut its recommendation on the stock to a hold frombuy in June, Belov said.
 He reiterated a buyrecommendation on the stock.
 “The market has been driven by the Ukraine conflict andwhile there seems to be no quick solution to the crisis, wedon’t expect it to deteriorate as the parties are actuallywilling to talk and meet for further negotiations,” Ilya Balakirev, a senior analyst at UFS Finance Investment Co, whichhas a buy recommendation on the stock, said by phone from Moscowyesterday.
 MB Financial merged Cole Taylor into MB Financial Bank, the Chicago-based buyer said today in a statement.
 Companies including Edita Food Industries, a snacks maker part-owned by London-based buyout firm Actis LLP, and a subsidiary of Emaar Properties PJSC, the Dubai-based developer of the world’s tallest tower, are also considering IPOs in Cairo.
 The stock market hasn’t helped an investor who has said he likes to wait for the “fat pitch,” an opportunity to buy a company at a price promising favorable returns.
 He rarely buys back shares.
 The cash pile fell to $357 billion on June 30 last year as he teamed up with buyout firm 3G Capital to take HJ Heinz Co.
 has said that a reasonable leveraged buyout price is less than eight times Ebitda.
 Royal Boskalis Westminster NV surged 82 percent after saying it will start a share buyback program.
 The world’s largest dredging company said it will buy back as many as 10 million shares in the next 2 1/2 years.
 - Family Dollar would consider Dollar General’s buyout offer if the bidder agreed to sells as many stores are regulators demanded.
 Chairman Charlie Ergen, who has said he could go after T-Mobile if Sprint fails to buy it.
 regulators may prefer a buyer like Iliad or Dish that would preserve a market with four national carriers, since Son would seek to combine T-Mobile and Sprint into a single company.
 Led by Chief Executive Officer Patrick Frost since July 1, the insurer agreed to buy German real estate asset-manager Corpus Sireo to accelerate an expansion in money management.
 “The company benefited from good new business at strong margins,” Daniel Bischof, a Zurich-based analyst with Helvea who has a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note to investors.
 “These better-than-expected results appear to confirm that Swiss Life is on track to achieve its plans,” Peter Casanova, a Zurich-based analyst with Kepler Cheuvreux who has a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note to investors.
 Swiss Life agreed to buy the Cologne-based Corpus Sireo from German savings banks Sparkasse KoelnBonn, Stadtsparkasse Duesseldorf and Frankfurter Sparkasse for 210 million euros ($281 million).
 Claure, 43, was appointed less than a year after SoftBank agreed to buy a majority stake in his mobile-phone distributor for $126 billion as part of the Japanese carrier’s push for international expansion.
 SoftBank said yesterday it would buy the rest of Claure’s stake for about $298 million.
 SoftBank’s successes include the largest stake in Alibaba, an investment that started 14 years ago with a $20 million bet on a then-unknown Web portal connecting Chinese manufacturers with overseas buyers.
 CLOs pool high-yield corporate loans, which are often used to finance leveraged buyouts, and slice them into securities of varying risk and return.
 8 after a report the nation’s pension fund freed itself to buy more domestic equities.
 buyout firm TPG Capital offered A$34 billion ($32 billion) for the world’s second-biggest listed winemaker, according to a person familiar with the matter, matching a takeover bid by KKR & Co.
 Tata Steel Europe is almost completely dependent on outside sources for the steelmaking raw materials, while its Indian unit buys more than 50 percent of its coking coal needs from suppliers.
 Under the arrangement described in the case, Consultant A’s shell companies, which are registered in the British Virgin Islands, would buy alumina from Alcoa of Australia.
 More mobile-focused web companies can become buying targets” Valuation Gap Guangzhou-based Vipshop has soared 155 percent this year while YY jumped 72 percent, helping fuel a 79 percent advance in the Bloomberg gauge of the most-actively traded Chinese companies in the US.
 A majority of 56 economists surveyed last month by Bloomberg News said the central bank will end its bond-buying program at its October meeting.
 “Any dislocation would also likely result in more rapid deployment of our credit and private-equity funds” Apollo, which managed $1675 billion in credit, buyout holdings and real estate as of June 30, said second-quarter profit fell 57 percent as it earned less money from selling investments.
 ‘Monetizing’ Portfolio Apollo in the past two years has been one of the most active buyout firms in exiting investments, taking advantage of rising markets to sell holdings and take companies public.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Nampower will be the sole buyer of gas pumped from the Kudu fields and has first right of refusal if there is additional gas, Shilamba said.
 Since then, Buffett, 83, has been Moynihan’s highest-profile cheerleader, endorsing the CEO’s strategy and shrugging off a $4 billion accounting mistake disclosed in April that forced the bank to scrap stock buybacks.
 At the same time, Murdoch’s company announced a $6 billion stock buyback authorization.
 Louis who rates the stock a buy, said in a phone interview.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA (CSNA3), the Brazilian steelmaker led by Benjamin Steinbruch, is seeking to buy steel assets in the US.
 The interest follows a failed attempt earlier this year to buy OAO Severstal’s assets in the US, he said.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Woodside Petroleum Ltd’s $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian gas producer.
 Woodside investors cast 72 percent of their votes in support of the buyback, short of the 75 percent needed, according to a company statement after a shareholder meeting in Perth.
 Mounting Criticism Woodside faced mounting criticism from investors that Shell was getting preferential treatment through the buyback, fueling speculation the Australian company might undertake a buyback for all holders should the deal collapse.
 “An equal-access, off-market buyback would involve less certainty regarding the price and quantum of the buyback depending on shareholder participation and would not provide an orderly reduction of Shell’s shareholding,” he said.
 The buyback was a great deal for Shell because of the generous allocation of franking credits, which reduce an investor’s tax bill, and with Woodside trading at three-year highs, Macquarie analysts said in a report last month.
 Plan B Woodside as an alternative could put the cash into expansion projects to increase output, or use it for special dividends and buybacks, according to a Morgan Stanley note today.
 “You’re are buying at the bottom of the cycle and that’s attractive,” Deane said by phone from Melbourne.
 Look to Buy The company will also look to buy a project should it fail to discover a new mine, he said.
 Randgold hasn’t made a major acquisition since buying Moto Goldmines Ltd.
 As part of the agreement with Samsung, Barnes & Noble will buy at least 1 million devices from the electronics giant within the first 12 months.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- China’s procurement agency recently told government departments to stop buying antivirus software from Symantec Corp.
 “As yields stayed lower in subsequent months, some of the investors probably resumed their buying” China’s holdings of US.
 Morgan, Hancock joined with Roberto Mendoza, a former colleague at the bank, in a deal to buy a stake in Berkshire’s General Re Securities Holdings.
 Hong Kong lenders are luring foreign buyers seeking to tap China-related business in a city that is the biggest center for offshore yuan trading.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc has agreed to buy 727 percent of Greek broadband company Hellas Online SA for 727 million euros ($965 million) and plans to make an offer for the rest of the company.
 Vodafone agreed to buy Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March for 75 billion euros, including debt, and Kabel Deutschland Holding AG last year for 105 billion euros.
 “There are thousands of people buying these things that aren’t associated with the AMA and that is a concern,” said McGraw, who represents filmmakers seeking permission to use drones as flying cameras.
 The buyer will also assume some liabilities.
 last year to buy a controlling stake in Supercell Oy, developer of games Clash of Clans and Hay Day.
 Buying Spree Pershing Square has teamed with Laval, Quebec-based Valeant in its bid to buy Allergan as Valeant’s Chief Executive Officer Mike Pearson aims for his company to become one of the world’s biggest drugmakers.
 Pearson has spent at least $19 billion buying more than 40 companies since he took the helm in 2008.
 Using options allowed Pershing Square to skirt rules requiring government approval to buy more than $75 million of a company “with an intent to influence control of the business,” Ackman told Bloomberg TV’s Stephanie Ruhle and Erik Schatzker.
 ‘Incredible Opportunity’ Valeant found a partner in Ackman, who saw an “incredible opportunity to buy Allergan stock with advance inside knowledge,” guaranteeing high returns, Allergan alleged.
 While Pershing Square and Valeant maintained appearances they weren’t making an offer, PS Fund 1 embarked on buying sprees, including one in April in which it exploited an “archaic” provision of US.
 Swedbank today raised its recommendation on Oslo-based DNO ASA to buy from neutral, and the shares rose 83 percent in Oslo trading.
 Genel Energy Plc began a share buyback, repurchasing 155,000 ordinary shares and sending its stock rallying 76 percent.
 “The buyback shows that Genel feels that it is hugely undervalued” Stanton has an outperform recommendation on Genel Energy’s stock.
 “DNO is producing at record high levels and we see the recent share price correction as a buying opportunity” DNO rose 83 percent to 1729 kroner at close, the biggest gain in nearly six months.
 The European Union blocked local investors from buying new stock and bonds issued by Sberbank and VTB along with other companies it’s sanctioned amid allegations Russia is fomenting the crisis in Ukraine.
 Short-sellers borrow shares and sell them, expecting to buy them back later at a lower price for a profit.
 The company has already had inquiries from possible buyers of the business, which has annual sales of about A$12 billion ($11 billion) to industries as diverse as food and cosmetics, Orica said today in a statement.
 Evidence the region’s economic recovery is losing steam has fueled further buying on speculation that central bank officials will add stimulus.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Coca-Cola Co, the world’s largest beverage company, agreed to swap some brands and buy a 17 percent stake in Monster Beverage Corp.
 In fact, it really is half, on an ounce-for-ounce basis, of a Starbucks cup of coffee” Given the regulatory concerns, buying a minority stake is less risky for Coke, Dibadj said.
 The soda maker may end up buying the rest of the business once the smoke clears, he said.
 The talks were already under way before Telefonica SA -- which competes with Telecom Italia in the Brazilian wireless market -- offered to buy Vivendi’s GVT unit for 67 billion euros ($9 billion) earlier this week.
 As part of the existing bid for GVT, Vivendi would be given the right to buy a stake of about 8 percent in Telecom Italia from Telefonica, which is a shareholder in the company through an investment vehicle known as Telco SpA.
 dropped for a second day after buying International Strategy & Investment Group LLC in an all-stock deal that dilutes the value of existing shares and moves the merger-advisory firm deeper into the equities business.
 Evercore said yesterday it would issue as many as 81 million shares to buy ISI and the 40 percent of its equities research and trading unit it doesn’t already own.
 Evercore plans to buy back about half the shares it will issue to fund the deal over the next five years, reducing the potential dilution for investors, Chief Executive Officer Ralph Schlosstein said today on a conference call with analysts.
 Rhone, which tried to buy a stake in English Premier League soccer club Liverpool in 2010, has investments in German chemicals companies, US.
 Discussions broke off when the winemaker discovered that a shareholder had been informed of the buyout firm’s bid, forcing the company to disclose the offer to the market.
 He rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 said businesses would be able to buy middleware and database products from Oracle on the Azure cloud.
 YPF has five buy, five hold and one sell recommendations from analysts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Options for the Mooresville, North Carolina-based company include buying part of BR Home Centers, the home-improvement holding company valued at about 500 million reais ($2201 million) that is working with Rothschild to study strategic options, one of the people said.
 “Reducing the liabilities of the company puts it in a better position, so it boosts our optimism toward the Pemex spread” Joe Kogan, an emerging-market strategist at Bank of Nova Scotia who recommends buying Pemex bonds, said the company’s total pension liabilities may account for 025 percentage point of the yield differential between the oil producer and the government.
 It will also buy energy from two projects in the Imperial Valley, the 154-megawatt Mount Signal Solar II and the 252-megawatt Mount Signal Solar V.
 A negative yield means investors who hold a security until it matures will receive less than they paid to buy it.
 Of course this affects larger things -- having kids, buying a home.
 buyout fund and third European LBO pool.
 In January, Axalta was seeking to reduce the rate on about $28 billion of loans it obtained to support the buyout, a person with knowledge of the situation said then.
 Carlyle, founded in 1987 by Bill Conway, Dan D’Aniello and David Rubenstein, has snapped up corporate orphans since it started buying defense companies in the aftermath of the fall of the Berlin Wall.
 The firm, which besides leveraged buyouts also manages hedge funds, credit investments and real estate, oversaw $203 billion in assets as of June 30.
 The first pool is more than halfway toward its target of $5 million, which will be used to buy properties in Brooklyn’s Bedford-Stuyvesant.
 Building Upgrades In Bedford-Stuyvesant, Weissman plans to buy as much as $15 million of properties -- mostly apartment buildings with ground-floor retail space -- with $5 million coming from investors and the rest borrowed.
 Weissman said his program also differs from such websites as Realty Mogul and Fundrise in that those companies distribute pledges to property managers and developers, while CityShares will buy and manage buildings directly.
 CityShares is the only way for property investors “to get exposure to that appreciation and rental income outside of buying an apartment or buying a brownstone on their own,” Weissman said.
 The program will offer participants advantages over buying shares of a real estate investment trust, including access to rent rolls, payment histories and other data on the funds’ buildings, Weissman said.
 The bank reported a net income in 2011 as a result of booking gains from buying back bonds at a discount to par.
 Policy Rethink Fraser, whose company agreed earlier this year to buy two state-owned coal-fired power plants in New South Wales for A$151 billion, said the government needs to “rethink” the policy to spur significant investment in the industry.
 Alfa Bank will probably need to pay a premium of 50 to 60 basis points over its existing debt to attract buyers, according to Sergey Dergachev, who helps oversee $10 billion in emerging-market debt at Union Investment Privatfonds GmbH in Frankfurt.
 “They’re offering to buy us out.
 The company is “not in talks to buy them,” he said.
 San Miguel has announced almost $8 billion in acquisitions since 2000 and is prepared to spend as much as $10 billion more to buy assets in Southeast Asia as it moves further from the food-and-beverage industry and into energy and infrastructure.
 The Philippine Daily Inquirer reported July 28 that Tan was trying to raise funds to buy back San Miguel’s stake, adding that San Miguel may buy out Tan if he can’t come up with the money.
 Tan would need about $1 billion to buy back shares and cover advances for aircraft purchases, the newspaper said, citing unnamed people familiar with the business.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 China’s procurement agency told departments to stop buying antivirus software from Symantec Corp.
 “If you believe that geopolitical events are going to heat up rather than de-escalate, you’d be a buyer in gold,” Quincy Krosby, a market strategist at Newark, New Jersey-based Prudential Financial Inc, which manages more than $1 trillion, said Aug.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Dobrolet, the low-cost unit of Russia’s OAO Aeroflot grounded by European Union sanctions, plans to buy $15 billion of single-aisle jets from Boeing Co.
 The sale means the financial-services assets will be owned by Chinese nationals instead of the global investors that may buy shares in the IPO.
 If Alibaba does buy a stake, the profit-sharing and IPO-payment terms from yesterday’s filing will be amended again.
 Zhang, 37, tried to buy shares in each and every one, confident that she knew what was coming next: an immediate surge in price that has rewarded investors in Chinese IPOs with an average first-day gain of 43 percent this year.
 Zhang, the investor who has tried to buy shares in all of this year’s IPOs, agrees.
 “But for the market to realize its potential the government has to bring in the foreign institutional investors and banks to improve liquidity” While foreign investors are allowed to invest in India’s stock market, they are barred from buying or selling commodities on Indian exchanges.
 agreed to buy 15 percent stake in MCX from Financial Technologies last month, and shareholders in the bourse now include billionaire investor Rakesh Jhunjhunwala and HDFC Bank Ltd.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Chugai soared 15 percent after people familiar with the situation said Roche Holding AG is in talks to buy the rest of the Japanese drugmaker.
 Money is still flowing into equities” The Topix climbed 12 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 Still, “there are hopes of buying on the downside” should GPIF begin share purchases before announcing its new portfolio around September.
 Roche, the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs, plans to pay about $10 billion to buy about 40 percent of Chugai to take full control, the people said, asking not to be identified because the plans are private.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- CPFL Energias Renovaveis SA and Neoenergia SA are among companies that expressed interest in buying Energisa SA’s power generation unit in Brazil, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Energetica de Minas Gerais, the Belo Horizonte-based utility known as Cemig, is another prospective buyer, one of the people said.
 Electra Energy is also analyzing documents, with a shortlist of would-be buyers to be finalized by the end of the month before a second round of talks, the other person said.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Nestle SA, the world’s largest food company, plans to spend 8 billion Swiss francs ($88 billion) in its first share buyback in three years after reporting revenue growth that exceeded analysts’ estimates.
 Nestle is funding the buyback from the sale of part of its stake in French cosmetics company L’Oreal SA, which will boost second-half profit by 74 billion francs.
 “The 8 billion-franc buyback has to be put in the context of M&A activities,” Bertschy wrote in an e-mail.
 “Nestle would have the ability to do a bigger buyback of 10 billion francs to as much as 20 billion francs” Shares Rise The shares traded 32 percent higher at 6925 francs as of 11:06 am.
 Nestle said today the buyback is “subject to market conditions and strategic opportunities” In 2011, the company completed a 10 billion-franc repurchase program that it began in 2010.
 “The old adage -- when the going gets tough, the tough buy Nestle -- is once again playing out,” said Warren Ackerman, an analyst at Societe Generale.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Jason Ferguson said the job was straightforward: buy a gambling company’s client data and flip it to a rival who could use the information to win new customers.
 I thought I was acting within the realm of legality” Canadian police agreed, with no charges being laid against Ferguson, who was flagged to Paddy Power by a London gaming consultant posing as a potential buyer.
 Mega Breaches “Many countries have anti-hacking or data privacy laws that criminalize the theft of personal data, but there is no harmonized position on buying and selling data that has been stolen,” said Richard Jones, director of data privacy at Clifford Chance LLP in London.
 “Even in a strict regime it may not be possible to prosecute someone who didn’t know, or claims not to have known, that the data they were buying was stolen” Eight “mega breaches” last year exposed more than 10 million identities each, compared with one in 2012, according to Mountain View, California-based Symantec Corp, the biggest maker of anti-virus tools.
 “It remains possible that Ferguson was merely a middle man seeking a buyer for an unidentified contact and as such wasn’t actively involved in orchestrating the theft of the stolen data” Files Combed The first order allowed the company access to Ferguson’s bank account.
 on whether or not it’s illegal to buy and sell private third-party data digitally, she said.
 The European Union has blocked local investors from buying new stock and bonds issued by Sberbank and VTB along with other companies it’s sanctioned amid allegations Russia is fomenting the crisis in Ukraine.
 The venture is targeted at attracting young consumers to the Munich-based premium automaker before they consider buying a vehicle as they grow older and have families.
 Walgreen said yesterday that it would buy the portion of Alliance Boots GmbH that it doesn’t already own without changing its address for tax purposes.
 “The lost revenue to Treasury means it has got to be made up somewhere, and that typically is going to be a bunch of hard-working Americans who either pay through higher taxes themselves or through reduced services” The administration and Democrats propose to make it effectively impossible for companies to invert by buying a smaller foreign business.
 Guo’s Fosun, the investment arm of China’s biggest closely held industrial group, has been on a buying spree, ranging from insurance businesses to New York City office buildings.
 and Cnooc Ltd, received two approaches from potential buyers it didn’t name after announcing the Horizon merger in April.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Since taking over Equity Commonwealth in an investor-led revolt almost three months ago, Sam Zell and his team have found buyers for more than $200 million of properties, sold shares in a former unit and moved the company’s headquarters.
 The investors were critical of the prior management’s strategy of selling suburban buildings and buying properties in downtowns across the US.
 who recommends buying the shares, said in a telephone interview.
 After transforming Equity Commonwealth and its investments, the company’s new managers may be able to seek a buyer for the REIT -- perhaps a large private-equity fund, Goltra said.
 JPMorgan Chase and some other major banks are offering to buy the defaulted bonds from the holdouts -- NML, Aurelius.
 Earlier this month, Yigit Bulut, chief economic adviser to Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan, contradicted Ali Babacan, deputy prime minister with responsibility for banking and the Treasury, who said that it would be “desirable” for Ziraat to buy Bank Asya.
 Eleven of the remaining analysts rate it hold, while two say buy.
 Awas, which focuses on buying used jets mainly from other leasing companies, is also studying an initial public offering of the rest of its planes, said one person.
 Investors are snapping up the bonds as the Federal Reserve suppresses interest rates, pushing investors to buy riskier assets to get higher yields.
 Hickey, who recommends buying Activision stock, is forecasting 2014 unit sales of 19 million for Call of Duty: Advanced Warfare.
 Some people won’t want to buy the game a second time, he said.
 “You want to buy companies that have that currency leverage,” said Irwin Michael, fund manager at ABC Funds in Toronto.
 The buyer of a custom-ordered Diversified gas didn’t want the expense from those freight bills, so it decided to bring the manufacturing in-house.
 The factory there continues to operate after the buyer irked by rising rates forced the company “about three years ago” to idle a $500,000 investment in a custom gas used to make packaging, said Dearden, the consultant.
 Russian sales dropped 52 percent this year from the same period of 2013 as sanctions block investors from buying the debt.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Stock investors who missed this year’s 20 percent rally in the S&P BSE Sensex Index will get a chance to buy at cheaper levels in the next two months, according to BlackRock Inc’s India joint venture.
 That correction ought to be used to buy” Risk Aversion The DSP BlackRock India TIGER.
 “For investors who have not bought enough equities in the last three to four months, any correction will be a good buying opportunity,” Naganath said.
 The house on the Peak, an exclusive neighborhood with sweeping views across Victoria Harbour, would be the most expensive property in Asia if it finds a buyer, according to Colliers International.
 Demand for luxury properties in Hong Kong has been damped since the government imposed an extra 15 percent levy on overseas buyers in its efforts to curb surging demand from mainland Chinese.
 Sun Hung Kai’s record asking price could be an advertising tactic to raise the project’s profile for overseas buyers, said David Ji, head of research and consultancy for Greater China at realtor Knight Frank LLP.
 Purchasers who are required to pay the foreign buyer’s tax will be given a 1175 percent rebate, while local buyers will get a cashback equal to 85 percent of the purchase price, according to the Twelve Peaks website.
 Luxury-home prices will have to fall from their peak to attract buyers and developers will have to offer incentives, Raymond Lee, chief executive officer of Greater China at Savills Plc, told reporters yesterday.
 The sector has been hit the hardest by the extra tax on foreign buyers, he said.
 The buyer applied for a 85 percent cash benefit, the company said.
 Angola’s government announced plans in June to buy $1 billion of trains and power generators from GE.
 companies from buying foreign competitors to avoid domestic taxes.
 said July 18 it would buy Shire for $55 billion, and AstraZeneca spurned a $117 billion offer from Pfizer Inc.
 After spending $32 million to buy Billerica, Massachusetts-based VideoIQ in January, Avigilon raised C$100 million in a share sale in April.
 “Can you get there by just spending a lot of money and getting a lot of customers in a land-grab opportunity or do you do it profitably?” Growth Levers Sangha maintained his buy rating on the company while dropping his target price on the stock to C$33 from C$38.
 Eight analysts say buy the stock, one says hold and one says sell, according to the data.
 HSBC raised its rating to overweight, the equivalent of buy, from neutral, saying that the recent pullback is an opportunity.
 Pfizer abandoned a 695-billion-pound ($116 billion) effort to buy London-based AstraZeneca on May 26.
 A final decision on whether the sale goes ahead will hinge on the interest shown by potential buyers, the person said.
 In Spain, the carrier is fighting to hold on to market share in mobile and Internet services after Vodafone Group Plc agreed in March to buy Grupo Corporativo ONO SA for 72 billion euros, a deal that makes Vodafone the second-largest carrier in the country, behind Telefonica SA.
 Abertis Infraestructuras SA agreed in August 2013 to buy at least 4,227 mobile-phone towers from Telefonica SA and TeliaSonera AB’s Spanish unit Yoigo for 385 million euros.
 “The non-life result was a bit modest and life was disappointing after some one-offs,” Stefan Schuermann, a Zurich-based analyst with Vontobel Holding AG who has a buy rating on the stock, said by telephone.
 Under the terms of today’s deal, United Internet will buy newly issued shares by Berlin-based Rocket.
 The uncertainty of the federal government’s position on foreign investments has played a role in other would-be activists and acquirers from buying Canadian, including smartphone maker BlackBerry Ltd, Hall said.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Masayoshi Son, Japan’s most acquisitive executive, is raising a war chest that could be used to buy companies from Yahoo! Inc.
 Already the biggest shareholder in Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, SoftBank could team up with the e-commerce company, or buy a movie maker or news service, said SMBC Nikko Securities Inc.
 That’s almost double the amount spent by Japan’s next-biggest buyer, Nippon Steel & Sumitomo Metal Corp.
 The company issued a record $49 billion in bonds last September to help fund its buyout of Vodafone Group Plc’s 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- A buying spree in Australia by foreign acquirers may drive dealmaking this year to the highest level since 2007.
 Overseas buyers struck a record $40 billion of deals for Australian businesses last quarter.
 The buyers, from China to Singapore and South Africa, are betting a nation with one of the developed world’s fastest-growing populations will extend 23 consecutive years of economic expansion.
 The interest from offshore buyers is putting 2014 on course to be the biggest for merger activity in Australia in seven years.
 Foreign investors do see Australia as a safe place to invest” Foreign buyers targeted Australian companies in 149 deals in the second quarter of 2014.
 agreed to buy Roc Oil for A$474 million ($442 million), ending the Sydney-based company’s plan to combine with domestic peer Horizon Oil Ltd.
 A potential buyer for the A$73 billion Coca-Cola Amatil may be SABMiller Plc after it bought Australian brewer Foster’s Group Ltd.
 Not Cheap Australia is luring buyers even if its assets are pricier than those in other markets, said David Wood, Sydney-based head of investment banking for Australia at Bank of America Corp.
 Developed markets “are very attractive places for companies to spend” Wine Buyout This week, Treasury Wine Estates Ltd, the Australian maker of Penfolds Grange, said a second buyout firm had matched a A$34 billion proposal from New York-based KKR & Co.
 Australian buyers are also targeting acquisitions, some overseas.
 last month agreed to buy Franklin, Tennessee-based Video Gaming Technologies Inc.
 Whether Australian companies are the buyers or the targets, merger activity is likely to keep going strong, according to Nicholson at Ernst & Young.
 Its Brazil unit Tim Participacoes SA competes with Telefonica SA’s Vivo, the country’s biggest mobile carrier, which has offered to buy Vivendi SA unit GVT to add broadband users.
 Vivendi would also get a right to buy a stake of about 8 percent in Telecom Italia from Telefonica, a transaction that would reduce Telefonica’s clout in Brazil’s wireless market.
 “Given that money managers are gauged on how they perform versus fixed-income indices, the artificially higher allocation of MBS in the index forces money managers to buy the sector even if spreads are rich,” the New York-based analysts wrote in the Aug.
 Even after the central bank ends its buying, it’s expected to continue reinvestments meant to maintain the size of its balance sheet, they said.
 Contrary to forecasts when the Fed began buying, the holdings “may be a long term phenomena,” the analysts said.
 “There’s a good reason to use the share-price drop as a buying opportunity” for Bakkafrost, said the analyst.
 The central bank in May called on the nation’s biggest lenders to accelerate the granting of mortgages and urged them to give priority to first-home buyers.
 Nomura rates Vanke’s H-shares, which trade in Hong Kong, a buy.
 “We’re confident we will return to profitability in 2014” AOL, based in New York, is counting on the platform business, which lets advertisers buy space on websites and online videos, for growth as its traditional subscription business declines.
 Bond investors demanded some of the highest yields since the market started less than a year ago to buy securities backed by the landlord’s houses in a $684 million deal today.
 The US, the buyer of about 80 percent of Mexico’s exports, grew at a 4 percent annualized rate from April through June after shrinking 21 percent in the first quarter, when harsh winter weather undercut demand.
 ArcelorMittal said that it had agreed to buy stakes held by BHP Billiton Ltd.
 Fed Chair Janet Yellen has said officials will keep its benchmark low for a “considerable time” after the bond buying ends.
 added 23 percent to $6495 as it agreed to buy HealthLease Properties Real Estate Investment Trust and formed a partnership for additional properties to expand in senior care.
 The provider of fuel cards agreed to buy Comdata Inc.
 Housing starts surged in July to the highest level in eight months and purchases of previously owned homes rose as low borrowing costs and an increase in inventory drew buyers.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Telstra Corp, Australia’s largest phone company, will buy back stock after posting annual profit that beat analyst estimates as it consolidated a drive to win customers in the country’s mobile market.
 The company will buy back as much as A$1 billion of stock, driving the shares up the most in a year.
 Telstra is using its cash to invest in networks to win customers and increase returns to shareholders through buybacks and higher dividends as it prepares to hand over fixed-line operations to a government fiber network.
 “They probably had more leverage to go bigger with the buyback given the cash flow they’ve generated” Telstra’s shares rose 22 percent to A$556 at the close of trade in Sydney.
 Fed Decision The Fed this week cut its monthly bond buying to $25 billion in its sixth consecutive $10 billion reduction.
 The Fed’s Open Market Committee reiterated that it’s likely to reduce bond buying in “further measured steps” and to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending purchases.
 to lower its tax bill, typically by buying a smaller company.
 companies from getting a foreign address by buying a smaller business.
 drugstore chain, said today it would keep its Deerfield, Illinois, address while buying all of Alliance Boots Holdings Ltd, the UK’s biggest pharmacy chain.
 It’s in the process of buying Australia’s top baker Goodman Fielder Ltd.
 Wilmar, which is buying Goodman Fielder together with Hong Kong-based investment group First Pacific through a 50-50 venture, won acceptance from the Australian baker’s board for its bid, which it then cut by 36 percent in July due to the target firm’s plans to write down asset values.
 agreed to buy three UK.
 “In terms of investment themes, they are buying consumer-oriented assets which helps them go beyond financial assets in the country” Software maker Cheetah raised $168 million in its US.
 Temasek in March agreed to buy a 25 percent stake in Hong Kong-based Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s retail arm AS.
 agencies, including the Defense Department and the Department of Homeland Security, buy the IBM servers, according to Bloomberg Intelligence.
 Cfius examined more than double the number of transactions by Chinese investors in 2012 than it did the previous year, making them the most scrutinized foreign buyers of American assets ahead of the UK, according to the committee’s most recent report to Congress.
 Medtronic Inc, based in Minneapolis, was also said to consider bidding for the company before deciding to buy Covidien Plc.
 companies trying to escape the domestic tax system do so by buying a smaller company abroad and adopting its address.
 GM would provide most of the financing, and then separately would buy Delphi’s steering unit and four US.
 Singer, said Platinum was buying the company too cheap.
 GM would also buy the steering business and other assets for about $11 billion.
 It sold 487 lots for more than $1 million during this period and 26 percent of buyers were new to Sotheby’s, the auction house said.
 and Barclays Plc sweetened terms on a piece of a $12 billion bond deal last week to attract buyers, while Deutsche Bank AG and Cantor Fitzgerald LP increased the yield they’re offering on securities today, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Bond buyers are pushing back as banks aim to sell at least $6 billion of the debt in August in the busiest US.
 Defense Secretary Chuck Hagel arrived in New Delhi seeking to remove barriers to the sale of American weaponry to India, the world’s largest arms buyer.
 attaches to bolstering defense trade with India, Hagel brought with him Frank Kendall, the Pentagon’s top weapons buyer, and Puneet Talwar, the assistant secretary of state for political-military affairs.
 defense contractor, wants India to buy more of its C-130J transport aircraft, Madhavan said.
 chief investment strategist Russ Koesterich says bond buyers are right to take a muted view on US.
 Perhaps this is why buyers are still funneling into 30-year Treasury bonds that are yielding 32 percent -- almost a percentage point less than they have on average during the past decade and about the least relative to 10-year notes since 2009.
 The last time bond buyers felt so good about 30-year debt was during the European sovereign debt crisis in 2011.
 Investors are buying longer-term securities now because rapid growth doesn’t look that plausible.
 Numericable in April agreed to buy SFR, France’s second-largest carrier, from Vivendi SA, and in June unveiled a deal to buy Virgin Mobile’s unit in the country.
 They also said that buying and selling land is more complicated and takes more time than investments in bonds or stocks.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Pandora Media Inc, the biggest internet radio service, rose after a report said the company could attract buyout interest.
 The five-year contemporary art rally has fueled a surge in online auctions and opened the doors for new companies that are betting consumers will buy works by Warhol and Banksy while lounging at home in their pajamas.
 Winklevoss Backing The lack of transparency is making harder for buyers and sellers to establish a fair price for an artist’s work.
 “Even if it does sell, not every owner wants the work’s price publically disclosed” Distorting Markets The opaque market makes it easier for buyers to quickly resell, or flip, an artwork for a profit.
 The companies said they are building a platform for collectors and first-time buyers to browse and purchase items including art, jewelry and fine wine.
 and Land Securities Group Plc each added more than 2 percent after Bank of America Corp’s Merrill Lynch recommended buying their shares.
 Merrill Lynch raised its rating to buy from neutral for both real estate investment trusts, citing a positive real estate environment.
 Investors are buying more hedges than any time since 2008 following a rally that has added $15 trillion to equity values.
 “The people who buy protections really have to be adept and take profits at a 3 or 4 percent decline, not hold until the end,” Selkin said by phone on Aug.
 Sales growth has been slower at about 52 percent a year, meaning companies have relied on cost reductions and share buybacks to make up the gap in earnings.
 for C$32 billion in May, Montreal-based SNC struck a deal to buy Kentz, an oil-services company, for $197 billion.
 Calls to buy shares of Europe’s largest lender trade close to the highest level in almost three years relative to bearish puts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg on the Hong Kong-listed equities.
 in London, who recommends buying the stock.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Mexichem SAB rose the most among major Mexican stocks after agreeing to buy a US.
 Mexichem agreed to buy Knoxville, Tennessee-based Dura-Line Corp.
 Mexichem has acquired 17 companies since 2007 and agreed to buy German chemical maker Vestolit GmbH from Strategic Value Partners LLC for 219 million euros ($293 million) on Aug.
 While placing his car on the Concours’s concept lawn yesterday afternoon, he said, people began approaching him wanting to buy one.
 Indian Stocks Speculation that President Vladimir Putin was seeking to ease the conflict with Ukraine helped spur buying in the last two trading days since the Micex’s price-to-earnings ratio fell to 481 times 12-month projected earnings on Aug.
 That was the position Comcast found itself in three years ago when it was buying NBC Universal.
 By buying Time Warner Cable, Comcast gains entry to the biggest US.
 The Topix rebounded 14 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 China buys 67 percent of the world’s seaborne ore.
 “This is a move by the company to keep people engaged” Replaced Trustee Caesars, taken private by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in a $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008, is battling with its creditors as it seeks to rein in interest expense that exceeds its cash flow.
 agreed last month to buy a group annuity contract from Prudential to cover about $350 million of the manufacturer’s pension liabilities.
 The company is stepping up its search for global acquisitions after its $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian energy company.
 Woodside is targeting LNG buyers in Japan and is in advanced talks with some potential customers, Coleman said.
 Woodside and the buyers are in a “tug of war” over price, according to the company’s CEO.
 Asian buyers are pushing for lower prices as the US.
 The gaming company that was taken private by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in a $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008, has been embroiled in dueling lawsuits with creditors as it seeks to rein in interest expense that exceeds its cash flow.
 dealership next year -- to buy a home power network that allows them to charge their new cars using only solar power.
 With battery systems to store power generated from rooftop panels to release on demand, SunPower customers can make their hybrid car truly solar-powered, reducing the amount of electricity they need to buy from the grid, he said.
 to buy Permira Advisers LLP’s television producer All3Media, in a deal valuing the company at 550 million pounds.
 Liberty Global has been waiting for European Union regulators to clear its 49 billion-euro ($66 billion) purchase of Dutch broadband provider Ziggo after agreeing to buy the company in January.
 Kid Brands Wants Bonuses for Workers to Complete Brand Sales Kid Brands Inc, a designer and distributor of infant and juvenile products that wasn’t able to find a going-concern buyer for its ‘Kids Line’ and ‘CoCaLo’ brands, wants permission to pay bonuses to seven employees to help complete the pending sale of the brands’ intellectual property, inventory and accounts receivable.
 Suchman LLC, which financed the bankruptcy, paid $12 million of debt in lieu of cash to buy MEE.
 The defendants then used $150 million of Tetragon’s cash to buy back nonvoting Tetragon shares, according to the lawsuit.
 The group’s appointed chairman, from one of the banks, adjusts prices to balance buying and selling.
 If there’s no suitable match between buy and sell orders, an algorithm picks a new price for a second round of bidding.
 Last month, Direct Energy agreed to buy installer Astrum Solar Inc.
 and Israel” The world’s richest country per capita has used wealth from the world’s third-largest natural gas reserves to buy stakes in Barclays Plc, Volkswagen AG and purchase London’s Harrods department store.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Gemalto NV, a developer of software and chips that make transactions more secure, agreed to buy data-protection company SafeNet Inc.
 “There are plenty of interesting companies that would accelerate our growth, but we’re very patient and we won’t buy them at any cost,” Piou said.
 The company also announced a plan to buy back as much as $3 billion in stock and a quarterly dividend of 3375 cents a share.
 Apollo in the past two years has been one of the most active buyout firms in exiting investments, taking advantage of rising markets to sell holdings and take companies public.
 The firm said the value of its buyout holdings rose 5 percent in the second quarter, in line with the same period last year and matching second-quarter gains at Carlyle Group LP and KKR & Co.
 The value of buyout holdings at private-equity firms affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric in part depends on quarterly mark-to-market valuations of those investments.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 In addition to buyout holdings, Apollo manages $1057 billion in credit assets and $91 billion in real estate.
 Compliance Policy Taiwan Eases Rules on Brokerage Trading in Dim Sum Bonds Brokerages can now buy or sell Dim Sum bonds in Taiwan, GreTai Securities Market said in a statement on its website.
 Sabanci’s Cimsa Cimento agreed to buy Sancim Bilecik Cimento, a cement producer in western Turkey, from Sonmez Group for $2207 million, it said in a public filing last month.
 They’re seeking to recoup cash and earn higher returns with cheaper financing after a homebuying spree by institutional investors created a new industry of single-family landlords.
 The company, which boosted its monthly property purchases by $40 million to $100 million last quarter, expects to buy more mortgages than homes this quarter, according to Beasley.
 Three years from now, will anybody be able to do that? My guess is probably not” Beasley’s Waypoint Homes was a pioneer in the rental-home industry, starting to purchase houses through distressed sales in 2009, several years before Wall Street-backed firms began aggressively buying in bulk.
 Amec, which agreed to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG earlier this year to expand its geographic footprint, won contracts including in the North Sea, and was the preferred bidder for Poland’s first nuclear power plant.
 “Were we to split the stock or take other actions focusing on stock price rather than business value, we would attract an entering class of buyers inferior to the existing class of sellers,” he wrote in a letter to shareholders in 1984, when the Class A shares traded for about $1,300.
 A put option exercised by Athabasca on April 17 forces a PetroChina subsidiary to buy the 40 percent it doesn’t own in the undeveloped Dover oil-sands project in northeastern Alberta, based on a 2010 agreement.
 Still, acquiring one of the companies would be a break with tradition for Wal-Mart, which doesn’t typically buy rival chains in the US.
 2, 1997 As Steven Keslowitz points out in “The Simpsons and Society: An Analysis of Our Favorite Family and Its Influence in Contemporary Society” (2003), mounds of money don’t buy Monty Burns friends, or love, or happiness.
 Deutsche Wohnen has been buying apartments to take advantage of rising rents, its ability to raise capital on the stock market at favorable terms as well as low-interest loans.
 Axeon SP buys feedstock from mulitple sources and follows standard background and vetting procedures, spokesman Michael Drager said by e-mail.
 The pickup in hiring also is keeping the Fed on track to end monthly bond-buying by year’s end.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- CIT Group Inc, the business lender that last month agreed to buy OneWest Bank, has no plans to become a “serial acquirer,” of financial firms, Chief Executive Officer John Thain said.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- UniSuper Management Pty, the third-best performing Australian pension fund over 10 years, plans to buy more emerging Asian equities as the region’s economic outlook improves.
 yesterday kept its full-year sales outlook of 48 percent growth, while boosting its earnings forecast, helped by an increase in share buybacks.
 Price appreciation is moderating as more properties are listed for sale and buyer demand slows, the group said.
 Still, buy-side firms are using an average of 78 dealers for their derivatives trading, up from 65 in 2009.
 shelved plans in May to buy AstraZeneca Plc for about $117 billion, which would be a record-setting transaction for the drug industry.
 The stock rose the most in a year after the company said it’s planning its first share buyback.
 “It’s certainly positive news that Maersk chooses to launch this share buyback.
 The company will buy back shares for about $1 billion in the next 12 months as Maersk’s capital structure is “almost too strong,” Chief Executive Officer Nils Smedegaard Andersen said in a Bloomberg Television interview.
 It will be the first “formalized” buyback in the company’s 110-year history, and it won’t reduce dividend payments, he said.
 “We find it highly positive that they show clear commitment to return on capital and distribution of this to shareholders through share buybacks and dividends,” Frode Moerkedal, an analyst at RS Platou Markets, said in a report to clients, reiterating a buy recommendation on the stock.
 “We expect the container market recovery will drive the stock over the next three years with the container market at its trough,” analysts at DnB Markets, including Nicolay Dyvik, said in a note to clients, sticking to a buy recommendation.
 “I am afraid I can no longer buy Californian raspberries and cherries, which I would see occasionally and compare to the cheaper fruit from Turkey” Russia slapped one-year import bans on an array of food from the US, the European Union, Norway, Canada and Australia, including dairy products, fish, beef, pork, fruit and vegetables.
 Aabar is in talks with former Arabtec CEO Hasan Ismaik to buy at least half of his 289 percent stake, a person familiar with the matter said July 16.
 Expedia announced its plans to buy Wotifcom for about $658 million last month.
 Levine indicate that there was a process, that there was any urgency to act or that there were discussions with another potential buyer,” Dreiling, 61, said in a letter sent to Matthews, North Carolina-based Family Dollar yesterday.
 After its offer was spurned, Dollar General said in a separate statement that it remains committed to buying Family Dollar and is confident it can resolve any antitrust obstacles.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Caesars Entertainment Corp, the casino company taken private in a $307 billion leveraged buyout just before the credit crisis, has taken steps in recent weeks that signal it’s poised for a massive debt restructuring that will saddle creditors with steep losses.
 The events are putting Las Vegas-based Caesars on a path toward a $127 billion debt restructuring that pits Leon Black and David Bonderman, the buyout titans who took the company private with a $6 billion equity investment, against distressed-debt investors including David Tepper and Howard Marks.
 ‘Chickens Roosting’ “I have no idea whether they’ll survive or not, what can I can tell you is that I won’t be buying any shares,” Gavin Wood, chief investment officer at Kagiso Asset Management, said by phone from Cape Town yesterday.
 “The hunters have feasted for the last six months,” said Raleigh Finlayson, managing director of Saracen Mineral Holdings Ltd, which in May completed a deal to buy OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel’s mothballed Thunderbox operations in Australia.
 Tim Participacoes SA was the worst performer on the gauge, dropping 85 percent on speculation the mobile-phone carrier’s alternatives for expansion are shrinking after Telefonica SA offered to buy rival GVT.
 “When you go into a situation like that you have to accept that the state is going to participate” The changes to the 2002 Mineral and Petroleum Resources Development Act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
 “After the recent strong sell-off in the shares, the good second-quarter results and confirmed outlook could lead to a rebound in the short term,” said Thomas Neuhold, an analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux who recommends buying the stock.
 WH Group will use the money raised to repay part of the $4 billion in loans taken out to buy Smithfield Foods Inc.
 The company’s IPO was “moderately over-subscribed” for the stock portion alloted to international funds, while local retail investors asked to buy more than 50 times the shares offered, WH Group said in a statement yesterday.
 Grain companies had to cancel sales last year or buy out contracts after the amount of rail cars they expected were not delivered, he said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- TDC A/S plans to sell new bonds at interest rates it says are likely to be much lower than those paid five years ago while it was owned by a group of private equity buyers including KKR & Co.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Telecom Italia SpA is preparing an offer valued at as much as 7 billion euros ($94 billion) to outbid Telefonica SA in the race to buy Vivendi SA’s Brazilian broadband unit GVT, people with knowledge of the plan said.
 In its proposal to Vivendi, Telefonica would give the French company the right to buy almost all of its stake in Telecom Italia.
 “It is always best to announce a top/bottom before it might occur so one is able to sell strength or buy weakness,” DeMark wrote.
 It’s difficult to buy the market if nothing changes” In the UK, the Bank of England said two of its policy makers wanted an interest-rate increase this month, marking the first split on borrowing costs in more than three years, according to minutes of the Aug.
 Germany’s largest chipmaker is nearing agreement to buy a US- based semiconductor company for about $2 billion, people familiar with the situation said.
 “We see the steel industry in India developing along the coastal seaboards, in the same way that we are seeing that transition in China” India may become a net importer of iron ore this year with steelmakers including JSW Steel Ltd, the nation’s third-largest producer, buying as much as 15 million tons from abroad, the Federation of Indian Mineral Industries said on July 30.
 “The consumer needs to be inspired to buy,” Jaffe said.
 For most of the past seven years, the Fed chief’s keynote speech on the conference’s first full day proved a buy signal for US.
 Fosun, which agreed to buy Roc for A$474 million ($441 million) in cash, added 07 percent to HK$963 in Hong Kong.
 The Anglo American unit put greater emphasis on buyers’ track records in making purchases at previous sales events, known as sights.
 Edwards, Imperial’s largest shareholder, agreed to buy C$40 million of the 6 percent, six-year senior unsecured convertible debentures via Edco Capital Corp, a company he controls.
 The Fairholme Partnership LP will buy another C$40 million.
 If the issuance fails to raise the full amount sought, Edco will buy non-convertible notes bearing interest at 12 percent to make up the shortfall, Imperial said yesterday in a statement.
 RQFII Demand Funds under the Renminbi Qualified Institutional Investor program, which allows yuan raised offshore to buy securities in China, are seeking new quotas.
 Worse Meat “We will now be forced to buy a worse quality of meat at higher prices,” said Zalina Abdusalamova, chief executive officer of Moscow-based Kings Meat Co, which provides meat to Marriott, Radisson and Novotel hotels.
 “I buy Russian cheese and grow vegetables in the garden” For Natalia Pavlenko, 55, a pensioner from Birobidzhan, Jewish Autonomous Region, Putin’s response to the West is too weak.
 The buyer is a conglomerate comprising Argentine media group Grupo Veintitres, British investment fund ISM Capital LLP and US.
 “We don’t have to buy it to be there,” Dauman said.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Added Complexity ZF confirmed in July that it’s in negotiations to buy TRW, which would create the world’s second-largest auto-parts supplier by sales -- combining a maker of transmissions with a leading producer of car-safety technology.
 The deal may trigger a buyout offer for all of Harbour Ring’s shares, it said.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Vestas Wind Systems A/S won its first commercial order for the world’s most powerful offshore wind turbine, pending buyer Dong Energy A/S’s final investment decision in a UK.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- TPG Capital, the buyout firm that invested in soured megadeals including TXU Corp, plans to start raising money this month for a flagship fund that’s seeking as much as $10 billion, said two investors.
 The total amount for TPG’s seventh buyout pool would include $2 billion the firm already obtained for a bridge fund, according to the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 TPG gathered $154 billion for its fifth fund in 2006 at the peak of the buyout boom.
 Fort Worth, Texas-based TPG, which controls more than $59 billion in buyout, credit and real estate assets, is the last of the six biggest US.
 leveraged-buyout houses to raise a new general vehicle since the crisis, which battered returns from some of the biggest deals in the industry’s history.
 The 2006 fund backed two of the largest: a $48 billion buyout of Texas utility TXU, now Energy Future Holdings Corp, in which KKR and Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies over a five- to six-year span, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Like its publicly traded peers, TPG has ramped up efforts to diversify beyond buyouts, which appeals to shareholders seeking a steady stream of earnings.
 TPG’s buyout results have improved since the Washington Mutual debacle, helped by a surge in asset values that enabled it to harvest gains on successful deals and a retooled investment approach, said the investors, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 All three, Oregon said, delivered returns in the top 25 percent of buyout funds raised the same year.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Adani Power Ltd, the power generator controlled by Indian billionaire Gautam Adani, agreed to buy one of Lanco Infratech Ltd’s thermal power plants in a deal valued at more than 60 billion rupees ($983 million).
 18 (Bloomberg) -- At lunchtime in Manila, Isha Vida avoids fast-food restaurants and joins thousands of other workers and students buying ready-made meals at minimarts across the Philippine capital.
 “When we saw these big outflows we were looking to buy stuff,” said Mark Okada, chief investment officer of Dallas-based Highland Capital Management LP, which manages $195 billion.
 funds that buy the debt, bringing net outflows to $32 billion this year, according to Lipper.
 Sweetening Terms Speculative-grade companies have struggled to borrow as buyers fled.
 to Acosta Sales & Marketing are among at least 20 borrowers this month that increased interest rates on loans they were seeking to attract buyers, Bloomberg data show.
 “Even the potential for retail outflows given further geopolitical instability or the potential increase in rates will be overwhelmed by strong fundamental data, low defaults, and an institutional buyer base that is not easily scared away,” Bank of America analysts led by Michael Contopoulos wrote in a report dated Aug.
 Fixing wholesale gas and electricity prices or using insider information to buy or sell energy products would become a crime under the proposed laws, the Department of Energy and Climate Change said in an e-mailed statement.
 The company’s $600 million in annual cost savings from the merger is twice what Dollar Tree estimated in its deal to buy Family Dollar.
 “More investors are realizing that one day, the crisis will be over and good opportunities to buy will be over too” Petroleo Brasileiro SA tumbled 5 percent, leading the Ibovespa’s 15 percent decline.
 hired Austin Beutner to lead the Los Angeles Times Media Group, bringing in a former deputy mayor of the city who once tried to buy the namesake newspaper with billionaire Eli Broad.
 “There seems to be no shortage of individuals interested in buying iconic newspaper brands,” Sweeney said.
 After scrapping a plan to buy smaller rival T-Mobile US Inc, Son ousted Chief Executive Officer Dan Hesse and hired Claure, the founder of wholesale mobile-phone seller Brightstar Corp, to put the company on a new course.
 For Rogers, he wouldn’t recommend investors buy shares in a publicly-traded fund run by a hedge-fund manager in part because of the way retail investors act during times of crisis.
 Instead, she has discovered somewhere she can buy organic or natural food without breaking her budget: Sprouts Farmers Market.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- JPMorgan Chase & Co, which last year said its private-equity unit would become independent, agreed to sell half of its $45 billion in buyout holdings to Carlyle Group LP’s AlpInvest Partners BV and Lexington Partners Inc.
 Lexington, based in New York, raised $7 billion in 2011 for a fund to buy stakes in buyout funds, a practice known as secondary private-equity investing.
 Humphrey said that he didn’t buy information, according to the microblog transcript, adding that the money he paid was for services provided by vendors.
 ‘Refinancing Risk’ CLOs pool high-yield corporate loans, which are often used to finance leveraged buyouts, and slice them into securities of varying risk and return.
 One of the last equity holdings the bank had was Banco Espirito Santo and “it has not ended well,” said Fall, who has a “buy” rating on Credit Agricole.
 Caesars has had only one profitable year since 2008, when it was saddled with $307 billion of debt in the buyout, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Twenty-nine analysts covering Sberbank’s Moscow-listed stock recommend buying the shares, while one advises selling, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The policy-setting Federal Open Market Committee, which has held the main rate near zero since December 2008, said at its July 30 meeting it still sees “significant underutilization of labor resources” The FOMC also repeated it’s likely to cut the size of a bond-buying program in “further measured steps” and to keep rates low for a “considerable time” after purchases end.
 Policy makers continued to trim purchases that pumped up the Fed’s balance sheet to $441 trillion, tapering monthly bond buying to $25 billion in a sixth consecutive $10-billion cut and staying on pace to end the purchase program in October.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Gannett Co, the owner of USA Today, has agreed to buy out the other companies that own Carscom for $18 billion, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 to find a buyer, a person familiar with the situation said in March.
 Japan buys about 65 percent of the liquefied natural gas coming from Russia’s Sakhalin-2, a 96 million metric ton-a-year project, according to Leigh Bolton, managing director of Holmwood Consulting Ltd, a Surrey, England-based energy consultant.
 The Miramar, Florida-based company said Rhone Capital LLC has agreed to buy $50 million in preferred stock and warrants to acquire 25 million shares of common stock.
 Alternatively, the deputy president can “place administration of such interests under the control of an independent and professional person or agency” Ramaphosa built his wealth after leaving politics in 1996 by buying stakes in companies such as Lonmin Plc and Standard Bank Group Ltd, Africa’s largest lender.
 “For the past five quarters, they guided below Street estimates, and this is the first quarter for the past five quarters that they’ve guided above Street estimates -- it’s definitely a positive,” said Neil Doshi, an analyst at CRT Capital Group LLC, who rates the stock a buy.
 Product Expansion LinkedIn’s professional networking service has been expanding into new product categories and last week said it agreed to buy Bizo Inc, a business-marketing startup, for $175 million.
 Seeking Alternatives In the meantime, Ukraine is boosting its gas production; cutting consumption; seeking alternate sources such as coal, oil and nuclear power; and buying gas from Poland, Slovakia and other neighbors, he said.
 “It’s a market: we can sell and we can buy,” and Russia has no right to tell other countries that they can’t resell Russian gas to Ukraine, he said.
 and EU investors to buy up to 49 percent of NAK Naftogaz Ukrainy, which operates pipelines that are used to transport gas for domestic use and half of the Russian gas that Europe imports.
 Asset Sales Larger competitor Lafarge SA is buying out Anglo American Plc’s share in a Solihull, England-based tarmac and aggregates joint venture for at least 885 million pounds -- to sell the whole business at a later point -- as the French company seeks to satisfy antitrust concerns ahead of a $40 billion merger with Holcim Ltd.
 “We continue to see buyers on dips and people willing to invest at these levels” Argentina’s failure to pay interest on its bonds is a credit event that will trigger settlement of $1 billion of credit-default swaps, according to the International Swaps & Derivatives Association.
 He’s buying municipal bonds for accounts with big tax concerns and corporate securities for accounts with income needs.
 Exchanges in Hong Kong and Shanghai agreed in April to allow cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 “It’s not an overwhelming negative” Iron ore sank last week to the lowest level in almost two months as a credit gauge in China plunged, adding to risks that demand will slow from the world’s biggest buyer of the raw material.
 and Deutsche Bank AG are nearing an agreement to purchase the buyout arm of National Bank of Greece SA, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 The business has underperformed similar buyout firms, with 10 of its 11 funds projected to lose about 25 euros for every 100 euros invested, according to an April document outlining the sale seen by Bloomberg News.
 Stellakis has presided over the buyout arm for more than a decade and received a $38 million bonus in 2009 -- the same year National Bank got its first state rescue.
 Limits on buying parts have also compelled companies to buy used planes for component salvage, hampering safety.
 to agreed to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 Fox abandoning its bid for Time Warner “is not what event-driven call buyers wanted to hear having locked-in to bullish bets,” he wrote.
 “One headline is about who’s buying who, billions of dollars, valuations and isn’t this exciting,” he said.
 “This is no different to the flows we’ve seen recently with decent buying of the back-end and front-end of the government bond curves” A yield curve is a chart showing rates on bonds of different maturities.
 A negative yield means investors who hold a security until it matures will receive less than they paid to buy it.
 A few potential buyers have expressed interest in the site, said Sato, who declined to identify them.
 Louis who recommends buying Coach shares, said in a phone interview.
 GlaxoSmithKline Plc increased 1 percent after the Financial Times reported private-equity firms may spend $10 billion buying older brands from the drugmaker and Sanofi.
 and Warburg Pincus LLC are among the private-equity firms weighing a plan to buy hundreds of older-brand drugs from Glaxo and Sanofi, the Financial Times reported, citing people familiar with the matter.
 and two private equity groups to buy the Parsons division, which according to the paper is valued at about $1 billion.
 Banks are proposing to buy at least a portion of the defaulted bonds, he said.
 The savings will be used to reinvest in new attractions and to increase stock buybacks.
 to lower its tax bills, often by buying a smaller company.
 companies from getting a foreign address by buying a smaller business.
 drugstore chain, plans to say it will buy all of Nottingham, UK-based Alliance Boots Holdings Ltd.
 One Amazon promotion gave customers a $15 Amazon gift card if they buy $50 worth of “selective household essentials,” all of which are P&G products.
 One of Ahold’s rivals in New England, Market Basket Inc, is seeking a buyer as its family owners battle each other for control.
 A large number of overlapping store locations means that were Ahold to buy Market Basket, some outlets might have to be closed, making a takeover less likely, Vos said.
 rose 57 percent after Bloomberg News reported executives are considering buying the company to fend off a potential outside offer.
 to arrange a loan and seek partners for a possible management buyout, according to people with direct knowledge of the matter.
 for $570 million as part of his plan to simplify XL and free up capital for share buybacks.
 Bernanke rattled investors when he said in May 2013 the bank could taper its $85 billion-a-month bond buying program if it saw indications of sustained growth.
 Bull Thesis A growing number of retirees and pensions are also buying bonds for steady, low-risk income in a demographic shift that’s set to underpin debt demand for years to come.
 are yielding the most in five years versus the rest of the world, which may lure foreign buyers.
 “It’s just sad comedy to watch this company continue to deny that it’s a fraud” Bison Capital Holding Co, a China-based investment firm, proposed to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR in a non-binding offer on July 30.
 For such national-plan providers, “the path of least resistance may be to buy your way in,” Rigg said.
 “This stock would fit very nicely into someone else’s portfolio, and they’d be able to take out a lot of costs at the same time” Acquisition Deterrent A potential acquirer may balk at the idea of buying Health Net if it can’t squeeze out cost synergies because they’ve already been outsourced.
 Marketers will be able to see the number of users that clicked on an ad, whether they used a smartphone, tablet or desktop computer, and which device was used to buy a product, Menlo Park, California-based Facebook said in a blog post today.
 Fosun is seeking to buy Aurora National Life Assurance Co.
 Wilton, which specializes in buying run-off businesses from insurers, this month acquired Continental Assurance Co.
 Free cash is money available for reinvestment in thebusiness, rewarding shareholders with dividends and stockbuybacks, and to retire debt.
 By contrast, the largest ETFs that buy Hong Kong-traded Chinese companies, known as H shares, posted just $5 million of inflows.
 Foreigners were net buyers of three-year debt futures after selling 11,303 more contracts than they bought yesterday, the most since April 3.
 lures high-end buyers and Chinese vendors including Xiaomi Corp.
 agreed to buy Shire Plc for $55 billion and said the combined company’s tax domicile will be in the UK.
 “While shares of Dresser-Rand may look expensive on near-term earnings, a strategic buyer would likely be willing to pay a rich multiple given Dresser-Rand’s top-tier product offering, robust aftermarket footprint, and solid long-term cash flow profile,” Chase Jacobson, an analyst at William Blair & Co, said in a note.
 could be among potential buyers of Dresser-Rand, analysts have previously said.
 Jeffrey Ubben, founder and CEO of ValueAct Capital Management LLC, said in April he saw several potential strategic buyers for Dresser-Rand, including National Oilwell Varco.
 Sulzer needs to deploy cash proceeds of 850 million francs ($935 million) from the sale of a coatings unit and CEO Klaus Stahlmann says the board supports his preference for spending cash on growth, including acquisitions, over a share buyback.
Telecom Italia SpA (TIT) is preparing anoffer valued at as much as 7 billion euros ($94 billion) tooutbid Telefonica (TEF) SA in the race to buy Vivendi SA (VIV)’s Brazilianbroadband unit GVT, people with knowledge of the plan said.
 In its proposal to Vivendi,Telefonica would give the French company the right to buy almostall of its stake in Telecom Italia.
 The Beijing-based company asked to buy about 20 percent of Axiata, a stake that would be valued at more than $37 billion based on yesterday’s closing price, said one of the people, asking not to be named as the information is private.
 It agreed in June to buy 18 percent of True Corp, Thailand’s third-largest phone company, for $881 million.
 China Mobile last year scrapped an agreement to buy a stake in Taiwan’s Far EasTone Telecommunications Co.
 The exchanges agreed to allow as much as 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border trading, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 “People are encouraged Charles Li said the quota may be increased in the future, and they might eliminate it altogether so you can buy as much as you like,” said Francis Lun, the Hong Kong-based chief executive officer at Geo Securities Ltd.
 The exchange link will only operate on days where trading and clearing arrangements are open in both Shanghai and Hong Kong, while investors will be protected by regulators of the market in which they’re buying stocks, Li wrote.
 The China Securities Regulatory Commission will oversee investors in yuan shares, while Hong Kong’s Securities and Futures Commission will regulate buyers of equities in the city, he said.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP is seeking a buyer for Heartland Food Corp, the second-biggest owner of Burger King restaurants, a person with knowledge of the situation said.
 Heartland would be seeking a buyer during a time of sluggish fast-food demand.
 and the buyout of protein power maker Dymatize Enterprises.
 Chappell cut his rating on the shares to neutral from buy.
 Retail Business Viva Energy, a unit of Vitol, will spend A$1 billion over the next five years after buying Royal Dutch Shell Plc’s Geelong plant in Victoria and its 870-site retail business.
 They give hedge funds and other big traders a tool for buying, or selling short, whole markets or market segments as frequently as they wish.
 And a bitcoin ETF would make it much easier for people to buy them.
 “In July, Iraq earned $78 billion from southern oil exports, meaning one month’s exports could buy the entire bond issue roughly three times over” Biggest Threat The advance of Islamic State fighters, who captured the northern city of Mosul in June, poses the biggest threat to Iraq’s government since the 2003 US-led invasion that toppled former leader Saddam Hussein.
 Bank Meeting The group of banks have met with Elliott and other creditors to propose buying the securities they own and settling the dispute, according to a bank official who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 In May, JPMorgan agreed to buy about $5 billion of government bonds that Argentina gave to Spanish oil producer Repsol SA as compensation for the takeover of its local unit in April 2012.
 Woodside’s $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders earlier this month, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian gas producer.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Medtronic Inc, the medical technology company poised to buy Covidien Plc and move its address abroad for tax purposes, said its quarterly sales grew 5 percent as demand rose for its pacemakers and aortic valves.
 In June, Medtronic agreed to buy Dublin-based Covidien for $429 billion in cash and stock to expand its portfolio of products sold to hospitals.
 We all want to do our best to make sure those benefits become reality” The agreement to buy Covidien was among several health-care industry deals that have set off controversy in the US, with congressional leaders and President Barack Obama’s administration looking for ways to keep companies from moving.
 The airline became the first Asian buyer of Boeing’s new 777X jet for $75 billion in December.
 The airline also agreed to buy 375 million gallons of fuel, or 2 percent of its current fuel consumption, from the US.
 7, according to a regulatory filing today, which didn’t say who the buyer was.
 to lower its tax bill, typically by buying a smaller company.
 agreed to buy last month for $55 billion, slid 4 percent to 4,680 pence.
 FleetCor plans to finance the purchase with about $24 billion of new debt and issue about 73 million of its shares to Ceridian LLC, which owns Comdata, the Norcross, Georgia-based buyer said yesterday in a statement.
 Our own employees had difficulty discerning between WellPoint, Anthem and which one is really running the show” WellPoint has about 2 million customers who buy the company’s plans directly for themselves and their families, including 769,000 through the Affordable Care Act exchanges.
 Higher Returns Annaly is sticking with its traditional focus on buying government-backed home-loan securities, mainly with borrowed money.
 Hedge Funds As traditional municipal-bond investors have shied away from the island, hedge funds and buyers of riskier debt have stepped in.
 exceeded $10 billion today for the first time since June 30 as investment-grade companies take advantage of a decline in borrowing costs to refinance debt and fund stock buybacks.
 “If you have underlying fundamentals improving, you have individual companies doing well, and you get some volatility as a result of macroeconomic worries, we’d view that as an opportunity to selectively buy” The Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility Index, which usually moves in the opposite direction to the S&P 500, rose 18 percent to 1666 today.
 cut its rating on the company to neutral from buy.
 Customers sign decades-long contracts to buy the output, and SolarCity is pouring the revenue into new installations.
 In a second deal, Vine Oil & Gas LP and its partner Blackstone Group LP will buy Shell’s properties in the Haynesville area of Louisiana for $12 billion.
 agreed to buy Hong Kong and Singapore operations from RSA Insurance Group Plc for $215 million to expand in Asia.
 Investors from outside the six-nation Gulf Cooperation Council, looking for access to Saudi Arabia’s $745 billion economy, aren’t currently allowed to buy Saudi-listed shares directly, and instead access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 No Purchases Humphrey said that he didn’t buy information, according to the microblog transcript, adding that the money he paid was for services provided by vendors.
 Allergan, seeking to stave off a hostile bid from Valeant Pharmaceuticals International Inc, approached Salix about buying the drugmaker in recent months, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 Deal Breaker “I don’t see Valeant buying Allergan if Allergan buys something significant.
 Of the 17 analysts who cover the stock and share their rating with Bloomberg, nine advise clients to sell, while six have hold recommendations and two recommend clients to buy.
 The stock, still Greenlight’s second-biggest holding, rallied 21 percent during the second quarter as Apple spent $18 billion buying its own shares.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index has almost tripled from its 2009 low, limiting options to buy stocks at attractive prices.
 Fiveout of nine recommend buying the shares, with an average pricetarget of $2995, according to data compiled by BloombergEZchip’s shares are down 2 percent this year, and closed littlechanged at $2411 in New York on Aug.
 “We believe EZchip may feel the decline in order activityduring the third quarter, which could negatively impact itsfourth-quarter guidance,” Srivatsa, who still has a buy ratingon the stock, wrote in the note.
 The deal was embraced by fixed-income buyers as declining yields in Australia and globally have fueled demand for credit and compressed spreads.
 “But in terms of real money accounts and offshore buyers there was strong participation” Wells Fargo’s previous benchmark issue of five-year Aussie dollar notes in January 2013 was sold at a spread of 100 basis points, compared with transactions that month by both Westpac and CBA at 95 basis points.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Apcoa Parking AG, the German car park operator seeking to restructure about 640 million euros ($851 million) of buyout loans, agreed to a deal that will reduce its debt by almost 70 percent.
 Apcoa, which has been negotiating with stakeholders since September, said in a court filing in April it wouldn’t be able to repay buyout loans that were due that month.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Companies from OAO Novatek to Yandex NV are boosting share buybacks, taking advantage of a plunge that has pushed Russian stocks down the most among the world’s biggest equity markets this year amid toughening international sanctions.
 restricted last month, have all extended programs to buy their own stock this year.
 “Billionaires are now likely to spend more to buy their companies’ stocks as valuations are low and the sanctions are in place,” Rabinovich wrote in an e-mail.
 The bulk is coming back home and needs to get invested” Lukoil, Yandex In May, Novatek extended its $600 million share buyback program through June 7, 2015.
 Mailru, the Internet company controlled by Alisher Usmanov, Russia’s richest man, plans to buy $45 million of its stock in 2014, compared with $30 million in 2013 and $35 million in 2012, according to the company’s regulatory filings.
 Vagit Alekperov, the chief executive officer of Lukoil and Russia’s 12th-wealthiest man, spent at least $147 million in the first quarter to buy company stock, while Vice President Valery Subbotin spent more than $34 million for stock in June and July, the data show.
 ‘Very Cheap’ Yandex, the nation’s biggest Internet search engine with a market share in Russia double that of Google Inc, has twice increased its buyback program since December, adding 3 million shares in each revision.
 and TPG Capital LP agreed to pay a combined $325 million to settle seven-year-old claims that they colluded to keep leveraged-buyout prices low.
 Paris-based Iliad has offered $15 billion to buy 57 percent of T-Mobile in a move that may initiate a bidding war with Sprint Corp.
 “Iliad’s synergy comments make little sense” New Network It’s possible that Iliad could be counting the savings it would get by buying T-Mobile instead of building its own network in the US, said Michael Bowen, a Portland, Oregon-based analyst at Pacific Crest Securities.
 regulatory approval to buy T-Mobile than Sprint can, according to Craig Moffett, an analyst for MoffettNathanson LLC in New York.
 Unlike Slim, Ergen has shown interest in buying US.
 When SoftBank was buying Sprint last year, Dish made a competing offer, then ultimately backed away.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Tractebel Energia SA, Brazil’s second-largest utility by market value, got approval from its board to buy the Santo Agostinho wind project in the country’s northeast for as much as 54 million reais ($24 million).
 Homeowners also are buying more appliances, a category Home Depot has been expanding.
 Price appreciation is moderating as more properties are listed for sale and buyer demand slows, the group said.
 Las Vegas-based Caesars, taken private by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in a $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008, is battling with creditors as it seeks to rein in interest expense that exceeds its cash flow.
 The money will come from Blackstone’s main buyout fund, called Blackstone Capital Partners, and its chief energy pool, Blackstone Energy Partners.
 Schwarzman said he expects returns from the Dangote venture to be in line with those produced by leveraged buyouts.
 The fund has done three deals, taking a stake in Tanzanian agricultural commodity business Export Trading Group in 2012, investing in Mozambique-based logistics company J&J Africa earlier this year, and helping buy commodities trader Traxys SA in a transaction closing this quarter.
 agreed last month to buy Kodiak Oil & Gas Corp.
 Well Costs “Whiting may allocate more of their rigs” in the Bakken after buying Kodiak, said Evan Turner, lead oil and gas analyst at the London-based research firm GlobalData Ltd.
 and Melody Capital Advisors LLC that would reorganize the company as a standalone business; and one backed by lenders to the LP unit that would sell those assets to a buyer owned by Dish Network Corp.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Mexichem SAB, the petrochemical producer controlled by billionaire Antonio del Valle, agreed to buy German chemical maker Vestolit GmbH from Strategic Value Partners LLC for 219 million euros ($293 million) in cash and assumed liabilities.
 It buys $200 million of rubles per day when that level is breached.
 Changing Sentiment Bond buyers are souring on junk debt after yields fell to an all-time low of 483 percent on June 20, Barclays data show.
 “You have a large middle class buying drugs with their own money, so the price is right.
 A recent rule change allows the health ministry to buy drugs from labs without a public bidding process, as long as firms partner with a state-owned lab.
 Ninety-five percent of young buyers use the Internet to shop for a new vehicle, said a report released today by AutoTradercom and conducted by IHS Automotive.
 That compares with 28 percent of all buyers.
 Some 35 percent of young buyers thought a lack of a mobile site hurt brands, while 59 percent said a poor mobile experience had the same effect, AutoTrader found.
 About 78 percent of millennials used a PC when shopping for a car, compared with 88 percent of all buyers.
 Some 80 percent of consumers will use multiple devices when car-buying online by 2020, up from 44 percent of millennials in 2014 and 32 percent of all buyers, the study found.
 “Social media is typically effective when there’s some sort of advocacy cause behind it, but not when it comes to buying or selling at all,” Helms said.
 Nokia built its location-technologies business by buying Chicago-based map provider Navteq Corp.
 The Brazilian iron-ore miner is trying to find buyers for its remaining assets, or to lease them out, to bolster cash positions after prices of the steelmaking ingredient slumped, the person said, asking not to be named because the process is private and may not lead to deals being signed.
 PC Boost “Where they really stood out was on their PC side,” said Jeffrey Fidacaro, an analyst at Monness Crespi Hardt & Co, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Cubist “would be pretty accretive to any company who would be looking to buy them,” Brian Skorney, a New York-based analyst at Baird, said in a phone interview.
 “It’s not like it’s a small company where the only people it would make sense for it to be bought by are people that already have the presence there and can buy and cut out the sales force,” Krempa said in a phone interview.
 If the drug is approved, which could happen as early as December, a buyer that has both US.
 Traders are buying up options that pay off if the industry slumps and now own 22 puts for each call on the Financial Select Sector SPDR Fund, the most in almost a year.
 “We are buyers of large-cap financials on further weakness as this group will benefit from more volatility,” Emanuel said in an Aug.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Credit-default swaps pay the buyer face value if the referenced borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 A potential transaction for Americana would be one of the largest leveraged buyout deals in the Middle East, where private equity activity is picking up on the back of economic growth and improving financial markets.
 The $787 billion American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, better known as the economic stimulus package, included tax credits and loans to spur development of green companies and to encourage people to buy their products.
 Central bank Chair Janet Yellen has said the benchmark interest rate will remain low for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends.
 “Because of reduced buying of coal domestically, the price has fallen, therefore there’s less incentive to import,” Georgi Slavov, head of raw materials research at Marex Spectron Group, an energy and shipping derivatives brokerage in London, said by phone on July 23.
 China was the largest buyer of the two ores from Indonesia before the ban, according to data from the International Trade Centre’s TradeMap, a venture between the World Trade Organization and United Nations.
 While the measures pushed down prices, they also prevented some Singaporeans, who mostly live in government-financed units that they own, from buying privately built apartments.
 The figure for resident households was 905 percent in 2013, up from 588 percent in 1980, according to government data, thanks to housing grants and a program that allows buyers to use accumulated government pension contributions for purchases.
 The government also taxed speculators and placed levies as high as 15 percent on foreign buyers.
 The central bank also cut the maximum period for new loans to buy public housing by five years to 25 years.
 The restrictions have made it more difficult for Singaporeans to sell government housing and buy better private apartments.
 Government units have an income ceiling for buyers and restrictions on the resale and rental of the units, as well as a minimum occupation period.
 “Now they can’t get the price they need for the upgrade” Condos Plunge The private market is also plunging as one of its biggest sources of buyers is stuck in government housing.
 buyout firm TPG Capital offered A$34 billion ($32 billion) for Treasury Wine Estates Ltd, according to a person familiar with the matter, matching a takeover bid by KKR & Co.
 TPG, the private equity firm run by David Bonderman, previously controlled Treasury Wine’s largest unit by sales, after buying it from Nestle SA in the 1990s.
 TPG has about $75 billion in announced, completed or proposed buyouts since January, making it the most acquisitive year since 2010 for the Fort Worth, Texas-based firm, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The central bank reduced its monthly bond-buying program to $25 billion on July 30, making a sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, while it held borrowing costs near zero percent.
 * Software exporter Infosys +18% as ex-directors seek $18b buyback to lift valuation * BSE 100 gainers: Godrej Consumer +45%, Adani Ent +32%, Nestle India +16%; Shriram Transport Finance +12% * BSE 100 losers: IDBI Bank -69% as 1Q net missed est; Jaiprakash Associates -35%; HDIL -33% * Index movers: IT +07%, Communications Technology +01%, Capital Goods -01%; Bankex -18%, Realty -12% * BSE 500 movers: JBCP +153%, INOL +73%, INFOE +66%, NSE +54%, WHIRL +5%; BHUS -20%, CMEXP -10%, SAPH -94%, INL -86%, APTY -74% * Foreigners bought net $70m of local shrs Aug.
 “Now there are thousands of people buying these things that aren’t associated with the AMA and that is a concern,” said McGraw, who represents filmmakers seeking permission to use drones as flying cameras.
 “The refinery outages spurred some buying,” John Kilduff, a partner at Again Capital LLC, a New York-based hedge fund that focuses on energy, said by phone on Aug.
 She used the money to pay off credit cards and buy Star Scientific shares, McDonnell said.
 needs to take tough measures in a thorough overhaul after two high-profile plane crashes this year drove away passengers and prompted the government to offer a buyout to the shareholders.
 “Piecemeal changes will not work,” Najib said in the statement, offering his support for the buyout plan.
 “This process of renewal will involve painful steps and sacrifices from all parties” Khazanah offered shareholders 27 sen a share to buy the 306 percent stake it doesn’t already own in the company, offering a 125 percent premium to the stock’s Aug.
 That touched off a three-front bidding war for the two companies, with Heineken NV eventually buying Asia Pacific Breweries and Charoen beating out OUE Ltd.
 7 to buy Metro AG’s wholesale stores in Vietnam for $874 million including debt, the data show.
 NetJets provides financial incentives for customers to buy shares in Bombardier Inc’s Global 5000 and 6000, which can fly 6,000 nautical miles (11,112 kilometers), or from Sao Paulo to Stockholm.
 Another option is leasing time on planes through NetJets Marquis Jet Card program, which allows customers to buy 25 or 50 hours of flight time on the aircraft of their choice.
 “There’s probably a bigger overall market opportunity there just because of the sheer number of people who can afford that versus buying a large share of a large cabin airplane,” Gallagher said.
 Banks are proposing to buy at least a portion of the defaulted bonds, he said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- International banks are looking to put together a group of investors to buy disputed Argentine debt and resolve a US.
 The deal has been difficult to complete because the buyers don’t know how much Argentina will eventually pay for the debt, the person said.
 estimates a 3 percent impact to its profit margin in the worst case where it can’t pass on any of the tax to buyers, the company said by e-mail.
 “Most contractors or suppliers that are tendering for projects are already factoring in potential cost increases pursuant to the GST” Lower Demand Property transactions might see a short-term increase as buyers rush to complete deals before the GST, though sales will probably slow again after the tax is implemented, he said.
 That dominance swung the traditional balance of power away from an elite centered in Bangkok, who accused Thaksin of vote buying and seeking to usurp the popularity of Thailand’s monarchy.
 Tyson will buy all outstanding Hillshire stock for $63 per share, valuing the deal at about $855 billion including Hillshire’s debt, the companies said in a July 2 statement.
 Mboweni on July 29 said the government should consider buying one of the existing banks to allow it to achieve this as Postbank lacks the infrastructure or the “muscle” to compete.
 Slagle’s experience is an example of how companies, facing rising health expenses, are increasingly buying or subsidizing fitness-tracking devices to encourage employees and their dependents to be more fit.
 JDcom follows a model similar to billionaire Jeff Bezos’s Amazoncom where the company manages inventory and sells products such as home appliances, books and clothes directly to consumers while Alibaba provides the platform that brings buyers and sellers together.
 Tencent, Asia’s largest Internet company, in March agreed to buy a 15 percent stake in JDcom and then folded its e-commerce businesses into the venture.
 “Do away with the charade -- put in wider seats and call it premium economy” Coach-cabin passengers on American’s domestic flights can buy snacks on board.
 The New York-based PE firm would buy the stake in a joint venture that owns more than 350,000 acres in the Haynesville Shale formation in northern Louisiana and East Texas, according to the Wall Street Journal, which first reported the talks earlier today.
 and TPG Capital LP, among the biggest alternative-asset managers, agreed to pay a combined $325 million to settle seven-year-old claims they colluded to keep leveraged-buyout prices low.
 The complaint, filed in December 2007, listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which the private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies out of billions of dollars by agreeing to suppress takeover bids.
 Steady demand for Symantec’s products and services are helping the company buy time as it searches for a permanent chief executive officer and faces pressure to sell its data-storage business.
 “They are still the biggest security vendor by far and there are some huge advantages associated with that,” said Patrick Walravens, an analyst at JMP Securities LLC who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 Some possible strategies include a buyout by a private equity firm, a breakup and sales of the data-storage unit, or further job cuts to boost profit margins.
 “We might be able to buy without a limit and many other foreigners will go in that way,” Dennis Lim, a money manager at Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said in an interview earlier this month.
 “There is no reason to buy an unsubsidized Samsung at the high end because they are so much more expensive but not that much better anymore than domestic Chinese models,” said Shaun Rein, managing director for China Market Research Group in Shanghai.
 in London with a buy rating on the stock “In the greater scheme of things, if it’s $100 million or $300 million, or somewhere in between, it’s not overly material” The stock was up 06 percent to 1,221 pence at 10:37 am.
 Their presence as potential buyers would lead to a truer auction and set a higher price on the company, the person said.
 Comcast is awaiting approval to buy Time Warner Cable, while AT&T needs clearance for its takeover of DirecTV.
 “The appetite for good quality stocks is high and any correction is being used as a buying opportunity” Mahindra & Mahindra gained the most in a month while Bajaj Auto Ltd.
 Nine other rate it ’hold,’ while two analysts say buy.
 “The clients are evaluating the new reality of their pockets, and it’s much cheaper to buy used appliances at a market, if it’s good quality, than pay it by installments in Elektra or Famsa,” he said.
 In the past, Mexico had kept the sales tax along the border lower than the rest of the nation for decades to give consumers incentive to buy products at home rather than cross into states like Texas, which charges as little as 625 percent in sales tax, and Arizona, at as little as 56 percent.
 SoftBank, which owns 80 percent of Sprint, is also buying Claure’s remaining stake in Brightstar for an undisclosed price.
 Investors in London and Edinburgh say they’re either cutting holdings of junk notes, buying credit derivatives to insure against losses or moving into high-yielding debt backed by collateral, such as oil rigs and cable networks.
 “We have had to say no to the vast majority of transactions this year” While the change in sentiment isn’t as marked as in the US, where a record $71 billion was pulled out of funds buying junk bonds in the week ended Aug.
 Instead of selling bonds in the SWIP Strategic Bond Fund Fund he co-manages, Hickmore sought protection against losses by buying credit-default swaps.
 CapitaLand is realigning its business to focus on more profitable opportunities in Singapore and China after buying the rest of its mall unit to consolidate some businesses and boost returns.
 Bulut last week contradicted Deputy Prime Minister Ali Babacan, who said state-owned TC Ziraat Bankasi AS was interested in buying Bank Asya, which had been in exclusive talks with Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ.
 The state wouldn’t consider buying a bank with 28 billion liras of non-performing debt, Bulut said in comments on the Sky360 news channel on Aug.
 “That doesn’t give investors a good feeling about buying the market.
 The rentals business will keep the name Hertz and get cash proceeds of about $25 billion to pay down debt and support a $1 billion share buyback, Hertz has said.
 Tencent Rivalry Alibaba agreed to buy 60 percent of the company in March for HK$624 billion ($805 million) to gain rights to television dramas and English Premier League soccer.
 That’s making buying companies look more attractive than purchasing individual properties.
 “It’s increasingly evident that real estate investment trusts cannot buy buildings at the cap rates they are valued at on their balance sheets, so M&A looks likely,” Jefferies Group LLC real estate analysts including Mike Prew wrote in a July 28 note to clients, citing Derwent London Plc’s July 22 sale of two London properties for 49 percent more than book value.
 “A way of assembling a high-quality property portfolio promptly is to buy a REIT and there’s a lot of hidden value in these companies,” Prew said by phone.
 Purchases of Spanish malls may reach as much as 15 billion euros this year as buyers anticipate a recovery in consumer lending, said Gema de la Fuente, an analyst at real estate agent Savills in Madrid.
 Still, Klepierre plans to sell non-essential assets if the deal to buy Corio is approved by shareholders, Laurent Morel, chief executive officer of Klepierre said July 29 without being more specific.
 Kraemer, was argued for the black home buyers by Thurgood Marshall, who later became the high court’s first African-American justice.
 In redlining, another technique for keeping blacks out, lenders marked certain neighborhoods as unsuited to black buyers.
 ended talks over buying the fourth-largest US.
 and Bank of America Corp, and debt buyers like Portfolio Recovery Associates LLC, according to the complaint.
 Debt Buyers If that fails, the bank may sell off the debt -- often as part of a portfolio of thousands of other debts -- to a large debt buyer, charging an average of four cents on the dollar, according to a 2013 report by the Federal Trade Commission.
 Those companies can resell parts of the portfolio to smaller debt buyers that operate in particular states or focus on specific kinds of debt, or they can try to collect the debts themselves.
 Stacking Up Over the past decade, debt buyers have increasingly turned to lawsuits to get debtors to pay, said Judy Fox, a law professor at the University of Notre Dame.
 For four publicly traded debt-buying firms, income earned from debt lawsuits nearly doubled over three years, to $11 billion in 2012, according to an April report by the Center for Responsible Lending.
 So the incentive to file these unsubstantiated lawsuits is very great” In Maryland, 85 percent of consumers didn’t respond to lawsuits filed against them, and of those, debt buyers secured money judgments 73 percent of the time, according to a University of Maryland study that looked at several thousand debt collection cases filed in 2009 and 2010.
 In New York federal court, a proposed class-action lawsuit is pending against Pressler and one of its debt buyer-clients over allegations that they fraudulently collected millions of dollars by suing thousands of low-income New Yorkers, like Melendez, over unpaid bills from AT&T Wireless.
 have also been considered logical buyers.
 Representatives for Discovery and Viacom declined to comment on whether they’re interested in buying Scripps.
 Interested buyers now have the chance to gain control of a business with the industry’s widest profit margins.
 Earlier this year, activist investor Icahn took a 9 percent stake in Family Dollar and pushed the company to look for a buyer.
 to buy a panelmaker in June.
 bank, raised its quarterly dividend to 5 cents a share and dropped plans to buy back stock after the Federal Reserve approved its resubmitted capital plan for 2014.
 “Shareholders were pressuring them more for the dividend than the buyback,” Charles Peabody, a Portales Partners LLC analyst in New York, said in a telephone interview.
 Peabody said it was a “shrewd move” to ask only for a higher dividend for now, and sets the company up for the possibility of a buyback next March.
 Six analysts covering the company recommend buying the shares, while one has a hold rating and one advises clients to sell, the data show.
 reiterated buy recommendations on the stock after yesterday’s earnings report.
 Ferguson reiterated his buy recommendation on the stock and target price of $48 per share.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Ophir Energy Plc and Genel Energy Plc rose in London after both oil explorers announced share buybacks.
 Ophir, focusing on West and East Africa, plans to buy as much as $100 million of shares, the London-based company said today in a statement.
 Shareholders in Genel, with projects in Iraqi Kurdistan, on April 22 gave it approval to buy as much as 10 percent of its voting shares.
 It was Genel’s first share buyback.
 Even with the brand’s focus on safety, which includes a program to eliminate car-crash fatalities by 2020, drivers look at all aspects of a vehicle when buying a Volvo, said Andreas Bauer, a co-manager of the Autohaus am Goetheplatz dealership in Munich that handles the marque.
 “People won’t buy the car for its safety features if they don’t like it aesthetically” The new XC90 is part of Volvo’s drive for “more attractive cars” to close the sales gap with BMW, Volkswagen AG’s Audi division and Daimler AG’s Mercedes, the three biggest premium automakers, Chief Executive Officer Hakan Samuelsson said in an Aug.
 “This is definitely worse than we had anticipated,” said Yarbrough, who has a buy rating on Target’s stock.
 is seeking to buy coking coal mines, preferably in Australia, according to a tender document on its website.
 A $39 billion HUD offer in June was the most competitive to date, drawing more buyers and bids than previous sales and setting off a flurry of auctions last month.
 “Sellers looking to sell, lots of buyers looking to buy and pretty good fundamentals, which are making pricing dramatically higher than in 2012” Sales Jump About $30 billion of bad loans were sold in the first half of this year, more than the roughly $25 billion traded in all of 2013, according to Michael Nierenberg, chief executive officer of New Residential Investment Corp, a real estate trust that invests in mortgage-related assets, managed by an affiliate of Fortress Investment Group LLC.
 Wall Street buyers are acquiring the debt after foreclosure starts dropped this year to the lowest level since 2006 and house values soared in California, Phoenix and other markets hard-hit by the real estate crash.
 The FHA is a mortgage insurer run by HUD that helps lower-income borrowers buy houses.
 New Residential purchased $500 million of nonperforming loans, or NPLs, from a bank in the second quarter and isn’t eager to buy more, Nierenberg said last week.
 “We’ll keep our eye on it, but it’s not something we’re going to jump in and buy a ton of loans, RPLs or NPLs, unless we think we can meet our return hurdles” While rising prices are squeezing potential margins, Wall Street-backed investors are able to increase their returns by using low-cost debt to finance their purchases.
 and Axonic Capital LLC are also buying nonperforming loans to expand their property holdings.
 Niel then tried to buy Bouygues Telecom, a deal that was stymied by a $4 billion price gap.
 Equities accounts for about a quarter of the industry’s trading and investment-banking revenue and includes commissions and gains from buying and selling stocks, futures, options and other derivatives, as well as fees and interest from providing services and lending to hedge funds.
 By simplifying his empire’s corporate structure, Kinder will lower borrowing costs, free up cash for bigger dividend payouts and unify the company under a single stock that he can use as currency to buy competitors.
 Shi, a New York resident who buys products ranging from flip flops to used books on Amazon, said he’s keeping his spending patterns the same even as the company duels with Hachette Book Group and Walt Disney Co.
 Visitor traffic to the site was up almost 7 percent in June from a year earlier, third-party merchants’ sales through Amazon’s marketplace jumped more than 40 percent in July and even book buyers aren’t deterred, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Of the 39 percent of book buyers aware of the discord between Amazon and Hachette, the majority have no opinion or aren’t buying fewer books from the online retailer, according to a survey last month by consulting company Codex Group LLC.
 Shi said only higher prices, less selection, and slower deliveries would discourage him from buying on Amazon.
 People can’t buy directly through the site yet, but Twitter has been building a strategy for the possibility and recently agreed to buy CardSpring Inc, a service that lets users redeem deals and discounts through merchants’ tweets.
 “As long as there is a preponderant player in the telecom sector, Televisa can continue to buy cable-TV players without the regulator’s authorization” Cablecom, one of the few large, independent pay-TV providers left in Mexico, will help Televisa compete against America Movil SAB, which holds about 22 million of Mexico’s phone and Internet connections, compared with Televisa’s 3 million.
 “So the idea that they said they would bid jointly and that the FCC would say that’s OK was improbable from day one” While the companies have agreed on the broad outlines of a merger in which Sprint would buy T-Mobile for about $32 billion, the agreement isn’t likely to be announced until August, people familiar with the matter have said.
 The company is fighting creditors in court over its efforts to deal with $23 billion of debt from a 2008 leveraged buyout.
 wireless carrier, started the limited-time offer in stores today for customers buying the iPhone 5s and iPhone 5c.
 automaker is counting on an expanded stable of passenger cars and the new SRX, its top-selling model, to lure buyers away from German luxury marques and Toyota Motor Corp’s Lexus.
 “Someone could buy them for the port or someone could buy them for the assets,” James Wilson, an analyst at Morgans Financial Ltd.
 A takeover approach “would certainly feel like it would be opportunistic at today’s prices, but we are a publicly traded stock so what can you do if someone wants to buy you? The door is always open when you are publicly listed” Port Access With projects such as Corunna Downs, Atlas’s resources in the Pilbara total 17 billion tons, the company said in a June presentation.
 Any buyer of Atlas, which hauls its ore to the coast in trucks, could boost profitability by lowering transport costs, said Hope at Credit Suisse.
 Fortescue is among possible buyers, he said.
 To be sure, leading producers such as BHP and Rio Tinto have no need to bolster their production by buying Atlas, said Mathew Hodge, an analyst at Morningstar Inc.
 Fortescue may be more focused on cutting debt than buying assets, he said.
 The most likely acquirer, a Chinese steelmaker, has little need to guarantee supplies of ore by buying Atlas because there’s already enough, said Sydney-based Hodge.
 So what’s the motivation?” The lure is sought-after capacity to load iron ore at Port Hedland, and that can be secured only by buying Atlas, said Wilson at Morgans.
 It’s also turning to developing markets for growth, buying control of its joint venture Asia Pacific Breweries in 2012.
 By simplifying his empire’s corporate structure, Kinder will lower borrowing costs and unify the company under a single stock that he can use as currency to buy competitors.
 Kinder Morgan Partners, the main operating unit, has been forced to buy into riskier, lower-profit businesses, such as oil tankers, because of its higher cost of capital, analysts with investment bank Tudor Pickering Holt & Co.
 Energy Transfer, the owner of 35,000 miles (56,000 kilometers) of natural gas pipelines, announced a deal in April to buy gasoline-station owner Susser Holdings Corp.
 Warren also was reportedly negotiating to buy Targa Resources Corp.
 In its note to investors, Tudor Pickering had proposed the partnership buy its parent, Kinder Morgan Inc, instead of vice versa.
 “The second-quarter numbers came in a bit weaker than expected,” mainly on execution of lower-margin projects in China and Turkey, Christopher Rodler, an analyst at MM Warburg Investment Research who has a buy recommendation on the company, said today by phone.
 Credit-default swaps pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 That presents a buying opportunity, according to Goes, who said Sao Carlos has 360 million reais ($160 million) in cash and is prepared to sell some holdings to make way for acquisitions.
 Three analysts recommend buying the shares and three say hold.
 “Investors are encouraged to buy riskier investments in large part due to near zero interest-rate environments in Europe and the UK,” said Spencer Lake, global head of capital financing at HSBC Holdings PLC.
 firms seeking foreign listings for tax reasons, known as inversions, have helped drive M&A activity, such as AbbVie Inc’s July 18 announcement that it’s buying Dublin-based drugmaker Shire Plc for $55 billion.
 Earnings Mover Traders are speculating on a big move after earnings and some short sellers are probably buying calls to hedge against a rally, according to Fred Ruffy, a senior options strategist at Trade Alert LLC in Chicago.
 Riley’s Sinha, who raised his rating on the stock last month to buy from neutral.
 The bank is also planning an Islamic finance unit, it said in a public filing today, while it ended talks about buying shariah-compliant lender Asya Katilim Bankasi AS as it said a deal “is not in line with our bank’s priorities” Bank Asya would have pursued talks if Ziraat had made an official bid, it said in a public filing today.
 Inbound shipments surged 65 percent in value to $312 billion in June from a year earlier after the central bank allowed more banks and traders to buy gold overseas.
 Premiums or the fees that jewelers pay to buy gold from importing banks and agencies have plunged to $8 an ounce over the cash price in London from as high as $160 in December, according to Bamalwa.
 “We can utilize our risk tolerance to buy when risk premia are really high in the market” The DNB High Yield Total Return Index rose 99 percent over the past 12 months.
 Board Refused Fox dropped its proposal to buy Time Warner, citing that the company’s board had refused to engage in talks and Fox’s stock price had declined since the offer became public, according to a statement from the company.
 Fox abandoning its bid for Time Warner “is not what event-driven call buyers wanted to hear having locked-in to bullish bets,” he wrote.
 The company doubled its buyback and raised the dividend.
 The buybacks and dividend increase countered a decline in revenue and operating income, as advertising sales fell.
 CBS increased its stock-buyback program to $6 billion from $3 billion, while raising the quarterly dividend 25 percent to 15 cents a share.
 The Turetskys, who married in December, decided to buy a three-bedroom, 1,500-square-foot (140-square-meter) unit at the Adeline, right across from their current rental.
 Few Options “If you’re a buyer looking to buy something in our bottom price tier, you really don’t have that many options south” of Central Park, Lightfeldt said.
 ‘Last Wave’ “I feel like I’m on the last wave of potential buyers that will be able to get a good bang for their buck,” Pasquale said.
 High demand and low inventory are driving up prices in neighborhoods across the city, making prospective Manhattan buyers look north to Harlem, where access to subways is a major selling point, said Boland, who is marketing the Adeline.
 Jeff Krantz, a real estate broker with Halstead Property, said future additions, including a Whole Foods set to open in 2016 on 125th Street and Lenox Avenue, will continue to attract homebuyers.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Sensata Technologies Holding NV plans to buy Schrader International Inc.
 The MERS database largely replaces filings that were historically done by hand, making it easier for Wall Street banks to buy and sell home loans.
 Customers in Chinese cities including Beijing and Guangzhou will be able to buy all the items on the menu later this week, Oak Brook, Illinois-based McDonald’s said in a statement today, without specifying the date or number of cities.
 ‘Rational’ Investment Polskie Gornictwo Naftowe i Gazownictwo SA, the state-controlled company that imports almost all gas to Poland, has signed a 20-year contract with Qatargas to buy about 15 billion cubic meters annually through the terminal, with the first deliveries scheduled for the end of this year.
 “We need to be exceptionally tough here, especially because gas from Qatar is more expensive than the gas we buy from different suppliers” To contact the reporters on this story: Maciej Martewicz in Warsaw at mmartewicz@bloombergnet; Piotr Bujnicki in Warsaw at pbujnicki@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: James M.
 For the first time in decades, more people are buying SUVs than sedans.
 Younger buyers starting families are keen to trade in their small, entry-level car for a mid-range crossover, said Michelle Krebs, a senior analyst at AutoTradercom.
 withdrew from talks to buy T-Mobile over conditions of the deal and concern that regulators wouldn’t approve a combination of the third- and fourth-largest wireless operators in the nation.
 EnerVest Ltd, a private-equity firm that invests in oil and gas production, will purchase HighMount, Ron Whitmire, a vice president for the Houston-based buyer, said in a phone interview.
 Mercuria, based in Geneva, agreed in March to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s commodity business for $35 billion.
 With the injection of capital and influence on the board, Sycamore isn’t more likely to complete a buyout of the retailer in the next three to four quarters, Toohig said.
 Nishikubo, who took flying lessons and became a pilot after purchasing his stake in Skymark, said earlier this week he still wanted to buy A380s.
 The airline announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s current model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 ETFs, which allow investors to trade shares representing a broader index of stocks, are gaining popularity as a way to invest in industries such as apparel, restaurants and entertainment without having to buy multiple equities.
 Dollar General was given no sign by Family Dollar’s Levine that a deal with another buyer was imminent, according to Dreiling.
 Levine indicate that there was a process, that there was any urgency to act or that there were discussions with another potential buyer,” Dreiling said.
 Even as consumers keep buying GoPro’s tiny video cameras that adventurers strap onto their bodies to record their exploits, investors are locking in their gains after the company’s strong stock run, said Alex Gauna, an analyst at JMP Securities.
 “It looks clean to me,” said Gauna, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 The private-equity firm, which owns about 50 percent of Hugo Boss, is in discussions to find a buyer for the stake, which is valued at about 37 billion euros ($5 billion), said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information isn’t public.
 Under German takeover law, when a buyer acquires at least 30 percent in a target company, they are required to make an offer to the remaining shareholders unless granted an exemption by Germany’s regulator BaFin.
 Not only that, Oaktree gets warrants to buy 10 percent of the miner of rare-earth minerals, which are used in electronic devices from Apple Inc’s iPads to Raytheon Co’s Tomahawk missiles.
 Priceline’s investment in Ctrip, through a convertible bond and an agreement to buy Ctrip shares on the open market over the next year, means the company may own as much as 10 percent of Ctripcom, which is listed on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
 A record $71 billion was pulled from funds that buy US.
 yields that are higher than those of other government bonds lured buyers.
 As Rosneft expanded, in part by buying assets that Putin had forced an imprisoned political opponent’s company to sell, it became one of his favorite tools for extending Russian influence abroad.
 The pact helped secure a $22 billion Russian credit line allowing Venezuela to buy tanks, missiles and an anti-aircraft defense system.
 Sanctions are accelerating this redirection as Russian companies seek cash from Asian buyers to replace lost western financing, she said in an e-mail.
 Two months later, the Russian government announced that OAO Gazprom, the state-controlled natural gas producer, would buy Rosneft.
 Besides buying Rosneft, Gazprom had also planned to bid for Yuganskneftegaz, the main production unit of then-billionaire Mikhail Khodorkovsky’s Yukos Oil Co.
 In December, Rosneft agreed to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil trading, storage and transportation businesses.
 surged 79 percent after agreeing to buy Kyrgyzstan oil assets.
 “Investors are waiting for fresh buying catalyst following the recent rally” China Rongsheng jumped 79 percent to HK$150.
 The shipbuilder agreed to buy a 60 percent stake in an oilfield project in Kyrgyzstan for HK$218 billion ($2813 million) in an all stock deal.
 The company agreed in June to buy Frank Russell, a unit of Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co, for $27 billion to bolster its FTSE International Ltd.
 The company, once the leader in casual play with titles such as FarmVille, is buying sports and other rights.
 “The evidence is very clear that Sam and Charles Wyly continued to have the trusts buy whatever they wanted, they had access to hundreds of millions of dollars,” she said.
 “This limits what buyers are willing or able to pay, and helps moderate sellers’ price expectations” Some of the biggest price declines in London were recorded in affluent boroughs including Kensington and Chelsea, Camden, Hammersmith and Fulham, according to the report.
 “That tends to depress property prices more in the higher-priced boroughs, with those that need to sell in summer pricing lower to attract holiday-distracted buyers” Bruce Dear, head of real estate at law firm Eversheds, said the main problem in London remains a shortage of housing supply, which has pushed property prices to more than 16 times the average salary.
 Share Buyback The car-rental business will keep the name Hertz and get cash proceeds of about $25 billion to pay down debt and support a $1 billion share buyback, Hertz has said.
 A negative yield means investors who buy a security and hold it until it matures will receive less than they paid to purchase it.
 Murdoch’s $85-a-share bid to buy Time Warner Inc.
 What’s the plan with BSkyB? Fox has said before it wants to sell stakes in media operations it doesn’t control, or buy full control.
 Once Time Warner is resolved, investors want to know whether Murdoch is a buyer or a seller of BSkyB, and whether the outcome of his current pursuit will have an impact on that decision.
 Nomura has a buy recommendation on the shares.
 You can’t change the direction of the wind, but you can adjust the sail on the sailboat” Investors are quick to both sell and buy in a market that has gone almost three years without a retreat of 10 percent as the strengthening US.
 Persistent gains and shorter losing streaks are encouraging investors to buy dips.
 “There is a great hesitation to buy at new highs and then feel stupid when the inevitable correction hits,” Jason Goepfert, president of Sundial in Blaine, Minnesota, wrote in an e-mail.
 “So once we’ve seen a bit of a dip, we can rationalize to ourselves that, ‘Well, at least I didn’t buy at the high, even if we do decline further’ That feeds on itself and pretty soon we’re right back at new highs again” Goepfert found that the only time when V-shaped rebounds happened more often than now was during the two years through December 1936.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Ausin Group (Finance) Pty, which offers property and mortgage broking in Australia to Chinese buyers, expects to sell two-thirds more homes and to double the amount of loans it arranges as demand from the mainland surges.
 Chinese purchasers overtook Americans to become the biggest buyers of real estate in Australia in the 12 months through June 2013, plowing A$59 billion into commercial and residential property, a 42 percent increase from the previous 12 months.
 New Developments Chinese buy in Australia to educate their children and to live in a clean environment, CLSA Asia-Pacific Markets economist Andrew Johnston wrote in a report today.
 The average price of the properties Chinese buy in Australia is A$630,000, according to the company.
 When Zaja and a partner based on the mainland, whom he declined to identify, first set up Ausin in 2009, banks would only finance developments where less than 30 percent was sold to overseas buyers, he said.
 “The larger banks had the view that overseas buyers were a much higher risk than local buyers.
 Ausin last year began operating as a mortgage broker and now arranges home loans through local banks for about 93 percent of its buyers, Zaja said.
 Ausin has a client who buys about 10 properties through the company every year, and now owns about 40, Zaja said.
 Local Concerns Concerns by locals that overseas investment in Australian real estate, particularly from China, is driving up prices and reducing affordability has prompted a parliamentary inquiry into foreign buying of domestic property.
 “Now, our activity is very much subject to phenomenons like weather” Vale is studying shipping options including buying extra vessels or, preferably, leasing carriers, he said.
 “With the increase in export volume, we will need to hire more ships or buy them, whatever is more efficient from a financial point of view,” Martins said.
 agencies, including the Defense Department and the Department of Homeland Security, buy the IBM servers, according to Bloomberg Intelligence.
 A separate procurement list includes some Apple computers that departments can continue to buy on a smaller scale, defined as purchases totaling less than 12 million yuan ($195,000), according to a state purchasing website.
 Earlier, China’s procurement agency told departments to stop buying antivirus software from Symantec Corp.
 Berli Jucker agreed to buy 19 wholesale stores in Vietnam from Dusseldorf, Germany-based Metro AG for an enterprise value of 655 million euros ($876 million) to expand its distribution and retail network in the Southeast Asian country, according to a statement to the Thai stock exchange yesterday.
 The stock has two buy, two hold and 10 sell ratings, with an average 12-month price target of 4302 baht, according to analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Vitro disclosed the possible sale of the food-and-drink business yesterday, saying a potential buyer is conducting due diligence and negotiating a price, while declining to name the suitor.
 Next year Tesla may deliver 60,000 cars and 100,000 in 2016, 18 percent and 67 percent more, respectively, than he previously expected, said Lache, who also now rates Palo Alto, California-based Tesla a buy, up from a hold.
 6, Adam Jonas, an equity analyst for Morgan Stanley, who rates Tesla the equivalent of a buy, said he expects demand for the Model X to be greater than that for the Model S.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Banks buying asset-backed debt may win a limited reprieve from planned tougher capital rules if the securities are judged to be straightforward.
 “Capital should be redeployed to share buybacks or increased dividends” Carbon Tracker said it derived its projects list and cost estimates from a database compiled by Rystad Energy AS, an Oslo-based oil-industry consulting firm.
 and TPG Capital LP, among the biggest alternative-asset managers, agreed to pay a combined $325 million to settle seven-year-old claims they colluded to keep leveraged-buyout prices low, Bloomberg News reported.
 The complaint, filed in December 2007, listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which the private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies out of billions of dollars by agreeing to suppress takeover bids.
 that do much of their business beyond the nation’s borders are attractive buys amid modest domestic growth, Jeffrey Bradacs, a fund manager at BMO Global Asset Management, said in an interview in the Toronto Bloomberg office yesterday.
 added the chip designer to its conviction-buy list.
 With investors back buying Irish securities, now the punters are returning, albeit cautiously.
 Standard Chartered Plc reduced its rating on the stock to underperform from outperform, while Jefferies Group LLC and Deutsche Bank AG downgraded the shares to hold from buy on disappointing six-month earnings.
 While more cities are set to follow, buyers remain hesitant as the central bank maintains mortgage restrictions, according to Centaline.
 He’s been buying, selling and analyzing the stones for 35 years.
 It unearthed a 1225-carat blue diamond in June that will go on display next week for prospective buyers.
 The company has already received unsolicited calls from potential buyers.
 “Lufthansa has a structural policy that covers jet fuel buying for the next two years,” Christoph Meier, a Frankfurt-based spokesman for the airline, said by phone today.
 What is surprising is that our screen showed 11 of the 13 analysts who cover the company had buy/overweight/outperform ratings on the stock going into yesterday, with the other two rating the shares at neutral or the equivalent.
 “It’s blindingly obvious that everybody who buys a gun ought to get a background check,” Rich Barton, the gun-owning founder of Expedia and Zillow tells Alison Vekshin.
 Bain’s investment will help Toms expand its distribution in Europe and Asia as well as in the US, which includes increasing the chain’s retail stores from the current two locations, Ryan Cotton, a principal at the buyout firm who helped lead the investment, said in a telephone interview.
 Bain is making the investment in Toms from its 11th buyout fund, a $73 billion pool it finished raising in April.
 “Marchionne can just renegotiate and set a new withdrawal price,” Church, an analyst with the equivalent of a buy rating on Fiat, said by phone.
 “The bigger SFS becomes, the higher the level of risk is,” said de Bray, who recommends buying Siemens shares.
 Al Jazeera is using the “underhanded tactic” of turning the escrow fund into “a reservoir from which to pull money to buy favor with its distributors,” the partnership that owned Current TV said in the complaint.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Telefonica SA offered to buy Vivendi SA’s Brazilian Internet-provider unit GVT for 67 billion euros ($9 billion) to expand in a fast-growing broadband market and address antitrust concerns in the country.
 Vivendi would also get a right to buy a stake of about 8 percent in Telecom Italia SpA from Telefonica, a transaction that would reduce Telefonica’s clout in Brazil’s wireless market.
 Telefonica lost out to Vivendi in an initial attempt to buy GVT in 2009.
 Nobel Biocare Holding AG rose 22 percent to 1625 francs after people familiar with the matter said the company has attracted potential buyers including EQT Partners AB and Danaher Corp.
 Drax Group Plc declined 18 percent to 6395 pence after UBS AG lowered its recommendation on the utility to neutral from buy.
 The Topix has climbed 13 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy, signs Japan is weathering a sales-tax increase from that month and speculation the nation’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more local shares.
 plans to buy International Strategy & Investment Group LLC, the closely held research firm co-founded by Ed Hyman, in what would be the investment bank’s biggest acquisition, according to two people with knowledge of the negotiations.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- BNP Paribas SA offered to buy out shareholders in DAB Bank AG just days after reaching agreement with UniCredit SpA to acquire all but 19 percent of the German online broker.
 In April, the company agreed to buy 66 percent of ConSors Discount Broker AG, a competitor of DAB Bank, for 287 million euros, adding it to the French bank’s Cortal brokerage unit to form Europe’s biggest online broker.
 Devan Kaloo, head of global emerging markets at Aberdeen, said the stock drop, which started in mid-July, opens a chance to buy Russia’s largest retailer at an attractive valuation.
 unit he said failed to fulfill parts of a 2012 agreement to buy a division of his Carter Brothers security business.
 In October 2012 Tyco Integrated Security LLC agreed to buy the equity interest in Atlanta-based Carter Brothers LLC, which consisted of a fire and life safety division and a security division, for $358 million, according to the lawsuit.
 is in talks to buy Dublin-based aircraft-leasing firm Avolon Holdings Ltd, the company said in a stock exchange filing.
 were buying the company for 12 billion euros ($161 billion) was “not true” “The company has not reached a binding agreement or offer with relevant parties regarding the acquisition of Avolon and cannot guarantee the completion of the deal,” AVIC Capital said in the statement, adding that there were “bigger inaccuracies” in a previous report about the deal, without being more specific.
 11 that the two companies were in talks to buy it for $4 billion to $5 billion, including debt.
 AVIC Capital said last September that it was interested in buying overseas lessors as it expands its fleet to meet rising domestic travel demand.
 in the 1960s, are traded publicly and pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 electricity producer, agreed to buy Goal Zero to add portable and emergency solar-power systems to its retail energy offerings.
 The agency doesn’t disclose the names of buyers.
 Last year, the energy unit bought Nevada’s largest electric utility for $56 billion and Buffett teamed up with buyout firm 3G Capital to take HJ Heinz Co.
 In April 2008, minority shareholders of Pacific Century Premium Developments Ltd, then 16 percent-owned by Elliott, blocked a buyout by parent PCCW Ltd.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Roche Holding AG is in talks to buy the almost 40 percent of Chugai Pharmaceutical Co.
 Roche, the world’s biggest maker of cancer drugs, plans to pay about $10 billion to buy the remaining stake in Tokyo-based Chugai, the people said, asking not to be identified because the plans are private.
 Last month, Roche agreed to buy Seragon Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Investors typically start buying contracts when the reading is below 30, a sign a market is oversold.
 Chen has kept buying through this month, swapping some of her Legg Mason BW Alternative Credit Fund’s holdings of non-agency US.
 Some money managers have been shedding their mortgages with government backing this year in anticipation of the end to the Federal Reserve’s bond buying program, which could cause prices to fall, said Matt Jozoff, an analyst at JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Prices of Europe’s debt should benefit if the European Central Bank starts buying asset-backed securities, Chen said.
 He said he also likes securitizations of the income streams from lease payments made by solar panel buyers, especially deals from SolarCity Corp, where billionaire Elon Musk serves as chairman.
 Deal sizes have also been attractive, at about $1 billion, which means investors can buy a large block of bonds.
 “We’d be happy to buy current ordinary shares over the counter at 5 cents -- they’re not worth zero,” Jean Pierre Verster of Johannesburg-based 36ONE, which had an open short position on African Bank when the shares ended trading on Aug.
 Those who see doom and gloom will be wanting to get out while the opportunists will be buying” Abil fell to a low of $017 in US.
 Businesses are essentially chasing the same buyers, sellers and material” Digital Platform Phaidon Press senior publicist Kate Greenberg and Artspace co-founder and Chairman Christopher Vroom didn’t immediately return calls and e-mails seeking comment.
 The Topix climbed 12 percent from this year’s low on April 14 amid optimism about the global economy, signs Japan is weathering a sales-tax increase and speculation the $12 trillion state pension fund will buy more local shares.
 led gains on the Hang Seng Index after the developer agreed to buy assets from its parent.
 “Investors are also getting excited about asset injections from Chinese SOEs” China Resources Land surged 76 percent to HK$1818 after saying it agreed to buy a Shenzhen property project from a unit of its state-owned parent.
 The judgment is a setback for Blackstone, manager of the largest fund dedicated to buying real estate in Europe, as it tries to buy up distressed real estate assets in Ireland with the economy starting to rebound from its property crash of 2008.
 In May, it agreed to buy the O’Flynn loans through Carbon Finance.
 Last month, it agreed to buy the shares in Bell Aliant Inc.
 “Priceline is the best executor in the online travel space,” said Tom White, an analyst at Macquarie Capital USA Inc, who rates the company an equivalent of a buy.
Imperial Tobacco Group Plc’s (IMT) Alison Cooper was lauded as the surprise winner in theReynolds/Lorillard tobacco megadeal when she agreed to buy Blu,the world’s best-selling electronic cigarette.
 Tired Brands “We know we are buying unloved and under-invested brands,and we can’t wait to get our hands on them,” Evans said.
 “As the market continues to rise in the face of conflicting economic data, global unrest, and looming overdue Fed exit from quantitative easing we remain cautiously positioned” The Federal Reserve has begun to wind down its bond-buying program, known as quantitative easing, as the US.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index has almost tripled from its 2009 low, limiting options to buy stocks at attractive prices.
 That signals lower costs for meat buyers including Ruth’s Hospitality Group Inc.
 Yigit Bulut, chief adviser to Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan, yesterday denied comments by Deputy Prime Minister Ali Babacan that the government wants state-owned TC Ziraat BankasiAS to buy Bank Asya, as the lender is known.
 Bulut said thatthe state wouldn’t consider buying a bank with 28 billion liras($13 billion) of non-performing debt.
 IBM, Motorola In January, the company announced plans to buy Google Inc’s Motorola Mobility unit for $291 billion in cash and stock.
 The same month Lenovo agreed to buy International Business Machines Corp’s low-end server unit for $23 billion.
 Comercial Mexicana, whose holdings include the upscale City Market grocery stores in the capital’s metropolitan area, hired Rothschild earlier this year to find a buyer for the entire business, people said at the time.
 Excelsior columnist Dario Celis wrote yesterday that Comercial Mexicana is in exclusive talks with a buyer for the restaurants and is close to reaching a deal.
 “It’s a milestone that means we can retire the technical risk,” said SG Securities analyst Zafar Khan, who has a “buy” rating on Airbus stock.
 had expressed interest in buying the Colombian government’s stake.
 “Price remains a critical factor in our customers buying decisions,” he said on the call.
 “This isn’t ideal, but Deutsche Bank should be able to deal with the situation,” Dirk Becker, an analyst with Kepler Cheuvreux who recommends investors buy the stock, said by phone from Frankfurt today.
 “Jain will be able to jump in and meet important clients in Germany for Fitschen,” said Michael Seufert, an analyst at Norddeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale who recommends investors buy Deutsche Bank shares.
 Consumers are upgrading to the new generation of game players, Sony Corp’s PlayStation 4 and Microsoft Corp’s Xbox One, and buying new titles with snappier graphics.
 He recommends buying the stock.
 agreed to buy the company that owns the brand in Ireland and southwest England as the South African food and liquor retailer seeks to boost growth outside its home market.
 Spar will buy 80 percent of closely held BWG Group for 800 million rand ($74 million), the Durban-based company said today in a statement.
 The deal will be financed by a rand-denominated loan and includes the right to buy the remainder of Dublin-based BWG in three to five years.
 “Tavrin and I will each buy a 3 percent stake, another 2 percent will be bought by other directors, and the remaining 2 percent will be kept for future distribution among managers,” Streshinsky said in a telephone interview.
 The overall progress in the economy and labor market has allowed Fed policy makers to further reduce their bond-buying while keeping interest rates at record lows.
 Amec, which agreed to buy US-traded Foster Wheeler AG earlier this year to expand its geographic footprint, won contracts including in the North Sea, and was the preferred bidder for Poland’s first nuclear power plant.
 agreed to buy less than 10 percent of game developer Gumi Inc.
 “We can buy 1 million tons a year from Iran, but because we will start imports in the latter half of the year, it may be about 03 million tons this year,” Venkataramana said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Dairy Farm International Holdings Ltd, an operator of supermarkets and retail stores, is paying 569 billion yuan ($925 million) to buy 20 percent of Yonghui Superstores Co.
 “This buyout gives Dairy Farm exposure to a growing China grocery retail market” The investment also allows the Dairy Farm to diversity its sales as the company faces challenges in a competitive Southeast Asian market, Yeo said.
 and Dutch natural gas futures while keeping the energy trading platform it agreed to buy from GFI Group Inc.
 system it agreed to buy last week.
 “There’s client interest in having other clearing venues for those hubs and that’s why we prioritized them” CME agreed to buy Trayport’s owner GFI Group Inc.
 Best Prices “You have in the value chain brokers that today are providing the quotes and giving liquidity to this platform,” Diego Perfumo, an exchanges analyst at Equity Research Desk in Greenwich, Connecticut, said on July 30 by phone, the day CME announced it had agreed to buy Trayport.
 “Instead of fighting the established participant they buy them” London-based Trayport, founded in 1993, aggregates bids and offers from exchanges and brokers to show the best prices on one screen.
 “If you weren’t able to buy fakes, the way China works someone else will come and fill that gap” It usually takes Alibaba as long as 5 working days to remove a product, according to the company.
 “Issuers’ actions to not include Moody’s anymore are oftentimes because Moody’s is a notch or two or three lower,” said Kozlik, who published a report last month titled “Are S&P’s Local Government Ratings Too High?” Conflicting View Investors in the $37 trillion municipal market rely on the two biggest rating companies, both of which trace their roots back more than a century, to satisfy mandates requiring they buy bonds rated above specified levels.
 It does impact your willingness to own it or buy more of it” Makes Sense Having multiple rating companies offers states and cities opportunities to seek higher grades to lower borrowing costs, which “makes all the sense in the world,” Kozlik said.
 The buyout proposal was 29 percent more than Chiquita’s closing share price on Aug.
 Hundley, a Richmond, Virginia-based analyst at BB&T Capital Markets who recommends buying Chiquita shares, said by phone.
 on July 9 predicted a dramatic recovery in prices in the second half, saying that it’s now cheaper for steel mills in China to buy seaborne rather than domestic supply.
 After completing 93 percent of a A$950 million ($880 million) share buyback, CSL will consider repurchasing as much as A$950 million more its shares, it said.
 Activist investor Carl Icahn, who had pushed Apple to buy back more of its own stock earlier this year, said the rise in the company’s share price validated his earlier claim that the iPhone maker was undervalued.
 Spending Cash The stock’s rise shows investors are buying into the strategy outlined by Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook, who has been prodded to introduce bigger iPhones, give more money back to stockholders and introduce new devices.
 Apple is in the midst of a program to give back $130 billion through buybacks and dividends.
 He’s also been more active in acquisitions, including spending $3 billion to buy Beats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 31, Tseng said, adding that he would consider buying if it does.
 “We are surprised” that the Japan claim “was not reflected in the first-quarter results given the magnitude of the event,” Tom Carstairs, an analyst at Berenberg with a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note to clients.
 The Munich-based reinsurer is increasing dividends and buying back shares to appease investors, including Warren Buffett.
 Kinder plans to buy up two companies he controls, known as master limited partnerships, for a combined $44 billion, consolidating his oil and natural gas pipeline empire under a single, taxable corporation known as Kinder Morgan Inc.
 The change will lower investor payouts, leaving heft to beat rivals on new projects or buy them up, he said.
 plans to split into two publicly traded companies by spinning off its publishing business, including USA Today, and also said it has agreed to buy full ownership of Carscom.
 Gannett also agreed to buy the 73 percent interest it doesn’t already own in Classified Ventures LLC, the parent company of Carscom, for $18 billion in cash.
 The newspaper unit’s cash flow will let it buy other companies without adding substantial debt, Martore said today on a conference call.
 Shares Gain Bloomberg News reported earlier that Gannett agreed to buy the remaining stake in Carscom for $18 billion, citing a person familiar with the matter.
 CCTV has broadcast that iPhone software could be used to help steal state secrets -- allegations Apple has denied -- and people familiar with the matter said this month that China’s procurement agency recently told government departments to stop buying antivirus software from Symantec Corp.
 agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II for about $34 billion, gaining medical-office buildings and senior housing in the biggest health-care real estate deal in three years.
 In June, Ventas Inc, the country’s third-biggest health-care REIT by market value, agreed to buy American Realty Capital Healthcare Trust Inc.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- When Coca-Cola Co, the world’s largest beverage company, agreed to swap some brands and buy a 17 percent stake in Monster Beverage Corp.
 Vice President Al Gore sued Al Jazeera, claiming the satellite news provider owned by the Qatari royal family owes him and a partner $65 million from a deal to buy his network, Current TV.
 The men said Al Jazeera illegally tried to seize $65 million in escrow funds tied to the $500 million buyout.
 Cisco faces a challenging shift as customers move from buying hundreds or thousands of proprietary machines with gross margins of 60 percent or more to software-defined networks that can run more efficiently on cheaper gear.
 Rehaut has the equivalent of a buy recommendation on the shares and a price estimate of $60 that implies a 23 percent advance from today’s closing level.
 “Traders react to any bit of news, any sign that the conflict easing, by buying as valuations are low and therefore very attractive” This week’s rally pared the RTS’s decline in 2014 to 15 percent, a selloff that’s been driven by concern international sanctions intended to punish Putin for not moving to quell the rebellion by pro-Russian separatists in eastern Ukraine will squelch growth and hurt corporate profits.
 New York Attorney General Eric Schneiderman claimed in a lawsuit filed in June that Barclays falsified marketing materials to hide how much high-frequency traders were buying and selling.
 Senvion will use the sale proceeds to buy the group’s contracts to monitor and repair 25,000 megawatts of machines worldwide -- a business which generates about 500 million euros a year and is growing at about 20 percent, according to Tanti.
 was threatening to shut its Philadelphia refinery if it didn’t find a buyer, and it idled the Marcus Hook plant in Pennsylvania.
 Apple agreed to buy Beats for $3 billion in May, its biggest-ever acquisition, with founders musician Dr.
 Permira, based in London, is in talks with advisers to find a buyer for its holding of about 50 percent in the German fashion label, valued at about 37 billion euros ($5 billion), Bloomberg News reported Aug.
 Possible Buyers “In terms of a strategic buyer, we could see Polo Ralph Lauren or PVH,” said Kepler Cheuvreux analyst Juergen Kolb in a note to clients, referring to the owner of the Calvin Klein and Tommy Hilfiger labels.
 “For some luxury-goods companies, Hugo Boss may not be ‘luxury’ enough” Another private equity firm could also be a possible buyer, the analyst said.
 Under German takeover law, when a buyer acquires at least 30 percent in a target company, it is required to make an offer to the remaining shareholders unless granted an exemption by Germany’s regulator BaFin.
 Edita Food Industries, a snacksmaker part-owned by London-based buyout firm Actis LLP, is considering an IPO, four people familiar with the matter said in May.
 While the buying shows demand for equities is strong, it’s no guarantee prices will rise, said John Manley of Wells Fargo Funds Management.
 The money added to the SPDR S&P 500 ETF this week may reflect more complex strategies than simply bullish investors buying stocks, according to Robert Stein, who helps oversee $900 million as president of Chicago-based Astor Investment Management LLC.
 “They could be selling individual securities, doing the 80/20 thing where you buy the SPDRs and sell the 20 weakest stocks against it.
 Novo Banco’s managers, led by Chief Executive Officer Vitor Bento, will seek to find private investors to buy “significant” stakes in the bank in “an adequate time horizon,” according to the central bank.
 Yet it’s not enough to rely on individuals bringing technology into their workplaces anymore because spreading products throughout companies often requires official buy-in and extra bells and whistles like security.
 Apple Sales As part of Apple’s deal with IBM, IBM’s sales force will recommend its clients buy iPhones and iPads, as well as 100 business-focused mobile apps the two companies are building together.
 The economy of China, the biggest buyer, is forecast to expand at 74 percent this year, the weakest pace since 1990.
 The company agreed last year to buy Elkhorn Holdings, a Wyoming-based provider of construction services for midstream oil and gas facilities in the US.
 drugstore chain, won’t asssume the Bern, Switzerland, legal domicile of Alliance Boots Holdings when it finishes buying the pharmacy-retailer, which it announced moments ago.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Russian companies are set to seize on sliding asset prices to buy back their bonds, helping stem the third-biggest rout in emerging markets, according to Morgan Stanley and Erste Sparinvest.
 Steelmaker OAO Severstal and Far East Shipping Co, whose cash piles both amount to 11 times short-term debt obligations, are among companies with an “incentive to buy back bonds,” Morgan Stanley said in a report two days ago.
 Severstal, which in May repurchased $288 million of two Eurobonds, is considering using about $1 billion of proceeds from an asset sale to lower debt, including possibly a buyback, Chief Executive Officer Alexey Mordashov said on July 30.
 “It’s basically a good option to buy back bonds trading at a discount” Bond Selloff Severstal’s $750 million of securities due in October 2022 slid as much as 437 cents from July 16 to a three-month low of 9450 cents on Aug.
 “There will be some cash-rich, non-sanctioned corporates using this opportunity to buy back debt,” thus providing some support for Russian corporate credit, Morgan Stanley said in its research note.
 You hoard it” OAO Gazprom Neft, which was listed in Morgan Stanley’s note, sees no benefit from buying back bonds, Chief Financial Officer Alexey Yankevich said on a conference call yesterday.
 OAO Phosagro, another company cited in the report, doesn’t plan to buy back Eurobonds, the company’s press service said yesterday.
 “It’s basically a good option to buy back bonds” for companies with surplus funds, or those having low indebtedness with good cash flow and with good access to financing, Varga of Erste Sparinvest said.
 The Liquor Control Board of Ontario, one of the world’s largest buyers of alcohol, reported C$5 billion ($46 billion) in sales in the year ended March 2014 and delivered C$174 billion to government coffers, according to its website.
 Despite the earnings revision, Schlumberger investors are not concerned, according to Luke Lemoine, an analyst at Capital One Southcoast in New Orleans, who rates the shares a buy and owns none.
 Chief Executive Officer Niall Booker is refocusing the bank on retail customers and selling non-core assets after the 150-year-old company had to raise about 400 million pounds in May to plug a capital deficit that was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 Mok upgraded the shares to buy from hold.
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 He has a buy rating on First Solar.
 Shareholders in Europe, the Middle East and Africa raised about $87 billion selling stakes in companies this year, about 43 percent more than they sold in the same period in 2013 as buyers return to the region’s markets, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Suez Environnement is considering buying Delta NV’s 75 percent stake in Belgian waste-treatment company Indaver Group, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 Indaver could also draw bids from buyout firms, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the discussions are private.
 Veolia Competition Another potential buyer of Indaver could be Suez’s larger rival Veolia Environnement SA, according to the people.
 Fonterra, which plans to unveil a new global consumer brand next week, last month announced it will buy a stake in a Chinese infant formula maker as it seeks to tap the nation’s lucrative baby milk market.
 Ten of 14 analysts have the equivalent of a buy rating on Nice shares, which are forecast to rise 12 percent in the next 12 months to $4586, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Because Nice has been around for a while, it’s been overlooked” as a big data play by investors, said Shyam Patil, a Los Angeles-based analyst at Wedbush Securities who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Bond investors have been too quick to bet the European Central Bank will buy sovereign debt, BlackRock Inc.
 The Fed tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 The London-based unit will use some of the proceeds from the IPO to buy the 49 percent stake of a Canadian business that it doesn’t already own, according to the filing.
 His real estate investment trust, which buys housing debt, owns a captive insurer that’s borrowing $15 billion from the Des Moines FHLB, which it joined last year.
 In return for buying stock in the institutions and pledging collateral, members receive access to low-cost, wholesale funding.
 So went the buying spree during Asia Week in New York this week as Chinese dealers and collectors packed the salesrooms and snapped up pieces of their cultural heritage.
 These issues have discouraged new buyers and undermined credibility of Chinese auction houses.
 “You won’t get the middle class to start buying art in China unless they trust the market and the prices are in line with some fundamental values,” she said.
 Signs of more selective buying were present during the New York sales this week.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG agreed to buy Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 Shale Oil Siemens has already spent $13 billion this year buying most of Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy business, which also makes gas turbines and compressors.
 Financiere Richemont SA, the world’s largest jewelry maker, posted the slowest start to a year since the global recession as consumers held back on buying luxury goods in Hong Kong, halting Asian growth.
 “I would still hold Richemont and look to buy the dip” Swatch Forecast Swatch Group AG’s sales growth may decelerate to 2 percent to 6 percent this year, Nick Hayek, chief executive officer of the maker of Omega and Longines Swiss watches, said in an interview published by Finanz & Wirtschaft yesterday.
 FuRyu was founded in 2007 after amanagement buyout of an entertainment division of Omron Corp.
 FuRyu has “effectively paidoff” loans used for the management buyout, he said.
 to encompass Asia and Europe, and we now see broad demand from a diverse range of investors” Suntory Holdings will use the $1 billion raised in this month’s sale to complete the refinancing of an 800 billion yen bridge loan from Mitsubishi UFJ it arranged to buy Beam, according to Hasumi Ozawa, a spokeswoman for Suntory.
 Loan Expansion The Bank of Japan’s unprecedented buying of about 7 trillion yen of sovereign notes a month to defeat deflation has driven down interest rates, negating gains from banks’ expansion of domestic lending.
 19 television interview with Rossiya 24 that investors should buy Sistema shares and wait for a “good” ending.
 ECB Obstacles Next month, European Union judges will review oral arguments in a German challenge to a European Central Bank bond-buying plan called outright monetary purchases.
 is moving forward with its deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 “We are seeing buyers of Sistema and MTS bonds,” Luis Saenz, head of equity sales and trading at BCS Financial Group in London, said by email.
 Regulators said in last year’s guidelines that the management-information systems “at some institutions have proven less than satisfactory in accurately aggregating exposures on a timely basis, with many institutions holding large pipelines of higher-risk commitments at a time when buyer demand for risky assets diminished significantly” They stated that banks’ systems should “enable management to identify, aggregate and monitor leveraged exposures” and they also recommended strong “pipeline management policies and procedures” There has been a “marked deterioration in underwriting standards,” in areas like leveraged lending, Fed Chair Janet Yellen said in July, in her semi-annual testimony to the Senate Banking Committee.
 “We can offer a majority stake if a buyer is from the European Union,” Hajdas Doncic said.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Blue Earth Inc, a solar-power developer and provider of energy-efficiency services, has agreed to buy a $10 million equity stake in battery maker PowerGenix Systems Inc.
 Forecasts for record crops in Vietnam and India will guarantee CCL Products raw materials and bolster efforts to win more buyers for instant coffee supplies dominated by Nestle SA and Kraft Foods Group Inc.
 CCL Products is no longer content with selling to institutional buyers outside India, Prasad said.
 In buying Family Dollar, Dollar Tree wouldbe combining the industry’s No.
 Apple Pay will let consumers buy items in brick-and-mortar stores by tapping phones on cash registers.
 It willalso simplify buying online through mobile phones, said Chris Dixon, a partner at Andreessen Horowitz.
 “We’ve been trying to buy some Scottish bonds opportunistically, but there don’t seem to be many around, at least not in size,” said Pattullo, who helps oversee about $121 billion.
 The risk of losses should the vote swing the other way may be dissuading bond dealers from holding the securities, according to Pattullo, who said he managed to buy some bonds of Edinburgh-based Standard Life Plc.
 “I’m sure that Ulster Bank executives saw improvements in the Irish property market and broader economy coming through last year, even before RBS flagged that they were reviewing the operations here, but it probably took a bit longer for RBS to buy into that story,” Hughes said.
 (C) With customers already lining up to buy the phones, Apple’s decision to team up, rather than develop a payment system from scratch, could funnel more spending to the networks and card-issuing banks as transactions shift from cash and plastic cards to mobile phones and other digital devices.
 Jewelry sales in India and China, the largest buyers, typically climb in the fourth quarter before the festivals and the wedding season.
 “Indian consumers had been resisting buying gold in the last few months because prices were higher and now they will buy for festivals and weddings,” Bamalwa said on Sept.
 While jewelry buyers will relish the price decline, it may hurt the interest of investors during Diwali, said Mayank Khemka, managing director of Khemka Group of Companies.
 Indians buy bullion during festivals and for weddings as part of the bridal trousseau.
 Monsoon Impact “Monsoon has been good overall, so buying from villages will also improve,” said Kumar Jain, owner of UT.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest manager of alternative assets, is raising money for its next leveraged-buyout fund with a target of $16 billion, according to a person with knowledge of the matter.
 His issue is that he’s got a buy recommendation on Syneron and the stock is plunging.
 “If management can execute, the stock will move higher,” said Newitter, who has a buy rating on the shares.
 While Syneron won’t be able to catch up to Zeltiq, which has become the market leader in the non-invasive fat reduction industry, the fact that UltraShape is pain-free should allow it to make some inroads, said Anthony Vendetti, a New York-based analyst at Maxim Group LLC who also rates the company a buy.
 At the same time, it was mired in almost $23 billion of debt, the result of a leveraged buyout done just before the financial crisis, and struggling to find areas for growth.
 Since buying First Data in 2007 for $298 billion, including debt and fees, KKR’s original investment has lost about 20 percent in value.
 Instead of selling, KKR in June increased its investment in First Data to $39 billion to help shore up the Atlanta-based company’s balance sheet, making it the buyout firm’s biggest bet ever on one company.
 After KKR purchased RJR Nabisco in 1989 for $313 billion, the biggest buyout up to that time, the firm was forced to prop up the company the following year to stave off bankruptcy.
 Over the past two years, First Data and KKR vetted more than 60 startups, eventually buying three: Clover Network Inc, a cloud-based payment software developer; Perka Inc, a digital rewards-program designer; and mobile-gift-card company Gyft Inc, which Google Ventures had helped seed.
 (JPM) The new-issue market for covered notes is more active thanfor asset-backed debt and investors typically hold largeramounts than ABS buyers, JPMorgan analysts led by Gareth Davieswrote in a note to clients.
 “If the ECB wants a strong sentimentchange by making large purchases it’s hard to do that in thesecondary or new-issue ABS markets as there quite simply aren’tenough bonds” The debt-buying plans have been greeted with skepticism byinvestors who suggest the central bank will struggle to buyenough securities after the market contracted more than 40percent since 2010.
 Retained ABS Draghi said earlier this month the Frankfurt-based centralbank will buy a broad portfolio of “simple and transparentsecurities” that will include ABS and covered bonds.
 The company agreed to buy Neotel from India’s Tata Communications Ltd.
 recommended buying the shares.
 Humana jumped 37 percent to $13237 after announcing plans for the $2 billion share buyback expiring at the end of 2016.
 The new buyback replaces a prior $1 billion plan, which had about $782 million remaining.
 Developer Albert Friedman started buying buildings in the ’70s, renting first to artists and photographers, when the neighborhood was “pretty dangerous” -- a “skid row” with drug dealing and prostitution, he said in an interview.
 is seeking buyers for the South Korean multiplex cinema operator in an effort to exit a seven-year investment, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Korea Multiplex Investment Corp, whose shareholders include the National Pension Service, Public Officials Benefit Association and Military Mutual Aid Association, this week began sending information on the sale to potential buyers, the people said, asking not to be named as the matter is private.
 Korea Multiplex can trigger a 100 percent sale that could be blocked only by smaller investors offering a higher price for shares than the would-be buyer, the people said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Ardian, the former private-equity arm of insurance company Axa SA, agreed to buy private-equity fund stakes valued at 1 billion euros ($13 billion) from UniCredit SpA, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 Ardian outbid several other parties who had made offers for the holdings, which are mostly made up of positions in European buyout funds and were held by HypoVereinsbank, a German unit of Milan-based UniCredit, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the deal hasn’t been announced.
 Secondary buyer AlpInvest Partners BV, owned by the Carlyle Group LP, helped structure a deal that involved purchasing fund stakes from HVB and providing about $450 million in capital for new investments.
 Exploring a sale and an IPO, known as a dual-track process, can help propel a sale by pressuring buyers to act before a share sale puts the company in the hands of public investors.
 When it came to buying the team, Pegula and his wife, Kim, who reportedly paid a record $14 billion for it, turned to Pittsburgh’s Sherrard, German & Kelly PC.
 Working with Pegula, Lowe said, “has been a great ride” Lateral Moves Jenner & Block, Davis Polk Add Lawyers in Chicago, Washington Jason Osborn joined the private-equity and mergers-and-acquisitions practices of Jenner & Block LLP as a corporate partner in the Chicago office He will focus on representing private-equity funds and public and private company clients in complex transactions, including mergers and acquisitions, leveraged buyouts, going-private transactions and joint ventures, and in related corporate-governance, executive-compensation and general corporate matters Osborn was previously a partner in the Chicago office of Kirkland & Ellis LLP.
 Azoulay is buying mainly dividend-paying stocks, he said.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- The tumble in Macau casino shares that erased $74 billion of value in eight months has spurred Macquarie Investment Management’s top-ranked stock picker to look for buying opportunities.
 “We’re always a buyer when we see value” Galaxy Entertainment, founded by billionaire Lui Che Woo, trades at 183 times reported earnings, down from a multiple of 109 in 2011.
 “The abolishment of the redevelopment agencies by Governor Brown is the single biggest problem” for affordable housing, said William Witte, president of Related’s California division, which also is seeking buyers for condominiums next to Belmar with an average price of $24 million.
 “Neel’s regulatory plan would help reduce the cost of housing, thereby helping more Californians buy homes” She didn’t provide specific proposals.
 That casino is closing after unsuccessfully searching for a buyer since 2011, according to a state filing.
 Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 Cheaper Grain Cheaper grain is bolstering profit for buyers includingTyson Foods Inc.
 Televisa took a loss on its investment just three years after it agreed to buy the stake for $16 billion, as the carrier struggled to compete in Mexico.
 SoftBank’s American depositary receipts fell 85 percent to $3635 yesterday, as investors who were buying the Japanese carrier as a proxy for Alibaba could purchase the shares directly.
 To win regulatory support for the plan, the buyer will need to be a new entrant to the Mexican market to create more competition, it has said.
 “We won’t be buying any new privates.
 There are potential buyers for Phones 4u’s insurance business and New York-based Assurant Inc.
 EE and Vodafone may buy some of the retailer’s stores, and will make a decision in the next few days, three people familiar with the matter said yesterday, asking not to be identified because the plans aren’t public.
 They cutthe stock rating to neutral from buy.
 In 1995, Tesco had started to expand overseas and that year overtook J Sainsbury Plc as Britain’s largest supermarket chain after shaking off its image as a “pile-em-high, sell-em-cheap” retailer by starting its Clubcard -- a loyalty program that told it exactly what shoppers were buying.
 The company also reduced its dependence on Libya, Yemen and Iraq, where it has experienced supply disruptions, by last year buying $27 billion of assets in the North Sea.
 “It’s a worldwide phenomenon that governments are buying bonds to keep their countries moving along economically” China’s Finance Minister Lou Jiwei said his government won’t make any major policy adjustments in response to changes in individual economic indicators, even as he said growth faces downward pressure.
 “I still feel we are in a ‘Goldilocks’ environment with an accommodative Fed, huge buybacks, and another strong earnings-announcement season shortly” Yahoo declined 56 percent to $3865.
 AngloGold will use the proceeds of the share sale to either buy back bonds in the market or settle bank debt of $430 million, “or a combination of both,” Stewart Bailey, a company spokesman in Johannesburg, said by phone on Sept.
 EBay marketplaces could draw bids, too, because its robust cash flow would appeal to buyout firms, he said.
 While Johnson’s sum-of-the-parts estimate for EBay is in the mid-$60s, he said strategic buyers may be willing to pay a much higher price because of what they’d be gaining.
 It could cost Google $50 billion to $62 billion to buy PayPal alone, according to an estimate in a Sept.
 Since making its stake in EMC known in July, Elliott has also held talks with potential buyers of EMC without VMware for several months, the person said.
 It boosted the amount late yesterday after receiving commitments to buy 5825 million euros of shares.
 public by the end of the month, at which time it will also start soliciting offers from potential buyers, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Exploring both a sale and an IPO, known as a dual-track process, can help propel a deal by pressuring buyers to act before a stock offering puts the company in the hands of public investors.
 Shuaa’s Safieddine, who rates Emaar Properties buy, expects both revenue and profit at the mall business to grow at more than a 10 percent in 2015 and 2016.
 “The market is in good shape right now,” said Van Hees, who recommends buying Micron stock.
 “Since people know very little about the company, investors are buying into the United Arab Emirates’ retail sector” Companies in the UAE.
 GFI rallied a record 44 percent on July 30 as CME GroupInc, the owner of the world’s biggest futures market, agreed tobuy it for $580 million.
 “The question is legallywhen would they be allowed to start buying in the market?” To contact the reporter on this story:Sofia Horta e Costa in London at shortaecosta@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Cecile Vannucci at cvannucci1@bloombergnetSrinivasan Sivabalan Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Mitsubishi Corp, Japan’s biggest trading house, proposed to buy the Norwegian fishery Cermaq ASA for 888 billion kroner ($14 billion) to expand its foods business and become the world’s second-largest salmon farmer.
 In June, it inked a deal that will almost double its Australian grain handling volumes after buying a controlling stake in Olam International Ltd’s unit in the world’s fourth-largest wheat exporting nation.
 “It is in this context that we recognize the potential of farmed salmon, which can respond to those growing needs, but with minimal impact on the environment” May Switch The Norwegian government, Cermaq’s biggest shareholder, said it’s prepared to sell its shares to Mitsubishi, although it could switch to another buyer if presented with a more attractive offer.
 A majority of Cermaq’s shareholders last year rejected a final bid from Marine Harvest ASA to buy Cermaq, including its fish-feed unit Ewos, for 107 kroner a share.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Hidili Industry International Development Ltd, the Chinese coal miner at risk of defaulting on its debt, will buy back only 60 percent of its dollar bonds because banks won’t lend money to purchase any more.
 Hidili earlier this week offered bondholders 68 cents on the dollar to buy back its $380 million of 8625 percent notes due November 2015, as well as a two cent fee for consenting to amend the notes’ terms.
 Bonds Surge Huang declined to identify the banks funding Hidili’s buyback offer.
 “If we can generate more cash flow over the next year, then we can consider buying back more of the bonds.
 Shuaa’s Safieddine, who rates Emaar Properties buy, expects both revenue and profit at the company’s malls business to grow at more than a 10 percent in 2015 and 2016.
 (2850) has spent NT$428 billion on locally issuedforeign debt and plans to buy more to boost returns, accordingto an Aug.
 There were not so many buyers of Chinese material in theUS.
 Now the Chinese are taking back their material, buying itwherever they can find it” A similar vase is displayed at the Palace Museum inBeijing, according to the auction house.
 Under Japan’s incentives to develop sources of clean energy, utility operators are required to buy clean energy at terms and prices set by the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry.
 agreed to buy Conversant Inc.
 “Relative to the market, I’d have a hard time buying anyone telling me these are bubble-like valuations,” he said.
 “I don’t expect a noticeable change in strategy” with a new chairman, said Neil Smith, an analyst with Bankhaus Lampe in Dusseldorf, Germany, with a buy rating on BNP Paribas.
 Airbus has sought to broaden the appeal of the A380 by selling 20 planes to a leasing company that has pledged to find buyers that don’t yet have the A380 in their fleet.
 Unless the carriers choose to extend their leases, those planes will then be up for sale, providing another possible avenue for prospective buyers.
 government debt ended little changed after advancing earlier as Wall Street Journal reporters speculated during a web cast that Fed policy makers would retain the pledge to keep benchmark overnight rates low for a “considerable time” after the bank ends its bond-buying program.
 Hours earlier, Siemens AG said it would buy Dresser-Rand Group Inc, a provider of energy equipment based in Houston, for $75 billion.
 In two deals last week, SAP AG agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 Hamstrung by sanctions on Russia and unrest in the Middle East, the corporate giants of Europe’s largest economy are using takeovers to reshape strategies and buy into a US.
 Munich-based Siemens, which is simultaneously selling its 50 percent stake in a household-appliances joint venture with Robert Bosch GmbH, is buying Dresser-Rand to participate in the shale-gas boom that’s driving the US.
 Autonomous Driving ZF Friedrichshafen is buying TRW to take the No.
 ‘Highly Flawed’ Eni teamed with Royal Dutch Shell Plc in 2011 to buy Oil Prospecting License 245 for $11 billion.
 Still, Bosch’s preferred scenario may have been to continue to work with ZF on steering components rather than help strengthen a competitor by buying half the JV for an undisclosed sum.
 Lower-than-average catastrophe claims have also eroded their pricing power as buyers are less compelled to seek protection.
 The largest businesses, with global operations, typically buy catastrophe insurance through a broker or directly from insurers, with payout limits for risks in specific countries.
 A new potential partner would be a boost to the Montreal-based planemaker and a reassuring sign to other buyers following multiple setbacks for the company’s largest-ever jet.
 Aircraft buyers typically pay most of the cost upon receipt, and bond researcher Gimme Credit has said further delays could heighten the risk of a liquidity crunch, based on $750 million in US-denominated debt due in January 2016.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- PT Pertamina, Indonesia’s state-owned energy company, agreed to buy a 30 percent stake in Murphy Oil Corp’s oil and natural gas assets in Malaysia for $2 billion in cash.
 Proceeds may be used for drilling in the oil-rich Eagle Ford Shale in Texas, acquisitions, debt reduction and share buybacks, Roger W.
 He rates the shares buy and owns none.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Western Canadian crude is heading across the Atlantic Ocean as Canada’s oil companies seek buyers outside North America.
 Canada’s search for overseas markets comes as its crude production is rising along with that of its traditional buyer, the US.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- L’Oreal SA, the world’s largest cosmetics company, agreed to buy Brazilian hair-color maker Niely Cosmeticos Group, continuing an acquisition spree that has seen it spend more than $5 billion on deals this year.
 Since January, the company has spent more than $5 billion on deals, including the buyback of 8 percent of its stock from Nestle SA and the purchases of facial mask-maker Magic Holdings International Ltd.
 Brewers can buy a range of business services including legal assistance with taxing authorities, distribution expertise and accounting.
 Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying this month to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, according to the policy statement after the Federal Open Market Committee’s meeting in Washington.
 We do the good, the bad and the ugly” National Bank, Canada’s sixth biggest by assets, is cashing in on Credigy’s efforts eight years after buying an 80 percent stake in the firm.
 Other’s Garbage Credigy has diversified, buying and selling more types of consumer-loan portfolios while contracting out its US.
 collections efforts and adding a lending business for other debt buyers.
 “It takes a lot of guts on the executive management to say that we’re going to buy what is otherwise a bank’s garbage,” Brunelle said.
 The firm started lending to other buyers of distressed assets in 2008, and three years later entered the European consumer market in Spain.
 By 2012, Credigy began buying performing assets.
 “So we’re trying to take advantage of that market of buying non-core markets as they’re presented” UK Opportunities The firm is watching opportunities in Europe and the UK.
 even as buying debt portfolios has become more competitive.
 “If you’re just buying and potentially selling and harvesting different kinds of performing loan books in different geographies it’s very difficult to have visibility into that business” Credigy’s longer-term outlook will depend on how big the business becomes and what kind of risks emerge, Sedran said.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Waha Capital PJSC advanced the most in almost two months after the Abu Dhabi government-backed investment company said it’s board will meet this month to approve buying back shares.
 17 to discuss and approve the buyback program.
 “A buyback is a way of rewarding shareholders,” Sanyalaksna Manibhandu, Abu Dhabi-based manager of research at NBAD Securities LLC, said by e-mail.
 “It’s going to come down to analyzing scanner data and what that says about consumer-buying patterns,” Buffier said in a phone interview.
 “Concussion-litigation risk in the NFL seems to be top of mind for buyers these days,” Ayes said Sept.
 Amid a recession and slowing growth in Brazilian air travel, Sao Paulo-based Gol is also taking advantage of low borrowing rates to buy back debt with proceeds from a bond sale that Standard & Poor’s estimates may be as much as $500 million.
 NQ Mobile Inc, a Beijing-based mobile-security serviceprovider, jumped 11 percent to an eight-week high of $7Frederick Ziegel, an analyst at Topeka Capital Markets Inc,reiterated a buy rating on NQ stock with a price target of $33in a note dated Sept.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Burger King Worldwide Inc’s deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 Pfizer, which this year attempted to buy AstraZeneca Plc and move abroad, fell as much as 23 percent.
 It closed down 043 percent after Bloomberg News reported that the company was considering buying Actavis Plc, which has an Irish address.
 It has issued guidelines, demanded data from banks and filed an enforcement action to alter a system officials say lets auto dealers charge higher rates to minority buyers.
 Consumer groups say the practice gives dealers too much leeway to move certain buyers into more-expensive loans.
 Dealers say the markup is a reasonable price for their services, which include bringing in customers and handling paperwork, and that buyers can negotiate the spread.
 The consumer bureau has said lenders should monitor spreads to prevent discrimination, or switch to a flat markup so all buyers get the same deal.
 “When people go to buy a car, they should not have to worry whether they’ll pay more for their auto loan because of their race, gender, or ethnic background” Talks between the agency and auto lenders to settle claims of discrimination have stalled at times because the bureau wanted a public commitment that banks will eliminate the discretion of dealers to change loan costs, according to four people briefed on the discussions.
 Tech Record The company is on the second week of its global tour to meet with investors as it seeks to convince funds to buy into its offering.
 With markets calm for now, investors are buying longer-dated options as the Federal Reserve prepares to conclude its bond buying program by October and attention shifts to when interest rates will be raised.
 Bond Buying Fed policy makers tapered monthly bond-buying in July to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive reduction, staying on pace to end the stimulus program in October.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- UniCredit SpA is studying the sale of a stake in Pioneer Global Asset Management SpA to Banco Santander SA and two buyout firms in a transaction that would combine the asset-management unit with the Spanish bank’s fund-management business, said a person familiar with the plan.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Two years after an unsuccessful buyout attempt of T-Mobile USA, former Telstra Corp.
 In 2012, Trujillo’s efforts to drum up interest in a buyout of T-Mobile from Deutsche Telekom AG failed because private-equity firms that were approached reacted with skepticism due to its size and cost of financing, people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 While details of the plan are still being worked out, Trujillo’s investment could take the form of a proposed capital increase or buying Telecom Italia shares on the market, the people said.
 Icahn buys positions in companies he considers to be under-performing and then pushes for change.
Commercial-mortgage bond buyers arestanding up to an onslaught of new deals, belying concern thatbanks would struggle to sell the debt as issuance surges to thehighest in seven years.
 London-based Gemfields, the world’s top emerald producer, has been visiting Colombia over the past four years, seeking to buy a share in an emerald mine, said Chief Executive Officer Ian Harebottle.
 “Gemfields tends to buy 75 percent, and leave 25 percent with local stakeholders” Gemfields, which mines emeralds in Zambia, has climbed 108 percent over the past 12 months to 52 pence in London trading.
 The company would like to buy an asset in a proven emerald-producing region of Colombia, and considers security in Boyaca to be adequate, even following recent violence, Harebottle said.
 announced a $95 billion accord in March, including paying $63 billion in cash to Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac and buying back $32 billion of mortgage bonds from them.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- BlackRock Inc, the world’s largest money manager, has been buying South Korean stocks after valuations fell to seven-year lows versus regional peers and the government took steps to bolster economic growth.
 The company’s first new platform in 13 years, the Street is available in 500-cc and 750-cc variants to target younger buyers in emerging markets such as India as well as at home in the US.
 Exports, catering to buyers seeking to “own a piece of history” in countries such as the US, UK.
 Colgate would fit with that theme and offer a buyer leading brands.
 Attractive Distribution The maker of Total toothpaste would make sense as a buyer or seller because another company’s products could be distributed globally through Colgate’s channels, according to Ali Dibadj, a New York-based analyst at Sanford C.
 They suggested it could buy Colgate.
 3G Capital, run by billionaire Jorge Paulo Lemann and his partners, is known for finding ways to slash costs at the businesses it buys.
 There’s also room to increase Colgate’s leverage ratio -- 15 as of June 30 -- with a buyout by 3G Capital, Yacktman said.
 will buy out the supermarket operator.
 The Topix has rebounded 17 percent from an April 14 low to gain 18 percent this year amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 A survey of 386 iPhone customers waiting in line in New York and Minneapolis yesterday found that 57 percent planned to buy the iPhone 6 Plus and 43 percent the iPhone 6, Gene Munster, an analyst for Piper Jaffray Cos.
 More customers also intended to buy higher storage capacity than purchasers of the iPhone 5S last year, with 22 percent yesterday choosing the 16-gigabyte version of the iPhone 6 or 6 Plus, 52 percent paying for 64 GB and 26 percent opting for 128 GB, the survey showed.
 corporations from buying smaller foreign businesses and taking their addresses.
 may benefit from having more buyers for their programming, Gallant said.
 FCC action might grant the new services the right to buy programming owned by cable companies, and possibly to feature television broadcasts, said the person briefed on the agency’s plan.
 “It buys some time.
 “If you get one-third of the transfer, yourreturn is booming” Third-party ownership allows investors to buy the tradingrights to players from clubs.
 “We see a big delay in how the economic slowdown, the ruble’s devaluation and the central bank’s rising rates affect what people are willing to pay for housing” Etalon is targeting an annual gross profit margin of about 40 percent as it focuses on upper middle-class Russian buyers who are less affected by slowing growth, said Evdokimov, 50.
 All 10 analysts covering the global depositary receipt have a buy recommendation and predict an average 96 percent return in the next 12 months.
 “Due to sharp ruble fluctuations, starting in March potential buyers started showing lots of interest in real estate in almost all regions of Russia,” Zhuchkov, a managing director at the Moscow-based firm, said by e-mail.
 Petersburg, Moscow and the greater Moscow region where it’s targeting upper middle-class buyers between the ages of 30 and 55, with household incomes of about $130,000 a year.
 Still, Gordon said she’ll never buy a car again without voice recognition, for all its shortcomings.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- CEZ AS, the largest Czech power producer, says it would like to buy a majority stake in Polish utility Energa SA as part of its plan to grow through acquisitions in central Europe.
 CEZ’s interest in Energa and its stated desire to buy Enel SpA’s stake in Slovak power producer Slovenske Elektrarne AS marks a reversal of its earlier policy to steer clear of foreign acquisitions.
 The Czech company will seek opportunities to buy assets in nearby foreign countries, particularly in Slovakia and Poland, the CEO said.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Starz, the pay-TV channel controlled by billionaire John Malone, has hired an investment bank to seek potential buyers, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 All of this will “keep people buying” Treasury 30-year bonds fell last week, pushing yields up by the most in 10 months, as a US.
 report showed manufacturing accelerated and as the European Central Bank cut interest rates and announced an asset-buying plan to spur economic growth.
 The Milan-based carrier has spoken to advisers about using its Brazilian unit Tim Participacoes SA to buy Oi, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the discussions are private.
 About 348 million South Africans will be buying meals from fast-food restaurants by 2017, up from 31 million now, according to the Consumer Landscape Survey.
 The company will need to buy faster-growing businesses -- such as Tableau Software Inc.
 He and the board have faced pressure from Elliott, a shareholder who wants EMC to separate from its publicly traded VMware unit and pursue strategic buyers for the remainder.
 It could buy cyber-security, big-data or cloud businesses, he said, citing Tableau, Fortinet, Verint Systems Inc.
 Smaller buyers are increasingly facing off against bond managers with billions of dollars, like Boaz Weinstein of Saba Capital Management LP, whose buying and selling can impact returns for individuals who may just think they’re wagering on a basket of bonds.
 The discounts exist in part because smaller buyers are preparing for interest-rate increases and getting less interested in funds that use leverage to boost potential returns and losses on debt.
 in 2010 for $19 billion, has maintained its focus on the region, agreeing to buy a Guatemalan lender and Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA’s Panama unit.
 It’s a seller’smarket, and whether it’s one supplier or 10, nothing changes forthe buyer” Changing Law Several governments have also toyed with the idea ofchanging a 41-year-old law that permits only only state-run tomine coal and sell it commercially.
 Tightening Concern The Federal Reserve is gauging the strength of the economy as it winds down a bond-buying program and considers raising rates.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Gabor Varga, a 28-year-old software developer, has joined almost 100,000 Hungarians who will buy homes this year, lifting the market after it suffered one of the worst collapses in Europe.
 “I originally wanted to rent, but interest rates are so low, housing prices are down and rents are creeping up, so I thought it was a good time to buy,” said Varga, who in March bought a new two-bedroom apartment on the outskirts of Budapest with a 13 million forint ($54,000) 20-year mortgage.
 EE agreed to buy 58 Phones 4u shops and take on 359 employees, the largest UK.
 Dixons Carphone, the London-based electronics retailer that agreed last week to take on 800 Phones 4u employees, is in negotiations to buy some Phones 4u stores and may announce the purchase as soon as today, people familiar with the matter said.
 The remnants of Phones 4u will probably be liquidated if administrators can’t find additional buyers.
 19 that it plans to buy 140 shops and take on about 900 employees, pending a court hearing today to review the sale.
 Vodafone’s agreement to buy stores and inventory will raise 124 million pounds ($203 million) while EE’s deal for shops will raise 25 million pounds, PwC said today in a statement.
 18 that there are potential buyers for the retailer’s insurance business, and that New York-based Assurant Inc.
 20 that Dixons Carphone was in talks to buy some of the stores.
 is seeking buyers for some of its South African mines after a five-month strike closed shafts earlier this year.
 There are signs potential buyers are already lining up.
 Investors buying additional Tier 1 debt face the risk of losing coupon payments and writedowns.
 utility owner by market value, is spending $500 million to build three solar farms in North Carolina and to buy power from five more in the state.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Consumer confidence fell to a five-week low as Americans’ views on the economy and the buying climate soured.
 A gauge of the buying climate, which shows whether this is a good time to purchase goods and services, decreased to a 10-week low of 312 from 321.
 Fits and Starts The housing industry is also advancing in fits and starts this year as tight credit and slow wage growth keep some prospective buyers out of the market.
 “Without real urgency pushing buyers to make a decision, general industry demand continues to be impacted by uncertainty about the economy and world events, improving but fragile consumer confidence and reduced affordability due to rising prices and limited personal income growth,” Robert Toll, chairman of the Horsham, Pennsylvania-based company, said on a Sept.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Reserve stuck to its pledge to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after it stops buying assets, even as it outlined a strategy to exit from six years of unprecedented easing.
 Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 Main Rate The Fed has said since March that its benchmark rate would stay low for a “considerable time” after it completes monthly bond buying intended to boost growth.
 Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 About$25 billion of shares in trades will be done as investors buyand sell to mimic the changes, according to a Sept.
 Siemens,Europe’s largest engineering company, is looking to buy Dresser-Rand in a deal that would scupper a competing plan by Sulzer AG,according to people familiar with the plan.
 jumped 18 percent to $12720 asSAP SE agreed to buy the company for $74 billion to boost itscloud-computing business.
 A combination of Chiquita and Fyffes is in the interests of both parties, David Holohan, an analyst at Merrion Capital in Dublin who has a buy recommendation on the Irish banana producer, said today by e-mail.
 In 2010, the companies couldn’t come to an agreement that would enable Alibaba to buy back shares held by Yahoo.
 told clients to buy the shares.
 “A majority of people are thinking July 2015 may be the rate increase and the market’s responding positively to the idea that rates aren’t coming any sooner” Stocks advanced yesterday, sending the S&P 500 up as much as 06 percent, after the Fed renewed its pledge to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends, probably next month.
 The stock was raised to buy from neutral at Citigroup.
 climbed 58 percent to $4898, the biggest advance in the Russell 1000 Index, after increasing its share buyback plans.
 commercial real estate buyers as its $870 billion sovereign-wealth fund, the world’s largest, acquires buildings from New York to San Francisco.
 That makes it the biggest international buyer after Canada.
 In the US, prices for top-quality buildings in major markets are being driven up by foreign funds that often are willing to accept lower yields than domestic buyers in return for a safe place to put their money, according to research firm Green Street Advisors Inc.
 The wealth fund agreed to buy 45 percent stakes in 601 Lexington Ave.
 Norway’s wealth fund began buying real estate outside Europe last year.
 Such buyers have a strong appetite for prime real estate and can afford to pay more because of their low cost of capital, a trend likely to continue if fixed-income yields remain low, he said.
 In May, a partnership led by the property unit of the Ontario Municipal Employees Retirement System agreed to buy five Boston-area office buildings from Blackstone Group LP for $21 billion.
 “Thus they exert more impact on this segment of the market” Foreign investors typically buy less than 50 percent of individual US.
 The fund, as a relatively new buyer to the scene, “does shrink the space available in an auction tent that was already crowded,” said Knott of Green Street.
 “Anytime you add in a motivated buyer with a big checkbook, that is going to at the margin increase asset values, but I don’t think it’s quantifiable” Canada has been the biggest foreign buyer of US.
 government passed an act in 2004 to set aside $56 billion over 10 years for the stockpiling of drugs and vaccines that could protect against a bioterrorism attack, creating a potential buyer for any company able to prove it had a safe and effective vaccine.
 Microsoft, maker of the Xbox video-game console, is in talks to buy Persson’s company, Mojang AB, for more than $2 billion, people with knowledge of the talks said.
 This year, he slammed Facebook, tweeting that the “things they can do to your phone is creepy, so I’m switching to web” In March, he said he canceled a deal to bring Minecraft to the Oculus virtual-reality headset after Facebook agreed to buy its manufacturer, because Facebook “creeps me out” Last month, he said he’s “officially over being upset about Facebook buying Oculus” Warming Up E-mails to Persson and Mojang weren’t returned.
 In the last 10 years, Orange has spent at least $57 billion buying assets in Jordan, Kenya, Egypt and other parts of Africa and the Middle East, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The company, with 9 buy ratings from analysts, 9 holds and 1 sell, has lost more than half its value this year.
 Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 Yet some potential buyers are starting to question whetherthe return the securities offer really reflects the loss risk.
 They like theinstruments even if they’re not sure of the terms” According to Michelle Brennan, an associate director atStandard and Poor’s in London, the kind of investor buyingcontingent debt will be savvy enough to recognize the risks.
 Lunch, Blowout At the new Anthropologie stores, a customer might be able to eat lunch, buy a new outfit, get a blowout and go straight to a party, or she could bring her husband to look at furnishings and shop for clothes while he drinks coffee, Tubin said.
 Investors have largely factored in more share-buying by the nation’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund and further fiscal and monetary stimulus to counter the deepest economic contraction in five years, Kathy Matsui, chief Japan strategist at the brokerage, said in an interview in Tokyo on Sept.
 The Topix’s rebound since April was fueled partly by speculation GPIF will buy more domestic stocks after the equity measure slumped 76 percent in the first three months of the year.
 Seventeen analysts recommend buying Goldcorp, while there are eight holds and one sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Investors, when they buy a stock today, they want to believe that cash flow per share and earnings per share is going to go up over time,” Jeannes said.
 in 2005 and this year’s deal to buy Micros Systems Inc.
 He has also kept his focus on sales, as companies have started buying more cloud-computing technology and slowed their purchases of licensed enterprise software that Oracle has specialized in.
 Three stock promoters -- Anthony Thompson, 38, of Bethesda, Maryland; Eric Van Nguyen, 30, of Quebec; and Jay Fung, 40, of Delray Beach, Florida -- are accused of working with five others from April 2009 to May 2012 to drive up prices of penny stocks to induce investors to buy shares, Vance said today in a statement.
 Kingfisher earlier thisyear agreed to buy Mr Bricolage, France’s third-largest home-improvement chain.
 “A combination could also lead to revenue growth opportunities given the broader user base, higher quality content, better technology assets and enhanced relationships with advertising agencies” Armstrong has been positioning AOL as a buyer, not a seller.
 “It’s a worldwide phenomenon that governments are buying bonds to keep their countries moving along economically” Fed Bank of Philadelphia President Charles Plosser will retire March 1, the regional reserve bank said today in a statement.
 of Indianapolis is tied as the biggest buyer of CSeries jets, having signed a firm order for 40 jets in 2010.
 Pessimism today means there are more people tobuy into the rally tomorrow, he said.
 I am opposed to both sanctions and counter-sanctions’’ Rosneft, in the meantime, is pushing ahead with plans to expand into the oil services business and to buy the global oil merchant business of Morgan Stanley.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Slovakia’s government may create a holding company to let it buy Enel SpA’s stake in the country’s largest power utility without worsening the fiscal position.
 The Czech Republic’s state-controlled CEZ AS, which was beaten by Enel in a 2004 tender for the stake, would benefit from buying Slovenske, Czech Economy Minister Jan Mladek has said, while Hospodarske Noviny reported Energeticky a Prumyslovy Holding, a private-equity company, is also interested.
 Even so, the company has room for improvement in cash management on its receivables and acquisitions, according to Morgan Stanley, which kept the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 “Whether it immediately moves or not,implied volatilities will rise in Hong Kong given thisadditional uncertainty” The protests may deter mainland investors from buying HongKong shares when the exchange link starts, said Daniel Chan, aHong Kong-based analyst at Brilliant & Bright InvestmentSeventy-seven percent of mainland investors surveyed by CLSALtd.
 “This will make it hard for peopleto buy in a market that’s lacking positive news to begin with” To contact the reporters on this story:Kana Nishizawa in Hong Kong at knishizawa5@bloombergnet;Weiyi Lim in Singapore at wlim26@bloombergnet;Fion Li in Hong Kong at fli59@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Michael Patterson at mpatterson10@bloombergnet;Sarah McDonald at smcdonald23@bloombergnetPhani Varahabhotla Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 “What investors are buying now is the possibility of a change in government” Silva would have 476 percent voter support in a second round of the Brazilian election, compared with 328 percent for incumbent Rousseff, according to a Sensus poll published on the website of IstoE magazine Sept.
 “Given the company’s expansion strategy and the fact its debt still isn’t that high, it shouldn’t have trouble finding buyers,” Monika Kalwasinska, an analyst at PKO Bank Polski SA in Warsaw, said by phone Sept.
 The company agreed in July to buy Dublin-based Shire Plc in a 32 billion pound ($524 billion) deal where it planned to move its legal address abroad to lower its taxes.
 company is trying to buy, lost 25 percent to $8811.
 said in July it agreed to buy Abbott’s generic drug business in developed markets and would form a new company incorporated in the Netherlands to cut taxes.
 The company, which agreed at the end of August to buy Canada-based Tim Hortons Inc, will proceed with the deal even amid the crackdown on inversions.
 Speth conceded that the XE’s profitability might lag margins of equivalent models at the three German luxury carmakers because it’s “clear that we don’t have the economies of scale” Jaguar is hoping its sporty heritage, which has been shored up by the 51,250-pound F-Type sports car, helps it woo buyers away from BMW, Audi and Mercedes.
 Goldman Sachs Asset Management agreed to lead a syndicate that will buy stakes from investors in 2002 and 2005 funds run by Crescent Capital Group LP, which separated from TCW in 2011, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 Goldman Sachs’s asset-management arm, which oversees $935 billion, is deploying capital in a competitive secondary market where deal volume is expected to exceed $30 billion this year as buyers bid up prices to post-crisis highs, according to a July report from Dallas-based investment bank Cogent Partners.
 Chicago-based Lake Capital Partners LP, after deciding against raising another buyout fund more than a decade ago, was considering allowing clients to sell their stakes in its 2002 pool, two people briefed on the matter said in July.
 A strong balance sheet and the cheapest valuation among peers make MYR attractive for a leveraged buyout, said Avondale Partners LLC.
 Potential strategic buyers include Quanta Services Inc.
 “If they woke up in the morning and said ‘We want to sell,’ it would not be hard to put a list together of potential buyers,” Dan Mannes, a managing director at Nashville, Tennessee-based Avondale Partners, said in a phone interview.
 MasTec’s Expansion MasTec, a $25 billion utility contractor, has been seeking to expand its electric business and buying MYR would help it do so, said Mannes of Avondale.
 The company has a net cash position and decent cash flow, qualities that appeal to buyout firms.
 Organized Ducks While MYR could appeal to buyers looking to fill a specific geographic niche, large electrical transmission companies “have their ducks in a row” and may not be interested in making major acquisitions, Jonathan Braatz, an analyst at Kansas City Capital Associates, said in a phone interview.
 CLOs, which buy loans and slice them into securities ofvarying risk and return, bought 63 percent of the new debt lastquarter, according to the Loan Syndications and TradingAssociation, which cited Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ LeveragedCommentary and Data.
 have been eager buyers.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Mario Draghi may find a falling currency can’t buy much of an economic recovery.
 Reuters reported earlier today that Pepper was in advanced talks to buy PrimeCredit and is awaiting approval from Hong Kong’s banking regulator, citing unidentified people.
 The laws add 15,000 permits for clean-air vehicles to use car-pool lanes, give rebates to low-income residents to buy cleaner automobiles, require cities and counties to speed up permits for residential solar-panel installations and require the state to devise a plan to fight short-lived pollutants such as methane.
 1 buyer of Tesla and every other electric car,” Brown said in a Sept.
 Incentives the state gives residents to encourage them to buy zero-emission vehicles “are cranked into the whole panoply of incentives that we give for climate-change policies” Hybrid Cars The number of hybrid cars in California has grown 110 percent to 709,766 in 2013 from 337,881 in 2009, according to the state’s Department of Motor Vehicles.
 It set up cap-and-trade rules that let businesses buy pollution credits from companies that reduce emissions.
 increased for a second day after three people said the tractor maker is in advanced talks to buy PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Spanish residential mortgages rose 29 percent in July from a year earlier, the most since March 2006, as economic growth made homebuyers more confident.
 The amount of money lent to homebuyers climbed 13 percent to 32 billion euros ($4 billion).
 The Export-Import Bank provides loan guarantees, loans andinsurance to help foreign companies buy US.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Electrolux AB agreed to buy General Electric Co’s century-old appliances unit for $33 billion in cash, putting the Swedish company on a par with industry leader Whirlpool Corp.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- The biggest and smallest buyers can’t seem to agree on whether to plow cash into high-yield loans or to pull it out.
 He acknowledged there’s competition to buy the debt, saying, “We aren’t the only ones interested” Buyers from pensions to life insurers poured $146 billion into US.
 The buying by institutions is overwhelming the waning demand from individuals, though, and helps explain why average loan prices are about the same as they were at year-end, at 98 cents on the dollar, despite the outflows from mutual funds.
 had to receive an approval from Putin three years ago to buy a 49 percent in a countrywide television channel to show cartoons and kids’ shows.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- ZF Friedrichshafen AG, which agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 The company, which oversees $279 billion in assets including private-equity, real estate and hedge funds, has yet to make a buyout investment in Russia, the person said.
 TPG Capital, the buyout firm co-founded by David Bonderman, invested about $100 million in VTB Group in 2011 and bought into hypermarket chain Lenta Ltd, which held an initial public offering in February.
 Past Reforms Under Guo’s leadership from 2011 to 2013, the China Securities Regulatory Commission expanded foreign investor quotas to buy stocks, cut trading fees and pushed companies to increase dividends.
Namibia’s government will offer tobuy Areva SA’s (AREVA) water desalination plant in the country, built ata cost of 3 billion Namibian dollars ($271 million), instead ofbuilding its own water desalination plant to supply the semi-arid Erongo region.
 “The plant has a provision for expansion and if we buy it,we can expand the capacity to above 20 million cubic meters,”he said.
 had the steepest gain in two weeks after agreeing to buy from Merck & Co.
 Nobuyuki Hirano, the chief executive officer of Mitsubishi UFJ and chairman of the Japanese Bankers Association, said Sept.
 Japan’s benchmark 10-year yield has fallen 22 basis points this year to 0515 percent, as the central bank buys about 7 trillion yen of sovereign notes a month to spur inflation.
 While details of the plan are still being worked out, Trujillo’s investment could take the form of a proposed capital increase or buying Telecom Italia shares on the market, the people said.
 3, Ramsden lifted his rating on the New York–basedbank to what Goldman calls a conviction buy, even though theshares were near a 17-week high and some analysts thought theywere poised for a downturn, Bloomberg Markets magazine willreport in its October issue.
 On Dec3, he cut the rating to a hold and assigned a strong buy ratingto US.
 Best Teams Greenwich Associates surveyed 815 buy-side analysts at 243investment management firms, banks, mutual funds, hedge funds,pension funds and insurers from December to March.
 Google Bet In February 2013, only 64 percent of analysts coveringGoogle had a buy rating on the stock, the lowest percentagesince 2005.
 Kirjner not only maintained his buy on the shares;he also raised his target price from $820 to $1,000 on Feb.
 “We will see thewinners become even stronger winners, and that includes Googleand Amazon” Cusick’s Call JPMorgan’s Philip Cusick, the top-rated telecommunicationsanalyst, made one of his best calls last year when, on April 25,2013, he maintained his buy rating on Bellevue, Washington–basedT-Mobile US Inc.
 One company on which he has a buy rating is AmericanTower Corp.
 He had a buy rating on Merck & Co.
 “The valuation, by our math, impliedthat Merck would never invent another drug in our lifetimeThat’s a good time to buy a stock” Merck remained ISI’s top pick as of mid-August.
 companies from buying smaller foreign businesses and taking their addresses for tax purposes.
 Berkshire will earn 9 percent annual interest on its $3 billion investment tied to the Burger King deal and has the option to buy a 175 percent stake in the combined restaurant company.
 Treasuries are the world’s worst-performing bonds this quarter as the Fed prepares to end its bond buying while the European Central Bank introduced additional stimulus.
 analyst Heath Jansen today raised his rating to buy from neutral, saying a London listing for the spinoff would be welcomed by UK.
 BHP’s London shares fell the most in almost three years the day the spinoff was announced as the company also decided to skip a widely anticipated share buyback.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Bregal Investments, the private-equity unit of a company run by the Brenninkmeijer family, cut the amount of buyout-fund stakes it plans to sell by about 50 percent after a disagreement on price, according to a person with knowledge of the situation.
 The firm, with offices in London and New York, may sell about $200 million of private-equity holdings, half the level it showed to buyers earlier this year, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The average winning bid for holdings of buyout funds rose to equal the net value of assets in the first half of 2014 from a low of 40 percent in the same period of 2009, according to data compiled by investment bank Cogent Partners.
 Since 2002, Bregal, which focuses on buyout, special situations, energy and funds in Europe, the Americas and Asia, has invested more than 7 billion euros ($9 billion).
 rose 31 percent afteragreeing to buy Athlon Energy Inc.
 The European Central Bank last month hired the company to advise on developing a program to buy asset-backed securities as the monetary policy-maker strives to revive the faltering euro-area economy.
 Swatch’s Hayek didn’t seem worried about that earlier this year when he said consumers will resist buying smartwatches because of insufficient screen size and limited battery power.
 We’re still waiting for the big bazooka, which would be the ECB really expanding their balance sheet” The ECB, which meets to discuss monetary policy this week, has cut interest rates twice since June, announced targeted long-term loans for banks, and said it will start buying assets to avert a downward spiral in prices.
 Lagardere SCA climbed 22 percent to 2119 euros as Oddo & Cie recommended buying shares of the media company.
 Yara International ASA added 12 percent to 32260 kroner after Liberum Capital raised its rating on the fertilizer supplier to buy from neutral.
 Associated British Foods Plc rose 45 percent to 2,679 pence as Credit Suisse Group AG advised clients to buy the stock.
 Cohen’s traders are melting away- The Organization of American States holds its annual generalassembly in Guatemala City, Guatemala- Home Depot hack affected 56 million payment cards- China sentences Glaxo’s Mark Reilly to three years in prisonfor bribing doctors and hospitals and fines Glaxo 297 millionpounds ($489 million)- Libya is a mess- Nigeria is combatting Boko Haram by torturing men, women andchildren, according to a seven-year study by AmnestyInternational- Florida man kills his daughter, six grandchildren and himself- Baltimore cop’s lawyer says client within his right toneutralize a dog that bit a woman by slitting its throat- Memphis police find another 200 unprocessed rape kits, somedating to 1976, to go with the current backlog of 12,000- Dunkin’ Donuts, Krispy Kreme agree to buy palm oil only fromsources that don’t clear cut rain forests- Japan will resume killing whales for scientific research,dinner- Women will be admitted as members to the Royal and AncientGolf Club of St.
 “There will be a discussion about this” The Export-Import Bank provides loan guarantees, loans and insurance to help foreign companies buy US.
 IPO Recovery Companies including Edita Food Industries SAE, a snacks maker part-owned by London-based buyout firm Actis LLP, and a subsidiary of Emaar Properties PJSC, the Dubai-based developer of the world’s tallest tower, are considering initial public offerings in Cairo to take advantage of resurgent stock prices.
 Zaffino, who has a buy rating on the shares, lowered his price target to $75 from $90.
 “They will serve as confidence boosters to investors looking to buy into the sector” German online fashion retailer Zalando SE plans to raise as much as 633 million euros in an IPO on Oct.
 Banks are required to show the central bank how their capital fares through dire economic scenarios, and are expected to limit dividends and share buybacks if they don’t meet minimum ratios.
 Andersson, 47, said the regulator’s mortgage rules make it harder for first-time buyers to enter the housing market.
 2 that he wants the mortgage cap to be eased to 95 percent from today’s 85 percent to help first-time buyers enter the market.
 Poser maintained his buy rating on the stock, saying Skechers remains “quite healthy,” with average selling prices on its products rising 19 percent at mid-tier department stores.
 “Investorshave found more reasons to sell than to buy right now” Growth Prospect President Xi’s probes are targeting Communist Party cadresfrom the top to bottom ranks nationwide as he warned that the 87million-member strong party is facing “severe dangers” fromcorruption.
 That had made it harder for gamblers to buyexpensive goods in exchange for cash.
 buyout firms which already own part of Santander’s unit, will own the rest.
 More Countries “People who want an iPhone are going to buy one, regardless of what the news says,” said Carl Howe, an analyst at 451 Research.
 Draghi, Kuroda ECB President Mario Draghi this month announced a final round of interest-rate cuts and a plan to buy privately owned securities as he seeks to revive inflation in the 18-nation euro area.
 to attract a more diverse group of buyers and sellers.
 As part of that agreement, BlackRock and MarketAxess developed a pricing system, an alert that notifies any investor on the system if an incoming order matches a bond they want to buy or sell, a person familiar with how it works said in November.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Mizuho Financial Group Inc, Japan’s third-largest bank, is selling stakes in buyout funds valued at about $1 billion, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Once compliant with Volcker, the bank intends to continue to commit capital to buyout funds, one of the people said.
 “It’s a worldwide phenomenon that governments are buying bonds to keep their countries moving along economically” Robertson was joined by other billionaire money managers at the summit in expressing concern that debt markets are overheated.
 The European Central Bank helped send two-year note yields below zero in eight countries in the region this month after unexpectedly announcing an interest-rate cut and saying it would buy some privately owned securities.
 Almost every company in Washington-based Carlyle’s buyout funds has refinanced its terms at least once, said Conway.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta flight to Atlanta got canceled.
 For years, patients have been able to buy less expensive copies of existing chemical drugs -- ranging from Lipitor for cholesterol to the antidepressant Prozac -- once their patents ended.
 “People who want an iPhone are going to buy one, regardless of what the news says,” said Carl Howe, an analyst at 451 Research.
 Investors should buy the ruble when it weakens to 3870 per dollar, Iskander Abdullaev, an analyst at Sberbank Investment Research, said in an e-mailed note.
 Criteria for loans to first-home buyers may be eased and people who have paid outstanding mortgages may be considered eligible for first-home status when buying a second property, the Guangzhou-based 21st Century Business Herald reported on Sept.
 “Property bonds with relatively higher yield premiums and sold by top developers with sound balance sheets and sufficient channels to refinance are a good buy,” Xue Zheng, head of fixed-income at AXA SPDB Investment in Shanghai, said in Sept.
 “There’s buyers because we look cheap to Europe, buyersbecause people think the economy will continue to failindefinitely, and if the Fed raises rates it will only failmore,” said Thomas Roth, senior Treasury trader in New York atMitsubishi UFJ Securities USA Inc.
 The West African nation, the world’s largest exporter of the material used to make aluminum, is attracting interest as Chinese buyers seek new supplies and an Indonesian ban on bauxite shipments pinches global markets.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Self-driving vehicles and smartphone integration will be among the top features at Europe’s biggest auto show this year, as executives focus on something that’s become increasingly hard to come by: buyers.
 In Paris, Mercedes will show an upgraded version of the B-Class hatchback, which automatically avoids collisions, as well as a 100,000-euro ($127,000) Mercedes GT sports car that will vie for buyers of models like the Porsche 911.
 Social trends, though, suggest it will be difficult to convert these gawkers into buyers, said Tim Urquhart, an analyst at IHS Automotive in London.
 “The market is changing with demographic factors at work, such as urbanization and younger potential buyers deciding they don’t need a car,” he said.
 Prices for African and Oceanic art have surged with therally in art markets, boosted by new buyers includingcontemporary-art collectors, the Louvre Abu Dhabi and members ofthe royal family of Qatar.
 Sotheby’s (BID) sales in this category wereup 14 percent to $417 million in 2013 as the number of buyersgrew by 71 percent from the previous year, the New York-basedauction house said.
 “You can buy a great piece for about $1 millionand a very, very good piece for $100,000” 10,000 Salons Kunin, who expanded Regis into a publicly traded businessthat now owns or licenses 10,000 salons, also collected Americanart, European Old Masters, and Russian and 19th-centurypaintings.
 The buyer,French-born, American artist Arman, sold the work to Kunin forabout $2 million in 1998, Schweizer said.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- The Hong Kong-Shanghai exchange link will reject bids deemed too far below prevailing share prices as authorities seek to prevent investors from “hogging” the daily quota of buy orders available for cross-border trades.
 Brokers should “remind their clients not to provide buy order instructions with an aim to ‘reserve’ or ‘hog’ the quota” The link, part of China’s effort to open up its financial system and promote wider use of the yuan, will begin with limits on both daily and aggregate purchases as policy makers seek to maintain some control over capital flows.
 The 3 percent limit on buy orders may be adjusted over time depending on market conditions, HKEx said.
 Traders can’t amend buy orders through the link, the bourse said.
 The previous government in January scrapped a $753 million deal to buy helicopters from AgustaWestland, a unit of Rome-based Finmeccanica, after a 15-month corruption probe.
 But that narrows our buying options.
 “We should make money when customers use the product, notonly when they buy it,” because the device makes it easier tofind products for sale online, Ian Freed, Amazon’s vicepresident for the smartphone, said in an interview today“That’s served us well in other businesses” The Fire lets users capture information from items such asbusiness cards and paintings, and allows them to give commandsby tilting the device.
 Photographer: Krisztian Bocsi/Bloomberg Ian Freed, who oversees the Fire business for Amazon, said in an interview today, “We should make money when customers use the product, not only when they buy it” Close Ian Freed, who oversees the Fire business for Amazon, said in an interview today, “We.
 Read More Close Open Photographer: Krisztian Bocsi/Bloomberg Ian Freed, who oversees the Fire business for Amazon, said in an interview today, “We should make money when customers use the product, not only when they buy it” AT&T Inc.
 In the process,Amazon has upended the publishing and retail industries and hasset its sites on video games with the $970 million agreement tobuy Twitch Interactive Inc.
 The 77-year-old, who made an unsolicited $2 billion cash offer to buy the Empire State Building last year and owns a stake in Manhattan’s Woolworth Building, has never appeared on an international wealth ranking.
 He made his unsolicited $2 billion cash offer to buy the Empire State Building in June 2013.
 In 2004, Schron financed a $1 billion leveraged buyout of Mariner Health Care Inc.
 The Topix has rebounded 16 percent from an April 14 low amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 That will also entice networks to buy advertisements promoting a specific show and its airtime -- what’s called a tune-in advertisement.
 The complex may attract supplies from as far off as Texas as producers pulling record volumes out of shale formations search for buyers, Paul Eisman, Alon’s chief executive officer, said by telephone today.
 goes public later this week, according to bets by structured-products buyers.
 Call warrants are financial instruments that give the holder the right to buy the underlying share at a specific price within a certain period.
 Minecraft is already wildly popular worldwide, giving it a far higher price and the danger that Microsoft is buying at the top.
 “They are buying an expensive asset where once it goes within Microsoft, will it continue to show the type of growth that it has?” Xbox Trims Elsewhere at Xbox, Nadella has trimmed.
 “Improved confidence and stocks being cheaper than they were a few days ago prompted some buying.
 Since June, ECB President Mario Draghi has cut interest rates to record lows, offered cheap long-term cash to banks, and pledged to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds in a bid to revive the euro-area economy.
 He has said policy makers will go further if needed, leaving open the option of quantitative easing, or large-scale buying of sovereign debt.
 China, the biggest buyer of the fiber, will restrict imports next year to encourage use of domestic cotton, the government said on Sept.
 Matt Rose, executive chairman, visited the region in August and spoke to local media and Seattle Mayor Ed Murray about the company’s safety practices and commitment to buy 5,000 stronger tank cars.
 Instead of cutting borrowing costs, the bank could employ unconventional monetary tools, such as buying dollars without offsetting the effect of the intervention, said Barry Topf, a former member of the monetary policy committee.
 Since then, mortgage standards have tightened, and he can’t afford to buy in his neighborhood because investors have bid up prices to almost pre-bust levels.
 The Hispanic share of the market for mortgages to buy homes fell to 22 percent in 2013 from 24 percent the prior year and barely half of the 2006 peak, according to an analysis of federal lending data by the Urban Institute, a Washington-based non-partisan research group.
 Tighter credit excluded as many as 12 million Americans from buying in 2012 who would have qualified under the pre-bubble standards, Urban Institute’s George said.
 “If I buy, it won’t be here in Santa Ana,” Ramos said.
 “The majority of our clients are Hispanic and they want to buy a house but it’s so difficult,” Manuel, 21, said during an interview in the apartment living room.
 Such a concentrated deal encouraged more fund managers to buy on the first day of trading, as they sought exposure to Alibaba’s dominance over a booming e-commerce industry in the country of 136 billion people.
 Pfizer, which had run aground (for now) in its attempt to buy AstraZeneca, came out with yet a new and different target for its inversionary tactics, Actavis.
 The warren sprawled out under the center of the city, and you could have lunch or dinner, get your hair cut, buy almost anything and cover several city blocks sheltered from the elements.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Perella Weinberg Partners LP agreed to buy the site of Berlin’s Tacheles building, a former department store that was occupied by squatters for two decades.
 Investors including private-equity firms, insurance companies and pension funds are buying commercial property to benefit from the city’s growing economy.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Palm oil’s slump to a five-year low offers investors an opportunity to buy plantation stocks, according to Dorab Mistry, director at Godrej International Ltd, who says producers are still making money.
 Upstream companies will benefit when the price cycle turns” Mistry, who’s traded palm oil for more than three decades, joins Standard Chartered Plc in recommending investors buy plantation stocks to profit from a rebound in prices.
 “We have long argued that the way to make money in the palm sector is to buy growth operators when prices are low and sentiment is weak,” Standard Chartered analysts Adrian Foulger and Denis Chai said in a report dated Sept.
 “At that time, palm rapidly made itself competitive and exported its way out of a crisis as Malaysian stocks peaked at 2238 million in December 2008” Imports of vegetable oils by India, the biggest palm oil buyer, surged to 134 million tons in August and may exceed 1 million tons this month, Mistry said.
 The company is negotiating the interest rate with initial buyers, who will have the option to buy an additional $75 million in notes.
 The private-equity giant, which will own about 7 percent of the company post-IPO, injected $775 million of equity in a leveraged buyout of Travelport in 2006, later lifting its investment to just over $800 million.
 Cheapest Equities “Investors sold Russian stocks on rumors about sanctions and now are buying up the cheapest equities on the fact,” Vadim Bit-Avragim, who helps oversee about $41 billion at Kapital Asset Management LLC in Moscow, said by phone.
 Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, wants to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 “Investors hope to sell now and buy cheaper later” The government will also sell a 5 percent stake this month in Steel Authority of India Ltd, worth 163 billion rupees, a finance ministry official said Sept.
 Verisk announced in January that it agreed to buy EagleViewto add an image library that encompasses about 90 percent ofUS.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- BB&T Corp, the lender that agreed last week to acquire 41 Texas branches from Citigroup Inc, plans to buy Bank of Kentucky Financial Corp.
 Investment in the grain industry will continue until there aren’t any assets left to buy, according to John Murray, managing director at Emerald Grain Pty, a Melbourne-based grain handler.
 “Most of the buyers of the assets of grain in Australia will invest where it’s sensible” Wheat futures dropped 13 percent in Chicago this year on expectations that global production will climb to a record.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- If you’re a lazy investor (sorry, sell side, we don’t have any phone numbers), then exchange-traded funds that buy “high-quality stocks” must seem like a no-brainer.
 Who doesn’t want “high-quality stocks,” right? And for most of a decade, if you wanted to buy the “quality” stocks in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index you could just load up on the PowerShares S&P 500 High Quality Portfolio ETF issued by Invesco Ltd.
 So it beggars the question, what are these two funds doing differently? The SPHQ is advertised as a way to own stocks “reflecting long-term growth and stability of a company’s earnings and dividends” The iShares QUAL fund is billed as buying stocks with “high return on equity, stable year-over-year earnings growth and low financial leverage” Different Quality While the descriptions sound similar, the two have ended up focusing on completely different sets of stocks.
 “We need new policy now and the expectations are somewhathigh,” said Mikey Hsia, a sales trader at Sunrise Brokers LLP“We need Abe to give us the next indication of what he wants todo here, such as his growth policies” The Topix has rebounded 18 percent from an April 14 low togain 27 percent this year amid optimism about the globaleconomy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government PensionInvestment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 Liquidnet Holdings Inc, which runs a trading platform where large investors can buy and sell stocks, is cutting about 6 percent of its staff amid poor performance at its US.
 offered to buy it.
 Cermaq surged 14 percent to 9575 kroner after Mitsubishi offered to buy the Norwegian fishing company for 888 billion kroner ($14 billion).
 “Local banks have been buying bonds as lending is sluggish, so the Fitch news will probably help send yields further down” The dong was steady today at 21,200 per dollar in Hanoi, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- ZF Friedrichshafen AG agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 The company has the funds to settle a put option in March that gives buyers the right to sell 25 billion rubles of bonds, he said.
 The company agreed to buy a stake in Liongate Capital Management LLP last year to add hedge funds.
 While a public stock offers investors more liquidity and transparency, Pershing Square’s investor correspondence outlines a cheaper way to benefit from his activist campaigns without buying the listed fund.
 “You know every day how it’s going and you can buy or sell more on a daily basis” Ackman has said he’s wanted to raise permanent, public capital since at least 2011 to avoid a repeat of the financial crisis, when investors withdrew about 27 percent of his New York-based firm’s funds.
 Publicly traded funds allow investors to buy and sell stakes without affecting the fund’s holdings.
 “My guess is, the target buyers are European money managers, probably wealth managers, allocating capital for individuals who invest outside the US.
 and aren’t wealthy enough to buy into the hedge funds directly,” said Admire Capital’s Karamanian.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Fosun International Ltd, the investment arm of China’s biggest closely held conglomerate, is offering to buy Espirito Santo Saude SGPS SA for as much as 451 million euros ($580 million), joining a bidding war for the Portuguese hospital operator.
 It faces rival bidders in its push to buy Espirito Santo Saude, which runs hospitals, clinics and nursing homes in Portugal.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Euro-area government bonds declined on concern the European Central Bank may lack the tools to deliver fully on a measure it announced last week to buy privately-owned assets.
 4 and said it would buy asset-backed securities, while falling short of announcing a plan for quantitative easing.
 Mounting Tensions Dollar General, spurned twice in its attempts to buy Family Dollar, announced yesterday that it was taking its latest, $80-a-share offer directly to shareholders.
 The hostile approach ratcheted up a bidding war that began after Dollar Tree announced its agreement to buy Matthews, North Carolina-based Family Dollar for $7450 a share in July.
 Adobe has been trying to persuade customers to buy online subscriptions for its design software, seeking to make sales more predictable by replacing periodic one-time purchases.
 “The revenues per customer will go up over time as you’ve completed the transition to the model, but in the meantime you do have the challenge of having to forgo revenue and therefore earnings” Vleeschhouwer recommends buying Adobe stock.
 Marketing Cloud Adobe said one reason revenue failed to reach the high end of its earlier forecast was a faster transition to subscription buying among customers of its Marketing Cloud product.
 “US markets have remained attractive to foreign buyers with the stronger dollar, and US.
 They cut borrowing costs again this month and announced plans to buy asset-backed bonds.
 Northam is among smaller miners contemplating buying assets, including those being sold by major producers.
 spun off three aging South African mines in 2013, is another possible buyer of unwanted assets, CEO Neal Froneman said in July.
 Oi and Tim have both been exploring ways to reduce the market to three major carriers from four, including buying parts of each other, Bloomberg News has reported in the past several weeks, citing people familiar with the matter.
 A unit of billionaire Anil Ambani’s Reliance Power Ltd, which had signed a memorandum of understanding to buy Jaiprakash Power Ventures Ltd’s three hydro-power plants on July 27, scrapped the deal citing “regulatory uncertainties and tariff issues,” according to a statement yesterday.
 Rating Cut Abu Dhabi National Energy Co, known as Taqa, withdrew from an agreement to buy two hydro-power projects in July 24 after signing an agreement in March to take over the assets at an enterprise value of $16 billion along with a Canadian institutional investor and Indian infrastructure finance fund, IDFC Ltd.
 cut it’s recommendation for Jaiprakash Associates to hold from buy today and reduced its target price by 58 percent to 39 rupees.
 The offering, being marketed to yield about 140 basis points more than the swap rate, comes after Chief Executive Officer Ivan Glasenberg said in March Glencore may have an interest in buying more assets.
 Bank Asya swung between losses and gains of as much as 11percent before Borsa Istanbul halted trading, saying“abnormal” buy and sell orders warranted the decision.
 Butanother bank run could bring it down if it’s massive enough” Local competitor TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided againstmaking a bid to buy the lender last month in favor of startingits own Sharia-compliant unit.
 Brondeau is buying Cheminova as he revises a March plan to spin off all mineral businesses.
 Alkali chemicals are “highly profitable and cash generative” and will attract “many interested buyers,” Brondeau said in the statement.
 It takes four years for a customer buying online-delivered software from SAP to furnish the same amount of revenue as an on-premises contract, said Mucic, speaking at SAP’s Walldorf, Germany headquarters.
 Still, operating margins for software-as-a-service may reach 15 percent in 2017 as many customers renew contracts each year, said Baudry, who has the equivalent of a buy recommendation on SAP shares.
 which has also been buying cloud companies.
 Mercuria, nearing completion of a $35 billion deal to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity operation, joins Glencore Plc and Trafigura Beheer BV in having part of its business regulated by the FCA.
 jumped 33 percent after Germany’s Merck KGaA agreed to buy the specialty-chemicals company for $17 billion.
 “It’s a worldwide phenomenon that governments are buying bonds to keep their countries moving along economically” G-20 officials said yesterday in a communique released in Cairns, Australia, that they “are mindful of the potential for a build-up of excessive risk in financial markets, particularly in an environment of low interest rates and low asset price volatility” The ministers welcomed signs of strength in some key economies while noting “growth in the global economy is uneven” The European Central Bank will actively manage its balance sheet and is willing to implement more stimulus if required to stave off the threat of deflation in the euro area, ECB President Mario Draghi said in his quarterly testimony to European lawmakers in Brussels today.
 China is the largest consumer of energy and buyer of industrial metals.
 Buccaneer didn’t solicit votes on a previously filed plan because it began settlement talks with largest shareholder Meridian Capital International Fund, proposed buyer and secured lender AIX Energy LLC, and the official creditors’ committee shortly after obtaining conditional approval of its explanatory disclosure statement, according to court papers filed Sept.
 The proposed plan would have bondholders exchange their $14 million in existing debt for $75 million in new bonds, unless a buyer emerges who is willing to pay cash of at least $6 million plus specified costs.
 Payouts are preferred over buybacks, he said.
 in New York, who rates Dresser-Rand shares a buy and owns none.
 agreed to buy VimpelCom Ltd’s stake in upstart carrier Wind Mobile.
 The buyer assumes about C$160 million of debt.
 The transaction gives Wind the funding needed to build out its presence in Ontario, British Columbia and Alberta by buying airwaves at government auctions set for early next year, Chief Executive Officer Anthony Lacavera said in an interview.
 VimpelCom, based in Amsterdam, had struggled to offload its stake since it backed off an attempt to buy control from Lacavera in June 2013.
 Quebecor’s Efforts Globalive and West Face may be looking to consolidate ownership in the hope that another small operator, Quebecor Inc, would buy Wind Mobile in its own effort to expand across the country, said David Heger, a StLouis-based analyst with Edward Jones.
 Wind’s next steps include buying spectrum in those auctions and building a long-term evolution, or LTE, network to speed data use on smartphones, Lacavera said.
 Customers can bring their own iPhone to Wind’s network or buy devices like Samsung’s Galaxy S5 or HTC Corp’s HTC One through the carrier.
 While the ECB’s rate cut and asset-buying program will mean cheaper funding for banks in both Nordic countries, the measures may force Sweden’s Riksbank to cut rates while putting pressure on Norway to raise, according to Nordea Bank AB and Nykredit Markets.
 The ECB, which unveiled its plan to purchase asset-backed securities last month, said it will buy “a broad portfolio of simple and transparent securities” and euro-denominated covered bonds.
 Both Nykredit’s Erikson and Nordea’s Bruce say the ECB’s buy-back program will drive down funding costs for banks.
 If we changed our menu every time we had a spike in one of the items we’re buying, it’s just impossible” A prolonged drought in California, which grew 91 percent of US.
 Lemon sales got a boost this year when the price of limes tripled by May for some buyers, after crop damage in Mexico, the biggest supplier to the US, left tight supplies.
 Ripplewood is in talks to buy the government’s stake andplans to develop the bank into a national champion, ChiefExecutive Officer Tim Collins said Sept.
 For potential buyers interested in Visteon, a breakup may be preferable because it would let them bid directly on the faster-growing electronics division without having to take on its climate-control venture, said UBS AG.
 Of the two businesses, it’s the one that’s easier for buyers to get their hands on, as Halla Climate would likely need to approve a deal for the venture.
 Full-on Buyer A takeover of all of Visteon also can’t be ruled out, said Sponheimer of Gabelli, who sees Delphi as a possible buyer for the entire company.
 “This increases the probability of a hike in direct return, either through a dividend hike or introduction of share buybacks” Statoil’s head of development and production in Norway, Arne Sigve Nylund, declined to comment on whether the deal could lead to a higher growth in dividends.
 The price includes buyer’s commission.
 In a market plagued by forgeries, the provenance “assured the buyers that they weren’t made yesterday,” Rabstenek said.
 Qianlong pieces were copied in 19th century, 20th century and they are copied now” In 2010, London-based auction house Bainbridges achieved a record price of 516 million pounds ($837 million) for a Qianlong era vase, though the buyer reneged and the vase was later sold privately for less than half that amount.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Palm oil shipments by India, the world’s biggest buyer, will climb to a record this year as tumbling prices and zero-tax on exports from Malaysia make the oil attractive to refiners, said Ruchi Soya Industries Ltd.
 “Though the supply suggests that prices should remain lower to attract demand, however, amid policy driven steps, prices for palm may get underpinned” Argentina, Brazil India buys more than 50 percent of its annual demand, shipping palm oil from Indonesia and Malaysia, and soybean oil from the US, Brazil and Argentina.
 The Shire acquisition is the largest of a recent wave of tax-inversion buyouts.
 companies from buying foreign competitors to avoid domestic taxes.
 As much as 200 million pounds from the sale of New York-based engineering consultancy Parsons Brinckerhoff will beinvested in a share buyback program once it is completed,Balfour also said today.
 seeks to buy mines already in production to boost cash flow, said the South African producer of the metal with operations from Australia to Peru.
 “If we could repeat the success of the Yilgarn acquisition in Australia, then clearly we would be looking to try and buy something,” Holland said.
 Gold Fields seeks to buy cheap assets as larger producers offload some mines to pay back debt and adjust to a bullion price down 27 percent since the start of 2013.
 The currency trades under a pegged exchange-rate system, with the city’s monetary authority buying and selling greenbacks to maintain its level.
 “If people are selling and no one’s buying the price is going to move irrespective of value, whereas an ETF trades much closer to the NAV” Gross, co-founder and chief investment officer of Pacific Investment Management Co, will join Janus Capital Group Inc.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- South Korea will go ahead with plans to buy 40 Lockheed Martin Corp.
 The military scaled back the number to 40 last year, when it opted to buy the F-35 over cheaper options from Boeing Co.
 Cost estimates for the $3986 billion program have climbed 71 percent in inflation-adjusted dollars since the Pentagon signed its initial contract with Lockheed in 2001, even as plans were adjusted to buy 409 fewer aircraft.
 Rio opted in June 2013 to retain its diamond unit after failing to find a buyer and deciding not to pursue an initial public offering.
 The Montreal-based company wants to start a so-called mobile virtual network operator which would buy and re-sell space on networks instead of building its own.
 A “modest” share buyback is possible, it said.
 “Why would anyone want to buy Russian equities, no matter how cheap they are, amid the geopolitical risk?” ‘Sanctions War’ A Sept.
 The company may face the biggest decline in European revenue in five years as demand weakens and buyers negotiate discounts, according to two officials who asked not to be identified before the number is made public.
 The pending sales show how cheap funding for firms that make the loans is continuing with little disruption as fixed-income investors seeking an alternative to low interest rates buy up the debt.
 (4755) rose the most in fivemonths after it agreed to buy US.
 San Francisco-based Ebates offers cash rebatesto customers who buy products ranging from laptops to lipsticksfrom the website’s retail partners.
 buying a remaining 48 percent in Russia’s most-popular social network for $147 billion.
 He profited from the chaos -- buying landwhen values collapsed -- and now welcomes changes inregulations, and investor attitudes, that are bringing a measureof order to the Dubai market.
 “The market’s stabilizationis limiting the pool of buyers and requires a lot of work to getinvestors to accept slower returns and more regulations.
 Mulchandani started by buying a four-story building andselling it within months for a 20 percent profit.
 The buyerwould become responsible for subsequent payments due duringconstruction and upon completion by providing postdated checks,he said.
 “They were essentially saying: ‘I’m never going to holdonto this and I’m sure I’ll find someone else to buy it before Ihave to make that completion payment,’” the CEO said.
 At the time, everybody lost a lot of money andpeople wanted to see somebody fall” Dynasty Zarooni held more than 100 million dirhams inpostdated checks from buyers and by early 2009, checks from somepurchasers bounced and complaints were filed, Mulchandani saidThe buyers accused Mulchandani of selling nonexistent propertiesas well as illegally running an investment club with guaranteedreturns, according to court documents.
 He finished oneand delivered it to buyers, while the other two are set forcompletion in November, he said.
 Two days later, he was at Nakheel PJSC’s sales officebuying the 30,000 square-meter (320,000 square-foot) waterfrontplot for 400 million dirhams.
 Around 30 percent of buyers in SKAI’s projectsare Chinese after the developer held roadshows in Shanghai,Mulchandani said.
 “Developers andbuyers are also maturing and realizing that doubling yourinvestment in six months can also mean losing it in the sameamount of time” Some of the biggest Dubai property companies are alsoriding the market’s rebound after shaking off damage from thecrash to take advantage of growing demand for hotel and retailproperties.
 Prime Minister David Cameron warned in Davos,Switzerland, in January last year that the companies should“wake up and smell the coffee because the public who buy fromthem have had enough” Technology companies “are welcome here in Britain withopen arms, you have the advantages of our skilled population towork for you, broadband connections to deliver your services andour NHS to keep your employees healthy,” Osborne said,referring to the state-run National Health Service.
 “The public’s outcry never seems to cross over to a pointwhere they’re no longer buying a sponsor’s product,”D’Alessandro said in a telephone interview.
 He declined to be more specific, citing the privacy of the buyers.
 The Hong Kong-Shanghai link will give foreign investors unprecedented access to mainland shares, allowing 13 billion yuan ($21 billion) of net buying per day.
 Fed Stimulus The Fed is gauging the strength of the labor market as it winds down a bond-buying program and considers the timing of raising interest rates.
 raised its three-month rating on stocks to the equivalent of buy, after the European Central Bank reduced its main interest rates and implement an asset-buying plan.
 Ford declined 2 percent to $1680 after Morgan Stanley downgraded the shares to underweight, similar to sell, from overweight, similar to buy.
 jumped 30 percent to $3615 in its biggest advance since February 2012 as Global Cash Access Holdings Inc, a provider of cash solutions to the gaming industry, said it will buy the company for about $12 billion to expand its access to casino floors.
 rose 26 percent to $12798 after Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy as many as 200 high-density Boeing 737 jets in a deal worth a potential $22 billion at list prices.
 Investors should buy the riskier parts of Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac deals because the securities are benefiting from a hunt for yield amid a sixth year of near-zero interest rates from the Federal Reserve, Bank of America Corp.
 Telefonica Brasil SA may move after its parent agreed tobuy Vivendi SA’s Brazilian broadband unit GVT for about 7billion euros ($9 billion).
 “I do think it’s still a buy the dips market,” James Liu, global market strategist at JP Morgan Funds in New York, said by phone.
 It’s a ’buy on the dips’ equity and we may grind higher until earnings” All of the 10 main S&P 500 groups advanced today.
 With Ello, “the message of buy, buy, buy is toned down” Harney is just one of the people flocking to Ello, a Burlington, Vermont-based startup that has caught the attention of users and investors since its debut on Aug.
 In Saudi Arabia, Savola Group weighed heavy on the benchmark after the food processor said it won’t make a buyout offer for Egypt’s Bisco Misr, a confectionery maker in the most populous Arab country.
 Open interest in bearish options, which grant buyers the right to sell the shares, surged to more than 76,000 contracts on Sept.
 “A lot of people are buying puts and the stock’s been put under a lot of pressure,” Mark Sebastian, founder of Option Pit LLC, a Chicago-based education and consulting firm, said by phone yesterday.
 4 that it will buy up to $100 million of its own shares in the next 12 months, joins the growing list of Chinese technology companies that have been targeted by short sellers.
 The ECB is preparing to buy covered bonds and asset-backed debt as it seeks to spur economic growth by stimulating lending.
 Some investors are concerned that should the central bank buy as much as 100 billion euros of the debt they’ll be crowded out of the market.
 “New issues are over-subscribed, spreads are grinding ever tighter and now there is a big buyer looking for 100 billion euros or more” Third Time This will be the third time the ECB has created a program to buy covered bonds, with previous purchases starting in July 2009 and November 2011.
 It said the country’s labor laws include a provision under which workers must be consulted by both the vendor and buyer of a company before the deal is done.
 RewardStyle’s LikeToKnow:It has made theBCBGMAXAZRIA and Herve Leger catwalks shoppable via Instagramphotos, and edgy media outlet Refinery29 shows consumers whereto buy the clothes worn by the stars attending Fashion WeekIt’s all based on what shoppers at home “like” “We started realizing that the consumer really dictatestrends, even though us fashion people always think we do,”Lubov Azria, chief creative officer of BCBG Max Azria Group LLC,said in an interview at her showroom in New York’s GarmentDistrict.
 Drawing inspiration fromthe commission that personal shoppers make from boutiques whereclients purchase clothing, bloggers using RewardStyle get a cutwhen their followers buy something through their links.
 You’ll see more regularpeople buying that you wouldn’t have thought of asfashionistas” To contact the reporter on this story:Alex Barinka in New York at abarinka2@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Sarah Rabil at srabil@bloombergnetBen Livesey Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 In addition to its flagship Bed Bath & Beyond chain, the Union, New Jersey-based company owns Christmas Tree Shops, Buybuy Baby and Cost Plus World Market.
 Coke gave the drink a Twitter account, too, so loyalists can “follow the brand’s journey” “Surge is back,” the Facebook page’s organizers said, urging readers to buy and spread the word.
 It was a prize possession” The group sold “The Surge Movement” t-shirts, and it crowdfunded a $4,000 billboard near Coke headquarters in Atlanta that read: “Dear Coke, We couldn’t buy Surge so we bought this billboard instead” It’s the largest to “pledge” for the revival of any discontinued product.
 If they don’t get that, anything else is suboptimal” Richard Farnsworth, a spokesman for SABMiller, declined to comment on whether it will make another attempt to buy Heineken or any other companies.
 Another idea is to buy Groupe Castel’s African beer operations, in which SABMiller already has a 20 percent stake, though that may not provide enough scale, he said.
 “They’re very complementary businesses” If SABMiller is still opposed to being taken over, then it’s going to need to buy an international brand like Heineken, said Chris Wickham, a London-based analyst at Oriel Securities Ltd.
 In July, BTG agreed to buy Assicurazioni Generali SpA’s Swiss private-banking unit for 15 billion Swiss francs ($16 billion), almost doubling assets under management to about $200 billion.
 “Japanese shares have risen quite far, so investors that want to buy are in wait-and-see mode and those that want to sell are taking profits” Officials at the US.
 The Topix rebounded 15 percent from an April 14 low amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- If you agreed with all the academics, billionaires and politicians who denounced Federal Reserve monetary policy since the financial crisis, you missed $1 trillion of investment returns from buying and holding US.
 Betting against the consensus on Treasuries has been a winning strategy” Inflation Risk Minerd is buying Treasuries due in 10 years or more, which typically appreciate when inflation expectations weaken.
 They have almost tripled the gain in gold, which some investors buy to preserve wealth when they foresee rising costs eroding the dollar’s value.
 Bernanke announced a second round of bond buying in that became known as QE2, a group of economists, investors and political strategists published a letter to him saying it would “risk currency debasement and inflation” and do little to promote jobs growth.
 17, 2010, with their own letter to Bernanke, which questioned the need for more stimulus after the Fed’s first round of bond buying pumped $17 trillion into the economy and expressed concern any additional purchases could result in “hard-to-control, long-term inflation” The Fed was also criticized abroad, with German Finance Minister Wolfgang Schaeuble calling the stimulus “clueless” that same month.
 “And it’s done it without sparking inflation” Now, as the Fed moves to end its latest round of bond buying and considers increasing rates, the debate over the pace of tightening has never been more important.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Martin Strobel, chief executive officer of Baloise Holding AG, said the insurance company may consider buying firms in Switzerland, Germany, Belgium and Luxembourg.
 Baloise, Switzerland’s third-biggest insurer, strengthened its presence in Belgium in 2011, buying Nateus SA and Nateus Life SA for 217 million euros ($281 million) and Eureko Group’s Avero Schadeverzekering Benelux NV for 75 million euros.
 “We are interested in bolt-on transactions and we like to buy for a reasonable price,” Strobel said, adding Baloise “profited during the financial crisis with our acquisitions in Belgium and Luxembourg, where the sellers were forced to sell” The shares rose as much as 03, extending this year’s gains to 73 percent.
Iliad SA (ILD) faces hurdles in its planto buy T-Mobile US Inc.
 Talks between Paris-based Iliad and potential partners,including buyout firm KKR & Co, have yet to result in a higherbid, the people said, asking not to be named discussing privatedeliberations.
 Tay claimed Tahir backed out of the sale after alleging the sculpture by the Colombian artist was a fake, according to the art gallery owner’s countersuit, where she assured the buyer it’s authentic.
 The deal, which originally involved buyers providing freshcapital to the Rohatyn team for new deals, no longer includesthat component, the people said.
 The Toronto-based analyst’s ratings are the equivalent of buy for Air Canada and hold for WestJet.
 “We need to see immediate results from the new CEO or we will need to seek a buyer to take the assets off our hands” Lewis, a former Unilever executive, is tasked with reviving Tesco’s fortunes after three years under Clarke in which the grocer’s market value almost halved to about 17 billion pounds ($28 billion) amid sliding sales in the UK.
 Couche-Tard was among a short list of suitors to buy a $16 billion minority stake in China’s Sinopec Sales Co, Reuters reported Aug.
 Cash Flow Chu is one of 11 analysts among 14 covering Couche-Tard who rate the stock a buy, while three have a hold.
 The pension fund had committed more than $25 billion in Blackstone’s buyout and credit funds as of March 31.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Airbus Group NV predicted airlines will buy planes worth $46 trillion at list prices over the next 20 years, with Chinese domestic travel surpassing the US.
 Crude had “a very large correction, which invites a lot of technical buying,” said Harry Tchilinguirian, head of commodities strategy at BNP Paribas SA.
 International investors have been flocking to Treasuries since speculation the ECB was moving closer to buying bonds drove yields in the region to historic lows this month and turmoil in Ukraine enhanced the refuge appeal.
 “Weengage with them directly so we have a direct relationship,obviously commercially but more importantly technically, so wecan understand what is needed in the future and what we caninvest in to be well positioned as time goes on” Google (GOOG), like other cloud providers, buys storage technologyas well as develops its own.
 Bond buyers funneled $462 million into BlackRock Inc’s $12 billion high-yield bond exchange-traded fund yesterday, bringing inflows this week to $194 million into the ETF in the past week, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Sherman, who helps manage DoubleLine’s $1344 million Shiller Enhanced CAPE fund, said traders at the firm started selling higher-rated bonds to buy lower-rated ones about a month ago.
 While Yellen’s been warning that this market looks frothy, she just gave investors the green light to buy more junk.
 “Dollar-denominated is the way to go” Instead of buying junk debt, Gundlach said he would rather own high-grade corporate and government bonds, “and sprinkle in stocks” Gundlach, who was named research firm Morningstar Inc’s fixed-income manager of the year for 2006, started Los Angeles-based DoubleLine in December 2009 after he was fired as chief investment officer of TCW Group Inc.
 said they are committed to their electric vehicle program and denied a report they may cut battery production and buy cells from LG Chem Ltd.
 The technology, adapted from consumer cameras such as Panasonic’s Lumix series, will probably also find buyers in the airline industry, the executive said.
 Selling Stocks “Investors sold Russian stocks on rumors about sanctions and now are buying up the cheapest equities on the fact,” Vadim Bit-Avragim, who helps oversee about $41 billion at Kapital Asset Management LLC in Moscow, said by phone.
 company buys a foreign competitor and moves its headquarters abroad.
 China’s economy is expected to expand this year at the slowest pace since 1990 as property prices slump, meaning less demand for steel in the nation that buys 67 percent of seaborne iron-ore supply.
 New production capacity andslowing steel demand in China, which buys 67 percent of seabornesupply, have led to a global surplus that Goldman Sachs GroupInc.
 “There is more confidence in the consumer and because there’s more confidence there’s possibly a greater ability to buy the more expensive pieces,” he said.
 22 impose curbs on loans or cash transfers from offshore subsidiaries to a new foreign parent -- which AbbVie would create by setting up a UK-domiciled company after buying Shire.
 Merrill Lynch upgraded the stock to buy from neutral.
 And, when you have such a large, liquid mega-cap company coming to market, there’s going to be demand” A boom in stock buybacks and corporate takeovers has offset new offerings and reduced the supply of US.
 “In order to not screw up holdings and sector weightings, people are letting go of other tech stocks” Share prices throughout the market would be least affected if money for buying Alibaba came from a “healthy and sustainable increase in borrowing,” wrote El-Erian in a Bloomberg View column yesterday.
 “We have been adding to our Brazilian exposure and inparticular have been buying Brazilian state-owned enterpriseswhere the outlook is improving and they are priced at deepdiscounts to their intrinsic value,” Dipak Chouhan, a productspecialist for Latin America investments at Santander AssetManagement, said in an e-mailed response to questions.
 The biggest economy in Asia buys more than 60 percent of global seaborne supply, and Australia and Brazil are the leading exporters.
 The allocations allow yuan raised offshore to be used to buy securities in China’s domestic market.
 wireless carrier after seven years of customer losses and a failed plan to buy smaller rival T-Mobile US.
 The company added baggage fees and said it may consider a share buyback or increased dividend.
 The Fed is assessing the strength of the world’s largest economy as it winds down bond buying and considers raising interest rates.
 Repsol SA dropped an offer for Talisman in August that added to costs to buy default protection, leading to the worst performance for credit-default swaps in Canada during the past month, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Madrid-based Repsol, studying a full takeover of Talisman, rethought its plans after failing to find buyers for assets it wasn’t interested in owning, including Talisman’s North Sea and Southeast Asia fields, people with knowledge of the matter said Aug.
 “Bond investors were hopeful that someone would come in and buy the company,” David Lund, senior credit analyst at Thrivent Financial for Lutherans, which holds Talisman bonds, said by phone from Minneapolis.
 All three major shareholders have committed to buying stockin the new issue, which gives investors the right to buy sevenshares for every 25 shares they already own, SGL said in an e-mailed statement.
 SAP SE may move after the biggest maker of business-management software agreed to buy Concur Technologies IncVivendi SA may move after agreeing to sell its Brazilianbroadband unit GVT to Telefonica SA.
 Investors are lured by the potential for share buybacks and earnings growth as hedge fund Jana Partners LLC, which has agitated for a more shareholder-friendly use of Walgreen’s cash, struck a deal with the company on three board seats.
 The $11 billion investment-fund Jana, which owned 12 percent of Walgreen shares as of June 30, will use the board positions to push for more buybacks, a person familiar with the matter said.
 The same day it said it will keep its domicile in the US, Walgreen announced a smaller-than-expected buyback plan of $3 billion and cut its forecast for adjusted earnings by $2 billion.
 The agreement reached in August allows it to buy the remaining 55 percent by Feb.
 “Walgreen has been conservative in the buyback area, but it’s impossible to know which direction the board will go post-Jana, post-merger” Calls betting on a 10 percent rally in Walgreen cost 1 point more than puts betting on a decline of that size on Sept.
 He recommends investors buy the stock and projects it will climb to $72 in a year.
 There are a fewincremental buyers, but no one is selling.
 will buy the Berkeley, California-based maker of organic and natural foods for about $820 million,or $46 a share in cash.
 Chief Executive Officer Preben Prebensen said in an interview that lending growth was driven by the residential construction market and auto buyers as the UK.
 In 2006, Philips sold an 80 percent stake in its semiconductor business NXP to a group of buyout firms.
 The middle class swelled to more thanhalf the population, and people got credit to buy their firsthomes and cars.
 “As Japan’s corporate sector improves overall in creditworthiness, there is value for investors in buying rarer names” Falling Yields The average yield on Japanese corporate bonds is 038 percent, one basis point from the lowest since June 2003, according to Bank of America Merrill Lynch data.
 9, the same day the Tokyo-based company said it plans to buy US.
 Corporate borrowing costs have plunged since the central bank last year began buying about 7 trillion yen of sovereign notes a month to banish deflation.
 There were no sales in the final three months of 2013 at the building, which had earlier found buyers for two penthouses at more than $90 million each.
 In other words, the sky is not the limit” The slowdown at One57, the 1,004-foot (306-meter) tower piercing the sky near the southern end of Central Park, indicates buyers are pulling back on deals at buildings already on the market in anticipation of more choices for new super-luxury homes.
 At One57, where sales began in 2011, the units that have been slow to find buyers are those adjacent to the construction crane, Extell filings on the Tel Aviv exchange show.
 Buyer Views Crews working on the 90-story skyscraper used those units to house building materials, making it difficult for potential buyers to view them, Extell said.
 “When other choices start appearing, there’s not the same urgency” The building’s West 57th Street neighborhood, fringing Central Park, has emerged as a billionaires district, where developers are racing to build skyscrapers of record-setting heights aimed at buyers seeking an investment haven.
 “And then the old club, which is not really old, becomes old” Prospective buyers considering One57 or 432 Park Ave.
 The same would-be buyers who are interested in towers along the park are inquiring about Silverstein Properties Inc’s 30 Park Place in lower Manhattan, where 157 condos are being built atop a Four Seasons hotel.
 “Whoever is buying 15, 20, 30 million-dollar apartments, they want to make sure they’re buying the best of the best” Other condo projects in the Midtown area include JDS Development Group and Property Markets Group’s planned 1,400-foot tower at 111 W.
 Same Pool All those developments will be pricing units at more than $5,000 a square foot, putting them in competition for the same pool of ultra-wealthy buyers, said Donna Olshan, president of Olshan Realty Inc.
 Extell expects the unsold units at One57 to find buyers by the end of the year, according to the filings.
 even if it doesn’t eventually buy the carrier, as the process paves the way for a review of airport fees and policies.
 “It’s the market that’s interesting” Aegean, which last year absorbed competitor Olympic Air SA, said in July it may be interested in buying shares or assets from Cyprus Airways.
 Ryanair Holdings Plc, Aegean’s main competitor in the Greek market, said in August it’s also among those interested in buying the Nicosia-based carrier.
 will need to either regain their mines in auctions or buy replacement supplies from the market, raising output costs.
 Into Fracking Ineos moved into the fracking business by buying a 51 percent stake in a shale license from Reading, England-based BG Group Plc.
 The company this month announced it will buy RadLink-Asia Pte, Singapore’s largest provider of outpatient diagnostic imaging, nuclear medicine and leading radiopharmaceuticals, for 3465 million ringgit ($106 million).
 agreed to buy earlier this year, slipped 25 percent after the US.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Gazprom, the world’s largest natural gas exporter, may face the biggest decline in European gas revenue in five years as demand weakens and buyers negotiate discounts, according to two company officials.
 Customers including Germany’s EON SE and Italy’s Eni SpA, Gazprom’s two biggest EU buyers, have been able to negotiate better deals with suppliers after losing money selling fuel on domestic markets because their contract prices were higher than European Union spot rates.
 raised it to buy, citing cheap valuation relative to regional peers.
 We’re not going to sell billions of dollars of assets in month one and buy them back in month three.
 The ECB’s step last week to lower key interest rates and add an asset-buying plan saw Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 In 2007, Energy Future Holdings Corp, the Texas utility formerly known as TXU Corp, raised a $7 billion term loan to partially fund its leveraged buyout by KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, Bloomberg data show.
 Courts Barclays Settles Lawsuit as Judge Says It Misused Client’s Data Barclays Plc settled a lawsuit in which its client CF Partners (UK) LLP accused the bank of advising on a takeover bid then buying the target itself.
 The settlement was disclosed minutes after a London judge issued a verdict in the case that said Barclays misused confidential information to help it buy the carbon-trading firm Tricorona AB in 2010.
 An average of more than 90 percent of workers across all units backed the concessions, a day after Greybull was announced as the preferred bidder to buy Monarch from the Mantegazza family, the Luton, England-based company said in a statement.
 consumers also have been buying more athletic apparel and footwear for everyday use, not just when working out or playing sports.
 The company had been struggling to maintain growth there, its second-largest market, as shoppers became choosier about which brands they buy.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- More buyers are picking Apple Inc’s iPhone 6 Plus over the iPhone 6 in this debut weekend, according to a Piper Jaffray Cos.
 The survey of 386 Apple customers waiting in line in Minneapolis and New York yesterday found that 57 percent intended to buy the iPhone 6 Plus, he said.
 Munster said he had expected buyers to split 50-50 between the models this weekend and shift more in favor of the smaller phone over time.
 More buyers also said they would pay for higher storage capacity for either phone than for the iPhone 5S last year.
 Last year, 35 percent planned to buy 16 GB, 39 percent intended to get 32 GB and 25 percent wanted 64 GB, Munster said.
 It added 2 million monthly subscribers last year through lower international rates and contract buyout offers to users switching service.
 to try to buy PT Bank Danamon Indonesia last year in a deal that was scuttled by regulators.
 20, has signaled he is committed to cutting energy subsidies further, while the Federal Reserve is on course to end its bond-buying program in October and start raising US.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- When Harriet Hill began looking for a London home six months ago, open houses drew two dozen or more hopeful buyers.
 “There’s been a sudden swing of power towards the buyer.
 I can take my time” London home sellers, who have dominated the market for five years amid a dearth of inventory and robust demand, are losing clout to buyers.
 “We’ve moved from excess optimism and been hit by a combination of the mortgage market review, talk of interest rate rises, warnings from notable folk about overheating alongside the slower summer months” Excess Check The swing began in April, when the Financial Conduct Authority introduced homebuyer affordability checks as part of its market review to prevent the sort of borrowing excesses that fueled the financial crisis.
 must act to contain price rises and prospects of higher borrowing costs also made buyers more cautious.
 “The market is topping out and buyers are being more prudent.
 The number of new buyers in London registering with estate agents fell by 39 percent.
 The central bank also is requiring lenders to reject mortgages for buyers who fail a stress test that assumes an immediate 3 percentage-point increase in the benchmark interest rate.
 Asking prices fell by about 6 percent in August, the largest of three consecutive drops, as buyers became concerned that interest rates might rise and banks curbed lending, property website Rightmove Plc said on Aug.
 Inventory Rises There was a 10 percent increase in homes put up for sale and a similar decline in buyers during August compared with a year earlier, according to Johnny Morris, head of research at broker Hamptons International.
 “We saw a big surge in pent up demand from domestic buyers concentrating in London and extending down the commuter routes” Interest Rates With the BOE’s benchmark interest rate stayed at its historic low since March 2009, the city’s housing prices toppled records.
 The average London home at the end of the second quarter cost 500,000 pounds, or almost nine times a typical first-time buyer’s salary, according to lender Nationwide Building Society.
 During the buying frenzy, even brokers didn’t like the large group viewings, Hill, the homebuyer, said.
 “You’d have people pointing out cracks in the wall before loudly claiming they wouldn’t want to live there” to throw competing buyers off, Hill said.
 “Tanga will be the first one” Investors are looking to buy Tanzanian assets as policymakers in East Africa’s second-biggest economy get ready to scrap limits on foreign-share ownership.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said, “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta Air Lines Inc.
 The company has also kept the basic design of its website unchanged over the years -- partly due to the influence of its community of buyers and sellers -- and only started to make more aggressive changes since Wenig’s arrival.
 earlier last month, connects manufacturers in China with overseas buyers, and operates the auction site TaoBao and the AliPay payments service.
 “Our biggest advantage is that we’re pure -- you won’t have EBay selling against you, but you can’t say that if you sell on Amazon” Wenig has also tweaked EBay’s website to encourage consumers to browse for goods and customize their searches, instead of logging on to find and buy a specific item.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Cleco Corp’s effort to find a buyer is faltering, as the likeliest suitor for the Louisiana utility -- Macquarie Group Ltd.
 The Financial Times on Sept 8 reported that Cleco could announce a sale in weeks having narrowed its prospective buyers down to Macquarie and Iberdrola.
 Yara’s desire to lock in cheaper gas was clear when it tried unsuccessfully to buy Terra Industries Inc, said Colin Isaac, an analyst at Atlantic Equities LLP in London.
 The merger may lead to more capital being returned to investors via higher dividends and stock buybacks, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the details haven’t been made public.
 expansion in 2004 when the Toronto-based company agreed to buy a 51 percent stake in Portland, Maine-based Banknorth Group Inc.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- The Abraaj Group Ltd, a buyout firm focused on emerging markets, is raising a $500 million fund to invest in Turkey, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Germany is offering electric-car buyers the prospect of free parking as Chancellor Angela Merkel’s government seeks to boost demand for the vehicles.
 Broadmedia’s G-cluster service, which began in June of 2013, allows users to play games without having to buy discs or download the software to a local machine.
 “This is definitely starting to affect consumers and some are thinking twice about buying Apple now because the government has made them nervous” Apple pledged it has never built, and will never build, a “back door” with any government agencies for products or services, the ministry said.
 “Maybe they think it protects them somewhat from future regulatory changes” RBS and Barclays this year stopped traders and salespeople from seeing colleagues’ forthcoming deals and their banks’ buy and sell orders in aggregate, four of the people said.
 ‘Fig Leaves’ Managers at Deutsche Bank have advised foreign-exchange employees that they shouldn’t charge a markup on straightforward buy and sell orders in actively traded currencies where the Frankfurt-based lender isn’t assuming any risk, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 Fiat’s decision to make London the site of its new headquarters sparked a residential buying spree in the city, according to Tom Bill, head of London residential research at Knight Frank LLP.
 agreed to buy the owner of real-estate websites.
 The gauge lost 16 percent in September with the Fed on course to end its monthly bond-buying program, known as quantitative easing, in October.
 will buy the San Jose, California-based company for $21 a share.
 The mall developer also agreed to buy the 40 percent stake it doesn’t already own in the Highcross Shopping Center in Leicester, England, for 180 million pounds.
 VIA, the new fund with Value Retail, has completed outlet-mall acquisitions in Amsterdam and Prague and is in exclusive talks to buy four more, Atkins said on a call with analysts today.
 2 Time Warner Cable Inc, which Comcast has proposed buying.
 The agreement aims to erode the so-called Asian premium paid by gas buyers in the region, where the fuel must be shipped by tanker in liquid form and contracts are linked to the price of oil.
 Japanese buyers paid an average $1618 per million British thermal units in June, the last month for which Finance Ministry data is available.
 Combining Tokyo Gas’s buying power with that of Kogas will give the companies increased bargaining power in the market, Tanazawa said.
 “We have to do something to cut prices,” Tanazawa said, adding that deals with other LNG buyers are possible.
 “By teaming up, our LNG buying volume becomes impossible for buyers to disregard” The company known as Kogas, Korea’s sole LNG importer, bought 393 million metric tons of the fuel last year, making it the world’s biggest buyer.
 More than 1,100 miles south in suburban Miami, Maggie Cruz-Ledon and her husband have set a 2015 deadline to buy a house, upping their budget in the process.
 A group ofbanks including Toronto-Dominion Bank and Canadian Imperial Bankof Commerce, which co-led PrairieSky’s IPO in May, will buyEncana’s remaining stake for C$3650 a share, 30 percent morethan the IPO price.
 Microsoft is in talks to buy Mojang AB for more than $2 billion, according to people familiar with the negotiations.
 One buyer, data reseller Exact Data, posted Abate’s name and address online, along with 100 others, under the header Sample Diabetes Mailing List.
 ‘Confidential’ Clients Little is known about who buys medical lists since data brokers say their clients are confidential, Rockefeller said at a hearing on the issue in December.
 “The companies with stronger balance sheets will use this as an opportunity to buy assets at a good level,” he said.
 That buyback plan however was scrapped in May in favor of the consent solicitation process.
 Moody’s expects to buy back as much as $125 billion worth of shares this year, an increase from $1 billion.
 Moody’s plans to buy the remaining shares it doesn’t already own in Copal Amba, which provides research and analytics services to companies and financial institutions, according to a statement.
 Gamba also expects rising demand for the natural gas it produces in Colombia, with three large buyers expressing interest in its supplies, in addition to a utility that signed a new contract to buy from Canacol this month.
 “If Alibaba wants to move into Internet TV, it either has to build its own content-delivery network or buy something like Akamai,” Mewawalla said.
 It would make sense for Alibaba to buy Yahoo, though Alibaba may be reluctant to do such a “big, splashy deal,” said Jackson of Ironfire Capital.
 It’s a “more elegant way” for Alibaba to buy back its shares from Yahoo and lower the price, said Ryan Jacob, manager of the Jacob Internet Fund, which owns Yahoo stock.
 “Foreign investors see a weaker yen as equalling higher stocks, so we’re seeing a spiral in which shares rise as the yen drops” The Topix rebounded 16 percent from an April 14 low amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 By 2012, the bailout included a $60 billion credit line from the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, a Treasury investment of as much as $698 billion and as much as $525 billion from the Fed to buy mortgage-linked assets once owned or backed by the insurer.
 Easier Mortgages In July, the Reserve Bank of India announced a rule change that applies to banks selling long-term bonds to raise funds that can be lent to buyers of cheap homes.
 They also said they expect to end the asset-buying program next month in what would amount to a first step toward an eventual tightening of credit.
 “I don’t think you can duck it” Even in a revamped tax code, Democrats say there should be specific language that would stop companies from buying smaller foreign businesses and taking their addresses.
 companies from buying a smaller foreign business and taking its address.
 Republicans say they worry that the Democrats’ changes would encourage more foreign corporations to buy US.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Magnitogorsk Iron & Steel advanced to a nine-month high in Moscow after Sberbank CIB called the Russian steelmaker a buy, citing a cost-cutting program and attractive valuations.
 “Magnitogorsk is one of the most attractive stocks in the sector because it is cheap and there are triggers for further growth,” Sergey Donskoy, an analyst at Societe Generale in Moscow with a buy rating on the stock, said by phone yesterday.
 BCS has a buy rating and a $3 target price, implying a 15 percent price gain.
 Eighteen of 20 analysts covering the company recommend buying the GDR, the highest total since April 2010.
 “The price for iron ore is continuing to decline, and Magnitogorsk is the least-integrated steel producer among peers,” which helps it benefit from the price drops, Iryna Trygub-Kainz, an analyst at Raiffeisenbank AG who reiterated her buy recommendation on the stock, said by phone yesterday.
 “It’s hard to grow a scalablebusiness” Chan has a buy rating and a price target of $31 on thestock, which closed at C$2262 in Toronto yesterday.
 The sixanalysts that cover the company rate it a buy.
 That compares with a gain of 50 percent for the top quartile of European buyout funds raised the same year, data compiled by London-based research firm Preqin Ltd.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Burger King Worldwide Inc’s deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 The company’s first-quarter earnings increased 24 percent, helped by the completion of a record buyback program, growth in domestic air shipments and lower pension expense.
 The cloud-computing company decided to remain independent after ending a review on strategic options, and rebuffed investor calls to buy back shares, saying it will preserve cash for future acquisitions.
 agreed to buy US.
 “BGC and GFIare expected to become one of the world’s leading financialservices brokers” CME, owner of the world’s biggest futures market, said inJuly it would buy GFI for $580 million to expand its reach intoEuropean energy trading.
 “The stock’s price jump in trading is definitely a goodreward to investors who had the chance to buy,” said Tan Chiheng, a Boston-based analyst at Granite Point Capital Inc,which purchased some of the shares.
 shopping-center landlord spun off this year from Simon Property Group Inc, agreed to buy Glimcher Realty Trust for about $2 billion to create a diversified retail property owner.
 The combined company may seek to buy more properties where tenant sales are lower on a per-square-foot basis than at malls owned by Simon and other top-tier landlords, said Jeffrey Langbaum, a Bloomberg Intelligence analyst.
 Iron ore last week fell below $85 a ton for the first time in five years as China’s economy, the world’s biggest buyer, showed signs of losing momentum amid an expanding global glut.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaires including Li Ka-shing and Robert Ng have cut debt at their Hong Kong developers to near-record lows as they prepare to buy land as prices fall, a signal the city’s real estate gains may be coming to an end.
 “You can’t force developers to buy land,” Nicole Wong, CLSA’s regional property research head, said this week.
 “You can only entice them to buy land, and that would be through a seemingly profitable land price” Land Sales Hong Kong’s government is accelerating land sales to boost housing supply by 470,000 units over the next decade.
 “Now developers are looking for high-quality sites in urban areas where they can be sure to attract homebuyers,” said Lo.
 Developers have accelerated sales and offered discounts to lure buyers of new homes after the government imposed three rounds of taxes to thwart a housing bubble.
 Being Prudent While buyers snap up new flats, existing home sales still lag the historic average of 7,000 to 8,000 deals per month after the government in February 2013 doubled the sales tax on property.
 Since this is the Minneapolis area, maybe The Replacements or Prince would be best) The duo had one more trick up their sleeves, according to the SEC, and it’s what’s known as “painting the tape” In the final seconds of trading on the last session of the month, the pair is accused of routinely placing multiple buy orders to pump up the price of CyberOptics Corp, an electronics company currently valued at $76 million.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Rakuten Inc, controlled by billionaire Hiroshi Mikitani, fell the most in three months in Tokyo after the owner of Japan’s largest online mall said it’s in talks to buy US.
 ECB Meeting In addition to cutting interest rates to record lows and offering long-term loans to banks, the ECB has committed to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds to steer price gains back toward its goal of just under 2 percent.
 Yellen has since said officials will keep the benchmarkrate low for a “considerable time” after the bond buying ends.
 3 to buy putsexpiring in November and conveying the right to sell the bondETF at $113, 24 percent below yesterday’s close.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Alere Inc’s former chief executive officer is working with shareholders to buy the health-services company and take it private for $46 a share.
 smartphone, which has a larger screen, and considered buying the Korean manufacturer’s device before learning of Apple Inc’s plans to roll out new iPhones with bigger displays.
 “My daughter’s is easier to read; the quality of her pictures are really good too,” she said, adding that she hopes to buy a new iPhone soon.
 Slightly more than half of consumers planning to buy a smartphone will opt for a larger device, according to a survey conducted earlier this year by Accenture Plc.
 More than a quarter of those who responded said they’re willing to spend $299 to buy a 55-inch iPhone, according to the poll.
 It isn’t just retirees who are poised to buy bigger iPhones.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- If Quebec history is a guide, investors should consider buying British assets ahead of Scotland’s independence vote, Nomura Securities International Inc.
 “Most likely you’ll have a victory for the No with a very thin margin, so it’s probably a good idea to buy assets now while they’ve come down a lot,” St-Arnaud said in a telephone interview.
 More than 20 potential buyers, including private-equity firms Blackstone Group LP and Lone Star Funds, have declared interest in the 168 percent of CA Immo since UniCredit put the stake up for sale in July, Kurier newspaper reported.
 last week, it could be a chance to resume his quest to buy a National Basketball Association club.
 Ellison, 70, has failed in bids to buy the Golden State Warriors, Los Angeles Clippers, New Orleans Hornets (now the Pelicans) and the Memphis Grizzlies.
 He failed in efforts to buy the Hornets, and then the Grizzlies, with the intention of moving them to San Jose, California.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Azul Linhas Aereas Brasileiras SA, Brazil’s third-biggest airline, is considering buying the newest-model narrow-body jets from Airbus Group NV or Boeing Co.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, agreed to buy Canadian car-financing company Carfinco Financial Group Inc.
 Consumers in New York and San Francisco had already formed queues to be first to buy the gadgets.
 The 59-year-old Air Force veteran, who has stood in line to buy iPhones three times before on the first day of sales, said he had his heart set on an iPhone 6 Plus, which has a 55-inch screen.
 The Fed is on track to end its monthly bond-buying next month.
 Daiichi Sankyo Daiichi Sankyo fell 12 percent to 1,835 yen after Mizuho cut its rating on the stock to neutral from buy and also reduced its target price.
 The Topix rebounded 19 percent from an April 14 low to gain 34 percent this year amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 “Stocks being cheaper than they were a few days ago prompted some buying.
 “We saw a couple days of declines and people are going into the default of buying into that dip on US.
 Criteria for loans to first-home buyers may be eased and people who have paid off outstanding mortgages may be considered eligible for first-home status, the newspaper said.
 “With the asset quality of corporate loans deteriorating, banks may have renewed interest in lending to home buyers.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- OTP Bank Nyrt, Hungary’s largest lender, offered 300 million euros ($379 million) to buy Nova Kreditna Banka Maribor dd.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- SABMiller Plc was rebuffed in an attempt to buy smaller brewer Heineken NV, a deal that would have strengthened it against a potential bid by Anheuser-Busch InBev NV, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 “For SAB, a way of preserving their independence is to buy Heineken,” said Matthew Beesley, portfolio manager and head of global equities for London-based Henderson Global Investors Ltd.
 Time Warner’s standalone strategy includes an upgraded HBO Go mobile app and easier access to the channel for broadband Internet users who don’t want to buy a full cable-TV package.
 (FDO) says Dollar General Corp’sproposal to buy the company will have a tough time getting pastregulators.
 Dollar General, whose interest in Family Dollar hasbeen rebuffed twice, has data showing that its buyers shop at arange of rivals, especially Wal-Mart.
 Softbank Corp, the Japanese telecommunications companyheaded by Masayoshi Son, is in talks to buy Glendale,California-based DreamWorks Animation, people with knowledge ofthe discussions said on Sept.
 The decision to consider a sale highlights the challengesfaced by Katzenberg as he seeks to diversify beyond filmDreamWorks Animation, which previously looked for a buyer, hasexpanded its TV business and acquired Awesomeness TV, an onlinevideo network, while forming a partnership in China thatincludes live entertainment.
 Content Consolidation 21st Century Fox Inc’s attempt to buy Time Warner Inc.
 (CMCSA), which is buying Time WarnerCable Inc.
 (T) is buying satelliteservice DirecTV for $48 billion.
 Starz, the movie channelcontrolled by John Malone, is seeking a buyer, people familiarwith the matter said last week.
 The company ended talks to buy thefourth-largest mobile carrier, T-Mobile US Inc.
 Last year he attempted to buy Universal Music Groupfrom France’s Vivendi.
 Bombardier expects the Turkish government to announce an auction by the end of this year to buy as many as 90 high-speed trains, Dieter John, head of the Canadian company’s central and eastern Europe division, said at a news conference in Istanbul today.
 Blackstone and GIC in October also agreed to buy a majority stake in Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s European insurance business.
 is in talks to buy Singapore-based semiconductor test and assembly company Stats Chippac Ltd.
 The Hua Capital group is in active discussions to buy OmniVision, Zhang said.
 Chinese Immigrant In the past two years, Chinese buyers have announced plans to acquire overseas-listed semiconductor companies valued at more than $51 billion, including the proposed purchase of Stats Chippac, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s three biggest wireless carriers spent 85 billion reais ($36 billion) buying spectrum to help handle growing demand for high-speed data service.
 Oi and Tim have both been exploring ways to reduce the market to three major carriers from four, including buying parts of each other, Bloomberg News has reported in the past several weeks, citing people familiar with the matter.
 Policy makers in July reduced monthly bond buying to $25 billion in their sixth consecutive $10 billion cut, on track to conclude the program by year-end.
 The pharmacy chain is in the middle of its biggest deal ever, the purchase of the rest of European health beauty chain Alliance Boots GmbH for $153 billion after buying a stake in the company in 2012.
 Buyback Concern Investors have also pressured Walgreen to boost a $3 billion share buyback the company announced in August.
 Walgreen owns 45 percent of Alliance Boots and said last month it plans to buy all of the company and base the new business in Chicago.
 A deal would enable Alibaba to buy back its shares from Yahoo without a large tax leak.
 As SoftBank searches for targets, buying Yahoo would increase its stakes in Yahoo Japan and Alibaba.
 SoftBank has had internal conversations about buying Yahoo, according to a person familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified discussing private information.
 Riley’s Sinha says there’s a way for Yahoo to both merge with AOL and sell its Alibaba stake without the tax penalty: SoftBank could first buy AOL, then exchange it with Yahoo for the Alibaba shares.
 “They can basically now look to a target to buy with the proceeds,” he said in a telephone interview.
 Possible Deal “We didn’t take this step so we could quickly buy something again,” Dekkers said.
 Today’s announcement may prompt renewed takeover interest from chemical companies seeking to buy the plastics unit, Wenner said.
 The company agreed in May to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drug business for $142 billion, and Dekkers also has expressed interest in acquisitions in veterinary medicines.
 “Tenders into the Dollar General offer will be meaningless since there is no way that Dollar General can purchase shares that are tendered” Dollar General, spurned twice in its attempts to buy Family Dollar, took its offer directly to shareholders in a hostile bid last week.
 Fed Assesses The Fed is assessing the strength of the world’s biggest economy as it winds down a bond-buying program and considers raising rates.
 Jazztel, Orange Jazztel Plc climbed 61 percent to 1278 euros and Orange SA declined 14 percent to 1129 euros as the French company offered to buy the Spanish broadband provider for about 34 billion euros ($44 billion).
 shareholders as a $17 billion buying spree fails to charm investors at home.
 in Toronto who owns Crescent Point shares and sees the weaker stock performance as a buying opportunity.
 Goldman recommends investors buy the stock and Raymond James, currently restricted, previously recommended the equivalent of a buy since June, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The stock has 12 buy, two hold and one sell recommendation.
 Get has been owned by Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s buyout unit GS Capital and Quadrangle since a 58 billion-kroner buyout from Candover Partners Ltd.
 BC Partners Holdings Ltd, the London-based buyout firm, dropped out of bidding for Get, one person said.
 to a“leading global energy company,” which also will assume $33million in debt, Mississauga, Ontario-based Just Energy saidtoday in a statement, without identifying the buyer.
   Litigation Headwinds “Such charges are always going to bind management capacity and Deutsche Bank has enough to deal with given its litigation headwinds and the ECB’s stress tests this year,” Stefan Bongardt, an analyst at Independent Research GmbH who recommends investors buy the shares, said by phone from Frankfurt today.
 No Agreement Frequent discussions between private bankers didn’t culminate in deals as buyers and sellers can’t agree on prices, and some sellers have unresolved legal risks, Staub said.
 “On the private banking side we would almost exclusively like to buy in Switzerland,” Staub said.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 (AMZN) Alibaba doesn’t sell merchandise itself, makes most of itssales from commissions and advertising, and provide servicesthat help buyers and sellers conduct their businesses.
 UBM is in advanced talks to buy the privately-held US.
 Speculative buying has pushed some of the country’s smallest stocks to prices unjustified by their earnings potential, Montree Sornpaisarn, the chief executive officer of Maybank Kim Eng Securities (Thailand) Pcl, said in an interview in Bangkok.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Ethiopian Airlines Enterprise, Africa’s largest carrier by revenue, agreed to buy 20 redesigned 737 models valued at $21 billion in the largest single order for Boeing Co.
 Ryanair Holdings Plc announced earlier this month that it would buy as many as 200 of the higher-capacity Max 200 model from the Chicago-based planemaker, with deliveries set to begin in 2019.
 Tax Move Endo, previously based in Malvern, Pennsylvania, moved its address to Ireland in February by buying a smaller Irish company.
 Investcorp agreed to buy a majority stake in Esmalglass from 3i Group Plc in August 2012 in a deal valued at about 200 million euros, the person said.
 The iPhone 6 Plus, which has a larger display, will take three to four weeks for shoppers who pre-ordered online yesterday, according to Apple’s website, as people rushed to buy the handset hours after the company began taking pre-orders.
 agreed to buy closely held Windsor Quality Holdings LP for about $800 million in its biggest purchase as the Japanese maker of seasonings and processed foods pursues growth in the US.
 in its attempt to buy Swiss natural food ingredients maker Wild Flavors GmbH.
 The buyer of Fundamental Long Term Care Inc.
 He said he had intended to buy THMI for its computer equipment.
 The company is especially interested in buying technology expertise, Ritter said.
 “At present the company does not havesufficient liquidity to enable it to continue to trade throughthis period without raising further finance” Higher cost iron-ore producers are suffering as prices forthe material delivered to China, the biggest buyer, have slumpedto the lowest in five years amid a glut of the steelmaking rawmaterial.
 The Web portal would bolster Yahoo’s video and editorial content and is a better option than buying a “high-priced startup,” he said.
 Starboard’s Strategy Founded in March 2011, Starboard typically focuses on a small-cap activist strategy developed by Smith and Mark Mitchell since 2002 and Peter Feld since 2005 -- buying stakes in companies they call undervalued and pushing executives and directors for changes such as unit spinoffs and asset sales.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Adding management skills will help potential buyout firms tackle a complex web of cement plants up for sale in markets spanning Europe to Brazil and the Philippines.
 “PE and consortia of PE buyers are most interested in my view as well as some of the larger industrial groups” Starting in their new roles tomorrow, Bourguignon and Soule will present to potential buyers and prepare the divestments which could be sold as a single package worldwide or in Europe.
 Different Options Holcim and Lafarge are discussing different options for divestments with regulatory authorities and potential buyers, Zurich-based Holcim said in the statement.
 “PE buyers will be interested in the potential CEO and CFO and may also be interested in an industrial partner -- the sector is not awash with good managers and running these long-term assets well will be key to generating healthy returns for a purchaser,” Cantor’s Osburn said.
 “The stores have been broadening,” said John Tinker, ananalyst at Maxim Group LLC who recommends buying the shares“They’re very strong on the kids/tweens side” Barnes & Noble rose as much as 26 percent to $24 in earlytrading in New York.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- The UK’s takeover regulator has proposed giving itself powers to enforce commitments by buyers to retain jobs or factories in a merger.
 If adopted, the rules would allow the Panel to seek a court order if it believes there’s a risk a buyer won’t stick to its promises, and to closely monitor their implementation.
 Former Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik said last month he rejected an offer to buy part of his 28 percent holding.
 The PlayStation TV is meant to be a “microconsole” that will help Sony capture more families and parents buying gaming devices for the holidays at a cheaper price, said John Koller, vice president of platforms marketing at Sony Computer Entertainment America.
 Energy Future, which was taken private in a record leveraged buyout seven years ago, filed for bankruptcy in April with a plan to split off the side of the company that owns the profitable Oncor business.
 in a record $48 billion leveraged buyout.
 Buffett’s Bet Berkshire entered the energy business in 2000 by buying a majority stake in an Iowa utility holding company.
 Chen, who took the helm after a buyout failed, said he isn’t interested in selling the company’s intellectual property.
 in recent years to take advantage of low borrowing costs and issue bonds to fund share buybacks.
 sold debt, driving down the value of existing bonds, to buy back C$900 million ($821 million) of its own shares after coming under pressure from two US.
 Even if the company avoids being broken up, “management may feel compelled to adopt more aggressive financial policies as part of a package to placate the barbarians at the gate,” including debt-funded share buybacks, Gimme Credit’s Adams wrote in a Sept.
 Credit Concern Even if the shareholder activists don’t demand issuing debt to fund share buybacks, the possibility they’ll demand TransCanada spin off its power utility business may endanger the company’s A- rating from Standard & Poor’s, said David Lund, senior credit analyst at Thrivent Financial for Lutherans, which holds TransCanada bonds.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Norway will for the first time start buying kroner with foreign currency from its oil revenue accounts as Scandinavia’s richest nation takes an historic step in covering growing budget needs as crude output declines.
 The Nordic country will buy 250 million in kroner ($39 million) a day in October, the Oslo-based central bank said today.
 It signaled earlier this year that Norway may need to start buying its own currency.
 “The amount that they will buy is even bigger than we expected,” said Kjersti Haugland, an analyst at DNB ASA, which estimates the amount announced today will be a “floor” for buying in the final two months.
 “It could imply that the spending of oil money has turned out to be actually bigger than budgeted” Krone buying marks the start of a new era for western Europe’s biggest oil and gas exporter, which has built an $860 billion sovereign wealth fund from its petroleum revenue over the past two decades.
 The strengthening is “more related to a stigma-effect -- that a central bank is buying its own currency,” Nils Kristian Knudsen, currency strategist at Svenska Handelsbanken AB, said by phone.
 The central bank flagged a potential shift earlier this year, saying in May it won’t sell kroner in the “coming months” and will begin buying “somewhat further ahead” As recently as May last year it was buying 300 million kroner a day in foreign currency.
 Deals Sidley, Davis Polk Advised on Electrolux Purchase of GE Unit Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP represented Electrolux AB (ELUXB) in itsdeal to buy General Electric Co.
 company will consider selling the GE Money unit, which provides personal loans and credit card services, to a buyer or through an initial public offering, said the people, asking not to be identified as the process is private.
 Spain’s Banco Santander SA agreed in June to buy GE’s consumer finance unit in Sweden, Denmark and Norway for 700 million euros ($894 million).
 Born in eastern China, he said he made his money from investing at the right times, buying real estate at low points and getting out quickly once prices rose, he said.
 Shunfeng agreed in May to purchase the insolvent German solar inverter producer Sunways AG for 22 million euros ($28 million) and is buying the assets of SAG.
 Solar Slump He was buying into solar as the industry was mired in a slump triggered by a global oversupply of panels.
 Televisa may try to become a mobile virtual network operator, or MVNO -- buying minutes wholesale from a wireless provider and then reselling them under its own brand to consumers, said Gregorio Tomassi, a Banco Itau BBA analyst.
 Potential buyers include AT&T Inc.
 Gaojin will issue stock and buy the larger DMG Holdings in a deal that will values the company at RMB601 billion ($978 million).
 After stocks plunged during the financial crisis, he used Daily Journal cash to buy shares of Wells Fargo & Co.
 Encana will probably boost its spending on drilling, raise its dividend and may buy back shares with the proceeds from the PrairieSky stake sale, Kepler said.
 The Topix rebounded 18 percent from an April 14 low to gain23 percent this year amid optimism about the global economy andspeculation the $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fundwill buy more domestic shares.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Glenn Straub, the Florida developer who made a $90 million offer for the shuttered Revel Casino Hotel in Atlantic City, New Jersey, is considering buying the neighboring -- and also closed -- Showboat as well.
 Pessimism today means there are more people to buy into the rally tomorrow, he said.
 Insurance Subsidies While spending for healthcaregov has exceeded official estimates, the Affordable Care Act is coming under budget in at least one area: subsidies to help Americans buy insurance.
 The Topix rebounded 16 percent from an April 14 low to gain 12 percent this year amid optimism about the global economy and speculation the $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 The company charges a 025 percent advisory fee on managed assets exceeding $10,000, and additional fees to buy exchange-traded funds, according to its website.
 The buyer wasn’t identified.
 Like many Chinese companies listed overseas, Alibaba is using a legal arrangement that requires investors buy Alibaba through contracts instead of direct ownership.
 The stock has five buy recommendations, six holds and five sells, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 central bank pares back its stimulatorybond buying program amid signs of a recovery in the broadereconomy.
 TheEuropean Central Bank unexpectedly cut its main rates last weekand said it will buy asset-backed securities as it tries to spurprice growth and ignite economic growth.
 It won’t buy gold assets outside South Africa.
 “One part of the new strategy was to turn the one-man-show Bill Gross into a normal investment subsidiary,” said Frank Kopfinger, an analyst at Commerzbank AG in Frankfurt with a buy rating for Allianz shares.
 Pearson Plc climbed 17 percent after Morgan Stanley raised its recommendation on the owner of the Financial Times to the equivalent of a buy.
 Customers open accounts, through which they buy bitcoins for dollars.
 Regulator Worries The first big challenge Armstrong addressed was how to buy bitcoins easily.
 Back then, buyers and sellers gathered in parks or bars to trade cash for bits.
 bank account to Coinbase and buy bitcoins.
 They corresponded, and Ehrsam started buying and selling bitcoins, sometimes on his phone from the bathroom at Goldman Sachs.
 People still used a whole one to buy a pizza, if they could find a shop that accepted it.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to buy output from Belle River, enough to power about 35,000 homes, according to the statement.
 Minera Los Pelambres, an affiliate of Antofagasta Plc, will buy about 70 percent of the power generated by the 104-megawatt Conejo project, which is being built in the Atacama Desert.
 Cevian, which seeks to buy undervalued stocks, has alsoincreased its stake in ThyssenKrupp AG this year, and now owns15 percent of the German steelmaker, according to data compiledby Bloomberg.
 While Apple didn’t break out unit sales for each of the two new phones, about 60 percent of the initial buyers during opening weekend bought the 6 Plus, according to an estimate from Gene Munster, an analyst at Piper Jaffray Cos.
 Exchange-traded funds that buy semiconductor shares have absorbed almost $350 million in 2014, the most on record and the first inflows in five years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Dividends and share buyback plans have made semiconductor stocks increasingly attractive, according to Matthew Ramsay, an analyst with Canaccord Genuity Inc.
 boosted its quarterly dividend by 20 percent and added $5 billion to its share buyback plan.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Ericsson AB is buying a majority stake in Apcera, a San Francisco-based software startup the Swedish network maker is betting will accelerate its push into cloud-computing services.
 Among the six firms that cover it, four have the equivalent of buy ratings, including JPMorgan Chase & Co, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Four of the five analysts who have rated Alibaba since its IPO recommend buying the stock while one gives it a hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Hossie declined to comment on the size of the missed payment by Glencore, which has a contract to buy 2 million tons a year at spot prices until the first quarter of 2017.
 coal market in decades is driving the Russian steelmaker and other big mine owners for the exit, and a new class of buyers has emerged.
 “In any sort of cyclical industry, you want to buy when there’s blood in the street,” said George Dethlefsen, chief executive officer of Corsa Coal Corp, the Canadian mining company that’s backed by private equity investors, which bought PBS.
 private-equity firm Quintana Capital Group LP, plans to buy and develop mines close to Pittsburgh and the Great Lakes, the US.
 last year to buy an eastern Kentucky coal mining complex for $473 million.
 He created Blackhawk Mining LLC in 2010 to buy idled mines and his family is majority owner of the company through JMP Holdings LLC.
 Blackhawk has doubled its coal mining capacity this year, after buying Arch’s Hazard unit for $263 million in March.
 That kind of pressure mean more opportunities may arise for buyers of US.
 Earlier this week, Redmond, Washington-based Microsoft said it would buy Mojang AB, maker of the Minecraft video game, for $25 billion in Nadella’s first deal as CEO.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Baloise Holding AG is buying US.
 Issuance of secured debt, also known as leveraged loans, used to finance buyouts, reached a record $6952 billion last year in the US, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Strobel acknowledged that finding debt to buy may be a challenge.
 ECB President Mario Draghi stepped up the effort last week, cutting benchmark rates and announcing plans to buy bonds backed by loans to corporations.
 “In our real estate portfolio we currently buy very little because the prices have increased very much recently,” Strobel said.
 Sumitomo said it will form a special committee to investigate the causes of the impairments, while CEO Nakamura said there wouldn’t be any more writedowns “unless we see a sharp drop in resources prices” Despite the fall in commodity prices in the last two years, investors have recently begun favoring Japan’s trading companies after the companies promised higher dividends and the top three announced stock buybacks.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Keppel REIT, the second-biggest office property trust in Asia excluding Japan, will buy a stake in a Singapore office tower from Keppel Land Ltd.
 The trust agreed to buy a one-third stake in Marina Bay Financial Centre Tower 3 from its sponsor Keppel Land, it said today in a statement.
 The Fed tapered monthly bond buying by $10 billion for a seventh time, staying on course to end the program in October.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Lawmakers have rejected the Pentagon’s request to shift as much as $15 billion in war spending to buy eight new Lockheed Martin Corp.
 The Pentagon sought permission to spend $880 million to buy six Lockheed F-35B fighter jets and spares for the Marine Corps to replace six older Marine AV-8B Harriers destroyed during a September 2012 Taliban attack on Forward Operating Base Camp Bastion in Afghanistan.
 Air Force The Pentagon also sought to shift $256 million to buy two Air Force versions of the F-35 and spare parts meant to replace to two Boeing F-15 fighter jets lost in combat operations.
 An additional $404 million would have been transferred to buy 21 Apache helicopters from Chicago-based Boeing to replace 21 Kiowa Warrior aircraft lost in battle.
 rose the most among stocks in the Dow Jones Industrial Average after Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy as many as 200 of the high-density jets being added to the planemaker’s 737 Max family.
 Both Rubel and Arment rate Boeing a buy.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Aeon Co, Japan’s largest retailer, agreed to buy the rest of money-losing rival Daiei Inc.
 “I’ve been waiting for a break, but it hasn’t come” Driving the growth is demand for high-risk mortgages such as interest-only loans and financing to buy rental properties.
 Interest-only mortgages jumped to 43 percent of all new home lending in the three months through June 30, and credit to buy rental properties climbed to 38 percent, both record highs, according to APRA data starting in the first quarter of 2008.
 The company took on debt to buy fellow casino operatorMandalay Bay Resort & Casino in 2005 and build the $9 billionCityCenter project in Las Vegas.
Terry and Kim Pegula agreed to buythe Buffalo Bills for around $1 billion, the Buffalo Newsreported, citing two people familiar with negotiations.
 Louis Fed president, is among those whoargue that approach led to complacency about the Fed’sintentions and too much risk-taking by investors and homebuyers.
 Samsung last month agreed to buy SmartThings, a startup that makes similar applications.
 To meet its goal of 10 percent annual revenue growth, the company is relying on buying companies and starting new products.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- The buyout firms that own Weather Channel Cos.
 The cash purchase also ends a legal dispute between Vail Resorts and Powdr, allowing Park City to operate normally this coming ski season, the buyer said.
 China Life will buy 10 billion yuan of shares, while gas supplier ENN Energy Holdings Ltd.
Telefonica SA (TEF) agreed to buy Vivendi (VIV)SA’s Brazilian broadband unit GVT, three weeks after thecompanies entered exclusive talks for the business.
 The bank provides loan guarantees, loans and insurance to help foreign companies buy US.
 in 2010 for $19 billion, has maintained its focus on the region, agreeing to buy Guatemalan lender Grupo Financiero Reformador and Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA’s Panama unit more recently.
 That helped reduce fourth-quarter profit 21 percent to $201 million in ADM’s agricultural services segment, which buys and stores crops.
 buyout firms in a transaction that would combinethe asset-management unit with the Spanish bank’s fund-management business, said a person familiar with the plan.
 Bothbuyout firms are based in New York.
 and AbbVie Inc, have pending deals that would let them cut their corporate tax rates by moving their tax home outside the country by buying smaller foreign businesses, even though executives and operations wouldn’t necessarily follow.
 SABA received 85 percent of available loan funds for the project to buy and export goods to Darussafaka and received the money in a series of disbursements submitted by SABA to Deutsche Bank and Ex-Im, the US.
 By bundling loans on such properties into bonds of varying risks -- a process known as securitization -- the institutional landlords are recouping much of the cash they put up buying and improving homes, and getting a chance to earn higher returns on the capital still invested.
 1 said Tan had offered to “buy us out” PAL Holdings had a net income of 147 billion pesos ($34million) in the second quarter, compared with a loss of 106billion pesos a year earlier.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Cofco Land Holdings Ltd, a Hong Kong-based developer backed by China’s government, agreed to buy the builders of the mainland Joy City properties for HK$125 billion ($161 billion).
 The developer is buying companies owned by its parent, Cofco Corp, that built the mixed-use projects in Beijing, Shanghai, Tianjin, Yantai and Shenyang.
 analyst, tamped down that idea in a report, saying those companies don’t make much sense as potential buyers.
 Aileen Zerrudo, a spokeswomen for Clorox, declined to comment on the buyout speculation.
 That means decisions by money managers to buy or sell have increased impact on these economies, where assets are smaller and less liquid.
 “The NBA is supposedly going to be front andcenter in this sale, and that information will filter to whoeverthe buyer is” ESPN currently pays about $485 million a year, while Turnerpays about $445 million.
 It will rejectbids deemed too far below prevailing share prices as authoritiesseek to prevent investors from “hogging” the daily quota ofbuy orders available for cross-border trades.
 drought in a century cut output and sent prices to the highest ever, bigger harvests are lowering costs for buyers including Tyson Foods Inc, while cutting demand for farm machinery and threatening to reduce farmland values.
Blackstone Group LP (BX) and TPG CapitalManagement LP agreed to buy mortgage lender Kensington Group Plcfrom Investec Plc for 180 million pounds ($290 million) toexpand in the UK.
 Blackstone Tactical Opportunities Advisors and TPG SpecialSituations Partners are buying the business seven years afterInvestec delisted the company from the London Stock Exchange,all parties said in separate statements today.
 Bayer Material Science, as the plastics unit is known, maybe valued at more than 12 billion euros ($155 billion) and thedrugmaker could use the proceeds from a divestiture to buyZoetis Inc.
 Bayer’s Step “We didn’t take this step so we could quickly buysomething again,” he said.
 The German company already boosted its life sciencesbusiness with one deal this year, agreeing in May to buy Merck’sover-the-counter products, including allergy medicine Claritin,for $142 billion.
 Last year it agreed to buy its partner on oneof its new cancer drugs, Norway’s Algeta ASA.
 In July, he toldanalysts Bayer is looking at the importance of critical mass inanimal health in light of Eli Lilly (LLY) buying Novartis’s businessand Zoetis’s public listing.
 A need for critical mass was behindBayer’s decision to buy the Merck consumer health business, hesaid.
 The Topix rebounded 18 percent from an April 14 low to gain 23 percent this year amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 Jewelry sales in India and China, the largest buyers, typically climbs in the fourth quarter before festivals and a wedding season.
 Demand peaks on Dussehra and Dhanteras, two of the most auspicious gold-buying days according to the Hindu calendar.
 ‘Sticky Transition’ “It’s going to be a sticky transition,” said Brent Thill,an analyst at UBS who recommends buying the stock.
 went public, is a “very compelling” buying opportunity because other parts of Masayoshi Son’s investment empire may be undervalued, according to Jefferies Group LLC.
 19 as investors who were buying the Japanese carrier as a proxy for the Chinese company could purchase Alibaba shares directly.
 Subtracting the value of those stakes, along with Supercell Oy that was purchased for $15 billion last year, implies that investors who buy SoftBank shares get the company’s Japanese wireless operations for free, Goyal said.
 Panama, Guatemala Bancolombia SA, which closed its purchase of HSBC Holdings Plc’s Panamanian unit last year, has spent more than $3 billion in Central America since 2007, buying stakes in lenders from Guatemala to El Salvador.
 That’s in part because it’s become more difficult to buy and sell bonds as banks pull back from making markets in the face of higher capital requirements.
 “I used to buy bonds, now you just buy the ETFs” Fixed-income funds such as ETFs may be a potential threat to the financial system when the Federal Reserve withdraws its unprecedented stimulus, Michael Feroli, chief US.
 “Clearly rising rates could be something that would trigger that” As sentiment soured on junk bonds in recent months, investors have turned to the easiest exit, pulling $27 billion since June 25 from ETFs that buy the debt, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “Right now some people are burnt and not going to step in and buy bonds on the way down” A study published last year by BlackRock found that its high-yield ETF didn’t create disruptions in underlying securities even in moments of market stress.
 “If the asset class falls out of favor, market makers have to unwind the positions and find a buyer on the other side,” he said.
 The company is rated a buy by 16 analysts, a hold by six and a sell by two, among 24 analysts tracked by Bloomberg.
Silver Lake Management LLC, thebiggest technology-focused buyout firm, stands to make more thanfive times its money in Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 The firm and its investors injected $825 million inAlibaba, including $447 million from its third buyout fund inlate 2011, said the person, who requested anonymity because theinformation is private.
 founder Michael Dell last year in a $249billion buyout of the computer maker.
 Kvisle is trying to sell assets as he seeks to rein in debtand refocus a company with operations spanning six continentsRepsol dropped a plan to buy all of Talisman to instead weighthe purchase of some of the company’s shale assets, people withknowledge of the matter said in August.
 It’s never been cheaper for euro-area governments or individuals to borrow money and the ECB is seeking to put cash into the economy through cheap loans to banks and a pledge to buy asset-backed securities.
 He forecasts the ECB will start buying sovereign bonds early next year to further stimulate the economy.
 “The economy is crying out for much easier policy and the ECB will need to do more” Bond Purchases5 Dowding predicts that the central bank will start buying sovereign bonds under its quantitative easing program as early as the first quarter of next year as purchases of asset-backed securities alone won’t be enough to stimulate the faltering economy.
 The Fed is gauging the strength of the economy as it winds down a bond-buying program and considers raising rates.
 The vacation home they’re buying near Florida’s Disney World would have been out of reach if they had to pay all cash.
 “We wanted to keep some money here just to fall back on” The Lees are using a foreign-national mortgage, a loan for overseas buyers that required a 40 percent down payment, to purchase the five-bedroom house later this month for $423,000.
 Foreign buyers, who are helping to fill a void left by Americans facing high borrowing hurdles, spent about $35 billion on US.
 FBC Mortgage LLC, an Orlando-based lender, has increased mortgages to international buyers by 65 percent this year compared with 2013.
 started lending to non-residents in June after seeing rising demand from Chinese buyers.
 “Instead of buying two houses in cash they can buy four houses with loans,” said Brian Na, chief executive officer of Mega Capital, which is now issuing about $10 million of the mortgages a month.
 “At the same time, buyers can build a credit history in the US” While many Americans struggle to qualify for mortgages, lenders are chasing wealthy buyers, including foreigners, whose loans typically require a 30 percent to 40 percent down payment compared with 20 percent for US.
 Banks and smaller firms are offering more loan products to buyers based overseas, most of whom have paid cash for homes in the last few years.
 In Florida, the state with the largest share of cash sales, smaller community banks have gotten increasingly comfortable lending to foreign buyers, said Rob Nunziata, CEO of FBC.
 Applications from international homebuyers are now at about the same level they reached during the peak in about 2006, when foreigners needed just a passport and an application to get a mortgage, according to Andy Scott, president of International MortgagesNet in Orlando, which caters to mostly British clients, including the Lees.
 And there are a lot more checks and balances” The company, which has worked with international buyers in the US.
 While Canada was the top source of international buyers, China accounted for the largest sales dollar volume because Chinese purchased more expensive properties on average, the Realtors report said.
 The top five states for international buying are Florida, California, Arizona, Texas and New York, according to the association.
 But the process was fairly straight forward” Rising prices and competition from cash-rich investors have kept many American homebuyers on the sidelines.
 WmMorrison Supermarkets Plc gained 22 percent as Citigroup Increcommended buying the stock.
 judge to allow a shareholder settlement over the bungled buyout of Autonomy Corp.
 “Retail investors looking for a pure play will have to take their chances in the IPO market or wait until trading to try and buy it” Global Roadshow Alibaba’s executives are in the middle of a 10-day global roadshow to meet potential investors.
 Belgium’s AB InBev is in talks with banks about financing a 75 billion-pound ($122 billion) deal to buy SABMiller, Dow Jones reported, citing an unidentified source.
 Heunderstands the power of buying and shutting down yourcompetitors” “Larry is still there.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- News Corp, the newspaper publisher controlled by Rupert Murdoch, agreed to buy the owner of Realtorcom for $950 million, expanding its digital real-estate listings to compete with sites such as Zillowcom.
 agreed to buy Harlequin Enterprises for $415 million, bolstering its book publishing business with the romance imprint.
 and REA completing the buyout together, Bedi Singh, News Corp’s chief financial officer, said on the conference call.
 Salesforce agreed to buy data-management startup RelateIQ Inc.
 (FOXA) said it isn’tcoming back for the stake in British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc (BSY)it doesn’t already own after withdrawing an offer to buy TimeWarner Inc.
 BSkyB, which is 39 percent owned by Fox, agreed to buy SkyItalia and a 574 percent stake in Sky Deutschland from Fox inJuly for more than $9 billion.
 We want to getbigger, stronger and better” As Fox was working on a deal to sell its European units toBSkyB, it was also attempting to buy New York-basedentertainment company Time Warner Inc.
 Murdoch previously tried to buy BSkyB in 2011.
 The company in June agreed to buy a $736 million stake in China-based 58com to bolster its online content as it seeks to compete with Alibaba.
 will buy the operator of the Citistore retail chain from its parent for HK$9345 million ($121 million), according to a filing to the Hong Kong bourse.
 That will then buy them enough time to start the 18-month negotiation process that would follow any Scottish secession.
 ECB Stimulus Since June, ECB President Mario Draghi has cut interest rates to record lows, offered cheap long-term cash to banks, and pledged to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds in a bid to revive the euro-area economy.
 He has said policy makers will go further if needed, leaving open the option of quantitative easing, or large-scale buying of sovereign debt.
 Siemens AG said it would buy Dresser-Rand Group Inc, a provider of energy equipment based in Houston, for $75 billion.
 In two deals last week, SAP AG agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 Seeking Yield Investors have poured about $494 billion into mutual funds that buy taxable bonds this year after pulling $206 billion in 2013, according to the Investment Company Institute.
 to help fund its $130 billion buyout of Vodafone’s 45 percent stake in Verizon Wireless.
 “One of the primary reasons why last year’s Verizon mega deal was so successful is that Verizon was an investment-grade credit that came in size and was attractively priced,” said Bonnie Baha, director of global developed credit at Los Angeles-based DoubleLine Capital LP, who was among buyers of the record Verizon offering.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- A surge in luxury homebuilding in London is eroding the premium that developers can charge buyers to acquire a new property.
 Every time we get these selloffs, the buyers come in.
 agreed in November to buy six Recurrent solar projects in California and Arizona in a $400 million transaction.
 Roche, based in Basel, Switzerland, agreed in August to buy Brisbane, California-based InterMune for $83 billion in cash.
 Two failed attempts earlier had eroded confidence in Jaiprakash’s ability to find buyers, and investors will watch closely if the latest preliminary agreement will translate into a real deal, said Deepak Agrawala, an analyst at Elara Securities Pvt.
 24 to buy three of Jaiprakash’s hydropower plants, citing regulatory uncertainties and tariff issues.
 In July, Abu Dhabi National Energy Co, known as Taqa, withdrew from an agreement to buy two hydropower projects after having signed a deal in March to take over the assets at an enterprise value of $16 billion along with a Canadian institutional investor and Indian infrastructure finance fund, IDFC Ltd.
 cut its rating on Jaiprakash Associates to “hold” from “buy” yesterday and reduced its target price by 58 percent to 39 rupees.
 Treasuries are the world’s worst-performing bonds this quarter as the Fed prepares to end its bond buying while the European Central Bank introduced additional stimulus.
 Moving to cloud services has been a popular trend among companies looking to save on the cost of buying equipment and operating their own data centers.
 will underwrite 10 billion rand of the proposed new shares, investing their own money if there aren’t enough buyers for the stock.
 It set up a renewable-credit market three years ago allowing distributors to meet targets by buying certificates from clean utilities representing 1 megawatt-hour of electricity fed into the grid.
 What’s less clear is if investors are interested in buying.
 “Our clients wouldn’t be happy with us buying Russian bonds, especially from a state-controlled entity,” Viktor Szabo, who helps oversee $13 billion in emerging-market debt at Aberdeen Asset Management Plc in London, said by phone Sept.
 “We most probably wouldn’t be interested in buying” Russian companies were frozen out of the Eurobond market after the annexation of Ukraine’s Crimea peninsula in March provoked sanctions from the US.
 While Gazprom’s and Alfa’s funding hasn’t been included, buying their debt breaches the spirit of the law if not the letter, said Christian Schiweck from GS&P Kapitalanlagegesellschaft SA in Luxembourg.
 “We wouldn’t buy Alfa’s new issuance for the same reasons we wouldn’t buy Gazprom.
 railroads, thebiggest buyers in a $25 billion North American market, at justthe right time.
 Now 1,000 orders have poured in, according to GE,which doesn’t identify buyers.
 Union Pacific, for one, had expected tobuy only 200 new engines this year and none in 2015, accordingto Chief Operating Officer Lance Fritz.
 BNSF Railway Co, the largest railroad by revenue, isbuying 500 Tier 3 models this year as it fights the worst trackcongestion in the US.
 “They may end up buying more or at least want more than wethought they were going to need,” he said.
 Vodafone went on to buy Spanish broadband company Grupo Corporativo Ono SA in March for 72 billion euros.
 Liberty agreed to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV for 49 billion euros in January and a stake in ITV Plc, the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster, in July.
 has also given the underwriters on its sale a 30-day option to buy as much as 6 million additional shares in Israel Chemicals.
 Short-sellers borrow stock and sell it, hoping to buy it back at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 Alibabacom, which connects manufacturers with overseas wholesale buyers and was delisted in 2012 at its IPO price, is a unit of the entity that’s now set to list on the New York Stock Exchange.
 junk-bond market stretched into a third day as the biggest exchange-traded fund that buys the debt fell toward the lowest level this year and yields climbed to the highest since October.
 Bond buyers are moving out of high-yield bonds, which traded at an average 1025 cents on the dollar yesterday, as the Federal Reserve moves closer to reversing its extraordinary policies that were put in place in 2008 to bolster demand for risky assets.
 companies seeking to avoid the developed world’s highest corporate tax rate by buying foreign businesses and moving their tax address abroad.
 Pfizer Inc, which this year attempted to buy AstraZeneca Plc and move abroad, fell less than 1 percent to $3005 at the close in New York.
 companies need to buy a foreign operation, and the shareholders of the non-US.
 AbbVie Inc, based in North Chicago, Illinois, has agreed to buy Shire Plc and move to the UK.
 Medtronic Inc, which plans to buy Covidien Plc and move its legal address to Ireland from Minneapolis, fell 29 percent to $6408.
 Pfizer Chief Executive Officer Ian Read had cited the tax benefits as a reason to buy AstraZeneca and move Pfizer’s tax base to the UK.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Bond buyers have generally grown more risk-averse as 2014 drags on -- except when it comes to emerging-market debt.
 Second, buyers of emerging-markets bonds are taking their cues more from the European Central Bank, which is accelerating its stimulus, than from the Fed, which is slowing its program.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Honda Motor Co, Japan’s third-largest carmaker, has started buying land in the western Indian state of Gujarat for a future plant in the country, an executive at the company said.
 Tokyo-based spokeswoman Kumiko Hashimoto confirmed that the company has started procedures for buying land in India.
 “But how can I sign contracts with foreign buyers when I don’t know if I can get money to increase my production in the first place” To contact the reporter on this story: Nguyen Dieu Tu Uyen in Hanoi at uyen1@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story: Stephanie Phang at sphang@bloombergnet Rina Chandran, K.
 Expedia’s Offer Expedia, whose brands include Hotelscom and Hotwirecom, agreed July 7 to buy Wotif, offering shareholders A$306 and a special dividend of 24 cents a share, which would be paid by Wotif.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Mercedes-Benz, seeking to become the world’s biggest maker of luxury vehicles again, is targeting potential Porsche buyers with a new top-of-the-line sports car that costs about half the price of its predecessor.
 “This approach appears to be intended to not only preempt shareholder approval, but also eliminate interest from the various bidders for the company” Allergan is in talks to buy Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 “Allergan’s Board remains confident in the Company’s ability to deliver significantly more value than Valeant’s grossly inadequate offer” Jackson Square said Allergan had refused to engage in talks with Valeant and declined to buy back its own stock when it was trading at lower levels last year, ignoring urging from the San Francisco-based investor.
 Activists, who buy sizable stakes and agitate to increase value, targeted 369 companies in 2013, up 12 percent from 2012, Hedge Fund Solutions’ data show.
 Then they buy a foreign competitor that meets size requirements and pays that rate and reincorporate in the domicile of the acquired company.
 He’d been talking to management for months and said he agrees with their decision to drop the rebuffed offer and do a buyback.
 postponed a shareholder vote on its plan to buy Fyffes Plc while it seeks talks with Cutrale Group and Safra Group on their unsolicited $614 million proposal to acquire the banana producer.
 “We continue to believe that the Fyffes/Chiquita combination is highly attractive and would require a bid of in excess of $16 from Cutrale-Safra to match the economics of the merger,” David Holohan, an analyst at Merrion Capital in Dublin, who has a buy rating on the stock, said today.
 5 that Chiquita shareholders should reject the Fyffes deal and instead pursue a buyout offer from Cutrale and Safra.
 He reversed himself and sued the NBA in federal court in Los Angeles the day after Ballmer agreed to buy the team.
 He estimates Family Dollar would trade at about $50 a share in the absence of a buyout, wiping out the recent rally and then some.
 “I’d rather tell clients to put the money to work elsewhere because the outcome is just too unknown at this point” Only three of 25 analysts currently recommend buying Family Dollar stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “But I still think you could ultimately see $83 or $84 because once this asset is bought by one buyer, the buyer that’s left out really doesn’t have a lot of choices” for other takeover targets to pursue.
 “If they come up to $78 or $79, it makes it easier for Family Dollar management to justify pushing to stay with the Dollar Tree offer” That price is about where the stock traded yesterday, still offering little incentive for investors to continue buying.
 “To be buying the stock today and making a bet on antitrust, that’s not a bet I’d be willing to make at this point,” Yarbrough said.
 “For anyone to buy them is risky” BHP Spinoff Iron ore slumped 38 percent this year as producers increased output, while copper for delivery in three months on the London Metal Exchange declined 7 percent.
 “I’d assume there were buyers out there, but that what they were willing to pay wasn’t in line with what BHP wanted” Near Misses Davis’s X2 Resources was said in April to be studying some BHP thermal coal and nickel assets, while Regent’s Magris Resources Inc.
 They have since pared losses amid bets on rising global demand and that new buyers will be found outside Russia.
 Of the 12 analysts covering the company, eight recommend buying the share; only one advises selling.
 “It’s our top pick in the industry, and it has been for some time,” said Giskeoedegaard, who raised his recommendation to a strong buy from a buy last month.
 Short sellers borrow assets to bet on a decline in prices, hoping to buy them back later and pocket the difference.
 Rusal to buy.
 Chevrolet Sail GM plans to spend $12 billion through 2017 to increase capacity and expand its product line in China, which the company projects will buy 33 million to 35 million vehicles a year by 2020.
 BNP Paribas agreed to buy Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s equity derivatives unit in February after reaching a similar deal with Credit Agricole SA in October.
 Poland is able to buy 2 billion cubic meters of gas per year via a link with the Czech Republic and via the Lasow link with Germany.
 The company agreed tobuy Neotel from India’s Tata Communications Ltd.
 Criteria for loans to first-home buyers may be eased and people who have paid off outstanding mortgages may be considered eligible for first-home status, the newspaper said, citing unidentified people at Industrial & Commercial Bank of China Ltd.
 3 to stem the decline in sales, many homebuyers still have a wait-and-see attitude, according to Centaline Group, parent of China’s biggest property agency.
 “This reported property policy loosening marks the first major relaxation of mortgage lending rules, which should effectively lower both the down payment requirement and mortgage rates for some second home buyers,” UBS economists led by Hong Kong-based Wang Tao wrote in a report today, adding more easing is likely.
 First-home buyers are allowed to pay only 30 percent up front, and are eligible for mortgage-rate discounts of as much as 30 percent the central bank’s benchmark.
 Strict Curbs In Beijing, at least 70 percent of homebuyers who are currently deemed second-home buyers may qualify for first-home status if the reported policy changes take place, according to Wu Hao, a manager at the loan brokerage of Bacic & 5i5j Group, the city’s second-biggest realtor for existing homes.
 The city is the most strict with the curbs, treating all mortgage applicants who ever owned a home or borrowed money as second-home buyers even if they’ve sold their only home or paid off their only mortgage, she said.
 The loosening will benefit first-tier cities the most, where the definition of first-home buyers has been most strictly applied, according to Jinsong Du, a Hong Kong-based property analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG.
 A Chinese bank will consider buyers as first-home buyers if they pay off outstanding mortgages, and will ease restrictions on second-home purchases, the Shanghai Securities News reported today, citing an unidentified official from the bank.
 Fuzhou, capital of the southeastern province of Fujian, said yesterday people who have paid off loans could be considered first-time home buyers and enjoy preferential rates, according to a statement on local government’s website.
 We’re going to focus more on the underlyingfundamentals of stocks, rather than buying them simply becausethere are no other alternatives” The Russell 2000 slid 24 percent to 1,11933 last week,its fourth consecutive retreat, as investors speculated theFederal Reserve will accelerate its timetable for interest-rateincreases amid improving economic data.
 rose the most in three months after first-quarter earnings beat analysts’ estimates as the company carried more packages, cut pension expense and benefited from completion of a record stock buyback.
 Including a 15-cent gain attributable to the stock buyback, per-share earnings were $210, beating the $196 average estimate of analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 Loan Partners The company is focused on raising money for debt, rather than other types of crowdfunding that buy physical properties.
 agencies, including the Defense Department and theDepartment of Homeland Security, buy the IBM servers, accordingto Bloomberg Intelligence.
 Hedge Fund Stake In April, after Jana said it invested $1 billion in Walgreen, partner Scott Ostfeld said the company’s buyout of Alliance Boots and Pessina’s presence on the board “will lead to the revitalization of this iconic brand and produce years of earnings growth through synergies, fixing operations and improving capital allocation” Pessina’s rise inside the Walgreen universe dates to 2012, when Walgreen bought a 45 percent stake in Alliance Boots.
 6 that it would buy the rest of Alliance Boots for $153 billion, it made Pessina by far the biggest holder, with 16 percent of the combined company after the deal closes.
 That same day, Walgreen unveiled a smaller-than-expected $3 billion share buyback and an about $2 billion cut to its adjusted earnings forecast, which sent the shares down as much as 16 percent and damaged the US.
 in 2007, which had teamed up with Pessina to do the buyout.
It’s natural for bond buyers to bepessimists.
 While cash may flee mutual funds when sentiment turns andWall Street may have little interest in making markets, private-equity firms have raised at least $300 billion to invest incredit and are likely buyers in a selloff, said Oleg Melentyev,who heads US.
 The catastrophic scenario of “acomplete vacuum of bids” in a downturn is “not likely tomaterialize because of the presence of this patient and high-quality capital” As the pool of outstanding corporate debt balloons, thecomposition of its buyers has also changed.
 Wall Street dealersare stockpiling fewer bonds to trade in response to highercapital requirements and new risk-curbing rules, and mutualfunds, hedge funds and private-equity firms are buying more.
 (KKR) areamong the firms that have diversified their traditionalleveraged-buyout businesses in part by boosting their debtinvestments.
 There’s also concern that the unprecedentedflows into debt mutual funds since the 2008 credit crisis willreverse when interest rates start to rise, with few willingbuyers on the other side.
 Some of the capital has been raisedwith an eye toward buying discounted notes in a selloff.
 While liquidity may not be what it used to, that doesn’tmean that markets will collapse under stress, Melentyev saidWhen prices drop, there may be a whole slew of buyers justwaiting to take the other side.
 The companystarted buying Irish debt in the third quarter of 2010.
 “They’re having to adapt to a new business model,” said Brent Thill, an analyst at UBS AG, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Oracle’s board also announced the buyback of $13 billion shares under the company’s share repurchase program.
 “This is, effectively, the next step in the evolution towards a cloud company,” said Kreher, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 With Facebook, a Nasdaq software error caused a late start to trading and caused some investors to buy more shares than they intended.
 “It’s a worldwide phenomenon that governments are buying bonds to keep their countries moving along economically” Robertson was joined on stage by Carlyle Group LP co-founder William Conway, who said he didn’t see a catalyst that would cause the bond market collapse.
 Three years after buying the data-analysis company, an acquisition that resulted in an $88 billion writedown and a flurry of shareholder lawsuits, HP Chief Executive Officer Meg Whitman says her company is once again in a position to consider takeover options.
 The $70 billion computer maker’s near-record cash pile gives it the means to do a deal, and the worst sales forecast among computer hardware peers provides the motivation for HP to buy its way to more competitive products.
 “There’s going to be a lot of scrutiny on it for sure, so whatever they buy has to definitely be high on the strategic priority list, as well as be an acquisition that they can explain from a financial return perspective” A representative for Palo Alto, California-based HP declined to comment.
 The Challenge Finding the ideal target will be tricky because whatever HP buys has to be strategically interesting enough to add to growth yet reasonably priced enough to generate a good return, said Alexander of Raymond James.
 “HP could definitely buy them and it would make some sense” Old School Teradata, a $7 billion information-warehousing company that counts EBay Inc.
 Eircomreturned to the stock market in 2004, before it was acquired in2006 in another leveraged buyout.
 The company agreed to buy Mainland Sand & Gravel Ulc of Canada on Sept.
 Hong Kong has grown to become the largest wine auction market in the world, largely on the strength of Chinese buyers, and accounted for about 43 percent of Sotheby’s global auction sales of $579 million last year.
 though he said that 25 percent of its wine clients buy at both auction and retail.
 Whereas buyers of wine at auction pay a flat 225 percent buyer’s premium on the hammer price, retail prices carry no commission charges.
 Ford also must demonstrate that the aluminum-bodied F-150, its best-selling and most profitable product, can be manufactured at full speed with high quality and that it’s embraced by truck buyers before Moody’s will will commit to a ratings change, said Bruce Clark, the company’s auto analyst.
 More recently, Oracle in June agreed to buy hospitality software maker Micros for $53 billion.
 Since then, Dupont Chairman and Chief Executive Officer Ellen Kullman has announced plans to cut bureaucracy, buy back $5 billion of shares and spin off the company’s performance chemicals unit, a commodity business that has more volatile earnings than other segments.
 The New York-based firm buys stakes in public companies it regards as underperformers and seeks to work with management and boards to boost shareholder returns.
 The stock buyback was announced in January.
 Ismaik, who owns about 28 percent of the company, said last month he rejected an offer from Aabar to buy part of his stake.
 Investors were buying stocks in Dubai at “pretty good entry levels given yesterday’s selloff and the drop at the start today,” Nayal Khan, head of institutional sales and trading at Naeem Holding brokerage in Dubai, said by phone.
 The company, which has two buy ratings from analysts, eight holds and three sells, is the worst performer in the 41-member Bloomberg World Oil & Gas Services Index this year after falling 41 percent.
 She uses the digital currency to buy gift cards and office supplies.
 Marijuana smokers are buying buds from bitcoin-enabled vending machines.
 “Usually men buy electronics,” Byrne said.
 “These men are buying more household goods,” such as mattresses, vacuum cleaners and sheets.
 If anything, using the currency to buy goods and services is even more popular in Europe, said Tony Gallippi, CEO of BitPay, which is based in Atlanta.
 “Adding a new currency for them is a very easy task” Plane Tickets Peter Surda, an economist who lives in Vienna, uses bitcoin two or three times a week to buy everything from food to electronics to plane tickets.
 Labour and the Greens pledged lower electricity prices by imposing a government-run agency on the market which would buy power from generators and sell it to retailers, requiring existing companies to split and creating uncertainty around future investment decisions.
 Nevada’s legislature began considering a package of bills related to Tesla yesterday, including the tax incentives and a measure to allow the automaker to sell directly to buyers, rather than through dealerships.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Veresen Inc, the Canadian company planning a terminal to ship liquefied natural gas to Asia from Oregon, agreed to buy Global Infrastructure Partners’ 50 percent stake in the Ruby pipeline for $143 billion.
 steelmaker by sales, agreed to buy a Kentucky mill from ArcelorMittal and Gerdau SA for about $770 million to boost its output of flat-rolled products.
 “This acquisition appears to fit the bill,” Matt Murphy, an analyst at UBS AG in Toronto who has a buy recommendation on the stock, said today in a note.
 Siderurgica Nacional SA said last month it was looking to acquire Gallatin after failing to buy ThyssenKrupp AG plants in Alabama and Rio de Janeiro last year.
 InMarch, when the company announced the Intercloud plan, Ciscosaid it would invest as much as $1 billion in financing tocustomers and partners to move to “Cisco-powered clouds” IBM, VMware Other large IT equipment suppliers have similar plans totry to maintain market share as equipment sales shift fromcorporate buyers to cloud providers.
 Cisco also recently agreed to buyMetacloud, a Pasadena-based company that runs cloudinfrastructure for companies, using gear the companies alreadyhave in their data centers.
 According to bets by buyers of structured products, such as call warrants and knock-out certificates, shares of Yahoo may rise 65 percent by the end of the year.
 company instead of buying Alibaba, as an alternative way to invest in the newly public e-commerce company’s growth.
 “You can go out and buy Alibaba, and, yeah, you can put them in your portfolio, but Yahoo’s got this stake and there’s value in that stake,” said Daniel Morgan, vice president of Synovus Trust Co, which owns more than 90,000 shares of Yahoo.
 ‘Discounted Prices’ Ryan Jacob, who manages Yahoo shares as part of his Jacob Internet Fund, said he doubts he’ll buy shares of Alibaba, because his ownership of Yahoo already gives him a piece of the Chinese company -- along with a stake in Yahoo Japan.
 “Usually, one firm buys another and they merge or something like that -- but in this particular case Yahoo was acting a little bit more like a partner or a venture capital firm” Jay Ritter, a professor of finance at the University of Florida, expects shares of the Web portal to follow Alibaba’s while Yahoo owns the stake in the Chinese company.
 Kelly, who hasn’t held Russian equities for a decade, said he is “looking closely” at the market and may start buying as soon as this year.
 “The Fed’s not in a hurry to move and when it does it will be a result of the time coming to normalize, not just to jack up rates” Stocks Advance Equities advanced yesterday, sending the S&P 500 up as much as 06 percent, after the central bank renewed its pledge to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after its bond-buying program ends, probably next month.
 Data Watch The Fed tapered monthly bond buying by $10 billion for a seventh time, staying on course to end the program as soon as next month.
 China is the biggest buyer of industrial metals.
 Investor and Fiskars were said to have rebuffed a bid byRolls-Royce Holdings Plc (RR/) to buy Waertsilae’s ship-engine unit inJanuary.
 and world prices reached the widest in two years, adding to costs for buyers including Hershey Co.
 buyers even as the rest of the world has a glut.
 buyers are being squeezed by the government’s trade restrictions, said Mitchell Goetze, president of the Goetze’s Candy Co, which has been making Caramel Creams for almost a century.
 The two-story house is on an 880-square-meter (9,472-square-foot) site in an exclusive neighborhood in Shibuya ward,according to a registration filing with the Legal AffairsBureau.
 The neighborhood, hidden behind the busy streets ofShibuya’s bustling shopping district, has art galleries and aNoh theater, which features a form of Japanese musical dramathat started around the 14th century.
 (9983) Chairman Tadashi Yanai, Japan’s richestperson, also lives in Shibuya ward and his house is valued atabout $74 million.
 Toranomon Hills Rising share prices and a depreciating yen, as well asexpectations of infrastructure being built ahead of the OlympicGames in Tokyo in 2020 and moves to legalize casinos, haveattracted buyers in the luxury sector, Takano at Sotheby’s said.
 French Wine Mori Building Co, the developer of Toranomon Hills, hasfound buyers for all the 70 units in the building, Kosei Ajima,general manager of business promotion and residential sales,said.
 “A lot of the timeJapanese would have to buy land and build themselves.
 Just nine of the 34 analysts covering the bank recommended buying the shares, compared with more than 80 percent four years ago.
 lawmakers’ attention this year, prompting Treasury’s response, including Burger King’s deal to buy Tim Hortons and move its address to Canada.
 Louis President James Bullard said earlier today the central bank may need to drop its pledge next month to keep interest rates low as bond buying under the quantitative-easing strategy is brought to a close.
 28-29, and reiterated a pledge to keep its benchmark interest rate near zero for a “considerable time” after bond buying ended.
 “Debt from countries like Tunisia is a difficult buy for Japanese investors but with JBIC backing they can invest comfortably” Yield Advantage The central bank of Tunisia is marketing 10-year bonds at 90 basis points over yen swaps, offering the equivalent of almost three times the yield on similar-maturity Japan sovereign notes at 054 percent.
 Late Saturday afternoon, with would-be iPhone buyers still queuing in front of Apple Inc’s marble-and-glass emporium on Berlin’s Kurfuerstendamm, three masked gunmen stormed a security company’s van that was hauling away the pile of euros the store had taken in over the weekend.
 Whereas Americans, Scandinavians, French and Italians can buy a cup of coffee or a pack of gum with a card, it’s rare for Germans to use plastic for such payments, and it can be hard to find a cafe or restaurant in Berlin, Munich or Frankfurt that will accept credit cards.
 are among companies that have opted to buy annuity contracts from Newark, New Jersey-based Prudential.
 Bond buyers rely on them to insure against defaults, and some investors use them to speculate.
 The firm also has made higher-than-market bids to buy blocks of stock from clients to win market share.
 “It’s an area we’ve been happily adding to” The proportion of analysts with buy ratings on Samsung is the lowest since 2009, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 While some 83 percent of analysts tracked by Bloomberg still advise buying Samsung, that’s the lowest proportion since 2009, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Wilmshurst said he’s also buying Microsoft Corp, which is among the largest holdings in his funds.
 Fundamentally we’re buying them because they are tremendously positioned as an enterprise software vendor” Microsoft’s Satya Nadella has been aggressive in making changes since he became chief executive officer in February, replacing Steve Ballmer.
 The optical equipment business may attract buyers such as Avago Technologies Ltd.
 It will take time for another company to challenge EBay’s dominance in helping shoppers buy and sell products online, according to Aaron Kessler, an analyst at Raymond James & Associates who rates EBay stock outperform.
SAP SE (SAP), the biggest maker ofbusiness-management software, agreed to buy Concur TechnologiesInc.
 The complaint comes after New York-based BGC disclosed earlier this week a hostile takeover offer to buy the company for $525 per share in cash, 15 percent higher than CME’s all-stock transaction.
 The CME deal, announced July 30, would break up GFI with managers led by Chairman Michael Gooch buying the wholesale brokerage clearing unit for $165 million plus the assumption of $63 million in liabilities.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Fresnillo Plc, the world’s biggest producer of primary silver, will buy partner Newmont Mining Corp’s share in a venture in Mexico for $450 million to increase the company’s gold output.
 “It’s a good strategy to buy shares of companies that are affiliated to Alibaba, since domestic investors can’t directly invest in its IPO,” Dai Ming, a money manager at Hengsheng Hongding Asset Management Co.
 will introduce a program that enables clients to buy Alibaba shares through the firm’s special program for qualified investors, the China Daily reported July 4.
 The change means costs will double for a customer buyingApple Inc.
 With a two-year contract for the top monthly plan, thebuyer received monthly rebates of 194 yuan that covered 88percent of the device’s list price.
 Novartis is buying Glaxo’s cancer business, selling its vaccine unit to Glaxo and setting up a consumer-health joint venture with Glaxo.
 Keyur Parekh, an analyst with Goldman Sachs, raised his rating on Glaxo this week to buy from hold, in part on the prospect of additional changes to be introduced by a new chairman.
 (6758) may reward investors ifthey wait to buy its bonds after an expected ratings downgrade,BNP Paribas SA said.
 “I don’t think they’reclose to default but of course they’re faced with very bigdifficulties” Nakazora, the nation’s top-ranked credit analyst from 2010to 2012, doesn’t recommend buying any of Sony’s some $42billion-equivalent of bonds outstanding now.
 Then,“we need to buy,” she said in an interview in Tokyo yesterday.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA Chairman Ana Patricia Botin, addressing shareholders for the first time since taking over from her father last week, pledged to pursue his strategy, characterized by a “clear vision” and “prudent risk-taking” “The group has the capital base, balance-sheet strength and capacity for revenue generation necessary” for growth, said Botin today in Santander, Spain, at the investor meeting called for the buyout of the bank’s Brazilian unit.
 The company said earlierthis month that it agreed to buy a 90 percent stake in power-plant developer Yunnan Metallurgical New Energy Co.
 The so-called hold-to-maturity norms protect banks from losses and encourage them to buy government debt.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date, and non-deliverable contracts are settled in dollars.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- TransFirst Inc, the payments firm that filed for an initial public offering in July, has drawn interest from potential buyers including CVC Capital Partners Ltd.
 agreed to buy Thomas H.
 Exploring both a sale and an IPO, known as a dual-track process, can help propel a sale by pressuring buyers to act before an IPO puts the company in the hands of public investors.
 London-based CVC agreed last year to buy online payment firm Skrill Group Plc from Investcorp Bank BSC.
 “The big push is likely to be for regional-language transactions” For Snapdeal, that means you can click on ‘khariden’ to buy in Hindi, or ‘vaangu’ to do the same in Tamil.
 It doesn’t buy inventory.
 Supersonic Planes With buyers of top-end corporate jets already shelling out almost as much as the price of the smallest Airbus and Boeing Co.
 policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 Investors aren’t ready to buy Russia yet because of Ukraine risks, and now Evtushenkov’s arrest has soured the mood further” The case against Evtushenkov stems from a probe into Bashneft, an oil producer that his holding company Sistema acquired in 2009, the Investigative Committee said on Sept.
 MTS could be a “good investment idea” as the company has no connection to the investigation besides the majority shareholder, Vladimir Vedeneev, chief investment officer at Raiffeisen Capital in Moscow, said after buying the stock yesterday.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Starbucks Corp, the world’s largest coffee-shop chain, agreed to buy the remaining 61 percent of its Japanese operations for about $9135 million.
 The deal will include buying a 40 percent stake from Sazaby League for about $505 million and the 21 percent owned by public shareholders for about $4085 million, Seattle-based Starbucks said yesterday in a statement.
 analysts including Thomas Singlehurst said in a note published yesterday as it downgraded Rightmove to sell from buy.
 reiterated their buy rating on Rightmove yesterday, following the release of Citigroup’s note.
 “Peer-to-peer lending willsurely play a stronger role pushing the waves because it’s purespeculation or investment demand” Rife Speculation Speculative buying -- selling assets in a short period oftime -- accounts for more than 20 percent of demand in first-tier cities, which include Beijing and Shanghai, JPMorgan Chase& Co.
 Investors accounted for 40 percent of homebuyers in 2007,when Shenzhen World Union Properties Consultancy Inc.
 startedasking clients their reason for buying.
 To stem the downturn, 37 of the 46 Chinese cities thatimposed limits on home ownership since 2010 to snuff outproperty flippers have relaxed or scrapped restrictions on thenumber of apartments one can buy as of Sept.
 A buyer agreed to pay 16 million yuan for the firstproperty and the transaction was completed Aug.
 Two days earlier, investors votedto sell the second property for 189 million yuan to a buyer,who runs a local advertising firm, rendering an annualizedreturn of at least 20 percent if the transaction is completed byOct.
 Brazil, Indonesia Usinas Siderurgicas de Minas Gerais SA, the steelmaker known as Usiminas, fell 36 percent, extending an eight-session rout to 22 percent after Banco Santander SA cut its recommendation to the equivalent of sell from buy.
 economy as it winds down a bond-buying program that’s on track to end this year.
 “There’s nervousness ahead of the Fed meeting” The Topix rebounded 16 percent from an April 14 low amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 17 to keep interest rateslow for a “considerable time” after the end of bond buying.
 4 when the European Central Bank’s surprise decision to cut interest rates and start buying securitized debt sent European equities to a two-month high.
 Investors speculate the central bank will maintain its pledge to keep its benchmark rate low for a considerable time after the asset buying ends.
 Ebro Foods SA added 23 percent to 1539 euros as UBS AG raised its rating on the Spanish maker of rice and pasta products to buy from neutral.
 said today it will spend as much as 9 billion yuan ($15 billion) buying a stake in Tsinghua Unigroup Ltd, the owner of two Chinese chip designers, as it seeks to speed up its access to the world’s largest mobile market.
 The buyers will take on about 2,000 staff members.
 There are about a dozen interested buyers for the insurance business, PwC said today.
 Shop Sales EE agreed to buy 58 Phones 4u shops and take on 359 employees, the largest UK.
 EE may also buy the Phones 4u Life mobile business, a reseller of EE’s service, PwC said today.
 Dixons Carphone, the London-based electronics retailer that agreed last week to take on 800 Phones 4u employees, is in negotiations to buy some Phones 4u stores, people familiar with the matter said.
 19 that it plans to buy 140 shops and take on about 900 employees.
 Vodafone’s agreement to buy stores and inventory will raise 124 million pounds ($203 million) while EE’s deal for shops will raise 25 million pounds, PwC said.
 An acquisition of Zantel would give a buyer access to spectrum in Tanzania, helping it cope with growing demand for mobile data.
 4, when the ECB unexpectedly cut interest rates and announced a plan to buy securitized debt.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said last week the central bank will buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds, to funnel cash into an economy which stalled in the second quarter and where lending has been shrinking for more than two years.
 “Our focus is on the next generation of collectors, the new buyers who will become futures sellers,” Andrea Fiuczynski, Sotheby’s chairman of West Coast, said in an interview at the company’s Manhattan headquarters.
 They want to know what they can buy now” Private Dinners Today Sotheby’s Sunset Boulevard space in Los Angeles is showing November auction highlights including works consigned by the estate of Rachel “Bunny” Mellon and the Georgia O’Keeffe Museum in Santa Fe, New Mexico.
 Caesars said last week it was beginning talks with some first-lien bondholders in an effort to pare debt at its biggest unit, Caesars Entertainment Operating Co, which the company has struggled to service since its 2008 leveraged buyout by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 Without a buy-in from those creditors, the company would have trouble securing enough allies to quickly emerge from a bankruptcy.
 utility owner by market value, said last week it would spend $500 million to build three solar farms in North Carolina and to buy power from five more in the state.
 decided to develop a payments system so people could use iPhones to buy items at a store instead of swiping debit or credit cards, the company bypassed EBay Inc’s PayPal.
 The 15-lien holders said the plan representsthe best opportunity to “realize on their claims” Momentive Performance filed for bankruptcy protection inApril after struggling to meet payments on debt dating to its$38 billion buyout by Leon Black’s Apollo in 2006.
 (STR), an Indiandrugmaker, agreed to buy Shasun Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- It’s widely known that corporate-loan buyers want bigger returns.
 gained the most in nearly five years after agreeing to buy Civitas Therapeutics Inc, the developer of an experimental Parkinson’s disease therapy.
 His buyers scour the globe for the rarest Chevelles, Corvettes, Mustangs, Road Runners and other hot rods, which he displays in perfectly parked rows on his shiny warehouse floor.
 Later, he assembled a staff and experimented with buying and selling.
 Think of it, he says, as “the Bloomberg of the classic-car marketplace, where you have in one place the ability to track your portfolio, monitor the market, do your research and communicate with others” Kauffman’s Vision If a buyer is in the market for, say, a Mercury Cougar and finds 57 of them on EBay ranging from $8,000 to $80,000, from various years and with varying amounts of information, he then has to venture out to Mercury forums to investigate each one.
 If you decide to buy, you can do that, too, then arrange to have the car insured and shipped.
 Mass-market producers tried to win buyers with discounts that Barclays Plc estimated averaged 20 percent in Germany and 18 percent in France.
 In May, Apple agreed topay $3 billion to buy headphones and streaming-music serviceBeats Electronics LLC, the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 As activist investors amass more cash, many have pivoted toward buying smaller stakes in larger targets, instead of the more traditional 5 percent-plus stakes in smaller companies.
 The activist fund typically focuses on a small-cap activist strategy developed by Smith and Mark Mitchell since 2002 and Peter Feld since 2005 -- buying stakes in companies they call undervalued and pushing executives and directors for changes such as unit spinoffs and asset sales.
 dollar, you may buy bonds to take advantage of that,” said Allan von Mehren, chief analyst at Danske Bank A/S in Copenhagen.
 Investors are betting on growth, with 43 of 53 analysts recommending buying the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 These include Burger King Worldwide Inc’s deal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Lone Star Funds, the private-equity firm founded by billionaire John Grayken, agreed to buy 38 US.
 “We are now leveraging that brand equity to recycle capital while maintaining a long-term brand presence in multiple markets” Lone Star joins investors including Blackstone Group LP and Barry Sternlicht’s Starwood Capital Group in buying select-service hotels, which lack amenities such as restaurants and have limited service offerings.
 That could come from selling and using the cash to buy assets deemed safer, or just by holding onto the debt, based on its own favorable regulatory treatment.
 While buying old mortgages may not seem in line with Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac’s mission of fueling new lending, it can help encourage banks to retain loans and then to find new ones, according to Lawrence White, a professor at New York University’s Leonard N.
 Petersburg is reducing operations to one shift a day from two and offering voluntary buyout packages to about 500 hourly and salaried employees, Ruesselsheim, Germany-based Opel said today in a statement.
 Opel said it wants to avoid firings and that it’s offering a voluntary separation package that “is administratively and financially more attractive than the official redundancy package stipulated by Russian labor legislation” The carmaker said it will consider mass firings if not enough workers accept the buyout.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- American companies have seldom spent more money than they are now buying back shares.
 The ratio of buys to sells is near the lowest since 2000.
 “Who would know the business better than an executive in the middle of it? Even executives are buying on the corporate level, their hearts are not in it personally” Buying Stock Insiders buying stock have dropped 8 percent from a year ago, poised for the fewest in more than a decade, according to data compiled by Bloomberg and Bethesda, Maryland-based Washington Service.
 are among companies whose executives have done less buying even as corporate repurchases increased.
 “If management doesn’t feel confident enough about the future, they’re going to be net sellers” With sales growth running at an average 26 percent a quarter in the past two years and cash balances exceeding $1 trillion, chief executive officers are turning to stock buybacks to bolster per-share profit.
 Executives’ Preference “While we think an appropriate way to deploy excessive cash is through increasing dividends, many executives prefer cash buybacks because of the improvement to earnings per share that could be created,” Kristina Hooper, a US.
 The lost interest among executives “is likely concern about valuations, or at least a lack of seeing screaming buys as they have been,” she said.
 That’s his biggest disposal in the open market since 2004, excluding options-related and automatic sales, according to InsiderInsightscom, which analyzes insider transactionsIn June, Monsanto announced a $10 billion stock buyback plan.
 Stock Disposal Cisco in November announced $15 billion in buybacks and said last month that it plans to return a “minimum” 50 percent of its free cash flow to shareholders.
 The number of buyers almost tripled that of sellers in November 2008 and stayed higher in each of the following four months.
 Intel will employ 1,000 workers, the ministry said, and will also buy at least $550 million of Israeli products.
 Loan Scrutiny Lending to car-buyers with imperfect credit has come under federal scrutiny.
 It set cap-and-trade rules that let businesses buy pollution credits from companies that reduce emissions.
 Policy makers tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 “I will consider buying in the new issue if the pricing is right, though I would be a lot more likely to do so if the bonds contains step-up language in case of a downgrade to a junk rating,” Jan Hugo Simensen, an Oslo-based portfolio manager at DNB Asset Management AS, said in an interview.
 He sold about half his TDC bonds last week due to “rating concerns” after the company said it agreed to buy Norwegian cable provider Get AS for 138 billion kroner ($22 billion).
 TDC is buying Get to get add half a million Nordic cable customers as it struggles to raise revenue amid growing competition in the mobile market and tougher regulations.
 “Investors are increasingly requesting execution and routing information from their execution partners, but most buy-side firms lack the expertise to know exactly what to ask for, how to analyze the massive stream of information and -- more importantly -- how to interpret the results,” Chief Executive Officer Larry Tabb said in a statement.
 In 2013, 39 percent of first-time buyers used FHA loans, which generally require 35 percent down, compared with 56 percent in 2010, according to data from the National Association of Realtors.
 A dearth of first-time buyers is pushing down the national homeownership rate, which fell in the second quarter to its lowest level since 1995, according to Census Bureau data.
 Insurance Premiums Higher FHA mortgage insurance premiums are also depressing demand for its loans and the ability of homebuyers to qualify for them.
 Siemens AG Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser did just that in a deal to buy Dresser-Rand Group Inc, a US.
 “It’s always hard for management to justify accepting a merger over a cash offer to shareholders,” said Guenther Hollfelder, an analyst at Baader Bank in Munich who recommends buying Siemens stock.
 For a while, users could only buy Minecraft on Persson’s website, where it retailed for 15 euros.
 The targeted amount of the capital increase is guaranteedto be reached because Telefonica, which owns a 77 percent stake,will buy all the new shares to which it is entitled, and thebanks managing the offer agreed to purchase any shares notacquired, Telefonica Deutschland said.
 Following the July 2013agreement to buy E-Plus, the company said it would raise about37 billion euros in a rights issue.
 The Federal Reserve, which begins a two-day policy meeting tomorrow, is gauging the strength of the economy as it winds down a bond-buying program that’s on track to end this year.
 and European bonds and buy more debt of the largest emerging nations.
 “It will be difficult for Russia to stop buying US, European and Japanese bonds” The world’s biggest energy exporter is considering investing cash into bonds issued by BRICS members and should move money away from countries that imposed sanctions as punishment for its role in the Ukraine crisis, Finance Minister Anton Siluanov said Sept.
 BRICS debt is currently not eligible for either fund, which can only buy bonds from developed nations, including the US, UK, France and Canada.
 Fosun started buying Club Med shares in 2010 and began a strategic partnership with the operator to lure more Chinese vacationers to its resorts.
 has an “overweight” recommendation on Guinness Nigeria stock, implying that current holders should keep their shares and other investors shouldn’t buy, it said in an e-mailed statement.
 Istanbul-based Bank Asya swung between losses and gains of as much as 11 percent before Borsa Istanbul halted trading, saying “abnormal” buy and sell orders warranted the decision.
 In addition to Qatar Islamic’s failed takeover, local competitor TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against making a bid to buy the lender last month in favor of starting its own Shariah-compliant unit.
 (4568) agreed to buyUS-based Ambit Biosciences Corp.
 Blockbuster Deals Global pharmaceutical companies have announced a string ofdeals this year, pruning underperforming businesses and makingacquisitions in areas where demand for medicines is growingNovartis AG (NOVN) in April agreed to buy GlaxoSmithKline Plc (GSK)’s cancerdrug business for as much as $16 billion, form a consumer-healthventure with Glaxo and sell its animal-health unit to Eli Lilly& Co.
 (ABBV) agreed to buy Shire Plc (SHP) forabout 32 billion pounds ($52 billion) in July.
 Shoppers are making fewer trips to stores, and when they do buy, they aren’t going for impulse purchases.
 To prepare for the increase in online buying, shipping companies are beefing up their seasonal labor force.
 “I buy stuff online because I don’t have the time,” said Coomber, the co-founder of Birdling Bags, a maker of weekender bags for families.
 Oi has hired Banco BTG Pactual SA to look at strategic options to buy Telecom Italia’s Tim stake.
 Policy makers reduced borrowing costs further earlier this month and committed to buying asset-backed securities and covered bonds to boost the ECB’s balance sheet by as much as 1 trillion euros ($13 trillion).
 The decision to buy covered bonds, assets the ECB already bought between 2009 and 2012, was also driven by concern over volumes, Visco said.
 Hanssem Co, the nation’s biggest furniture retailer, attracted unanimous buy ratings from 16 brokerages as it surged 206 percent in the 12 months through last week, more than any other company in the benchmark Kospi index with a market value of at least $2 billion.
 Buy Ratings The company lost its unanimous buy record at the end of last week when Eva Dimensions, a Locust Valley, New York-based research company, cut its rating to neutral.
 Hanssem’s consensus recommendation of 49, on a Bloomberg scale where 5 represents all buys, remains among the highest of the 113 biggest companies on the Kospi.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Sky Deutschland AG said investors should reject a buyout offer by British Sky Broadcasting Group Plc, calling the price agreed by its controlling shareholder 21st Century Fox Inc.
 Yizheng said it then plans to buy Sinopec Oilfield Service Corp.
 The company, which manufactures and distributes polyester chips, staple fiber, hollow fiber and polyester filament, said it plans to cancel the 242 billion A shares it’s buying from Sinopec Corp.
 High Rates Shrinking demand from China, the biggest buyer of South African raw materials, is raising concern the nation’s current-account deficit will widen as exports decline, hurting the rand and outweighing the lure of relatively high interest rates.
 The central bank said July 30 it will probably keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after ending its bond-buying program.
 “The company might want to not be too aggressive on pricing so it can still have some upside after the listing” The company is embarking on the second week of its global tour to meet with investors in Asia and Europe as it seeks to convince funds to buy into its offering.
 A group of investors led by the New York-based fund yesterday agreed to buy the Latvian government’s 75 percent stake in Citadele Banka AS, the Baltic nation’s fifth-biggest lender by deposits, for an undisclosed price.
 JPMorgan raised its rating on the producer of security scanners to overweight, similar to buy, from neutral.
 Icahn buys positions in companies he considers to be under-performing and then pushes for change.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Robert Bosch GmbH plans to buy full control of its home-appliance venture from partner Siemens AG for 3 billion euros ($386 billion) as the German manufacturer pushes to make more consumer products with Internet links.
 The business will continue using the Siemens brand for “the long term” The agreement is Bosch’s second in a week to buy out a joint venture partner, following a deal to gain full control of a car steering-systems producer from ZF Friedrichshafen AG.
 The buyout poses “no problem” financially for closely held Bosch, which has 14 billion euros in liquidity, Chief Financial Officer Stefan Asenkerschbaumer said on the call.
 ZF is selling its half of the steering-systems manufacturer to reduce antitrust issues as the Friedrichshafen, Germany-based company bids $117 billion to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 With Alibaba, “people got their allocations and they’re just dumping their Yahoo shares because that trade is kind of unwinding now,” said Doshi, who rates Alibaba a buy and has the equivalent of a hold on Yahoo.
 Bruce Bittles, chief investment strategist at Milwaukee-based RW Baird & Co, which oversees $110 billion, said Yahoo declined as people “buy the rumor, sell the news” “I’d expect them to be down today,” he said yesterday.
 Internet/Trademark Twitter Testing ‘Buy’ Button as E-Commerce Plans Take Shape For Twitter Inc, a tweet will soon be more than a form ofcommunication or an ad -- it will be an invitation to buy.
 The microblogging company is testing a “buy” button soconsumers can purchase directly from tweets posted on itsservice.
 “There are only a handful of potential buyers with the resources to grow Minecraft on a scale that it deserves,” Owen Hill, a spokesman for Mojang, said in a posting on its website.
 For a while, users could only buy Minecraft on Persson’s website, where it retailed for 15 euros.
 “It’s about my sanity” Microsoft’s Risk Microsoft takes the risk that it is buying Minecraft at the height of its popularity and that Mojang, without the founders, may not grow rapidly or produce lucrative sequels, Ives said in an interview last week.
 agreed to acquire Nobel Biocare Holding AG for $22 billion after the Swiss maker of dental implants searched for a buyer amid a wave of consolidation in the health industry.
 Danaher, an industrial conglomerate with products ranging from laboratory equipment to water-treatment chemicals, is buying a business whose sales still haven’t recovered from the recession and financial crisis that began in 2008.
 “For Nobel Biocare shareholders, it’s still an attractive price compared with the share price of recent years” Inviting Bids Nobel Biocare was initially approached by Swedish buyout firm EQT with an offer of about 17 francs a share, Bloomberg News reported in August, citing people with knowledge of the matter who didn’t want to be identified.
 Zimmer agreed to buy Biomet in April.
 The purchase brings the value of announced acquisitions of health-products companies this year to $81 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg, led by Medtronic Inc’s agreement to buy Covidien Plc for $429 billion.
 The European Central Bank this month cut rates and said it will start buying debt to add to stimulus.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 As the buying power of emerging nations grows, an ever increasing number of cars could become a burden on society, he said.
 Solar Power is buying a special purpose vehicle that ownsthe rights to the projects.
 The DVR “has been slowing growth for 10 years’ The majority of VOD viewing takes place after those three days, when advertisers are less likely to buy commercials.
 It continues to rack up viewership as the show moves forward” The delayed viewing may also be saving shows that would otherwise be canceled, according to Billie Gold, vice president and director of TV programming research at Carat, a media planning and buying unit of Denstu Inc.
 In the preliminary prospectus, the carrier had said it will buy a maximum of nine Airbus Group NV’s A320 aircraft and three A320 simulators.
 26 that it agreed to buy Tim Hortons for more than $11 billion.
 Omaha, Nebraska-based Berkshire will earn 9 percent annual interest on its investment and gets the option to buy a 175 percent stake in the combined company.
 Pfizer abandoned abid to buy the UK’s AstraZeneca Plc in May, while peoplefamiliar with the matter said it has approached Actavis Plc toexpress an interest in an acquisition.
 Before that, it bought most of its cars from automakers that agreed to buy them back at a set age and price.
 The car-rentals business will keep the name Hertz and get cash proceeds of about $25 billion to pay down debt and support a $1 billion share buyback, Hertz has said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- BASF SE’s oil and gas arm agreed to buy assets from Norway’s Statoil ASA for $125 billion, diversifying energy supplies for Germany’s biggest chemical maker as relations between Europe and Russia worsen.
 “A re-rating could happen if the market buys into the management teams and strategies, but it will take time,” said Hanre Rossouw, commodities chief for emerging markets at Cape Town-based Investec Asset Management, which manages $123 billion including AngloGold shares.
 It won’t buy gold assets outside South Africa.
 “We’re getting closer to an endto tapering and the raising of interest rates in the US, sothis yen weakening is set to continue” While the Bank of Japan maintained an unprecedented levelof stimulus as Asia’s second-largest economy weakened, theFederal Reserve has been winding back its stimulatory bondbuying program this year and is due to report on the outlook formonetary policy next week.
 Merchants who fund and then buy the crop “don’t give a damn about deforestation,” Moyo said.
 What small-scale guy is going to plant trees on his measly two hectares, then wait five or 10 years to harvest the wood for curing?” ‘Strongly Urge’ Tobacco buyers including Mashonaland Tobacco Co, Tobacco Processors Zimbabwe Ltd, Alliance One Inc and Universal’s Zimbabwe Leaf Tobacco declined to comment.
 Still, the Harare-based Sustainable Afforestation Programme, funded by the tobacco-buying companies, says it plans to spend $335 million over the next seven years replanting about 5,000 hectares of trees a year.
 Jose Galindo, 36, sitting on the floor of a United terminal at O’Hare, said, “there’s thousands of people trying to purchase a ticket” Galindo has been trying to buy a ticket online after his Delta Air Lines Inc.
 Three rate the stock hold, while one advises clients to buy the stock.
 BlackBerry has four buys, 24 holds and 10 sells, with an average 12-month price target of C$968, implying a 17 percent decline from current levels, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 urged investors to buy.
 Not Donations Speaking fees aren’t campaign donations, but they can buy influence, says Craig Holman, a government affairs lobbyist for Public Citizen, a watchdog group in Washington.
 experiment with drones and thousands of people buy small, easy-to-fly unmanned copters, the FAA remains wary and hasn’t permitted commercial flights outside Alaska.
 advanced 48 percent after Deutsche Bank AG recommended buying the sports lottery website.
 The groups had traveled from New York, about two hours away by car, to buy the iPhone 6 and iPhone 6 Plus in order to resell them in China for large markups, said David Hartman, a police spokesman.
 The lines also attracted a swell of tourists looking to buy handsets that aren’t available yet back home.
 Global investors have been buying Treasuries as the European Central Bank has cut interest rates and taken other steps to spur economic growth in the region, while turmoil in Ukraine has also enhanced the refuge appeal.
 “Panasonic was a very interesting buy before they made the hard decisions to restructure,” said Brian Barish, president of Denver-based Cambiar Investors LLC, which oversees $115 billion in assets and bought Sony this year.
 Kumho Petrochemical said in an e-mailed statement that the group ordered affiliates including the petrochemical company in 2009 to buy commercial papers issued by Kumho Industrial and Kumho Tire just before the two companies entered debt rescheduling programs.
 Fed Meeting Fed policy makers begin a two-day meeting today as they wind down a bond-buying program and consider when to start raising interest rates.
 In addition to the liquidity support, the ECB will also start buying asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 2, the ECB is scheduled to announce further details of its ABS plan, including more specifics on the kinds of assets it intends to buy.
 Gonzalez-Paramo said buying securities backed by residential real-estate loans, or RMBS, is a good way to generate as much cash as possible for banks to lend.
 “If done right, this transaction could springboard both entities into more competitive players in their respective industries,” said RJ Hottovy, an analyst at Morningstar Inc, who has a buy rating on EBay.
 Photographer: Ian Waldie/Bloomberg A prospective buyer holds a brochure after inspecting a house for sale in the suburb of Eastwood in Sydney, Australia.
 Close A prospective buyer holds a brochure after inspecting a house for sale in the suburb of.
 Read More Close Open Photographer: Ian Waldie/Bloomberg A prospective buyer holds a brochure after inspecting a house for sale in the suburb of Eastwood in Sydney, Australia.
 Commonwealth Bank, Westpac, ANZ and National Australiawere each rated a buy on average by a third of the analysts asof Sept.
 For Ang, if the price is right, buy and if the price is right, sell” San Miguel rose 04 percent to 8040 pesos at the close of trading in Manila, its highest price since July 25.
 (WB), the largestmicroblogging site in China, surged in New York after THCapital recommended buying the stock, saying investors areoverestimating the threat from competing services.
 Hou wrote in a reportyesterday, initiating coverage with a buy rating.
 The Passport is BlackBerry’s first major new device introduced globally since Chen was named CEO in November, the same day that a planned buyout of the company collapsed.
 “It makes perfect sense why Vodafone would buy cable,” Fries said.
 Vodafone then went on to buy Spanish broadband company Grupo Corporativo Ono SA this year.
 For its part, Liberty agreed to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV in January and a stake in ITV Plc, the UK’s biggest commercial broadcaster, in July.
 carrier to post a quarterly loss this year, is offering its flight attendants buyouts of as much as $100,000 as it seeks to rein in costs.
 The Association of Flight Attendants was involved in the buyout discussions and jointly issued news of it yesterday.
 The buyout was offered to members of both groups, in seniority order.
 utility owner, agreed to buy solar power projects under construction in California from a US.
 Power from Catalina will be sold to an unnamed buyer under a 20-year agreement.
 At yesterday’s prices, buyingthat New York-Los Angeles round trip for tonight in businessclass would have run about $5,200.
 said in March 2013 underwriting guidelines that leverage levels of more than six times “raises concerns” The acquisition, which is backed in part by a $3 billion preferred equity investment by billionaire investor Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, would be the largest restaurant leveraged buyout in US.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Norway’s sovereign-wealth fund, the world’s largest, agreed to buy stakes in three prime US.
 The fund earlier this month agreed to buy a 499 percent stake in San Francisco’s Orrick Building, also known as Foundry Square II, through a venture with asset manager TIAA-CREF.
 from buying Office Depot Inc.
 “Today is a very sad day for our customers and staff” PriceWaterhouseCoopers LLP was today named as the company’s administrator and said its initial focus was to find a buyer.
 Buyout Talks As Vodafone and EE negotiated for new contracts with Phones 4u, the companies briefly considered buying out the stores before deciding that a bid would be too complex, both companies said today.
 Some fixed-income funds buy longer-term government bonds as a month ends to align the interest-rate sensitivity of their holdings with their benchmark indexes.
 The agreements signal talks are heating up to restructure about $12 billion of bonds as the company struggles to service debt taken on in its 2008 buyout by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
Vodafone Group Plc (VOD) has agreed tobuy 140 of Phones 4u’s UK.
 PwC said yesterday that there are potential buyers for theretailer’s insurance business and that New York-based AssurantInc.
 Diverging Policy In contrast, Bank of Japan officials retained a pledge tobuy 60 trillion yen ($548 billion) to 70 trillion yen of assetsa year to help spur inflation, at a gathering this monthEuropean Central Bank policy makers next meet on Oct.
 agreed to buy a 49 percent stake as part of a revenue-sharing alliance.
 In the Mong Kok district, a popular shopping destinationfor tourists, an electronics store offered to buy an iPhone 6for at least HK$10,000 and an iPhone 6 Plus for HK$12,000.
 on forming a $26 billion fundand Morgan Stanley’s $17 billion Asia buyout fund.
 Shipping aircraft on schedule is crucial because buyers usually pay most of the purchase price upon delivery.
 Of the 25 analysts who cover the stock for financial firms, 11 rate it hold, four say sell and 10 buy.
 Only one of the plane’s 12 named firm buyers, Deutsche Lufthansa AG, ranks among the world’s top 20 by passenger traffic.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- China, the world’s biggest buyer of iron ore, will soak up excess global seaborne supplies of the steel-making material as it sustains demand even amid an economic downturn, according to Vale SA.
 Earlier this week, Microsoft said it would buy Mojang AB, the maker of the Minecraft video game, for $25 billion, in Nadella’s first deal as CEO.
 Bernstein & Co, who rates the stock the equivalent of a buy.
 Arizona Border Losses to local businesses have kept rising as buyers shun harvests and dairy products from seven villages along the river, about 30 miles from Arizona’s border.
 “He told us our milk was contaminated and he wouldn’t buy another liter” Grupo Mexico is also facing a lawsuit from the state civil protection agency, headed by Carlos Arias.
 Whether people return to buy Corrales’s peanuts or Corella’s milk remains uncertain.
 Individuals can buy as much as 30 percent of the shares, giving them the chance to bet on the world’s second-best performing stock market this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The days of ads bought over the phone are fading asadvertising agencies and publishers automate the process and usedetailed consumer data to target individuals ready to buy, Magnasaid in a forecast released today.
 By 2018, almost 40 percent ofInternet display ads will be sold on exchanges matching buyersand sellers.
 Magna Global is a research and media-buying segment of NewYork-based advertising agency Interpublic Group of Cos.
 “Thevote clears up a lot of uncertainties and will put investorsinto the mood for buying risk” Contingent capital bonds can typically be written down orconverted to equity when the issuer’s Tier 1 capital falls to apreset level.
 Coca-Cola, the world’s largest beverage company, last month agreed to swap some brands and buy a 17 percent stake in Monster for about $215 billion to increase its bet on the burgeoning $40 billion global energy-drink market.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Iron Mountain Inc, the Boston-based data storage and information management company, is considering an offer to buy Recall Holdings Ltd.
 Recall shares pared some of their earlier gains after the company denied being in talks with Iron Mountain or any other buyer.
 is taking on at least 50,000 more to ensure people get their iPhones and foot massagers on time even as consumers tempt fate by waiting later and later to buy online.
 Still, the software snafus haven’t been enough to discourage iPhone buyers.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Huntsman Corp, the chemical maker that agreed to buy Rockwood Holdings Inc’s titanium dioxide assets for $105 billion, won European Commission antitrust approval to complete the deal once a printing-ink unit is sold.
 Gustavo Galindo, a New York-based portfolio manager who helps oversee more than $10 billion of emerging-market assets at Russell Investments, said buying the auto websites fits with a broader trend of investors seeking to tap the increase in consumer spending as well as high rates of Internet usage in China.
 Biggest Lender UBA Plc, Nigeria’s fourth-biggest lender by market value, granted $700 million in loans to several investors, including Transnational, which got $215 million to buy Ughelli Power, the country’s second-biggest gas-fueled plant with capacity for 900 megawatts.
 of Nigeria, or Amcon, to buy bad debts from lenders and save the financial system from collapse.
 Amcon said last month it won’t buy any more bad debts from lenders.
 “If these interventions allow the declaration of the Transitional Electricity Market, then they may have averted a crisis” The bailout will enable an October start to the electricity market, where generators and distributors can buy and sell energy in a process mediated by the Nigeria Bulk Electricity Trader, according to a timetable set by regulators.
 4, when the region’s central bank unexpectedly cut interest rates and announced a plan to buy securitized debt.
 lost a bid to block buyers of $10 billion worth of residential mortgage-backed securities it packaged in 2007 to proceed as a group with their lawsuit alleging the bank misled them.
 In June 2013, it agreed a $1 billion deal to buy pharmaceutical assets from US.
 “Everybody worries about losing money, but as long as I don’t invest too much I am not worried about it” Individual investors like Al Hadrani can together buy as much as 30 percent of the shares in the initial public offering, with the rest earmarked for institutions.
 Of the 50analysts that cover the Seoul-based carmaker, 94 percent had abuy rating on the stock before yesterday’s announcement, thehighest proportion of any carmaker tracked by Bloomberg.
 16 through yesterday -- the proportionof buys on Hyundai Motor had never dipped below 87 percent andsometimes went as high as 100 percent, according to datacompiled by Bloomberg.
 “This is like throwing cold water at investors and whatHyundai is basically saying is that they’d rather buy realestate than pay dividends,” said Bruce Lee, chief executiveofficer at Zebra Investment Management in Seoul.
 The stock rallied on July 24, when the company announced that it was approached by a potential buyer.
 CEO Sol Trujillo get financing to buy a stake in Telecom Italia, Fossati said he doesn’t have details about Trujillo’s plan.
 The volume Pemex may buy wouldn’t dent the oversupply of US.
 Before buying shares in Alibaba, however, investors must weigh the risks.
 It begins with a history of the company’s beginning as a marketplace to connect buyers and sellers.
 The European Central Bank is taking the opposite path, announcing a plan to buy securitized debt and keeping rates low until inflation increases toward its target.
 4 and said it will start buying securitized debt.
 Benmosche announced a deal last month to buy a unitfrom Ageas Group for about $305 million to expand in UK.
 “Priorities have changed” from the time when buying a car was a yearned-for rite of passage, said Paola Franco, 44, who views her 28-mile London commute as more or less wasted time.
 “Issuance is starting to come back to life as companies get enough investor attention to sell bonds” Investors submitted bids valued at 475 billion rubles, and the notes were sold to a single buyer, according to the ministry and data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The casino company has struggled to service the debt it took on as part of its 2008 buyout by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Houston Foods Inc, a fast-food franchisee in Texas, plans to buy about 260 Burger King locations owned by Blackstone Group LP’s Heartland Food Corp.
 Last month, Carrols Restaurant Group Inc, the largest Burger King franchisee, said it was buying 64 of Heartland’s restaurants in Tennessee, Indiana and Illinois for about $18 million.
 The company agreed last month to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 Shoukat Dhanani, chief executive officer of Houston Foods, declined to comment on buying Heartland’s stores.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Gol Linhas Aereas Inteligentes SA, Brazil’s biggest airline, is looking at buying Embraer SA’s upgraded regional jets to add to its current all-Boeing Co.
 Gol parked its wide-body 767s earlier this decade and, after agreeing to buy discounter Webjet in 2011, handed back that carrier’s older 737s to lessors.
 Brookstone, meanwhile, filed for bankruptcy this year and was then purchased by Chinese buyers.
 Companies that perform security and performance tasks associated with their websites today must either ask a third-party company for help or buy hardware and put it in their data centers.
 started coverage of 21Vianet today with a buy rating.
 The company has the fourth-best recommendation consensus among regional peers in the Internet software and services industry, with nine buys and one hold, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 trading on concern the new price incentives that the Chinese real estate website is offering homebuyers will erode profits.
 SouFun started a promotion last week offering buyers who purchase houses through its website as much as 150,000 yuan ($24,431) in assistance to cover their mortgage interest, renovation and management fees, details posted on the Beijing-based company’s website show.
 The incentives are part of an effort to lure buyers as home sales in China plunged 105 percent in the first seven months of the year.
 “The weakness in the property market forced SouFun to offer this type of promotion to encourage people to buy homes, which will pressure its margins,” Henry Guo, an analyst at JG Capital, said by phone from San Francisco.
 More than 10,000 home buyers have submitted applications to SouFun for the incentives, according to the information on its website.
 Many plane buyers don’t bother with international Wi-Fi because current offerings are so “sketchy,” said Greg Raiff, chief executive officer at consultant Private Jet Services Group LLC.
 The son of a Lebanese immigrant, Slim built his fortune by buying the government-run telephone utility in a privatization sale and then keeping his hammerlock on Mexico’s telecommunications industry, with a 70 percent share of the country’s mobile-phone market and 80 percent of fixed lines.
 Both companies service casino floors, so you’ll have a network of service” Casino Mergers GCA’s offer follows a wave of mergers in the casino industry, including Gtech SpA’s agreement to buy International Game Technology for $47 billion in July.
 Robert Shore, an analyst at Union Gaming Group LLC, said it’s not a surprise that there’s another deal pending -- yet he’s surprised to see GCA as the buyer.
 Oracle also said it would buy back $13 billion instock.
 More recently, Oracle in June agreed to buyhospitality software maker Micros Systems Inc.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- For Twitter Inc, a tweet will soon be more than a form of communication or an ad -- it will be an invitation to buy.
 The San Francisco-based microblogging company is testing a “buy” button so consumers can purchase directly from tweets posted on its service.
 The buy button will also help demonstrate the influence of a tweet in directly driving sales for businesses.
 Facebook’s Button Rival Facebook Inc, which is also testing a buy button on its ads, has tried several commerce tools on its website with little success.
 Hubbard, the former president of Live Nation Entertainment Inc’s Ticketmaster, who was hired last year before Twitter’s November initial public offering, said the company will use the test to determine what kinds of posts are most successful in getting people to buy.
 Twitter is starting by setting up the buy button for celebrities, musical artists, non-profits and brands that already influence their followers with 140-character updates, such as Pharrell and Burberry Group Plc.
 In July, Twitter agreed to buy San Francisco-based Cardspring Inc, which lets users redeem deals and discounts through merchants’ tweets.
 private in a $11 billion buyout of the distributor of janitorial, plumbing and lighting products.
 Once shareholders buy more than 5 percent of a company’s stock, they’re required to flag any intention to engage with corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 Earnings of Hong Kong developers are being buoyed this year by higher residential sales as buyers, deterred by government curbs aimed to cool prices, are lured back by discounts and low mortgage rates.
 Executives have said the brand will add a flagship sedan, to be built at the Detroit-Hamtramck assembly plant that makes the Chevrolet Volt plug-in hybrid, and that the CTS may add features such as heated seats to lower-level versions next year to attract more buyers.
 “They are taking the cash and buying all these peripheral bonds that have a lot of spread on them relative to Treasuries,” a trend that is occurring across the money-management industry, said Erik Schiller, a Newark, New Jersey-based senior money manager at Prudential Fixed Income.
 Federal Reserve signaled it would phase out its bond-buying program, sparking 16 straight months of net redemptions through August.
 Since July, the Istanbul-based bank’s talks with Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ for a buyout deal failed and state-run TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against a takeover.
 The nation’s top producer may buy half a million metric tons a month of the steelmaking ingredient, according to two people, who asked not to be identified as they aren’t authorized to speak to the media.
 The Prague-based company’s Chief Executive Officer Daniel Benes sent a letter to Slovak Economy Minister Pavol Pavlis requesting a meeting to discuss the possibility of buying a stake in the utility, where the state has a minority holding, the minister said today in Bratislava.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Computer Sciences Corp, a technology consultant for governments and companies, has contacted private-equity firms including Blackstone Group LP and Bain Capital LLC to gauge their interest in a leveraged buyout, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 If it goes private, CSC’s would be the largest leveraged buyout since Michael Dell and Silver Lake Management LLC acquired Dell Inc.
 Lawrie is arguing that buyers could benefit as the reorganization continues, the person said.
 Private-equity funds view Falls Church, Virginia-based CSC as a potentially cheap buyout based on enterprise value to earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, though are concerned by its cash flow and slower-growth business units, one person said.
 The buyout funds are once again spending billions on enterprise technology businesses.
 announced yesterday it reached a deal to be bought by Vista Equity Partners for $43 billion, following Compuware Corp’s $25 billion buyout by Thoma Bravo LLC earlier this month.
 A deal could be structured where the businesses are split, with a private-equity firm buying one unit and a strategic suitor buying the other, one of the people said.
 This is at least the third time since 2005 that CSC has fielded interest from possible buyers.
 Prime Minister Shinzo Abe has been seeking to spur better returns by having the fund buy more risky assets.
 Other buyers followed, momentum built, and the stock ended the day as one of only two gainers in the Nikkei 225 Stock Average.
 Pushed by Prime Minister Shinzo Abe, the Bank of Japan flooded the market with cash via an asset-buying program.
 The most-leveraged trader used a cash deposit of 20 million yen to buy and sell 4 billion yen worth of equities in a single day, according to Warita.
 In the same way, even the savviest investor has a built-in bias for buying when stocks fall and selling when they go up.
 While Della Valle’s plans for Hogan include expanding its network of 10 directly-operated stores in China and diversifying into leather goods, “we remain skeptical on the brand’s ability to rapidly become a global brand,” wrote Chauvet, who recommends buying Tod’s shares.
 The Italian company may also buy back the license for the Roger Vivier brand from Della Valle ahead of its renewal due in December 2016, Chauvet said, citing management.
 “We think there will be a robust level of interest” from buyers, Kieselstein told the court.
 and Blackstone Group LP are among seven firms to win preliminary approval of a $5905 million settlement with investors claiming they held down leveraged buyout prices.
 The original complaint listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies of billions of dollars by colluding to suppress takeover bids.
 The settlement class includes anyone who sold or exchanged stock as part of the leveraged buyout of businesses including the cinema operator AMC Entertainment Inc, the food-service business Aramark Corp.
 Ares, co-founded in 1997 by billionaire Tony Ressler, isnow buying less than 20 percent of new loan offerings -- theirlowest rate of purchase since the last peak -- because most ofit’s too risky for the yields being offered, according toMargolies.
 Ares bought the $24 billion portfolio from Merrill Lynchat roughly 87 cents on the dollar after Margolies, whounderwrote loans and bonds backing more than $100 billion ofbuyouts in 2007, ran an auction process dubbed “ProjectBaseball” because it was conducted during the 2008 summerbaseball season.
 The Web portal would bolster Yahoo’s video and editorial content and is a better option than buying a “high-priced startup,” he said.
 Starboard Strategy Founded in March 2011, Starboard typically focuses on a small-cap activist strategy developed by Smith and Mark Mitchell since 2002 and Peter Feld since 2005 -- buying stakes in companies they call undervalued and pushing executives and directors for changes such as unit spinoffs and asset sales.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 It’s a hugeshift” Corridore rates the shares buy; Heymann rates themas market perform.
 buyout firm Apollo Management International LLP to buy 80 percent of insurer Fidelidade-Companhia de Seguros SA from the Portuguese government.
 “You have to show success and theway you show success so you can keep raising money is by sellingan investment at a high price in a high market or you gopublic” Blackstone created Invitation Homes, based in Dallas, bybuying foreclosed homes at auction after the housing marketcollapsed.
 It has spent more than $8 billion buying andrenovating properties.
 The firm acquired 20 million square feet (19million square meters) of prime industrial properties inCalifornia by buying debt on the assets at discounts.
 Equity Office Blackstone used a different strategy to exit its other bigboom-era real estate deal, the $39 billion buyout of billionaireSam Zell’s Equity Office Properties Trust, then the largest USoffice landlord.
 ‘Treasure Island’ Bloomberg News, citing a person with knowledge of the matter, was the first to report last year that the CFTC found evidence traders at Wall Street banks instructed ICAP brokers to buy or sell as many interest-rate swaps as necessary to rig ISDAfix by moving it to a predetermined level.
 People applying for a loan to buy a second home may get lower down payments and mortgage rates that were previously only available to first-time home buyers so long as they have paid off their initial mortgage, the People’s Bank of China said in a statement on its website yesterday.
 The central bank also eased a ban on mortgages for people buying a third home.
 Under existing rules, first-home buyers need to pay a 30 percent down payment, rather than at least 60 percent required for a second home.
 Banks should decide “prudently” on the down payment and interest rates for loans to applicants buying a third home, the central bank said in the statement.
 “If you are InBev looking to truly build a global brewer, which they have been doing in recent years, the next asset that ABI would want to buy is SAB” Shea estimates such a deal would be valued at about $90 billion after a 25 percent premium.
 Silbert started buying bitcoins in February 2013, when the price was about $22, at the urging of his younger brother Barry, chairman of SecondMarket Inc, a New York–based brokerage specializing in hard-to-trade assets.
 ‘Big Void’ “At that point, you could only use bitcoins to buy T-shirts, coffee mugs and alpaca socks,” Alan says.
 The listing was up on BitPremier for just a week before the eventual buyer, based in Texas, approached Tome.
 “People who hold enough bitcoins to make them a potential buyer have drunk the Kool-Aid, and they’re in it for the long haul,” he says.
 Those who think bitcoins are fool’s gold should know that they can be used to buy the real thing.
 Coles says he has sent out detailed information on the mine to four potential buyers who have subsequently signed nondisclosure agreements.
 investors won a bid to fast-track suits opposing rival Dollar Tree Inc’s $85 billion buyout bid for the discount chain that is also being pursued by Dollar General Corp.
 Family Dollar’s push to close the Dollar Tree deal by November leaves disgruntled shareholders with a “little over two months” to have their challenge to the buyout heard, Donald Enright, a lawyer for Family Dollar investors, told Bouchard at a hearing in Wilmington, Delaware.
 The ruling comes as Goodlettsville, Tennessee-based Dollar General announced today that it was taking its buyout offer directly to Family Dollar shareholders and that it could overcome antitrust concerns about the merger, which would create a discount retail chain with 20,000 locations.
 “Certainly that is what the price of their bonds is implying” Factory Backlog The dollar securities traded at 98 cents in March 2013 before plans to raise funds in the bond market fell through when Impsa couldn’t drum up enough buyers at an interest rate of 1125 percent.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- BNP Paribas SA will consider buying equity and commodity derivatives from competitors to help lift earnings at the securities unit, said Yann Gerardin, who will lead the investment bank starting next month.
 Gerardin, who joined the company in 1987 to create its equity derivatives business, has built that unit out by buying assets from Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc and Credit Agricole SA in the past year.
 BNP Paribas agreed to buy RBS’s equity derivatives unit in February after reaching a similar deal with Credit Agricole in October.
 Scotland has about 43 percent of the UK’s wind powercapacity and exports a quarter of its electricity, relying on anationwide system obligating utilities to buy clean energy tosupport the industry.
 and Canada to have that kind of oil ultimately come from Canada than from just about all the other places the oil is presently coming from” Harper touted the country’s low business tax rates and waded into the controversial decision by Burger King to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 “The big trend is the streetwear, and that’s what this company is executing toward,” said Anna Andreeva, a New York-based analyst at Oppenheimer & Co, who recommends buying the shares.
 Last month, Wilson agreed to sell half his stake in the retailer to Advent for $845 million and to forgo pursuing a buyout for at least a year.
 “They’ll be additive to the board and discussions,” said Tubin, who recommends buying the shares.
 After years of struggling to find a buyer, the Brussels-based bank announced last December an agreement to sell it to Yinren, a Chinese group that trades diamonds.
 Requirements to buy from the Anglo American Plc unit will include maximum debt-to-equity ratios and an audit of their books.
 Central bank officials tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion last week in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the program in October.
 will be pressured to boost a $3 billion share buyback that disappointed investors last month after activist hedge fund Jana Partners LLC struck a deal yesterday on three board seats at the US.
 The settlement, which immediately added Jana founder Barry Rosenstein to the board, comes after Walgreen last month agreed to buy the rest of European health and beauty chain Alliance Boots GmbH for $153 billion.
 Bigger Buyback Walgreen shareholders, including Jana, are seeking to increase the buyback by at least several billion dollars.
 “The buyback was smaller than expected and, historically, they’ve kept an extremely conservative balance sheet,” said Jeff Jonas, associated portfolio manager at Gabelli Funds, a Walgreen shareholder, in an interview before Jana won the board seats.
 Along with buying the rest of Alliance Boots, Walgreen last month cut its adjusted earnings forecast by about $2 billion and said it wouldn’t move its legal address abroad for a lower tax rate.
 Credit Rating Walgreen officials said in August that they didn’t offer a bigger buyback because they wanted to reserve money for deals and protect the company’s credit rating.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Hidili Industry International Development Ltd, the Chinese coal miner at risk of defaulting on its debt, got fewer offers than it sought in a bond buyback.
 Separately, bondholders with 853 percent of the notes agreed to let Hidili loosen some of the debt covenants, including those who accepted the buyback offer, according to the statement.
 The buyback follows similar repurchase programs by other cash-strapped companies including China Forestry Holdings Co.
 Hidili earlier this month said it would pay noteholders 68 cents on the dollar to buy back the securities, as well as a two cent fee for consenting to amend the notes’ terms.
 17 that banks are funding the majority of the buyback because its weakening creditworthiness has made it harder to refinance in the global debt capital markets.
 17 by the most on record after the buyback announcement.
 One said a double-match would “smack of buying off the contributor,” noting it could open the door to 5-to-1 matching or more.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Bank of Montreal, Canada’s fourth-largest lender by assets, plans to sell as much as $400 million in buyout fund stakes as competition fuels rising prices, according to four people with knowledge of the deal.
 The bank is seeking to sell mostly North American buyout stakes in as much as 50 funds, said the people, who asked not to be named because the information is private.
 Mizuho Financial Group Inc, Japan’s third-largest bank, is selling stakes in buyout funds valued at about $1 billion, two people with knowledge of the matter said earlier this month.
 BMO Financial has backed New York-based Halyard Capital, which makes middle-market buyout investments in media, communications and business services.
 The average winning bid for holdings of buyout funds rose to equal the net value of assets in the first half of 2014 from a low of 40 percent in the same period of 2009, according to data compiled by investment bank Cogent Partners.
Chinese consumers will get theirfirst shot at legally buying game consoles today after a 14-yearban, as Microsoft Corp.
 Even if people buy the console, the content they want toplay needs to also get through censorship” Console makers trying to sell their machines in China areup against a generation of gamers used to playing free online(although they pay for virtual items).
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Chinese purchases of Hong Kong stocks through a planned exchange link may exceed estimates as individual investors buy casino and technology shares unavailable in Shanghai, according to Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 “We might be surprised by retail participation once the stock connect is launched, given mainland investors’ preference to invest and trade themselves instead of buying mutual funds,” Christina Ma, the head of Goldman’s cash trading, equities in Asia Pacific ex-Japan, said in an interview in Hong Kong on Sept.
 added 49 percent after the e-commerce business agreed to buy US shopping-site operator Ebates Inc.
 economy continues to improve, the Japanese economy will benefit given that Japan has a large number of exporters” The Topix rebounded 15 percent from an April 14 low amid optimism about the global economy and speculation the $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 The Fed is gauging the strength of the economy as it winds down a bond-buying program and considers the timing of raising rates.
 The firm will pay $1 billion in cash for all of Ebates, a San Francisco-based website operator that offers cash back to customers who buy products ranging from laptops to lipstick from its retail partners.
 The retailer traces its roots to Minnesota railway agentRichard Sears buying a load of watches being returned to theirmaker in 1886, according to its website.
 Allergan approached Salix about buying the drugmaker because purchasing a sizable competitor could help Allergan defend itself against Valeant by making it a much more expensive target.
 Meanwhile, Actavis Plc also is interested in buying Allergan and approached the company in August, a person familiar with the matter said.
 “Withthe exchange connect coming closer, the market is expectingforeign investors” to buy Chinese shares, he said.
 It will reject bids deemed too far below prevailingshare prices as authorities seek to prevent investors from“hogging” the daily quota of buy orders available for cross-border trades.
 “We’re getting closer to an endto tapering and the raising of interest rates in the US, sothis yen weakening is set to continue” The Topix rebounded 15 percent from its April 14 lowthrough yesterday amid optimism about the global economy andspeculation the $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fundwill buy more domestic shares.
 The silver slump hasn’t deterred buyers of ETPs backed by the metal.
 “Unlike gold, buyers of silver ETFs are not the momentum players,” said Peter Jankovskis, who helps oversee $31 billion as co-chief investment officer of Lisle, Illinois-based OakBrook Investments LLC.
 Retail buyers, who account for about 80 percent of US.
 An ounce of gold buys 66 ounces of silver, compared with a 10-year average of 577.
 Stolen information on credit and debit cards has been used to buy prepaid cards, electronics and groceries, the newspaper reported yesterday, citing unidentified people familiar with the attack’s fallout.
 Criminals sometimes buy numbers, then manufacture fake cards they use to purchase gift cards and goods that can be resold.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Bankers joined loan guarantors in pushing the Federal Housing Finance Agency to ease proposed capital rules for mortgage insurers, saying the plan will make borrowing less affordable for homebuyers unless it’s revised.
 The National Association of Realtors said it was concerned that the FHFA proposal could make it more difficult for first-time buyers to afford a home by raising the cost of insurance.
 “We recommend buying Bank Nifty options as they are goingcheap,” Manoj Vayalar, assistant vice president at ReligareSecurities Ltd, said by phone today.
 ‘Buying Time’ “What he’s doing now is buying time,” Marion said of Poloz.
 analyst raised her rating on Yahoo shares to a buy, saying that shareholder pressure will “add urgency” to Mayer’s turnaround effort and drive better allocation of the company’s cash.
 The Federal Housing Finance Agency, which regulates mortgages backed by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, amended its loan buyback rules earlier this year.
 And rather than typical fixed or adjustable-rate loans, the government-backed agencies should encourage lenders to offer shared appreciation mortgages, where lenders benefit from price appreciation of homes, or lease purchases, which enable renters to buy their homes, he said.
 A gauge of price-growth expectations in the euro area, based on inflation swaps, is set to drop for a third month in September, even after the ECB unexpectedly cut interest rates to a record and said it would buy asset-backed securities to boost the economy.
 Caesars, taken private in a $307 billion leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital, is in talks with the senior creditors of its biggest unit to craft a restructuring plan that would reduce the consolidated company’s $242 billion in long-term debt, according to people with knowledge of the discussions.
 Shipping companies and retailers are preparing for the increase in online buying by boosting their seasonal labor forces.
 rose the most in five months after it agreed to buy US.
 San Francisco-based Ebates offers cash rebates to customers who buy products ranging from laptops to lipsticks from the website’s retail partners.
 Rowe Price,is saying funds that buy short-term debt absolutely will rollout new products to take advantage of the loophole.
 The central bank has said since March rates would stay low for a period after it completes a bond-buying program under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy.
 (ABBN), the world’s biggest makerof power grids, announced a $4 billion share buyback as ChiefExecutive Officer Ulrich Spiesshofer seeks to boost shareholderreturns.
 The sale of businesses includingtubular steel structures for electricity transmission andindustrial heaters and ventilators has raised about $1 billionin the last year, helping to fund the share buyback.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Micro Focus International Plc agreed to buy US-based business-software provider The Attachmate Group Inc.
 TUI Travel Plc rose 47 percent after Morgan Stanley recommended buying the shares.
 Meanwhile, the Federal Reserve cut monthly bond buying by $10 billion for a seventh time yesterday and pledged to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after asset purchases end, probably in October.
 Private-equity firms like KKR, Blackstone Group LP andCarlyle Group LP have been diversifying businesses beyondleveraged buyouts, in part by buying stakes in hedge-fund firmsKKR has been scouting for such opportunities in Asia, which hasfast-growing economies and diverse markets where reforms arecreating new opportunities, said the people.
 KKR’s partnership with Acion is different from atraditional hedge-fund seeding deal in which an investor buys anequity stake in a manager for a share of its fee revenue.
 KKR agreed in July to buy a 249 percent stake in Houston-based BlackGold Capital Management LP.
 KKR also agreed early last year to buy a same-sizedstake in Nephila Capital Ltd, a Bermuda-based company that makesreinsurance-related investments which traces its roots to 1998.
 15 due to the delay in gas price revision,” said Joshi, who has a buy recommendation for ONGC shares at Emkay Global Financial Services Ltd.
 There’s a lot more potential” The Hong Kong-Shanghai link will give foreign investors unprecedented access to mainland shares, allowing 13 billion yuan of net buying per day.
 Chinese institutions and investors with at least 500,000 yuan in their securities accounts will be able to buy Hong Kong shares using yuan through mainland brokerages.
 The excitement about mainland shares contrasts with a 2007 plan to allow Chinese citizens to buy Hong Kong stocks, later abandoned, which helped drive the Hang Seng Index to a record.
 One in two customers either buy their coverage directly online or seek information about it on the Internet before going to their broker, the insurer said.
 It now buys about 7 trillion yen of sovereign notes a month.
 The Fed is gauging the strength of the economy as it winds down a bond-buying program and considers raising rates.
 UBS AG raised its rating on the micro-blogging service to buy from neutral.
 Piper Jaffray analyst Eugene Munster downgraded the stock to neutral from overweight, the equivalent of buy.
 “It’s important for the Russian authorities to scare away any uncontrolled contender from buying Vedomosti,” Vasily Gatov, an independent media analyst and former vice president of the Guild of Periodic Press Publishers, said by phone.
SAP SE (SAP) Chief Executive Officer Bill McDermott opened the coffers to fund cloud computing growth bybuying Concur Technologies Inc.
 “SAP is paying a relatively high multiple,” said Knut Woller, an analyst at Baader Bank AG, who recommends buying SAPshares, in a note.
 By buying Concur, SAP is seeking to play to its strength:selling new or enhanced products to its huge customer base, manyof which have been running its programs for decades.
 joined with other makers of palm oil to pledge that their production of the commodity won’t lead to deforestation, and said its pledge on that commodity will be matched by similar efforts on the other crops it buys.
 agreed to buy Producers Ag Insurance Group from CUNA Mutual Group for $110 million to diversify into the business of guarding farmers against losses.
 The buyer was advised by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 companies have reduced their taxes by buying smaller foreign companies and moving their address.
 “The cost of production for Solar is probably 30 percent less than the imported stuff, making it one of the cheapest producers,” said Equirus’ Dama, who has a buy rating on Solar.
 (CVX), the world’s third-largest oil producer by market value, is searching for someoneto buy one of its smallest refineries, the Kapolei facility onthe Hawaiian island of Oahu.
 An investment bank is working for the San Ramon,California-based company to identify potential buyers of the54,000-barrel-a-day plant, Braden Reddall, a spokesman at thecompany’s headquarters, said by telephone late yesterday.
 “No decision has been made atthis time other than to determine the level of interest ofpotential buyers” Chevron previously considered turning the Kapolei complexinto a terminal.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Merck KGaA agreed to buy Sigma-Aldrich Corp.
 retailer’s stakeholders, found that the phone companies showed more interest in buying parts of Phones 4u, the company said in a call with bondholders yesterday.
 EE and Vodafone may buy some of the stores, and will make a decision in the next few days, three people familiar with the matter said, asking not to be named discussing the plans because they are not public.
 While there is a potential buyer for Phones 4u’s insurance business, mobile phone carriers and the unnamed competitor haven’t shown any willingness to buy the company as a whole, according to Hunt.
 The firm uses mathematical models to decide when to buy and sell securities, derivatives and other investments.
 Former Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik, who owns about 28 percent of the company, said last month he rejected an offer from Aabar Investments PJSC to buy part of his holding.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Doyen Sports, one of the biggest investors in soccer’s $2 billion player-trading market, said FIFA’s plan to prohibit speculators from buying stakes in transfer rights will hurt small market teams.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers today, according to a study that consulting firm Accenture released in December.
 “The question is: how will the medium and low-end car buyers respond when they have to pay for the service,” Entner said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Gazprom, the world’s largest natural gas exporter, faces the biggest decline in European gas revenue in five years as demand weakens and after buyers negotiated discounts.
 The European price declined after some contracts with EU buyers were renegotiated, Malgin said.
 Customers including Italy’s Eni SpA and Germany’s EON SE, Gazprom’s two biggest EU buyers, have been able to negotiate better deals with suppliers after losing money selling fuel on domestic markets because their contract prices were higher than European Union spot rates.
 Later that week, Borsa Istanbul suspended the lender’s shares from trading twice in the same day, citing “abnormal” buy and sell orders.
 The exchange said the suspension was due to “uncertainties over the bank’s ownership” after a takeover bid by Qatar Islamic Bank SAQ failed and state-owned TC Ziraat Bankasi AS decided against making a bid to buy the bank.
 agreed to buy TriZetto Corp.
 Activist investors are subject to extensive disclosure requirements, including details on the identity of the investors, the price and date of their recent transactions in company stock, the source and amount of money spent to buy the stake, any recent steps or future plans to influence management or seek control, contractual arrangements, and the use of derivatives.
 Spinning off real estate into a separate property companyor converting into a REIT holding company would enable ClubCorpto boost dividends and lower its interest costs, and could putit in a better position to buy other clubs and courses, said thepeople.
 ClubCorp last month announced itagreed to buy Sequoia Golf Holdings LLC, a deal that will add 50clubs.
 ‘Flatter’ Curve “If you’re a longer-term investor, buy the 10-year area,” Jones said.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Dollar General Corp, spurned twice in attempts to buy Family Dollar Stores Inc, took its $91 billion offer directly to shareholders in a hostile bid.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Prudential Plc, the UK’s biggest insurer by market value, agreed to buy Kenyan life insurer Shield Assurance Co, its second acquisition in Africa.
 reported in its S-1 filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission in 2012, that buys a chunk of equity.
 The IRS prohibits some transactions in accounts such as buying property for personal use with funds or borrowing money from it.
 Twitter also recently agreed to buy CardSpring Inc, a service that lets users redeem deals and discounts through merchants’ tweets, for undisclosed terms.
 In the short term, convertible debt offerings tend to send a company’s share price down as buyers hedge their purchases by taking short positions in the stock.
 He said yesterday that if he comes close to something that starts to gain traction, he’ll “probably abandon it immediately” Microsoft’s deal to buy Stockholm-based Mojang is projected to close late this year.
 Uncertainty surrounding the vote is already discouraging wealthy homebuyers, Ian Morton, principal at Bradburne & Co.
 Particularly, “the larger farms and estates that overseas buyers would traditionally purchase -- they seem to be hesitant, waiting to see the outcome before they buy anywhere,” he said.
 Hundreds of thousands of Hungarian homebuyers who took out Swiss-franc mortgages faced soaring payments and defaults as their own currency slumped as much as 44 percent against the franc since 2008.
 Hedging Product To avoid similar currency effects, commercial property investors usually buy a hedging product.
 residential mortgage-backed securities market, with a median of 98 percent of prime and 11 percent of buy-to-let RMBS, according to Deutsche Bank.
 A decision to buy state assets will be made after “an objective, hard-nosed assessment,” Roy said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Ryanair Holdings Plc agreed to buy as many as 200 high-density Boeing Co.
 Already the region’s biggest discount airline, Ryanair agreed to buy 100 737 Max 8 aircraft with eight more seats than the standard version, together with the same number of options in a deal worth a potential $22 billion at list prices.
 Technology companies have applauded the change, saying it helps eliminate nuisance suits in which firms buy patents for the purpose of demanding high royalties or winning settlements from established companies.
 Consumers are holding off buying cars in anticipation of price cuts after the government’s recent anti-monopoly probes.
 Using Leverage Traders are increasingly using credit-default swaps, which allow them to put less money down to assume a greater amount of potential risk and return than buying debt.
 “High yield is less risky than Treasuries” So, bond buyers, either lever up on junk or ratchet down your return expectations.
 Yuan buying hit a then-peak of 666 million yuan ($109 million) on July 31, when the European Union penalized Russia’s largest banks, OAO Sberbank, VTB Group and OAO Gazprombank, over Putin’s support for Ukraine’s insurgency.
 And unlike the dollar and euro, which attract a lot of speculative trading, almost all yuan buying is for settling commercial contracts, said Andrei Dorfman, a senior currency trader at Bank Moskvy.
 Their clients’ wishes in hand, traders would head out to buy and sell shares at the dozens of posts where specialists oversaw individual stocks.
 “I spent all my time shoveling out GE as fast as buyers would come in,” he recalled.
 Throughout the 1930s, whenever they had extra money, they would buy shares of companies they knew firsthand -- Pepsi-Cola Co, Procter & Gamble Co, Pfizer Inc, American Home Products Corp.
 rose the mostin more than two years after the maker of aircraft electronicsforecast 2015 profit and sales that exceeded analysts’expectations and expanded a share buyback plan.
 have been eager buyers.
 tower deals, with Houston-based Crown Castle as the buyer in each.
 Eyes Opened An infusion of cash would give Verizon more flexibility after its debt ballooned to finance the $130 billion deal to buy full control of its wireless unit earlier this year.
 As oil production hits a 28-year high, investors and politicians are buying into the vision of a domestic energy renaissance.
 The stock was upgraded to buy from neutral by Compass Point analysts led by Jason Stewart.
 The Philadelphia-based company struck a deal in May to buy Clayton Holdings to expand outsourcing services for the home-lending industry, and is considering a sale of its bond guarantor.
 Jose Antonio Martinez Sampedro and Luis Javier Martinez Sampedro will later have to buy 196 percent of shares from bondholders as a condition of the agreement, which includes delisting Codere.
 “There’s no doubt the world is getting to be a more and more dangerous place, and there are countries around the world” that could look to buy aircraft and artillery, Jeff Babione, deputy manager of Lockheed’s F-35 Lightning II program, said in an interview in Oslo.
 He has a buy rating on DigitalGlobe Inc, a Longmont, Colorado-based company specializing in high-resolution satellite imagery that has supplied equipment used by NATO to monitor Russian movements along the Ukraine border.
 The improvements to profitability, combined with investor-friendly moves such as stock buybacks, may influence share prices more than the strife in Iraq and Syria, Finnegan said.
 Federal Reserve policy makers yesterday tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course for an October end to the program intended to keep rates low.
 “The window has narrowed a little bit for homebuyers.
 Odds are we will see some more narrowing as time goes buy” Before this week’s increase, mortgage rates had been little changed for the past two months, hovering at the lowest levels of the year.
 had agreed to buy Fingerprint Cards for $650 million.
 maker of oilfield equipment, sank after announcing it will buy back shares for the first time, spending as much as $3 billion from a growing cash pile.
 Williams said in July the Houston-based company was looking for ways to repatriate approximately $35 billion in cash overseas, which would give it “more flexibility” to buy back shares or boost its dividend.
 The buyback may be a concern for some investors that National Oilwell is “in some ways admitting” there are growth challenges or maybe not as many opportunities for acquisitions, Rob Desai, an analyst at Edward Jones in St.
 “It is kind of an overreaction,” said Desai, who rates the shares a buy and doesn’t own them.
 The share buyback is expected to last 36 months, “although it may be increased, extended, suspended or discontinued without prior notice,” the company said.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- For a retailer with 2,266 stores and $79 billion in annual revenue, buying software to protect against hackers is a good idea.
 shoppers and a slowdown in emerging marketsThe company yesterday agreed to buy Brazilian hair-color makerNiely Cosmeticos Group, continuing an acquisition spree that hasseen it spend more than $5 billion on deals this year.
 The buyer is a venture led by Norman Sturner’s Murray Hill Properties LLC and Clarion Partners, SL Green and Moinian said in a statement today.
 Diamond District In a separate transaction, SL Green agreed to buy the top 13 floors at Extell Development Co’s International Gem Tower at 55 W.
 Apartment Plan Potential buyers found that the downtown skyscraper’s floors were too square to convert to apartments, compared with the Sony Building, whose spaces are more rectangular, allowing apartments to get more natural light, said the people, who asked not to be named because the talks were private.
 A conversion also would have required either buying out remaining tenants or waiting until their leases expire, the people said.
 The buyers have about $100 million in reserve to cover those costs, plus tenant improvements and leasing commissions, he said.
 technology buyout this year.
 The software maker had been pitching its business to potential buyers including private-equity firms earlier this month, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 earlier this month, the previous largest buyout of a publicly traded tech company this year according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 (GOOG) develop drone delivery systems and thousands of people buysmall, easy-to-fly unmanned copters, the FAA remains wary andhasn’t permitted commercial flights outside Alaska.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries declined for a seventh day, the longest slump in more than a year, on speculation the Federal Reserve may delete reference to interest rates staying low for a “considerable time” after it ends bond buying.
 Money may win auctions, but it can’t buy the palate required to differentiate between a 1947 Chateau Petrus and a lesser Bordeaux dosed with California cabernet to mimic the age and roundness of a legendary vintage.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Bond buyers are rewarding BRF SA after Brazil’s biggest food company by market value said it will unload its worst-performing division.
 The company announced last month an offer to buy 75 percent of Alyasra Food Co’s retail frozen foods distribution business in Kuwait.
 delivered seven jets to Russian buyers in 2013, a year when US.
 The Access fund will back private-equity managers who specialize in buying companies in Germany and southern Europe, the people said.
 The fundraising comes against a difficult backdrop for funds of funds because investors increasingly prefer investing directly in buyout-fund managers.
 18 referendum and reckoning markets will price in a 35 percent chance, its strategists reckon the time to buy Scottish stocks is two days before the vote.
 The measures Draghi announced are really helpful for the overall market” Rate Cuts The ECB unexpectedly cut interest rates this month and said it will start buying asset-backed securities to combat persistent low inflation and boost growth.
 We know very little of what Scotland seriously intends to do” The Stoxx 600 climbed 16 percent last week, touching a two-month high after the European Central Bank cut all three of its main interest rates and said it would start buying securitized debt.
 to buy Permira Advisers LLP’s televisionproducer All3Media, in a deal valuing the company at 550 millionpounds.
 “The bond markets are witnessing some value-buying after two days of losses,” said Anoop Verma, vice president for treasury at DCB Bank Ltd.
 Bond Purchase India’s government is looking to buy back 200 billion rupees ($33 billion) of bonds from the central bank and the transaction will probably be completed in September at market prices, two officials familiar with the matter said this week, asking not to be named because the plans are private.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 SAP, the largest maker of business-management software,agreed to buy Washington-based Concur for $74 billion to boostits cloud-computing business.
 The Ex-Im bank provides loan guarantees, loans and insurance to help foreign companies buy US.
 If they are going to be hiring people, buying equipment, thinking about making overseas sales they need some degree of certainty,” bank president Fred Hochberg said today at a Bloomberg Government lunch in Washington.
 The company has used Danske’s biggest competitor, Stockholm-based Nordea Bank AB, for a number of its corporate finance actions, including as the lead manager for a share buy-back plan introduced this year and for most bond sales.
 Horton Inc, builds homes for first-time and move-up buyers, retirees and multiple-generation households in 18 states.
 “Lennar has shifted its neighborhood mix further away from first-time buyers than we expected, which should reduce the business risk from mortgage underwriting standards,” Jay McCanless, an analyst with Sterne Agee & Leach Inc, said in a note to clients after the call.
 While Lennar still sells about 30 percent of its homes to first-time buyers, many would-be purchasers are discouraged because loan-qualification procedures have become “invasive,” Miller said on the call.
 The Bank of Japan, which meets next week, is buying 60 trillion ($548 billion) to 70 trillion yen a year of bonds to stave off deflation.
 currency has rallied as the Fed has been on track to conclude next month a bond-buying program designed to keep long-term borrowing costs low and spur economic growth.
 The central bank said it will buy 250 million in kroner a day ($39 million) in October.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Private-equity manager Philip Manduca is so convinced of the inflation-beating value of diamonds that he shrugged off reports of an alleged army uprising to buy part of a mine in Lesotho.
Middlemen who help investors bet onlife insurance contracts lack incentive to make sure thearrangements are profitable for the buyers, according to acompany that monitors the industry.
 “From the investor’s perspective, this fee structure alsocreates a potential misalignment of interest between theintermediary and the investor,” Conning said in the report“Another approach, though one we have seen little evidence ofdeveloping as of yet, is altering the traditional compensationmodel so the intermediaries have a vested interest in theeventual profitability of the life settlement” Investor Discretion Darwin Bayston, chief executive officer of the LifeInsurance Settlement Association, whose membership includesbrokers and investment firms, said all parties already have aninterest in the long-term success of the market, and that it’sup to buyers to evaluate risks before taking on contracts.
 “Investors always have the discretion to buy what theywant,” he said in a phone interview.
 Mars, the maker of M&M’s candies, later acquired an additional 10 percent of the operation, though it declined to buy most of P&G’s slower-growing European business.
 The strategy “showcases the fact that they want to be a more nimble organization that can respond to consumer trends and competitive pressures” without sacrificing scale and leverage with retailers, said Lash, who rates P&G a buy.
 “They’re also some of the biggest sukuk buyers” Saudi Arabia is working on new rules aimed at promoting the local currency bond and sukuk market, three people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday.
 The rules are expected to allow foreign investors to buy local currency bonds for the first time and could be published early next year, they said.
 The Topix has rebounded 17 percent from an April 14 low to gain 22 percent this year amid optimism about the global economy and speculation the $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 Cliffs has also announced a plan to buy back as much as $200 million of shares.
 teenagers are thinking of Adidas when they want to buy basketball shoes” Based in the Bavarian town of Herzogenaurach since its creation in 1949, the world’s No.
 “Reebok is almost ruined,” said Sam Poser, an analyst at Sterne, Agee & Leach who recommends buying Nike and Under Armour shares.
 - Welsh mother unwittingly buys Mattel’s new “Real Housewives of Camden” Barbie.
 (ECA) agreed to buy AthlonEnergy Inc.
 Encana will pay $593 billion in cash and assume $115billion in long-term debt to buy Athlon, the Calgary based-company said today in a statement.
 He’s been selling gas-producing assets and buying oil-and liquids-rich properties.
 Two years later, the first reports on the loan sales show the program has benefited the insurance fund more than the communities, as hedge funds and private equity-backed investors drive up prices for the loans they buy with few strings attached.
 Not-for-profit groups that want to buy the pools of mortgages say the current system favors financial buyers over those whose primary mission is aiding borrowers and communities.
 “Which is both get better recoveries for the FHA fund and at the same time give borrowers and communities additional opportunities to either stay in their home or have better outcomes than if the loans went through the foreclosure process” The government mortgage insurer, which focuses on backing low-downpayment loans for first-time home buyers, has been under pressure to improve its bottom line as losses on delinquent house payments depleted its reserves after the housing bubble burst.
 “The NSO pools had far superior results” HMC, which buys loans as Corona Asset Management, has rehabilitated dozens of abandoned homes in North Las Vegas, Nevada, from a portfolio of 217 mortgages purchased this year, many of which have become rentals for families serving at Nellis Air Force Base, he said.
 Even small deals were awarded to for-profit buyers.
 “For some of our competitors, buying a nonperforming loan is a cheap way to get to the property and turn it into a rental,” said Ahmad, whose company has managed $2 billion in non-performing loans since 2010.
 Loan Star The largest buyers have been Lone Star Funds with $39 billion in the national pools and Blackstone’s Bayview with $24 billion in national portfolios and $908 million in the neighborhood pools.
 Other big buyers include Oaktree Capital Management LP, a Los Angeles-based alternative investment fund; Selene Finance LP, founded by mortgage-bond pioneer Lew Ranieri; Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc; and asset managers such as Pacific Investment Management Co.
 Rackspace, which maintained its forecasts for the current quarter, also said it’s rebuffing investor calls to buy back shares and will preserve cash for future acquisitions.
 Cloud Competition Acquisitions in the cloud-computing service business have reduced the list of potential buyers that would want to acquire Rackspace and have the scale to do so, according to Jonathan Atkin, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets.
 New CEO While Rackspace may consider a share buyback in the future, it wants to retain cash to fund possible acquisitions and decided it didn’t want to take on debt, Weston said on a conference call.
 19 launch and will more quickly get phones in the hands of customers so they can take advantage of the new network,” wrote Colby Synesael, a New York-based Cowen analyst, who upgraded the shares to the equivalent of buy from a market perform rating.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Many of the people rushing to buy an iPhone 6 tomorrow will fund the purchase with a currency that’s growing in value: old iPhones.
 Installment Plans Getting customers to buy new phones is especially important under increasingly popular installment plans, in which consumers pay the whole value of new phones over several months in return for lower service rates.
 In one deal, buyout firms including CVC Capital Partners Ltd, KKR and TPG Capital Management LP are bidding for Kuwait Food Co, operator of about 1,500 KFC and Pizza Hut restaurants in the Middle East and North Africa, people familiar with the matter have said.
 It also represents a thank you of sorts from buyout firms, which have historically turned to the Gulf Arab region’s cash-rich sovereign wealth funds and family offices for capital.
 Grilled Chicken TPG Capital, based in Fort Worth, Texas, and Abraaj Group Ltd, a Dubai buyout firm, are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 The value of buyouts in the US.
 The MSCI World Index, which tracks developed equity markets around the globe, is up 116 percent since its March 2009 low -- higher prices make it harder for private-equity firms to find bargain companies to buy.
 The internal rate of return -- a standard measure for buyout funds -- for private equity deals on Gulf investments is about 27 percent to 30 percent, compared with 20 percent to 24 percent for deals in the West, according to Al-Shroogi, reflecting the higher risks of doing business there.
 Royal Philips Electronics NV, the world’s largest lighting company, agreed to buy a 51 percent stake in Saudi Arabia’s General Lighting Co.
 AT&T already offers two deals that also will be extended to the new versions of the iPhone: get a $100 credit on your bill when you purchase any iPhone and add a new phone line to an AT&T Next account; or buy an iPhone for no money down with AT&T Next and get a $200 discount on any iPad.
 Since then, Sprint named a new chief executive officer, Marcelo Claure, after abandoning talks to buy T-Mobile.
 Banks can now either accept zero returns on that money or use it for auto and motorcycle loans, or to buy credit portfolios and bonds from smaller lenders.
 Car Loans “The problem is that the demand to buy vehicles isn’t hot nowadays,” said Paulo Duailibi, head of retail products at Banco Santander Brasil SA.
 The central bank’s attempt to goad lenders into buying portfolios from mid-size competitors, freeing up their capacity for new loans, is also unlikely to find success, said Antonio Hermann de Azevedo, Banco BMG SA’s chief executive officer.
 Loan Purchases “No bank will be buying loan books after these measures because there aren’t many loan books to buy,” he said in a telephone interview, explaining that mid-size banks retreated from lending because of the slowing economy and to keep delinquencies under control.
 Always Interested Bristow said that while he probably wouldn’t look to buy the rest of Kibali, his company would study other assets AngloGold might look to sell.
 Emirates NBD, the second-biggest bank, greets customers with a message encouraging them to buy shares in the IPO through its automated teller machines or when they log in to their accounts online.
 Individuals can buy as much as 30 percent of the shares, giving them the chance to bet on the world’s second-best performing stock market this year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 For the banks, lending to customers to buy stock is a way to put their ample supplies of cash to work.
 Allergan, the maker of the anti-wrinkle treatment Botox, was said to be in talks to buy Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 “I don’t want to see ads, I just want to see peopleposting interesting stuff,” Harney, 29, said in an interviewWith Ello, “the message of buy, buy, buy is toned down” Harney is just one of the people flocking to Ello, aBurlington, Vermont-based startup that has caught the attentionof users and investors since its debut on Aug.
 While HBC Investment Services is the preferred buyer, Nigeria’s Fidelity Bank Plc is the “reserve bidder for the acquisition of the entire issued and fully paid up ordinary shares of Enterprise Bank,” the Asset Management Corp, or Amcon, said in a statement yesterday.
 Amcon was set up in 2010 to buy bad loans and took over three of the eight lenders it rescued as part of a 620 billion-naira ($38 billion) bailout.
 RBS had been open to takeover offers for Citizens, holding talks with potential buyers that didn’t yield anything substantial, Van Saun said in January.
 4 and announced plans to start buying asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 consumers also have been buying more athletic apparel and footwear for everyday use, not just when working out or playing sports.
 The company had been struggling to maintain growth there, its second-largest market, as shoppers became choosier about which brands they buy.
 Yara, after last year buying OFD Holding Inc.
 willseek a $675 billion term loan to buy Tim Hortons Inc, thelargest financing of its kind since the collapse of LehmanBrothers Holdings Inc.
 to Germanchemicals company Styrolution Group GmbH to postpone mergerfinancings has continued in September with investors pulling$435 million from funds that buy the debt last week, bringingnet withdrawals for the year to $43 billion.
 Deals that year included the $7billion loan raised by Energy Future Holdings Corp, the Texasutility formerly known as TXU Corp, to partially fund itsleveraged buyout by KKR & Co, TPG Capital and Goldman SachsCapital Partners, Bloomberg data show.
 “It isn’t a case where the buy-side has gone on strike,”Paul Hastings’s Farley said.
 Tencent, which in June agreed to buy a stake in 58com to bolster its online content to compete with Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, fell 33 percent to HK$122.
 The Fed is gauging the strength of the economy as it winds down its bond-buying program and considers the timing of raising rates.
 Lower fuel costs help ease price pressures in a country that buys about 80 percent of its oil from abroad, aiding Prime Minister Narendra Modi’s efforts to narrow the current-account gap that widened to a one-year high in the quarter ended June.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Antwerp’s diamond dealers, who buy and sell 80 percent of the world’s most valuable gemstones, have lost their bank.
 It’s likely to make loans scarcer in an industry that relies on debt to buy the dull, rough diamonds that are finished into jewelry.
 After years of struggling to find a buyer, the bank announced last December the agreement to sell it to Yinren, a Chinese group that trades diamonds.
 is buying cloud-computing software developer Eucalyptus Systems Inc.
 in 2012, a year after buying the data software company for $103 billion.
 Asia’s biggesteconomy is the world’s largest buyer of seaborne supplies.
 Fed policy makers begin a two-day meeting tomorrow as they wind down a bond-buying program and consider the timing of an increase in interest rates.
 “If I’m going to get a million shares of Alibaba, I need to have money to buy that.
 lost 1 percent to $4624 after agreeing to buy Mojang AB, the software company behind the popular game Minecraft, for $25 billion, in a bid to boost its Xbox and mobile business.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Barclays Plc settled a lawsuit against CF Partners (UK) LLP after a London judge criticized the banks’ employees and ruled the lender had breached confidential client information to help it buy a carbon trading firm.
 Yesterday’s settlement was disclosed minutes after Judge Robert Hildyard issued a verdict saying Barclays misused the information to buy Tricorona AB in 2010.
 ‘A Fantasy’ “We could buy it,” one said.
 tripled last week and about a quarter of potential iPhone 6 buyers are new to Apple’s ecosystem, according to RBC.
 agreed to buy 22 office properties in the US.
 While SABMiller could still seek other partners, such as Danish brewer Carlsberg, “the fact that SAB’s management seem so serious about the need to defend themselves does add credence to the ABI-is-going-to-buy-SAB story,” Jonathan Fyfe, an analyst at Mirabaud Securities, said in a note.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Managers of two of the largest high-yield municipal funds see a buying opportunity in tobacco securities even as more of the bonds are projected to default.
 Yield Lure Bond buyers still purchase tobacco debt amid the default estimates because funds would flow to states and cities even after the securities’ stated maturities, meaning they’d eventually be fully repaid.
 The bonds also have the appeal of being relatively easy to buy and sell, in contrast with most speculative-grade securities issued for stand-alone projects such as retirement communities, fertilizer plants and charter schools.
 Cheaper grain is bolstering profit for buyers including Tyson Foods Inc.
 The company agreed in August to buy less than 10 percent of Gumi Inc, the Japanese maker of role-playing games including Genjuhime Monster Princess, and plans to set up a 10 billion yen fund to invest in other local game developers.
 “If I’m going to get a million shares of Alibaba, I need to have money to buy that.
 Fed Decision The Fed is gauging the strength of the economy as it winds down a bond-buying program that’s on track to end this year.
 China is the biggest buyer of energy and industrial metals.
 The company is goingpublic after delisting from the Tokyo Stock Exchange in 2006,following a buyout led by Nomura Holdings Inc’s principalfinance unit and CVC Capital Partners Ltd.
 The central bank also plans next month to release details of a program to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 The ultimate value of the TLTROs and programs to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities will be 985 billion euros, according to the Bloomberg survey.
 regulators, were part of its defense of the deal to buy No.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Mahindra & Mahindra Ltd, India’s largest maker of tractors and sport-utility vehicles, is in advanced talks to buy PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business, according to three people familiar with the matter.
 Village Transport Mahindra began making scooters six years ago after buying Kinetic Motor Co.
September 26 (Bloomberg) -- At the Africa Aerospace and Defence Expo earlier this month, weapons buyers from across the continent descended on Air Force Base Waterkloof in the South African capital Pretoria for a bit of shopping.
 Norinco has even devised a way to make buying weapons easier for such customers: It promotes starter kits of basic defense gear -- everything from rifles to howitzers, laser-guided bombs, armored personnel carriers, tanks and drones -- for governments that want to quickly outfit their armed forces.
 Non-defense units of sprawling Norinco often benefit as it courts buyers of bargain-priced weaponry, gaining an entry point to sell their products to the same customers.
 “That means they have to buy everything from local suppliers” Norinco declined to comment on the company’s business strategy or make executives available for comment after five e-mails and several phone calls to the company’s public relations representatives.
 Asia accounted for 63 percent of total consumption of goldjewelry, bars and coins last year, with China overtaking Indiaas the biggest buyer, according to the council.
 With a wider choice of other beverages to buy, beer has lost some of its status.
 Changing Perceptions German brewers -- who are currently celebrating Munich’s Oktoberfest, the industry’s highpoint of the year -- are hoping specialty beers can help change perceptions and lure back buyers year round.
 To boost earnings in the meantime, Rometty has raised debt to fund share buybacks, laid off workers and reduced the company’s tax rate.
 IBM has about $14 billion remaining in its current share repurchase authorization and said it will request additional funds for buybacks at its October board meeting.
 agreed to buy for $21 billion.
 The investment was a departure for the billionaire, who has long said that he avoided buying technology stocks for Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 While municipal issuers may welcome diving borrowing costs, investors are growing wary of buying as yields approach generational lows.
 Hermes International SCA advanced 25 percent to 23830 euros after Natixis SA recommended buying shares of the French maker of Birkin handbags.
 Citigroup downgraded its recommendation on the stock to neutral from buy.
 are among buyers of the nation’s crop.
 The central bank buys about 7 trillion yen ($653 billion) in bonds each month.
 He said he continues to support ending the central bank’s bond-buying program this month.
 Louis Fed President James Bullard said last week the Fed should consider delaying plans to end bond-buying to halt a decline in expected inflation.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s central bank increased interest rates sooner than investors and analysts forecast to buy policy makers credibility two days after President Dilma Rousseff’s re-election sparked a sell-off in assets.
 It’s also licensing Bavarian’s vaccine and buying new shares in the company in a potential investment of more than $187 million, the Kvistgaard, Denmark-based company said today.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks plunged the most in more than 15 months on concern the European Central Bank’s asset-buying program announced today won’t be enough to boost inflation and revive the economy.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said it will buy assets for at least two years, starting covered-bonds purchases this month and asset-backed securities this quarter.
 Societe Television Francaise 1 climbed 11 percent to 1083 euros after UBS AG recommended buying the shares.
 From 2009 through the first six months of 2014, the rate of premium luxury buyers who opted for all-wheel drive rose to 46 percent from 33 percent, according to data compiled by Edmunds.
 cable company Comcast, seeking to buy No.
 Esbriet’s market potential attracted an $83 billion buyout from Basel, Switzerland-based Roche, at a time when Brisbane, California-based InterMune was unprofitable.
 The Federal Reserve is on track to end its bond buying this month and is assessing data to determine if the economy is strong enough to withstand higher interest rates.
 European shares rebounded after slumping yesterday on concern the central bank’s asset-buying plan won’t be enough to revive growth and avoid deflation.
 The company is also holding talks to supply LNG buyers in Asia.
 The company is targeting “traditional parties” as well as “people wanting access to well-priced LNG who aren’t in the traditional buying league,” he said.
 oil explorer with a focus on Asia said it was in talks with two possible buyers.
 Today, it announced a deal to buy interests in deepwater Indonesia to expand in Southeast Asia.
 The company’s view “will be taken with a little bit of skepticism,” Edward Muztafago, an analyst at Societe Generale in New York, who rates the shares a buy and owns none, said in a phone interview.
 Schlumberger, which has 37 buy and three hold recommendations from analysts, rose 1 percent to $9155 at 5:16 pm.
 “Historically Schlumberger has been that place,” said Hallead, who rates the shares the equivalent of a buy and doesn’t own them.
 In June, Williams said it was seeking to acquire all of the partnership after buying control of it and half of its publicly traded units from Global Infrastructure Partners II for $6 billion.
 Twelve of 19 analysts covering the stock recommend buying it, while five have a hold rating and just two have a sell.
 “Gazprom is a strong long-term buy, simply because Europe needs Russian gas,” Balakirev said by phone from Moscow yesterday.
 Also, the company adjusted its outlook because of fewer customers signing up for or upgrading to installment plans and more subscribers bringing their own device instead of buying one through AT&T.
 In the third quarter, 7 percent of customers on smartphone plans brought their own devices instead of buying one from AT&T.
 Aiming to build its video business, AT&T agreed in May to buy El Segundo, California-based DirecTV.
 agreed this week to buy the Waldorf Astoria hotel for $195 billion.
 High-quality Manhattan properties are prized by buyers seeking safe investments and the potential for rising values, Mazur said.
 The market has been of particular interest to Chinese companies and other foreign buyers.
 Norway’s Norges Bank Investment Management last month agreed to buy stakes in three Boston Properties Inc.
 A buyer also may be able to increase revenue by improving the Helmsley Building’s ground-floor retail space, which totals about 70,000 square feet and can be enlarged, Stacom said.
 A buyer would have the option to replace the financing, Stacom said.
 The Bank of Japan is buying debt and expanding its monetary base by as much as $650 billion a year, and the European Central Bank announced plans to purchase covered bonds and asset-backed securities.
 That holds true even for the US, where the Fed is on course to stop buying Treasuries and mortgage securities this month as a precursor to raising interest rates from almost zero as soon as next year.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Wereldhave NV agreed to buy six French shopping centers for 850 million euros ($11 billion) and plans to finance part of the deal by selling shares.
 Investors will spend 21 billion euros on income-producing commercial real estate in France this year, 19 percent more than in 2013, as overseas buyers seek larger assets, broker Savills Plc said Oct.
 and has to find a separate buyer for the UK.
 New Hotels With Brazil’s economic growth weakened, Iguatemi’s future expansion will come by taking advantage of low prices to buy stakes in new and existing malls, as well as adding mixed-use commercial towers and hotels to shopping centers.
 “There’s a lot of space to buy into,” Betts said.
 28-29, when they are expected to end bond-buying.
 Australian police alleged in 2011 that Securency International Pty paid kickbacks to government officials in Indonesia, Malaysia, Nepal and Vietnam to persuade them to buy the company’s weather-resistant plastic bank notes.
 and Shaw, which also own phone networks, will still compete with Netflix’s global reach and buying power, Ghose said by phone.
 He has a buy rating on Rogers.
 She has represented buyers, sellers and investment advisers in connection with financings and transactions involving both private and public companies.
 Numericable shareholders will get preferential rights to buy new shares at 1782 euros apiece, the Champs Sur Marne, France-based cable provider said today.
 Altice agreed to buy SFR, France’s second-largest phone company, for $23 billion from Vivendi SA in April.
 That may be enough to attract buyers.
 and ConocoPhillips -- are in a position to buy their way to more acreage.
 Shy Buyers Global oil firms have held off for years on buying companies that specialize in the highly complex niche of shale drilling.
 Cash to Spend Chevron and ConocoPhillips may be the top buyers, according to Amy Myers Jaffe, executive director of energy and sustainability at the University of California at Davis.
 “You can’t just buy the acreage and be really successful.
 “With the pullback, there’s a lot of opportunity here for a company to come in” For other companies, weak balance sheets may force them to find a buyer.
 “What it really takes for deals to happen is confidence in the board rooms of the buyers to do that,” Freeborn said.
 Former Carlyle buyout directors Franck Falezan, Benoit Colas and Jean-Pierre Millet started an activist investing fund earlier this year, along with Martin Donnelly, Adam Lister, Benjamin Devaux and Nikolaus von Abercron, according to the firm’s website.
 More than 60 percent of analysts rate this stock buy or hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “I wouldn’t call this capitulation by management as they continue to move too slowly for our tastes,” said Dibadj, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Coca-Cola.
 Interest rates in Japan have been tumbling as the BOJ carries out unprecedented stimulus to beat deflation, buying about 7 trillion yen of sovereign notes a month.
 exports now have to contend with the biggest buyers in Asia banding together to beat down prices.
 Tepco and Chubu Electric, Japan’s two biggest buyers, will form a joint venture by the end of March for thermal-power generation and fuel imports, they said in a statement on Oct.
 “The announcement appears similar to one or two others we’ve seen recently and is representative of the way we are seeing major buyers looking to put more pressure on sellers on price and contract flexibility,” Gavin Thompson, Wood Mackenzie’s Tokyo-based head of Asia gas and power research, said in an e-mail.
 The company is looking to buy gold mines in Africa that would raise its annual production to about 1 million ounces, Gordon said.
 Allan Koenig, an Energy Future spokesman, said today that “any liquidation scenario would be a liquidation of the EFH corporate entity and not the operating businesses” Energy Future, which was taken private in a record leveraged buyout seven years ago, filed for bankruptcy in April listing almost $50 billion in debt, making it one of the biggest corporate filings ever.
 “They have continued to deliver what they have pitched to the market,” Miguel Mayorga, an analyst at Corporativo GBM who has the equivalent of a buy rating for the shares, said in a telephone interview from Mexico City.
 In August, Oi hired Banco BTG Pactual to study the possibility of buying Telecom Italia SpA’s stake in its Brazilian wireless unit, Tim Participacoes SA.
 He doesn’t expect the company to buy up competitors or low-priced mining assets until coal prices start to rebound, he said.
 Valeant “had very strong growth in almost every part of their business from dermatology, eye care, all the way through to even their dental business” He has a buy rating on Valeant’s stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 QEP, which is also speaking to other suitors, could select a buyer within weeks, one person said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The Denver-based company, which said in June that it would spin off Entrada, is working with Deutsche Bank AG to find buyers, the people said.
 Takeovers involving energy companies that help move and process oil and gas have increased sharply this year, as buyers seek scale to handle a pickup in US.
 Alipay’s “ePass” service will let Chinese shoppers buy products on US.
 Norilsk has also suggested buying stockpiles and including those reserves in agreements between the five BRICS nations, Brazil, Russia, India, China and South Africa, Donskoi said.
 Norilsk and a group of banks and private investors are raising funds to buy palladium stockpiles from Russia’s central bank, the company said Sept.
 plunged the most in six years after the Chinese natural gas supplier agreed to buy gas refueling stations in North America from company Chairman Wang Yusuo and his wife.
 and Canada” Both analysts maintained a buy rating with a target price of HK$70.
 The gauge slid 3 percent over the past three weeks amid a selloff in global stocks even as Brent crude fell to a four-year low, reducing import costs for the nation that buys about 80 percent of its oil needs from abroad.
 The exterior may not brighten up the neighborhood, but the self-satisfied smiles of the buyers just might.
 Blackstone and a group of co-investors acquired Vivint’s three main assets in a $19 billion leveraged buyout in 2012, investing $714 million of equity.
 In the second half of 2013, Karma started buying Indian public sector banks such as State Bank of India and Indian Bank.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Zimbabwe’s central bank is close to making key appointments to run a unit that will buy non-performing loans running as high as 90 percent at some lenders in the southern African country.
 We raised the stock to a buy less than two weeks ago, and CTC didn’t disappoint” The Moscow-based company’s third-quarter OIBDA margin, referring to operating income before depreciation and amortization, increased to 319 percent from 306 percent a year ago, according to the filing.
 “We could see some upside if yesterday’s buying continues and the market takes some encouragement from the increase in copper guidance” Rio advanced 15 percent to A$6163 at 10:50 am.
 Cloud computing is transforming the technology industry by letting companies rent processing power and data storage over the Internet instead of buying and maintaining their own hardware.
 13 to mark a new listing, Fiat Chrysler Automobiles, Marchionne is racing to create a lineup of cars that will lure buyers into showrooms worldwide.
 In 2005 he played a game of chicken with General Motors Co, threatening to enforce a contract that would have required the struggling American company to buy even-dodgier Fiat; he walked away with a $2 billion cash settlement.
 The Jeep name, Marchionne says, “is credible, and is understood by everybody” And he expects Alfa Romeo and Maserati to steal buyers from BMW, Mercedes, and Audi.
 Global merger transactions climbed 29 percent in the third quarter from a year earlier to about $886 billion, driven in part by European companies buying US.
 “BASF is finally facing the harsh reality,” said Oliver Schwarz, a Hamburg-based analyst at MM Warburg, who rates the chemical maker’s stock buy.
 Silver Lake, the biggest technology-focused buyout firm, decided against buying Snapfish from Hewlett-Packard Co.
 Even as they forecast a 17 percent rise in sales, analysts expect Shutterfly to report its first annual loss since it became a publicly traded company this year, data compiled by Bloomberg show The deal would have been Silver Lake’s largest acquisition since last year’s buyout of Dell Inc.
 Regulators last year proposed applying the requirements to about 10 electronic trading venues that match stock buyers and sellers, including dark pools operated by Credit Suisse Group AG and UBS AG.
 That’s one reason the company cites for investing in Bugatti: the ultra-high-end car shows people who might want to buy its other luxury brands what VW is capable of doing.
 “We’re hearing about the ECB buying bonds,” Benjamin Dunn, president of Alpha Theory Advisors, which advises hedge funds with about $6 billion in assets, said in a phone interview from Crested Butte, Colorado.
 10 amid concern the European Central Bank will face obstacles in its plan to buy securitized debt as a means of boosting inflation and growth.
 “The market is expected to continue to be constrained for some time due to political and economic uncertainty within the UK and Europe, tighter mortgage lending markets and mismatches between the price expectations of buyers and sellers,” Foxtons said in the statement.
 Corn Rebound ValueAct expects Agrium to benefit from an eventual rebound in corn, soybean and wheat prices that will increase the amount of cash the Canadian company has available for dividends and share buybacks.
 “The deterioration in market conditions reflects the reduction in buyer demand, which seems to be driven by high asking prices, uncertainty ahead of the election and some impact from the mortgage market review,” Chris Millington, an analyst at Numis Securities Ltd, said in a note to clients today.
 He has a buy recommendation on the stock.
 and Europe, tighter mortgage lending markets and mismatches between the price expectations of buyers and sellers,” Foxtons said.
 last year said a debt level of more than six times a measure of earnings “raises concerns” Total debt for large leveraged buyouts rose to 626 times earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization during the third quarter from 589 times in the first half of the year, according to S&P’s Capital IQ LCD.
 Loans aren’t regulated as securities and take weeks to change hands, increasing the risk of a market seizure in the case of accelerated withdrawals from funds that buy the debt.
 Barclays decided not to fund a private-equity buyout of Redwood City, California-based photo-sharing site Shutterfly Inc, which has been shopping itself to funds since July, according to people with knowledge of the deal.
 Regulatory Pressure Bank of America, Deutsche Bank and Credit Suisse backed away from financing Vista Equity Partners’ more than $4 billion deal to buy Palo Alto, California-based Tibco Software Inc, which JPMorgan and Jefferies LLC are underwriting, according to two people with knowledge of the buyout announced last month.
 Some larger competitors passed on the deal because it would leave the Hauppauge, New York-based payments processor with leverage exceeding regulators’ guidelines, according to another person with knowledge of the buyout.
 While investors appreciate regulators’ concerns, ultimately they will decide whether loans are too risky or not to buy, said Jonathan Insull, a New York-based money manager at Crescent Capital Group LP, which oversees about $15 billion of speculative-grade debt.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Japanese stocks rose, with the Topix index extending yesterday’s gain, as the yen fell after the Federal Reserve said it would end its bond-buying program.
 Renesas soared 54 percent to 836 yen after saying it would offer buyouts to about 1,800 workers as it targets quarterly net income of 11 billion yen, which is above analysts’ estimates.
 ‘Powerful’ Models “By layering industry-specific transactional data and subject-matter expertise over that search data, organizations such as Auctioncom are able to create powerful predictive models for accurately forecasting buying behavior in the present and for the coming months,” Hal Varian, chief economist at Mountain View, California-based Google, said in the statement.
 In July, Seattle-based Zillow agreed to buy San Francisco-based Trulia Inc.
 KLA, which makes machines that check that stages in the production of computer chips have been completed correctly, is struggling to predict when customers will buy equipment, according to Patrick Ho, an analyst at Stifel Nicolaus & Co.
 Azoulay is buying mainly dividend-paying stocks, he said.
 South Korea has been reviewing its missile-defense options, including whether to buy Lockheed Martin Corp’s Terminal High-Altitude Area Defense system, known as THAAD.
 South Korea has said it will buy 40 F-35A fighters made by Bethesda, Maryland-based Lockheed.
 “TSB seems to remain utterly committed to its branch opening plans,” said Ian Gordon, an analyst at Investec Plc, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 There’s only a 50 percent chance the Fed will raise its interest-rate target to at least 05 percent by October next year, after ending its bond-buying program today and leaving its key rate near zero, futures data and analyst forecasts compiled by Bloomberg show.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Aurubis AG, Europe’s biggest producer of refined copper, raised the premium it will charge buyers in the region next year for supplies of the metal by 48 percent.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Dollar-denominated junk bonds rose, paring the biggest losses in a year, after a Federal Reserve official said the central bank should consider delaying the end of its bond-buying program.
 chief investment officer of global credit Mark Kiesel said today that “credit is a buy here” with rising rates on high-yield bonds and loans, in an interview with Bloomberg Television.
 Louis Fed Bank President James Bullard said the central bank should consider delaying the end of its bond buying, signaling the Fed may take action to insulate the US.
 funds that buy leveraged loans in the past week, the 14th straight outflow in the longest stretch of withdrawals since 2008, according to Lipper.
 The European Commission said the Spanish measures unfairly rewarded companies for buying stakes in foreign competitors.
 Before the EU investigation, Spanish companies had been on a buying spree, with Telefonica purchasing UK.
 mobile-phone operator O2 Plc and Iberdrola SA buying Scottish Power Plc.
 government offered to buy electricity at a price that’s almost double today’s market rate under a 35-year contract.
 More home owners also offered their properties for sale in London’s best districts, giving buyers more choice, Marsh & Parsons said.
 Investors were the biggest buyers of homes in prime neighborhoods, purchasing 26 percent of the properties, down from a record 31 percent in the previous quarter.
 The buyer and terms of the sale weren’t disclosed.
 Rules meant to safeguard markets after the 2008 financial crisis prompted the traditional middlemen in the bond market -- the world’s largest banks -- to pare back their operations, making it harder for investors to buy and sell debt.
 “A move of this magnitude is common for GoPro,” said Alex Gauna, an analyst at JMP Securities in San Francisco, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 The buyback program had been suspended because of the possession of “material non-public information,” Palo Alto, California-based Hewlett-Packard said in a statement today.
 Chief Financial Officer Cathie Lesjak said last week that Hewlett-Packard still possessed “material nonpublic information” that prevented the buying back of shares, renewing speculation that Hewlett-Packard was still considering a pursuit of the company.
 If investors turn that down, then they may support Dollar General’s tender offer to buy Family Dollar, which would remove the need to revamp the board.
 will give the Malaysian group greater access to the European market, while asset-rich Wilmar is probably the best company to buy over the long term, Mistry told reporters.
 Mistry, who’s traded edible oils for more than three decades, said in September that it was a good time to buy palm oil companies, without identifying individual stocks, and reiterated that call yesterday at the conference.
 “If you’re looking at something over the long term, it’s probably the best palm oil company to buy.
 9 offered 107 billion pounds ($171 billion) for London-listed New Britain Palm Oil to buy plantations in Papua New Guinea.
 “I do feel that Sime Darby has done a very good job by buying New Britain Palm Oil.
 “I am happy to repeat that the present is a good time to buy plantation and processing company equities,” Mistry told the conference yesterday.
 They’re also eager to ensure Rio executives would remain in key roles in a merger that would probably be billed as a combination of equals, especially after Glasenberg largely ejected Xstrata Plc managers after Glencore agreed to buy that company in 2012, one of the people said.
 is accelerating a real estate deal spree, spending $585 million to buy more than half of a Silicon Valley office park and agreeing to lease an entire campus in development to make space for its growing workforce.
 Vodafone Group Plc remains interested in buying the business, a person familiar with the matter said, asking not to be named discussing internal deliberations.
 “I think the market is potentially so huge that this could be an EBay-sized business” Traina was inspired to start the company after buying his brother an hour of tennis with John McEnroe at a charity auction.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group boosted their offer to buy Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 5 that Chiquita investors should reject the Fyffes deal and instead pursue a buyout from Cutrale-Safra.
 He maintains a buy rating on the stock.
 “If a nuclear disaster happens, nobody’s going to buy another single bottle of shochu or another single piece of kushiage from us,” said Kazuya Tanaka, an Ichikikushikino real estate agent who became a city councilman after the Fukushima accident to fight for the permanent idling of the Sendai plant.
 won European Union antitrust approval to buy messaging service WhatsApp Inc.
 agreed to buy the company for $122 billion.
 Stocks tumbled last week amid signs of economic weakness in Europe and geopolitical turmoil as the Federal Reserve is on course to end its bond-buying program this month.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- David “Sandy” Gottesman, who became a billionaire by buying shares decades ago in the company his friend Warren Buffett was building, said it’s unlikely another such business will ever be created.
 JSR Corp, a maker of synthetic rubber for auto tires, soared 65 percent after announcing a share buyback.
 JSR soared 65 percent to 1,875 yen after saying it plans to buy back up to 21 percent of its shares for as much as 10 billion yen from Oct.
 It decided to buy 49 percent of Kalon and plans to acquire the remaining stake in the future, Fujifilm spokesman Takahiro Taguchi said, confirming an earlier report by the Nikkei.
 The central bank couldn’t buy all 3 trillion yen ($28 billion) of bills it sought to purchase today, falling short of its goal for such an operation for the first time since at least April 2013.
 “The short-term notes were being absorbed by the BOJ’s buying operation to start off with, and then risk aversion on back of a sharp global bond rally pushed yields even lower,” said Satoshi Yamada, a manager of debt trading in Tokyo at Okasan Asset Management Co.
 Operation Failure The BOJ bought 262 trillion yen of Japan’s treasury-discount bills from financial companies today after offering to buy the securities with yields at 0005 percentage point below market rates.
 “The BOJ has to continue to buy bills at a rapid pace until at least November to achieve its monetary-base target” Japan’s three-month treasury bill yield was minus 009 percent, while the six-month rate was minus 005 percent.
 Vodafone, the world’s second-largest wireless carrier by customers, agreed to buy Ono in March as part of a plan to add Internet and TV services across Europe.
 Trading Slump It’s become increasingly difficult to buy and sell debt as new regulations prompt Wall Street banks to curtail their holdings.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne is inviting expressions of interest from potential buyers of the UK’s 40 percent holding in Eurostar, which is majority owned by France.
 At the end of the auction, SNCF retains a legal right to buy the stake at a 15 percent premium to the best bid.
 “They just haven’t been able to do anything” Talisman, which has operations spanning six continents, has struggled to find buyers for assets from Southeast Asia to Texas as it seeks higher prices than acquirers are willing to pay, according to people familiar with the efforts.
 Troubled Unit Repsol, Spain’s largest oil producer, had explored a takeover but couldn’t find buyers for Talisman holdings including the company’s North Sea unit, said people with knowledge of the matter, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 “The management and board have to stick to their plan” Shale Plays The company has an opportunity to boost shares by successfully finding a partner to develop its Duvernay shale holdings in Canada and a buyer for its midstream Marcellus shale assets in the US, said Chris Cox, an analyst at Raymond James Ltd.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Men are more likely than women to mistakenly trust myths about buying insurance.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar Airways’s deal to buy as many as 20 Gulfstream business jets will more than double the size of the corporate charter fleet at the second-biggest Gulf carrier.
 “There was some value-buying in beaten down sectors such as utilities and metals toward the end,” Alex Mathews, head of research with Geojit BNP Paribas Financial Services Ltd, said by phone today.
 shale oil and gas, buying Brigham Exploration Co.
 Romania’s economic recovery, government austerity and steps to strengthen local banks may help the notes maintain the outperformance at a time when the Fed is weeks away from ending its bond-buying program, according to Societe Generale SA.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Private-equity investors are expected to buy European insurance assets in 2015 as more companies sell non-essential businesses, according to a Towers Watson report.
 The value of deals fell by more than 50 percent year-on-year, with many buyers remaining hesitant about making transformational acquisitions, according to the report.
 Ann has been under pressure from some investors to consider putting itself up for sale since at least August, when Engine Capital LP and Red Alder LLC said the retailer could fetch $50 to $55 a share in buyout.
 relies on such testing and disclosures when deciding whether to approve highway products and reimburse states that buy them.
 “For sustainable, long-term investors it makes a very decent story to buy into” So far shareholders have been reluctant to ratify the story.
 Last month, SAP agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 Under the terms of the 2013 agreement, Merrimack, New Hampshire-based GT Advanced was required to supply millions of units of sapphire that Apple wasn’t obligated to buy, and had to maintain certain key employees, Squiller said.
 “The market doesn’t like uncertainties and therefore thesold positions rise compared to the buy ones,” said Marcelo Aguiar, a Sao Paulo-based equity analyst at Goldman Sachs GroupInc.
 “Usiminas is now in a scenario in which the controllingshareholders’ strategies are misaligned,” Santander analystsled by Felipe Reis in Sao Paulo said after lowering theirrecommendation to the equivalent of sell from buy.
 “There are several possibilities that may happen,including Nippon buying out Ternium and triggering tag alonerights,” he said by telephone.
 “Their pricing improvement was much better than expected, and this could have a positive impact on earnings,” said Thomas Besson, a Paris-based analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux, who recommends buying the shares.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Joseph Beben wasn’t in the market for a house until he heard about a year-old community in suburban Phoenix where 10 homebuilders are offering buyers incentives such as swimming pools, built-in barbecues and subsidized mortgage rates.
 “Frankly, in a master plan with 10 other builders, and all offering concessions and you choose not to, then you need to make sure you buy your salesperson a high-quality TV set so they have something to do while they’re sitting alone” Phoenix and other markets where bargain-hunters pushed prices up the most in the past two years have many residents who lost homes to foreclosures after the crash -- which is also why FHA loans have become popular.
 “When you take the FHA limit down to $271,000, you hit us right in our sweet spot” FHA mortgages for new homes in the Phoenix area fell 39 percent in August from a year earlier, while the number of buyers financing existing homes with the government-insured loans gained 12 percent, according to RL Brown Housing Reports, a consulting company based in Scottsdale, Arizona.
 “A couple of the builders said to me, ‘What will it take for you to buy this home?’ That’s kind of drastic when they say something like that.
 Ehlen and Stacia, his wife and business partner, said they’ve recently brokered deals for two other new-home buyers, including one who got $38,452 in discounts, free window blinds and coverage of closing costs.
 “If people qualify to buy, there are some great deals to be had,” Stacia Ehlen said.
 Clearinghouses such as LCH Clearnet, majority owned by the London Stock Exchange Group Plc, and Deutsche Boerse AG’s Eurex Clearing operate as central counterparties buy and sell orders, and traders post collateral to reduce the threat of default.
 “It just didn’t work, even though I clicked ‘yes’ to all of them!” Online Browsing The first obstacle to many overseas buyers on Korean websites is their choice of Internet browser.
 Marubeni and Winsway Enterprises Holdings agreed to buy stakes in Calgary-based Grande Cache in 2011, the year that the price of coal peaked, paying a 70 percent premium over its market value on the Toronto Stock Exchange.
 Up Energy Development Group has agreed to buy Marubeni’s 40 percent and Winsway’s 427 percent stakes in the Canadian miner, and will assume its obligations including a bank loan, the Hong Kong-listed company said in a statement yesterday.
 Buyback Right Marubeni retains the right to buy back 1578 percent of Grand Cache, and Winsway 1686 percent, over the next five years, according to Up Energy’s statement.
 “There’s an approval process which could take a number of years before the carmaker will start buying that component from that supplier.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Norway’s sovereign wealth fund, the world’s largest, agreed to buy the Bank of America Merrill Lynch Financial Centre in London for 5825 million pounds ($944 million) as it expands its bet on the UK.
 “GIC’s decision must have been driven by broader portfolio considerations” Norway’s state fund in 2010 agreed to buy a $772 million stake in London’s Regent Street from the Crown Estate and in August snapped up a stake in London’s Mayfair district for 343 million pounds.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- AEW Europe plans to buy as much as 4 billion euros ($5 billion) of European real estate in the next three years as demand from Asian investors spreads across the region.
 The firm hopes to reduce risk by buying properties away from the spotlight.
 The company is putting together a group of investors to buy out LSK’s stake, he said.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Part of the thrill of buying a Lamborghini is having an engine that growls louder than just about anything else on the road.
 The auto industry is struggling to comply with ever tighter environmental regulations and still meet consumer demand for cars that are affordable and offer the performance buyers expect.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- CEZ AS, the largest Czech power maker, will probably not buy Enel SpA’s entire 66 percent stake in the Slovak utility Slovenske Elektrarne AS if it makes a bid for the assets, Chief Executive Officer Daniel Benes said.
 “I don’t think it would be prudent for CEZ to buy Enel’s entire stake in Slovenske Elektrarne,” Benes said.
 capacity to take advantage of natural gas that has become abundant and cheap with increased production in shale formations, said Kevin Sterling, an analyst at BB&T Capital Markets who recommends buying Kirby shares.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- The euro climbed the most since March as the European Central Bank failed to provide details on the size of a plan to buy private debt, curbing bets it would expand the ECB’s balance sheet enough to weaken the currency.
 The euro gained from almost a two-year low as ECB President Mario Draghi unveiled plans to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities for at least two years.
 Doft predicted that the company will also buy back a “significant amount” of its shares over the next two years.
 Selling vacant properties in Italy’s slumping commercial property market will be a challenge for the government because the assets often require “intense” management from local partners and significant investment from potential buyers to improve them, Catella said.
 Investors placed a record $629 billion last year into mutual funds that buy leveraged loans, which are mostly speculative-grade, aren’t regulated as securities and trade by appointment only, Lipper data show.
 “The increased sensitivity of credit markets could make the exit process more volatile, potentially undermining the ability of the financial system to support the recovery” The concern is the more investors buy obscure assets, the less flexible they’ll be during a market disruption.
 While Treasury trading surged, buying and selling in debt such as corporate bonds remained more than 20 percent below record levels.
 “Yields jump, markets panic, and risky assets will be the first to go” Fed Tapering Almost six years after the Fed started buying bonds and holding benchmark interest rates at about zero, investors are trying to prepare for a withdrawal of easy-money policies.
 With the European Central Bank preparing its own stimulus, investors are faced with either settling for the lowest yields on record on government bonds or buying riskier assets.
 “Even when prices go down, it’s hard to buy paper,” said Gershon Distenfeld, the New York-based director of high-yield debt at AllianceBernstein Holdings LP.
 can’t challenge the private-equity firm’s $26 billion buyout of the publicly traded credit business KKR Financial Holdings LLC as an insider deal, a judge concluded.
 KKR’s acquisition of KKR Financial, commonly known as KFN, in an all-stock deal, didn’t amount to a controlling-shareholder buyout that shortchanged investors, Delaware Chancery Court Judge Andre Bouchard ruled.
 The ruling comes less than two weeks after KKR and other buyout firms such as Blackstone Group LP won initial approval of a settlement of investor suits claiming the companies colluded to hold down the value of acquisitions.
 Investors argued the buyout amounted to an insider deal that shortchanged shareholders.
 Control Issue Lawyers for KFN investors said in court filings that under the unit’s management agreement with KKR, the buyout firm handles all operations and KFN has no employees.
 The buyout “was approved by a majority of the shares held by disinterested stockholders of KFN in a vote that was fully informed,” Bouchard said.
 The French company hasn’t been holding substantial talks with prospective buyers in weeks, one of the people said.
 Mylan said in July it was buying Abbott’s generic drugs business in established markets to expand its presence in Europe, Japan and Canada.
 Comcast, which is seeking regulatory approval to buy rival Time Warner Cable Inc.
 mines and seeking buyers for the company’s Canadian and Australian assets.
 In a short sale, an investor sells a security it doesn’t own, betting the price will decline before it has to buy the shares to close the trade.
 Bernanke surprised traders by signaling that the central bank might start curtailing its record bond buying.
 Jay Baris, a New York-based partner and chairman of the investment-management practice at the Morrison & Foerster LLP law firm, said a lot of the onus falls on fund managers to make sure they’re not buying assets unsuitable for “hot money” clients who might disappear quickly.
 and Rio Tinto Group expanded supplies, pushing the market into a glut just as demand growth slowed in China, the biggest buyer.
 “With mills holding ample stocks of finished steel, buyers are unwilling to purchase significant quantities of iron ore” China’s economy will probably expand 73 percent this year, according to a Bloomberg survey of economists from Sept.
 and Poly Real Estate Group Co, the biggest developers, advanced at least 28 percent after the nation’s central bank said last week it was allowing a broader range of home buyers access to lower down payments and mortgage rates.
 People applying for a loan to buy a second home may get lower down payments and mortgage rates that were previously only available to first-time home buyers so long as they have paid off their initial mortgage, the People’s Bank of China said in a statement on Sept.
 The central bank also eased a ban on mortgages for people buying a third home.
 unit, Tracfone, doesn’t have its own network in the country and provides service by reselling minutes it buys wholesale from T-Mobile and other carriers.
 about buying parts of its Mexican mobile and landline units, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 “It’s not an easy sale” Beyond Financial Mexico’s Federal Telecommunications Institute, which must sign off on the breakup plan, will go beyond financial ties when it reviews potential buyers of America Movil’s assets, the president of the agency said in an interview earlier this week.
 Total debt levels for large leveraged buyouts have risen to 626 times Ebitda in the third quarter from 589 times in the first half of this year, according to Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ Leveraged Commentary & Data.
 mutual funds and exchange-traded funds that buy the debt, which is typically rated below investment grade, according to Lipper, a Thomson Reuters company supplying mutual fund data.
 Financing for Acosta Sales & Marketing’s buyout by Carlyle Group LP increased the Jacksonville, Florida-based company’s leverage to “well above” eight times Ebitda, according to a Sept.
 TravelClick Inc, a New York-based provider of technology services to the hotel industry, obtained $560 million of covenant-light term loans in May to back its $930 million buyout by private-equity firm Thoma Bravo LLC, according to Bloomberg data.
 “The expectation going in was the Fed would probably be dovish to minimize market reaction but instead they’re optimistic, which has resulted in slightly higher bond yields and equities down here” Inflation, Volatility Policy makers said that while inflation in the near term will probably be held down by lower energy prices, it repeated language from its September statement that “the likelihood of inflation running persistently below 2 percent has diminished somewhat” Concerns that Europe will slip into a recession just as Fed bond buying ends sent the S&P 500 down 74 percent from an all-time high of 2,01136 in mid-September through Oct.
 If they consume it on Monday, will they also consume it on Tuesday?” ADM’s three main units are focused on buying and selling crops, and processing corn and oilseeds into products that include biofuels, industrial chemicals and animal feed, as well as food.
 Last month he said that it’s “the beginning of the end of the bond market rally” after the European Central Bank unexpectedly cut interest rates and said it would start buying asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 The hedge-fund manager said today that was contingent on the ECB starting quantitative easing, or the buying of bonds.
 The airline announced a decision to buy double-decker A380s and start an international business-class service in 2010, breaking from the company’s model of low-fare travel using single-aisle Boeing Co.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Endo International Plc agreed to buy Auxilium Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 16 value, when Endo announced that it wanted to buy the Chesterbrook, Pennsylvania-based drugmaker for $2810 a share.
 Valeant has grown by buying smaller companies for their product lines.
 ADB and rival ABN Amro Group NV earlier this year cut the proportion of gems they’d finance, demanding that buyers of the stones front up more of their own cash.
 Cloud Software Lenders exchange documents with applicants and store records electronically so they are easily retrieved by regulators and the investors who eventually buy the loans.
 In addition, investors have forced lenders to buy back more than $81 billion of soured home loans because of faulty underwriting.
 Lenders are buying cloud technology because it’s more efficient and less costly than maintaining a staff to update proprietary software, said Rich Smith, chief marketing officer for Ditech Mortgage Corp, the fifth-largest nonbank lender.
 Homebuyers had moving vans full of furniture and nowhere to put it because of delays in closing their purchases.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- The Iraqi government has asked to buy 800 more Hellfire missiles from the US, according to a Pentagon spokeswoman.
 Soybean prices have tumbled into a bear market in the past five months, touching a four-year low, leaving some growers unable to find buyers.
 “Buyers are not in the slightest hurry to buy,” Celeres’ Galvao said.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Argentine stocks fell the most in the world amid speculation the government is pressuring traders to stop buying local shares to sell abroad for dollars, a practice used to skirt currency controls.
 CME, owner of the world’s biggest futures market, said in July it would buy GFI for $580 million to expand its reach into European energy trading.
 “You could risk losing some of the talent you’re trying to buy in the process” GFI Chairman Gooch and Lutnick still own large portions of the competing companies they founded.
 BGC had wanted to buy its rival for years and was surprised when the CME deal was announced, according to a September statement by BGC.
 Kotowski has the equivalent of a buy recommendation on the bank’s shares.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Germany’s 10-year bonds halted a six-day advance as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said a plan to buy asset-backed securities to boost the economy would begin this quarter.
 Draghi vowed last month the ECB would buy “a broad portfolio” of ABS.
 He told a press conference in Naples the institution would also begin buying covered bonds.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries posted a loss for the first time in in six weeks before the Federal Reserve holds a meeting next week where policy makers are forecast to end monthly bond-buying.
 They are on course to end a third round of bond buying, or quantitative easing, that has been in place since September 2012.
 Russian stock buyers should wait for the stabilization of the oil price and geopolitical de-escalation, JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 He said he approached the Atlanta-based soda giant about buying his business and the overture was rejected.
 The nine-hour disruption affected the same-day electronic transfers used by homebuyers, delaying some payments until late into the evening.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index dropped 13 percent amid concern over weaker economies in Europe and geopolitical turmoil as the Federal Reserve prepares to end its bond-buying program.
 Vice Chairman Rajiv Singh and four other employees were also banned from “buying, selling or otherwise dealing in securities, directly or indirectly, in any manner” for three years as the company suppressed information when it sold shares for the first time in 2007, the Securities and Exchange Board of India said in an order posted on its website.
 The volatility caught traders off guard, spurring them to buy back futures to cover short sales and contributing to a spike in the VIX during that time, according to Ramon Verastegui, the head of engineering and strategy at Societe Generale SA.
 While hedge funds decrease wagers on lower volatility in favor of long positions, buyers are still piling into an exchange-traded note derived from short positions in VIX futures.
 Those shareholders will also buy 477 million shares from Public Investment Corp, South Africa’s largest fund manager, for 2 billion rand.
 declined 10 percent after TD Securities cut the stock’s rating to hold from buy.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- As bets pile up against Japanese stocks, investors with $293 billion in client assets see the pessimism as a signal to buy.
 20, a Nikkei newspaper report the country’s $12 trillion pension fund would buy local shares roused the Topix from a three-week rout.
 and buyout firm TPG since December 2012, could attract interest from buyout firms including AEA Investors LP and Silverfleet Capital Partners LLP, said the people, asking not to be identified because the talks are private.
 “These measures will result in savings that can be put to more productive use such as spending on education and health care, a better and wider public transportation system, and on the country’s security” Before the latest adjustment, Malaysia was among the 10 cheapest places to buy gasoline in a Bloomberg ranking of 61 countries using data as of April.
 sold most of the apartments they released over the weekend as protests that have paralyzed parts of Hong Kong kept some buyers away.
 26 may rock the confidence of homebuyers if the unrest persists.
 “The housing projects that attract more investor buyers may be more affected” by the protests, Henderson’s Lam said Oct.
 Developers have resorted to discounts and subsidies to lure buyers after the government slapped on three rounds of taxes to contain surging home prices.
 Double Cove buyers are entitled to a 6 percent rebate on stamp duty and as much as a 6 percent discount.
 There were only six transactions in ten existing housing estates tracked by Centaline, half of the deals in the previous weekend, as the demonstrations disrupted traffic and as buyers are drawn to the discounts offered on new homes, the realtor said in a e-mailed statement yesterday.
 While buyers have become more hesitant there haven’t been big price cuts by homeowners yet, Chris Wong, a Centaline director, said the same day.
 Gordon, who represented Oracle Corp’s Larry Ellison, music mogul David Geffen and Oprah Winfrey in their unsuccessful bid to buy the Los Angeles Clippers.
 It bodes well for not only future GDP growth, but future corporate profits as well” Interest Rates Stocks tumbled this week amid signs of economic weakness in Europe and geopolitical turmoil as the Federal Reserve is on course to end its bond-buying program this month.
 said it intends to use about $16 billion in external financing to buy Covidien, reaffirming its commitment to complete the acquisition of the drugmaker.
 jumped 51 percent to $1113 after Raymond James raised the company to market perform from underperform and Deutsche Bank added the stock to a short-term buy list.
 cut its rating to on the stock to reduce, the equivalent of a sell, from buy.
 The Moscow-based company’s billionaire Chief Executive Officer Vagit Alekperov said in May that he would use the $600 million of dividends he expected to receive this year to buy more shares, according to the letter.
 And with a lack of large-scale operations in the China, that means the 500X needs to be more than a Jeep in an Italian suit to win over discerning European buyers, said Arndt Ellinghorst, head of automotive research at ISI Group in London.
 The ECB has already implemented a negative deposit rate, offered cheap loans to banks and unveiled a plan to buy asset-backed securities.
 30, the industry had 286 percent of its assets in bank deposits, 405 percent in bonds, 10 percent in stocks and funds buying securities and the rest in other investments, the regulator said.
 in Aliso Viejo, California, shifted his company’s address to Canada by buying a smaller drugmaker there.
 “The numbers on Bank of Ireland look better than I thought,” said Eamonn Hughes, an analyst with Dublin-based Goodbody Stockbrokers, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 “You would think that people would be lining up now to get mortgages to buy a home,” Buffett said today at a conference hosted by Fortune magazine in Laguna Niguel, California.
 Slow wage growth and tighter lending standards have kept some would-be borrowers from buying a home.
 Buffett agreed last week to buy Van Tuyl Group, a collection of 78 car dealerships, in a bet that the industry will consolidate.
 ‘Good Liquidity’ “The winners are going to be companies that have cash on their balance sheet, unlevered balance sheets, low cash costs, the ability to be able to take advantage of the downturn by buying or building things,” he said.
 “We strongly believe this represents a great buying opportunity,” Yamana said last week in an e-mail.
 “If you are able to buy them at the right entry point, particularly when the sentiment is very negative, like now, you can really make a lot of money,” Jimenez Crespo said.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- It’s a good thing that some people can’t buy BlackBerry Ltd’s Passport phone, Chief Executive Officer John Chen said.
 Nest Labs, a digital-thermostat company that Google acquired earlier this year, said in a blog post today that it’s buying Boulder, Colorado-based Revolv.
 Google, betting that connected homes will help spread its technology and services, paid $32 billion in February to buy Nest, which in turn bought in-home camera company Dropcam Inc.
 In a statement yesterday, Techint’s Ternium SA subsidiary agreed to buy an additional 10 percent stake, bringing its holding to 38 percent.
 Newbury, England-based Vodafone is a possible buyer, one of the people said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Even after buying DirecTV and its 18 million subscribers in Latin America, AT&T Inc.
 DirecTV has been testing wireless Internet access, when it may make more sense to buy large landline networks that already have broadband subscribers, he said.
 Dallas-based AT&T is among the companies that America Movil SAB has contacted about buying $175 billion of Mexican wireless and landline businesses, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 Carlos Slim’s America Movil has said the buyer needs to be new to the Mexican market to create more competition.
 “AT&T is already buying TV subscribers in Latin America, so if America Movil is divesting landline and wireless assets in Mexico, then AT&T can then buy those and offer a triple or even a quad play in Mexico,” Sweeney said.
 Now he’s thinking of buying more shares.
 “When we see a great company at a good price we’ll step in and buy it rather than try to time the market bottom” Energy stocks are suffering the worst losses in a market retreat that’s erased about C$227 billion from the value of Canadian stocks since Sept.
 We just raised cash today, so not in the market as a buyer” Suncor Energy Inc.
 She pointed to the companies’ “solid” management and production growth as evidence the stocks are a good buy.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 Helen of Troy in February said it would buy back $550 million of its shares.
 EDT in a German challenge to the ECB bond-buying plan posed by Germany’s Federal Constitutional Court.
 ECB President Mario Draghi told reporters in Naples today that the central bank will buy assets for at least two years to boost inflation and economic growth in the 18-nation euro area.
 It will start purchasing covered bonds this month and plans to buy asset-backed securities from this quarter.
 To secure deliveries, buyers are paying record premiums that probably will remain near all-time highs for at least another three months, London-based researcher CRU said after the ruling.
 Goldman is seeking a buyer for Metro and JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 Risk Spur ECB buying “spurs risk-on and takes some of the fear bid out of the market,” said Larry Milstein, managing director in New York of government-debt trading at RW.
 Beale, who took over as CEO of the world’s oldest insurance market in January, said many businesses are not yet alert to the risks of an attack on their computer systems or the need to buy coverage.
 The European Commission said the Spanish measures unfairly rewarded companies for buying stakes in foreign competitors.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Apax Partners LLP agreed to buy Exact Holding NV for 730 million euros ($930 million) to back the Dutch business-software provider’s push into cloud computing.
 Private-equity firm Advent International agreed in November to buy cloud-software maker Unit4 for about 115 billion euros.
 Lenders big and small have imposed credit standards above those required by the two government-controlled companies to reduce buybacks.
 You have this heavy penalty environment and you want people to lend more: Those are two conflicting things” Buyback Offenses Watt, a former Democratic congressman who oversees Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, outlined the types of offenses, including misrepresentations and data inaccuracies, that will require banks to buy back defaulted loans over their lifespan.
 The FHFA plans to exempt lenders in some case who make one-time errors from buying back mortgages.
 Reassess Overlays To broaden lending, Watt added, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac may start to buy mortgages with down payments as low as 3 percent.
 use “overlays” -- restrictions tougher than those required by Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac -- to reduce their buyback risk.
 The ranks of first-time buyers are at an all-time low.
 In May, Watt had provided some initial clarification on buybacks, saying lenders wouldn’t be held accountable even if loans had as many as two late payments in the first three years.
 “Although mortgage bankers may sign on to the changes, that won’t indicate a new level of trust in a relationship that has shifted consistently against them for 7 years” The best thing FHFA could do to help calm banks’ concerns about buybacks is establishing a set period, such as 24 months, of on-time payments that would free them of all responsibility for the life of the loan without exceptions, Jaret Seiberg, an analyst at Guggenheim Securities LLC, said in a research note on Oct.
 Seiberg said in an interview that legal penalties from errors are an even bigger risk than buybacks.
 unveiled new iPads and Macintosh computers in the second wave of Tim Cook’s biggest product push, as the chief executive officer works to lure new buyers during the crucial holiday shopping season.
 Twenty-seven analysts whose ratings are tracked by Bloomberg say investors should buy the stock, with five saying hold and two recommending sell.
 Seventeen analysts say investors should buy the stock while two say hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 jumped 67 percent, its biggest gain since July 2013, after revenue and adjusted earnings beat estimates and the company said it accelerated its share buyback program.
 After the securities lost 19 percent in the three months through September, some investors are buying again: The two biggest junk-bond exchange-traded funds received $6179 million of deposits yesterday alone, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Until then, Synchrony has said it won’t pay out excess capital through dividends or stock buybacks.
 Relative Value The Topix has rebounded 13 percent from an April 14 low through amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 UBS cut its rating on the stock to neutral from buy and lowered its share price target.
 Eisai declined 1 percent to 4,2955 yen after Nomura cut its outlook on the stock to neutral from buy.
 The Federal Reserve, which is on track to announce the end of its bond-buying program this month, is assessing whether the recovery in the world’s largest economy is strong enough to withstand higher interest rates.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said the ECB will buy assets for at least two years to boost inflation and economic growth in the euro area.
 added 22 percent as the mobile carrier said it will buy Korean TV program distributor DramaFever Corp.
 “When you align a number of technical indicators together, it’s telling you to buy,” said Hiroichi Nishi, an equities manager at SMBC Nikko Securities Inc.
 The company agreed to buy DramaFever, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers, adding to the Japanese carrier’s spate of online content acquisitions.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- It’s time for Big Blue to shift some of its buyback budget to takeovers.
 IBM already spent more than $100 billion on buybacks in the last decade alone.
 Rometty has used share buybacks and job cuts as part of her effort to doggedly increase earnings and divert investors’ attention away from falling sales.
 It also had $46 billion in debt, thanks in part to buybacks it financed with borrowings.
 There has to be some kind of security that doesn’t allow the real data to scamper out of the building” IBM could also buy its way to a greater share of data-analytics and artificial-intelligence markets, Lowenstein said.
 Altice this year agreed to buy French mobile-phone carrier SFR in a $23 billion deal as part of a plan to combine the asset with Drahi’s Numericable Group.
 Iliad SA yesterday scrapped its offer to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile, joining Sprint Corp.
 “They’re doing very, very well in the current environment” T-Mobile has done a good job understanding what consumers are looking for, including more simplified pricing plans, said Smithen, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock and expects it to reach $34.
 Legere, speaking two weeks ago at a conference in Seattle, said his employees still have post-traumatic stress disorder from AT&T’s failed attempt to buy the wireless carrier in 2011.
 “They probably can’t buy all the Japanese stocks they need to get to 25 percent by the time they announce it.
 David Einhorn, president of Greenlight Capital Inc, recommended investors buy the two renewable power companies, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 The retailer plans to raise capital by offering shareholders $625 million of notes plus warrants to buy additional stock, an attempt to give the company time to return to profitability.
 rallied 84 percent, the biggest gain in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, to $6543 after a partnership it controls agreed to buy QEP Resources Inc’s natural-gas pipeline and processing unit for $25 billion.
 “Banks have more capital and their ability to support losses is greater now than it was” Reassured by the capital banks have raised, investors’ new-found readiness to buy securities that can incur losses even before equity suffers has helped boost the CoCo market to about $62 billion within 18 months of the first notes being sold.
 The government of former Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki initiated legal actions to block companies from buying Kurdish oil.
 The Paris-based telecommunications provider abandoned a plan to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile US Inc.
 The company lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make the material, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 The moves will be more volatile, especially with the Fed extracting themselves as one of the main buyers of Treasuries” Hedge-fund managers and other large speculators as of Oct.
 Support for anti-euro groups such as Alternative for Germany has risen and the ECB’s latest plan to buy assets sparked an outcry within all major parties.
 “Draghi wants the ECB to be a central bank like any other, one that can go and buy government debt.
 Germany’s Federal Constitutional Court has already expressed doubts about the legality of the two-year-old pledge to buy bonds of stressed countries after a challenge by a German lawmaker and a group of academics.
 The company said profit was 7482 million pesos, 57 percent below the average estimate among five analysts, amid what Chief Executive Officer Arquimedes Celis called “a complicated consumer environment” “There was a bit of a surprise,” said Marco Montanez, an analyst at Vector Casa de Bolsa who said by telephone that he continues to recommend buying the shares.
 home price growth is slowing after regulators introduced mortgage restrictions to cool the market and buyers became wary of impending rises in interest rates.
 Rosneft, Russia’s biggest oil producer, halted a two-day gain after Bank of America cut its rating from buy.
 “We’re buying bonds.
 agreed to buy UK.
 “Clearly they have gone down the ‘buy’ rather than ‘make’ route,” Simpson said.
 Dealmaking in the semiconductor industry has picked up this year, with Infineon Technologies AG agreeing in August to buy International Rectifier Corp.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Intesa Sanpaolo SpA and UniCredit SpA, Italy’s biggest lenders, led European banking stocks lower after the European Central Bank failed to provide details on a plan to buy securities that were designed to unlock lending.
 European banks were pushed lower after ECB President Mario Draghi said in Naples, Italy, today that the central bank will start buying covered bonds this month and asset-backed securities by the end of of the year.
 say it’s time to buy after yields on high-yield, high-risk securities rose to the highest in a year on Sept.
 “We now see risk/reward as more attractive than it has been in over a year,” Morgan Stanley analysts Adam Richmond and Jeff Fong wrote in a report today titled “Buy High Yield” While junk-bond buyers seemed sanguine about risk earlier in the year as the market soared, “we no longer see the same complacency among investors in aggregate” After Fed officials bemoaned the $13 trillion market for showing “reach-for-yield” behavior earlier this year, investors have been souring on the notes that posted annualized returns of 186 percent since 2009.
 Some $22 billion has been pulled this year from mutual funds that buy the debt, with money going into higher-rated bonds and stocks instead, according to data compiled by Well Fargo & Co.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Russian billionaire Viktor Kharitonin agreed to buy a majority stake in the Nuerburgring, the German race track known as Green Hell for its challenging Formula One course.
 Kharitonin, chairman of Moscow-based Pharmstandard OJSC, agreed to buy two-thirds of the company that controls the Nuerburgring, according to a statement from the property’s administrators today.
 Kharitonin stepped in after Capricorn Automotive GmbH, an auto-parts maker that agreed to buy the Nuerburgring in March, failed to complete the acquisition, said Pietro Nuvoloni, a spokesman for the administrators.
 At least 16 Latinos have filed consumer complaints with the Illinois attorney general, saying Herbalife duped them into buying tens of thousands of dollars worth of products they couldn’t sell.
 The market downturn prompted the central bank to ease mortgage policies for some homebuyers on Sept.
 Short sellers bet that a stock will decline, borrowing shares to sell with the expectation of buying them back later at a lower price.
 “It is certainly possible fair value could fall significantly” For Olivia Engel, State Street Corp’s Sydney-based head of Asia-Pacific active quantitative equity, the valuations are a reason not to buy.
 The developer’s first project was holiday homes aimed at Hong Kong buyers.
 It began targeting local Chinese buyers the 1997 Asian financial crisis affected the city’s economy.
 has accepted about 80 volunteer buyouts from employees in its Standard & Poor’s ratings unit, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Catherine Mathis, a spokeswoman for McGraw Hill, declined to comment on the buyouts.
 Potential buyers “will see no way of getting their growth or actually keeping themselves from shrinking, or margins deteriorating, and they see this as their only option,” Greenberg, the chief executive officer of the Zurich-based insurer, said on a conference call today.
 last month agreed to buy Producers Ag Insurance Group from CUNA Mutual Group for $110 million to diversify into the business of guarding farmers against losses.
 cable-television company says it will shed 25 million customers in Detroit and other Midwestern and Southern communities as part of a plan to buy No.
 The new company will buy management services from Charter Communications Inc, which has a debt ratio of 51 times Ebitda.
 Charter, which had sought to buy Time Warner Cable, would own a 33 percent interest in GreatLand and become the second-largest US.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Japanese shares fell, with the Topix index dropping for the first time in three days, as the yen extended gains after the Bank of Japan kept its bond-buying program unchanged in a policy decision today.
 The Topix has rebounded 14 percent from an April 14 low amid optimism about the global economy and speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Saipem SpA’s shares surged in Milan after the chief executive of OAO Rosneft was quoted as saying the Russian company would be interested in buying a stake from Eni SpA if it’s put up for sale.
 That measure sought to rein in entities that buy patents in order to demand nuisance royalties from as many companies as possible.
 “Just the appointment of the new central bank governor is an indication that there are still things we get right as a country” While FirstRand pulled out of the bidding to buy Mainstreet Bank Ltd, it’s still looking for “bolt-on acquisitions” in Nigeria, said Nxasana.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Nuevo Midstream LLC, a Texas pipeline company backed by private-equity firm EnCap FlatRock Midstream, is seeking a buyer and could fetch $15 billion, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Nuevo, which is working with Barclays Plc on the sale, has drawn interest from potential buyers including Oneok Inc.
 Takeovers involving companies that help transport, store and process oil and natural gas after have surged this year, as buyers including Enterprise Products Partners LP and Energy Transfer Partners LP bulk up to handle increased US.
 agreed to buy three of its operating units for $44 billion, in the year’s largest energy deal.
 EnCap Flatrock, an affiliate of buyout firm EnCap Investments LP, primarily invests in pipeline companies.
 to buy 24 million rand ($219 million)worth of shares in television equipment company Ellies HoldingsLtd.
 Looking forward, the money manager may buy more Greek debt with longer maturities.
 to buy Greece’s government bonds in April, last week said it has sold all its holdings of the nation’s debt on expectations that the European Central Bank won’t “launch a full-blown quantitative easing” program of securities purchases that will support the market.
 BRF, KKR and CVC are bidding for the whole company, known as Americana, which would then be split between the buyers if the bid is successful, said the people, who asked not to be identified because talks are private.
 The company entered into talks with Americana in 2012 to buy its food business, one of the people said.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Mark Cuban, the billionaire owner of the Dallas Mavericks, said he’s buying shares of Netflix Inc.
 “I’m buying NFLX stock,” Cuban tweeted today.
 “At half of YHOO, 10B<Twitter and small pct of major media companies, someone will try to buy them” Cuban, 56, is buying a stock that is trading near its lowest level in five months after slumping more than 20 percent in two days.
 ‘Bargain’ Cuban followed up on his original tweet by responding to a Twitter user asking whether companies would think twice before buying Netflix because of its off-balance-sheet liabilities.
 “The value of nflx is so much more than its price that even if a buyer wrote a 8b check to pay it off its a bargain,” Cuban said.
 The number of homes changing hands fell about 20 percent so far this month, compared with the same period in September, as buyers and sellers become more cautious, according to Sammy Po, residential chief executive at realtor Midland Holdings Ltd.
 Homeowners aren’t in a hurry to offload their properties, even as some potential buyers are deterred by the city’s political uncertainties, according to Citigroup Inc.
 Developers have lured buyers from the existing home market with discounts and subsidies, narrowing the premium that usually is paid for new flats, since the government slapped on three rounds of taxes aimed to control surging prices.
 December Showdown If Allergan doesn’t buy Salix or find another deal, the stage will be set for a showdown in December that could determine the company’s fate.
 stocks rallied for the week, capping a monthly advance and returning benchmark indexes to records, as better-than-estimated earnings and economic data eased concern about the end of Federal Reserve bond buying.
 Optimism in the economy and better-than-estimated earnings fueled a rebound after the index had tumbled 74 percent from its September record on concerns that Europe will slip into a recession and that growth was slowing in China just as the Fed ends its monthly bond buying.
 “The buy-the-dip philosophy came back stronger than ever as everybody said the correction is behind us and the opportunity to buy stocks on sale is now,” Brian Peery, co-portfolio manager at Novato, California-based Hennessy Advisors Inc, said by phone.
 Equities slipped the next day after the Fed announced the end of its bond buying program.
 The biotechnology drug company will raise its dividend 30 percent in the first quarter 2015 and plans to buy back as much as $2 billion of stock through the end of next year.
 The tire maker reported earnings that topped analysts’ estimates and said it would buy up to $150 million worth of stock.
 2, when European Central Bank President Mario Draghi stopped short of spelling out how many assets the ECB might buy to head off deflation.
 Fast-Forward Fast-forward to last month, when Draghi cut the ECB’s three main interest rates and announced an asset-buying plan to boost inflation and revive economic growth.
 2, when Draghi said the ECB will buy assets for at least two years for as much as 1 trillion euros ($13 trillion).
 Job Cuts “There really are two different buyers and there are different buying criteria,” he said.
 I think Iliad really meant it seriously given the resources they invested in the process, but it was a desperate attempt of the small guy buying the big guy” Bouygues Overture T-Mobile won’t be Niel’s first major setback.
 Earlier this year, Iliad tried to get its hands on Bouygues’s mobile network as Bouygues sought to buy Vivendi SA’s SFR -- only to have the plan scuttled when Vivendi sold SFR to Numericable Group.
 Private Equities Iliad had held talks with potential partners including buyout firm KKR & Co.
 Today’s report from AB InBev comes amid speculation that the brewer could seek to buy its main competitor SABMiller, the maker of Grolsch and Peroni.
 So in some sense you could say that sanctions have helped us with a number of decisions that will cut costs’’ On plan to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil trading unit: ‘‘I want to talk about our intentions.
 Morgan Stanley found a buyer.
 And now the regulator won’t allow the buyer to conclude this deal” “There is a contradiction here.
 I think that is precisely why we never considered buying this asset.
 I think he has weighed all of these risks when deciding to buy.
 If you look at those who have been buying shares of Bashneft during this volatile period you can make conclusions without me as to who is spreading these rumors and why.
 There should be compliance -- I insist -- with applicable laws and principles” “When I buy shares I hold myself financially responsible.
 If buying is allowed, it means it is not in any way forbidden.
 Sinopec also announced yesterday that it’ll buy its parent China Petrochemical Corp’s stake in a refinery at the Saudi city of Yanbu for $562 million.
 said it may acquire properties owned by its next chief executive officer a day after a board member said the oil and natural gas producer has been approached by buyers.
 Boone Pickens said yesterday that the company has drawn interest from buyers.
 “Obviously, they’re concerned about the rapid degradation of their stock price so they are trying to articulate that they have some sort of plan” The company rejected an $1850-a-share buyout bid in 2011 from Chairman and CEO Douglas Miller.
 Greek and Portuguese bonds extended their gains from yesterday even as ECB Governing Council member Luc Coene said there was “no concrete proposal” to buy corporate bonds.
 ‘Stay Long’ ECB officials are “moving more rapidly than the consensus recognizes and that stories of some preparation on sovereign buying should not be ruled out,” Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc analysts, including London-based fixed-income strategist Harvinder Sian, wrote in a note to clients today.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group again increased their unsolicited joint bid to buy banana producer Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 The European Central Bank started buying covered bonds on Oct.
 say Treasuries are poised to fall as the Federal Reserve approaches the end of its bond-buying stimulus program.
 Investors will demand a concession to buy longer-dated debt as the Fed withdraws from a market where it bought 41 percent of this year’s gross issuance of Treasuries due in more than 20 years, Pimco said in a report.
 They kept their pledge to maintain interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after the asset buying stops.
 ECB President Mario Draghi has said he’ll start a programthis month to buy asset-backed securities and covered bondsPolicy makers gathering today in Italy are under pressure to actafter his pledge to add as much as 1 trillion euros ($126trillion) to the bank’s balance sheet failed to rein in bets ona worsening price outlook in the euro area.
 Global Turmoil “With oil at a four-year low and inflation under control, domestic cues are positive, but we’ll have to wait for semblance of sanity to return to the global markets before we see buying emerge in Indian equities,” Ajay Bodke, head of investment strategy and advisory with Prabhudas Lilladher Pvt, said in an interview to Bloomberg TV India today.
 equities slumped on concern over the end of the Federal Reserve’s stimulatory bond-buying program.
 The European Central Bank is expected to announce today details of its plan to buy asset-backed securities after it unveiled a series of stimulus measures to boost credit lending and combat the threat of deflation.
 power company by market value, agreed to buy a 150-megawatt solar project in California from First Solar Inc.
 First Solar, a panel maker, will buy back a minority stake in the project, which it acquired last year from a group including a Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Sempra Energy’s San Diego Gas & Electric has agreed to buy power from the solar farm under a 25-year contract.
 Fidelity Worldwide Investment’s Dominic Rossi, who oversees global equities from London at the fund manager, said today that he plans to buy US.
 Boston Properties The firm said its buyout portfolio appreciated 37 percent in the third quarter, outpacing the 06 percent advance in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index of large US.
 The gain compared with a 3 percent increase in the buyout holdings at Carlyle Group LP, which releases fund performance earlier than its full earnings.
 Schwarzman said that while a worsening market decline would eventually make it harder to exit investments through initial public offerings, Blackstone has other ways to realize profits, such as selling companies to strategic buyers or competitors, or extracting dividends through recapitalizations.
 “A market readjustment might delay certain public-market dispositions in the near term, but if the timing is impacted we’d expect out companies to continue to grow very nicely while we wait” The firm is seen as a bellwether for the buyout industry given its size and reach across markets.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul and then sell them.
 James said the firm will start raising money for its seventh global buyout fund by year-end and for its eighth opportunistic real estate pool early next year.
 economy expanded faster than forecast last quarter, signaling growth is strong enough to withstand the end of Federal Reserve bond buying.
 District Judge David Carter that Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP used inside information about Valeant’s plans to buy the shares starting in February.
 “Pershing Square got the opportunity to buy $4 billion of Allergan stock knowing that a hostile bid at a higher price was imminent,” Wald said.
 Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, is seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 Pershing Square and Valeant ruled out a tender offer at the time he was buying Allergan shares because they thought Allergan would have adopted a poison pill to block that approach, he said.
 Pershing Square isn’t offering to buy Allergan’s shares as part of the Valeant bid; it doesn’t control the terms of the offer; and it won’t have control over the resulting company, Allergan said.
 “It is nice to hear somebody who’s got a more level view,” said Gengaro, who rates the shares a buy and owns none.
 “It’s like going and buying a safe that a million people have been able to use for the last five years,” he said.
 “I’m constantly afraid the rear suspension will break and my family and I will get hurt, especially when we are traveling at high speeds” The car owners demanded the Wolfsburg, Germany-based automaker replace the rear suspension or refund buyers.
 The outbreak of the fly-like insect known in Spanish as broca is forcing growers to sell to local buyers who pay less than export market prices, crimping profits, said Pedro Echeverria, a farmer in the northwestern province of Antioquia.
 “The cooperatives are buying it at very low prices” The benchmark Arabica coffee contract has doubled in price this year as a drought in Brazil, the world’s top producer, crimps output.
 The move came after French government officials said they were concerned that corporate decision-making was leaving the country, illustrated most recently by General Electric Co’s effort to buy Alstom SA.
 Shares of Mead Johnson reached a record this month on renewed speculation Danone would buy it.
 Commodity Futures Trading Commission members and staff are weighing whether to require that contracts for non-deliverable forwards be guaranteed at clearinghouses that accept collateral from buyers and sellers.
 “But there are a number of lingering questions around readiness and other market structure issues that we hope to learn more about” Non-deliverable forwards are contracts to buy or sell a currency in the future that are settled with cash rather than delivery of the currency.
 Last month, ZF Friedrichshafen AG agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 Jefferies LLC is facing a loss of about $10 million on Toms Shoes LLC debt after investors balked at buying into the loan at prices offered by the firm.
 Wall Street is either syndicating or has agreed to provide $52 billion of leveraged loans to back mergers and buyouts, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Recent “volatility” in credit markets and outflows from loan mutual funds have led to “much better” yields for buyers of new leveraged loans, Okada said.
 funds that buy leveraged loans, the most since August 2011, while extending the longest stretch of outflows since 2008, according to Lipper.
 Los Angeles-based Toms Shoes said in August that Bain agreed to buy a stake in the business and that Jefferies had committed to finance the deal.
 They had to cart over all the clients’ accounts and the systems” DBS, Southeast Asia’s biggest bank, said in March it agreed to buy the French bank’s private-banking operations in Singapore and Hong Kong as well as “selected parts” of its trust business for $220 million.
 “This is a good way for SolarCity to broaden the range of investors who are able to buy solar bonds, a new asset class,” Pavel Molchanov, an analyst at Raymond James in Houston, said today in an e-mail.
 “There will be a lower share price to buy into this company” CIMB cut its rating on Osim to hold from add and reduced its share-price forecast by 41 percent to S$237.
 “Gazprom isn’t a stock worth buying” Gazprom estimates Ukraine’s debt at $53 billion and is demanding $31 billion be paid by the end of the year in European Union-brokered talks on resuming deliveries.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Monsanto Co, the world’s largest seed company, is planning to restrict sales of its herbicides in Argentina to certified buyers in a bid to reduce incidents of incorrect spraying that pose health risks.
 The Federal Reserve is poised to end a program this month of asset-buying that drove investors to buy stocks, bonds and currencies in developing nations.
 Oil Fund to own morebarrels of crude each month as it sells the expiring futures andbuys the less expensive next-month contract.
 Chiquita Brands is scheduled to hold a shareholder meeting for a vote on its plan to buy Fyffes.
 The company reported earnings Wednesday that beat estimates, raised its forecast and was upgraded to a “strong buy” at Raymond James.
 agreed to buy a controlling stake in the Candelaria copper mining complex in Chile from Freeport-McMoRan Inc.
 In the streaming deal, Lundin will get $648 million upfront from Franco-Nevada, which will buy 68 percent of gold and silver production at a discount from Candelaria up to a certain level, after which it will be entitled to 40 percent of the metals.
 Less than a year after the buyout, the company bought back $95 million of Oak Hill’s shares.
 From 2009 through the first six months of 2014, the rate of premium luxury buyers who opted for all-wheel drive rose to 46 percent from 33 percent, according Edmundscom.
 markets for buying and developing real estate, topping San Francisco, as growth potential in the Texas cities draws investors from popular coastal areas, a survey shows.
 Another option considered was for UBS to buy a small bank, transfer the undeclared “black accounts” to it and then sell the acquisition.
 More than 40 percent of the 330 members in the Family Office Exchange are buying at least one private company a year, said Sara Hamilton, founder of the Chicago-based group.
 The New York firm that’s been investing money for the German automotive family was in talks earlier this year to buy a family-owned business based in California, said the person familiar.
 The Santos-led project will need gas and is the “most logical” buyer of the Arrow supplies, Hirjee said.
 of Nigeria to acquire Mainstreet Bank after it emerged as the preferred buyer for the nationalized lender.
 Amcon was set up in 2010 to buy bad loans and stabilize Nigeria’s banking industry after a debt crisis threatened the industry with collapse.
 Mainstreet is the second of the nationalized banks that needs a buyer.
 As monetary policy keeps bond yields low, more cash is being channeled into stocks as buyers scour markets for the best returns.
 This time around, banks are tightening their mortgage standards and some are targeting experienced landlords rather than the amateur investors who had been drawn to the so-called buy-to-let market.
 “The big mistake in the past was where borrowers were using their family home, taking some positive equity out,” to buy properties for lease, said Fergal McGrath, chief executive officer of Dublin-based Dilosk Ltd, which plans to start lending at the end of the year.
 “We’re targeting the professional landlord” Ireland’s buy-to-let market was almost wiped out by the country’s property crash.
 “We have certainly seen more interest in buy-to-let in recent months” Quirke said AIB borrowers could be couples who have paid more than half of their own mortgage and are trying to buy a property for their adult children before prices rise too much.
 AIB charges a 535 percent standard variable rate for buy-to-let loans, compared with 44 percent for owner-occupier loans.
 “The risk is much lower for buy-to-let than owner-occupier loans because they are getting borrowers to put up much bigger down payments than for private homes and charging them higher rates” Ireland’s central bank plans to impose limits for the first time on how much banks can lend home buyers, two people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi’s plan to buy asset-backed securities may give Irish banks access to cheaper money and buttress a lending revival.
 Draghi’s willingness to buy asset-backed securities and RMBS starting this month should make them easier to sell, resulting in lower coupon payments for Dilosk on the proposed securities.
 As a condition for European approval, Drillisch, a smaller carrier that doesn’t own a network, agreed to buy as much as 20 percent of the merged company’s network capacity over five years.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Tesco Plc shares had their best day in almost six months amid speculation that buyout firm TPG Capital Management LP is considering a 2 billion-pound ($32 billion) purchase of the grocer’s Dunnhumby data analysis unit.
 Publishing targeted weightings in advance would move markets, forcing the fund to buy at highs and sell at lows, he said in an interview on Oct.
 Robertson, 82, said last month at the Bloomberg Markets Most Influential Summit in New York that governments are buying bonds to “keep their countries moving along economically” He said today that low bond yields are forcing investors who would otherwise be allocating to bonds to invest in stocks.
 “He must have believed that he was buying at a price where there was room for disappointment” IBM has struggled to transform its business fast enough as more customers seek to store data and software on cloud-computing networks, rather than on site.
 Revenue Slump The investment was a departure for the billionaire, who has long said that he avoided buying stocks of technology firms for Berkshire because it was hard for him to understand their business plans and forecast their prospects.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 The selloff is “ridiculously overdone,” Ahmed, who has a buy rating on the stock, said today by phone.
 CFO’s View Chief Financial Officer Ramon Leal said Alfa hasn’t decidedwhether to buy, maintain or reduce its stake in Bogota-basedPacific, Colombia’s second-largest oil company.
 It could be something else, orsome other company, so we want to keep flexibility” David Neuhauser, a money manager at Livermore PartnersInc, an energy-focused hedge fund located in Northbrook,Illinois, said the size of Alfa’s stake in Pacific signals thatthe Mexican company is committed to buying the rest.
 It then sold the same amount of rupee-denominated bonds onshore, and had the offshore unit buy the debt.
 Companies with lower ratings are unlikely to sell bonds in India, regardless of the coupon, because local investors tend to buy only high-grade credits, S&P said.
 “Now that the ECB has also said Aareal has enough capital, Soffin can now allow the repayment without any diplomatic disruptions,” said Michael Seufert, an analyst at NordLB in Hanover, Germany with a buy recommendation on Aareal shares.
 With earnings projected to drop through the middle of next year, 83 percent of the Samsung analysts tracked by Bloomberg have the equivalent of buy ratings on the stock, versus 75 percent for the Cupertino, California-based iPhone maker.
 While prospects for a turnaround are among reasons for such recommendations, Samsung exemplifies the optimism voiced by an analyst community that rates about 70 percent of Korean stocks as buy, exceeding levels seen in markets such as the US, Russia and India.
 In June, he raised his rating on Samsung to a “strong buy” and elevated his 12-month target price to 22 million won -- double the stock’s current price -- and hasn’t looked back.
 Kim is among the 49 analysts, out of a total of 59, rating Samsung a buy -- Apple has 47 of 63 -- according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Not Alone While impressive relative to global peers, buy ratings from 83 percent of analysts isn’t that high for Samsung.
 As recently as three years ago, every single one of the 39 analysts covering the company at the time had a buy recommendation on the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 is rated buy by 85 percent of the 52 analysts covering the company, even though it’s got the worst-performing stock this year among major global carmakers.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- A key test for Apple Inc’s new iPads, which the company is set to unveil at an event today, will be whether the tablets attract more buyers like Bernie Moreno.
 The 47-year-old began using the iPad largely because it added an element of cool to his stores, and he is now looking for more reasons to buy.
 In total, global sales of tablets to businesses, institutions and governments are projected to surge to 101 million units in 2018 from 19 million in 2013, as market share of those buyers increases to 27 percent from 79 percent, according to IHS Technology.
 in July to sell to corporations so they could “be a catalyst for future iPad growth” Icahn’s Thinking The opportunities to increase iPad sales among business buyers is part of the reason activist investor Carl Icahn wrote in a shareholder letter last week that he believes Apple is undervalued and should be trading at $203, more than twice its current price.
 The company also is developing a bigger iPad, with a 129-inch screen to be introduced next year, people familiar with the plans have said, in a move that could further appeal to business buyers looking for more capabilities.
 “It’s of great interest for me to sell” Meriton Pty, Triguboff, 81, said in an interview in Sydney, adding that he last met with the interested buyer last week.
 Meriton has capitalized on the price gain by buying A$1 billion ($880 million) of land since January 2013.
 He’s talking with only one potential buyer, he said, and will sell only if the Chinese acquirer is willing to take over all of Meriton.
 They’re also following local buyers who are migrating.
 Meriton sells about 15 percent of its apartments to Chinese buyers, according to company figures.
 as well as Chinese investors had approached him through bankers to buy all or part of Meriton.
 Banks have now been net buyers for 12 straight months.
 While companies in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index are earning more than ever and carrying the lowest debt burdens in at least 24 years, the buying suggests that loan officers are less sanguine over the outlook for the US.
 “It’s not being fully utilized because of less demand, but also the banks have to be much safer,” which is why they’re buying Treasuries.
 Bond Demand Global banking regulations designed to reduce risk-taking and prevent a repeat of the 2008 crisis that devastated the financial industry suggests lenders will need to keep buying US.
 “Regulations are making them a price insensitive buyer of Treasuries,” Priya Misra, Bank of America’s head of US.
 to buy Greece’s government bonds in April, has sold all its holdings of the nation’s debt.
 People “buy bigger” in Indonesia, Jain said, raising his voice over the blare of a stereo as thousands inspected the latest models at a show dominated by sturdy sport utility vehicles and boxy multi-purpose cars.
 Tata Motors’ Jain says he thinks gradually increasing the fuel price will eventually make Indonesians more likely to buy smaller cars.
 agreed to buy Louisiana utility Cleco Corp.
 Under the agreement announced today, the buyers will keep a presence in Pineville, maintain rates and employee headcount and put at least four Louisiana residents on the board.
 Last month, Macquarie, a specialist in investing in regulated infrastructure assets, appeared to be faltering in its attempts to buy the utility because co-investors were skeptical of the returns, people familiar with the matter said at the time.
 “Its trades made up over 70 percent of the total Nasdaq trading volume of the affected stocks in the seconds before the close of almost every trading day” Athena targeted situations where buyers and sellers of Nasdaq stocks were out of balance, the SEC said.
 “I don’t think the oversight on trading is going to relax anytime soon” Nasdaq Messages Athena’s strategy was allegedly to take advantage of messages that Nasdaq sent out ahead of its close, which tell traders if there are imbalances between orders to buy and sell certain stocks.
 If an imbalance message showed a buy imbalance of 10,000 in a company’s shares, Athena would place an order to sell 10,000 shares at the close and then try to buy those 10,000 shares in the final few minutes of the day, the SEC said.
 The Swedish buyout firm bid for Nobel Biocare Holding AG, the Swiss maker of dental implants, before losing out to Danaher Corp.
 Companies can have an advantage to buyout firms in competitive bidding processes because they often have access to cheaper financing, and can reap more cost savings by integrating acquisitions with existing businesses.
 The divestments come as Siemens spends $76 billion to buy Dresser-Rand Inc.
 fracking market” Kaeser is concentrating on that industry as he seeks to catch up with the profitability of General Electric Co, which has agreed to buy France’s Alstom SA to expand its own energy offering.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Mobile TeleSystems, Russia’s largest wireless carrier, may buy a stake in handset retailer Svyaznoy to safeguard its sales channels, even as MTS’s billionaire owner remains under house arrest in connection with oil industry investments.
 There is little agreement among investors about the best course forward for Conn’s, said Tilghman, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Short sellers will only stand to gain if they hadn’t also been investing in Shire, using a typical arbitrage tactic of shorting the acquirer while buying shares in the target, said Ben Kelly, an event-driven analyst at Louis Capital Markets in London.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 Cameras capture the kids’ reactions, and parents later have a chance to buy the photos.
 The plan gives foreign investors unprecedented access to mainland shares while providing Chinese investors a channel to buy Hong Kong-listed equities.
 While the company is returning money to shareholders via stock repurchases and dividends, activist investor Carl Icahn has been pushing the company to accelerate the buyback program, saying the shares are trading at half their value.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Treasuries dropped as investors bet the Federal Reserve will end its third round of bond buying today even as it retains a commitment to low rates for an extended period.
 “While fracking costs run the gamut, producers often break even around $80 to $85” Traders seeking an angle on declining oil prices are turning to a tried-and-true “pairs trade” -- buying Exxon Mobil and shorting Apache.
 and ConocoPhillips -- are in a position to buy their way to more acreage” It makes us think that the $5 we saved at the gas pump isn’t really that much at all.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Archroma, the Swiss chemicals maker owned by SK Capital Partners LP, will buy BASF SE’s textile operations as Chief Executive Officer Alexander Wessels looks to build a $3 Billion sales company from assets divested by the chemical industry’s incumbent players including Clariant AG.
 “The volumes are low and there are very few cars in customer hands,” said John Krafcik, president of TrueCar Inc, an auto-buying website based in Santa Monica, California.
 They’ve started marketing the car, so if a consumer comes in and can’t buy one, then it becomes an inefficiency,” Krafcik said in a phone interview yesterday.
 and 11 states alleging the companies paid kickbacks to Medco Health Solutions Inc, based in Franklin Lakes, New Jersey, then the largest manager of employee prescription-drug benefits, to buy and recommend brand-name drugs including London-based AstraZeneca’s heartburn pill Nexium.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Enterprise Products Partners LP bought a stake in Oiltanking Partners LP and offered to buy the rest of the company in a proposal worth as much as $6 billion, the latest bet on the growing market for US.
 pipeline operator by market value, is buying a two-thirds stake in Oiltanking along with its general partner for about about $441 billion in cash and stock, the Houston-based companies said in separate statements today.
 fuel shipper to expand as the shale-fracking boom increases domestic supplies and draws interest from overseas buyers.
 Enterprise is also buying 2 percent of the general partner interest.
 Oi’s debt load led Bava to cut the highest dividend yield in the global telecommunications industry last year, initiate the Portuguese merger and hire Banco BTG Pactual SA to act as a vehicle to buy Tim Participacoes SA.
 Billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA cable holding company is interested in buying Portugal Telecom’s assets, a person familiar with the matter said this week.
 “They are making extra dollars per barrel off of that because they are buying that oil at a discount,” Rob Desai, an analyst for Edward Jones in St.
 It was able to buy oil at lower prices than analysts expected because of its ability to move it on pipelines and a fleet of more than 3,200 rail cars.
 The shares, which have 14 buy and seven hold recommendations from analysts, dropped 15 percent to $7639 at the close in New York.
 The bank, which shrank its leveraged loan book to 298 million euros ($378 million) at the end of June from 53 billion euros in 2008, according to company reports, has been assessing buying portions of the debt from underwriters, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they’re not authorized to speak about it.
 Mortgage Limits New regulatory limits on how much banks can lend home buyers may be an opportunity to grow business in other areas, Cyril Roux, deputy governor of the Central Bank of Ireland, said on Oct.
 While Liberty has also considered buying all of Expedia, the company’s chairman, Barry Diller, indicated “that’s not what he wanted,” Maffei said.
 Los Angeles-based Ares led a buyout of Floor and Decor for an undisclosed amount in November 2010.
 small businesses are dropping health insurance for their workers, as Obamacare lets them send employees to new marketplaces where they can often get subsidies from the government to buy coverage.
 While businesses with 100 or more employees have to offer coverage or pay a penalty, small businesses don’t, meaning it may make more sense for them and their employees to drop coverage and buy it elsewhere.
 Google is trying to woo customers with lower prices and simpler tools for buying cloud services, which are attracting companies that are looking to trim computing costs.
 for $275 million, the final piece of a $285 billion restructuring that involves selling its vaccines and animal health units and buying GlaxoSmithKline Plc’s cancer unit.
 Novartis said in April it would buy Glaxo’s cancer unit for as much as $16 billion, while selling its vaccines business, excluding flu shots, to the London-based company for $71 billion.
 The elimination of fuel subsidies that have cost Petrobras at least 60 billion reais during Rousseff’s first term would boost the company’s profit and its ability to buy goods and services from suppliers such as Halliburton, according to the Instituto Brasileiro de Petroleo, or IBP, a group that lobbies for the industry.
 Wealthy urbanites, we learned, were laying out noteworthy sums -- $25,000 in Brooklyn! $95,000 in Boston! -- to buy indoor parking spaces for their favorite rides via condominium-like real-estate deals.
 Dubai shares are stringing together two days of gains for the first time this month as global markets rebound on the European Central Bank’s decision to buy government debt to stimulate the region’s economy.
 In Egypt, non-Arab foreign investors were net buyers of about 46 million Egyptian pounds ($64 million) of shares, the most in a week, according to bourse data.
 announced plans to buy a company that owns a West Texas prospect for $71 billion, or about $50,000 an acre.
 Encana will pay $5850 a share to buy Athlon Energy Inc, a four-year-old Fort Worth, Texas-based driller backed by buyout firm Apollo Global Management LLC.
 Cliffs also has announced a plan to buy back as much as $200 million of shares and agreed with lenders to amend a credit facility, allowing the company to proceed with the stock repurchases.
 Working with Jefferies Group LLC on the sale, KCG has begun reaching out to potential buyers of the platform -- called HotSpot-- including Nasdaq OMX Group Inc, CME Group Inc, Intercontinental Exchange Inc, Deutsche Boerse AG, and London Stock Exchange Group Plc, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 The company was formed in 2013 after Knight Capital was forced to find a buyer after losses tied to trading glitches brought it near bankruptcy.
 He holds a buy rating on Amcom with a price target of A$240.
 and a long-time Japan watcher, doesn’t buy into Edwards’ gloom.
 He is advising investors to buy the so-called defensive shares, which typically refers to stocks of software, consumer and drug companies.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- German bonds fell, pushing 10-year yields up the most in two weeks, as investors reassessed prospects for additional European Central Bank easing measures after it gave only outlines of a plan to buy private securities.
 “The ECB looks set to adopt a wait-and-see stance but eventually will introduce QE,” he said, referring to buying sovereign bonds, or quantitative easing.
 Focusing on plans to buy private debt as soon as this month to buoy euro-area inflation that’s the weakest in five years, Draghi yesterday left the option of purchasing government bonds in his toolbox.
 Draghi’s Reluctance Draghi’s reluctance to spell out how many assets officials might buy disappointed investors pushing him to go all-in.
 Portuguese and Greek bonds climbed after Draghi said the ECB was prepared to buy ABS from nations rated below investment grade.
 France’s Christian Noyer joined policy makers from Germany and Austria in opposing a program to buy asset-backed securities, according to two euro-area officials.
 Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, agreed to buy GE Money Bank AB, which operates in Sweden, Denmark and Norway, for about 700 million euros ($953 million).
 GE agreed in 2007 to buy BPH from UniCredit SpA to take advantage of economic growth in eastern Europe.
 Though government-controlled Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac will buy loans to borrowers with FICO credit scores as low as 620, the average score on mortgages they purchased is now about 740, well above the 660 level often considered subprime.
 Established lenders are reluctant to ease their rules out of concern that Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac and FHA will force them to buy back bad loans with underwriting errors.
 Shellpoint Partners LLC’s New Penn unit, the lender backed by mortgage-bond pioneer Lewis Ranieri, in August began offering mortgages for home buyers with debt-to-income ratios up to 55 percent and interest-only loans when borrowers have “high disposable income” or “high income potential due to their line of work” Caliber said in June its new programs would offer new flexibility for foreign nationals or on purchases of condos without approval for government programs.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac wouldn’t buy the loan because of Mataska’s debt relative to income.
 Eager to avoid further increases or moving to a smaller place, they began looking to buy another home.
 Wall Street has been willing to buy and bundle into securities only high quality mortgages on expensive homes, known as jumbos.
 Investors Buying Banc of California, which holds its expanded-criteria loans on its books, has begun to find buyers on Wall Street, said Seabold, declining to name them.
 Hoping to buy another home before prices rose too much, Dave, whose credit score had fallen to about 660, got a mortgage from Atlanta-based Angel Oak Home Loans to buy a four-bedroom house for $260,000 in Woodstock, Georgia, with 20 percent down.
 2, when European Central Bank President Mario Draghi stopped short of spelling out for how long the ECB might buy assets to head off deflation.
 outlook and end their bond-buying program as planned, according to 62 of 64 economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 ‘Exceptionally Stupid’ “Problems could arise if the regulator does something exceptionally stupid and imposes an unreasonable hike in the ratio as well as an unreasonable timeframe to implement it,” said Investec’s Gordon, who has a buy recommendation on shares.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP said third-quarter profit increased 18 percent as the world’s largest alternative-asset manager collected profits from its biggest buyout fund and sold real estate holdings.
 “Underlying fundamentals including fundraising, realization activity, investment activity and portfolio performance all remain strong” Blackstone, which under Chief Executive Officer Steve Schwarzman has been the most successful leveraged-buyout firm to diversify beyond corporate takeovers and into businesses such as property and hedge funds, last week decided to spin off its advisory units in an effort to reduce conflicts of interest with its fund management groups.
 The firm, which is marketing its seventh global LBO fund, is benefiting from the $217 billion buyout pool it raised from 2005 to 2007, which in the second quarter crossed a return threshold that’s allowing Blackstone to collect performance fees at an accelerated rate.
 The firm said its buyout portfolio appreciated 37 percent in the third quarter, outpacing the 06 percent advance in the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index of large US.
 The gain compared with a 3 percent increase in the buyout holdings at Carlyle Group LP, which releases fund performance earlier than its full earnings.
 Blackstone is seen as a bellwether for the buyout industry given its size and reach across markets.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, overhaul and then sell them.
 Worldwide, the value of private-equity buyouts announced in the third quarter rose 12 percent to $264 billion from the same period last year, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Nedbank Group Ltd, the South African lender controlled by Old Mutual Plc, has agreed to buy 20 percent of Ecobank Transnational Inc, even after the Lome, Togo-based company sold a stake to a Qatari bank.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander Brasil SA tumbled as much as 12 percent, the biggest intraday drop since January, as its Spanish parent prepares to conclude an offer to buy 25 percent of the bank it doesn’t already own.
 Purchasing Protection A month ago, investors were rushing to buy stock hedges during a stretch in which the MSCI Emerging Markets Index lost 12 percent.
 “These guys had margin expansion across the board,” Hassan Ahmed, a New York-based analyst at Alembic Global Advisors who recommends buying Dow shares, said by phone today.
 The outflows have prompted derivatives traders to buy options to protect against declines in equities.
 and one of the earliest bulls of the 5 1/2-year bull market, those gains signal genuine investment, not just short sellers buying back stock they’d borrowed and sold.
 Concerns that Europe will slip into a recession just as Federal Reserve bond buying ends sent the S&P 500 down 74 percent from an all-time high of 2,01136 in mid-September.
 Virgin Mobile Mexico is a wireless reseller, meaning it sells minutes it buys on a wholesale basis from Telefonica SA.
 Companies have to buy more water from distant suppliers and are spending more to purify the little water they can get from current reserves, according to Ademar Ribeiro Romeiro, a professor at State University of Campinas.
 “The near-term catalysts are their emerging businesses,” said Dan Salmon, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 QIA today agreed to buy 199 percent of Lifestyle, the owner of the Sogo department store in Hong Kong, for about HK$478 billion ($616 million).
 Dealers, which historically used their own money to buy bonds off clients as markets soured, have been sellers, too.
 “It is still too early to simply ‘buy-the-dip’ as the macro outlook is highly uncertain, technicals remain quite weak and monetary policy is unlikely to change course in the near term” At the same time, the global speculative-grade default rate remains well-below historic averages and has been falling.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy Philadelphia Financial Group Inc.
 cable-TV company, proposed buying No.
 telephone company by revenue, followed in May with its $485 billion agreement to buy satellite TV provider DirecTV.
 lost 21 percent after agreeing to buy a controlling stake in the Candelaria copper mining complex in Chile from Freeport-McMoRan Inc.
 Pension funds and insurance companies that buy long-dated securities to match the maturity of their liabilities rely on the clause to avoid losses.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Investment managers putting money into Romania’s farms are paying a fraction of prices in Germany or the UK, buying the potential to boost yields by joining fragmented plots and improving farming methods.
 RBC recommends buying the shares.
 IBM had been seeking a buyer for its chipmaking division since at least 2013, a person with knowledge of the unit said in February.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Mercedes-Benz is buying 25 percent of Italy’s MV Agusta Motor SpA as it follows luxury-car competitor Audi AG into the motorcycle market.
 Citigroup itself advised a group of buyers interested in taking over Occidental Petroleum Corp’s Middle East business, people with knowledge of the matter said in July.
 Sinovel’s bondholders last month rejected a plan to allow its Jiangsu unit to use as much as 700 million yuan to buy some of 26 billion yuan of debt the company sold in 2011.
 agreed to buy Aviv REIT Inc.
 agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II for about $34 billion.
 Getting another layer of protection would make them “feel confident when offering these loans -- giving more of our nation’s heroes a chance to buy a home in the country they risked everything to protect” Smaller Lenders When smaller lenders do offer VA loans, they often sell the servicing contracts to larger lenders to get rid of the default risk, said Tozer of Ginnie Mae, which guarantees $15 trillion of bonds mostly backed by FHA and VA loans.
 The underwriters have been given an option to buy another 24 million shares of the unit within 30 days, the lender said.
 Where they don’t agree is on what industries to buy before the reports start rolling in, though there is some common ground: Subramanian is bullish on health-care and financial stocks and advises avoiding consumer-staples and energy companies.
 “Our job will be to ensure that the players receive their fair share of the results of their efforts and that we do everything possible to maintain the growth and popularity of the game” Bloomberg reported in July that Fox, the Rupert Murdoch-controlled company that tried to buy Time Warner this year, was interested in pursuing the NBA rights.
 has rallied three times as fast as the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index since agreeing to buy WhatsApp Inc.
 The bank recommends buying a bullish call and bearish put expiring next month with an exercise price of $79.
 To Brian Wieser, an analyst with Pivotal Research Group, a decline in Facebook would be a buying opportunity.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Spanish government bonds dropped for the first time in three days as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi failed to provide details on the size of a plan to buy private securities to boost the economy.
 German bunds were little changed as the ECB held its main interest rate at a record-low 005 percent and outlined a timetable for buying covered bonds and asset-backed securities.
 Greek bonds rose as Draghi said the ECB was prepared to buy ABS from nations rated below investment grade.
 The Frankfurt-based central bank will start buying covered bonds this month and ABS by the end of the year, Draghi said.
 The ECB will buy assets in some nations that have a debt rating below BBB minus, he said, adding that caveats will apply.
 ‘Sizable Impact’ “These purchases will have a sizable impact on the balance sheet,” Draghi said, though shied away from a definitive goal for how much the ECB might buy, saying total stimulus may fall short of the 1 trillion euros he’d earlier signaled.
 “The market has a buy-the-dip mentality right now,” John Canally, an economic strategist at LPL Financial Corp.
 fundamentals might’ve gotten some people interested in buying again” ECB, Fed US.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said yesterday policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond buying.
 One way of gauging market sentiment is to compare how much it costs to buy options that protect against losses in shares this month versus those timed to expire in 90 days.
 For one, many car buyers are status-conscious and “want to be seen driving cars that are not ’cheap,’” he said.
 Though she knew about Nissan’s no-frills brand, she paid almost 50 percent more than the top-end version of the Go to buy a Grand i10 from Hyundai Motor Co.
 ‘Life-Changing’ Investment “People who are buying a car for $10,000 or less are making a fundamental, life-changing investment,” Vincent Cobee, corporate vice president in charge of Datsun, said in an interview Sept.
 about buying as much as $175 billion worth of assets, people with knowledge of the matter told Bloomberg last month.
 “We are working with the potential buyers to have an agreement,” Slim said.
 Hiesinger is seeking buyers for a foundry in Brazil’s Rio de Janeiro state as well as stainless steel operations.
 firm buy Vision Globale would be bad for the province.
 Quebecor was another potential buyer of the film production company.
 Spinning off VMware would make the rest of EMC more attractive to other buyers, potentially delivering even higher returns to shareholders, Elliott wrote in a letter earlier this month.
 Hopkinton, Massachusetts-based EMC plans to absorb its VCE joint venture by buying out most of partner Cisco Systems Inc’s stake, people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday.
 Sales last quarter got a boost as VMware signed more customers to multiyear agreements and persuaded them to buy tools for managing their systems, according to a note from Mizuho’s Lamba, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 that have the necessary income and appetite to buy the machine, according to Louis Kim, Hewlett-Packard’s vice president of product management.
 plans to buy the 30 percent of Brookfield Residential Properties Inc.
 “Together with the authorities, OeVAG will now flesh out its plans for restructuring the Volksbanken-Verbund” In the 2000s, OeVAG rapidly expanded in eastern Europe and by buying corporate Investkredit AG and Kommunalkredit Austria AG, which lends to municipalities.
 Uneven economic data and the approaching end of Federal Reserve bond buying have sent the S&P 500 down 32 percent from a record Sept.
 It’s tempting to say ‘buy the dip,’ but there’s nothing stopping them from a valuation perspective from falling lower” Large speculators tracked by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission pushed short sales on the Russell 2000 Index to the highest level in more than three years last week.
 “Investors are buying MMK because the dividend is twice as much as a year ago, which was unexpected,” Vladimir Vedeneev, the chief investment officer at Raiffeisen Capital in Moscow, said by e-mail.
 The German manufacturer is likely sell its holding in Unify should it find a suitable buyer, “but I wouldn’t expect anything to materialize in the coming two years, at least,” said Gael de Bray, a Paris-based analyst at Societe Generale.
 A normal buyer would probably prefer to wait for early signs of a turnaround” Gores Group bought its stake in Unify, then known as Siemens Enterprise Communications, in 2008.
 The country also provides subsidies to consumers in the form of loans to buy and install batteries alongside solar panels.
 He previously worked for buyout firm Permira Advisers LLP.
 plans a campaign of stock buybacks and dividends that will return 60 percent of the biotechnology drug company’s adjusted earnings to shareholders through 2018.
 It plans to buy back as much as $2 billion through the end of 2015 and has the authorization to buy back $4 billion in total.
 Stockholm-based Cevian, which seeks to buy undervalued stocks, has also increased its stake in ThyssenKrupp AG this year, and now owns 15 percent of the German steelmaker, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Baby Boomers The parks -- where buyers own the homes, not the land -- charge home owners regular rents for use of the sites.
 As life expectancy and the number of people older than 65 climb, “for those with the vision and the capacity to strategically allocate capital, the opportunity to achieve long-term superior returns is present,” Martyn Jacobs, an analyst at Patersons, wrote in a report in July, when he initiated coverage of both companies with buy ratings.
 Many retirees “have a lot of money tied up in their house but don’t necessarily have much cash to live on,” said Loewensohn of Alceon, which has acquired about 5,000 sites in New South Wales and Queensland states over the past two years, and is buying about one a month.
 Deferred Fees In traditional villages, when buyers leave, they’re charged a deferred management fee, usually a proportion of the value for each year they’ve been there, capped at a certain number of years.
 In August, Oi hired Banco BTG Pactual to study the possibility of buying Telecom Italia SpA’s stake in its Brazilian wireless unit, Tim Participacoes SA.
 Telefonica, owner of the Vivo brand in Brazil, agreed to buy Vivendi SA’s local broadband provider GVT last month.
 “It’s obviously a mature market, a slower-growth market” He recommends buying the shares.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- KPMG LLP and the UK’s markets regulator failed to spot a 15 billion-pound ($24 billion) shortfall at Co-Operative Bank Plc that derailed its plan to buy Lloyds Banking Group Plc branches, British lawmakers said.
 The Mentor, Ohio-based provider of hospital sterilization products and services announced today that it will buy the smaller Synergy Health Plc and establish the combined company’s tax address to the UK, even as senior executives remain in the US.
 Traders are holding about the same number of call and put options, signaling they’re buying protection against swings in either direction for stocks.
 Puts give the right to sell a stock at a certain price, while calls allow the owner to buy it at a set level.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Actavis Plc, the drugmaker that made three acquisitions this year, agreed to buy Durata Therapeutics Inc.
 “The dollar is sold across the board and it’s the dollar-selling not baht buying at this point,” said Yamaguchi of Mizuho Bank.
 The industry-financed regulator levied the fines for breaking rules related to short selling, or selling a stock with the hope of profiting by buying it later at a lower price.
 Pietras didn’t rule out the possibility that company co-founder and former 44 percent shareholder Gennady Timchenko is a potential buyer for the assets.
 Sanctions levied against Russian citizens and companies over the Ukraine crisis mean Gunvor will be challenged to find non-Russian buyers for the assets.
 Customers including farmers, rural homeowners and schools pay little to nothing up front and sign long-term contracts to buy electricity produced by United Wind systems.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Beyond the walls of a palace outside Casablanca owned by Saudi Arabia’s King Abdullah, Moroccans are buying housing plots that one of the Middle East’s biggest construction firms will fold into a new mini city.
 That came six months after a CNBC interview in which he said “stocks, in a long-term sense, are still undervalued by any objective measure” Fed Bank of Dallas President Richard Fisher cautioned on March 5 that there were signs in financial markets indicating central bank bond-buying may be emboldening investors to take excessive risks.
 The central bank said last week it will for the first time start buying kroner with its foreign currency oil revenue to cover budget needs.
 DNB ASA estimated today that the krone buying could reach 59 billion kroner next year to cover the extra spending.
 The collateral pledge is “the minimum required if you concede to your buyer two and half more years to complete a deal that has been on hold for almost one year,” he said.
 If Fintech fails to do so during the 30-month period, Telecom Italia can choose to seek another buyer for that 51 percent stake.
 If Telecom Italia can’t complete a sale to another buyer within a further 30 months, the agreement with Fintech will be terminated.
 In that case, Fintech will pay Telecom Italia $175 million in compensation and Telecom Italia gets an option to buy back Sofora shares bought by Fintech.
 Carriers will buy 840 new freighter planes valued at $240 billion in the next 20 years on a revival in air-freight traffic, Boeing said in a statement distributed through PR Newswire.
 A verdict that allows the transfer of shares to buyers is “a precondition” for the sale process to resume, he said.
 10 allowed the government to proceed with the sale on condition it won’t transfer shares to buyers until a ruling.
 He said his decision to buy more will “depend on the terms” of the sale.
 A discount may not be enough to attract buyers amid a collapse in oil prices.
 “We will not be buying OGDC particularly because a large part of its value is based on the oil price, which I’m not able to forecast,” Stockholm-based James Bannan, who runs the $145 million Frontier Markets Fund at Coeli Asset Management, said by e-mail.
 Sven Richter, head of frontier markets at Johannesburg-based Renaissance Asset Management, which owns shares in Oil and Gas and Pakistani banks, said he hasn’t decided yet whether to buy OGDC.
 “We are happy to buy Pakistan,” Richter said in a phone interview on Oct.
 Reducing Risk “If there are no wage gains, consumers are unlikely to increase the quantity of goods they buy, on net, and demand-pull inflation should remain pretty tame,” said Guy Lebas, chief fixed-income strategist at Janney Montgomery Scott LLC in Philadelphia.
 The state-owned Chinese company and its Canadian subsidiary, Nexen Inc, are looking at buying seismic data covering an area of the Barents Sea where licenses will be awarded in 2016, according to a Sept.
 to block Apple Inc’s mobile-payment technology presages a long fight over the fees and customer data collected when people use smartphones to buy stuff.
 “It’s about getting customers to buy stuff, and you don’t want to stop customers from buying stuff just because you don’t offer a payment alternative they chose to use,” he said.
 Target Corp, another MCX member, doesn’t allow Apple Pay for in-store transactions, though customers can use it to buy things on their phones through the chain’s mobile app.
 FHFA Plans Homebuilders extended gains after reports yesterday that the Federal Housing Finance Agency, which regulates Freddie Mac and Fannie Mae, plans new steps to encourage lending to buyers with less-than-perfect credit scores.
 The FHFA also is planning an effort that will allow buyers to make down payments as small as 3 percent of the purchase price, two people with direct knowledge of the matter said.
 “In the measures of future buyer traffic, they still remain exceptionally strong” KB Home The S&P homebuilders gauge increased 4 percent yesterday.
 Homebuilder shares are down about 7 percent for the year, which also presents a potential buying opportunity, McGrath and Meyers said.
 Investors struggling to assess global growth and the end of Federal Reserve bond buying have been blindsided with a threat that defies quantification, said Howard Ward, chief investment officer for growth equities at Rye, New York-based Gamco Investors Inc, which oversees about $47 billion.
 plans to buy an additional 40 percent stake in Istanbul’s second-biggest airport to gain full control, people familiar with matter said.
 Malaysia Airports, which owns 60 percent of Istanbul Sabiha Gokcen Airport, plans to exercise its pre-emptive rights to buy the remainder from units of Turkish builder Limak Holding AS, said the people.
 A bid from Malaysia Airports would put an end to plans by TAV Havalimanlari, owner of Istanbul’s larger Ataturk airport, to buy the stake in a deal reached last month.
 Malaysia Airports, operator of airfields in the Southeast Asian country, had agreed in December to raise its stake in Sabiha Gokcen to 60 percent, paying 225 million euros to buy out Indian partner GMR Infrastructure Ltd.
 The stones are then sold on, often crisscrossing trading hubs in Antwerp, Mumbai, New York and Tel Aviv multiple times before finding a buyer.
 About 37 percent of all rough diamonds are sold by the miner, and the majority are marketed at sales, open to about 80 buyers, at its offices in Gaborone, the capital of Botswana.
 The buyer has been invited to place an order in advance, but all he knows for sure before he opens the box is the price, a fixed sum, often in the tens of millions.
 Whatever the buyer finds, it’s take it or leave it.
 It currently has about 1,000 clients registered to buy and sell, and plans to increase that number in coming months.
 If overseas investors were to buy the developer’s bonds despite its high debt load, that would mean “its risks don’t look that high to some,” he said.
 21 it is entering the energy business by buying 60 percent in a Kyrgyzstan oilfield by issuing new shares.
 “We view the present correction as a potentially excellent buying opportunity,” said Monty Guild, chief investment officer of Los Angeles-based Guild Investment Management Inc, which has about $150 million in global equity funds.
 Jason Bernstein, an analyst at brokerage firm Odeon Capital Group LLC, wrote in a note to clients yesterday that he’s heard the presentation will be about Globalstar, claiming the satellite communications company’s airwaves will be “worthless” “Nothing could be further from the truth,” said Bernstein, who recommends buying Globalstar shares and expects them to reach $5.
 White advises companies on mergers and acquisitions and counsels private-equity firms on management buyouts and buy-ins, leveraged buyouts and public-to-private transactions.
 “The reason is probably that they know that they need to open up the domestic market if they want to promote panda bonds” Growth Potential China’s central bank didn’t permit qualified foreign institutional investors to buy notes in the interbank market until March 2013.
 Employment gains are are lifting consumer confidence and giving more shoppers the money to buy gifts this year.
 On top of that, the survey found that shoppers will be more discerning, with 36 percent planning to check products and prices before they buy, the highest proportion in at least four years.
 About 52 percent of shoppers are planning to buy electronics, making them the most popular gift this year, the New York-based industry trade group said.
 TMK said in June that it plans to sell 56 million shares, or about a 6 percent stake, of existing shares, while state-held Rusnano said in August that it agreed to buy them.
 The system will let customers buy items with their phones by scanning QR codes.
 A buyer could justify spending about 20 percent more.
 is a logical buyer for the $364 million company, said DA.
 There are many logical buyers “that have adjoining networks or are in that field” A representative for Waynesboro, Virginia-based Lumos declined to comment.
 Faster Fiber The “crown jewel” for buyers is Lumos’s fiber network, said Michael Goodman, an analyst at Corbyn Investment Management Inc, which oversees about $13 billion including Lumos shares.
 as potential buyers.
 Zayo, which went public earlier this month, may be the most likely buyer, said Barry Sine, director of equity research at Drexel Hamilton.
 By next year, its fiber assets will have increased in value and potential buyers Comcast Corp.
 “It’s a weird time for them to be shopping the company when the major fiber buyers are off the market,” Smithen said.
 Even so, a sale is probably more likely, and even without Comcast and Level 3, there’s no shortage of potential buyers, said Goodman.
 “A sale of the company, whether it’s to a strategic buyer or a private-equity buyer makes sense for an exit strategy,” he said.
 and Jana Partners LLC, and pledged to cut $160 million in expenses and return at least $3 billion to investors through stock buybacks and dividends.
 While Mercuria won’t buy most of JPMorgan’s metals business and inventories or its two crude-supply contracts for US.
 It will also buy more than a dozen physical assets in North America, including about 6 million barrels of storage leases in the Canadian oil sands.
 retreated the most since July 17 after it offered to buy a 51 percent stake in French carmaker PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business, giving India’s biggest tractor maker access to European technology.
 In May, Cupertino, California’s Apple agreed to pay $3 billion to buy the headphones and streaming-music service Beats in the company’s biggest-ever purchase.
 Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook to accelerate buying back the company’s stock, saying the shares are trading at half their value.
 Icahn sees “nothing wrong” with a tender offer as large as $100 billion for Apple to repurchase its stock, he said in an interview with Bloomberg Television’s Trish Regan, where he reiterated his praise for Cook while urging him to buy Apple’s “undervalued shares” faster.
 The investor, who first unveiled his stake in Apple in August 2013, followed in December by saying he would pursue a shareholder vote to force the company to increase its stock-buyback plan.
 In February, he dropped his campaign to spur Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 The move followed an announcement in April 2013, when Apple disclosed a plan for a total of $100 billion in dividends and buybacks.
 “Spending some amount of money on a stock buyback is reasonable and more than what they are doing today would make sense,” Andrew Uerkwitz, an analyst at Oppenheimer & Co, said in an interview.
 agreed to buy Van Tuyl Group, the largest privately owned US.
 “I fully expect we’ll buy a lot more dealerships,” Buffett told CNBC today.
 “We would probably be buying stocks in Russia in view of their attractive valuations,” Mark Mobius, chairman of the Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said by e-mail today.
 While if a factory owned all of its stores, it could set prices and buyers would lose virtually all bargaining power” The bill prohibits automakers from selling a vehicle “directly to a retail customer other than through franchised dealers,” with exceptions for nonprofit organizations and government agencies.
 A Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as a QFII, or Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as an RQFII, is needed for foreign asset managers to buy A-shares.
 Once the license is obtained, the investor also needs to submit an application to China’s State Administration of Foreign Exchange for a specific dollar amount of investment quota that they can use to buy mainland stocks.
 He recommends investors buy calls on the Financial Select Sector SPDR Fund expiring this week with a strike price of $23.
 At the same time, the existing-home sales figures showed that participation among first-time buyers is still languishing.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- A company controlled by Sweden’s Lundin family agreed to buy Kinross Gold Corp’s idled Fruta del Norte gold project in Ecuador for $240 million and will change its name to Lundin Gold Inc.
 The company, which has operations in the Americas, Russia and West Africa, acquired the project when it agreed to buy Aurelian Resources Inc.
 The producer of iron ore, copper, coal, platinum and diamonds is getting approaches from potential buyers of mines it plans to exit “on a weekly basis,” Cutifani said on July 25.
 The shares surged 94 percent on July 24 amid reports the company is in talks with an investment firm about a buyout.
 AbbVie, based in North Chicago, Illinois, had planned to buy Shire for an estimated $52 billion, then move the combined company’s legal address to the UK.
 The drugmaker walked away from a $114 billion attempt to buy London-based AstraZeneca, a purchase that would have boosted the company’s roster of medicines and moved its legal address overseas.
 David Einhorn, president of hedge fund Greenlight Capital Inc, this week recommended buying shares in both companies, saying SunEdison is worth $32 a share.
 soared 27 percent in Sydney after the provider of outsourcing services entered talks with Ferrovial SA after turning down a preliminary buyout offer.
 who downgraded Perion to hold from buy on Aug.
 “The big challenge for Perion and others is to look at mobile areas and see if they can figure out how to monetize it,” said Srivatsa, who said he kept his buy rating on the stock because he’s giving Mandelbaum the benefit of the doubt.
 The Paris-based firm may fetch more than 1 billion euros ($16 billion) and attract asset managers and buyout firms, they said.
 DNCA has about 15 billion euros in assets under management with 20 fund managers, up from 58 billion euros when the buyout firm took its stake.
 agreed to buy 175 publications from Quebecor Inc.
 Postmedia is buying the assets from Sun Media Corp, a unit of Quebecor, and the deal will be funded with new debt and equity.
 Watt’s plan to ease rules that can force them to buy back soured debt.
 Last month, the bank moved to buying jumbos with loan-to-value ratios as high as 85 percent, up from 80 percent, for mortgages as large as $15 million, he said.
 The shrinking footprint of Ex-Im, which provides loans, guarantees and insurance to help foreign companies buy US.
 “It’s a combination of later household formation, a little bit more consumer debt in households, first-time homebuyers in particular” JPMorgan, the No.
 Borrowers who don’t have 20 percent equity have to buy mortgage insurance -- a monthly fee that can make refinancing too costly.
 Banks imposed strict rules after regulators forced them to buy back more than $80 billion of soured mortgages from Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac due to underwriting errors.
 Buyback Risk “One of the key problems for housing is the lack of credit, especially for first-time homebuyers,” said Zandi.
 “There are a number of Americans who want to buy a home, can afford to buy a home, who simply can’t get credit,” he said.
 Shares of Nomura rose the most in almost six months after the Tokyo-based firm said it would buy back stock.
 Nomura will buy back as many as 40 million shares, 1 percent of its outstanding stock, from Nov.
 Doubling Target Last week, Rocket almost doubled its target for proceeds and then advanced the date of its listing after winning commitments to buy shares from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The 2010 Nigerian Content Act requires international energy companies working in the nation’s oil and gas industry to end imports of pipes and buy instead from local companies to meet annual demand of 800,000 metric tons a year.
 ‘Inefficient Farmers’ “Abe’s reform plan is making progress,” said Nobuyuki Chino, the president of Continental Rice Corp, a grain trader in Tokyo.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Mercuria Energy Group Ltd’s six-month-old agreement to buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodities business for $35 billion was revised to cover only $800 million of assets, according to people familiar with the change.
 rooftop developer agreed in June to buy Silevo Inc, a maker of high-efficiency solar panels for about $200 million.
 Peters, Missouri-based SunEdison as a potential “winner” in the solar industry yesterday, and recommended buying the shares.
 “The best time to buy is before the shops get crowded,” said Anand, 27, as she eyed trinkets on velvet shelves at a store in Mumbai’s Zaveri Bazaar, India’s biggest jewelry market.
 “I buy some gold jewelry every Diwali.
 India is the largest gold buyer after China.
 “The appetite for gold among physical buyers in India seems to have increased,” said Howie Lee, an investment analyst in Singapore for Phillip Futures Pte.
 It’s a symbol of wealth or a form of investment, and the precious metal is deeply rooted in worship and culture” After import restrictions and a weak rupee led to a 34 percent drop in demand in the first half of 2014, purchases are set to improve in India, the world’s largest buyer as recently as 2012.
 Retail sales of everything from rings to pendants to necklaces may rise 30 percent to 40 percent during Dhanteras, the biggest gold-buying festival, said Rajesh Exports Ltd, a jewelry retailer and exporter.
 23, is considered an auspicious time for buying gold.
 Asian Buyers Cheaper bullion may spur buyers in Asia, according to UBS AG.
 Prices at or below $1,200 will attract physical buyers and be seen as favorable by investors, UBS analysts Edel Tully and Joni Teves said in a report on Sept.
 A rush to buy will not materialize unless prices fall closer to $1,100, they said.
 While China was the top buyer in 2013, demand in the three months through the end of June fell 52 percent to 1925 tons, less than the 2041 tons purchased in India, council data said.
 For Lynette D’Souza, a 30-year-old dentist in the western Indian state of Goa, the lower gold price means she can buy more with the 100,000 rupees she’s budgeted on a gift for her brother, whose wedding is scheduled next month.
 “It may be the higher growth nature of these other businesses compared to the exporters or cyclical names that investors are looking for” Small-Cap Rally Dongwon F&B Co, a Seoul-based producer of processed food, and Pyeong Hwa Automotive Co, a maker of auto parts, are among analysts’ top picks in Korea, with unanimous buy ratings.
 Yield levels are low but that’s what you have to buy” Germany allotted the 1 percent securities due in August 2024 at an average yield of 093 percent.
 4 amid concern the European Central Bank’s asset-buying plan won’t be enough to revive the region’s economy.
 Randgold jumped 61 percent, following a gauge of mining companies higher, after HSBC advised investors to buy the stock.
 “The near-term catalysts are their emerging businesses,” said Dan Salmon, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 White Mountains Chief Executive Officer Ray Barrette is counting on the trend of more consumers buying insurance online.
 Severstal’s Cash “We prefer high cash-return stocks like Severstal,” JPMorgan’s Gorokhov wrote in his note, raising it to buy from neutral.
 “Geopolitical tensions have risen, concerns of a domestic slowdown in the construction sector loom large and bulk material prices continue to depreciate” Fourteen analysts recommend buying Severstal’s GDR and five have a hold rating.
 “Politically, these purchases are much easier to accomplish than buying government bonds” Corporate Bonds The ECB’s Governing Council isn’t currently considering corporate-bond purchases, according to two euro-region central bank officials familiar with the matter.
 Monetary policy can only buy time for governments to put their economies on a more solid footing, he said.
 AbbVie, which announced in July a plan to buy Dublin-based Shire and move its legal address abroad, said its board of directors will meet Oct.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- General Electric Co’s aircraft leasing division, the world’s largest, agreed to buy Milestone Aviation Group for $178 billion to add helicopters to its portfolio of rental assets.
 Berkshire Deal Santulli pioneered the fractional-ownership of aircraft, in which individuals and companies buy shares of a private plane’s flying time in lieu of purchasing the jet.
 LNG developers are also facing pressure from buyers such as power utilities in Asia, which are banding together to secure lower prices, including contracts that are tied to the US.
 Under the rules, shipping terminals emitting more than the equivalent of 016 metric ton of carbon dioxide per ton of LNG will be able to offset emissions by buying credits or paying into a technology fund.
 A prolonged ruble slump could also help Russian manufacturers build up export capabilities, despite some short-term pain when it comes to financing foreign debt and buying equipment, said Dominic Sanders, a partner in Moscow at law firm Linklaters.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Cyient Ltd, an Indian software services provider to the aerospace and automotive industries, plans to buy at least one more company this fiscal year, Chief Executive Officer Krishna Bodanapu said.
 agreed to buy TriZetto Corp.
 Cyient has “far too much cash” for a company of its size, said Madhu Babu, an analyst at HDFC Securities in Mumbai with a “buy” rating on the stock.
 They can easily spend about 15 billion rupees on buyouts.
 EBay said it has taken pains to reach out to buyers and sellers to reassure them that little will change with a split.
 Since then, EBay has received little feedback from buyers and sellers, said Ryan Moore, a company spokesman.
 Martin’s company made changes to meet EBay’s higher standards for sellers, including posting more photographs of bike parts so buyers can thoroughly inspect them before purchasing, he said.
 “It’s not clear whether dovish policies from the Fed that don’t include bond-buying will be as equity-supportive,” Michael Purves, chief global strategist and head of equity derivatives research at Weeden & Co.
 Buy Puts “Investors have been using this move up in volatility to buy puts, with the expectation that the VIX will mean revert,” said Mandy Xu, a New York-based derivatives strategist at Credit Suisse Group AG.
 is offering an 85 percent premium to buy palm oil plantations in Papua New Guinea, betting land will become scarce to produce the edible oil used in food, cosmetics and biofuels.
 The French explorer is expecting to sign confidentiality agreements with about a dozen prospective buyers and will then begin a “standard” bidding process, de La Chevardiere said.
 Draghi said the central bank will buy assets for at least two years to boost inflation and economic growth in the euro area.
 “We’re using this weakness to buy into names that got beaten up over the last week or so” Data Watch The S&P 500 fell yesterday to its lowest level since Aug.
 is on course to halt its monthly bond-buying program this month.
 Europe Rout The ECB’s asset-buying plan is part of a range of stimulus measures it has announced since June to fight the threat of falling prices in the 18-nation currency bloc.
 “The view is that what they’re doing is simply not enough with buying bond assets for the next couple of years,” Dan Veru, chief investment officer at Fort Lee, New Jersey-based Palisade Capital Management, said by phone.
 midterm elections in November all get some blame for giving buyers a reason to slow the torrid pace of deals seen earlier in the year.
 said it will remain an independent company after Silver Lake Management LLC shelved an attempt to buy it.
 Gun enthusiasts had flocked to stores after 2012 shootings at an elementary school in Newtown, Connecticut, and at a movie theater in Aurora, Colorado, with buyers stocking up amid fears that restrictive legislation would soon follow.
 Enterprise Hybrid Cloud Solution takes 28 days to set up and will cost in the hundreds of thousands of dollars, compared with nine to 12 months of setup and the millions of dollars it would cost for businesses to buy the products separately and stitch them all together, Burton said.
 mortgage-bond analysts in August also said it might be time for benchmark bond indexes to exclude the Fed’s holdings, because the current set-up “forces money managers to buy the sector even if spreads are rich” The share of the debt in Citigroup’s own BIG index would fall to 20 percent from 29 percent with such a switch, its analysts wrote.
 Amid the Fed’s buying, yields on mortgage securities backed by Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac or Ginnie Mae have fallen to 023 percentage point more than Treasuries, compared with an average of 059 percentage point over the past 15 years, according to Bank of America Merrill Lynch index data.
 The investors may start buying a greater share as the Fed stops purchases, they wrote in an Oct.
 “We have to be a bit more cautious especially for companies that have high debt levels” before we make a recommendation to buy, said Lexter Azurin, the head of equity research at Unicapital Securities Inc.
 The protests disrupted the National Day holiday shopping plans of Chinese tourists, who accounted for 75 percent of the city’s 54 million visitors last year and are large buyers of local property.
 But chasing Pettee’s money comes with a catch: She won’t buy anything at full price.
 She researches items online before she buys and expects to do about half her shopping on the Web.
 That means they’re not as easily swayed by time-honored retailer tactics, such as luring customers with store displays and encouraging impulse buys.
 After she and her boyfriend decided to spend less on the holidays this year, Torzewski was almost finished buying gifts before the calendar turned to October.
 “We cut back on buying silly little nonsense gifts,” Torzewski said.
 “While there was a dip this month, builders are still positive about the housing market” Cheaper borrowing costs may help draw more prospective buyers into the market even as credit conditions remain tight more than five years after the recession.
 Further job market gains and a pickup in wages would help boost residential real estate, which has seen lackluster participation among first-time home buyers.
 The homebuilder group’s gauge of prospective buyer traffic dropped to 41 in October, while the index of current single-family home sales decreased to 57.
 and Melody Capital Advisors LLC that would reorganize the company as a standalone business; and one backed by lenders to the LP unit that would sell those assets to a buyer owned by Dish Network Corp.
 The company raised $45 billion for the buybacks in its biggest-ever bond sale, prompting Standard & Poor’s to cut Monsanto’s credit rating three levels to BBB+ from A+.
 He said he would be buying equities nowas a long-term investor and that earnings have been good.
 “Real money issaying this is an attractive level to buy stocks” To contact the reporters on this story:Callie Bost in New York at cbost2@bloombergnet;Eric Lam in Toronto at elam87@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Chris Nagi at chrisnagi@bloombergnetLynn Thomasson, Emma O’Brien Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 will proceed with its 352 million-euro ($449 million) bid to buy rival banana producer Fyffes Plc after rejecting a higher takeover offer from Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group.
 Hundley, a Richmond, Virginia-based analyst at BB&T Capital Markets who recommends buying Chiquita shares, said in a note today.
 Cutrale, a closely held fruit juice company controlled by Jose Luis Cutrale, and banks controlled by Joseph Safra, Brazil’s second-richest man, are trying to derail Chiquita’s plan to buy Fyffes, a deal that was announced in March.
 recommended Chiquita investors reject the Fyffes deal and instead pursue a buyout from Cutrale-Safra.
 24 against buying Fyffes.
 In the Shell promotion, Lego toys such as a red race car have been distributed to customers who buy at least 30 liters of gasoline at filling stations in 33 countries.
 and the stock was lowered to neutral from buy at Nomura Holdings Inc.
 Having raised Fund II in August, which is oversubscribed at $400 million, LeapFrog plans to start buying more stakes for amounts between $10 million and $50 million.
 “The single biggest move in our portfolio over the last two or three months has been buying bank stocks,” Dion Hershan, the fund manager’s head of Australian equities said in an interview in Sydney yesterday.
 The fund, which controls 694 percent of Malaysia Airlines, has offered to buy the shares it doesn’t already own for 138 billion ringgit ($422 million) and delist the company by the end of the year.
 TUI has sold 90 percent of the apartments built in the center of Castelfalfi, an eight-century-old village in the region of Tuscany, while it will only convert two dozen former farmhouses into villas once buyers have signed contracts, project head Stefan Neuhaus said in an online interview.
 From today’s perspective, it’s a disaster” TUI has yet to find buyers for more than half of the almost 50 sites being sold, which include new villas and the most expensive properties, as it targets completion of the project in 2018.
 Property buyers, also attracted by a newly opened gourmet restaurant and shops, are coming from as far away as the US, Canada and Australia, Neuhaus said.
 Draghi pledged to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds for at least two years, and said that Greece and Cyprus must be subject to bailout programs to ensure their inclusion because their credit ratings are below investment grade.
 Draghi said yesterday that he wants to be “as inclusive as possible, but with prudence” as he set out the caveat that the ECB will buy securities in countries with credit ratings below BBB- only if they are subject to bailout conditions.
 Also, the ECB will be buying up to 30 percent of asset-backed securities issued by Greek banks vis a vis 70 percent limit in other euro area countries.
 “Bottom line is that Greek banks should find more buyers for these securities, as the ECB won’t buy new issues on its own.
 The developer’s first project was holiday homes aimed at Hong Kong buyers.
 It began targeting local Chinese buyers when the 1997 Asian financial crisis affected the city’s economy.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Liberty Global Plc agreed to sell a Dutch pay-TV channel and to drop some clauses in contracts with broadcasters in return for European Union antitrust approval to buy Dutch cable operator Ziggo NV, regulators said.
 He upgraded SunEdison to the equivalent of buy from hold and raised the target price to $24 from $20.
 companies from inverting by buying a smaller foreign business.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- C&C Group Plc plunged after the Magners cider maker’s first-half earnings fell short of market expectations and as analysts questioned the logic of its approach to buy England-based Spirit Pub Co.
 He downgraded his recommendation to hold from buy.
 When he began buying silver with his brothers in 1973, it cost $2 an ounce and a big consumer was Eastman Kodak Co, which used it to make film.
 Most traders buy and sell paper.
 In the late 1970s, the Hunts were accumulating so much silver they needed surrogates to buy it for them, said George Gero, who traded the metal at the Commodity Exchange Inc’s open outcry pit in New York for the investment bank Drexel Burnham Lambert.
 Family Cutlery “The main buyer for Nelson Bunker Hunt was Conti Commodities, and when we saw the Conti broker coming to the pit, we’d all buy some silver,” raising the price, said Gero, now vice president, global futures, for RBC Capital Markets in New York.
 Ascent Broken “They broke the ascent by basically outlawing the buying of silver,” said Knight, who blogs at slopeofhopecom.
 banks, the American branches of four foreign banks and five brokerage houses had provided the Hunts’ silver-buying venture with more than $800 million -- equivalent to almost 10 percent of all the bank lending in the country in the previous two months,” William Greider wrote in “Secrets of the Temple” (1987).
 While Whitworth didn’t threaten a proxy contest aimed at gaining a board seat, he told the company he’d bring credibility and focus Hewlett-Packard on using its cash to buy back shares, increase its dividend or put more money into research and development.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- This may be the year for some dealmaking chemistry between Clariant AG and potential buyers.
 With net income projected to rise next year to the highest since 2000, the new and improved Clariant may entice both private-equity buyers and other chemical makers, according to shareholder Alpine Woods Capital Investors LLC.
 “This is the Holy Grail” for a buyer.
 agreed last month to buy Taminco Corp, a producer of alkylamines whose sales are projected to grow at a faster pace than its own.
 as another potential buyer to consider, while Kepler Cheuvreux analysts in a report last week highlighted Clariant as an appealing target for Germany’s BASF, which was valued at $82 billion yesterday.
 BASF and Dow have been speculated as buyers for Clariant before.
 There are other possible targets in the chemicals industry that buyers may pounce on first.
 The city agreed to renew a lease for a Syncora affiliate to operate a tunnel into Canada, and to give the bond insurer the option to buy land around the tunnel and a parking garage downtown.
 Anyone using above-average GDP gains as a signal to buy would have missed the 190 percent advance in the S&P 500 since March 2009 that rivals almost any rally in the past nine decades.
 Maybe going forward, we’ll see the economy catch up and the stock market may not have strong gains” Throughout the rally, corporate profits have been a better guide than GDP growth for when to buy stocks.
 Rather than investing to meet demand that might not come, executives juiced returns by spending near record amounts on buybacks.
 ‘Big Disconnect’ “You can’t do a whole lot more cost cutting and you can’t buy back a whole lot more stock,” David Lafferty, the chief market strategist for Natixis Global Asset Management in Boston, said by phone.
 “Equities will either be choppy or come down” After buying stocks indiscriminately in 2013, investors are punishing companies now that fail to deliver growth.
 IBM has spent $19 billion buying back its shares in the past 12 months and Coca-Cola plans to repurchase between $25 billion and $3 billion of its stock this year.
 At the same time, buybacks are losing their allure.
 “A good decree law provides investors, financiers and LNG buyers with an improved risk profile,” said Peffer.
 The buyout firms haven’t yet decided whether to go ahead with bids, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 The French company this year agreed to buy mobile-phone carrier SFR in a $23 billion deal as part of a plan to combine the asset with Drahi’s Numericable Group.
 “When you can buy proven companies with long-term track records right now at attractive prices, it’s always difficult to provide additional supply to the market” North American oil and natural gas supply gains have put downward pressure on commodity prices.
 There’s no specific plan to buy corporate bonds, ECB Governing Council member Luc Coene said this week in an interview with L’Echo newspaper.
 “The whole market has recovered on speculation the ECB might start buying corporates,” said Daniel Lenz, lead market strategist for the euro area at DZ Bank AG in Frankfurt.
 1 after funding costs for speculative-grade borrowers surged to the highest in a year and potential buyers demanded at least 12 percent interest.
 IBM has struggled to keep up with the industrywide shift, prompting Chief Executive Officer Ginni Rometty to buy SoftLayer Technologies Inc.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Amanat Holdings, the Dubai startup that’s selling shares to the public this month, plans to spend about 175 billion dirhams ($476 million) buying stakes in three to six health-care and education companies.
 “We continue to see good relative value in Brazil versus its peers” In 2002, Pimco kept buying Brazilian bonds as others dumped the securities amid concern incoming President Luiz Inacio Lula da Silva, a former union leader, would swell spending and sink the country into default.
 He recommends buying Danske shares.
 Elliott is an activist investor that buys stakes in businesses it deems undervalued.
 Vodafone agreed to buy Kabel Deutschland in a $10 billion transaction that was completed in October last year.
 Teva is trying to buy more time to shift patients to a longer-acting version that won’t face generic competition until 2030.
Investors are buying into funds thattrack oil prices at the fastest rate in two years, betting thatcrude will rebound from a bear market.
 Oil Fund to own more barrels of crude each monthas it sells the expiring futures and buys the less expensivenext-month contract.
 Iliad SA rallied 96 percent as it abandoned a plan to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile US Inc.
 Teva also increased its share buyback by $17 billion, to $3 billion, and said it plans to begin buying stock promptly.
 “This was an excellent quarter for Teva and the increased buyback is a positive bonus,” David Maris, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets, said in a note.
 HBO and its growth prospects are a big part of why New York-based Time Warner rejected a $75 billion buyout offer from Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc, saying it will be better off independent.
 15 because of lack of data to substantiate conclusion that consumer buying patterns had changed) Aug.
 “If Colgate is that lax in putting this kind of chemical in their product, I don’t think I’ll buy other Colgate-Palmolive brands,” Pollock said.
 It didn’t disclose the buyers or value of the deals.
 The investor will use the so-called revolving credit facility to buy projects that include solar and wind power plants as well as waste and water processing facilities, it said today in an e-mailed statement.
 is set to jump 28 percent to a two-year high just as China, the world’s biggest buyer, cuts imports because of record inventories.
 “Of course I’ll be concerned if the food I eat is directly or indirectly from GM products,” said Anh as she was buying pork in a market.
 RHB will issue new shares to buy CIMB and units of both firms will form a “mega-Islamic bank” with Malaysia Building Society, the companies said Oct.
 Growth Slows Having pulled the euro-area economy out of its debt panic in 2012, Draghi has sought to boost prices by cutting interest rates to record lows, issuing cheap loans to banks and laying the groundwork to begin buying private-sector assets this month.
 2, when Draghi stopped short of spelling out for how much the ECB might buy assets to head off deflation.
 Part of North Chicago, Illinois-based AbbVie’s rationale for buying Shire was to be able to lower its corporate tax rate by moving its legal address abroad.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- MVV Energie AG will buy a majority stake in renewable-power developer Juwi AG as the regional German utility expands in the clean-generation business.
 “People don’t tend to think about these things until they’re in the headlines, then they panic-buy,” said Scott, who founded Chicago-based LifeSecure in 2005.
 Buyers of the book frequently also purchase Tyvek suits and respirators, according to Amazon, which encourages customers to buy all three together.
 He suggested price-sensitive buyers won’t miss the features that are disappearing, including the right to buy or be awarded complimentary upgrades to better seats and the right to get same-day stand-by or confirmed tickets.
 Delta will need to make sure buyers know what they’re getting.
 of South Korea about buying the unit, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 While it’s unclear at this point if either company will bid, Delphi’s management is planning to meet with potential buyers this week, the people said.
 “Here I am, buying organic beef and strawberries! My kids are so lucky” Maskova is part of a new generation of eastern Europeans mindful of what they eat and willing to pay extra for it.
 Siemens Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser is trying to build the Munich-based company around products for “electrification, automation and digitalization” Last month, he agreed to buy Dresser-Rand Inc.
 Speculative-grade yields rose to 67 percent, the highest level in a year, stoking interest among potential buyers including Pacific Investment Management Co.
 The association’s members have mainly invested in term deposits and buying yuan, he said in a phone interview.
 He said the brand could be valued at as much as $1 billion if it can attract less well-heeled shoppers and said a strategic buyer or private equity firm might bite.
 Komatsu’s earnings are vulnerable to fluctuations in China, the world’s second-biggest economy and its largest buyer of materials.
 who recommends buying the shares, said in an interview.
 jumped 84 percent after TD Securities recommended buying the shares.
 TD Securities analyst Jamie Somerville raised the stock to buy from hold.
 Those two are free-to-play games that encourage users to keep spending small sums to speed up their game progress, as opposed to a one-time payment to buy most iterations of Angry Birds.
 Firms that buy and sell goods or services from the market would be at a disadvantage.
Fortress Investment Group LLC (FIG), the first publicly traded hedge-fund and private-equity manager in the US, is seeking about $43 billion to buy distressed credit around the world as investment firms prepare for markets to sour, according to people familiar with the matter.
 He has announced a plan to buy as much as $200 million of shares and has sold a minority holding in a graphite mining company as part of a review of Cliffs’ assets.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Reynolds American Inc, the tobacco company that agreed in July to buy US.
 The stock rose on the news of the Duracell separation rather than P&G’s first-quarter results, which were “nothing to write home about,” said Russo, who recommends buying P&G shares.
 Almost six years after the Fed started buying bonds and holding its benchmark interest rate at about zero, investors are preparing for policy makers to withdraw the policies.
 Hewlett-Packard still possesses “material nonpublic information” that prevents it from buying back shares, Chief Financial Officer Cathie Lesjak said yesterday after the $69 billion company announced plans to split in two pieces.
 Hewlett-Packard is spinning off its personal-computer and printer operations into a company to be called HP Inc, leaving enterprise software and services as a stand-alone entity that could buy $58 billion rival EMC.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Geberit AG, the Swiss maker of bathroom piping, offered about $14 billion to buy Finnish ceramic toilet maker Sanitec in what would be Chief Executive Officer Albert Baehny’s biggest acquisition.
 plans to buy back more shares, spending as much as C$17 billion ($15 billion), after posting third-quarter profit that missed analysts’ estimates.
 “CN seems ready to increase its payout ratio,” Benoit Poirier, an analyst at Desjardins Capital Markets who advises investors to buy Canadian National shares, said today in a note to clients.
 The buyback plan “will lend support to the shares,” Jim Corridore, an analyst at Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ, said in a note to clients.
 It will probably devote C$17 billion to the new buyback program after spending C$14 billion in 2013-2014, Jobin said on the conference call.
 Distressed Debt Fortress is seeking about $43 billion for its third credit opportunities fund to buy distressed debt, two people with knowledge of the plans said this month, joining investment firms Oaktree Capital Group LLC and Apollo Global Management LLC in anticipating deterioration in debt markets.
 Fortress stock is down about 62 percent since the company’s February 2007 initial public offering, when it sold shares at $1850 apiece to become the first US-listed buyout and hedge-fund manager.
 Hedge-fund firm Serengeti Asset Management LP last week recommended buying Fortress shares as they are “exceptionally cheap” and the firm should pay a significant dividend in the next couple of years.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 That’s more than twice as fast as the competition, said Andrew Nowinski, an analyst with Piper Jaffray Cos in Minneapolis who has a buy recommendation and a $50 price target for the stock.
 “It’s really up to Mellanox here to stay ahead of them and come out with a faster speed and stay ahead of the curve” Intel Threat In a July 16 note entitled “Giddy about Grantley,” Jefferies analyst James Kisner upgraded Mellanox to buy from hold, arguing that while the company faces a “significant threat” from Intel in the long term, that’s unlikely to materialize until at least 2016.
 Saudi Arabia, Iraq and Iran are offering the biggest discounts to crude buyers in Asia since at least 2009.
 2 that his institution will be buying assets for at least two more years.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Virgin Australia Holdings Ltd, the country’s second-ranked carrier, will buy the remainder of Tiger Airways Holdings Ltd’s local unit for A$1 (88 cents).
 Actavis has been the most active buyer of drug companies since January 2011, making more than $36 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 While Actavis may not be able to buy everything on its wish list, it could acquire Allergan and do some smaller deals, Kedra said.
 “We see fewer customers buying salmon after supplier prices have gone up 40 percent to 45 percent” The company also had a “difficult” start to October, as “there is change in the customer behavior we have to analyze, and there is an inflationary impact on our sales,” Dunning said.
 “Still, we feel confident to confirm the guidance for full-year sales growth of 34 percent to 38 percent” The retailer is making efforts to find more local suppliers and move away from buying abroad, Dunning said.
 The initiatives include a consensus on when defaulted loans are so flawed that lenders must buy them back from the two mortgage-finance companies, a key sticking point in efforts to unlock credit, according to three people familiar with the discussions.
 The banks’ reticence has kept first-time homebuyers and others with weak credit out of the real-estate market and created a drag on the fragile housing recovery.
 20 speech at the Mortgage Bankers Association conference in Las Vegas how some loans can be permanently exempted from the threat of buybacks, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the plans aren’t public.
 conservatorship since 2008, buy mortgages and package them into bonds on which they guarantee payments of principal and interest.
 have been in negotiations with Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac and the FHFA about how to clarify the rules governing loan buybacks.
 The gauge rose yesterday, paring gains in the final hour of trading, following a two-week drop driven by concern that the European Central Bank’s asset-buying plan won’t be enough to boost inflation and revive the region’s economy.
 Bank of America’s Merrill Lynch cut its rating on the London-based company to underperform, the equivalent of a sell, from a buy.
 The company, which supplies medicines in more than 150 countries, last year spent more than $2 billion buying assets from London-based Glaxo and US.
 “Consumers have long complained about how their cable service forces them to buy channels they never watch,” Wheeler said.
 Tradeweb Markets LLC said yesterday that its customers can buy and sell investment grade US.
 They’re trying to change a system where, for decades, buying and selling has taken place over the phone among investors who prize discretion in the thinly traded $77 trillion US.
 Additionally, he said Tradeweb may mimic stock exchanges with a central order book, which would let investors buy or sell with a single command.
 About 25 percent of the buying and selling has been facilitated by the streamed prices, with the rest split between the two methods of request-for-quote trading, Olesky said.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Morgan Stanley advised clients to buy Russian stocks seven weeks after cutting the country to sell, the latest sign of how volatile the market has become as the conflict in neighboring Ukraine approaches its eighth month.
 The bank cut its recommendation to sell in late July, just a month after raising it to buy.
 “Cheap or not, buyers should wait for stabilization of oil and geopolitical de-risking,” JPMorgan analyst Alex Kantarovich wrote in an Oct.
 So if the market is undervaluing Apple at the moment, Icahn argued, now is the time for Cook to push for a stock buyback of as much as $100 billion.
 Investors are trying to buy up copper mines in anticipation of rising prices.
 Also, the company adjusted its outlook because of fewer customers signing up for or upgrading to installment plans and more subscribers bringing their own device instead of buying one through AT&T.
 In the third quarter, 7 percent of customers on smartphone plans brought their own devices instead of buying one from AT&T.
 Aiming to build its video business, AT&T agreed in May to buy El Segundo, California-based DirecTV.
 Litmus Test The bid-ask spread for major currencies, the difference between the price at which traders are willing to buy and sell, was 008 percent this month, little changed from September and compared with a six-year average of 011, according to JPMorgan.
 The company raised its share buyback plan to $15 billion from $135 billion.
 Continental Coal Ltd, in which Village bought a stake last year, received an approach from a third party interested in buying its 74 percent holding in its South African subsidiary, the West Perth, Australia-based company said in a separate statement dated Oct.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- SABMiller Plc hinted at the prospect of more deals in the brewing industry after being rebuffed in an attempt to buy smaller rival Heineken NV.
 who recommends investors buy the shares, said by phone from London.
 The hedge fund has been agitating behind the scenes since at least July for the VMware spinoff and for EMC to seek strategic buyers for its remaining businesses, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Spinning off VMware would make the rest of EMC more attractive to other buyers, potentially delivering even higher returns to shareholders, Elliott wrote.
 and pushed through changes at Juniper Networks Inc, including cost cuts and a buyback.
 “With worrying signs that the economy might be rolling over, and European equities not cheap anymore, it’s no wonder people want to move their money elsewhere” To combat falling prices, boost lending and bring back economic growth, Draghi cut the European Central Bank’s three main interest rates last month and announced an asset-buying plan.
 The measures and a falling euro may still buy more time for growth to take hold, according to Matthew Garman, a strategist at Morgan Stanley in London.
 in London with a buy rating on the stock.
 For the $499 price of a Swash -- now available nationwide -- consumers could buy a new smartphone or an actual washingmachine.
 Almost 70 percent of consumers had told P&G that theyavoided buying clothes requiring excessive care.
 Yet the problem of persuading people to buy things theydon’t know they need has been solved before, perhaps mostspectacularly by Sony with its Walkman.
 The target buyer is “Sam,” a hypothetical, androgynous30-something who has annual income of $80,000 and spends heavilyon clothing.
 You have to buy the pods, which cost $699 for a box of 12.
 Refiners say the maritime law raises their costs and puts them at a disadvantage to foreign companies, that could buy US.
 “After the recent correction, investors are buying in.
 Investors should buy mid-cap H shares as they are cheaper than their counterparts in the mainland, said Sam Le Cornu, whose Macquarie Asia New Stars Fund has outperformed 98 percent of peers tracked by Bloomberg in the past five years.
 Securities and Exchange Commission approached the company for information in a probe of lending to car buyers with spotty credit.
 The declines came even as the slowdown boosted speculation the European Central Bank will eventually purchase government debt in a full quantitative easing program, after confirming today it began buying covered bonds.
 Earlier this month, Iliad SA scrapped its offer to buy a majority stake in T-Mobile, joining Sprint and AT&T in failing to win control of the company.
 While Evonik is exploring an acquisition of all of DSM, which has a market value of 9 billion euros, it is most interested in the nutrition division, which supplies ingredients for health supplements and personal-care products, and would also consider buying just part of the company, the people said.
 Evonik spokeswoman Barbara Mueller denied any plans or considerations to buy DSM, saying “that is definitely not the case and there are no talks” Representatives for DSM, Clariant and Croda declined to comment on whether Evonik is evaluating them as a takeover target.
 Evonik would also consider buying parts of DSM to get around the issue of being based in Germany, one of the people said.
 The German company could also buy all of the Dutch firm and then sell off parts, another person said.
 Acreage in Kansas may rise to a 17-year high, said Jeff Kahle, the managing director for Quinter, Kansas-based United Plains Ag Cooperative, which buys grains in about 18 counties in western Kansas and Eastern Colorado.
 He has a “buy” rating on the stock.
 Hasenstab’s Fund Franklin had 41 percent of its assets in stock funds and 40 percent in products that buy bonds as of Sept.
 Funds that buy a mix of stocks and bonds accounted for 18 percent of assets.
 market where growth and profitability is the greatest” Verizon Interest Crown Castle has said it’s interested in buying Verizon Communications Inc’s wireless network towers, which could fetch about $6 billion as one of the last large groups of US.
 In a letter earlier this month, Corvex urged Crown Castle to increase its dividend payout ratio or raise cash to buy back more stock, before bidding for Verizon’s towers.
 Tower Deals Crown Castle has been a buyer of US.
 agreed to be bought by Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group for about $681 million, three days after shareholders rejected its plan to buy another banana producer in a tax inversion.
 Chiquita had rejected Cutrale-Safra’s overtures three times, including last week when it said the $1450-a-share price wasn’t superior to its plans to buy Dublin-based banana producer Fyffes Plc.
 ‘Brand Loyalty’ Cutrale, a closely held fruit juice company, and banks controlled by Brazil’s second-richest man, Joseph Safra, initially made an unsolicited offer of $13 a share to buy Chiquita in August.
 dollars created an impetus for Venezuelan distributors to buy more product and take it outside the country.
 Declining sales in Venezuela in the first six months of this year, driven by price increases, argue against Richard’s thesis that distributors there are buying excess product to sell elsewhere, he said.
 Carrefour, which agreed in June to buy back discount stores in France, is focusing on price and convenience as it seeks to cement a domestic revival.
 If Crist wins, he may push for a program similar to that adopted in Arkansas and more palatable to Republicans, which has enabled the poor to buy private insurance using Medicaid, McGorman said.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Ireland’s central bank plans to cap how much banks can lend home buyers to prevent rebounding house prices from turning into a fresh credit-induced real estate bubble six years after the nation’s property crash.
 “Ireland is now at a classic point in the economic credit cycle where first-time buyers are becoming ever more desperate to demand highly leveraged mortgage lending,” said Conall Mac Coille, an economist with Dublin-based securities firm Davy.
 The central bank said today it also plans to cap loans for buy-to-let properties so that no more than 10 percent of new such lending is at loan-to-value ratios in excess of 80 percent.
 Almost 43 percent of the 29 billion euros of buy-to-let loans on banks’ balance sheets are in distress.
 FourPoint Energy LLC and EnerVest Ltd, a private-equity firm with more than $9 billion in managed assets, will buy 145,000 acres in the Granite Wash and Cleveland plays of Texas and Oklahoma for $195 billion.
 In the other sale, KKR & Co-backed Fleur de Lis Energy LLC agreed to buy 7,200 acres in the Permian Basin of Texas for $350 million.
 “Personally, I think the risks for buying such debt are not fully reflected in their prices,” Tham, who oversees more than $1 billion, said in a phone interview yesterday.
 While if a factory owned all of its stores, it could set prices and buyers would lose virtually all bargaining power” The bill prohibits automakers from selling a vehicle “directly to a retail customer other than through franchised dealers,” with exceptions for nonprofit organizations and government agencies.
 Chinese collector Liu Yiqian used his AmEx Centurion Card to buy an ancient ceramic cup for a record $36 million in April, racking up almost 422 million points.
 Commodity Futures Trading Commission are weighing whether to require that contracts for non-deliverable forwards be guaranteed at clearinghouses that accept collateral from buyers and sellers.
 Non-deliverable forwards are contracts to buy or sell a currency in the future that are settled with cash rather than delivery of the currency.
 European equities tumbled the most in 15 months on concern that an asset-buying program announced today by European Central Bank President Mario Draghi won’t be enough to boost inflation and revive the economy.
 Draghi didn’t give us anything I would get excited about to say, ’Wow, let’s buy copper, things are going to get spectacular in Europe’” Bart Melek, the head of commodity strategy at TD Securities in Toronto, said in a telephone interview.
 Fairway filings show Sterling invested about $90 million to buy about 80 percent of the company in 2007.
 stocks extended a rebound, with the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index rallying the most in a year, as speculation grew the European Central Bank is buying bonds and corporate results beat estimates.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- After buying a high-efficiency washing machine, Stephen Asbel found that adding his usual amount of detergent turned his family’s clothes into a sudsy mess.
 That shift is a “double whammy” for P&G and others that sell more premium products, because the customers who upgrade to the washers tend to be the same ones who buy costlier detergents, Escalante said.
 Since December, he has privately campaigned for better corporate governance, share buybacks, and a breakup of MSG, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Splitting off MSG’s sports teams and cable networks in one company will make a sale of the Knicks easier for Dolan, because it can avoid a large tax bill a year after a spinoff, and because a buyer wouldn’t have to spend billions on lower margin real estate and entertainment joint ventures.
 Stern said on ESPN that year that the Knicks’ owners were “not a model of intelligent management” Investors in both Cablevision and MSG have been skeptical of the Dolans’ decisions over the years, including Cablevision buying Newsday in 2008, according to Paul Sweeney, an analyst at Bloomberg Intelligence.
 Thaler publicly disclosed the activist investment in August, and yesterday MSG said its board is weighing a split, will begin buying back shares, and named shareholder-friendly directors to its board -- activist Nelson Peltz and private-equity investor Scott Sperling.
 “We’re not consenting to the changes” Schaeffler is seeking to reduce debt it accumulated from buying a stake in Continental AG amid the credit crisis in 2008.
 The number of calls to buy shares of the Chinese mobile-security service provider has climbed to 356,000 on Oct.
 Bison Capital Holding Co, an investment firm in Beijing, proposed on July 30 to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR, a 42 percent premium over the previous day’s closing price.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Tesoro Logistics LP agreed to buy QEP Resources Inc’s natural-gas pipeline and processing business for $25 billion in cash to expand its business in the Rocky Mountains and North Dakota.
 agreed to buy Atlas Pipeline Partners LP and Atlas Energy LP for $587 billion last week.
 The company may buy oil assets or producers whose shares have dropped because of a decline in crude prices, wrote Rezvan, who rates QEP a buy.
 Given that Magnit focuses on low-income customers who usually buy domestic products, it suffered less than anyone who focuses on middle-class customers” A total of 16 of 20 analysts covering Magnit’s GDRs recommend investors buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “As long as the situation isn’t resolved, the shares will likely trade at a discount to our projected price target” Vilidnitsky increased his target price on Magnit to $8143 from $8070 yesterday, reiterating a buy recommendation.
 Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA is helping Bankia and CaixaBank find a buyer for the loans, the people said, asking not to be identified as the process isn’t public.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- South Africa will search for potential buyers for an equity stake in South African Airways SOC Ltd.
 The company, which has 17 buy, nine hold and one sell recommendations from analysts, rose 09 percent to $7135 at the close in New York.
 They are offering to buy the company and a portfolio of about 34 billion euros ($43 billion) in bad loans, the people said.
 Twitter got a favorable rate for the more than $18 billion in convertible debt that it sold last month, even though the company didn’t have anything in mind to buy with the money at the time, the CEO said.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Steris Corp, an Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products, agreed to buy Synergy Health Plc for about 12 billion pounds ($19 billion) and move to the UK.
 for tax purposes, a sign tougher rules against such transactions aren’t deterring some buyers.
 The Obama administration also wants to prevent companies from inverting by buying a smaller foreign business, but that requires congressional action and Democrats and Republicans have been unable to agree.
 Principal trading is the business of using a firm’s capital to buy and sell securities, while profiting on the spread and movement in prices.
 Its merger and credit strategies are still up this year and an unrestricted share class of the Advantage funds that can buy new issues bucked the rest of the funds in September.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 7 amid speculation that buyout firm TPG Capital Management LP is considering a purchase of Tesco’s Dunnhumby data analysis unit.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Spain’s Ferrovial SA agreed to buy three UK.
 “This presents a buying opportunity” Adding Junk Pacific Investment Management Co and Blackstone Group LP said last week that they are poised to snap up junk bonds.
 “We are reducing some of our loan exposure and buying high-yield bonds.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said the central bank should consider delaying the end of its bond buying, signaling the Fed may take action to insulate the US.
 The money manager in recent months moved to an underweight position in longer-dated periphery debt, and it ended a key overweight position in Portuguese securities as investors priced in expectations the ECB would have to buy sovereign bonds to revive the region’s economy, Thiel said.
 To participate in the peripheral market on the view that it is a given, that the ECB will buy a bond from you if you buy it today, is a mistake” Quantitative easing expectations have built among investors amid speculation the ECB won’t be able to increase its balance sheet by 1 trillion euros ($127 trillion), a goal ECB President Mario Draghi indicated last month to be carried out with plans already announced.
 After the ECB’s Governing Council meeting yesterday, Draghi played down the importance of the balance sheet target as he provided more details on the plans to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 “I still have some concerns about that” The ECB said it may buy assets in crisis-hit Greece and Cyprus, which have a debt rating below BBB minus.
 “Now that they don’t have to buy at such a high price, they should drop,” Pando said while waiting at Dallas-Fort Worth International Airport for a trip to visit friends in Orlando.
 Economic growth and energy demand is slowing in China, Iran’s biggest buyer, while the Persian Gulf state’s sales are restricted by US.
 They’re also reacting to ever-increasing demand for new, centrally located apartments from Chinese buyers seeking to escape their own faltering housing market and improve their quality of life.
 The life-long country resident and her partner are buying their second apartment in two years on the 60th floor of the 63-story Eq.
 Many of them are building apartments in Australia to satisfy growing demand from foreign buyers, he said.
 Foreign buyers accounted for a quarter of demand for new homes and 115 percent of existing homes in Victoria in the three months to Sept.
 In addition to traditional amenities including pools and gyms that many apartment buildings have, extra features include poker rooms and guest lounges to help attract buyers, Golden Age founder Jeff Xu said.
 To win sales for a model that hasn’t secured a new airline customer since 2012, it needs to convince would-be buyers that the aircraft has a place in their fleets outside the week-long Hajj itself.
 At the same time, Garuda is concerned there’d be little year-round call for the model and would be reluctant to buy without government help, he said.
 He was selected for his buy recommendation on Apple, which tripled in price.
 Wolf’s next big call, in April 1985, was a prescient buy recommendation on Apple when it traded at around a split-adjusted 38 cents a share.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Saddled with $13 billion of debt seven years after buying Corus Group Plc, Tata Steel Ltd.
 Of the 50 tracking the stock, 34 rate it a buy, while eight suggest selling.
 analyst, upgraded the stock to buy from neutral.
 Investors in most mutual funds can buy or sell shares once a day, typically after markets close, and only directly with the fund.
 Of 14 equity analysts that followed the maker of mobile phone screens, four considered it the equivalent of a buy at the end of last week, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 It ended last week with a consensus rating of 3 in a system where buy ratings score a 5 and sells score a 1.
 He had rated the stock outperform, the equivalent of buy, since August, when he began coverage with a price target of $19.
 If banks commit compliance errors in issuing a loan that goes bad, they have to buy it back at a loss from Fannie Mae or Freddie Mac.
 Lending Falls The higher costs and concerns about buybacks are driving the decline in mortgages for home purchases.
 At 1st Priority Mortgage, based outside of Buffalo, New York, one investor who buys the company’s loans requires employees to fill out a seven-page form verifying compliance with qualified mortgage standards.
 More Examiners Regulators are also reducing buyback risks to lenders.
 Iliad, which originally proposed buying 566 percent of T-Mobile US Inc, still intends to offer about $33 for each T-Mobile share for a significantly larger stake, said the people, asking not to be identified discussing a private matter.
 The company held talks with potential investors including buyout firm KKR & Co, people with knowledge of the matter said last month, and discussed raising as much as $5 billion in additional debt and equity for a sweetened offer.
 In a profanity-laced tirade, Legere said his employees still have post-traumatic stress disorder from AT&T’s failed attempt to buy the wireless carrier.
 funds that buy high-yield bonds, according to Lipper data.
 The 1974 picture of Sao Schlumberger, composed of four separate portraits of the arts patron and haute-couture client, also remained in the possession of its original buyer.
 IndiGo, the biggest domestic carrier in India by market share, has a right to buy another 100 jets as part of the deal, President Aditya Ghosh said in a phone interview today.
 While IndiGo talked to Boeing Co, Airbus’s main competitor, the New Delhi-based carrier’s preference was to buy Airbus planes, people familiar with the airline’s discussions said in July.
 government offered to buy electricity at a price that’s almost double today’s market rate under a 35-year contract.
 JDcom, Vipshop “Alibaba still has tremendous opportunity inside China,” Gil Luria, a technology analyst with Wedbush Securities who recommends buying the stock, said by phone yesterday.
 They will probably expand globally in other categories” The Beijing-based company operates online commerce platforms connecting buyers and sellers and provides services that help them conduct business.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Banks in London are expanding curbs on entertainment, with some adding bans on buying clients shots and expensing pricey bottle services for tables at nightclubs.
 In addition to putting an end to buying clients shots of booze, one sent around a memo imposing a curfew on entertaining, according to GQ Employment Law.
 Homebuilding in central London doubled in two years as record-low interest rates and demand from overseas buyers drove up values at a pace not seen since 1987.
 Though prices climbed for most of this year, the pillars supporting the London market -- a cheap pound, record-low interest rates and the city’s reputation as a haven for foreign buyers -- have been eroding for months.
 Overseas buyers have seen prices rise because of a strengthening pound, as well as new levies such as a capital-gains tax on homes sold by people living abroad.
 “Supply is increasing, so there will be more choice and I do believe that the inferior units will suffer” Many of the developers are targeting overseas buyers at the luxury end of the market, where rising supply has already reduced the premium paid for new apartments over existing ones to 431 percent at the end of the first quarter from 676 percent in 2012, London-based broker Huntly Hooper Ltd.
 “A few months ago, it could have been overpriced and it was still selling” Unattractive Prices Most domestic buyers can’t afford or don’t want apartments that cost more than 1,000 pounds a square foot, JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “There is an increasing sophistication of the overseas buyer; it’s not just a one-way ticket, which is good,” said Hurley at Mount Anvil.
 “Any issuance that occurs is likely to be small placements, bought by buy and hold investors and so the market would be very illiquid” Lack of Sales Only one bond denominated in dirhams has been issued this year through yesterday, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “After the early morning buying spree traders have sat on their hands,” Chris Weston, chief markets strategist in Melbourne at IG Ltd, wrote in an e-mail to clients.
 Louis Fed Bank President James Bullard said the central bank should consider delaying the end of its bond buying to halt the decline in inflation expectations.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Teb Portfoy Yonetimi AS has been buying shares of consumer businesses as the manager of one of Turkey’s best performing funds prepares for a spike in spending after possible interest rate cuts next year.
 climbed 4 percent to C$5671 after being raised to an “action list buy” at TD Securities.
 Osaka Bay Ferrovial, the Spanish builder, and Macquarie agreed this month to buy three UK.
 said it was buying cloud specialist Eucalyptus Systems Inc.
 Synergy Health Plc jumped 31 percent after Steris Corp, an Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products, agreed to buy it for about 12 billion pounds ($19 billion).
 The Governing Council kept interest rates unchanged at record lows and said it will start buying covered bonds and asset-backed securities to support the economy.
 The company is also seeking buyers for assets or stakes in projects from the US.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 Regulators in 2011 insisted Comcast follow open-Internet rules before letting the company buy NBC Universal.
 The FCC twice halted its review before letting Comcast buy NBC Universal.
 This “is a good time to buy plantation and processing company equities,” Mistry said today and listed Wilmar International Ltd.
 “There’s no point in buying gold,” John Stephenson, chief executive officer at Stephenson & Co.
 A so-called short squeeze occurs when prices rise as investors who made bearish bets are forced to buy the security to pay back borrowed shares.
 Rockies Expansion Credit-default swaps, which typically fall as investor confidence improves, pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 The US-backed companies will spell out when they will force lenders to buy back loans that were issued based on false or inaccurate information, Federal Housing Finance Agency Director Melvin L.
 The banks’ reticence has kept first-time homebuyers and others with weak credit out of the real-estate market.
 Steps clarifying when loan flaws will trigger buybacks are important, but that’s not enough to solve the problem, MBA President David Stevens said in a speech today.
 conservatorship since 2008, buy mortgages and package them into bonds on which they guarantee payments of principal and interest.
 To increase lending to borrowers of modest means, the FHFA is working to let Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy loans with down payments as low as 3 percent of purchase price, Watt said.
 The technology, adapted from consumer cameras such as its Lumix series, will probably also find buyers in the airline industry, he said.
 currency is being driven by speculation the Fed is preparing to raise interest rates while policy makers in Japan and Europe will maintain or increase bond-buying programs to pump money into their economies.
 Monte Paschi’s missteps began with its November 2007 agreement to buy Padua-based Banca Antonveneta SpA.
 in Seoul, said he’s still considering buying Australian mining companies.
 Then the mining commodity shares should perform brilliantly” A decline in yields around the world has made stocks a better buy than bonds, according to Nader Naeimi, one of the portfolio managers at Sydney-based AMP Capital Investors Ltd, which has $125 billion in assets.
 The European Central Bank began buying bonds this week, according to people familiar with the purchases.
 The Swiss bank ignored or frustrated interest from potential buyers in Asia, Russia and the Middle East, according to Leshkasheli’s lawsuit filed in 2012, and less than a year after the sale, one of the bankers involved in the deal left to work for Gutseriev.
 Leshkasheli argues that Credit Suisse failed to attract firm bids from prospective buyers that included national oil companies from India and Vietnam whose preliminary valuations of the asset ranged from $350 million to as high as $12 billion.
 The second process also failed to elicit any firm bids from prospective buyers, which included Hecton Investments Ltd.
 Leshkasheli, who currently runs London-based Mayfair Energy Group UK LLP, had also strained relations with Socar, lowering the value of the asset and deterring buyers, the bank said.
 increased 31 percent to C$12067, a record, after unveiling a three-year growth strategy that includes additional share buybacks of C$400 million ($360 million) through 2015.
 pressures it to spin off the faster-growing VMware, saying doing would make the rest of EMC more attractive to other buyers.
 SQM’s local shares have an average consensus rating among eight analysts of 15, with 1 meaning sell and 5 buy, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP represented Brazil’s Cutrale Group and Safra Group in its protracted and ultimately successful bid to buy Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 Chiquita rejected Cutrale-Safra’s overtures three times, including last week when it said the $1450-a-share price wasn’t superior to its plans to buy Dublin-based banana producer Fyffes Plc.
 The bad bank was set up in 2010 to buy non-performing loans and stabilize Nigeria’s banking industry after a debt crisis threatened it with collapse.
 4 named Skye Bank Plc the preferred buyer for Mainstreet Bank, the second of the nationalized lenders close to being sold.
 The gauge of personal finances increased to 524 from 50 a week earlier, while the buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, was little changed at 327 compared with 33 the prior period.
 Since then, Dupont Chief Executive Officer Ellen Kullman has announced cuts in administration, a share buyback worth $5 billion and a spinoff the company’s performance chemicals unit, a commodity business that has more volatile earnings than other segments.
 Uncertainty means potential licencees, who will provide income by buying DuPont’s cellulosic ethanol technology to use in their own cellulosic plants, are “sitting on the sidelines,” he said.
 3Legs Resources Plc, the Isle of Man-based company that was the first foreign explorer to buy a license in the East European nation, said last month it’s leaving after poor results at Poland’s biggest fracking operation in the northeastern Baltic Basin.
 3Legs handed three permits in the Baltic Basin to partner ConocoPhillips last month, seven years after becoming the first foreign company to buy a license in Poland, citing poor results from their Lublewo well.
 Then in 2007 an outbreak of infectious salmon anemia or ISA ravaged stocks with suppliers losing contracts with buyers including Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 The Oslo-based company controlled by shipping billionaire John Fredriksen will add 40,000 tons of capacity as it buys Acuinova for $120 million.
 told clients to buy the shares.
 The North Chicago, Illinois-based pharmaceuticals company planned to buy Shire for an estimated $52 billion, then move the combined company’s legal address to the UK.
 Trading Rules Javelin narrowed its plans after swap buyers said the original version would cause too many types of trades to occur on the platforms.
 Argentina’s sovereign risk excludes the nation from access to long-term LNG contracts and forces it to buy in the more expensive spot market, Montamat’s Scheimberg said.
 “If they could buy long-term contracts you’d be able to sell those shipments in the spot market at a fair price.
 “After the index dipped below 50,000, it started to lure buyers” After the selloff, some stocks are trading at compelling levels, according to Frederico Sampaio, the chief investment officer at Franklin Templeton Investments’ Brazilian unit.
 India’s subsidy bill rose fivefold under Prime Minister Manmohan Singh as he implemented policies to buy farm produce at guaranteed prices, boost rural wages and distribute cheap food.
 The Coatesville Area School District has agreed to a 25-year contract to buy electricity from it.
 Price Discrepancies Orders to buy or sell stock are submitted and withdrawn all the time in electronic markets, where computerized strategies are used by arbitragers to profit from price discrepancies and by market makers to anticipate demand.
 In that case, the orders found buyers and resulted in hundreds of millions of dollars in losses to the Jersey City, New Jersey-based firm.
 erred in not notifying the regulator that it crossed a critical threshold in buying shares of GFI Group Inc.
 “Our preferred route is to place some of the shares on the market and combine that with Dassault buying some of the shares,” Lahoud said.
 Citigroup downgraded its recommendation on the stock to neutral from buy.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said yesterday policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond buying.
 The company agreed to buy Catalunya Banc from the government in July in a bet that Spain’s economy is on the road to a lasting recovery.
 The lender is taking advantage of a rally in ABS prices spurred by the European Central Bank’s plan to buy the securities as part of its asset purchase program.
 The yield premium investors seek to buy European asset-backed bonds over benchmark rates is 078 percentage point, approaching the lowest in seven years, according to Barclays Plc index data.
 Secretary of State John Kerry told Vietnam Deputy Prime Minister Pham Binh Minh that Vietnam will be able to buy non-lethal weapons from the US.
 will buy out the additional 40 percent stake held by minority investors in Istanbul’s second-biggest airport for about 285 million euros ($361 million), the company said.
 Malaysia Airports yesterday exercised its pre-emptive rights to buy the stake in Istanbul Sabiha Gokcen Airport from units of Turkish builder Limak Holding AS, it said in a filing to the exchange.
 The bid from Malaysia Airports put an end to plans by TAV Havalimanlari Holding AS, owner of Istanbul’s larger Ataturk airport, to buy the stake in a deal reached last month.
 Malaysia Airports, operator of airfields in the Southeast Asian country, had agreed in December to raise its stake in Sabiha Gokcen to 60 percent, paying 225 million euros to buy out Indian partner GMR Infrastructure Ltd.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Gingko Tree Investment Ltd, a unit of the agency that manages China’s foreign currency reserves, is in talks to buy a Munich office park that’s valued at as much as 500 million euros ($630 million), according to two people with knowledge of the plan.
 Crown Estate to buy a shopping center in the English city of Leicester for 3455 million pounds.
 “Gloomier news in the world has turned into the American buyer’s best friend,” said Keith Gumbinger, vice president of HSHcom, a Riverdale, New Jersey-based mortgage-data firm.
 While borrowing costs are low, lenders are continuing to tighten the credit vise on homebuyers after five straight years of economic expansion, imposing the toughest standards since at least 1998, according to a new index by research company CoreLogic Inc.
 It stems from decreases in the value of the company’s debt, under the theory it would be less expensive to buy it back.
 Gorman’s plan also relies in part on increasing dividends and share buybacks.
 The firm in March announced a $1 billion stock-buyback plan and doubled its dividend to 10 cents a share.
 of Nigeria, a state company created to buy bad debt from lenders after the country’s 2009 financial crisis, also last year raised its annual levy on banks from to 05 percent of their assets from 03 percent.
 Acibadem Saglik Hizmetleri ve Ticaret AS, Turkey’s biggest hospital chain owned by IHH Healthcare Bhd and Khazanah Nasional Bhd, is in exclusive due diligence to buy rival Medicana Saglik Grubu, Istanbul-based Medicana said Sept.
 College Operator For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA rose 13 percent to 2998 reais after Valor Economico newspaper reported the company is in talks to buy two universities in Brazil.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Hong Kong stocks rose from a three-month low on optimism the Federal Reserve will delay the end of bond-buying.
 The publisher disclosed plans for the buyouts and layoffsin a regulatory filing today, saying the reductions “arenecessary to control our costs and to allow us to continue toinvest in the digital future of The New York Times” In a memo to the newsroom, Executive Editor Dean Baquetsaid that there will be forced layoffs if 100 newsroom jobscan’t be eliminated through voluntary buyouts.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Rentrak Corp, a data provider for the entertainment industry, soared after agreeing to buy Kantar Media’s US.
 The deal offers advertisers, cable networks and TV stations “even more latitude and tools to capture and understand consumer behavior” Harrigan, based in Denver, has a buy rating on the shares.
 lost a bid for a $112 million breakup fee after a judge sided with India-based rival Apollo Tyres Ltd, which claimed a failure to honor terms of a buyout agreement doomed the $25 billion sale of the US.
 The company’s ownership of Chinese affiliate Chengshan Cooper Tires, which seized control of its facility after the merger announcement and wouldn’t release financial records, was “a major obstacle” to consummating the buyout terms, Glasscock wrote.
 coal market in decades is driving the Russian steelmaker and other big mine owners for the exit, and a new class of buyers has emerged.
 “In any sort of cyclical industry, you want to buy when there’s blood in the street,” said George Dethlefsen, chief executive officer of Corsa Coal Corp, the Canadian mining company that’s backed by private equity investors, which bought PBS.
 private-equity firm Quintana Capital Group LP, plans to buy and develop mines close to Pittsburgh and the Great Lakes, the US.
 last year to buy an eastern Kentucky coal mining complex for $473 million.
 He created Blackhawk Mining LLC in 2010 to buy idled mines and his family is majority owner of the company through JMP Holdings LLC.
 Blackhawk has doubled its coal mining capacity this year, after buying Arch’s Hazard unit for $263 million in March.
 That kind of pressure mean more opportunities may arise for buyers of US.
 The Mentor, Ohio-based provider of hospital sterilization products and services announced yesterday that it will buy the smaller Synergy Health Plc and establish the combined company’s tax address in the UK, with senior executives remaining in the US.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Frank Timis, founder of Sierra Leone’s biggest iron-ore producer African Minerals Ltd, is close to buying the Marampa mine from London Mining Plc, which appointed administrators last week.
 prompted a four-hour trading halt at the world’s largest futures market, preventing buying and selling of contracts tied to major stock indexes, Treasuries, oil and gold.
 “Tesla has battery technology that’s years ahead of the competition,” said James, who rates Tesla a buy and projects it will reach $325 within 12 months.
 While the company has looked at buying a number of other businesses since then, the owners demanded a higher price than Truworths was willing to pay, Mark said in 2012.
 with a mission of rethinking the way people buy and sell stuff with their mobile phones.
 “I would not recommend Square to anybody” With today’s debut of Apple Pay, a service that lets shoppers buy goods in stores using Apple Inc’s iPhones, and the coming spinoff of EBay Inc’s PayPal, more Square customers could be lured away by rival services that offer lower fees, easier transactions and a deeper pool of buyers and sellers.
 “Holds on funds are extremely rare -- a fraction of a fraction of a percentage point -- and may occur when we need additional information to protect our buyers and sellers from potential chargebacks, high-risk transactions, or violations of our Terms of Service,” said Aaron Zamost, a spokesman for Square.
 It has 157 million active buyers and sellers completing transactions via the Web.
 China Taiping Insurance Group (HK) Co, the company’scontrolling shareholder, will buy its allotment of the rightsshares for HK$442 billion.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said yesterday policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond buying.
 “The market has a buy-the-dip mentality right now,” John Canally, an economic strategist at LPL Financial Corp.
 fundamentals might’ve gotten some people interested in buying again.
 “Credit is a buy here, specifically high yield” bonds and loans, Mark Kiesel, one of three managers who oversee Pimco’s $202 billion Total Return Fund, said yesterday in a Bloomberg Television interview.
 “The buyback is a further step in the creeping takeover of Hochtief by ACS,” UBS analysts including Daniel Porter wrote in a note to clients today.
 “Our thesis remains that a premium cash bid for minorities is unlikely” The buyback, announced in a statement last night, follows a 256 million-euro ($323 million) repurchase program by Hochtief last year that helped Madrid-based ACS increase its stake to 61 percent.
 The new buyback may boost the holding to 65 percent, increasing expectations of a full takeover, according to analysts at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 Separation Plans EBay and PayPal are considered takeover candidates after their split, for buyers such as Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 “People were really afraid of a miss,” said Freedman, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 “The process of buying a home used to be stupid easy.
 Now, my wife and I were buying a home with two salaries, we make a heck of a lot more than I used to, and I have to go into great and terrible detail to show documentation” Lenders are continuing to tighten the credit vise on homebuyers after five straight years of economic expansion, imposing the toughest standards since at least 1998, according to a new index by CoreLogic Inc.
 He’s already refinanced twice since buying the Capitol Hill rowhouse in May 2004, land records show.
 Easy Credit During the housing bubble in early 2005, credit for buying homes was at its loosest, more than twice as available as in 1998, according to the index.
 Lenders raised standards after the 2008 housing collapse compelled the government to rescue Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac and the companies forced banks to buy back bad loans from them with underwriting errors.
 Airbus is seeking ways to lure buyers for the twin-engine A330 as demand slides ahead of plans to introduce a more-efficient version with new engines.
 Both companies, along with Swedish Match and Philip Morris International Inc, are committed to “generously rewarding” investors, though share buybacks are being scaled back to reduce debt, Moody’s said.
 A stock gauge designed by Societe Generale SA comprisingbusinesses that plan to buy back shares, a strategy to boostshareholder returns while reducing cash balances, is beating itsbetter-known peer.
 While the JPX-Nikkei 400also takes into account return on equity, which can be increasedby conducting buybacks, it’s equally weighted to companies’profitability, an area where Japan’s businesses fall short ofglobal peers.
 We created the buyback index “as a way to get exposure tothe increasing interest in shareholder value in Japan,” SocieteGenerale quantitative strategist Frank Benzimra said in aninterview last month.
 “The idea is to capture abnormal returnsobserved after the announcement of the share buyback.
 After a few months they dissipate” High Turnover The buyback index reviews its constituent companies everytwo months and generally only includes those that have announcedplans to repurchase shares during that period, Benzimra said.
 Ifthe number of eligible firms is less than 15, they keepcompanies previously in the index to fill the remaining spots,choosing the ones with the highest buyback ratios, or thepercentage of all shares that they said they would repurchaseIf more than 25 say they will repurchase shares in a givenperiod, those with the lowest ratios are left out.
 Record Cash Companies have been buying back shares as holdings of cashremain near record levels after Abe and the Bank of Japan’spolicies spurred inflation and weakened the yen, boostingearnings at exporters.
 The company has announced a buyback everyyear since at least 2011, according to data compiled byBloomberg.
 said in April it wouldspend as much as 500 billion yen ($46 billion) to buy backstock.
 Toyota Motor Corp, Japan’s largest company by marketvalue, said in March it would buy back as much as 360 billionyen of shares, its first such purchase in five years.
 MitsubishiCorp, the country’s biggest trading house, announced itsbiggest buyback in seven years in May.
 “That’s why we created this buybackindex -- as a way to get exposure to companies raising return onequity” To contact the reporters on this story:Anna Kitanaka in Tokyo at akitanaka@bloombergnet;Toshiro Hasegawa in Tokyo at thasegawa6@bloombergnet To contact the editors responsible for this story:Sarah McDonald at smcdonald23@bloombergnetTom Redmond, Jim Powell Press spacebar to pause and continue.
 rose for the first time in four days as JG Capital said a selloff that pushed the online fashion retailer’s valuation to a 10-month low provided a buying opportunity for some investors.
 11, is also luring buyers, said Henry Guo, a San Francisco-based analyst at JG Capital.
 “Investors see a cheap valuation, and they are buying in at this point” Guo said by phone yesterday.
 “Demand for vegetable oil and fats in Asia is growing very rapidly” The company is looking for assets over the next year to complement its network of businesses that buy crops and crush oilseeds, Schroder said.
 This month, Archer-Daniels-Midland Co, the world’s largest corn processor, closed its deal to buy Wild Flavors GmbH for about $3 billion and announced an agreement to purchase Specialty Commodities Inc.
 announced an agreement to buy Penford Corp.
 Mizuho raised its price target on the stock to 310 yen from 260 yen and maintained its buy rating.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- David Einhorn, president of Greenlight Capital Inc, recommended investors buy renewable power companies TerraForm Power Inc.
 Anna Nikolayevsky, founder and chief investment officer of Axel Capital Management LLC, also speaking at the event, recommended investors buy shares of Ezcorp Inc, whose products include pawn and payday loans, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 Proposed changes to the 2002 act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” Exxon Mobil Corp.
 “There may be buyers that will make an offer for a large chunk, or for everything in Europe or for the whole set,” Lafont told reporters at company headquarters in Paris today.
 funds that buy high-yield bonds in the past week, the biggest withdrawal since a record $71 billion during the first week of August, according to Lipper data.
 companies seek to lower their tax bill by moving their legal address abroad, often after buying a foreign company.
 “Assuming the transaction is now ‘dead,’ Shire’s fundamentals appear strong and we would buy when the dust has settled,” Peter Welford, an analyst at Jefferies LLC in London, wrote in a note to clients today.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Fibra Uno Administracion SA, Mexico’s biggest real-estate investment trust, plans to buy 20 billion pesos ($149 billion) of properties, according to the company’s adjunct Chief Executive Officer Gonzalo Robina.
 The property trusts pool investor money to buy real estate such as shopping malls, office buildings and rental housing.
 Crude from around the world is competing for buyers in Asia, says the Paris-based International Energy Agency.
 shipments of ultra-light oil from the Gulf of Mexico and India is buying more Latin American output.
 Saudi Arabia, the biggest exporter, is cutting premiums to attract more Asian buyers, according to the IEA.
 Saudi Arabia, which has the greatest output in the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, may be cutting the differentials it uses to price monthly oil deliveries to Asia in a bid to attract buyers, the IEA’s Halff said.
 rose 3 percent to $8080 after activist investor Corvex Management LP said the company should either increase its dividend payout ratio or boost its leverage ratio and buy back more stock.
 “This quarter was another step in the right direction for Microsoft,” said Ives, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on Microsoft’s stock.
 in New York, who describes his rating on Microsoft’s stock as “pound-the-table outperform,” or the equivalent of a buy.
 Flexjet LLC, a provider of fractional aircraft ownership services, agreed to buy as many as 50 Gulfstream jets, including the new G500.
 “While the world has gone global, the reason you buy business jets is because you can go to three places in one day that are otherwise inaccessible,” Rubel said by phone.
 Saudi Arabia, Iraq and Iran are offering the biggest discounts to crude buyers in Asia since at least 2009, amid speculation they are seeking to maintain market share.
 The owners haven’t set a deadline and neither is currently interested in buying the other’s half, the people said.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Old Mutual Plc, Africa’s largest insurer, agreed to buy UK-based Quilter Cheviot Ltd.
 Securities and ExchangeCommission has been seeking to ensure investors get adequateinformation on the risks they’re taking by buying securitiesbacked by the loans.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- Namibia has formally made an offer to buy Areva SA’s water desalination plant in the country to secure supplies for uranium-mining operations as well as towns in the semi-arid Erongo region and western coastal area.
 “If we buy the desalination plant from Areva, water problems at Husab will be a thing of the past,” the state-run news agency quoted Katali as saying during a meeting with Wu Xinxiong, director of China’s National Energy Administration.
 Yahoo separately also agreed to buy mobile-chat platform MessageMe.
 Starboard has asked Mayer not to spend any more money on buying companies, saying her acquisitions so far have failed to amount to much.
 It competes with Facebook Inc, which tried to buy Snapchat for $3 billion last year and started its own product to send ephemeral photos and videos after being rebuffed.
 “Ask a buyer of one of those big SUVs today, where do you think gas prices will be? They’ll probably say, ‘Eh, about the same’” Middle Incomes Relief from pain at the pump is felt most profoundly in average-income households, which haven’t participated as much as upper-income families in the auto industry’s comeback.
 “Gas prices have stabilized as a percentage of household income, or even gone down a little bit, which opens up that freedom to purchase” Low interest rates, extended loan terms and more subprime financing are also bringing in more buyers.
 “The fuel economy used to be a reason not to buy them.
 agreed in July to buy US.
 “We’re starting to bear fruit on the cost-competitiveness of the company” Immelt has been disposing of some GE Capital assets while bulking up those that support industrial operations, a strategy that includes steps such as this week’s accord to buy helicopter lessor Milestone Aviation Group LLC.
 Russian stocks offer “compelling” valuations though Templeton Emerging Markets Group isn’t buying because of concerns over US.
 “With the ruble getting cheaper, that becomes very, very good for investors because you’re able to buy more rubles with less dollars” Mobius favors Sberbank, “major” oil companies, supermarket chains and mining companies, including OAO GMK Norilsk Nickel.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- The Federal Open Market Committee is expected to end its bond-buying program after reducing monthly purchases to $15 billion in September from $85 billion two years ago.
 The Federal Open Market Committee has indicated it will end a third round of bond-buying aimed at lowering long-term borrowing costs.
 He has a buy recommendation on the shares.
 “Earnings will be more balanced between the second quarter and third quarter,” John Roberts, a New York-based analyst at UBS Securities who recommends buying the shares, said by phone today.
 He said low prices may be short-lived as buyers, including ethanol plants, step in to generate more demand.
 “The results are solid, with capital slightly above expectations even after acquisitions,” said Cyril Meilland, a Paris-based analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux who has a buy rating on the stock.
 That’s made CSC a better business, even as it has gotten cheaper for potential buyers.
 It would be the biggest technology buyout since Dell Inc.
 Deal Scenarios A deal could be structured in a way that splits the businesses, with a private-equity firm buying one unit and a strategic suitor buying the other, one of the people familiar with the matter said.
 HCL Technologies Ltd, an India-based software company, could fit as the strategic buyer for CSC’s global infrastructure services division, which provides tools including data-center management for companies, Friedman said.
 For financial firms seeking targets that have the right financial criteria for a buyout, CSC “checks a lot of those boxes,” Morningstar’s Lange said.
 In a letter today, Corvex Management LP said that Crown Castle should either increase its dividend payout ratio or boost its leverage ratio and buy back more stock.
 Crown Castle has been a buyer of US.
 “At the end of the day, they’re buying the expectations,” Jorge Lagunas, a money manager at Interacciones Casa de Bolsa SA, said in an e-mail.
 Less than a year after the buyout, Dave & Buster’s bought back $95 million of Oak Hill’s shares.
 Bertelsmann, owner of 53 percent of the New York-based business, plans to buy part or all of the 47 percent held by Pearson Plc, the people said, asking not to be named discussing private deliberations.
 A buyout would give Bertelsmann -- which has a war chest of several billion dollars according to Chief Executive Officer Thomas Rabe -- more flexibility in running the business as the media house tightens its television, online, and print operations.
 “Print is inherently a more challenging business as they try to make the digital transition” Bertelsmann agreed yesterday to buy the 25 percent stake in German magazine publisher Gruner & Jahr it doesn’t own, ending a 45-year-old partnership with the Jahr family.
 Should Bertelsmann choose not to buy Pearson’s shares, Pearson has the right to initiate a recapitalization of the venture.
 Real estate values approaching or surpassing peak levels in New York, Boston and Washington have buyers turning to Philadelphia for its higher yields, rising rents and falling vacancies.
 “Not only is it a good time to sell, it’s a great time to buy” Demand for properties on the market should be good, Walters of CBRE said.
 We want to help small businesses expand globally just like large corporations can, and we want to make it less difficult for Chinese consumers to buy international brands” Alipay Expansion Small & Micro Financial, controlled by Ma, is competing against Tencent Holdings Ltd.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Banco Santander SA, Spain’s biggest bank, said investors holding 1365 percent of its Brazilian unit’s minority shareholders accepted the company’s offer to buy their stock in exchange for newly issued shares.
 Santander announced its proposal to offer as much as 47 million euros ($59 billion) to buy back as much as 25 percent of the outstanding shares earlier this year, offering to pay 20 percent more than their market price at the time.
 The acceptance rate was lower than the level required for Banco Santander to have to buy the remaining outstanding units and shares from any investor who wants to sell at the same price in an additional offering through the exchange in the next three months, the lender said.
 Mikhail Prokhorov, whose investment empire stretches from the world’s largest aluminum maker to the Brooklyn Nets basketball team, recently explored whether fellow oligarchs, including Vladimir Potanin, were willing to buy a portion of his $27 billion stake in potash miner OAO Uralkali, two people familiar with the matter said.
 Uralkali’s market value declined about 56 percent since November last year, when Prokhorov’s companies agreed to buy about 28 percent in the potash maker, using debt.
 economy capped its best six months of growth in a decade last quarter, supporting the Federal Reserve’s decision to bring its bond-buying program to an end this month.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Jamie Dinan, founder of York Capital Management LP, recommended buying shares of Molson Coors Brewing Co.
 Dinan, whose New York-based firm oversees $25 billion, called Molson Coors the likely buyer of the venture stake, saying its shares could see a 48 percent to 58 percent upside from such a transaction.
 should consider buying Office Depot, Credit Suisse Group AG analyst Gary Balter said last month, arguing that the deal would reduce costs by $144 billion.
 Five of the 14 analysts who evaluate the company rate it a sell, five recommend investors hold shares and four have it as a buy, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 That compares with the start of the year, when there were no sell ratings and seven buy recommendations.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP, the world’s second-biggest manager of investment alternatives to stocks and bonds, fell the most in six months after reporting lower earnings outside of its leveraged-buyout unit.
 The buyout performance helped boost firm-wide after-tax economic net income to 55 cents a share, beating the 52-cent average estimate of 10 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg.
 The value of a private-equity firm’s buyout holdings affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric relies on quarterly “mark-to-market” valuations of those investments.
 Carlyle, like other publicly traded buyout firms, reports profit that differs from US.
 Assets Decline Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Takeovers of companies that help move and process oil and gas have increased this year, as buyers including Targa Resources Corp.
 or buy back shares to comply with the law, Vedomosti reported Sept.
 Australia’s largest investment bank said today it will refrain from buying back stock to neutralize any dilution caused by investors who opt for new shares through its dividend reinvestment program instead of accepting a cash payout.
 Without the buyback and assuming 20 percent of investors opt for shares, Macquarie could add A$90 million ($79 million) to capital, said Omkar Joshi, an investment analyst at Watermark Funds Management.
 The last time it held off buying back shares to nullify dilution was for the final dividend in March 2011, filings show.
 Gains are probably set to diminish as the Federal Reserve wraps up its bond-buying program and prepares to raise interest rates, said Michael Zezas, chief municipal strategist at Morgan Stanley in New York.
 The prospect of skimpier earnings for investors has significance for municipalities as well: Demand from buyers chasing this year’s rally has helped push borrowing costs toward generational lows for officials financing schools, roads and water systems.
 stocks tumbled, sending the Russell 2000 Index into a correction, amid signs of economic weakness in Europe and geopolitical turmoil as the Federal Reserve prepares to end its bond-buying program.
 The European Central Bank is forecast to announce tomorrow details of its plan to buy asset-backed securities, after unveiled a series of stimulus measures to boost credit lending and combat the threat of deflation.
 The Fed, which is on course to halt its monthly bond-buying program this month, has maintained a commitment to keep rates near zero for a considerable time after completing asset purchases, while saying that future rate moves will depend on changes in the economy.
 The brokerages downgraded their recommendations to the equivalent of neutral from ratings similar to buy.
 It adds to dovishness” Concerns that Europe will slip into a recession just as Fed bond buying ends sent the S&P 500 down 74 percent from an all-time high of 2,01136 in mid-September through Oct.
 “Then, companies were buying for the sake of buying.
 Puerto Rico has been relying on those buyers as its ratings have fallen.
 will invest $562 million to buy its parent’s stake in an oil-processing plant in Saudi Arabia to consolidate its position as Asia’s biggest refiner.
 The Ontario Power Authority is buying the electricity under a 20-year contract.
 Bangkok Airways, led by Chief Executive Officer Puttipong Prasarttong-osoth, plans to use the proceeds to buy 18 new planes from Boeing Co.
 Bangkok Bank Pcl planned to buy another 105 million shares from existing investors at the same time as the IPO, the terms show.
 Italian and Spanish bonds rose for the first time in three days after European Central Bank Executive Board member Benoit Coeure said today officials will start the next phase of asset buying in coming days.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- AquaChile SA, the largest Chilean-owned salmon farmer, will buy a controlling interest in rival Invermar SA to take advantage of rising prices for the fish.
 through negotiations with creditors, and also will subscribe and buy into a planned $30 million capital increase for Invermar, the Puerto Montt, Chile-based company said in a statement today.
 plans to buy Norway’s Cermaq ASA in a deal that will allow Japan’s biggest trading house to leapfrog Oslo-based Marine Harvest ASA as the largest salmon farmer in Chile.
 He said stores need to boost in-stock levels -- a measure of the merchandise available on shelves for customers to buy.
 The analyst, who maintains a buy rating on the stock, was forecasting 500 stores.
 “Nobody buys these things.
 “They are voting with their feet by pulling cash from banks and buying” on the street.
 “When I need to sell dollars, I go to my colleagues who I know are interested in buying foreign currency as they are paid salaries in hryvnia,” said Yaroshevskyi, an accountant in Kiev.
 Open websites such as financeua and minfincomua offer lists of people seeking to sell or buy dollars and euros with contact numbers and exchange rates offered.
 She supplements that by buying dollars from customers for 14 hryvnia a buck, and reselling the greenbacks to another source for 142, pocketing 20 kopeks as profit.
 “By buying and selling I can make a little margin for myself.
 Tim shares surged today after Folha de Sao Paulo reported that Oi, Telefonica SA and America Movil SAB agreed on an offer to buy the carrier, controlled by Telecom Italia SpA, that values the company at as much as 315 billion reais ($129 billion).
 The company has approached potential buyers to purchase the chain and keep some, or all, stores operating, Latacha said.
 ‘Big Impact’ Institutional investors “will have no choice but to buy Japan Post given the big impact the share sale would have on the market,” DZH’s Tanaka said.
 (PRE) surgedthe most in seven months after Mexico’s Alfa SAB (ALFAA) said it’sconsidering an offer to buy shares it doesn’t already own inLatin America’s biggest non-state-owned oil producer.
 by buying a third of the 148 percent stake offered in Rosneft’s $107 billion public offering, the country’s biggest ever.
 Akimov did this by giving Novatek loans to buy assets from Gazprombank that the lender had acquired from businesses tied to former Gazprom managers.
 “It is still very difficult to determine Alfa’s strategy,” said Marimar Torreblanca, an analyst at UBS AG in Mexico City who last week cut her rating on Alfa to hold from buy.
 “Our initial assumption when Alfa began to announce the buying of Pacific Rubiales shares was that the intention was to eventually form a joint venture.
 When they began to buy more and more, it became a bit more difficult to understand” The value of Alfa’s disclosed stake in Pacific Rubiales, which reached as high as $11 billion in late August, had fallen to about $860 million as of yesterday.
 At the start of this year, Pacific Rubiales’s stock had 27 analyst buy ratings and zero sells.
 Bullard is the first Fed official to publicly suggest the central bank should extend its bond-buying, currently at a pace of $15 billion a month and forecast by economists to end when policy makers meet next week.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Sulzer AG sees further opportunities to buy or merge with companies producing equipment for the oil and gas industry after a proposed merger with Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 “If a factory owned all of its stores, it could set prices, and buyers would lose virtually all bargaining power” Political Debate Organizations including the Consumer Federation of America and the Center for Auto Safety have said that manufacturers such as Tesla should be able to sell directly and that buyers would benefit from choice.
 Bonds declined following a meeting last week where Draghi failed to provide details on the size of its purchases of asset-backed securities and covered bonds, and the option of expanding the program to buy government bonds through a quantitative easing plan in the toolbox for now.
 Salus Capital Partners LLC is seeking to buy as much as$465 million of the $585 million of loans purchased byRadioShack’s largest shareholder, Standard General LP, said thepeople, who asked not to be identified because the discussionsare private.
 Gamers will be able to buy a separate controller made for the phone that can stream titles like Activision Blizzard Inc’s newest Destiny game or Take-Two Interactive Software Inc’s Grand Theft Auto.
 The company, which is run from Parsippany, New Jersey, and obtained an Irish tax domicile by acquiring Warner Chilcott Plc last year, agreed to buy Durata Therapeutics Inc.
 Sales stand to get an additional boost in the final months of 2014 as the drop in mortgage rates caused by slowing growth in Europe and emerging nations makes properties more affordable for first-time buyers.
 Lending Rules Mortgages might be easier to come by after bank and housing regulators this week took steps to unlock homebuyer credit, which became more difficult to obtain in the wake of the 2008 financial collapse.
 “The traditional buyer -- the person who takes out a mortgage loan to buy a home -- seems to be growing in strength over the past year and we expect that to continue,” said Robert Stein, deputy chief economist at First Trust Portfolios LP in Wheaton, Illinois, who is among the best forecasters of existing home sales over the past two years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 First-time buyers remain one part of the market that has yet to return in full force.
 Easier lending standards and faster wage gains would attract more buyers making the first foray into ownership.
 He recommends buying the shares, which were little changed at 995 pence at the close of trading today in London and have fallen 33 percent this year.
 Congress remains deadlocked over the issue and even the Democratic-controlled Senate hasn’t voted on an Obama-backed plan to prevent companies from buying a smaller business and taking its foreign address in the process.
 Among former House members working on inversions are Bill Paxon and Vic Fazio, who are lobbying for Burger King Worldwide Inc, which is buying Tim Hortons Inc.
 Now, the 44-year-old investment adviser says he’s gotten so many phone calls from clients asking about Argentina in the past year he decided to start a hedge fund dedicated to buying the nation’s securities.
 Now it’s time to get on the field” Soros, Perry Knightsbridge’s Argentina Recovery hedge fund has raised about $100 million and will buy the country’s dollar-denominated bonds and American depositary receipts starting December and return investor money in three years, unless they choose to withdraw their assets before then.
 For Melhem, who moved to Argentina from Mexico when he was seven years old and lived in Buenos Aires until the second year of college before getting his bachelor’s degree in economics and international business at Babson College, the deterioration of the economy ahead of the next administration is an opportunity to buy the nation’s securities before a rebound.
 The company’s 2015 sales forecast doesn’t reflect “the most powerful growth story,” said Jason Moser, an analyst at the Motley Fool in Alexandria, Virginia, who recommends buying the shares.
 Equities extended early gains after the European Central Bank’s Benoit Coeure said it will start buying assets within days.
 2 after ECB President Mario Draghi stopped short of spelling out how many assets the central bank might buy to head off deflation.
 The efforts include buying more automation and sorting equipment for road transit hubs, adding facilities, route planning software and new trailers.
 Time Warner, based in New York, is under pressure to improve its performance after Chief Executive Officer Jeff Bewkes spurned a $75 billion buyout offer from Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 The cuts yesterday include buyouts announced in August, along with firings and the elimination of unfilled positions.
 11, for which single consumers buy gifts for themselves, according to NDTV.
 Other bidders still in the running to buy the British safety-equipment maker include buyout firms Wendel SA, Onex Corp, AEA Investors and Clayton Dubilier & Rice LLC, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are private.
 The Topix has rebounded 13 percent from an April 14 low amid speculation Japan’s $12 trillion Government Pension Investment Fund will buy more domestic shares.
 agreed to buy Hovensa LLC, the company said in a statement.
 Hovensa’s return will add an oil buyer to a market where crude prices have fallen 25 percent in the past four months because of growing supply and weaker global demand.
 Lorrie Hecker, New York-based spokeswoman for Hess, said the company continues to negotiate with a potential buyer for the plant.
 All the good news has more than tripled Avanir’s stock price this year and may get buyers’ attention.
 dropped plans to buy the company last week.
 Louis-based Mallinckrodt declined to comment on whether they’re considering buying Avanir.
 New Deal “Our new deal assures that your books will be continuously available for sale at this major retailer through this year’s holiday book buying season and well beyond,” Reidy wrote in the letter, obtained by Bloomberg News.
 Buying Climate Today’s report on sentiment showed the buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, fell for a third week, to 316 from 327, while the gauge of personal finances was little changed at 522 from 524 the prior period.
 The Governing Council kept interest rates unchanged at record lows and said it will start buying covered bonds and asset-backed securities to support the economy.
 It doesn’t need traditional advertising to drum up demand” Social Media While Tesla doesn’t buy TV spots, its digital strategy and Musk’s social-media presence -- he has more than 1 million Twitter followers -- have “created a lot of buzz among people that would not have otherwise bought the vehicle,” said Alan Baum, an independent auto analyst at Baum & Associates.
 The deal was instead hammered out across town, in the Times Square offices of Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP, one of the firms representing the buyer, China’s Anbang Insurance Group Co.
 Billionaire chairman Tadashi Yanai aspires to turn Asia’s biggest clothing retailer into the world’s largest, buying foreign brands and opening stores worldwide.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Apollo Global Management LLC co-founder Josh Harris is close to an agreement to buy Crystal Palace, two people with direct knowledge of the talks said, a deal that would make him the fifth owner of both a major US.
 The company agreed to buy Mainland Sand & Gravel Ulc of Canada on Sept.
 JPMorgan last week advised Geberit AG, the Swiss maker of bathroom piping, on its offer of about $14 billion to buy Finnish ceramic toilet maker Sanitec Corp.
 Sears Holdings investors will receive subscription rights to buy Sears Canada stock at C$1060 ($952) per share, the Sept.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s top soccer clubs “recklessly” wasted money from record TV rights fees on buying players instead of investing in youth development, according to a report by Latin America’s largest bank.
 Brazilian teams aren’t the only ones that spend the majority of their income on buying talent and paying bigger salaries to established talent.
 In England’s Premier League, soccer’s richest, spending money to develop youth prospects is much rarer than buying players.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Amazoncom Inc’s Chief Executive Officer Jeff Bezos has a knack for harnessing product reviews to get customers to buy online.
 Holiday Forecast “Word-of-mouth marketing -- people like you bought this -- creates a strong urge to buy,” said Rebecca Lieb, a social-media marketing analyst at Altimeter Group in San Mateo, California.
 “It’s not Amazon or the toy company saying we think you should buy this.
 It’s moms to moms” For Amazon, attracting buyers is crucial this holiday season.
 “Parents buying toys are trying to do it on the sly,” said Traci Gregorski, vice president of marketing at Market Track.
 Deliveries jumped 13 percent in the quarter, helped by the new Fit and back orders from the rush to buy before an increase in the sales tax rise in April.
 to find buyers for the 45 percent stake which it acquired for $115 billion in 2010, the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 is working with Tudor Pickering to seek buyers for assets in North Dakota worth as much as $3 billion, people familiar with the matter said this week.
 and Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce to buy a niobium mine in Quebec.
 “For us it’s nice to have investors like this who have a particularly good insight in what’s going on in the Asian market” Regent, 48, is among prominent figures in the mining industry who have established companies to buy assets as the world’s largest producers put unwanted operations up for sale.
 Strong Fundamentals Magris and its partners agreed to buy the Niobec mine and a nearby rare-earth deposit from Iamgold Corp.
 unit for buying and selling the fuel.
 “I would take this as a buying opportunity,” Invex’s Jose Antonio Cebeira said in a telephone interview from Mexico City.
 Twelve analysts recommend buying the stock, up from nine before the Aug.
 12 to strong buy.
 The mine accounts for 22 percent of Grupo Mexico’s output, and the plan to boost production is one reason Monex Casa de Bolsa recommends buying the stock, according to analyst Fernando Bolanos.
 Bolanos changed his rating to buy from hold on Aug.
 Last week, the company almost doubled its target for proceeds and then advanced the date of its listing after winning commitments to buy shares from JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 In buying Shire, which has its legal address in Dublin, AbbVie would have moved its tax domicile to the UK.
 Share Buyback After walking away from the Shire deal this month, AbbVie announced a $5 billion share buyback and raised its quarterly dividend by 17 percent, to 49 cents per share.
 Chief Executive Officer Niall Booker has sold assets after the 150-year-old company raised about 400 million pounds ($644 million) in May to plug a capital deficit that was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds.
 KPMG LLP and the UK’s markets regulator failed to spot a 15 billion-pound shortfall at Co-Operative Bank Plc that derailed its plan to buy branches from Lloyds, British lawmakers said Oct.
 30 people applyingfor a loan to buy a second home may get lower down payments andinterest rates that were previously only available to first-timehome buyers, as they have paid off their initial mortgage.
 Sahar Kandah plans to buy eight 50-piece bags of Halloween candy to hand out to trick-or-treaters in her Bronxville, New York, neighborhood, compared with seven last year, even though Mars Chocolate North America raised prices, including for her beloved Snickers bars, by an average of 7 percent in July, the same month that Hershey imposed an 8 percent increase.
 “When I buy chocolates from drugstores, I don’t even look at the price because they’re not such a big part of my budget anyway,” said Kandah, a bookkeeper at a private financial firm in Manhattan.
 He buys 120 tons of raw chocolate a year from Belgium, including about 10 tons of cocoa beans, for use at his 40,000-square-foot plant in Brooklyn, up from 100 tons a year ago.
 Buying Opportunity “It’s an overreaction to this development,” said Shebly Seyrafi, an analyst at FBN Securities in New York, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 “The stock tripled in a matter of three months, and this is a buying opportunity” GoPro is introducing new cameras this month, including new high-end models and a version priced at $129.
 Woodside is stepping up its search for global acquisitions after its $27 billion plan to buy back stock from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by shareholders, leaving Europe’s largest oil company with a larger, unwanted stake in the Australian energy company.
 After the planned demise next year of the Land Rover Defender, the G-Class will be among the last old-school SUVs in production, drawing buyers because it literally stands out in a sea of streamlined cars.
 Given that Syriza are ahead in the polls, that is a risk the market is looking at” ECB Effect Greek securities declined last quarter even after the ECB unexpectedly cut interest rates to a record and said it would buy asset-backed securities to boost the economy, moves which pushed bond yields across most of the region to record lows.
 “The numbers on Bank of Ireland look better than I thought, but both AIB and Bank of Ireland clear the hurdles well,” said Eamonn Hughes, an analyst with Goodbody Stockbrokers in Dublin, who has a buy rating on Bank of Ireland.
 Drahi’s investment company Altice, which controls Numericable, agreed in April to buy France’s second-largest phone company from Vivendi SA.
 In June, Luxembourg-based Altice agreed to buy smaller carrier Virgin Mobile in France.
 It’s holding talks with Oi SA shareholders to buy the Brazilian phone company’s Portuguese assets, a person familiar with the matter said this month.
 “It’s strategic for Alibaba to buy out Youku Tudou and find a home for all of its video content,” Castor Pang, head of Research at Core-Pacific Yamaichi in Hong Kong, said by phone.
 Alibaba is Youku’s biggest shareholder and the most likely buyer, he said.
 The Frankfurt-based institution started buying covered bonds on Oct.
 economic outlook and end their bond-buying program today as planned, according to 62 of 64 economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 It lured 227 billion yuan ($37 billion) of buy orders, 80 times the amount on offer, and surged 44 percent on the first day of trading.
 Gains for some of the nation’s best-performing IPOs are showing signs of petering out as traders rotate out of small companies that won’t be eligible for overseas buying under an upcoming trading link between Shanghai and Hong Kong.
 The connection, for which regulators have yet to announce a start date, will allow 13 billion yuan of net buying by overseas investors per day, excluding small caps and mainland IPOs.
 ACS has also been extending its control over Hochtief through a series of share buyback programs which serve to increase its holding in the German builder.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Up Energy Development Group said it’s picked the bottom of the coking coal market after the Hong Kong company agreed to buy control of a Canadian mine from its two owners by paying them $1 each.
 Winsway will hold onto 173 percent and retains the right with Marubeni to buy back some of Grande Cache shares within five years.
 Chinese buyers account for 60 percent of the current customer base.
 The European Central Bank plans to stimulate growth by buying asset-backed debt.
 “If you’re in the top 1 percent you’re pretty much buying everything you want already, so every incremental dollar coming in is going to get saved.
 The Fed’s bond-buying program, which the central bank plans to end this month, appears to have succeeded in stimulating the economy without debasing the currency because banks are holding onto reserves instead of lending, according to Paul Christopher, chief international strategist at Wells Fargo Advisors LLC in St.
 “They’re just creating bank reserves” Whether the Fed’s intervention will succeed can only be determined after the bond-buying program ends, said Robert Eisenbeis, a former director of research at the Federal Reserve Bank of Atlanta and vice chairman and chief monetary economist for Cumberland Advisors, which manages $22 billion, in Sarasota, Florida, “We won’t know until the exit really starts the totality of what the Fed has or hasn’t pulled off,” Eisenbeis said in an interview.
 Her predicament stems from her 1998 decision to take the biggest loan ever given at the time to an individual in Spain to buy her sister Alicia’s stake in Fomento de Construcciones & Contratas SA.
 Bugarin allegedly brought the work to New York and the gallery accepted it on consignment and began marketing it to potential buyers, the foundation said.
 Sentiment gets pushed to a negative extreme, markets become undervalued again and smart investors find opportunities to buy back in” Regional Gauges Japan’s Topix index rose 26 percent.
 Reuters earlier reported the ECB is looking to buy corporate bonds on the secondary market amid growing concern the euro area’s economic growth is slowing.
 “The environment is getting competitive,” said Asit Sharma, a Raleigh, North Carolina-based analyst at the Motley Fool, who recommends buying the shares.
 As part of the agreement, Solar Power will buy 160 megawatts of photovoltaic capacity from affiliates of Guodian Technology’s GD Solar unit for 1575 billion yuan ($257 million), according to a statement today.
 It gives US-focused investors more opportunity to buy into the automaker Lee Iacocca once saved and that was salvaged out of bankruptcy in 2009 by Marchionne and Fiat.
 “There’s no funding available to make purchases for the time being and the debt acts like a poison pill to any prospective buyers,” he said.
 Of the 32 analysts who’ve followed the stock while it traded in Milan, 11 recommend buying it.
 to explore its options before withdrawing due to a lack of interest from potential buyers, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage management and the board by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the US.
 That, coupled with the burger chain’s cash and low debt, are key ingredients for an activist campaign that could force more share buybacks or changes in strategy.
 The $11 billion fast-food company is in the process of buying Canada’s Tim Hortons Inc.
 And then you’ve got fast-casual continuing to do very well” Buyback Scope Earlier this year, McDonald’s set a target of returning as much as $20 billion in cash to investors through dividends and buybacks by 2016.
 “There are some scenarios where they could take on additional debt, buy back some stock and have it be accretive to earnings per share by a decent amount,” Kalinowski of Janney said in a phone interview.
 As they amass more cash, many have pivoted toward buying smaller stakes in larger targets, instead of the more traditional 5 percent-plus stakes in smaller companies.
 I think Iliad really meant it seriously given the resources they invested in the process, but it was a desperate attempt of the small guy buying the big guy” Andreas Fuchs, a spokesman for Bonn-based Deutsche Telekom, declined to comment, as did Anne Marshall, a spokeswoman for Bellevue, Washington-based T-Mobile.
 Iliad had held talks with potential partners including buyout firm KKR & Co.
 Earlier this year, Iliad tried to get its hands on Bouygues’s mobile network as Bouygues sought to buy Vivendi SA’s SFR -- only to have the plan scuttled when Vivendi sold SFR to Numericable Group SA.
 Braun raised his recommendation on the shares to buy from hold, raising his six-month price estimate to 15 euros from 12 euros.
 (GOOG) is accelerating a realestate deal spree, spending $585 million to buy more than halfof a Silicon Valley office park and agreeing to lease an entirecampus in development to make space for its growing workforce.
 With German politicians criticizing other euro-area nations for not following suit, that’s a hard message to change -- even as the downturn feeds into a stalling regional recovery that’s boosting calls for the ECB to start buying government bonds.
 Members of the country’s major political parties have criticized the ECB’s latest plan, to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds, on the grounds that it imposes risk on taxpayers.
 health insurers have been adapting to the 2010 law that this year required all Americans to buy insurance, giving those with low incomes subsidies to help them do so.
 Vice Chairman Rajiv Singh and four other employees were banned from “buying, selling or otherwise dealing in securities, directly or indirectly, in any manner” for three years.
 Acquisition Steris Corp, an Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products, agreed to buy Synergy Health Plc, provider of sterilization services, for about 12 billion pounds ($19 billion) and move to the UK.
 for tax purposes, a sign tougher rules against such transactions aren’t deterring some buyers.
 (IBM) added $5 billion to its buyback plan, giving investors an incentive to remain patient as the company tries to reinvent itself.
 IBM is buying back more shares after the stock hit a three-year low on Oct.
 “At the same time we remain fully committed to returning significant value to shareholders” IBM increased its buyback plan last year by $15 billion.
 IBM’s buybacks have become a point of contention in recent weeks.
 I think those could be translated pretty directly to the Pepsi business in the North American marketplace” Snacks Sale Should AB InBev decide it doesn’t want PepsiCo’s snack business, it could sell it to one of the many buyers who would be interested in the maker of Lays potato chips and Quaker oatmeal, Dibadj said.
 Deal Scenario Shackleton said the more likely scenario would be that 3G Capital buys Coca-Cola in conjunction with billionaire Warren Buffett, the soft-drink maker’s largest shareholder and 3G Capital’s partner on the more than $20 billion buyout of HJ.
 Couldn’t you actually use that system to distribute other stuff? Beer is a very obvious starting point” Buffett said in June there was no chance of a buyout of Coca-Cola after David Winters, an investor in the $195 billion soft-drink maker, suggested he might be plotting one.
 Coca-Cola’s recent agreement to buy 17 percent of Monster will shift distribution away from AB InBev in the US.
 Time Warner is under pressure to deliver returns to investors after Chief Executive Officer Jeff Bewkes spurned a $75 billion buyout offer from Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc.
 Those other shareholders were considered potential buyers of the Unitel stake, people familiar with the matter said in August.
 The company agreed to buy 58 shops from the defunct Phones 4u retail chain and take on 359 employees last month.
 “They are the only ones who are buying,” said 43-year-old Narzisi during a break after the lunch-time rush of businessmen and shoppers in the heart of Italy’s financial capital.
 Prime Minister Matteo Renzi, who’s struggling to cut Europe’s second-biggest debt of more than 2 trillion euros ($253 trillion), urged Chinese investors in June during a Beijing visit to buy stakes in Italian companies, following his counterparts in Greece and Portugal who tapped Chinese money to raise revenue and exit bailout programs.
 buyout firm for Portugal’s 80 stake in Caixa Geral de Depositos SA’s insurance unit for 1 billion euros.
 ECB President Mario Draghi’s pledge two years ago to do “whatever it takes” with a bond-buying plan to save the euro area will be examined.
 The country, which is getting gas from EU countries including Slovakia and Poland, needs to buy an additional 5 billion cubic meters of gas to last the winter without Russian supplies, Andriy Kobolyev, NAK Naftogaz Ukrainy’s chief executive officer, said Oct.
 Borrowing costs have dropped as the Bank of Japan buys bonds at an unprecedented pace to stimulate the economy, crimping lending income and returns from sovereign bond investments.
 SAMSUNG GALAXY STUDIO (130 Prince Street) -- There are plenty of phones and tablets on display at the Samsung Galaxy Studio, but you can’t buy one here.
 You can’t buy anything, in fact.
 Shoppers can buy products in larger sizes than what the company ships out in its signature boxes, which are mailed to subscribers in changing assortments each month.
 There is only one natural buyer -- the billionaire who controls the company.
 ‘‘It’s just perfect when you get into November because that’s when people go out and buy presents for people and buy presents for themselves” Further Declines Prices at the pump could keep falling into the $280’s at current oil prices, and could see even larger declines if crude takes another tumble, said Patrick DeHaan, a Chicago-based senior petroleum analyst for GasBuddy Organization Inc.
 “Being Deutsche Bank’s CFO is always going to be a challenge,” Dirk Becker, a Frankfurt-based analyst with Kepler Cheuvreux who recommends investors buy the shares, said before the announcement.
 The New York-based bank also said in its court documents that the lawsuit is a “paradigm of buyer’s remorse” The LIA “freely entered into commercial bargains which have turned out badly for it,” Goldman Sachs said.
 unit agreed in 2011 to buy an undisclosed stake in the $390 million Fulton, Mississippi, project, which will be built by China Three Gorges Corp.
 Tenaska Biofuels LLC agreed in 2010 to buy output from the Fulton plant.
 “The downstream growth is higher than commodity earningsgrowth,” Richmond, Virginia-based O’Carroll, who has a buy ratingon Alcoa, said in an interview yesterday.
 The premium thatbuyers pay to have metal delivered from warehouses has soared,something that also benefits Alcoa.
 It agreed in June to buy UK.
 “It’s much more punitive from a liquidity standpoint to buy cash bonds” Derivative Divergence JPMorgan’s data matches up the cost of credit swaps on individual companies and spreads on debt that matures within a similar time frame.
 16 that his firm’s $702 billion credit unit was ready to “feast” after “waiting patiently for something bad to happen” Mark Kiesel, one of three managers who oversee Pimco’s $202 billion Total Return Fund, said in a Bloomberg Television interview the same day that corporate debt, specifically speculative-grade, was “a buy” Holding Pattern Since then, the debt has gained more than 2 percent, according to the Bank of America Merrill Lynch US.
 Debt investors are likely to remain in a holding pattern this week as the Federal Reserve starts a two-day meeting today that analysts expect will mark the end of a bond-buying program that has suppressed yields, said William Larkin, a money manager who oversees $565 million of assets at Cabot Money Management in Salem, Massachusetts.
 One measure of that known as the bid-ask spread -- the difference between prices dealers quote to buy and sell the debt -- widened to 10 basis points, she said.
 Last month, Germany’s ZF Friedrichshafen AG agreed to buy TRW Automotive Holdings Corp.
 Louis President James Bullard said in an interview with Bloomberg that the central bank should consider delaying the end of its bond-buying program to halt the decline in inflation expectations.
 India imports about 80 percent of its oil requirements and is the world’s largest buyer of gold after China.
 Requirements to have Petrobras buy equipment and services from local suppliers have also caused projects to take longer and cost more, according to the Instituto Brasileiro de Petroleo, an industry lobbying group known as IBP.
 rallied 4 percent after announcing a share buyback program.
 The easiest to accomplish will be selling more shoes and handbags to women who already buy apparel from JC.
 Women buy clothing at JC.
 decided to develop a payments system so people could use iPhones to buy items at a store instead of swiping debit or credit cards, the company bypassed EBay Inc’s PayPal.
 junk-bond market is being inflated by a growing amount of leverage being used by buyers.
 That suggests junk-debt buyers are engaging in similar financing activities.
 So, investors are still buying, and probably with a a growing amount of leverage.
 Enel, which also produces in Algeria, signed a contract to buy supplies of liquefied fuel from the US.
 The Mumbai-based company agreed last year to buy Jaiprakash Associates Ltd’s cement factory in Gujarat state for an enterprise value of 38 billion rupees ($621 million).
 It typically takes months for buyers to find properties and close deals, and by then rates likely will have changed.
 EOS Matrix, the Belgrade-based unit of Germany’s EOS, a company that began as a Hamburg debt-collection service, said it’s in talks with more banking clients after buying Serb non-performing corporate loans for 18 million euros ($23 million) in December.
 “There’s a wide gap in what is selling and what should be buying prices,” Gruden said.
 Writing off NPLs may be the only way out as red tape deters investment and distressed-debt buyers, Nikola Stefanovic, a managing director of the South Balkan Fund of SEAF, a New York-based non-profit that lends to smaller companies in developing countries, said in a Sept.
 Mengniu bought a 75 percent stake in the baby-milk maker last year and has sought to strengthen foreign partnerships after a melamine-tainted milk it and Chinese companies sold in 2008 left Chinese buyers wary about domestic dairy products.
 2 kept interest rates unchanged at record lows and announced plans to start buying covered bonds this month in bid to spur economic growth and ward off deflation.
 The Bank of Japan’s stimulus plan includes buying 60 trillion yen ($547 billion) to 70 trillion yen of assets a year to try to spur inflation to an annual 2 percent rate.
 “We also believe the best way to help West African cocoa farmers and their communities is to continue to buy the cocoa that they grow,” Bill Guyton, president of the World Cocoa Foundation, said in the statement.
 Still, he’s not buying because of sanctions imposed on the nation over the conflict in Ukraine.
 The weaker ruble is “very, very good” for foreign investors, because it allows to buy more with fewer dollars, he said.
 “For NQ to regain its full credibility and win investor’s confidence further, it still needs to disclose quarterly earnings for this year and the progress of the buyout bid it received” this year, he said.
 Bison Capital Holding Co, an investment firm in Beijing, proposed on July 30 to buy NQ Mobile for $980 per ADR, a 42 percent premium over the previous day’s closing price.
 “Base effects from one-off shocks should reveal the stronger underlying picture in 2015, with rate hikes kicking up RPI inflation through mortgage-interest payments” The Nomura analysts favor buying the 250 percent inflation-linked gilt due in July 2016 and holding it to maturity, or against inflation interest-rate swaps, as a more short-term trade.
 European Woes Europe’s biggest engineering company Siemens this year unsuccessfully tried to combine its ailing train operations with Alstom’s transport business as part of an asset swap to buy the French company’s energy assets.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Rabobank Groep and Commerzbank AG are among underwriters of a rights offering who find themselves owning almost half of Royal Imtech NV after failing to find buyers for shares of the Dutch technical services company.
 and most of Europe have remained above average throughout September and October, causing sales growth to slow at both Next and H&M as consumers have delayed buying coats and sweaters for winter.
 announced today it will buy $11 billion of its shares after walking away from a deal to acquire AstraZeneca Plc earlier this year.
 The $11 billion buyback, to be utilized over an indefinite time period, is in addition to the $13 billion remaining under the company’s existing share repurchase program, Pfizer said in a statement.
 New York time after the buyback was announced.
 Lockheed said it repurchased 26 million shares for $446 million during the third quarter, after halting stock buybacks during the second quarter as it assessed pension obligations.
 The Fed is on pace to end its monthly bond-buying and leave its key interest rate unchanged near zero, according to Bloomberg surveys of analysts.
 “The consumer at this point seems to have the wherewithal to power the economy forward” Fed policy makers began their two-day policy meeting today and will end their bond-buying program as planned, according to 62 of 64 economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 There’s going to be continued buying opportunities around the country” He declined to discuss IPO plans for Invitation Homes.
 Pressure is mounting on the ECB to also buy sovereign bonds as the 18-nation euro area struggles to recover from a debt crisis and recession.
 “A lot of our currency investors are looking to buy dollars, especially when there’s any dip.
 Its domestic reputation doesn’t lure buyers.
 Not Prestigious “I am planning to buy a Renault Duster,” said Yuri Parsamov, 29, a marketing specialist from Moscow, referring to Renault’s best-selling low-cost sport-utility vehicle.
 “It was the most available new passenger car,” said Marina Makova, a teacher and Lada buyer from Lipetsk, a city in central Russia.
 Fibria was raised to the equivalent of buy from neutral by analysts at Bank of America Corp.
 Postmedia Network Canada Corp, with the backing of a New York-based investment firm, agreed to buy 175 publications from Quebecor Inc.
 “Why are we buying newspapers in a shrinking newspaper environment?,” Godfrey said to reporters in Toronto.
 “We’re not just buying a well-known newspaper brand in Sun Media.
 The European Central Bank may detail its plan to buy asset-backed securities tomorrow amid slowdowns in Germany in France.
 shale oil and gas by buying Brigham Exploration Co.
 Takeovers involving energy companies that help move and process oil and gas have increased sharply this year, as buyers seek scale to handle a pickup in US.
 Thirty-two out of 37 analysts recommend investors buy the ADR, while just one has a sell.
 MSG also announced plans to buy back shares and put activist Nelson Peltz and private-equity investor Scott Sperling on its board.
 The Asian economy is the world’s largest iron ore buyer.
 AbbVie, based in North Chicago, Illinois, planned to buy Shire for an estimated $52 billion, then move the combined company’s legal address to the UK.
 After confirming the deal was dead, the drugmaker announced a $5 billion share buyback over the next several years and increased its quarterly dividend by 17 percent, to 49 cents per share.
 In a prior notice to investors on July 11, the trustee said that questions about the ship’s abilities to operate in Mexican waters might deter would-be buyers.
 Steady employment gains are giving more consumers the wherewithal to buy presents this year and helping others feel secure enough in their jobs to spend more.
 Government Shutdown Last year, the first partial government shutdown in 17 years spooked some customers out of spending while extreme weather and a shorter shopping season kept them out of malls when they did want to buy.
 Consumer spending isn’t likely to increase dramatically this year, with shoppers buying only around specific occasions like holidays, Liz Dunn, chief executive officer of retail consulting firm Talmage Advisors in New York, said in an interview.
 Japanese investors boosted purchases of foreign stocks last week to the most since 2009 as bets the yen will weaken spurred buying outside their home market.
 The New York City Taxi and Limousine Commission in September 2012 designated the Nissan NV200 as the official “Taxi of Tomorrow” and required owners of medallions, which confer the right to operate yellow cabs in New York, to buy the $29,700 vehicles.
 Taxi fleet operators sued the city in December 2012 seeking to block the requirement, and a judge halted the program five months later, saying it violated the administrative code because it didn’t allow medallion owners to buy hybrid vehicles.
 The city then revised the rules to let medallion owners buy hybrids until Nissan develops a hybrid version of the NV200.
 There have also been 10 bond market securitizations totaling about $5 billion, allowing landlords to recoup much of the cash they spent buying and renovating homes, and giving them an opportunity to earn higher returns on the capital still invested.
 More Opportunities Smaller firms such as RCM are starting to see more opportunities this year, with offers of partnership from Wall Street firms, increased credit from specialty lenders and bids from rival companies seeking to buy homes in bulk.
 The firm sees opportunities to buy with its Premium Point partnership in cities including Jacksonville, Florida, Columbia, South Carolina and Birmingham, Alabama, where there is less competition from big institutional players, according to Popp.
 KPN completed the sale of its German unit to Telefonica SA’s local business this month and said today it will use some of the proceeds to buy back as much as 2 billion euros in notes.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Adidas AG took steps to placate investors who have sent its shares down 35 percent this year, saying it plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros ($19 billion) of its stock over the next three years.
 The buyback plan, coupled with a pledge to maintain its dividend, is an attempt by the world’s No.
 “This is a positive” The share buyback, which will begin in the fourth quarter, will be completed by the end of 2017, and will mainly be financed by its cash flow, Adidas said.
 The buyback program will be in addition to a pledge to pay an annual dividend of 20 percent to 40 percent of net income.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Energy Future Holdings Corp’s finance chief, facing creditor ire over auction plans for the company’s Oncor unit, said bids could come in higher than expected if potential buyers devise tax-free structures or pursue strategic goals in Texas.
 According to Keglevic, “no more than five” potential buyers will make offers in the first round of bidding.
 ‘Intrinsic Issues’ Some bidders might use a real estate investment trust structure to buy Oncor, which would eliminate taxes, he said.
 Nor does a potential buyer know whether Energy Future’s disadvantaged creditors will extract more money in the restructuring, forcing the company to raise prices for Oncor.
 30 (Bloomberg) -- The largest Philippine money manager has been buying shares as record foreign outflows drive the country’s benchmark stock index toward its biggest monthly loss this year.
 last month, said he sees the 21 percent decline in the benchmark Philippine Stock Exchange Index this month through yesterday as an opportunity to buy shares of banks, real estate, gaming and power companies.
 “We always say buy on dips and this is it,” said Ocampo, 47.
 who has a buy rating on Amazon stock.
 Morgan Stanley advised clients to buy Russian equities seven weeks after cutting the country to sell on Oct.
 The unveiling of the plan is luring buyersback in, according to Allianz Global Investors and Pictet AssetManagement.
 “Withthis valuation a lot of it is discounted already” Analysts at UBS AG, HSBC Holdings Plc, and Israel Brokerage& Investments upgraded ICL to the equivalent of buy from holdthis month, with UBS arguing that regulatory risks had beenpriced in.
 Just a third of the 15 analysts covering the companyrecommend buying its shares, according to data compiled byBloomberg.
 That’s included large operators buying family owned cinemas struggling to upgrade their circuits with digital technology and larger screens.
 “The company is permanently undervalued,” said Matthew Harrigan, analyst at Wunderlich Securities in Denver, who has a buy rating on the stock and a $31 price target.
 as possible buyers, while cautioning that antitrust regulators at the US.
 If you continue to have corrections in an overall up trend, this creates buying opportunities” US.
 -- as Burlington Northern is now called -- are potential buyers.
 chemical maker by market value, posted a surprise drop in third-quarter sales amid reduced buying by farmers and rising competition in solar-panel materials.
 “The seeds business is taking the hit,” Mark Gulley, an analyst at BGC Financial LP who has a buy rating on the shares, said today by phone.
 DuPont plans to spin off its performance chemicals unit, eliminate $1 billion in costs by 2019, and buy back $5 billion of shares.
 “Any potential dip after elections will be a buying opportunity” State elections are important for control of the upper house of parliament, where representation is based on seats in local assemblies.
 “As a long-term investor, yes, I’d be buying equities,” Fink said yesterday in an interview with Bloomberg Television’s Erik Schatzker.
 “Via large demand for foreign assets, it will play a dominant role in driving global asset-price trends for the remainder of this decade” The cash is piling up because the world is buying European goods and services -- especially Germany’s (GRCAEU) -- and the euro area’s depressed consumers aren’t buying much of anything from home or abroad.
 Minera Los Pelambres, a unit of Antofagasta Minerals SA, has agreed to buy electricity from the solar farm under a 20-year contract.
 For a global buyout firm or Hong Kong developer, buying a Chinese mall would be a way to profit as the country’s economy becomes more consumer-centric, said CBRE Inc.
 CapitaLand Ltd, CapitaRetail’s largest shareholder with a 19 percent stake, is also a possible buyer, according to Standard Chartered.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- MatlinPatterson Global Advisers LLC, the investment firm that specializes in taking control of companies by buying distressed debt, plans to close its London office and refocus on the US, according to two people with knowledge of the matter.
 After successfully buying the debt of MCI Inc.
 New Guns “New products are important primarily for the repeat gun buyer,” James said.
 “I almost think of firearms as sort of an accessory item like women buying shoes.
 He followed the initial volley by saying in December that he would pursue a shareholder vote to force the company to increase its stock buyback plan.
 In February, he dropped his campaign to spur Apple to buy back $50 billion of stock this year, after the company stepped up repurchases.
 The downturn could be a buying opportunity for less indebted companies, Cinnamond said.
 As the international companies pulled back, buyout firms stepped in, McClendon said.
 One loonie buys 8876 US.
 29 it will end a bond-buying program that has added $166 trillion to its balance sheet, citing “solid job gains and a lower unemployment rate” Most Fed officials expect to raise the key US.
 While Barclays Plc had the largest short position in Shire, at about 21 percent, it also had a long position of 27 percent, including derivatives and options to buy stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg and company filings.
 Inversion Crackdown In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 AbbVie expected to lower its tax bill by buying Dublin-based Shire and moving its legal address to the UK.
 funds that buy leveraged loans in the week ended Oct.
 To improve service, the railroad intends to hire 3,600 train, engine and yard workers this year and buy 261 new locomotives.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- The Canadian government is still reviewing Burger King Worldwide Inc’s proposal to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 “It’s a lot easier for a large company to buy a smaller one that has a disruptive technology and only 50 engineers” EMC, for example, has more than 60,000 employees.
 He reiterated a buy recommendation on the stock.
 agreed to buy the Beares brand and some stores from Ellerine Holdings Ltd, the furniture retailer of failed South African lender African Bank Investments Ltd.
 In a note that may reignite speculation about a possible takeover of the Atlanta-based company, Nomura’s Ian Shackleton and Edward Mundy said Coca-Cola’s plans to bolster its business, including a $3 billion cost-cutting initiative unveiled last week, need to “step up considerably” If not, a leveraged buyout financed by parties such as Buffett, the company’s largest shareholder, and investment firm 3G could value the soda maker’s shares at $90, more than twice their current price, they said.
 “We would expect a private Coca-Cola to be run more leanly and aggressively” Deal Speculation Buffett said in June there was no chance of a buyout of Coca-Cola after David Winters, an investor in the $178 billion soft-drink maker, suggested he might be plotting one.
 The partners began buying fiber-optic assets in high-population areas, betting that fears of excess supply were overblown.
 When the opportunity came to buy control of Globalstar in 2003, Monroe figured he could turn it around by simplifying and lowering prices to lure more consumers.
 “Some markets are buying hand-to-mouth” Rough-rice for January delivery fell 05 percent to $1224 for 100 pounds on the Chicago Board of Trade at 1:50 pm.
 exports attractive to foreign buyers, said Dennis DeLaughter, president of researcher and consultant VantageRM in Austin, Texas.
 In an August conference call discussing the results for Greenlight’s Cayman Island-based reinsurer Greenlight Capital Re Ltd, Einhorn blamed the Federal Reserve’s bond-buying program, known as quantitative easing, for boosting asset prices.
 attracting budget buyers in China.
 feedlots buy calves weighing 500 pounds to 800 pounds raised mostly on pastures and then feed them a diet of mostly corn until they reach 1,200 pounds and can be sold to beef plants.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank kept interest rates unchanged at record lows as investors wait for President Mario Draghi to reveal details of a plan to buy assets.
 The focus now shifts to Draghi’s press conference at 2:30 pm, when he is due to unveil the specifics of a plan to buy asset-backed securities and covered bonds.
 “We want to know what, how much, from whom, and when the ECB plans to buy,” said Robert Kuenzel, an economist at Daiwa Capital Markets Europe Ltd.
 The ECB’s asset-buying plan is part of a range of stimulus measures it has announced since June to fight the threat of falling prices in the 18-nation currency bloc.
 Balance Sheet An early proposal last month foresaw the ECB outsourcing purchases to external asset managers, with national central banks buying shares in a fund, according to two officials familiar with the proposal.
 “Draghi will thus need to maintain a very dovish message, promising further action if needed” Should the plan fail to boost the outlook for consumer prices, Draghi may have to step up to large-scale buying of government debt.
 Sands also today announced a 30 percent increase in its dividend to $260 a share for 2015 and authorized an added $2 billion for its stock buyback program.
 “Investors are concerned about how this safety problem will develop and now are refraining from buying stocks of those carmakers,” Hideyuki Suzuki, general manager of investment market research at SBI Securities Co, said by phone.
 Martha, Victoria-based Karoon, proposed three directors for election at today’s annual meeting to redirect the board from exploration toward buying more mature assets.
 Antares also said it would buy back as much as 10 percent of its stock.
 has entered exclusive talks to buy Omega Pharma NV after beating suitors including Sanofi, Actavis Plc and Boehringer Ingelheim GmbH, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Perrigo may reach an agreement to buy Omega Pharma, a Belgian over-the-counter health-care company, soon, two of the people said, asking not to be identified because the deliberations are private.
 In July 2013, Perrigo agreed to buy Irish drug company Elan Corp.
 “Consumers usually buy tires out of need and safety concerns, not because a product is cheaper” Rubber futures in Tokyo have plunged more than 30 percent this year through yesterday, on weakening demand in China, the biggest consumer, and Europe.
 Shire Plc tumbled 73 percent, posting its biggest two-day drop since 2002, after AbbVie Inc’s board recommended that shareholders vote against buying the UK.
 Shire, which AbbVie agreed to buy in July, slid 73 percent to 3,718 pence, extending losses since yesterday to 28 percent.
 “While Lufthansa and Air France struggle with excess capacity, labour issues and low cost/Mid East competition, IAG continues to deliver earnings momentum on the strength and resilience of the London market combined with prudent capacity growth elsewhere and ongoing benefits from the Iberia restructuring” Braun reiterated his “buy” rating.
 Louis Fed President James Bullard said yesterday the central bank should consider delaying the end to its bond-buying program.
 “Customers can push out a project, andit’s not a big deal for the customer, but it can be a huge dealfor a supplier like EZchip” Lower Expectations Schreiner downgraded his recommendation on Yokneam, Israel-based EZchip to buy from strong buy on Oct.
 Five of nine analystsstill have a buy rating on the stock, with four rating it hold,according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Schreiner, who has had a buy rating on EZchip since August2012, said those concerns are misplaced.
 The stake in the wireless carrier with the most subscribers in South Africa will probably be sold to institutional investors rather than to a private buyer, one of the people said, adding that a deal isn’t imminent.
 Vodafone Group Plc, which owns 65 percent of Johannesburg-based Vodacom, is also a possible buyer, said one of the people.
 Traders are getting ahead of themselves when they are buying Russian stocks because the geopolitical situation continues to be an overhang for the market, according to Andrey Shenk of research firm Investcafe LLC “The market conditions in Russia are worsening, a lot needs to be done to reverse the trend,” Shenk, an analyst at Investcafe, said by phone from Moscow on Sept.
 Jim Rogers, who set up Quantum Fund with George Soros in the 1970s, said the negative sentiment and low prices in Russia are a signal for contrarian investors to buy.
 jumped 52 percent in Hong Kong after its board approved a plan to buy stakes in thermal and hydro power stations from its parent.
 Stocks are declining as the Fed winds down its third round of bond buying under quantitative easing.
 Demoulas, who then brokered a deal to buy the company at the end of August.
 ‘Removing Barriers’ The kingdom is removing barriers to one of the world’s most restricted financial markets, where foreigners are barred from buying and selling primary local debt.
 It has that kind of feel to it” While October has seen elevated volatility in the past, November is when companies increase share buybacks, and that will limit losses in the stock market, according to a note yesterday from strategists including Amanda Sneider and David Kostin at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 The strategists noted that most companies stop buying back shares in the five weeks before reporting quarterly results.
 The pendulum is swinging from greed to fear” Stocks are declining as the Fed winds down its third round of bond buying under quantitative easing.
 cut their rating for the stock to a hold from a buy.
 Postmedia Network Canada Corp, operator of the National Post, jumped 11 percent to C$250 after agreeing to buy 175 newspapers and trade publications for C$316 million ($282 million) from Quebecor Inc.
 Safra agreed to buy the bank for more than 1 billion Swiss francs ($113 billion) in November 2011.
 The timing of H&R Block’s share buybacks may be pushed back as a result of the delay, Mark Palmer, an analyst at BTIG LLC, said in a note.
 Chinese nationals will be able to buy equities and real estate via a Qualified Domestic Retail Investor scheme, Wang Dan, a deputy director general at the central bank, said today at a conference in Beijing.
 They won’t just have Hong Kong and be dependent on Hong Kong only” Through Train QDRI was the name used for a program known as the through train, announced in August 2007 and then later abandoned, that would have allowed Chinese nationals to buy Hong Kong stocks directly.
 Peixoto earned $47,100 in illegal profits by buying put options, according to the agency.
 - Becton Dickinson to buy CareFusion Corp.
 The collection, spanning 1992 to 2010 with six bottles of the pinot noir red from each vintage, was purchased by an Asian buyer who wasn’t identified in a Sotheby’s list of sale results.
 The estimate excludes the buyer’s premium, a 225 percent commission included in the final price.
 export facilities are selling gas under long-term contracts, typically of about 20 years, which will give both buyers and sellers some protection against some price fluctuations.
 Tokyo Gas Co, Japan’s biggest city-gas distributor, agreed in July to buy about 520,000 metric tons a year from the Cameron project for 20 years starting 2020.
 Even if they are cheaper, the company will still buy US.
 LNG is a reality,” said Hiroki Sato, general manager of fuels at Chubu Electric Power Co, Japan’s second-biggest buyer of LNG.
 Merchants who fund and then buy the crop “don’t give a damn about deforestation,” Moyo said.
 What small-scale guy is going to plant trees on his measly two hectares, then wait five or 10 years to harvest the wood for curing?” ‘Strongly Urge’ Tobacco buyers including Mashonaland Tobacco Co, Tobacco Processors Zimbabwe Ltd, Alliance One Inc and Universal’s Zimbabwe Leaf Tobacco declined to comment.
 Still, the Harare-based Sustainable Afforestation Programme, funded by the tobacco-buying companies, says it plans to spend $335 million over the next seven years replanting about 5,000 hectares of trees a year.
 “We are advising clients to buy on dips” The Nifty has risen 27 percent this year, the best performer among the world’s 10 biggest markets.
 Strategic Options Spinning off VMware would make the rest of EMC more attractive to other buyers, potentially delivering even higher returns to shareholders, Elliott wrote in a letter earlier this month.
 lowered IBM to a hold after the results, dragging the percentage of buy recommendations on the stock to a record low 21 percent this week, according to data compiled by Bloomberg dating back to 1999.
 Still, some investors may see the stock decline as a chance to bet on a rebound and buy shares at a depressed price.
 The buying climate index fell to 33 from 338 as more people said now was a poor time to make purchases.
 That’s designed to protect suppliers and buyers from severe moves in the oil price, Geoffrey Cann, Australian oil and gas director at Deloitte LLP in Brisbane, said by phone.
 Amplats, as the Johannesburg-based asset of Anglo American Plc is known, is seeking buyers for four loss-making mines in South Africa, including Union, as it prioritizes its Mogalakwena open-cast operation in the country’s northern Limpopo province for future growth.
 The company has also attracted interest from buyers for the three mines in Rustenburg, in the North West province, Amplats said in the presentation.
 cable company awaiting regulatory approval to buy Time Warner Cable Inc, reported profit that beat estimates as new high-speed Internet customers more than made up for declining video subscribers.
 “From the point of view of a cable company, you really want to see broadband growth more so than cable-TV growth because it’s much more profitable,” Heger, who has a buy rating on the stock, said in an interview before the earnings release.
 Of 25 analysts rating the company in a Bloomberg survey, 18 have it as a buy, six as a hold, and only one rates it as a sell.
 “The market doesn’t like uncertainties and therefore the sold positions rise compared to the buy ones,” said Marcelo Aguiar, a Sao Paulo-based equity analyst at Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 “Usiminas is now in a scenario in which the controlling shareholders’ strategies are misaligned,” Santander analysts led by Felipe Reis in Sao Paulo said after lowering their recommendation to the equivalent of sell from buy.
 “There are several possibilities that may happen, including Nippon buying out Ternium and triggering tag alone rights,” he said by telephone.
 Calls to buy the iShares MSCI Brazil Capped ETF for between $4350 and $4950 over the next month fell the most among all contracts traded on US.
 Bullish contracts giving the right to buy the exchange-traded fund accounted for nine of the 10 biggest retreats among US.
 Calls give the right to buy 100 shares of a security for a certain amount, the strike price, by a set date.
 Under a plan backed by the presidential administration, an intermediary may be used to acquire all three stakes to make the deal more palatable politically before a group loyal to Putin buys the whole newspaper, the people said, asking not to be identified because the information is private.
 “We don’t know what will happen to Vedomosti, who will buy it,” he said by phone.
 “There are very few people in Russia who can buy Vedomosti and at the same time guarantee its editorial independence,” Sauer said by phone from Moscow.
 Sauer said the most likely buyer will be a “government-friendly” structure.
 Lesin said today that he’s not planning to buy Vedomosti.
 homebuyers unable to borrow from the nation’s largest lenders.
 The private-equity firm is raising $1 billion for a fund to buy the riskiest portions of bonds backed by loans given mostly to borrowers with troubled credit histories and first-time homebuyers with high student debt, according to marketing materials obtained by Bloomberg News.
 Tight borrowing standards have made property purchases tough for young buyers, who often have limited credit histories and low-paying jobs, as well as the former owners of the more than 5 million properties lost to foreclosure since the housing crash.
 Lone Star has been one of the biggest buyers of soured mortgages this year, winning $39 billion of the debt in a US.
 “There’s now a buying opportunity in Russian stocks,” Ivan Mazalov, a director who helps manage more than $3 billion at Prosperity Capital Management in Moscow, said by phone yesterday.
 and continental Europe, was already the largest pool ever raised dedicated to buying assets in the region, according to the New York-based company’s website.
 Last month, Manulife agreed to buy competitor Standard Life Plc’s Canadian business.
 and Blackstone Group LP are among seven firms to win preliminary approval of a $5905 million settlement with investors claiming they held down leveraged buyout prices.
 The original complaint, filed in 2007, listed 19 leveraged buyouts and eight related transactions in which private-equity firms were accused of shortchanging shareholders in target companies of billions of dollars by colluding to suppress takeover bids.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Car buyers flooding US.
 At the same time, Mexico boosted its domestic car sales forecast last week as the economy rebounds and new energy laws attract investment, driving up employment and demand for autos, according to Elizondo, who is based in Mexico City and rates Sanluis as buy.
 And in July, Corporativo GBM SAB agreed to buy a 26 percent stake in the company.
 “From the data we’ve seen, the stock is at its right price,” Julio Cesar Martinez, an analyst at Signum Research in Mexico City who rates the shares buy, said in a phone interview.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Namibia’s mining-investment company said it reached an agreement to buy a 75 percent stake in the Navachab gold mine that former JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP, the world’s second-largest buyout firm, dropped plans to raise its second fund targeting investments in the Middle East, two people with knowledge of the plan said, amid rising turmoil in the region.
 “Carlyle will still seek out targeted opportunities in the region using both existing and new funds with a mandate to invest in those markets,” the buyout firm said in an e-mailed statement.
 The Abraaj Group Ltd, a Dubai-based buyout firm focused on emerging markets, is raising a $500 million fund to invest only in Turkey, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 Demand is underpinned by the European Central Bank’s plan to buy ABS, as well as Finland’s top credit rating, he said.
 The ECB has pledged to start buying the instruments before the end of the year in a bid to kick-start growth in the single-currency area.
 Egypt’s Global Authority for Supply Commodities agreed to buy 600,000 tons of wheat from Romania since July 1, more than the 525,000 tons it’s buying from Russia and 480,000 tons from France, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The carrier will use the IPO proceeds to buy 18 new planes from Boeing Co.
 “We see very encouraging signs and expect better performance in the second half” The carrier will spend as much as 95 billion baht of the proceeds to buy new airplanes through 2017, according to a regulatory filing with the country’s Securities & Exchange Commission dated today.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Activist investor Bill Ackman said he’s preparing to buy a stake in a US.
 “He got the highest price for his fund instead of following the usual practice of pricing a little low to give buyers an early gain,” said Erik Gordon, a professor at the Ross School of Business at the University of Michigan.
 Son will have to balance future purchases with the increasing cost of servicing SoftBank’s record 94 trillion yen debt pile, as the Federal Reserve ends its bond buying program this month and analysts surveyed by Bloomberg expect Japan’s benchmark yield to almost double by the end of 2015.
 has paid off as the then-unknown Web portal connecting Chinese manufacturers with overseas buyers evolved into China’s biggest Internet shopping mall.
 Bond managers are looking for more efficient ways to determine values in a $12 trillion market as banks use less of their own money to opportunistically buy and sell, giving them less of an edge when they pitch their brokerage services.
 Fed Stimulus There’s less buying and selling in part because a large portion of the debt is owned by the Fed, which has expanded its balance sheet to $45 trillion from less than $1 trillion in September 2008 through three bond-buying programs.
 So bond buyers are turning to a greater number of dealers for their bets on Treasuries, relying on more than eight firms this year from about six dealers in 2009, Greenwich Associates data show.
 housing crisis laid bare an epidemic of fraud and sloppy paperwork on loans made to home buyers with spotty credit.
 Ratings companies are awarding top grades to the securities, and buyers have almost no way to determine the accuracy of the information they get about them.
 IHS Automotive raised its light-vehicle sales forecast to 164 million this year, the most since 2006, as credit to buy cars becomes easier to obtain.
 Sales Pressure Auto lenders collect less information on borrowers compared with mortgages because dealers want buyers to be able to drive off the lot that day, according to Ben Diehl, an attorney at Stroock & Stroock & Lavan LLP.
 “The investors don’t care; They’re buying the rating,” said William Harrington, a former analyst with Moody’s.
 Issuers also make promises to buy back any debt that has been misrepresented and retain the pieces of the bond deals that are in line to take losses first.
 First Pacific Advisors LLC is buying some of the safest portions of auto-loan bonds deals while avoiding riskier ones, said Abhi Patwardhan, a senior vice president at the Los Angeles-based firm.
 Qatar Airways is buying 10 planes, with the first starting operations on the Doha-London route last week and two more due this year.
 6 its offer to buy Riverbed, a bid that the company rejected in February as too low.
 Earlier this year, Bloomberg News reported that buyout firms including Silver Lake Management LLC, Thoma Bravo LLC and KKR & Co.
 Comercial Mexicana, whose holdings include the upscale City Market grocery stores in the capital’s metropolitan area, hired Rothschild earlier this year to find a buyer for the entire business, people said at the time.
 Prudential agreed to buy about 34 percent to 40 percent of Chilean retirement-fund manager Administradora de Fondos de Pensiones Habitat SA, the Newark, New Jersey-based insurer said yesterday in a statement.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Lee Ainslie, who runs hedge-fund firm Maverick Capital Management LP, recommended investors buy shares of Qihoo 360 Technology Co, owner of China’s second-biggest online search engine, saying the firm has a history of successfully entering new businesses and increasing revenue.
 Investors in most mutual funds can buy or sell shares once a day, typically after markets close, and only directly with the fund.
 He described at a June hearing plans to borrow about $4 billion, using $3 billion to buy forestry assets in China, and $1 billion to buy “a portfolio of marketable securities” He said the cash flow from the investments, after making repayments on the debt, would go to the charity.
 agreed to buy CareFusion Corp.
 agreed to buy Covidien Plc in June in an agreement deal that was also intended to broaden offerings to hospitals.
 He has significant experience with leveraged buyouts, take-private transactions, PIPEs and growth equity investments.
 The gauge retreated 73 percent in the past three weeks amid concern the ECB will face obstacles in its plan to buy securitized debt as a means of boosting inflation and growth.
 More than 60 percent of the respondents in Bloomberg’s monthly survey say the ECB plan to steer its balance sheet toward early-2012 levels is set to fall short and a growing number predict Draghi will resort to large-scale government-bond buying.
 “Deutsche Bank has suggested that legal costs will rise and the market was expecting this kind of number,” Ingo Frommen, an analyst at Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg who recommends investors buy the shares, said by phone from Stuttgart.
 “Investors are flocking to Europe because they see it as the best place for buying distressed portfolios,” said Vishal Soni, who bought real estate loans at Deutsche Bank AG in London before helping start consulting firm Oxane Partners Ltd.
 LLP, which oversees $142 billion, hired Simon Finn from Apollo to head a new unit that will buy distressed debt.
 Blackstone is advising investors buying discounted loans and assets sold off by banks seeking to meet new capital requirements, according to Gudgeon.
 with a buy rating on shares.
 5 MetLife in June announced its first share buyback since 2008, saying it would repurchase as much as $1 billion of common stock.
 Kandarian had refrained from buybacks while preparing for the prospect of increased oversight from US.
 opened coverage of the company with a buy rating.
 ‘Fully Valued’ Ten analysts recommend buying buying TAL Education, while three rate it hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “The business impact of these measures is nothing” Perez-Tenessa said the company would consider buying its bonds if they continue to trade at such a big discount.
 Like value stock investors, the MetWest managers buy bonds they see as bargains based on long-term fundamentals and sell them when prospects for more gains diminish.
 Both the buying and selling are done gradually, which mitigates risk and smooths out returns, Rivelle explained in the same 2012 interview.
 Carlyle Group LP, the Washington-based money manager that has been expanding its fund offerings, agreed to buy 60 percent of TCW in 2012.
 A shift of customers choosing to rent textbooks as opposed to buying them also cut into sales growth, he said.
 The fourth quarter is typically Amazon’s most lucrative, given an influx of shoppers who buy gifts for the holidays.
 In August, Amazon said it plans to buy video-game service Twitch Interactive Inc.
 Oil Prices Debt of speculative-grade energy companies has been particularly hard hit along with oil prices, tumbling 34 percent this month with relatively few buyers willing to step in to mitigate the drop.
 recommended investors buy junk securities in the past few weeks.
 Prior Downturns While big banks have been unwilling to add riskier debt in this selloff, they’ve been buyers in previous downturns.
 11, 2014: Hewlett-Packard agrees to buy cloud-computing software developer Eucalyptus Systems Inc.
 “There’s no sign from OPEC that they’re cutting back” Saudi Arabia and Iran, both OPEC members, are discounting their main crude export grades to Asian buyers by the most in almost six years, prompting speculation that some OPEC nations are competing for market share.
 cut official selling prices of its crude to buyers in Asia for November, two people with knowledge of the pricing decision said yesterday.
 Spoofing Profit It’s against the law to spoof, or post requests to buy or sell futures, stocks and other products in financial markets without intending to actually follow through on those orders.
 The spoofer cancels the original trade before it’s executed, and buys or sells at the new price.
 For Repsol, Watson’s ability to analyze troves of data can help boost efficiency and accuracy as it tries to cheapen the development of oil fields, cut the cost of discovering new reserves and find bargains when buying assets.
 One app will be used for oil exploration and the other to help determine the most attractive oil and gas assets to buy.
 buyout firm Apollo Management International LLP to buy 80 percent of insurer Fidelidade from the Portuguese government.
 exchange-traded funds that buy Brazilian equities, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The luxury brand has revamped its C-Class car to compete for buyers against Bayerische Motoren Werke AG’s BMW 3-Series.
 equity market, where buying and selling is spread across 11 exchanges and more than 40 alternative platforms.
 According to Rosenblatt Securities Inc, about 17 percent of trading takes place on the private venues, where offers to buy and sell stocks are cloaked until trades are completed.
 Goldman Sachs, Credit Suisse and UBS weren’t the only dark pool operators to experience temporary issues, according to one trader who buys and sells shares across different venues.
 More analysts rate FirstRand stock a buy than any of its three largest local rivals, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Dougan declined to comment on what he called “rumors” when asked about reports that Credit Suisse has considered buying Zurich-based Julius Baer Group Ltd.
 offered to buy a 51 percent stake in French carmaker PSA Peugeot Citroen’s scooter business, giving the Indian tractor manufacturer access to European technology to expand in the models.
 Labor’s View “They’ve sold us, period,” Cyrille Luquet, head of the CFDT union at Peugeot Motocycles, said in a phone interview after a works council meeting to inform employees of the buyout details.
 The sale process started this month and is generating interest from family-owned and buyout firms in the region, according to the people.
 are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, two people with knowledge of the matter said in August.
 The activist fund typically focuses on a small-cap activist strategy developed by Smith and Mark Mitchell since 2002 and Peter Feld since 2005 -- buying stakes in companies they call undervalued and pushing executives and directors for changes such as unit spinoffs and asset sales.
 “Auto body sheet has a much higher margin than anything except aircraft,” Lloyd O’Carroll, a Richmond, Virginia-based Analyst at Northcoast Research Holdings LLC who recommends buying Alcoa shares, said in an interview.
 Alcoa has expanded capacity at downstream plants in Indiana and Virginia this year, and in June agreed to buy UK.
 The premium that buyers pay to have metal delivered from warehouses has soared, something that also benefits Alcoa.
 “We learned this week that the psychology of investors is fairly fragile, and maybe that’s good because the markets die on extreme optimism” Stocks tumbled early in the week amid concerns over economic weakness in Europe and geopolitical turmoil as the Federal Reserve is on course to end its bond-buying program this month.
 ECB President Mario Draghi detailed plans to buy assets for at least two years to boost inflation and economic growth in the euro area.
 Lee Partners LP, will be nominated to the board and MSG will buyback as much as $500 million in Class A shares.
 Mario Gabelli, whose family of funds own more than 7 percent of MSG’s outstanding shares, said in May that a buyer would get the Knicks for free, given the Clippers valuation.
 Self-described “constructivists,” Trian buys stakes in public companies they regard as under-performers and seek to work with management and boards to boost shareholder returns.
 told clients to buy the shares.
 The company yesterday boosted its quarterly dividend and announced plans to buy back as many as 35 million shares.
 Indian Origins Solvay entered the market for PEEK, used in products ranging from artificial limbs to airplane parts, almost a decade ago by buying Gharda Chemicals of India.
 They have never appeared at auction until now and remained in the collections of the original buyers, according to Alexander Rotter, co-head of Sotheby’s worldwide contemporary art department.
 For now, the new firms operate on the outer margins of the financial system -- as an alternative to so-called payday lenders, which make loans secured by borrowers’ paychecks, or, in the case of small businesses, factors, who buy receivables from merchants at a discount.
 Kabbage is one of several new data-savvy lenders trying to displace factors, which buy up small-business receivables for quick cash.
 With so few deadbeats, and low-cost capital from depositors, banks have little incentive to buy into Merrill’s complex algorithms.
 He does buy data from third-party researchers, including Atlanta-based L2C Inc, which tracks rent payments.
 Unlike factors, he doesn’t buy receivables.
 Wait times to remove aluminum at Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s warehouses in Detroit and at Glencore Plc’s depots at the Dutch port of Vlissingen stretch more than a year and surcharges buyers pay to secure aluminum in the US, Europe and Asia are at record highs.
 Kinder Morgan’s arguments that only a simple majority of the partnership’s investors must approve the buyout stem from an “improper reading of the contract” governing the entity, Orenstein told Delaware Chancery Court Judge Travis Laster at a hearing today in Wilmington.
 and is seeking to buy out other unitholders.
 CEO Sol Trujillo get financing to buy a stake in Telecom Italia, Fossati said he doesn’t have details about Trujillo’s plan.
 Previous cases focused on so-called “course packs” that students buy containing excerpts from various books.
 If other assets cannot be identified, the company may renew efforts to buy Belt Railway Co.
 Short interest on Burger King, which agreed in August to buy the Canadian coffee-and-doughnut chain for $11 billion, has jumped fivefold since the deal was announced.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall, allowing them to buy back the shares at a lower price and pocket the difference.
 Burger King executives said in August that the company will still buy Tim Hortons if tax laws change.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- New Jersey Resources Corp’s NJR Clean Energy Ventures is buying its third wind farm from OwnEnergy Inc, a 48-megawatt project in Kansas.
 The Kansas Board of Public Utilities is buying about half of the electricity under a 20-year contract, and Yahoo! Inc.
 is buying the remainder under a 15-year agreement that seeks to offset the company’s energy usage in the Great Plains.
 “This prohibits the company from dealing in securities, which we believe will include issue of equities, REITs, debentures and other such marketable instruments” Information Suppressed SEBI, in an order posted on its website yesterday after trading hours, barred the DLF officials from “buying, selling or otherwise dealing in securities, directly or indirectly, in any manner” for three years as the company suppressed information when it sold shares for the first time in 2007.
 They alleged DLF had given as much as 650 million rupees in unsecured, interest-free loans to Robert Vadra, who they said used the funds to buy property from DLF at below-market prices.
 has expressed interest in buying Tabelog, a restaurant guide in Japan, the president of the Japanese website’s parent company said.
 “The Yelp founder came here to this office and told me, ‘Can you spin out Tabelog from Kakakucom? I want to buy it,’” Tanaka said in an interview.
 “The market is showing some real signs of recovery” Companies and wealthy entrepreneurs will buy 9,450 new jets over the next 10 years, Honeywell International Inc.
 Their estimated value at list prices is 77 percent more than in last year’s projection, as buyers gravitate to costlier, longer-range jets.
 “Really for the past four to five years we have seen very little activity in that segment” More “fence sitters” will be convinced that it’s time to buy if the economy continues to show stable growth, Von Weise said, and that will attract more jet-financing competitors.
 C&C fell 98 percent to 354 euros in Dublin as Nomura cut its recommendation on the stock to neutral from buy.
 Rio Tinto Group also sought to exit the industry, before scrapping that plan when the London-based company failed to find a buyer for its mines.
 “If a takeover doesn’t materialize, any selldown would present a pretty attractive buying opportunity” A representative for PanAust declined to comment on the prospects for a deal.
 21, when Managing Director Gary Stafford said a second potential buyer would complete due diligence the following month.
 14, advising investors to buy PanAust shares.
 “With the acquisition of Frieda River now complete, any offer from GRAM would have to incorporate significant value for this asset” Copper Prices Recent declines in commodity prices may make buyers less willing to pay up for PanAust now, and Guangdong Rising’s 23 percent stake could deter other bidders, said Tom Sartor, a Brisbane-based analyst at Morgans Financial Ltd.
 A gauge of construction, property and real-estate stocks has jumped 28 percent on expectations the new president will build more roads, seaports and allow foreigners to buy apartments valued at more than 25 billion rupiah ($204,666).
 Fading Optimism “The market was run up by foreign investors buying on the hope that Jokowi will prevail despite the adversities,” Das said in an Oct.
 Norilsk decided paying dividends was a better option after considering buying back shares because the company is undervalued, Potanin said.
 “We were considering doing a buyback to support our market capitalization, but decided that dividends are a clearer way of profit distribution for our investors and it’s more comfortable for the state in terms of taxes,” he said.
 and Home Depot Inc, where customers can buy more expensive items, have been subject to larger incursions.
 At the hearing, some creditors pressed for Oncor to be sold as part of a new, as-yet-unfiled restructuring plan, saying bids would be higher in six months or a year if potential buyers were confident that they could go through with the purchase on the terms set today.
 is buying out much of Cisco Systems Inc’s stake in joint venture VCE, which sells high-end data center equipment, according to people with knowledge of the matter.
 Lockheed said it repurchased 26 million shares for $446 million during the third quarter, after halting stock buybacks during the second quarter as it assessed pension obligations.
 KKR, like larger competitors Blackstone Group LP and Carlyle Group LP, has broadened its business beyond traditional leveraged buyouts, and the firm differentiates itself by using more of its balance sheet in investments.
 Where there’s a little bit of fear, we get excited” The value of a private-equity firm’s buyout holdings affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric relies on quarterly “mark-to-market” valuations of those investments.
 Blackstone’s buyout holdings climbed 37 percent in the latest quarter, and Carlyle’s gained 3 percent.
 Assets Decline Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 KKR’s measure of ENI, an accounting metric used by publicly traded buyout firms, differs from US.
 With the stock down, Monroe, who controls the company, said he would be buying shares if it were not in a blackout period before earnings results are reported.
 “I would like nothing more than to buy as much Globalstar as I possibly could at these prices,” Monroe said on the call.
 “If the price was exactly what the price is right now, a few weeks from now, I wouldn’t be at all surprised to see” my investment vehicles buy more stock when it’s unrestricted, he said.
 and the partnership it controls agreed to buy Atlas Pipeline Partners LP and Atlas Energy LP for about $587 billion, adding to its ability to process, ship and export booming US.
 Europe’s largest media house will buy the 251 percent family holding using cash, Bertelsmann said in a statement today.
 The buyout, two years after Bertelsmann failed to agree with the Jahr family on a full takeover, would facilitate cooperation between the publisher and Bertelsmann’s broadcaster RTL Group SA and its Penguin Random House book-publishing venture.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy and package mortgages into guaranteed bonds, have been under government control for six years after receiving a $1875 billion taxpayer bailout.
 Though Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac will buy loans from borrowers with credit scores as low as 620 on a scale of 850, the average score from the Fair Issac Corp.
 Dimon and other bankers have blamed tight credit on losses they have endured from having to buy back soured loans with underwriting errors.
 FHFA is required to set affordable-housing goals for loans that Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy from disadvantaged areas and borrowers.
 Lenders are willing to refinance the mortgages because Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac guarantee there won’t be any buyback risk.
 “The apparel business has had a slight deceleration, but the footwear business was up more than expected and the international business grew a ton,” said Sam Poser, a New York-based analyst at Sterne Agee & Leach who has a buy rating on the shares.
 That’s included large operators buying family owned cinemas struggling to upgrade their circuits with digital technology and larger screens.
 “The company is permanently undervalued,” said Matthew Harrigan, analyst at Wunderlich Securities in Denver, who has a buy rating on the stock and a $31 price target.
 as possible buyers, while cautioning that antitrust regulators at the US.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- The Treasury’s $93 billion of note auctions this week attracted the least demand at sales of the series since July 2009 amid the end of Federal Reserve bond-buying and the lowest yields since May.
 “The weak buy-side bid simply reflects that investors are in a holding pattern,” said William O’Donnell, head US.
 The fund is considering buying television channels and investing in retail property abroad to showcase the nation’s cuisine, fashion and animation, Chief Investment Officer Koichiro Yoshizaki told Bloomberg News last year.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Walgreen Co’s board should delay approving its $153 billion buyout of Alliance Boots Holdings Ltd, said a union-backed pension advisory firm, after the US.
 CtW also asked for an investigation into the role that hedge funds played in the decision to buy the rest of Alliance Boots.
 The Deerfield, Illinois-based company said in August it would buy the part of Alliance Boots it didn’t already own and wouldn’t use the deal to move its tax address abroad.
 The company also announced the forecast cut as well as a smaller-than-expected $3 billion share buyback, sending shares down as much as 16 percent.
 The decline offers buying opportunities among technology stocks, according to Storebrand Asset Management’s Espen Furnes.
 Among analysts, 56 percent recommend a buy and they predict the shares will gain more than 30 percent in the next year.
 Massachusetts state also said it will buy subway trains from China CNR.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Janus Capital Group Inc, which hired Pacific Investment Management Co’s Bill Gross last month, said it agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC for at least $30 million to expand in exchange-traded products.
 Finding buyers for many of the assets shouldn’t be too difficult because of their importance to Australia, according to Goldman Sachs’ Sims.
 Raytheon has agreed to buy a closely held company that it didn’t identify for about $400 million, executives said today on a conference call with analysts.
 Washington Prime Group Inc, a Bethesda, Maryland-based owner of strip shopping centers and regional malls, agreed last month to buy rival Glimcher Realty Trust in a $43 billion deal.
 Even Before the Washington Prime deal, Barry Sternlicht’s closely held Starwood Capital Group had been buying up lower-tier mall properties sold off by big real estate owners, including its agreement in June to buy seven malls from Taubman Centers Inc.
 None of the large mall operators are going to buy operators with lower-quality properties and B-mall REIT share prices are low and they don’t have the currency to make deals for each other, said Rich Moore, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets in Solon, Ohio.
 4 amid concern the European Central Bank’s asset-buying plan won’t be enough to revive the region’s economy.
 The industry’s focus on cost-cutting and share buyback programs suggests the sector may have reached the bottom of the cycle, BlackRock Inc’s Evy Hambro, who manages the $7 billion World Mining Fund, said today on Bloomberg TV’s “On the Move’ ‘‘The fact that management are now going down this path and looking to reward investors with increased returns -- and we’ve seen the first buybacks in the industry -- gives us grounds for a significant amount of optimism,” Hambro said.
 VantageScore’s supporters say its scores better predict creditworthiness for a broader spectrum of borrowers, including minorities and first-time homebuyers who are struggling to get mortgages today.
 In August, Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy most of the new loans for home purchases, began to study the feasibility of using VantageScore and other alternatives to FICO.
 Competition “will result in more predictive credit scores for potential homebuyers and better allows Fannie and Freddie to manage credit risk” VantageScore Lobbying VantageScore has sponsored mortgage-industry conferences and lobbies regulators and members of Congress.
 Watt, 69, a former Democratic congressman from North Carolina, has talked about expanding access to credit and has been reviewing Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac’s legal requirement to buy loans in “underserved” markets.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Eric Cinnamond had 75 percent of the money in his mutual fund in cash at the end of July because he couldn’t find enough cheap small-company stocks to buy.
 Buffett has said he is waiting for a “fat pitch,” his phrase for an opportunity to buy a stock at a favorable price.
 “These stocks are nowhere near the price they need to be for us to be aggressive buyers,” he said.
 The fund, which has about 18 percent of its assets in cash, hasn’t been an aggressive buyer of stocks since 2011, the last time the broader market fell significantly, said Lamphier.
 “We have a wish list of stocks, but we need to see prices a bit lower than they are before we would buy,” he said.
 Weitz, whose $11 billion Weitz Partners III Opportunity Fund beat 97 percent of peers over the past five years, said he has found a few new companies to buy in the past few days.
 “It brings us back into the game” At the Goodhaven Fund, Trauner said the best time to buy stocks is when markets are depressed.
 While the orders were canceled before being executed, averting losses for whoever placed them, they highlight the potential for catastrophe anytime someone gets details wrong with instructions to buy or sell securities.
 “Also, the amount was huge, so someone would’ve noticed before the market closed” Orders to buy or sell stock are submitted and withdrawn all the time in electronic markets, where software strategies are used by arbitragers to profit from price discrepancies and by market makers to anticipate demand.
 The increased output is forcing producers to reduce prices to lure buyers.
 After missing out on innovations that allowed smaller, domestic wildcatters to break open gas-and-oil-soaked shale rock formations, most of the big global oil companies used their financial muscle to buy their way in.
 Louis President James Bullard said yesterday the central bank should consider delaying plans to end its bond-buying at the end of this month to halt a decline in expected inflation.
 DuPont plans to spin off its performance chemicals unit, which makes pigments and refrigerants, eliminate $1 billion in costs by 2019, and buy back $5 billion of shares.
 Kullman said areas where she and Trian are aligned include the need to expand margins, boost productivity and return more capital to shareholders through share buybacks and increased dividends.
 Trafficking has encouraged middlemen to buy crude and smuggle it into Turkey, Jordan or Iraq, where it’s blended with other oil and sold to unsuspecting buyers, according to the report.
 in Vancouver who advises investors to buy Canadian Pacific shares, said today in a note to clients.
 “Results have been impressive” Oglenski advises investors to buy Canadian Pacific stock and predicts the shares could rise as high as C$280.
 He didn’t elaborate and said he wasn’t at liberty to disclose the buyer.
 He rates the shares buy.
 Approvals for shoppers wanting to buy on credit at Edcon stores have fallen by about 50 percent since Barclays Plc’s South African unit took over the retailer’s book in 2012, while efforts to find a potential second provider of credit have been unsuccessful.
 “Cash-sale retailers are certainly the most valuable in this climate” Edcon, which operates chains including Edgars, Red Square and low-cost Jet, has been revamping outlets and introducing international brands in an effort to claw back market share, which fell to 17 percent in 2012 from 22 percent a year after the Bain buyout, according to Euromonitor data.
 Those fliers are prized because of the frequency of their trips and their tendency to buy costlier tickets for last-minute flexibility.
 “We’re also seeing more flight to quality buyers out of global asset classes that are considered ‘riskier’” Adding to the bout of general anxiety overwhelming the market was the data yesterday showing that US.
 “It’s not just the global slowdown” While Wall Street economists may be sticking to their forecasts Treasuries will lose value, a lot of bond buyers aren’t listening right now.
 Orix, which also sells solar panels, may buy projects from developers that are relinquishing approvals granted to them under Japan’s feed-in tariff program, Nishigori said.
 Some non-Japanese developers are asking Orix to jointly invest or buy their projects after having trouble pushing them through on their own, he said.
 Some of the developers that buy panels from Orix are also affected, he said.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Bombardier Inc’s delays with the CSeries jet forced Deutsche Lufthansa AG’s Swiss subsidiary, the largest carrier buying the model, to lease aircraft from another planemaker.
 Bombardier has struggled to find buyers for a plane being promoted as an alternative to the Boeing Co.
 26 to buy 40 of the aircraft.
 “Their guidance was light for the quarter, but still strong,” said Kerry Rice, an analyst at Needham & Co, who has a buy rating on Yelp.
 The company has reshuffled management, naming Emmanuel Faber as chief executive officer, and is said to be considering the sale of the medical nutrition unit amid speculation it may be seeking to buy bigger assets.
 The companies also plan to start a joint venture to buy Fonterra’s Darnum plant in Australia and craft a distribution deal to sell the Fonterra baby milk brand, Anmum, in China.
 Publishing targeted weightings in advance would move markets, forcing the fund to buy at highs and sell at lows, he said in an interview on Oct.
 If Vodafone isn’t able to extend or buy spectrum in two of its expiring service areas where it has no alternative access to airwaves, the company would be forced to abandon its business.
 “We don’t even know what we’re going to have to pay for that spectrum, and we don’t even know if we’ll be able to buy it,” Pieters said.
 “The Dassault family can also buy,” Trappier said in an interview at the National Business Aviation Association conference in Orlando, Florida.
 “Anyone can buy” Airbus has a 463 percent stake in Paris-based Dassault Aviation given to it by the French government years ago.
 “It will be step by step” Dassault Aviation has about 3 billion euros in cash, according to Trappier, and the company may seek clearance to buy more shares beyond the 10 percent stake now planned.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Nigerian crude producer Oando Plc plans to build a 400-megawatt power plant in Africa’s biggest economy after it failed in three bids to buy state electricity utilities for sale last year.
 “Appetite to buy is already curbed” and rents could fall further, S&P’s Chan said.
 “Traveling has become so cheap and they buy more stuff on the Internet.
 “By buying Singapore developers now you’re really buying exposure outside of Singapore and into markets like China,” he said in an interview Oct.
 Alibaba buysrights from studios that control films and TV content to showthem online for a fee, often by territory.
 The company wants to sell more products from smallerAmerican producers into China, and it’s too early to think ofbuying other companies or considering mergers, Ma said.
 Capital Markets Chinese nationals will be able to buy equities and real estate via a Qualified Domestic Retail Investor scheme, Wang Dan, a deputy director general at the central bank, said today at a conference in Beijing.
 Bills fans previously organized a boycott of rocker Jon Bon Jovi over his involvement with a group of investors trying to buy the team, allegedly with the intention of moving it to Toronto.
 Stone Point is working with Perella Weinberg Partners LP to find buyers for Auto Protection, which does business as APCO, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the matter isn’t public.
 It is likely to be sold to another private-equity firm, with the company’s steady cash flow appealing to buyout shops, they said.
 Interstate National, which generates about $30 million in annual Ebitda, is working with Royal Bank of Canada to find buyers, the people said.
 The company plans to sell about 51 percent of its stake in the Hangzhou-based business to an Asian buyer, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the process is private.
 “If you look at HP, going down the split, H3C in China is probably too much to manage at the moment” Hewlett-Packard acquired H3C in 2010 as part of a deal to buy networking company 3Com Corp.
 If Hewlett-Packard were to find a Chinese buyer for its stake, then it could hand off operational responsibilities while still retaining some of the income, Kindness said.
 Work on Mercedes electric-drive cars has been completed, and the company will continue buying powertrain components from Tesla.
 While Toyota still owns a 24 percent stake, it’s no longer buying components from Tesla and is instead embracing fuel cells, a technology that Musk ridicules.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Shanghai Chaori Solar Energy Science & Technology Co, the first company to default in China’s onshore bond market, got a guarantee to help make repayments from a state-backed fund that buys bad debt.
 Americans buying coverage for 2015 using healthcaregov should expect an easier experience than during its troubled first year, Counihan said yesterday in his first interview since starting the job Sept.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- New York City’s Waldorf Astoria hotel is set to become the biggest prize yet for buyers from China who have been pouring money into US.
 building by a Chinese buyer, said Kevin Mallory, global head of the hotels unit of commercial real estate brokerage CBRE Group Inc.
 “If you have $2 billion to invest, isn’t it easier to buy one asset at arguably the greatest address in the world rather than 10 different ones?” he said.
 As with the Atlantic Yards and Chase investments, the Waldorf’s buyer will have to spend additional money to realize the property’s revenue potential.
 Many Japanese buyers were forced to sell when the US.
 Now somebody would love to buy them, I would believe, and this is what they should be exploring,” Icahn said yesterday in a Bloomberg Television interview with Stephanie Ruhle after speaking at the Robin Hood Investors Conference in New York.
 Novo Banco has drawn expressions of interest from potential buyers, Finance Minister Maria Luis Albuquerque said on Oct.
 The Mentor, Ohio-based maker of hospital sterilization products agreed to buy Synergy Health Plc for about 12 billion pounds ($192 billion) earlier this week in a tax inversion.
 Pertamina earlier this year expanded an agreement to buy liquefied natural gas from Cheniere Energy Inc’s US.
 Proceeds from the sale may be used for drilling in the oil-rich Eagle Ford Shale area of Texas, acquisitions, debt reduction and share buybacks, Roger Jenkins, chief executive officer of Murphy, said in the statement.
 He rates the shares a buy and owns none.
 Comercial Mexicana, whose holdings include the upscale City Market grocery stores in the capital’s metropolitan area, hired Rothschild earlier this year to find a buyer for the entire business, people said at the time.
 The unveiling of the plan is luring buyers back in, according to Allianz Global Investors and Pictet Asset Management.
 “With this valuation a lot of it is discounted already” Analysts at UBS AG, HSBC Holdings Plc, and Israel Brokerage & Investments upgraded ICL to the equivalent of buy from hold this month, with UBS arguing that regulatory risks had been priced in.
 Just a third of the 15 analysts covering the company recommend buying its shares, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In August, Switzerland’s Roche Holding AG agreed to buy InterMune Inc.
 still presents European buyers the biggest opportunity, according to Dirk Albersmeier, head of German M&A at JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 “In Asia, there is not much you can buy and you have to grow organically,” Albersmeier said.
 said it agreed to buy British restaurant chain PizzaExpress Ltd.
 When Electrolux AB said it would buy General Electric Co’s century-old appliances unit for $33 billion, shares of the the company rose to the highest close since at least 1989.
 agreed to buy rival Lorillard Inc.
 2 as concern grew the European Central Bank’s asset-buying plan won’t be enough to boost inflation and revive the region’s economy.
 raised its rating to buy from neutral.
 Delhaize Group slipped 18 percent to 5293 euros as Deutsche Bank AG cut its rating on the Belgian food retailer to hold from buy, citing this year’s 25 rally through the end of last week.
 The People’s Bank of China eased mortgage rules for homebuyers who have paid off existing loans on Sept.
 “There should still be important upside over the next six to 12 months from current depressed levels under either scenario,” the analysts, who have a buy rating on Petrobras, said in the note.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- Hilton Worldwide Holdings Inc, the largest publicly traded hotel operator, is considering buying high-end urban hotels or resorts to spend $195 billion in proceeds from the sale of Manhattan’s Waldorf Astoria hotel.
 So I think that the pressure has got to be going on behindthe scenes to reform” Weber’s View The ECB’s balance sheet, which can be boosted by buyingassets or accepting collateral in return for loans, is at 21trillion euros ($27 trillion) down from a 2012 peak of 31trillion euros.
 “Don’t kid yourself, this is nothing else but a correctionof a policy mistake made three years ago,” said Weber, 57, whoresigned as Bundesbank president in 2011 following a clash overbond-buying with the ECB council.
 “It’s very much a mixed bag, but nothing that suggests the Fed is going to take away the punch bowl any time soon” Fed Policy The Fed last month tapered monthly bond buying to $15 billion in their seventh consecutive $10 billion cut, staying on course to end the purchase program this month.
 Policy makers also stuck to their pledge to keep interest rates near zero for a “considerable time” after the Fed stops buying assets.
 In that hearing the court had allowed the government to proceed with the sale on the condition it won’t transfer shares to buyers till a ruling.
 “The buy side was looking for about a $700 million to $800 million increase and it came in closer to $1 billion,” Morris said in a phone interview.
 He rates Boeing as buy.
 SoftBank is currently considering buying assets around the world, including Grupo Iusacell SA in Mexico and US.
 ‘Drunken Fools’ Dish’s most logical buyer, Verizon, would face the same regulatory challenges to use that spectrum, Moffett said.
 India buys about 80 percent of its oil from overseas.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to buy the electricity under a 20-year contract.
 Warren has a “buy” recommendation on the stock.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- The prospect of Glencore Plc buying Rio Tinto Group is sending reverberations through the mining industry that could prompt more deal talks.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date, and non-deliverable contracts are settled in dollars.
 business, we don’t have to buy any more” Masrani, who becomes CEO tomorrow, is setting a different path than predecessor Ed Clark, who in 12 years transformed Toronto-Dominion into Canada’s largest bank with more branches in the US.
 Legere, in a profanity-laced tirade, said his employees still have post-traumatic stress disorder from AT&T Inc’s failed attempt to buy the wireless carrier in 2011.
 The German company last month took steps to placate investors with plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros of its stock over three years.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- For an article in the June edition of GQ magazine, writer Marshall Sella bought one unit of bitcoin, for the going market rate of $834, with the goal of answering a simple question: What can you buy with it? Long story short -- he ended up purchasing a two-slice Hamilton Beach toaster oven and a Timex watch from Overstockcom, soon after the web retailer announced it would accept payment in bitcoin.
 Finally he returned to Overstockcom to buy “underpants, water glasses and slippers” The only place to find plentiful bitcoin-buying opportunities, Sella concluded, was on what remained of Silk Road, the underground Internet marketplace targeted by US.
 As Kristen Schweizer reports today, bitcoin has become a significant payment source for those buying and selling child pornography.
 Federal Reserve to the International Monetary Fund say they see bubbles developing in markets? The answer, apparently, is to keep buying.
 I’m not worried” Societe Nationale des Chemins de Fer Francais will remain majority investor with a 55 percent stake and that should also mitigate against upheaval, though the French state rail company is unlikely to exercise a right to buy the UK.
 “It’s overdone” Worah said he’s been buying five-year TIPS as prices of the securities declined.
 outlook as the central bank ends its bond-buying program.
 DeVries listed the bonds as a “buy” in an Oct.
 funds that buy high-yield bonds in the week ended Oct.
 The owner of the Sofitel and Ibis brands agreed to buy French app-maker Wipolo and plans to improve customer access via mobile devices and revamp its online booking websites and employee platforms, the Paris-based company said in a statement today.
 “There are certain countries where we’d benefit from a partner” Groupon agreed to buy e-commerce marketplace Ticket Monster in South Korea less than a year ago for $260 million.
 Another mobile feature, Snap by Groupon, is a free app that pays people cash for buying select grocery and other items every week from any retailer in the US.
 Exploring both a sale and an IPO, known as a dual-track process, can help propel a deal by pressuring buyers to act before a stock offering puts the company in public investors’ hands.
 Stocks slid, recovered and lurched again as concerns mounted that Europe will slip into a recession just as Federal Reserve bond buying ends.
 Very little about the outlook for the North American economy has changed, he said, adding that the drop is a buying opportunity not seen in months.
 Louis Fed Bank President James Bullard said the previous day that policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond buying.
 “The more gas from other sources, the lower the reliance on current supply source will be” Independence Capacity The Independence, with a capacity of 170,000 cubic meters, is leased by Klaipedos Nafta AB, the state-owned energy terminal operator, from Norway’s Hoegh LNG Holdings for 10 years with an option to buy the regasification unit.
 Under the terms of the 2013 agreement, Merrimack, New Hampshire-based GT Advanced was required to supply millions of units of sapphire that Apple wasn’t obligated to buy, and had to maintain certain key employees, Squiller said.
 The Fed cited job gains in its decision to wind up the bond-buying program that fueled capital inflows into emerging markets, spurring speculation that policy makers could raise rates sooner than expected.
 The central bank said last week it will for the first time start buying kroner with its foreign currency oil revenue to cover budget needs.
 “As a long-term investor, yes, I’d be buying equitiestoday,” he said today in an interview with BloombergTelevision’s Erik Schatzker.
 to buy 24 million rand ($219 million) worth of shares in television equipment company Ellies Holdings Ltd.
 Car owners allege they were duped into buying models that weren’t as safe as they were made to believe because of the potentially dangerous air bags.
 In a separate lawsuit filed in the Central District of California, another five buyers or leasers of BMW, Honda and Toyota cars claimed their vehicles were unsafe because of the faulty Takata air bags.
 “It’s stock selection not blanket buying,” Kirill Yankovskiy, the director of equity sales at Otkritie Capital Ltd.
 Take EBay and PayPal: Both are considered candidates after their split, for buyers such as Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 “That’s especially true when there’s not a natural buyer for the asset and capital markets are strong” The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, the benchmark of American equity, closed at a record last month, while the Stoxx Europe 600 Index has recovered much of its losses from the financial crisis.
 The slimmed-down Hewlett-Packard Enterprise could buy $56 billion rival EMC Corp.
 could also eventually be sold, with logical buyers being Lenovo Group Ltd, Dell Inc.
 Online Payments As EBay looks to break up, Google could swoop in and buy PayPal to become the leader in online payments, Gene Munster, an analyst at Piper Jaffray Cos, said this month.
 With beer behemoth Anheuser-Busch InBev NV seeking ways to grow, some analysts said this month that it should buy PepsiCo to expand into soda.
 The business that makes Lays potato chips and Quaker oatmeal could go to other buyers, said Ali Dibadj, a New York-based analyst at Sanford C.
 “But when it comes to size, comfort and range, BYD was clearly above Nissan and Renault” The deal is a blow for Carlos Ghosn, the CEO of both Renault and Nissan, who has struggled to find buyers for the group’s Renault Zoe and Nissan Leaf electric vehicles.
 That is the rough equivalent of buying a bespoke suit for $300 or an apartment on Manhattan’s Fifth Avenue for $500,000.
 I could talk about how the interior is much improved, but, really? Hellcat buyers will ante up the $61,000-something to put a Joker-worthy smile on their faces.
 Caesars, taken private in a $307 billion leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008, is in talks with the senior creditors of its biggest unit to craft a plan that would reduce the consolidated company’s $242 billion in long-term debt, according to people with knowledge of the discussions.
 “Rumors are back again on Arabtec” shares being sold to an unknown buyer at 445 dirhams a share, he said.
 Nedbank’s parent company, Old Mutual Plc, is also targeting East Africa, buying micro lender Faulu Kenya Ltd.
 Pegler said adding Pure Energies’ technology and website will help him reach retiring baby-boomers and tech-savvy millenials buying their first homes who want to generate their own electricity.
 Teva is trying to buy more time to shift patients to a longer-acting version that won’t face generic competition until 2030.
 Comcast, which is seeking regulatory approval to buy rival Time Warner Cable Inc.
 22, 2009, cutting costs for buyers including Tyson Foods Inc.
 The fast-food restaurant seeking to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 The Middleton, Wisconsin-based company is buying Procter & Gamble Co’s remaining pet-food business.
 The New York company that has been building a health-care property business agreed to buy Griffin-American Healthcare REIT II in August.
 Whitworth and Batchelder manage more than $6 billion, buying stakes in public companies they consider undervalued and lobbying executives and directors for changes to boost returns.
 regulations cracking down onthe biggest buyers of leveraged loans risk concentrating thedebt into the hands of the largest firms while squeezing outsmaller managers.
 “The market is pretty weak and this will be received badly by some investors concerned about how dramatic it could be,” Michael Seufert, an analyst at Norddeutsche Landesbank in Hanover, Germany, who has a buy rating on the stock said by phone.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Apple’s Tim Cook and Alibaba’s Jack Ma speaking separately at a technology conference yesterday, said they’re open to working together on projects that would turn phones into tools for buying and selling stuff.
 in New York who rates the shares a buy and owns none, said in a phone interview.
 Halliburton, which has 28 buy, five holds and one sell rating from analysts, climbed 06 percent to $5292 at the close in New York.
 There are no plans to buy out the operator’s state shareholders, he said.
 IFM doesn’t plan to buy more than 30 percent of the stock, Kerschl said.
 After four years of government restrictions to cool housing prices that had tripled since 2000, the central bank is reversing course, making it easier for homeowners to buy second properties.
 “The property downturn will continue as buyers stay on the sidelines in anticipation of further price declines,” said Bei Fu, a Hong Kong-based credit analyst at Standard & Poor’s.
 It will allow more buyers to qualify for preferential mortgage rules and should help to release pent-up demand” Jiangxi Copper Co.
 Herecommended buying shares on the stock drop and reiterated hisestimate that the company should be valued at $5 a share.
 The hedge fund is betting the stock will decline,selling borrowed shares and then buying them back more cheaplyto pocket the difference.
 That may potentially put the onus on AT&T Inc, which America Movil has contacted about buying parts of its Mexican mobile and landline units, people with knowledge of the matter said last month.
 “If initially, it looks that they are not going in the right direction, I’m not going to make them waste their time” Slim, the world’s second-richest person, has said the buyer needs to be new to the Mexican market to create more competition.
 Swiss energy trader Vitol Group’s plan to raise $2 billion to buy oil from state-owned producer OAO Rosneft was thwarted after the world’s largest publicly traded oil producer by volume was slapped with US.
 “EBay continues to focus on enhancing its competitive position, improving the experience for buyers and sellers and investing in consumer engagement,” Donahoe said in the statement.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Adidas AG placated investors who have sent its shares down 35 percent this year, saying it plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros ($19 billion) of its stock over the next three years.
 “The top management seems to be under enormous pressure” The share buyback, which will begin in the fourth quarter, will be completed by the end of 2017, and will be mainly financed by cash flow, Adidas said.
 The Standard & Poor’s 500 Index was little changed following a three-day slide, as the Federal Reserve held its course to end a bond-buying program.
 Morgan Madison Avenue Securities Trust, is similar to debt that government-backed Fannie Mae began issuing last year to transfer some of its potential losses to bond buyers, according to a presale report by Fitch Ratings.
 Unlike its earlier deals, Fannie Mae won’t be at risk of bearing losses on any of the initial defaults in the loan pool, facing damage only after recouping as much as 475 percent of the starting balances from bond buyers, the credit grader said.
 “China remains a large, price-sensitive buyer that continues to set a price ceiling on the seaborne market even as import volumes decline,” Goldman said in the report.
 VLM, which aims to complete a management buyout from Germany’s Intro Aviation GmbH next week, will take two SSJ100s from Russian lessor Ilyushin Finance Co, with options for two more leased aircraft and purchase rights for a further 10.
 Intro had planned to keep VLM and also looked at adding two 100-seat jets before the management-buyout plan emerged, he said.
 “In virtually all other areas of commerce, consumers know the price and much about the quality of what they intend to buy ahead of the purchase,” said Uwe Reinhardt, a health economist at Princeton University, in an editorial accompanying the study.
 I hope they can continue to be self-restrained and reasonable” Leung’s offer is “a practical move to buy more time” while he waits for public opinion to turn against the movement, said Hung Ho-fung, an associate sociology professor at Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore who studies Hong Kong and China.
 Beristain, who has a buy recommendation on the stock, said liabilities at Bloom Lake include a rail contract that costs Cliffs $60 million a year even if the company transports no iron ore.
 South Korea received this month a shipment of Alaskan oil for the first time in at least eight years and may buy more, the importing company said.
 “But as long as the prices are right and there’s a guarantee that companies are getting the products they need, they will want to diversify supplies to reduce risks” GS Caltex Corp, which unloaded 800,000 barrels of Alaskan North Slope crude this month is considering whether to buy more of the grade, according to a company official.
 West refineries, traditional buyers of Alaskan oil, are turning to other North American crudes.
 “One: long-term growth with improved execution, resulting in significant operating leverage; or, two: the sale of this asset by private equity to a strategic buyer” Apex has had “constructive” talks with management and a director representing Leonard Green & Partners LP, which owns almost 57 percent of Container Store, Colen said.
 Allergan has been seeking its own deals, which might make it too big for Valeant to buy.
 Greece’s ASE Index, which earlier rallied as much as 31 percent amid speculation the ECB might buy low-grade Greek bank loans, slid 03 percent.
 ECB President Mario Draghi will push his organization to buy bundles of Greek and Cypriot bank loans with “junk” ratings, the Financial Times reported late yesterday.
 Draghi will unveil this week details of a plan to buy private-sector assets for hundreds of billions of euros, the paper said.
 The world’s second-largest sporting-goods maker said a share buyback will begin in the fourth quarter of this year and will be completed by Dec.
 The buyback will be in addition to its policy to pay an annual dividend of 20 percent to 40 percent of net income attributable to shareholders.
 As the industry giants face grim growth prospects, buying up these smaller brands may prove the most effective use of cash right now.
 “A lot of these guys are going to have to buy their way in, they really have no choice,” Pinheiro said.
 A buyer would have to offer Boulder investors $28 a share to match the Annie’s valuation, about triple the stock’s current price.
 Representatives for Nestle, Mondelez, Kellogg, Kraft, Pepsi and General Mills declined to comment on whether their companies are considering buying WhiteWave or Boulder.
 “It is expensive to buy the smaller companies because they are in demand,” said Jack Russo, a St.
 Boies challenged him with documents, including a press release issued on the night the bailout began, saying the government would receive a warrant, or option to buy shares of common stock.
 CFO’s View Chief Financial Officer Ramon Leal said Alfa hasn’t decidedwhether to buy, maintain or reduce its stake in Bogota-basedPacific, Colombia’s second-largest oil company.
 It could be something else, orsome other company, so we want to keep flexibility” David Neuhauser, a money manager at Livermore PartnersInc, an energy-focused hedge fund located in Northbrook,Illinois, said the size of Alfa’s stake in Pacific signals thatthe Mexican company is committed to buying the rest.
 The buyer, which owns offices in Moscow, plans to increase its stake in CA Immo to 26 percent, according to the statement.
 Louis Federal Reserve Bank President James Bullard said a day earlier policy makers should consider delaying the end of bond buying.
 Federal Reserve cited job gains in its decision to wind up the unprecedented bond-buying program, which had fueled capital inflows into emerging markets.
 BSkyB, about 39 percent owned by Rupert Murdoch’s 21st Century Fox Inc, agreed in July to buy Fox’s Sky Italia unit and a majority stake in Sky Deutschland.
 His challenge now is luring the hordes of buyers that analysts are projecting.
 Accelerated fees are a lump-sum payment representing income Blackstone would lose by selling a portfolio company ahead of a schedule agreed to at the time of the buyout.
 TPG, which is raising a buyout fund with a $10 billion target, has told clients it will report annually to them the amount of portfolio fees it collects.
 Hedge-fund firm Serengeti Asset Management LP last week recommended at a conference buying Fortress shares as they are “exceptionally cheap” and the firm should pay a significant dividend in the next couple of years.
 Fortress went public in February 2007, selling shares at $1850 apiece to become the first US-listed buyout and hedge-fund manager.
 Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 Proposed changes to the act include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an “agreed price” Exxon, Anadarko Petroleum Corp.
 Earnings excluding certain items including a separate $46 million charge partially tied to staff buyouts were $102 a share, exceeding the average estimate of 94 cents in a Bloomberg survey of eight analysts.
 Low upgraded the stock to buy from hold earlier this month.
 “There are few other Chinese names that have much liquidity in credit-default swaps in the high-grade space apart from the banks” Chinese Swaps Credit-linked notes are securities that can use credit-default swap contracts to transfer the risk of the reference entity from the issuer to the buyer.
 Risk Hedged Issuers of credit-linked notes “may be trying to quickly hedge their risk and reduce their exposure to China by buying protection through credit-default swaps,” Matthew Phan, a credit analyst in Singapore at independent research firm CreditSights Inc, said in an e-mail.
 The Yonkers-based bank has drawn interest from potential buyers including Sterling Bancorp and People’s United Financial Inc, said the people, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 The WHO is buying about 500,000 sets of PPE a month, he said.
 “If you buy a new car, it can tell you if your tires are running flat,” Conrad said.
 The Internet search giant has teamed up with Novartis AG to develop sensor-enhanced contact lenses that aim to help people with diabetes more easily track their glucose levels, and last month agreed to buy health-technology startup Lift Labs as it pursues new methods to address neurodegenerative diseases such as Parkinson’s.
 The Royals’ almost three decades of ineptitude, including only one winning season from 1995 to 2012, were blamed in large part on owner David Glass, who was Wal-Mart Stores Inc’s chief executive officer before buying the team in 2000.
 state of Massachusetts also said it will buy 284 subway trains from China CNR, which submitted a bid of $5666 million.
 Kao will boost total capital expenditure to as much as 100 billion yen ($915 million) a year eventually from about 60 billion yen now as the company accelerates expansion of factories outside Japan and evaluates buying new technologies, he said.
 China is the biggest buyer of industrial metals, and Germany is the third-largest.
 outlook and end their bond-buying program as planned, according to 62 of 64 economists surveyed by Bloomberg News.
 The company also announced its first ever buyback, of as much as $500 million in Class A shares.
 As the sales -- known as exits -- wane, buyout executives are rooting for declines in asset prices so they can put their cash piles to work.
 buyout portfolios gained 3 percent and 22 percent, respectively.
 The value of a private-equity firm’s buyout holdings affects economic net income, or ENI, because the metric in part depends on quarterly mark-to-market valuations of those investments.
 Exits Slow Private-equity firms pool money from investors including pension plans and endowments with a mandate to buy companies within about five to six years, then sell them and return the funds with a profit in a cycle lasting about 10 years.
 “Numerous corruption scandals and allegations of vote-buying, combined with a lack of substance in the electoral campaign, undermined public trust in the process and in politics in general” Vote Manipulation Bulgarian authorities convicted two people of vote-buying yesterday and is investigating 53 other cases, the Interior Ministry said on its website.
 “At current levels, it may be a good time to buy on dips or accumulate,” said Linus Yip, a strategist at First Shanghai Securities Ltd.
 UOB cut its rating on the stock to hold from buy with a target price of HK$20 per share.
 “The current valuation is very much under where it should be,” said Carl Short, equity analyst at S&P Capital IQ, who recommends buying the stock.
 could buy parts of the UK.
 Tesco may close Blinkbox if a buyer isn’t found, the London-based Times reported last month.
 Democratic senators including Carl Levin of Michigan and Charles Schumer of New York have proposed bills that would limit companies from inverting by buying smaller companies, something that the Treasury rules don’t prohibit.
 Electrolux last month agreed to buy General Electric Co’s appliances business for $33 billion, putting the maker of AEG stoves and Frigidaire refrigerators on a par with main rival Whirlpool Corp, with both companies chalking up revenue exceeding $20 billion.
 and TPG Capital in a record $48 billion leveraged buyout.
 It will provide as much as $105 million of similar loans to fund a buyback of bonds.
 A share buyback of as much as $20 million is also planned.
 In May, Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy the Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas hotel and casino for $173 billion from Deutsche Bank AG, which sought to end its money-losing foray into casino development.
 In 2013, the company raised $44 billion to buy commercial real estate around the world.
 The chain is planning to offer its shareholders $625 million of 8 percent unsecured notes due 2019 plus warrants to buy additional shares, according to a statement today.
 “It doesn’t solve all the liquidity problems, but it buys the company six to nine months” Chris Brathwaite, a Sears spokesman, declined to comment.
 The warrants allow shareholders to buy additional stock for five years at $2841, the closing price last week.
 and HSBC Holdings Plc cut theirratings on MTS to a hold from buy last month, pushing bullishrecommendations on the stock to the lowest level in a decade,data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 A total of 10 analyst have abuy recommendation on the stock and 14 recommend to hold it.
 The BOJ, which buys about 7 trillion yen ($65 billion) of government bonds a month, kept its asset-purchase stimulus program unchanged after a meeting today.
 Overseas holdings in several of Vietnam’s biggest companies have reached the legal limit of 49 percent, making it difficult for international investors to buy all the shares they want.
 Exchange Merger While international investors have been net buyers of Vietnamese stocks for almost nine straight years, inflows through yesterday totaled just $2275 million.
 They raised their recommendation to buy from neutral and increased their target price to 19 pesos from 17 pesos.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- The question of what counts as high-speed Internet service is emerging as a sticking point in Comcast Corp’s bid to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 McMillon said stores need to boost in-stock levels -- a measure of the merchandise available on shelves for customers to buy.
 Global merger transactions increased 29 percent in the third quarter from a year earlier to about $886 billion, driven in part by European companies buying US.
 The dividend was increased to 28 cents, and the buyback authorization rose to a maximum of $350 million, which “provides the flexibility to offset a significant portion of the equity granted in the ISI acquisition,” the firm said in the statement.
 to seek a buyer for one of its businesses as JDS pursues a plan to separate into two publicly traded companies, people with knowledge of the situation said.
 “The JDSU board of directors and management team are committed to acting in the best interests of stockholders, and continually review strategic priorities and opportunities” The optical-equipment business may attract buyers such as Avago Technologies Ltd.
 National Commercial Bank said that at the end of yesterday investors had agreed to buy just over 10 percent of its $6 billion share sale.
 in London with a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note to clients.
 “Gross’s new fund needs to build a good track record” Weil has raised the firm’s profile in the past month, hiring Gross and agreeing to buy VelocityShares to expand in exchange-traded products.
 The firm is expanding its presence in exchange-traded products by buying the parent company of VelocityShares, which offers products including ETFs and notes that track swings in market volatility.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Rio Tinto Group may decide that its best defense against another takeover approach from Glencore Plc is buying the largest mining company in the US.
 held talks to buy Salix Pharmaceuticals Ltd.
 The company, with mines in the Americas, Indonesia and the Democratic Republic of Congo, diversified into oil and gas last year after buying two energy companies for about $9 billion.
 Gait recommends buying Rio shares.
 In August 2007, a proposal allowing mainland investors tobuy equities in Hong Kong sent the Hang Seng Index (HSI) up 60 percentover three months before the plan was abandoned during theglobal financial crisis.
 Citgo said in a July 29 filing that state-owned oil company Petroleos de Venezuela SA was looking for a buyer, threatening to undermine bondholders and other creditors by removing a sovereign asset that could be seized in the US.
 “Those are issues more on the minds of potential buyers than the price of oil” West Texas Intermediate for December delivery fell close to a two-year low of $8101 a barrel on the New York Mercantile Exchange on Oct.
 Foreigners’ buying of medium- to long-term Japanese bonds fell to 4186 billion yen last week, from 8163 billion yen in the previous period.
 Norwegian Krone Norway’s krone fell versus most major peers as Finance Minister Siv Jensen said its strength won’t last after the central bank said it will buy back the currency for the first time as part of an effort to manage the nation’s oil revenue.
 The Bank of Japan, which meets next week, is buying 60 trillion yen ($550 billion) to 70 trillion yen of assets a year to help spur inflation.
 “French companies are now thinking twice before buying US.
 to buy Snapchat for $3 billion.
 Federal Reserve’s policy of buying bonds.
 Einhorn, president of Greenlight Capital Inc, yesterday recommended investors buy renewable power companies TerraForm Power Inc.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Greece’s bonds rose, with 10-year yields dropping the most in almost a month, on speculation the European Central Bank will take steps to ensure it’s able to buy Greek and Cypriot loans as part of its stimulus efforts.
 The ECB’s executive board will propose changing requirements on the quality of assets it’s allowed to hold so it can buy some Greek and Cypriot asset-backed securities, the Financial Times reported today.
 The report that “the ECB will also buy senior tranches of Greek and Cypriot ABS below the investment-grade threshold holds the potential to reverse the recent pronounced underperformance” of Greek bonds, Alexander Aldinger and Benjamin Schroeder, interest-rate analysts at Commerzbank AG in Frankfurt, wrote in a note today.
 “Still, it remains questionable whether the ECB will indeed buy assets which are even not eligible in their other operations” Greek 10-year yields fell 15 basis points, or 015 percentage point, to 648 percent at 4:52 pm.
 16 (Bloomberg) -- Prologis Inc, the world’s biggest industrial-building owner, is increasing construction of warehouses in Europe as growing demand for goods sold online supports more development without tenants or buyers in place.
 in New York who has a buy rating on the stock.
 stocks tumbled today amid concern over economic growth in Europe and geopolitical turmoil as the Federal Reserve prepares to end its bond-buying program.
 Smith says buy.
 17 (Bloomberg) -- Vivendi SA’s Canal Plus pay-television unit and its co-investor in Poland ITI Group are considering a sale of their majority stake in Polish broadcaster TVN SA after being contacted by potential buyers.
 Louis who rates the shares as buy, wrote in an Oct.
 In December, 3M raised its dividend 35 percent and unveiled a plan to spend as much as $10 billion on acquisitions through 2017 and buy back $22 billion of stock.
 Volatility leads to increased trading as clients buy hedges or make bets against further moves.
 “EasyJet is becoming more and more of a mainstream airline,” said Gert Zonneveld, a London-based analyst at Panmure Gordon with a “buy” recommendation on the stock.
 in 2001, said in November 2012 that he was short Petrobras, as the Rio de Janeiro-based producer is known, saying that investors buying the stock risk subsidizing failed government policies.
 In a short sale, an investor sells borrowed shares to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back cheaper and pocket the difference.
 land drillers to buy from neutral today, saying a recent sell-off in stocks was “overdone” At $80 oil, “the rig count is flat,” she said in an e-mailed research note today.
 Better finances for consumers, very good jobs growth and you’ve got more money in consumers’ pockets because of lower gasoline prices” The lowest costs at the gas pump in four years and the biggest payroll gains in more than a decade are projected to lift buying power and household purchases heading into the holiday-shopping season.
 The company will buy a power company in the year starting April 1, and will add 1,800 megawatts of capacity by March, Chairman Arup Roy Choudhury said in Mumbai after market hours yesterday.
 The stock was reduced to neutral from buy at Citigroup, according to a note dated yesterday.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Poland wants to buy cruise missiles from the US.
 Using options allowed Pershing Square to skirt rules requiring government approval to buy more than $75 million of a company ‘‘with an intent to influence control of the business,’’ Ackman told Bloomberg TV.
 Ackman said at the time that he was ‘‘helping facilitate a transaction between two companies for the benefit of the shareholders’’ Valeant, based in Laval, Quebec, wants to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The company this year agreed to buy hotel and restaurant software company Micros Systems Inc.
 As stocks and some corporate bonds fell last week, some hedge-fund managers said higher capital requirements had curbed Wall Street trading desks’ ability to cushion the declines by stepping in to buy securities -- what is known as providing liquidity.
 “It’s a very good thing we don’t have AIGs that are willing to provide lots of liquidity and are buying this stuff now, so we won’t have to bail them out one day,” said Barney Frank, the former Massachusetts congressman who was a co-author of the Dodd-Frank Act.
 It’s more about dealers trying to avoid losses they’d probably incur if they need to go back in and buy at a higher price later.
 Swiss Re in June agreed to buy the UK.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Vice Media Inc, the online news outlet that reports from remote corners of the globe, plans to stay independent and won’t seek a buyer in the near term, Chief Executive Officer Shane Smith said.
 Subscription Video Former Viacom CEO Tom Freston, an adviser to Vice, identified Internet-delivered video as the growth area for the media industry, saying Netflix Inc’s streaming service enticed consumers to buy subscription-based online video, he said.
 York Capital Management LP’s Jamie Dinan echoed Robbins’ view, saying in an interview at the conference he would love to see Actavis buy Allergan.
 AT&T Inc, which is buying DirecTV said it looks forward to continuing to work closely with HBO.
 central bank ended bond-buying as growth accelerated.
 Julian Robertson, the billionaire founder of Tiger Management LLC, called Japan’s added bond-buying “dangerous” “The stimulus is more positive for equities and it’s creating flows out of fixed-income,” said Guy LeBas, chief fixed-income strategist at Janney Montgomery Scott LLC in Philadelphia, which manages $61 billion in assets.
 Futures Bets Investors in Treasury futures were whipsawed in the past week after adding to wagers that two-year notes would gain just before the Federal Reserve sent prices lower by ending bond buying and saying the labor market was improving.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Archer-Daniels-Midland Co, the world’s largest corn processor, agreed to buy a distributor of nut and fruit products for $170 million to expand its new food-ingredients business unit.
 At the four-day Mipcom event in Cannes, content peddlers and buyers will hear from love-him-or-hate-him TV host and talent-show mogul Simon Cowell, as well as Ted Sarandos, the chief content officer leading Netflix Inc.
 “What’s My Line?” and “Name That Tune” joined a slew of shows that appeared in the ’50s as more people had the means to buy a TV set.
 One way of gauging market sentiment is to compare how much it costs to buy options that protect against losses in shares this month versus those timed to expire in 90 days.
 Couple these market-positive technical indicators with economic data that has come in better than expected and you have a buying opportunity, according to John Canally of LPL Financial Corp.
 “The market has a buy-the-dip mentality right now,” Canally, an economic strategist at LPL Financial in Boston, said in a phone interview.
 companies seek to lower their tax bill moving their legal address abroad, often after buying a foreign company.
 The idea of it, as described by Lukanyo Mnyanda in today’s Mortgages column, seems laudable in that (for those allergic to the topic of wealth inequality, cover your ears) it would shift taxation away from the poorest Scots and increase it on those buying and selling million-pound properties.
 23 (Bloomberg) -- Aaron Cowen, founder of Suvretta Capital Management LLC, said he likes shares of Liberty Global Plc because of its position in the German market and as competitors may seek to buy the company.
 Cowen told attendees that the burger company could continue to buy other franchise businesses to expand its global reach.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- SHV Holdings NV, a Dutch investment company, agreed to buy animal-feed maker Nutreco NV for about 27 billion euros ($34 billion), prompting some analysts to say a higher rival bid could be possible.
 “Another scenario that can not be ruled out is one in which several parties would team up in an effort to launch a competing offer that involves a breakup of Nutreco in fish feed, animal feed and Spain,” Maarten Bakker, an Amsterdam-based analyst at ABN Amro with a buy recommendation on the stock, said in a note to investors.
 “We would not be surprised if there could be other financial buyers being interested in Nutreco” The offer is a “fair price at an attractive premium,” Chief Executive Officer Knut Nesse said on a call with journalists.
 “Based on new calculations, we expect operating profit to be as much as 200 billion won lower than the consensus,” said Nam, who has a buy recommendation on the stock and a 290,000 won price target.
 Stake Buyback Separately, the Korea Exchange today asked Hyundai to clarify a media report that it may buy back General Electric Co’s stakes in affiliates Hyundai Capital Services Inc.
 Hyundai hired JPMorgan as it considers buying the stakes, which may be worth as much as 2 trillion won, MoneyToday reported earlier.
 Both Hyundai Card and Hyundai Capital provide financing for buyers of Hyundai vehicles.
 The market is “wary of potential cash expenditure” by Hyundai Motor even though buying back the stakes will help improve the company’s earnings in the future, said Shin Chung Kwan, an analyst at KB Investment & Securities Co.
 After court, Straub said in an interview that he was considering buying another property in the resort town.
 They’re poised to spend $914 billion on share buybacks and dividends this year, or about 95 percent of earnings, data compiled by Bloomberg and S&P Dow Jones Indices show.
 “Companies have done about all that they can in terms of maximizing the ability to do those buybacks” S&P 500 constituents will probably say earnings rose 49 percent in the third quarter when they begin reporting results this week, according to more than 10,000 analyst estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 While the ratio to earnings shows how buybacks and dividends compare to past economic expansions, it doesn’t indicate companies are struggling to fund them.
 That compares with total buybacks and dividends of about $235 billion, assuming repurchases estimated by Silverblatt are evenly divided between the third and fourth quarters.
 It can bounce around here and there, but it doesn’t go much above that” Aging Plants Excluding the recession years 2001 and 2008, dividends and stock buybacks have represented, on average, 85 percent of corporate earnings since 1998.
 The last time payouts exceeded income in 2007, the buyback index fell 47 percent, compared with a 35 percent gain in the S&P 500.
 CEOs have increased the proportion of cash flow allocated to stock buybacks to more than 30 percent, almost double where it was in 2002, data from Barclays show.
 added 15 cents, or 7 percent, to its EPS in the latest quarter through buybacks.
 In August, the Sunnyvale, California-based maker of networking equipment said it will complete $2 billion of buybacks by the end of this year, achieving the target earlier than expected.
 “We obviously have accelerated our buyback not just because of the cash results, but also because of the opportunistic nature of the capital returns that we’re doing at the moment” Juniper Networks offered buybacks equivalent to 109 percent of its stock price over the 12 months through June, more than double its earnings yield of 396 percent, data compiled by Bloomberg and S&P show.
 “It’s going to be harder and harder to justify using that capital to buy back stocks at record highs,” Tim Courtney, who helps oversee about $13 billion as chief investment officer of Exencial Wealth Advisors, said in a phone interview from Oklahoma City on Oct.
 You don’t want to run it into the ground and then try and sell it because then nobody’s going to buy it.
 When you get these shock pieces of news the understandable initial reaction seems to be sell and don’t buy until you’ve got some certainty around what’s going on” Ticket Transparency The decision to remove ticketing from the sites was made due to EDreams “not fulfilling its obligation to transparently report total ticket prices to clients from the start of the booking process,” Iberia said today in an e-mailed statement.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Anadolu Endustri Holding AS, the owner of stakes in Turkey’s biggest brewer and Coca-Cola Co’s local business, offered to buy 4025 percent of Migros Ticaret AS in a transaction that values the second-biggest Turkish retailer at 46 billion liras ($2 billion).
 “Anadolu is buying an insurance against further curbs on alcohol sales, hence the premium,” said Murat Gulkan, an analyst at Unlu & Co.
 Alfa Bank yesterday cut the stock to the equivalent of hold from buy, saying the weaker currency will lead to “microscopic” earnings of 6 billion rubles ($1419 million) because of a 130 billion-ruble loss on its mostly foreign-denominated bonds.
 “While sanctions don’t seem to bite that much at the moment, the company will probably feel the impact of the restrictions as time goes on” Kokin has a hold recommendation on Rosneft and a buy on Lukoil.
 The market is the only place where traders can buy or sell futures on the VIX, a widely followed benchmark tracking price swings in the US.
 Alibaba Investment An unrestricted share class of the Advantage funds that can buy new issues bucked the rest of the funds in September mainly because of an investment in Alibaba Group Holding Ltd, one of the people said.
 “Everybody will have their own saga as to why they should only cut from a more theoretical level, and I don’t think the Saudis are going to buy into that” OPEC isn’t engaged in a price war, according to the group’s Secretary-General Abdalla El-Badri.
 agreed to buy the project from EDF last month.
 “Declining demand in the paper market was already evident when BASF decided to buy Ciba,” said Lars Hettche, an analyst at Bankhaus Metzler, who rates the shares buy.
 Units with about 5 billion euros in annual sales could be exited and the cash used for bolt-on acquisitions or a share buyback, said Pandya, who rates BASF stock hold.
 “When your operating ratio is improving and you are buying back a ton of your stock, there’s really nothing here telling me that the story is getting incrementally worse,” Jeff Nelson, an Edward Jones & Co.
 15 (Bloomberg) -- Ingredion Inc, a maker of high-fructose corn syrup, agreed to buy Penford Corp.
 The fraud suit was filed as a proposed class action on behalf of buyers and users of the gowns.
 “It might be too early to buy Macau casino stocks,” Yip said by phone.
 “You see pent-up demand for loans” The ECB has also said it plans to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities to stimulate the European economy.
 Another accord, also signed last year, called for Rostekhnologii to buy as many as 100 Q400 turboprop aircraft valued at about $34 billion, based on list prices.
 have relied on asset sales and spinoffs to fund share buybacks and boost returns.
 The bank decided to force those clients to sell their assets and then buy new UBS funds holding securities to avoid the reporting requirements under the QI agreement, Schumacher said.
 “Given the way earnings are being downgraded, it may be too early to buy the stock,” Alan Richardson, whose Samsung Asean Equity Fund outperformed 96 percent of peers tracked by Bloomberg during the past five years, said by phone from Hong Kong.
 Even if the shares fell another 20 percent, it will still be more or less trading at the market’s multiple” While most analysts recommend buying or holding Genting, the shares yesterday traded at S$114, a 19 percent discount to the consensus price target.
 “Customers can push out a project, and it’s not a big deal for the customer, but it can be a huge deal for a supplier like EZchip” Lower Expectations Schreiner downgraded his recommendation on Yokneam, Israel-based EZchip to buy from strong buy on Oct.
 Five of nine analysts still have a buy rating on the stock, with four rating it hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Schreiner, who has had a buy rating on EZchip since August 2012, said those concerns are misplaced.
 31 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks rose to a four-week high amid optimism the Bank of Japan’s stimulus will fill some of the gap left by the end of Federal Reserve bond buying.
 Danone added 29 percent to 5422 euros after agreeing to buy a 25 percent stake in Yashili International Holdings Ltd, a Chinese infant milk-formula maker.
 Last month, he also announced a $4 billion share buyback to reward investors after the stock of the $42 billion sales company underperformed rivals such as Siemens AG and General Electric Co.
 “We buy the stock now as order momentum is improving” The stock was up 23 percent as of 9:03 am.
 29 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV plans to spin off Ferrari to help raise about $47 billion needed to counter mounting debt, giving investors a rare chance to buy into one of the most storied names in the automotive industry.
 “The likelihood of Allergan buying Salix is becoming more distant,” Neil Maruoka, a Toronto-based analyst at Canaccord Genuity Corp, wrote in a Sept.
 “Actavis is a much more logical buyer” A representative for Allergan declined to comment, referring to the company’s Sept.
 And whichever companies are left out of this round could wind up as either buyers or targets in the next.
 Actavis was also said to be interested in buying Allergan and approached the company in August with an offer that wasn’t much higher than Valeant’s, a person with knowledge of the matter said earlier this month.
 Shareholder Voices Allergan shareholder Pentwater Capital Management LP last week urged the company to engage Valeant or other possible suitors before buying Salix.
 New home values fell in August as tight credit damped demand even after local restrictions on home buying were eased.
 The company originally planned to spend 10 billion yuan ($163 billion) to buy 1,000 megawatts of solar capacity and now says it may buy as little as 500 megawatts.
 The company runs the Mycom portal, started last year to offer mobile games and communications apps to a global audience, and spent $147 billion last month to buy the remaining shares in VKontakte, Russia’s biggest social network.
 HTC’s mid- and low-end phones released in China face competition from devices by Xiaomi and Huawei Technologies Co, while the introduction of Apple Inc’s iPhone 6 models attracted high-end buyers.
 Two of 32 analysts surveyed by Bloomberg recommend buying the stock, while 22 advise selling.
 24, the biggest jump since July 2013, as buyers balked at the lower rates.
 In 2012, a spinoff of Assya Compagnie Financiere enabled Leyne to buy out its asset-management business in countries from Switzerland to Monaco to Israel.
 companies are hiring and consumers are buying goods and services big and small, helping strengthen a recovering economy and fueling demand for a new generation of SUVs of all sizes.
 rooftop developer agreed in June to buy Silevo Inc, a maker of high-efficiency solar panels for about $200 million.
 Peters, Missouri-based SunEdison as a potential “winner” in the solar industry today, and recommended buying the shares.
 It will also buy shipbuilding assets from Yangzhou Kejin Shipyard Co.
 The index had tumbled 74 percent from its September record on concerns that Europe will slip into a recession and that growth was slowing in China just as the Federal Reserve ends its monthly bond buying.
 Cooperation is also being sought from local governments and private companies to monitor buying of homes and vehicles, he said.
 climbed 43 percent, as companies continued to buy updated machines for new employees or upgrade systems from older ones running Microsoft Corp’s Windows XP software, said Jay Chou, an analyst at IDC.
 “There are a number of companies refreshing or buying additional PCs,” Chou said in an interview.
 Louis Fed Bank President James Bullard said the central bank should consider delaying the end to its bond-buying program as concern abounds that slowing growth in the rest of the world will weigh on the US.
 “The miss in equities and investment banking is related to Barclays’s specific problems,” said Joseph Dickerson, an analyst at Jefferies Group LLC in London with a buy rating on the stock.
 exchange-traded funds that buy Brazilian equities, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 L’Oreal USA Inc, a unit of Paris-based L’Oreal SA, will buy the Carol’s Daughter business.
 After two years of losing money, hog producers are getting a boost from record corn and soybean harvests just as tight meat supplies send pork and bacon prices to all-time highs and erode profit for buyers including Hormel Foods Corp.
 “Pork is going to be a better buy for consumers in 2015, without a doubt,” said Steve Meyer, the president of Adel, Iowa-based Paragon.
 Third Point, which is run by billionaire Daniel Loeb, held conversations and meetings with Sijbesma upon buying a stake, according to two people, who asked not to be identified as the matter is not public.
 agreed to buy DramaFever Corp, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers, adding to the Japanese carrier’s spate of online content acquisitions.
 customers buy Sunday Ticket, which starts at $3999 a month.
 With a wider choice of other beverages to buy, beer has lost some of its status.
 Changing Perceptions German brewers -- who are currently celebrating Munich’s Oktoberfest, the industry’s highpoint of the year -- are hoping specialty beers can help change perceptions and lure back buyers year round.
 The Treasury Department announced its crackdown on tax inversions the day before CF and Yara said they were in talks about a “merger of equals” The CF-Yara deal “was a head-scratcher from the get-go,” Gulley, who recommends buying CF and doesn’t have a rating on Yara, said by phone yesterday.
 The company plans to boost profits further in 2015 after agreeing to buy more than 45,000 apartments this year.
 Medtronic in Minneapolis offered to buy the Dublin-headquartered device maker for more than $42 billion in June.
 The spread has averaged 81 percent since the company agreed in June to buy Covidien in cash and stock and shift its legal address from Minnesota to Ireland.
 firms buy foreign companies and shift their headquarters overseas to benefit from lower tax rates.
 “We believe by joining forces we’ll create a more vibrant market place, we’ll create more liquidity for our buyers, we’ll create a better audience for our sellers,” Naspers Chief Executive Officer Bob van Dijk said on a conference call today.
 TPG sought a buyer for the stake after China Grand Automotive scrapped plans for a Hong Kong initial public offering twice since 2010, the person said.
 Scientific Games, which also makes lottery systems, can use the cost benefits from the $51 billion deal with Bally and a previous acquisition to pay extra interest to bond buyers without reducing the combined company’s expected cash flow, according to Bloomberg Intelligence analyst Noel Hebert.
 The newly discovered savings will make the bond issue more attractive by reducing Scientific Games’s leverage after high-yield buyers balked at taking most of $345 billion of bridge loans off underwriters’ hands last month.
 “That might change some investors’ appetite for buying the deal” Investors will also focus on the ability to achieve the cost savings because they impact free-cash flow, the amount of money the company generates from operations before interest and capital expenditures.
 Ineos founder Jim Ratcliffe has built one of the world’s top 10 chemical companies in revenue in under 20 years by buying up petrochemical and plastics operations from companies including BASF SE and BP Plc.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Visa Inc, the world’s biggest payments network, said it may have to pay more than $10 billion to buy Visa Europe Ltd.
 Telefonica in August agreed to buy Brazilian broadband provider GVT for about $9 billion, and last month completed the takeover of German wireless carrier E-Plus.
 “The early repayment means they can fuel up their game -- they can now focus on internal issues rather than meeting external requirements,” said Lemer Salah, an Amsterdam-based analyst at SNS Securities with a buy recommendation on the shares.
 The company is also looking for acquisitions in Asia after putting most of its physical assets in Russia up for sale in October, seven months after the Swedish billionaire agreed to buy the 44 percent stake of fellow Gunvor co-founder Gennady Timchenko.
 After a $52 billion deal to buy Shire Plc collapsed last month, approval of the drugs would help the company reduce its dependence on Humira, the rheumatoid arthritis injection that makes up more than half of its sales.
 Love also said the company that manufactured the mesh Boston Scientific used in its Obtryx had warned buyers of its product not to use it for medical applications.
 While the securities rebounded in the years that followed, the market remained illiquid, with wide spreads between bids from buyers and offers from sellers.
 “They are doing well on monetization through mobile advertising,” said Cheng Cheng, an analyst at Pacific Crest Securities LLC who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock.
 funds that buy junk bonds this week, the biggest increase this year, according to Lipper data.
 “Consumers buy the hardware so they can play the software,” Fils-Aime said.
 An Ivanhoe venture last week agreed to buy Manhattan’s 1095 Avenue of the Americas, a 42-story office tower on Bryant Park, from Blackstone Group LP for about $225 billion, according to two people with knowledge of the transaction.
 agreed to buy a rival Mexican mobile-phone operator, solidifying the US.
 AT&T was among potential buyers contacted about America Movil’s assets, according to people familiar with the matter, a deal that would further pit the partners of 24 years against each other.
 AT&T is already buying DirecTV, a move that aligns it with one of Slim’s fiercest Mexican rivals, Grupo Televisa SAB.
 AT&T is gaining 86 million subscribers by buying closely held Iusacell from billionaire Ricardo Salinas.
 AT&T was among the companies that America Movil reached out to about buying $175 billion of Mexican assets, people with knowledge of the matter said in September.
 America Movil has said the buyer needs to be new to the Mexican market to create more competition.
 The question is whether regulators would be amenable to AT&T being the buyer of America Movil’s assets.
 DirecTV, which AT&T is still waiting on regulatory approval to buy, has a 41 percent stake in Sky Mexico.
 The company is now buying coal to run the plants.
 The ECB will start buying asset-backed securities this week as part of stimulus plans that already include covered-bond purchases, long-term loans to banks and record-low interest rates.
 Potential buyers include private-equity led groups including Blackstone Group LP with Cinven Ltd.
 Holcim and Lafarge plan to complete the selection of buyers by late 2014 or early 2015, Fontana said in an interview today.
 She has long-term buy recommendation on the bank’s London-traded stock.
 He has a buy recommendation on the Moscow-traded shares.
 agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 45 planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviation services unit to enter aircraft leasing.
 that will buy an additional 15 planes for $7335 million, according to the company’s filing to Hong Kong’s stock exchange yesterday evening.
 Cheung Kong said in August it was seeking to buy planes from Terra Firma Capital Partners Ltd’s Awas arm to quickly build a major presence in the business.
 Bank of China Cheung Kong, through unit Accipiter Holdings Ltd, will buy 18 planes from units of GE Capital Aviation Services Ltd.
 Accipiter will buy an additional three 737-800s from GE affiliates for $1012 million.
 Cheung Kong agreed to buy 10 planes from Bank of China Ltd’s BOC Aviation Pte.
 4 that it had submitted a preliminary, non-binding proposal to buy planes from lessor Awas, without providing details.
 of China, is in talks with “relevant parties” to buy Dublin-based aircraft-leasing firm Avolon Holdings Ltd.
 Airlines globally will buy aircraft worth $44 trillion in the next two decades as more Indians and Chinese fly, Airbus said last year.
 Short sellers sell borrowed shares in anticipation of a decline in price that allows them to buy an equal amount of stock at a lower cost at some point in the future Sino-Forest Corp, a Chinese tree-plantation company, filed for bankruptcy protection in Canada in 2012 after Muddy Waters said in a June 2011 report the company overstated its assets.
 Activists often agitate for steps such as a sale, restructuring or increased dividends and share buybacks.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 Valeant could seek to acquire Zoetis if it can’t get Allergan, or it may try to buy both, the Wall Street Journal reported yesterday, citing people familiar with the matter.
 “We think, in a sense, it’s branded generic products sold directly to the physicians and it’s consistent with sort of the buy-and-build model that we like,” he told analysts on a conference call.
 “But obviously we have to find an asset at the right price because we will not overpay for anything” Tax Savings Zoetis and Valeant would be able to achieve tax savings together, and Valeant would make sense as a buyer because it looks for cash-generating businesses with low research spending requirements, said Alex Arfaei, an analyst at BMO Capital Markets, in a research note yesterday.
 The restriction only applies to potential acquirers who had considered buying Zoetis prior to its separation, which doesn’t include Valeant, according to Evercore ISI analyst Umer Raffat.
 “They may rely on more funding from BNDES in the short term, but will have to come to markets to continue funding its investment plan” Petrobras has relied on overseas bond buyers for more financing than any company in emerging markets in the past three years, raising $445 billion since 2011.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- JBS SA, the world’s biggest meat producer, said it plans to increase exports to Asia after paying A$145 billion ($13 billion) to buy Primo Group, the largest producer of ham and bacon in Australia and New Zealand.
 Separately, JBS said yesterday it agreed to buy a Brazilian poultry business for $169 million.
 While commodities may be trading at five-year lows, the heads of three top miners BHP Billiton Ltd, Vale SA and Rio Tinto Group last week all backed China, the world’s second-biggest economy, to keep buying increasing amounts of their products deep into the next decade.
 The companies provide liquidity to the mortgage market by buying loans and packaging them into guaranteed securities.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Salesforcecom Inc, which has agreed to lease what will be San Francisco’s tallest office tower, now plans to buy its first building in the city to expand its headquarters.
 Salesforce, the biggest maker of customer-management software, is buying the property for flexibility to add amenities as it centers its headquarters campus on three buildings at the corner of Fremont and Mission streets, said Burke Norton, chief legal officer.
 TIAA-CREF TIAA-CREF remains an active buyer of office, retail and apartment properties in the area, Lynette Pineda, a senior director at the company’s global real estate unit, said in the statement.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- EnerNOC Inc, a company that helps utilities reduce power demand during peak hours, rose the most in a week after buying an energy software company.
 Policy makers said last week they were ending the third round of bond-buying.
 agreed to buy Conning Holdings Corp, adding almost $92 billion in assets under management.
 Aquiline struck a deal in 2009 to buy Conning from Swiss Re AG.
 The ECB began buying asset-backed securities today, a spokesman said.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Eldorado Gold Corp, the largest foreign producer of the precious metal in China, is seeking a buyer for its mines in the country as part of a dual-track sale process, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Exploring both a sale and an IPO, known as a dual-track process, can help propel a deal by pressuring buyers to act before a stock offering puts the company in public investors’ hands.
 Strict lending rules and slow wage growth have hampered first-time buyers, prompting builders to cater instead to upper-income customers who are able to get financing or pay cash.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Onex Corp, Canada’s largest buyout firm, said European market volatility is creating opportunities for acquisitions as companies there back away from initial public offerings.
 Onex has become a seller more than a buyer this year amid persistently high valuations, resulting in a record number of realizations on its investments during the quarter and year-to-date, the firm said.
 Onex did manage to make its first major acquisition of the year in July when it agreed to buy York Risk Services Group Inc, which provides risk management, insurance claims and managed-care services for $133 billion.
 dollar amid bets the Fed will raise interest rates next year while policy makers in Japan and Europe embrace bond-buying programs to pump money into their slumping economies.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Mercedes-Benz is reviving the Maybach name for a second time to challenge Rolls-Royce and Bentley for the world’s wealthiest auto buyers.
 As an independent brand, Maybach -- named after an early collaborator of Gottlieb Daimler, one of the automaker’s founders -- failed to mount a serious challenge for ultra-luxury buyers because it lacked global name recognition.
 “Given the lower benchmark interest rates here and the outlook for interest rates, it makes sense for companies to issue in euros,” said Jon Brager, a senior credit analyst at Hermes Investment Management, which oversees $45 billion and didn’t buy Apple’s notes.
 Apple’s euro bond offering will be used for share buybacks, dividends and other business purposes, according to a prospectus filed by the Cupertino, California-based company yesterday.
 The company has been pushed by activist investor Carl Icahn to accelerate its share buyback program and boost the value of the stock.
 in London which didn’t buy Apple’s bonds.
 The slowdown has been caused by “a mixture of bad weather conditions in Europe -- it’s been too warm for the fall selection -- and the geopolitical situation,” said Volker Bosse, an analyst at Baader Bank near Munich, who recommends buying the shares.
 The law says people qualify for tax credits when they buy insurance on an online marketplace “established by the state” Those words are significant because only 14 states have set up their own marketplaces, known as exchanges.
 The question is whether people can collect the subsidies even if they buy policies on the federal exchange.
 is “going very well,” with lots of interest from different types of buyers, Jeff Bell, interim chief financial officer, said on a conference call, without elaborating.
 Earlier this year, Blackstone agreed to buy Frankfurt’s MesseTurm, once Europe’s tallest tower, for about 250 million euros, according to a person with knowledge of the deal who declined to be named because the sale is private.
 “Demand in Frankfurt is very high and it’s coming from a wide range of buyers,” said Sven Carstensen, a Frankfurt office analyst at Bulwiengesa AG.
 Spending more to improve quality isn’t always an easy option, either: the average airline flight in 2013 made about enough profit per passenger to buy a sandwich, according to International Air Transport Association CEO Tony Tyler.
 GIC, Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund, agreed to buy about $100 million of stock in the company’s Hong Kong share sale, the people said.
 also agreed to buy shares in the offering, the people said.
 owner of single-tenant buildings, sued investment partner RCS Capital Corp, alleging it wrongly terminated an agreement to buy a business.
 RCS agreed to buy American Realty’s private-capital management business, Cole Capital, for at least $700 million then reneged on the deal, the real estate investment trust said in a complaint filed yesterday in Delaware Chancery Court in Wilmington.
 Faux Leather With leather accounting for as much as 60 percent of the cost to make a bag, shoe or boot, buyers will start switching to other materials including canvas or imitation leather, said Ken Maxfield, president of The Maxfield Report, a hide-market publication based in Sergeant Bluff, Iowa.
 “The buyer is getting more for their money right now, and it’s enabling buyers to stretch a little further and say, I can do a leather interior or a luxury car” Adding leather seats to a car costs about $1,400, said Gonzalo Morales, a manager at Grossinger Toyota, a dealership in Chicago.
 Ownership of put options conveying the right to sell an exchange-traded fund tracking retail stocks has fallen to the lowest since May compared with calls giving the right to buy.
 The activist investor has been agitating behind the scenes since at least July for a spinoff of VMware and for EMC to seek strategic buyers for its remaining businesses, people familiar with the matter have said.
 is eliminating about 1,000 jobs through buyout offers to employees, according to a person with knowledge of the plan.
 Kim has a “buy” recommendation on the shares.
 Bought Veritas AMG in April agreed to buy a majority stake in Veritas Asset Management LLP, a global equity manager with $17 billion in assets.
 because they get paid rebates they wouldn’t otherwise receive domestically, said Robert Young, chief executive officer at Liquidnet Canada, a Canadian marketplace that facilitates trading between buyers and sellers.
 Amadeus is coming to the market as Spanish government bonds rally, with yields on the 10-year note falling below 2 percent for the first time amid speculation the European Central Bank will buy sovereign debt to stimulate the region’s economy.
 in Hong Kong who previously lost money buying shares in Thailand’s Nok Airlines Pcl.
 Bangkok Air plans to use the money to buy 18 new planes, mounting competition for regional rivals like Thai Airways International Pcl and Singapore Airlines Ltd.
 He bought the carrier’s shares, which he said ended up being “a value trap” and “a mistake” Richardson didn’t participate in the Bangkok Air IPO as “I can probably buy cheaper six months later when all the euphoria would have faded,” he said.
 ARM won’t seek to grow its cash pile, planning instead an increase in dividends and extra returns possibly through share buybacks, he said.
 “We’ve had buybacks in the past.
 “More consumers will be buying ARM-based devices next year than they did this year” ARM shares rose 1 percent to 893 pence in London trading today, paring the decline to 19 percent this year.
 While banks including Morgan Stanley and UBS AG recommended cheaper Shanghai shares after the exchange connect was announced in April, their discounts have vanished before most foreign money managers get the chance to buy.
 “Eligible buyers tend to get front-run by the institutions that are already in position to take advantage” Volume Surge Bank of China Ltd, the nation’s fourth-biggest lender, paced gains among dual-listed Shanghai stocks yesterday, surging 10 percent.
 Robeco, which oversees about $250 billion worldwide, said in July it was using its quota under China’s Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program to buy yuan-denominated A shares with dual listings in the consumer and industrial sectors.
 The $64 billion QFII program has allowed professional money managers to buy local securities since 2002, while a similar system using offshore yuan began in 2011.
 Repsol SA scrapped a takeover bid for Talisman because it couldn’t find buyers for properties it didn’t want including in the North Sea, people with knowledge of the talks said in August.
 Salazar, a 28-year-old videographer in San Antonio, paid$8,000 in 2010 to buy his used HHR, which he said was good forhauling his film gear.
 Treasury’sprice for buying the revamped automaker’s stock.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- JPMorgan Chase & Co, the biggest arranger of corporate debt this year, raised Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd’s debt to buy, saying the South African utility’s yields are attractive and betting its rating won’t be cut further.
 CGG couldalso attract interest from other buyers, the people said.
 At the same time, wage growth has been lackluster and property values have climbed, making homeownership prohibitively expensive for some first-time buyers.
 “Members in many areas of the country continue to see increasing buyer traffic and signed contracts” Readings greater than 50 mean more respondents report good market conditions.
 A gauge of prospective buyer traffic climbed to 45 from 41, while the six-month sales outlook rose to 66 in November from 64.
 The challenge for builders has been rising prices and stricter lending standards, particularly for first-time buyers.
 More than 30 percent of business at the Westlake Village, California-based builder is entry-level buyers, he said.
 “Sometimes you might write a contract three times on a house before you get one person to the finish line who can actually buy the house” “The recovery is not going quite as quick as we anticipated,” he said.
 Louis who rates EOG a buy.
 “We have already seen that recently in the oil services space” Halliburton Co, the world’s second-biggest oilfield services provider, this month agreed to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 The team is looking at a lot of things” Old Mutual this year completed an initial public offering for its asset management unit in New York and agreed to buy UK-based Quilter Cheviot Ltd.
 Former Owners Sistema spent $26 billion from 2005 to 2009 buying its stake in Bashneft.
 and its power-plant holding company, TerraForm Power Inc, agreed to buy closely held First Wind Holdings Inc.
 One year in as chief executive officer, Chen has helped BlackBerry recover from a failed buyout and put its stock on pace to beat the Nasdaq Composite Index this year for the first time since 2009.
 agreed to buy Belgian health-products provider Omega Pharma NV for 36 billion euros ($45 billion), including debt, in a deal that will expand its presence in Europe.
 (1) agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 35planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviationservices unit to enter aircraft leasing.
 that will buy an additional 15 planes for$7335 million, according to the company’s filing to Hong Kong’sstock exchange yesterday evening.
 Cheung Kong said in August it was seeking to buy aportfolio of planes from Terra Firma Capital Partners Ltd’sAwas arm to quickly build a major presence in the business.
 Cheung Kong, through unit Accipiter Holdings Ltd, will buy18 planes from units of GE Capital Aviation Services Ltd.
 Accipiter will buy an additionalthree 737-800s from GE affiliates for $1012 million.
 Bank of China Cheung Kong agreed to buy 10 planes from Bank of ChinaLtd’s BOC Aviation Pte.
 One loonie buys 8765 US.
 The buyers weren’t disclosed.
 The outlays include funds to maintain and expand its network and buy hundreds of locomotives.
 Ackman has said thathe welcomes a review by the SEC of Pershing Square’s tactics andthat it did nothing wrong -- acting as a co-buyer, alongsideValeant.
 Pershing Square beganbuying Allergan securities Feb.
 Ackman’s paper gain from the time he started buying to theincrease in share price the day the offer was announced is morethan $1 billion.
 “The risk of substantial monetary liability for insidertrading will likely chill enthusiasm for partnering with astrategic buyer in the way Pershing Square did here,”Cadwalader’s attorneys wrote in a memo to clients this weekPlaintiffs’ lawyers may already be planning to go after Ackmanin court, said Bill Mills, a partner at Cadwalader.
 The judge did say Valeant and Ackman took “substantialsteps to commence a tender offer” before Pershing Squarestarted buying the shares.
 In other words, Ackman knew non-public information about Valeant’s plans to make an unsolicitedbid for Allergan before buying stock, he wrote.
 Ackman was assured by lawyers at several firms that buyingAllergan’s shares didn’t violate the SEC’s rule about insidertrading, said a person familiar with the matter who asked not tobe identified because the information is private.
 That’s $1 billion inAckman’s pocket, “waiting to be picked” Any investigation or penalty may not impede the ability ofAckman and Valeant to buy Allergan.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Antofagasta Plc agreed to buy Duluth Metals Ltd.
 The drop in OHL Mexico, Pinfra and ICA “is more related with what’s to come,” Medina, who has a buy recommendation for Pinfra, said in a telephone interview from Mexico City.
 He hoped this reverence would lead investors to buy the bonds that backed them.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- OAO Rosneft, Russia’s largest oil producer, agreed to buy Total SA’s 167 percent stake in PCK Raffinerie GmbH in Schwedt, Germany.
 Rosneft is building holdings in European refineries by buying plants supplied with Russian oil.
 Kaeser, who took over in August last year, is concentrating on the energy business as he seeks to catch up with the profitability of General Electric Co, which has agreed to buy France’s Alstom SA to expand its own energy offering.
 The sale of the hearing-aids unit will help fund the 68 billion euros Kaeser spent to buy Rolls Royce Group Plc’s energy assets and Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 “The process with towers is ongoing but we can’t name the potential buyers due to non-disclosure agreement,” VimpelCom said in an e-mailed statement.
 Qatar Holding LLC, the foreign investment arm of the QIA, has invested in luxury hotels in Cannes and Amsterdam as well buying stakes in Barclays Plc and Credit Suisse Group AG.
 The fund agreed to buy HSBC Holdings Plc’s headquarters in London, the Financial Times reported last month, citing unidentified people with knowledge of the matter.
 The report also cited the industry’s profitability and financial position, along with the potential for increased dividends and stock buybacks.
 are among the stocks worth buying, according to Syth, based in St.
 purchased Actavis Group hf and changed its name in 2013, then buying Warner Chilcott Plc to move its tax address overseas and reduce its tax rate.
 Saunders came on board after Actavis agreed to buy Forest Laboratories Inc.
 14, and about $100 a share more than on April 10, when Ackman’s Pershing Square Capital Management LP began rapidly buying stock.
 Shebly Seyrafi, an analyst at FBN Securities who has the equivalent of a buy rating on GoPro, said the secondary offering is a “prudent move” to help reduce the stock’s volatility.
 AllianceBernstein, on the other hand, is cautioning investors against seeing recent price declines as a clear-cut buying opportunity given defaults will probably rise.
 utility owner, is buying a 50-megawatt power plant in Utah from Juwi Solar Inc.
 The project has a 20-year power-purchase and interconnection agreement with a buyer that Dominion didn’t identify.
 Actavis Plc said it would buy Allergan Inc.
 agreed to buy Mobil Corp.
 “While you often see buyer-friendly or seller-friendly” agreements, both were “reasonably negotiated documents which allowed people to move more quickly” Katz’s view was echoed by Latham partner Cary Hyden, who said his firm, along with Wachtell and Cleary Gottlieb, placed “a priority on putting grandstanding to the side to negotiate a deal for our clients” From Cleary representing Actavis were partners Victor Lewkow and Paul Shim and partner-elect James Langston.
 His practice focuses on complex transactions including leveraged buyouts for private-equity funds, domestic and cross-border M&A, as well as general corporate representations for publicly held corporations, private and family owned companies, and private-equity funds and their portfolio companies.
 policy makers at their October meeting retained a pledge to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after they ended a bond-buying program.
 Rolls Royce’s head of aerospace, Tony Wood, said last week that the company has a good shot at winning the contest, which presents a rare opportunity to enlarge the Trent 900 footprint as Airbus Group NV struggles to win buyers for its flagship jet.
 said it will buy back shares valued at 219 trillion won ($2 billion) after its parent group announced the sale of stakes in chemicals and defense businesses in the chaebol’s biggest restructuring.
 Samsung Electronics, the world’s biggest mobile-phone maker, will buy back 165 million common shares and 250,000 preferred stock, according to a regulatory filing today.
 The Suwon, South Korea-based company, with a market value of 1769 trillion won, will buy stock from the market by Feb.
 after shareholders claimed buyback rights.
 The company earlier rose 09 percent to 1,201,000 won at the close in Seoul trading, before the buyback announcement.
 In 2009, the conglomerate’s offer to buy Daewoo Shipbuilding & Marine Engineering Co.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Shanghai’s stock exchange will speed up its review of a proposal to scrap rules that prevent investors from buying and selling the same shares in one day.
 The rules require foreign investors buying shares through the Shanghai-Hong Kong bourse link to transfer the securities to a broker in the morning before exchanges open.
 Salus attempted to buy as much as $465 million of RadioShack’s senior loans last month, two people with knowledge of the discussions told Bloomberg at the time.
 Distressed hedge fund investors are interested in buying the struggling retailer’s senior debt to position themselves in restructuring negotiations in case the company files for bankruptcy.
 The company plans to lessen its reliance on so-called risk vehicles and start buying more vehicles it will sell back to the manufacturer at agreed upon prices.
 Before that, it bought most of its cars from automakers that agreed to buy them back at a set age and price.
 “You buy when others are selling.
 Five of the deals involved leveraged buyout firms, including at least four that received loans from Jefferies, such as Vista.
 The BOJ will do whatever it takes to support the economy, to achieve their inflation target” While the Federal Reserve ended its bond-buying program and speculation mounted that US.
 “Does it make sense to buy equities because of the meeting? No.
 Renaissance Capital said today it rates the stock buy after placing it under review last week.
 “The value-add or value proposition you bring to the enterprise has to be significantly better than the savings you get from putting it on Amazon’s cloud,” said Jeffrey Fidacaro, an analyst at Monness Crespi Hardt & Co, who rates the stock a buy.
 Japan’s government debt returned 2 percent in the past six months, the worst performance among major developed markets, as unprecedented bond buying by the Bank of Japan aimed at stoking inflation kept yields near record lows.
 Fifty years later it disbursed $25 billion to buy the medical-nutrition unit of Roche’s archrival Novartis AG.
 were among buyers in Turkey’s biggest initial public offering this year of the pension and life-insurance unit co-owned by Aviva Plc and Haci Omer Sabanci Holding AS.
 The four buyers got 40 percent of the stock, it said.
 Wirecard AG advanced 39 percent after agreeing to buy some assets from Visa Inc.
 However, buyers were deterred by the unresolved litigation, he said.
 Construction accounts for about 50 percent of China’s steel demand, Commonwealth Bank of Australia estimates, and the country is the largest ore buyer.
 is supposed to help Mercedes transfer some of the hipster aura of the electric-vehicle pioneer to the B-Class while avoiding the pitfalls of spending billions on a technology few may want to buy.
 It has the best chance of winning buyers.
 Demand for electric vehicles has been developing slower than expected as high vehicle prices and fears of being stranded along the roadside by a dead battery left buyers hesitating.
 That may be because people who buy electric vehicles actually want other drivers to notice how environmentally conscious they are, said Anjan Hemanth Kumar, a Bangalore-based analyst for Frost & Sullivan Inc.
 said today that it will buy the Hovensa refinery on the island of St.
 The buyer needs an operating agreement with the government of the Virgin Islands.
 The DAX Index climbed 08 percent, sending its nine-day gain to 71 percent amid growing optimism that the nation’s exporters will benefit from a weaker euro as the European Central Bank looks into broadening its asset-buying program.
 The Stoxx 600 has rallied 12 percent from its low last month as Mario Draghi said the ECB may start buying buying government bonds and China cut benchmark interest rates.
 Private-equity firms, hedge funds and other institutional investors started a $25 billion home-buying binge in 2012, seeking to benefit from low property prices and rising demand for rentals.
 Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd, which this year agreed to buy Ranbaxy, lost as much as 41 percent.
 Delays in the program, which gives foreigners unprecedented access to China’s $42 trillion stock market and lets mainland investors buy Hong Kong shares, have fueled volatility in the city’s equities and sparked losses in shares of Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd.
 The Stoxx 600 has jumped 12 percent from a low last month as European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said the lender may broaden its bond-buying program to include government debt, while China cut benchmark interest rates for the first time since 2012.
 It has been buying Max 9s and 737-900ERs, said Megan McCarthy, a spokeswoman.
 agreed to invest 612 million euros in Hertha Berlin and take a 97 percent stake in January, while Stuttgarter Nachrichten reported in July that Daimler AG was preparing to buy a holding in VfB Stuttgart, whose stadium neighbors its global headquarters.
 “It remains as a buy-on-dip market.
 People should continue to buy interest sensitive stocks” Real-Estate Stocks The one-year deposit rate was lowered by 025 percentage point to 275 percent, while the one-year lending rate was reduced by 04 percentage point to 56 percent, effective tomorrow, the People’s Bank of China said on its website.
 Goldman Sachs is trying to divest its aluminum business, Metro International Trade Services LLC, and has received interest from buyers in Europe, Russia and China, Gabillon said.
 Some of the trust’s rights were later sold for as much as 70 times what the initial buyers paid, according to the lawsuit.
 Ultimately, the trust beneficiaries complained, all of the financial gains from exploiting the Eagle Ford flowed to subsequent buyers, leaving the original mineral owners shut out with comparatively little.
 decided to buy a $200 million North Dakota wind farm, a year after signing an agreement to buy power from the project.
 MDU’s Montana-Dakota Utilities signed an agreement in October 2013 to buy power from the project, about 100 miles (160 kilometers) south of Bismarck, from then-developer Wind Works Power Corp.
 His tactics have helped the Brooklyn-based investor acquire two Manhattan office towers this year for almost $24 billion and become the biggest buyer of New York real estate this year.
 “Werner is a wizard,” said Douglas Harmon, a broker at Eastdil Secured LLC who has worked with Werner on transactions including his $15 billion deal to buy 5 Times Square in Midtown.
 In August, a Werner partnership agreed to buy the Socony-Mobil Building across from Grand Central Terminal for $900 million.
 Biggest Buyers The two transactions make Werner the biggest buyer of all types of real estate in New York in 2014, according to Real Capital.
 would eclipse Werner as the top buyer if the unit of pension fund Caisse de Depot et Placement du Quebec completes its $225 billion deal for 1095 Avenue of the Americas with a partner by Dec.
 “I tried to slow him down, as a seller, and dampen his eagerness to buy,” Patton said.
 Werner wanted to buy it.
 ‘Focused, Industrious’ Even as bondholders doubted that he could come up with the money, Werner completed the deal by bringing in another buyer, then collected a fee, Citrin said.
 After agreeing with the estate to buy a low-rise building on Church Street in Tribeca, Werner discovered information that warranted a price reduction, which one of his partners urged him to seek.
 and the Abu Dhabi Investment Authority to buy Time Warner Inc’s headquarters in Manhattan for $13 billion.
 The company raised its full-year dividend 11 percent to 265 pence and said it would complete its current 500 million pound share buyback program by the middle of 2015.
 Funds tracking the stock gauge will see 18 trillion yen in buying, according to Tokai Tokyo Securities Co.
 Foreign buying of Japanese stocks, which surged over the past two weeks to the most in almost a year, is also benefiting the Nikkei 225, as overseas investors opt for the larger companies in the measure.
 “Given its weighting in the Nikkei 225, we’ll probably see more buying of Fast Retailing,” said Mitsuo Shimizu, a deputy general manager at Japan Asia Securities Co.
 He has a buy rating on Transocean and estimates the stock will almost double to $45 in one year.
 ‘A Legend’ A stop-loss order is an instruction to buy or sell when a price reaches a certain level.
 The declines accelerated on bets that the Federal Reserve is moving closer to raising interest rates after ending its bond-buying program last month.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Twitter Inc’s recent debt deal, which raised about $18 billion, is set to make it more difficult for an acquirer to swoop in to buy the company.
 The largest producers are targeting record shipments, betting the increase will offset the plunging prices and force less competitive mines to close, including production in China, the largest buyer of seaborne supplies.
 Schorsch, 53, hasn’t been involved in discussions about the dropped deal to buy ARCP’s Cole Capital unit or the litigation, said Andrew G.
 Chief Executive Officer Im Kee Young said he’s still considering buying back the group’s former car heater and air conditioner maker after a buyout fund agreed to acquire a stake in the business, Halla Visteon Climate Control Corp.
 Hahn & Co’s offer for 70 percent of the former Halla unit “hasn’t damped our interest in buying back the company,” Im said in an interview.
 Terminated Offer Visteon announced an offer to buy the 30 percent stake it didn’t already own in the company in July 2012, then terminated the offer that same month, saying it didn’t receive sufficient offers to sell.
 Likewise, a ban on calling or buying back certain debt securities has expired.
 The hyperbole that characterized the IPO market at the beginning of the year is now giving way to tougher times, according to Harry Klagsbrun, a partner at EQT Partners AB, the largest Nordic buyout fund.
 “We’ll have to wait for the next statement from the company” and then “review what to do next” Shocked Banks Nordea Bank AB, which helped arrange the sale and had been urging clients to buy OW Bunker shares since Oct.
 said it has agreed to buy Range Royalty LP for C$699 million ($617 million) in stock and will raise its dividend after the deal closes.
 Deliveries of power station coal to foreign buyers will drop 20 percent by 2019 from 2012 levels, while coking coal will slide 29 percent, Morgan Stanley, a New York-based investment bank estimates.
 iron-ore producer announcedplans to use at least $11 billion of new debt to buy backportions of five of its securities.
 The buyback offer comes a day after Cliffs announced it wasconsidering plans to close a Canadian iron-ore mine, which sentshares tumbling 20 percent to $817.
 “There’s a lot of money that continues to buy Treasuries regardless of what’s going on, so it’s going to have a bid” Bloomberg’s dollar index, which tracks the greenback against 10 major peers, dropped 02 percent, after yesterday touching its highest level on a closing basis since 2009 in intraday trading.
 The stock jumped the most on record in Hong Kong after the company said it plans to buy CSSC Huangpu Wenchong Shipbuilding Co.
 Guangzhou Shipyard plans to issue 272 million shares to buy Huangpu Wenchong from their mutual parent, state-owned China State Shipbuilding Corp, the Guangzhou-based company said in a stock exchange filing Oct.
 business” Discovery will buy out its London-based partner and plans to fund the deal with a combination of internal resources and debt, the Johannesburg-based company said in a separate statement today.
 Aveva Group Plc increased 18 percent as Barclays Plc recommended buying the stock.
 During one asset sale at the chemical company,Weiss “suggested something he knew was exactly the opposite ofhow I wanted to do it” to find buyers, Ghasemi said.
 and JPMorgan for its failed attempt to buyAstraZeneca Plc and move to the UK, while the British companyworked with Obama backer Blair Effron’s Centerview Partners LLCand Evercore Partners Inc, among other firms.
 has seen purchase new home-loan securities without government backing since the financial crisis aren’t enough to foster a recovery in the market because they haven’t included many of the biggest bond buyers, according to Marc Simpson, an executive director at the bank.
 The limited sales are another challenge because they’ve suppressed liquidity, leaving the gap between dealer offers to buy and sell as large as a half cent on the dollar at times, Simpson said.
 and Lenovo Group Ltd, are attracting budget buyers in China.
 less competitive compared with their Japanese rivals, stoking speculation Korea and Taiwan will buy foreign currency to depress their exchange rates.
 17, giving foreigners unprecedented access to yuan-denominated shares and allowing mainland traders to buy Hong Kong equities.
 Some money managers who already invest in China’s domestic markets through the Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program may be able to free up some of that quota to buy securities outside Shanghai, said Adrian Mowat, the chief Asian and emerging market equity strategist at JPMorgan in Hong Kong.
 Mainland buyers used less than 10 percent of their daily Hong Kong quota today, after taking up just 18 billion yuan ($294 million) of the 105 billion yuan limit yesterday.
 The link allows any global investor with an account at a participating Hong Kong brokerage to buy a selection of Shanghai shares, expanding access to the $42 trillion equity market from a small number of foreign institutional money managers.
 “The buyers are more comfortable looking at the type of property built to today’s flood standards.
 In Ocean City’s Merion Park neighborhood, a cluster of single-family homes by wetlands, Booth pointed out a house for sale that was damaged during Sandy -- as is, for $299,000, and for $689,000 if the buyer wants a bigger house in its place.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Conn’s Inc, the retailer burned by rising delinquencies at its credit division, is a bargain for buyers willing to take control of the cleanup.
 A buyer could take the $13 billion company private to revamp the business faster than if it remained on the public market, according to SunTrust Robinson Humphrey Inc.
 He said a buyer could increase the number of stores “and then bring it back out at some point at a higher valuation” A representative for The Woodlands, Texas-based Conn’s said in an e-mailed statement that “while the company cannot comment about specific discussions, it’s reasonable to assume that a private-equity firm might find Conn’s an appealing investment” Growth Plans The retailer, which caters to lower-income customers, had more than 80 stores nationwide with most locations in its home state of Texas.
 Conn’s may not have to find a buyer.
 “That’s probably better in the hands of a private owner” Valuation Appeal Such a buyer could get Conn’s on the cheap.
 “There are definitely a number of players out there that have a lot of experience in buying this kind of thing and potentially turning it around,” said Lamar Villere, a portfolio manager at St Denis J Villere & Co, which manages $32 billion, including Conn’s shares.
 “He’s giving them capital so that they can act like he did in 1980,” buying stocks that will outperform over the long-haul, said Bill Smead, who oversees about $1 billion including Berkshire shares at Smead Capital Management.
 announced a deal in May to buy the satellite TV provider, a transaction that the deputies said they support.
 The share decline could be an enticement to buy more, said Smead.
 This week, Buffett announced that he was buying Procter & Gamble Co’s Duracell battery business, using $47 billion in P&G stock that Berkshire held.
 Airbus is stepping up efforts to pitch the A380 for Hajj operations as it seeks to establish a new niche for a jet that hasn’t won a new airline buyer since 2012.
 “If, for example, there was $20-$40 billion in it, then that would buy Nigeria six months to make a more gradual and cautious adjustment.
 The ’buy-the-dip’ mentality is being applied to the product and it shouldn’t be” Dip-Buying About $544 million in inflows were added to the VelocityShares ETN last month, swelling its market capitalization from $622 million on Oct.
 Staying Power The end of the Federal Reserve’s bond-buying program, a decision the central bank announced last week, could introduce more volatility into the market.
 The company said a year ago that it had lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make sapphire, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 In the meantime, if any of you mistakenly receive a briefcase full of cash, please bring it to my office immediately” Management at Funny or Die is working with the investment bank Moelis & Co, which has contacted potential buyers to gauge their interest in a deal, said one person, who asked not to be identified because the review is private.
 BNSF also plans to buy 330 new locomotives in 2015.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Publicis Groupe SA is in talks to buy Sapient Corp.
 The social network said in a blog post yesterday that starting next year, users’ news feeds will show fewer posts that prompt readers to buy a product, install an application or enter a sweepstakes.
 “Every day it becomes more and more clear that Facebook has abandoned social marketing, and is just a place to buy old-fashioned ads,” Nate Elliott, an analyst at Forrester Research, wrote in an e-mail.
 “We think this could generate a combined equity value in the mid-$30s,” said Greff, who rates the shares the equivalent of buy.
 While building a global commodities platform, BTG agreed in July to buy BSI Group Inc.
 to buy TV production house All3Media.
 Bracken said today that Liberty Global has no intention of buying the rest of ITV.
 is in talks to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 Sumitomo will prioritize investments over offering shareholders greater returns via buybacks, he said.
 and Mitsui & Co, which have embarked on shareholder-friendly measures such as buybacks, Sumitomo will direct cash flow from assets back into the business to boost profit in the hopes that investor trust in the stock will be revived, Nakamura said.
 Sumitomo is unlikely to look at share buybacks in the next two years, he said.
 Under that plan, he can buy one Fiat Chrysler and one CNH share for a combined price of about 658 euros, according to Fiat’s website.
 Louis, who recommends buying the shares.
 BNSF has worked to allay concerns about the safety of oil shipments by agreeing to buy 5,000 new crude tank cars with thicker steel than the models known as CPC-1232.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- Japan’s Nikkei 225 Stock Average is outpacing the broader Topix index by the most this year amid speculation the smaller gauge will benefit most from Bank of Japan stimulus and a surge in foreign buying of stocks.
 31 it would triple buying of exchange-traded funds, while the Topix rose 87 percent.
 “The BOJ’s ETF buying pushes up the NT ratio,” Suzuki said yesterday.
 “Foreign investors are trying to get in on the rally by buying large-caps, which are more liquid,” said Shinkin Asset’s Fujiwara.
 “Spar’s like-for-like sales were a positive surprise,” said Abraham, who raised his recommendation on the stock today to buy from hold.
 corporate bond sales in 2014: * Apple Inc’s $12 billion issue in April, used to generate cash for dividends and buybacks instead of repatriating money from outside the US.
 * Cisco Systems Inc’s $8 billion issue in February, which was designed to fund stock buybacks.
 agreed to buy in September.
 Chief Executive Officer Robert Kotick and other directors agreed to a $275 million settlement of investors’ claims that officials improperly benefited from a buyout of Vivendi SA’s stake in the video-game maker.
 “It’s certainly not for funding settlements of shareholder suits targeting self-dealing within a company” Investors sued after Activision’s board agreed to allow Kotick and Kelly’s group, which included Chinese video-game publisher Tencent Holdings Ltd, to buy 25 percent of Vivendi’s Activision stock at the same discounted price Activision paid for $583 billion of the shares.
 Kotick’s Threats Pacchia and another Activision investor faulted directors for allowing Kotick and Kelly to collect hundreds of millions of dollars by participating in the buyout group that was part of the Vivendi deal.
 The investors also said Kotick threatened to quit if directors didn’t allow his investment group to buy a sizeable chunk of the French conglomerate’s stake and then blocked Activision from considering alternative deals, according to court filings.
 Hyundai Mobis Co, South Korea’s biggest auto parts maker and a unit of Hyundai Motor Group, succeeded in buying Hyundai Autonet in 2009, five months after its initial attempt failed because of costs related to the mandatory buyback.
 The cost of buying back shares from investors exceeded the target that was set, triggering the collapse.
 The buyback price for Samsung Heavy was 27,003 won, 49 percent higher than the closing price on Nov.
 17, the last day to apply for the buyback.
 With the buyback prices higher than the market prices, investors went for the clear profit.
 In South Korea, a company can call off a merger should buyback requests reach a level that could increase its financial burden.
 It did so as part of a portfolio management strategy because the buyback prices were higher than the previous day’s close, spokeswoman Lee Cheol Hee said Nov.
 rose the most in more than two months in Manila trading after Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund agreed to buy a stake in the brandy maker.
 agreed to buy 112 billion Emperador shares at 11 pesos each for a total of 123 billion pesos ($273 million), the Philippine company said in the filing.
 GIC also will buy 528 billion pesos of equity-linked securities, which will boost its stake to 964 percent if they are converted to common shares.
 “We don’t have any target to buy Americana or some other brand or some other company,” Chairman Abilio Dos Santos Diniz said today in an interview in Abu Dhabi.
 has found buyers for $25 billion in convertible notes that will help fund construction of its Corpus Christi, Texas, facility to export natural gas from booming US.
 will buy the notes, which can be converted into common stock in Cheniere, the Houston-based company said in two separate statements today.
 RRJ will have the right to transfer a portion of the $1 billion in notes it’s buying to Temasek Holdings Pte, Singapore’s state-owned investment company.
 The announcement today marks the second investment in Cheniere by RRJ and Temasek, which joined forces in May 2012 to buy shares in the company for about $468 million.
 “People buy on the expectation and they sell when the actual result comes out” For this quarter, the question is what these numbers mean for the company’s margins, Papp said by phone.
 Ma and Apple Chief Executive Officer Tim Cook last month said they are open to working together on projects that would turn phones into tools for buying and selling goods.
 “They’re quite keen to expand further through acquisition of the biggest and most dominant centers” Unibail may buy or build malls in Germany’s seven largest cities, including Hamburg, Munich and Cologne, if it can find deals that match its criteria for size, customers and return on investment, Reinitzhuber said.
 Since then, Iliad SA also scrapped an offer to buy T-Mobile, the fourth-largest US.
 Investors sought to buy 84 billion euros of the securities.
 3 free-to-air commercial broadcaster, has drawn interest from potential buyers including Time Warner Inc.
 buyout firm Hellman & Friedman LLC, according to one of the people.
 Providence, the Rhode Island-based buyout firm focused on media and communications investments, manages funds with $40 billion of assets, according to its website.
 firm focusing on buying stakes in funds, is set to become a leading investor in Intermediate Capital Group Plc’s 23 billion-euro ($29 billion) fund, said people familiar with the matter.
 Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s asset management arm was lead investor in a deal to buy stakes in two older distressed-debt funds overseen by Crescent Capital Group LP in September.
 agreed to buy Africa’s Pepkor Holdings Pty Ltd.
 “How to build a competitive advantage is by scale -- you are able to extract synergies through logistics, group buying power and procure goods at a cheaper price.
 Steinhoff is buying a 525 percent stake in Pepkor owned by Titan Premier Investments Proprietary Ltd, controlled by Wiese, and another 371 percent from Brait Mauritius Ltd.
 Hang Seng’s attractions include a waiver through March next year on brokerage fees for buying and selling Shanghai stocks.
 The $64 billion Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor program has allowed professional money managers to buy Chinese securities since 2002, while a similar system using offshore yuan began in 2011.
 “Delinquencies are reported to private credit bureaus and can inhibit a borrower’s access to future credit for buying a home, starting a business, or completing or furthering education,” she said.
 “Farmers will be overjoyed to find buyers, whatever the price,” said Bertrand Rival, director of the vegetable growers association Legumes de France.
 Flaring Tempers Carrefour’s commitment is to buy 100 percent of the six main winter vegetables in France, said Jean Vepierre, the company’s director for fruits and vegetables.
 As the autumn season comes to a close in Europe, Carrefour has stopped buying carrots, turnips and potatoes from northern European countries.
 “They are tempted to buy into brands whether it’s beer, food products or clothing” Russian demand for Carlsberg’s premium drinks such as the Baltika 7 and Brewer’s Collection helped offset the impact of a weakening ruble and government regulation on the world’s fourth-biggest brewer.
 “As it happens very often, we see a dip and people buy in, there’s still some fear in the market that if you don’t buy in, you’re left watching” Global Slowdown The S&P 500 had gained for five straight sessions, bringing its advance from a six-month low in October to 95 percent, as better-than-estimated corporate earnings and economic data boosted confidence the US.
 BB&T, North Carolina’s second-largest bank, agreed to buy the lender for a premium of about 39 percent over yesterday’s closing price.
 She helped oversee the country’s largest banking acquisition when Westpac agreed in May 2008 to buy St.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Brookfield Property Partners LP dropped plans to buy the shuttered Revel Casino in Atlantic City, New Jersey, in a new setback for the state’s shrinking gambling industry.
 The Toronto-based investment company won bankruptcy-court approval to buy the resort for $110 million last month.
 Stockton College recently reached an agreement to buy the former Showboat casino, which closed earlier this year, and reopen the property as a satellite campus.
 He previously had a rating equivalent to buy for Gazprom and neutral on Rosneft.
 stocks rallied for the week, capping a monthly advance and returning benchmark indexes to records, as better-than-estimated earnings and economic data eased concern about the end of Federal Reserve bond buying.
 Optimism in the economy and better-than-estimated earnings fueled a rebound after the index had tumbled 74 percent from its September record on concerns that Europe will slip into a recession and that growth was slowing in China just as the Fed ends its monthly bond buying.
 “The buy-the-dip philosophy came back stronger than ever as everybody said the correction is behind us and the opportunity to buy stocks on sale is now,” Brian Peery, co-portfolio manager at Novato, California-based Hennessy Advisors Inc, said by phone.
 Equities slipped the next day after the Fed announced the end of its bond buying program.
 The biotechnology drug company will raise its dividend 30 percent in the first quarter 2015 and plans to buy back as much as $2 billion of stock through the end of next year.
 The tire maker reported earnings that topped analysts’ estimates and said it would buy up to $150 million worth of stock.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Former Deutsche Bank AG salesman Shigeru Echigo withdrew his appeal of a 10-month suspended prison sentence for bribing a Japanese pension fund official to buy investment products.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc is considering buying a stake in fiber-optic operator Metroweb SpA to compete with Telecom Italia SpA in ultra-broadband services, three people familiar with the matter said.
 Lewis, which agreed to buy Ellerine’s Beares brand for 40 million rand, expects South Africa’s competition authority to give feedback on the deal this month and, if approved, the benefits will be seen from December, he said.
 Online Streaming BCE is buying up content for a new online streaming service and has expanded the number of sports channels it offers.
 Gol Linhas Aereas Inteligentes SA, Latam Airlines Group SA’s Tam unit and Avianca Brasil said they were studying buying Embraer aircraft ahead of the program.
 With four doors and roomier rear seats than the tiny two-door base model, Fiat is looking to lure buyers away from the Nissan Juke, Kia Soul and General Motors Co’s upcoming Chevrolet Trax.
 TransCanada may come under pressure to appease shareholders such as New York-based Sandell by offering other debt-funded rewards including share buybacks, following examples set by Apple Inc.
 International investors bought about 26 billion yuan ($4247 million) of Shanghai shares out of the maximum daily 13 billion yuan permitted under the link today, while mainland investors left unused 97 percent of their quota to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 to call the program a “Ghost Train,” a reference to the so-called Through Train plan to let mainland investors buy Hong Kong shares in 2007.
 expansion, to attract buyers to the offering, according to Stone Harbor Investment Partners LP.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- As Prime Minister Viktor Orban dismantles Hungary’s market-based pension system, savers are buying more stocks and bonds to boost returns.
 life insurers have been diversifying away from individual annuities after the Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in March that pushed retirees to buy the product.
 This buyout “materially de-risks our remaining pension obligations and provides security to members who are insured,” Neil Marchuk, chairman of the TRW trustee board, said in a statement.
 insurers are ramping up their bulk annuities business to recoup lost revenue from government changes to the retirement system that no longer force retirees to buy an annuity.
 Brent Prices A drop in Brent to near a four-year low will cut import costs for the country that buys 80 percent of its crude from abroad, further easing price pressures, Alex Mathews, head of research at Geojit BNP Paribas Financial Services Ltd, said by phone today.
 in New York who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the stock, said in an interview.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Vodafone Group Plc is considering buying a stake in fiber-optic operator Metroweb SpA to compete with Telecom Italia SpA in high-speed broadband services, three people familiar with the matter said.
 agreed to buy Cobalt Capital Partners, owner of 256 industrial properties across the US, for about $16 billion.
 Private-equity investors to sovereign-wealth funds have been buying industrial properties because the yields are higher than for stores and office buildings.
 Chief Executive Officer Kelly King said yesterday in a phone interview after his company announced plans to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc.
 agreed to buy OneWest Bank from parent IMB Holdco LLC for $34 billion.
 “So some institutions that would be buyers have not yet felt comfortable” ‘Poster Child’ The pickup in deals gives hope to investors in bank stocks that have underperformed, said Jeff Davis, managing director for the financial-institutions group at Mercer Capital in Nashville, Tennessee.
 The Minneapolis-based firm isn’t interested in acquiring an entire bank even as it remains open to smaller acquisitions such as buying branches, Davis said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Anbang Insurance Group Co, the Chinese insurer buying New York’s Waldorf Astoria hotel, is planning an initial public offering that could raise about $2 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 The company, which agreed to buy Belgian insurer Fidea NV last month, said Oct.
 Anbang agreed in October to buy the 83-year-old Waldorf Astoria hotel for $195 billion, after weighing a bid for Hong Kong’s second-largest family-run lender Wing Hang Bank Ltd.
 Duke now buys gas in the open market, leaving it subject to price swings that are passed through to customer bills.
 The Hangzhou-based company, which reported better-than-estimated second quarter profit this week, is also targeting buyers and sellers outside China through platforms such as its Taobao Marketplace and Tmallcom.
 11 shopping day, a modern Chinese take on Valentine’s Day, “was formerly mainly a domestic market thing, but now the company provides a convenient channel for domestic consumers to shop online and communicate with international brands and manufacturers” Taobao Marketplace Alibaba has 307 million active buyers, the company said when it reported quarterly earnings on Nov.
 Disney earlier this year partnered with Apple to start Disney Movies Anywhere, a movie-management service that lets people buy a Disney film and then view it on multiple devices.
 The studios are also trying to reduce illegal downloads of films by making it easier for consumers to buy them and watch them anyplace.
 “It’s buy it wherever you want, enjoy it everywhere,” Voris said.
 “Fundamentally, this is solving that problem of giving value to a digital movie regardless of who you buy it from,” said Jon Zepp, head of movie partnerships for Google Play, the marketplace for buying content on Android devices.
 While debt has traditionally been brokered through conversations or in e-mails, an increasing proportion is moving to computer platforms as the biggest and smallest firms grow less willing to commit their own money to buying big blocks of debt from investors.
 Some of its sales staff helps match buyers and sellers over the phone.
 Taipei-based Cathay Financial Holding Co’s life unit agreed this month to buy Conning Holding Corp.
 London Stock Exchange Group Plc agreed this year to buy Russell.
 The world’s largest distiller ended talks two years ago about the future of the Cuervo tequila brand, which it was said to have an option to buy.
 Watt said low down-payment loans are a safe way to help families with healthy incomes and meager savings buy homes.
 homeownership rate has fallen to 644 percent from 692 percent in 2004 as blacks, Hispanics and first-time buyers struggle to get loans.
 This made consumers buy less and cheaper products” Little Effect ITE Group, a London-based organizer of conferences and exhibitions, derives about 60 of its business in Russia.
 as South Africa’s biggest trading partner in 2008, with the Asian nation buying $92 billion of goods from the world’s biggest platinum producer in the second quarter of this year, according to data compiled by the Bloomberg.
 Leever learned the strategy from his father, longtime MacDermid CEO and Chairman Harold Leever, who expanded the Waterbury, Connecticut-based business after leading an employee buyout in 1959.
 20 agreement to buy pesticide maker Arysta LifeScience Ltd.
 in White Plains who recommends buying the shares, said by phone.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- The failure to find a buyer for its Australian nickel business has left BHP Billiton Ltd.
 Rio Tinto Group, the second-largest, halted work last year to try and sell its diamond unit after failing to find a buyer.
 A potential buyer would need to invest in developing a nearby deposit, secure concentrate deals to feed smelters and would need to also face uncertainty over potential rehabilitation costs, according to UBS AG.
 The producer is currently seeking a buyer for its Fayetteville shale-gas assets in Arkansas, it said last month.
 Caution from potential buyers is understandable given the outlook for the metal, according to David Lennox, a Sydney-based resource analyst at Fat Prophets.
 With Glencore effectively barred from making a renewed bid until April, Rio has a window to woo shareholders through stock buybacks and selling non-core assets.
 Rio will then post full-year results in February when analysts say it’s likely to announce the first buyback since 2012.
 “If Rio doesn’t deliver a buyback that the market is happy with investors will say ‘well why should we continue to back you as the management team?’” said Burstow, who helps oversee about $800 million and counts Rio as a top 10 holding.
 “The most likely outcome is for the company to gear up and buy back stock and spin off non-core assets, such as Alcan” Spokesmen for Rio and Glencore declined to comment.
 Two months earlier, Rio said it would keep its diamond business after failing to find a buyer and deciding not to pursue an initial public offering.
 For Rio to keep that unchanged, it could fund a buyback of $1 billion to $17 billion, according to HSBC analyst Andrew Keen.
 Even with asset sales or reduced spending, Rio’s probably can’t afford a buyback of more than $5 billion “without accepting sustainably higher levels of financial leverage,” HSBC said.
 Jefferies has predicted Rio will announce a buyback of $3 billion to $5 billion next year.
 Knights, who has a sell rating on the stock, expects the company will stick stick to the cost-cutting and buyback plan outlined by Walsh.
 A continued slump in the price of iron ore may hamper Rio’s capacity for buybacks and play into the hands of Glencore’s dealmaking CEO who’s been critical of the mining company’s role in feeding a global glut of the steel-making raw material.
 Glencore “certainly does play a waiting game in terms of when is the right time in the cycle to be buying and selling,” Neil Gregson, who manages about $3 billion of natural resource stocks at JPMorgan Asset Management in London and counts both Rio and Glencore as top-five holdings.
 agreed to buy Scottish spirits company Whyte & Mackay from Diageo Plc.
 Prices in the United Nations market last month dropped to a record as demand from EU buyers is set to reach a limit set by lawmakers.
 Of the 39 lots offered, 35 found buyers.
 “There’s a lot of collectors from Asia, and Russians are still buying, so it’s a healthy market” Manet Record A flurry of bidders, both in the salesroom and on the phone, thrust Manet’s 1881 “Le Printemps” past its $25 million to $35 million estimate, selling for $651 million and setting an auction record for the artist.
 The New York Times first reported the Getty was the buyer.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Carlyle Group LP and financial publisher Euromoney Institutional Investor Plc agreed to buy market-data provider Dealogic Holdings Plc and related joint ventures for about $700 million.
 The buyers are offering $120816 in cash for each Dealogic share, the companies said today in a joint statement.
 rallied 59 percent after Aviva Plc said it’s in talks to buy the company.
 recommended buying shares of the bourse operators.
 Raiffeisen Bank International AG rose 23 percent after ING Groep NV raised its stock rating to buy from hold, and Metro AG increased 36 percent after a Macquarie Group Ltd.
 Tabelog’s sales growth is driven by subscription fees from restaurants, which made up almost 70 percent of revenue, according to Yuki Nakayasu, an analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG, who recommends buying the stock.
 company to buy Tabelog last year.
 in Ramat Gan in Israel, who has a buy recommendation on the two lenders.
 “Both VTB and Sberbank are ridiculously cheap and are strong long-term buys,” Saporta said by phone yesterday.
 17 low after the central bank added to quantitative easing and the nation’s $11 trillion Government Investment Pension Fund pledged to buy more shares.
 ECB Stimulus Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank is open to buying a wide variety of assets for further stimulus as German and Spanish inflation data highlighted the struggle to revive the euro-area economy.
 advanced last week to the highest level since January 2008 as Americans grew more optimistic about their financial well-being and the buying climate.
 The buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to purchase goods and services, rose to 328 from 319 the prior period.
 Lukoil, Russia’s second-biggest oil producer, added 23 percent to the highest price since July 2008, after BCS Financial Group advised investors to buy the stock.
 The following year, Prudential agreed to buy a US.
 “They are going to keep buying our debt.
 Aviva Plc lost 54 percent after saying it’s in talks to buy Friends Life Group Ltd.
 raised its rating on the bourse operator to buy.
 “The erosion of that barrier is clearly doing harm today” Levin faulted banks for stockpiling commodities at the same time they were engaging in “massive” transactions to buy and sell them and trade derivatives tied to oils and metals.
 That makes CME responsible for monitoring some of the world’s busiest markets, where traders can buy and sell futures contracts tied to oil, stock benchmarks like the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, and interest rates.
 who recommends buying the shares.
 Middle Eastern oil producers are increasingly competing with cargoes from Latin America, North Africa and Russia for buyers, as well as with US.
 31 amid optimism a surprise stimulus boost from the Bank of Japan will fill some of the gap left by the end of Fed bond buying.
 31, and tripled buying of real estate investment trusts.
 Buffett uses the float, or premiums held at the businesses until paying claims, to buy equities.
 oil producer that most analysts still think makes a good buy.
 Louis who, along with 33 others, rates EOG a buy.
 Most-Recommended An estimated 85 percent of analysts who follow EOG recommend buying shares, more than any other oil company on the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, according to data through October compiled by Bloomberg.
 26, only one oil shale driller maintained a buy recommendation: EOG.
 “They had a sharp slowdown in net new money during the summer” Becker is one of five analysts who recommend selling the stock, compared with eight who advise buying shares and 16 who rate the company hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Julius Baer agreed in July to buy the European operations of Bank Leumi Le-Israel BM, including about 7 billion francs of client assets.
 “Your shares rise because there’s even an artificial demand from all the funds that mimic the IPC and want to buy your shares” Net Worth That’s good for Salinas, who’s reaping most of the benefits from being the gauge’s biggest gainer in the past six months.
 In such transactions, the other party normally buys up shares as a hedge, a process that would have made Elektra shares scarce.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- GIC Pte, Singapore’s sovereign wealth fund, will buy a 49 percent stake in five malls in New Zealand from Scentre Group in a transaction valued at NZ$104 billion ($805 million).
 Singapore’s state fund is close to a deal to be one of the buyers of IndCor Properties Inc, an owner of US.
 industrial real estate, from Blackstone Group LP after last month buying a building next to Tokyo Station.
 Public Funding “If you have a new entrant with an environmentally friendly plant, that will set a new standard, that’s well positioned -- what’s a buyer going to think about the price to be paid?” he said.
 government securities were also supported by buying for month-end duration extensions.
 A parliament session starting next week will prove a key test for his reform agenda as he seeks to lift the cap on foreign investment in insurance, pass a new goods and services tax and make it easier to buy land.
 “If, for example, there was $20-$40 billion in it, then that would buy Nigeria six months to make a more gradual and cautious adjustment.
 The victims, who believed their investments were used to buy securities, have been paid almost $6 billion by Picard since he started distributing the recovered funds.
 Crisis Performance The subprime-auto business has exploded as bond buyers pile into securities offering yields that are about double those on similar debt tied to the most creditworthy borrowers.
 Lenders are enabling buyers to borrow more relative to the cost of a car.
 VimpelCom “worked with Takilant in the past” to buy frequency in Uzbekistan, the carrier said in an SEC filing last year.
 said its partner in a 71-year-old silicone venture that’s on pace for $6 billion of annual sales wants to sell its half of the business, and Dow could be the buyer.
 Rachelle Schikorra, a spokeswoman for Dow Chemical, said Liveris “didn’t say anything definitive” about buying the partner’s stake.
 John Roberts, an analyst at UBS Securities LLC who attended the investor meeting, said in a note that he believes Dow is trying to buy Dow Corning.
 Corning in January closed on its deal to buy Samsung’s 43 percent stake in Samsung Corning Precision Materials for $22 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “While most on the buy-side seemed to be enamored with the prospects of bringing a certain former rental-car company CEO back to the industry, our familiarity (through our airline coverage) with what is required of the president and COO at a large, complex, global airline leads us to believe that the selection of Mr.
 agreed to buy Swiss juice-box maker SIG Combibloc Group AG for as much as 375 billion euros ($47 billion) as Canada’s largest buyout firm expands in Europe.
 Earlier this month, SunEdison and its power plant holding company, TerraForm Power Inc, agreed to buy First Wind Holdings Inc.
 The dividend proposal “is definitely a sign of the level of Mol’s commitment,” said Concorde’s Vago, who maintains a buy recommendation for its shares.
 That’s the code name Actavis’s investment bankers gave to the project to buy the maker of Botox wrinkle treatment, its filings on the deal show.
 Ubiquitous on Wall Street, code names for buyers and sellers are meant to maintain some degree of confidentiality on a high-stakes transaction -- in case a document is misplaced or a conversation overheard.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- South Korean buyout fund Hahn & Co.
 The person declined to comment on a Korea Economic Daily report that said Hahn reached a preliminary agreement to buy the shares for about about 4 trillion won ($36 billion).
 Mando Corp, the flagship of the Halla Group, has expressed interest in buying the former affiliate as Chairman Chung Mong Won seeks to rebuild his family’s business empire.
 “This company can become within a limited time a shareholding company, and all the citizens can buy shares in it” The Kurds were producing 320,000 barrels of oil a day in October, Sherko Jawdat, head of the natural resources committee in the Kurdish region’s parliament, said Oct.
 “The stock is a show me story whether 2015 top line results can rebound off this year’s depressed levels” He rates the stock a buy.
 Turkish assets also came under pressure amid speculation the Federal Reserve will raise interest rates next year for the first time since 2006 after it ended its bond-buying program.
 Some of the trust’s rights were later sold for as much as 70 times what the initial buyers paid, according to the lawsuit.
 Ultimately, the trust beneficiaries complained, all of the financial gains from exploiting the Eagle Ford flowed to subsequent buyers, leaving the original mineral owners shut out with comparatively little.
 Investors were informed of Francois-Poncet’s departure earlier this year, and he plans to leave before the London-based firm starts to raise its next buyout fund, said the person, who asked not to be identified because the matter is private.
 economy shows signs of gaining momentum, buyers are pouring into long bonds because the collapse of inflation expectations suggests long-term growth will moderate as Fed Chair Janet Yellen lifts borrowing costs from close to zero.
 Stagnant Wages Stith said the firm is buying 30-year Treasuries as part of a “barbell” strategy that includes adding one-year debt and selling notes due in 3 years to 5 years, which he said stand to bear the brunt of losses as rates increase.
 At that time, almost everyone predicted yields on Treasuries of all maturities would increase as the Fed’s bond buying program bolstered a rebound in the US.
 The lowest costs at the gas pump in four years may also help spur buying power and household purchases heading into the US.
 “The company has been surrounded by different rumors related to possible mergers and acquisitions, issues related the exit of the chairman and now articles about the supposed leaving of Alejandro Valenzuela,” said Andres Audiffred, an analyst at Casa de Bolsa Ve Por Mas SA in Mexico City, who recommends buying Banorte with a price target of 108 pesos.
 Generali also announced the buyback of perpetual notes in euros and pounds that will be financed through the issue of new securities.
 economy is strengthening, and these bond buyers are at risk of losing when borrowing costs rise.
 Ma Kunpeng, a Shanghai-based analyst at Sinolink Securities Co, has a buy rating on the industry.
 Fan’s Clos des Quatre Vents estate in Margaux has noted waning sales to the Chinese, who are increasingly afraid of buying wines that are seen as a sign of lavish living.
 “We are very pleased that the Chinese buy the very top wines in fair proportion, but what’s important for Bordeaux collectively is to push forward the middle-segment wines, which is where Bordeaux can offer the best value in the world.
 The hope for resurgence in demand for wine from the Asian giant stems in part from Chinese investors still criss-crossing the Bordeaux region looking for chateaus to buy -- both as an investment and vacation homes.
 While about 60 percent of Chinese buyers are companies that will distribute the wine in their home countries, “there are several Chinese clients who just have a passion for wine,” she said.
 “They’d like just to buy a holiday country house in Bordeaux, because here for them it’s luxury,” Li said.
 The French owners “who sold their chateaus are clearly happy to have found a buyer, sometimes after five years on the market,” she said.
 In the future, Chinese investors will buy high-end estates in Bordeaux, worth in excess of 40 million euros, said Li, the Christie’s broker.
 “Chinese will start to buy Fronsac, Saint-Emilion Grands Crus classes,” she said.
 The Belgian home market was very disappointing once again,” said Hans D’Haese, an analyst at Banque Degroof SA in Brussels who raised his recommendation on the stock to an equivalent of buy from hold today.
 “There has been better buying from overseas this month based on the fact that Treasury prices look cheap as rates abroad keep getting ratcheted down,” said Thomas Roth, senior Treasury trader in New York at Mitsubishi UFJ Securities USA Inc.
 “They are going to keep buying our debt.
 Draghi said last week that buying government bonds may be a policy tool.
 The ECB, which has cut interest rates to record lows, already buys asset-backed securities.
 Recent deals in PVC show an appetite for some makers to become a more global force, and that could provide an opportunity for Solvay to find another buyer for Indupa, South America’s No.
 Mainland investors used less than 2 percent of their 105 billion yuan ($17 billion) daily quota to buy shares listed in Hong Kong today.
 AIG said the board authorized a fresh $15 billion buyback program on Oct.
 Priceappreciation, however, is moderating as more properties arelisted for sale and buyer demand slows, the group said.
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also roseless than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateauheading into the end of 2014.
 Alibaba provides the platform that brings buyers and sellers together.
 South Africa plans to buy more electricity from renewable sources and independent producers as a shortfall at state-run Eskom Holdings SOC Ltd, which produces 95 percent of the country’s power, caused blackouts and curbs economic growth.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Aviva Plc slid the most in a year and a half after saying it’s in talks to buy smaller British insurer Friends Life Group Ltd, reducing the value of its proposed offer to about 53 billion pounds ($84 billion).
 In contrast, Friends Life was the second-worst performer, hurt by government changes to the pension industry that scrapped rules forcing retirees to buy an annuity product.
 Golden Concord Holdings Ltd, the parent of GCL-Poly, and the investors will buy a combined 66 percent stake in Chaori Solar, or 168 billion shares, for 146 billion yuan ($240 million) under a restructuring proposal, GCL-Poly said today in a statement after its board approved the plan.
 For the first time in his six-year tenure, there are more analysts telling clients to sell Unilever shares than those recommending a buy.
 The Fed ended its bond-buying program at the gathering.
 Sawiris relocated Orascom Construction to Holland from Egypt last year through a buyout by OCI, an entity he helped set up amid the dispute with Mursi’s regime.
 “What we’re waiting for is the big foundry spend,” said Weston Twigg, an analyst at Pacific Crest Securities LLC, who has a buy rating on Applied Materials shares The shares of Santa Clara, California-based Applied Materials rose 09 percent to $2282 at the close in New York.
 The company, seeking to add scale and market share, last year agreed to buy Tokyo Electron Ltd.
 Trade imperatives bind all these countries” Oil Dependency India, which spent $143 billion to import crude last year, may look to diversify suppliers by buying more oil from Russia and Latin America to guard against geopolitical risks, Oil Minister Dharmendra Pradhan said in an October interview.
 While India plans to build 19 new nuclear plants by 2017, laws that make equipment suppliers liable in case of an accident have stalled deals, including an accord for buying two more Russian reactors for Kudankulam.
 18 that buying euro-area government bonds, or quantitative easing, could be a policy tool.
 The bank started seeking buyers for the uranium unit last year amid regulatory scrutiny of lenders’ commodity businesses, a person briefed on the matter said at the time.
 The board early next year will debate whether to distribute a special dividend or buy back shares, Philippe said.
 Altice SA and its unit Numericable Group, both owned by billionaire cable billionaire Patrick Drahi, agreed in April to buy SFR from Vivendi for $23 billion.
 “I make money but I’m not near a stage where I’m showing it by buying $100,000 watches or $100,000 phones,” Yankelovich said.
 “It’s about having something a bit out of the ordinary, about a money-can’t-buy experience or product you can talk about with your friends” Shark and ostrich skin interiors aside, when it comes to an everyday drive, an SUV, even one costing north of $1 million, makes a certain kind of sense when compared with vehicles like the Veyron, which can clock 62 miles per hour in 26 seconds but has no back seat and limited room for shopping totes.
 Cheap funding has encouraged companies to pile on even more debt: Total debt levels for large leveraged buyouts rose to 626 times a measure of profitability during the third quarter from 589 times in the first half of the year, according to Standard & Poor’s Capital IQ Leveraged Commentary & Data.
 to buy online video platform 56com, Renren’s investor relations department said today, confirming previous reports from Sina Tech and Marbridge Consulting.
 It agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc.
 Fairfax, run by value investor Prem Watsa, agreed this year to buy Pethealth Inc, North America’s second-largest pet insurer, for C$100 million ($88 million).
 The industry isn’t as established in North America as in Europe, and investors may be concerned that the company will be pressured by larger rivals, said Rohit Kulkarni, an analyst for Royal Bank of Canada who rates it a buy.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Italian and Spanish bonds rose for the first time in three days as European Central Bank policy maker Christian Noyer said in an interview officials would consider buying government debt to stimulate euro-area growth.
 “Demand for peripheral bonds remain underpinned” by speculation the ECB will buy government debt, said Mathias Van Der Jeugt, a fixed-income strategist at KBC Bank NV in Brussels.
 ECB Stance ECB Governing Council member Noyer told French daily newspaper Les Echos that the central bank could buy state or company debt if it decided that its policies weren’t having any effect.
 International investors bought about 26 billion yuan ($4247 million) of Shanghai shares out of the maximum daily 13 billion yuan permitted under the link today, while mainland investors left unused 97 percent of their quota to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 The transaction marks the final stage of the 111 billion-pound leveraged buyout of the UK.
 The Bank of Japan in October increased the target of government debt it buys.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore prices dropped to the lowest level since September amid a lack of demand in China, with some mills in the world’s largest buyer ordered to suspend production before a summit of world leaders in Beijing.
 “Demand remains weak as Chinese buyers sit on the sidelines, with many Beijing steel mills forced to halt production leading up to the APEC meeting,” Australia & New Zealand Banking Group Ltd.
 The premium buyers pay on top of market prices to secure aluminum supply rose to a record $500 a metric ton.
 Rexam, which in February agreed to buy a stake in United Arab Can Manufacturing Ltd.
 They’re also aiming to use the human touch as an advantage in an age when customers can buy gifts with a few mouse clicks.
 aims to transform the the typical Santa experience -- where kids sit on his knee and talk about what they want for Christmas -- into an entertainment event that encourages gift buying.
 Other retailers are going after shoppers by linking charity and gift buying.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Discovery Ltd, owner of South Africa’s largest medical-insurance administrator, agreed to buy the 25 percent of the UK’s Prudential Health it doesn’t already own for 155 million pounds ($246 million).
 Discovery will buy out London-based partner Prudential Plc, the UK’s largest insurer by market value, and plans to fund the deal with a combination of internal resources and debt, the Johannesburg-based company said in a statement today.
 The company this year agreed to buy French mobile-phone carrier SFR in a $23 billion deal to combine the asset with Drahi’s Numericable Group.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Apple Inc’s Beats Electronics unveiled new wireless headphones ahead of the holiday season, seeking to attract buyers in a fast-growing part of the market.
 Meantime, the ECB’s buying of asset-backed securities and covered bonds should add $410 billion to its accounts annually.
 So even with the Fed no longer buying $85 billion a month of assets, the aggregate liquidity provided each month by the three major central banks will next year return to this year’s peak of a little more than $150 billion.
 Steinhoff International Holdings Ltd, South Africa’s biggest furniture company, agreed to buy closely held clothing retailer Pepkor for 628 billion rand earlier this week to expand in the discount market.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Wohnen AG said nine-month profit almost doubled after the German property investor took advantage of favorable financing conditions to buy more homes in cities including Berlin.
 Deutsche Wohnen, Germany’s second-largest residential landlord by market value, has been buying apartments in large cities to take advantage of rising rents, and its ability to raise capital on equity and debt markets at favorable terms.
 While the regulator is already expanding its range of asset purchases, it has yet to commit to broad-based bond buying, or quantitative easing.
 While banks offering subsidized “My House, My Life” loans have tightened standards and a slowing economy may take some buyers out of the market, demand will still exceed supply, Chief Financial Officer Leonardo Correa said.
 The rest of MRV’s projects are targeted for buyers “a bit above that level,” he said.
 Correa isn’t alone in believing the “My House, My Life” program will probably be maintained and may even be expanded to include more expensive homes, according to Eduardo Silveira, an analyst at bank BESI Brasil who recommends MRV as buy.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac will let borrowers who have gone through foreclosure buy back their homes at market prices under a policy shift announced by the regulator for the two US-owned companies.
 “While this is a step in the right direction, we encourage FHFA to further help families regain financial footing by permitting principal reduction and allowing all properties in the foreclosure process to benefit from this change to its buyback policies,” she wrote.
 If a sale closes before any deal can be structured to protect creditors’ interests, ConocoPhillips said it may be forced to chase buyers to “unwind undoubtedly complex multi-party transactions” In January 2012, Venezuela’s late President Hugo Chavez vowed in a televised speech that his country wouldn’t recognize international arbitration awards over the nationalizations.
 We are not going to pay them anything” People familiar with the matter said this month PDVSA was continuing to show Citgo Petroleum Corp’s assets to prospective buyers even after the government said it canceled plans to sell the company.
 Inc, who rates the ConocoPhillips shares the equivalent of a buy and personally owns some.
 “There is always a buyer for a price,” Gheit said in a phone interview.
 “If we’re up today that would be the fifth day in a row and we haven’t had that since summer” The S&P 500 has rebounded 95 percent from a six-month low in October amid better-than-estimated corporate results and signs the economy is weathering a global slowdown and the end of the Federal Reserve’s bond-buying program.
 “There’s been a generally positive reaction to earnings, and rates and oil are stabilizing, but the ’buy’ ticket is a much more cautious one” Goldman Target The Chicago Board Options Exchange Volatility index has lost 13 percent in the past four days.
 The cloud-computing provider, which rejected takeover offers in September, also said it may buy as much as $500 million of its own shares in the next two years.
 Jefferies raised its rating on the stock to buy from hold, saying the company’s mobile-games business will help spur advertising sales.
 Small Stimulus The size of stimulus from Japan’s central bank is minuscule compared to the $185 trillion market value of the S&P 500, while ECB bond buying “will be a backstop, not a pitching machine,” according to Peter Cecchini of Cantor Fitzgerald LP, who recommends hedging portfolios through index options.
 An additional 23 percent of Sears’s space is in “questionable” locations, with somewhat better buying power, according to Suzanne Mulvee, CoStar’s director of research in Boston.
 who has a buy rating on Sotheby’s, wrote in aNov.
 phone monopoly, entered talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the wireless carrier co-owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG, two of the people said.
 After agreeing to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 77 billion euros ($96 billion) last year, it acquired Grupo Corporativo Ono SA of Spain.
 Colao, when asked in September whether Liberty Global would be a good fit for the wireless carrier, said he would consider buying it “for the right price” Representatives for Vodafone and Liberty declined to comment.
 Still, Liberty Global’s co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said last month regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone tried to buy its German business.
 By buying EE or O2, BT would add wireless services and a large customer base to complement its existing broadband and TV.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Enbridge Inc, Canada’s largest pipeline operator, will buy a majority stake in two US.
 fell the most in more than seven months in Singapore trading after a tribunal ruled that its Myanmar partner has the right to buy its stake in a joint-venture brewery.
 retains the right to buy Singapore-based F&N’s 55 percent interest in Myanmar Brewery Ltd, the holding company said in an e-mailed statement Oct.
 Some retail analysts aren’t buying it.
 All seven who cover Wix rate the shares a buy, overweight or outperform, with an average price target more than 65 percent above the current level, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 They already represent the biggest group of foreign buyers based on money invested, said Luis Lima, head of the association.
 24 auction, has been buying properties in Lisbon to create a network of outlets to serve the biggest concentration of Chinese residents in Portugal.
 For buyers from outside the European Union, there’s also the prospect of a visa.
 Chinese investors are the top beneficiaries of Portugal’s property-for-visa program, which enables buyers of property worth 500,000 euros or more to live in Portugal and travel freely within the EU.
 Every time Yi or another Chinese buyer made a successful bid, their fellow countrymen stood up and clapped.
 “Lisbon property auction rooms would be empty if it wasn’t for foreign property buyers” Russian Competition When Lisbon city council held an auction on Oct.
 Pigmentparty, a Chinese real estate company with an office in Lisbon, topped a bid by the Portuguese central bank’s pension fund to buy the former headquarters of Banco Santander in Lisbon for 73 million euros, the biggest deal at the auction that day.
 Then a French company bought two palaces located on two of Lisbon’s seven hills before a Russian outbid a Chinese investor to buy a century-old fire-department building in the capital for 3 million euros, almost twice the original asking price, said Antonio Furtado, a city council official at the sale.
 Portuguese investors managed to buy less than 2 million euros of properties out of the 216 million euros raised at the Oct.
 This year, ADM bought Switzerland’s Wild Flavors GmbH for $3 billion, announced a deal to buy Fargo, North Dakota-based Specialty Commodities Inc.
 While its bid to buy Sydney-based Graincorp Ltd.
 ADM is the middleman that buys crops from farmers and stores, hauls and processes them into food, feed and fuel.
 Not even $5 billion-plus in buybacks have had much of an impact on the stock price.
 Susquehanna Financial Group LLP said management or an activist could increase shareholder value by shifting the buyback funds toward a bigger dividend.
 Payouts Preferred Dividends are preferable to buybacks for slow-growing, mature companies, so Western Union should scale back repurchases and instead raise its payout, said Susquehanna’s Stauff.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank will next quarter consider buying sovereign debt in relation to the size of each euro member’s economy if current stimulus proves insufficient, Vice President Vitor Constancio said.
 “If not, we will have to consider buying other assets, including sovereign bonds in the secondary market, the bulkier and more liquid market of securities available.
 It would be a pure monetary policy decision, buying accordingly to our capital key, within our mandate and our legal competence” The comments underline the ECB’s desire to be ready to add more stimulus if needed, with President Mario Draghi last week vowing to revive inflation “as fast as possible” Even so, Constancio reflects a growing consensus on the need to wait to see the impact of existing measures, with Executive Board member Benoit Coeure saying in an interview this week that policy makers “won’t rush” to any decision.
 The idea of delaying quantitative easing until next year makes sense” Germany Target ECB expert committees have been tasked with examining further measures to help boost the region’s near-stagnant economy, even after programs buying up covered bonds and ABS started this year.
 Should the ECB buy sovereign debt, using the capital key would mean German bunds would be the top target.
 The impact of buying sovereign debt would go “well beyond the direct effect on the yields of the purchased securities,” he said.
 Constancio sought to dispel some of the arguments against large-scale sovereign bond-buying in the euro area, saying the argument that such intervention is pointless because yields on government debt are already low “is not well founded” Rates on bonds from Austria to Spain reached record lows today.
 Mainland investors used less than 8 percent of their 105 billion-yuan ($17 billion) quota to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 solar provider that just announced a second acquisition in a year, plans to buy two more companies in 2015, its chief executive officer said.
 “We’ve got an intense focus right now on buying integrators so that we can expand our company,” James Nelson said today in an interview at Bloomberg News headquarters in New York.
 “We want to buy two other companies -- that’ll put us up close to $100 million in revenue.
 That’s ambitious, but it’s our objective” Solar3D, which also is developing a proprietary solar-cell technology it intends to license, last week said it’s buying MD Energy LLC in a deal expected to close by February.
 Most of Solar3D’s customers are in California and prefer buying systems to leasing, Nelson said.
 Talvivaara Mining is seeking to secure enough money to buy the mining operations, associated assets and rights from the bankruptcy estate.
 The measure advanced 73 percent over the previous three trading sessions as the Bank of Japan expanded stimulus and the nation’s pension fund said it will buy more stocks.
 The company, whose market value once topped $7 billion, unsuccessfully sought a buyer last year.
 Wyden and Obama have urged legislation that would make itimpossible for US-based companies to complete inversions bybuying a smaller foreign competitor.
 Catch Everything Else” It included a link to the company’s Vapor Jet 30, a glove that consumers can buy with the logos of any of the 32 National Football League teams.
 “I would be very wary of buying a second property in Singapore as I would have to pay higher taxes, which makes it less attractive,” Fisher, 50, chairman of First Degree Global Asset Management, said in a phone interview.
 Additional taxes for foreigners buying residential property were raised to 15 percent in 2013 from 10 percent, on top of the basic buyer’s stamp duty rate of about 3 percent.
 In 2004, the island-state eased rules to allow foreigners to buy land for development on Sentosa, luring buyers from Australia to Russia.
 The curbs have made home buying prohibitive for foreign investors, said Donald Han, managing director of Chestertons, a real estate broker in Singapore.
 High-net-worth buyers “will wait and pick and choose the right time to enter the market,” Mok said.
 That has made it difficult to find any obvious buying opportunities, he said.
 The ECB may need to expand its asset-buying program to include sovereign bonds if deflation continues to pose a risk for the euro area, the IMF said last week.
 Last December, the Reserve Bank of India restricted foreign institutional investors from buying shares in HDFC Bank after overseas investments had crossed the then 49 percent limit.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Liberty Global Plc co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said that regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone Group Plc tries to buy its German business.
 “It makes perfect sense why Vodafone would buy cable,” Liberty Global CEO Mike Fries said at an investor conference in New York in September.
 Bond Purchases With ECB interest-rate cuts exhausted and purchases of covered bonds and asset-backed securities already under way, Draghi explicitly cited buying government bonds as a possible measure when he spoke to European lawmakers on Nov.
 The offerings will be the first of coupon-bearing debt since the Federal Reserve ended a program of monthly bond-buying under quantitative easing on Oct.
 Fed Purchases The Fed’s bond-buying, the first round of which began in December 2008, helped support demand in the Treasury market.
 “To get the regulatory approvals and paperwork done in the timeframe you’re talking about you can’t afford to keep chop-and-changing what’s in and what’s out” Hulamin Ltd, South Africa’s biggest maker of aluminum products, said today it and a group of companies will buy the casthouse at BHP’s Bayside smelter in the northeastern port of Richards Bay for an undisclosed figure.
 to buy about $700 million of non-performing loans.
 Former Arabtec Chief Executive Officer Hasan Ismaik said in August he rejected an offer from Aabar to buy part of his 279 percent stake in the company.
 to hold a shareholder vote over a $42 billion buyout by Vista Equity Partners LLC despite what investors said was a mistake in the deal by Goldman Sachs Group Inc.
 After reviewing filings in the case, Bouchard said Tibco executives originally miscounted the total number of shares involved in the buyout and Goldman bankers, serving as the board’s financial advisers, failed to confirm the accuracy of that count.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Italy’s government bonds advanced for a second week, pushing the 10-year yield down to a record, amid speculation the European Central Bank will broaden its asset purchases to buy sovereign debt.
 Earlier this week, Draghi said buying government bonds could be a policy tool for expanding stimulus.
 If the ECB actively starts buying financial assets that would be positive for riskier assets” Italy’s 10-year yield fell 13 basis points, or 013 percentage point, this week to 221 percent as of 5 pm.
 The ECB began purchasing asset-backed securities yesterday, part of a stimulus program that already includes record-low interest rates, longer-term bank loans and buying covered bonds.
JBS SA (JBSS3), whose $17 billion buyingspree in the past decade made it the world’s biggest meatproducer, is ready for more deals as record profit reduces debt.
 and Axonic Capital LLC, are also buying nonperforming loans to expand their property holdings.
 25 and changed the range used to buy naira at foreign-exchange auctions to 168 per dollar, plus or minus 5 percent, from within 3 percent of 155.
 17, buying has fallen short of the quota each day since then, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Some fund managers will also need to get approval from their clients before buying shares through the link, said Citigroup’s Rideout.
 12 that Zell was one of three potential bidders for stores to be shed in order for Cerberus to gain regulatory approval for the $92 billion buyout of Safeway, the second-largest US.
 In April 2013, the opening of derivatives trading was delayed for three hours because of a computer breakdown, forcing investors to use a rival exchange operator in Osaka to buy and sell Japanese index contracts.
 “They seem to suggest there had been a significant impact, a knock-on effect to the equities business because of the dark pool issues,” said Shailesh Raikundlia, an analyst at Banco Espirito Santo in London with a buy rating on the stock, adding that the bank’s equities business will probably recover in the fourth quarter.
 GFI managers favor CME’s lower offer because they would be entitled to buy some of the business for themselves as part of the deal, Lutnick said in the statement.
 While the Federal Reserve ended its bond buying program, fueling speculation it will raise benchmark interest rates next year, Japan and the euro area are still ramping up stimulus to ignite lackluster growth.
 European Stimulus The scope for buying eligible asset-backed securities as part of euro-area stimulus “is rather large and purchases of senior tranches alone should make it possible to generate significant volumes,” ECB President Mario Draghi said in letters to European lawmakers.
 added 35 percent after agreeing to buy DSS Group Inc.
 And then we’re buying our Christmas trees from British Columbia, where they’re not having problems” About 20,000 members of the International Longshore and Warehouse Union in 29 ports from San Diego to the Canadian border have been working without a contract since July 1.
 His buyer, a friend in Hong Kong, was expecting them by next week.
 Two analysts have buy ratings on Mexico City-based Santander Mexico, while 13 recommend holding the stock and eight say sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- BMW AG said sports cars may never find as many buyers as they did in the market’s glory days before the global recession.
 “Young, urban upwardly mobile professionals are now able to buy a much wider range of lifestyle vehicles other than sports cars” BMW is boosting sales of its other vehicles even as the sports segment stagnates.
 Intesa reported “better-than-expected third-quarter results on net interest income and provisions,” Annamaria Benassi, a Milan-based analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux who has a buy recommendation on the stock, wrote in a note to clients today.
 They have 50 acres planted in Pinot Noir grapes and have permitted the use of their vineyard name on the labels of wine producers who buy and use the grapes.
 German industrial giant Siemens AG thwarted Sulzer’s dreams of buying Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 If buyers aren’t found it will consult with the affected employees, and if restructuring occurs then redeployment within the company will be prioritized, according to the statement.
 The buyout firms’ 708 billion-euro ($88 billion) offer for PT Portugal was disclosed by Oi on Nov.
 Class A shares of the mutual fund will be available to the general public with a minimum initial investment of $2,000 for most buyers, and the maximum sales charge is listed as 575 percent, according to a prospectus.
 When you drive a Maybach, you may need to explain a little more” After slipping behind BMW and Volkswagen AG’s Audi in global luxury sales, Daimler AG’s Mercedes brand is building on the S-Class to cement its reputation for comfort and lavishness even as it seeks to address younger buyers with cheaper cars such as the CLA coupe.
 firm moves its legal domicile to a lower-tax country, often by buying a rival -- have been around since the 1980s, they entered the public’s consciousness this year as well-known companies including Pfizer Inc.
 That changed in the last year when firms with prominent consumer brands tried to buy companies overseas to reduce their taxes.
 In August, Burger King announced plans to buy Tim Hortons Inc.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Waypoint Leasing, the helicopter lessor backed by billionaires George Soros and Michael Dell, agreed to buy 31 aircraft valued at more than $400 million to meet growing demand from the offshore oil and gas industry.
 agreed to buy market leader Milestone Aviation Group LLC for $178 billion.
 “The demand for helicopters for lease has been very strong, offering benefits much like a fixed-wing lessor” such as lower capital needs to lease rather than buy, access to equipment and reduced residual value risk, Jason Arnold, a financial analyst with RBC Capital Markets, said in an e-mail.
 “It opens the doors to helicopter operation to those that typically wouldn’t want to own, can’t get access to equipment to buy, or are uncertain about their needs longer-term” Fragmented Market Another selling point for investors is a fragmented market where “there weren’t a lot of people doing this.
 Huge Investment “It’s going to take a lot of effort and time to make their products acceptable to the 1 percent of the population that would be the buyers,” said Joe Phillippi, an auto analyst with AutoTrends Consulting.
 “If we don’t know, how do we expect our customers to know?” ‘Stay Consistent’ Luxury buyers aren’t yet sold on Cadillac as a premium brand that ranks among the best in the business, said Michelle Krebs, an analyst with researcher AutoTradercom.
 “Cadillac now has the product it needs, but it needs to build the brand and stay consistent for the long term so that buyers are willing to pay the premium they are charging,” Krebs said.
 economy is able to weather a global slowdown even as the Federal Reserve winds down its bond-buying program.
 ThyssenKrupp has already sold its Steel Americas unit to ArcelorMittal, while failing to find a buyer for its stake in a Brazilian plant.
 Glencore Plc was among the companies looking at buying Nickel West, with its Chief Executive Officer Ivan Glasenberg saying in March the company was “kicking its tires” In August, BHP CEO Andrew Mackenzie said the unit wasn’t “a good fit with either the high-quality assets that we want to have in NewCo or the high-quality business that we are trying to create within BHP” Assets including uranium and diamond mines have been divested as BHP sold $33 billion of projects in the past two years, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The bank started coverage of Vipshop with a rating equivalent to buy.
 Still, “the scale and brand recognition Vipshop has right now is so great, I think the only one who could compete would be Alibaba, and I don’t know if they even want to do that” Of 24 analysts covering the company, 21 have buy recommendations, the highest number since the company’s March 2012 IPO.
 upgraded Barclays Plc to buy from neutral, citing that the Bank of England’s decision to set lower-than-expected minimum regulatory level means the lender is less likely to raise capital.
 Modern Settings LLC, a jeweler that buys precious metals and derivatives set on their prices, claims the companies “were privy to and shared confidential, non-public information about client purchase and sale orders that allowed them to glean information about the direction” of prices.
 Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in March that pushed retirees to buy an individual annuity.
 At least 13 analysts who updated their ratings on Tencent yesterday reiterated recommendations to buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 investors have piled almost $10 billion into ETFs that exclusively buy securities trading abroad, until recently one of the only ways for individuals to gain exposure to businesses from the world’s second-largest economy.
 The program permits international money managers to purchase a net 13 billion yuan ($21 billion) a day of Chinese shares, while also providing a route for mainland investors to buy Hong Kong equities.
 In addition to SEC approval, ETF managers who buy China’s domestic securities need a Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as an RQFII.
 Drones are so easy to buy and fly that users don’t learn the most basic aviation rules used to keep planes from colliding, Michael Barr, who teaches aviation safety at the University of Southern California, said in an interview.
 economy was weathering a global slowdown as the Federal Reserve ended its bond-buying program.
 The world’s largest sporting-goods maker was lowered to neutral, or hold, from buy at Sterne Agee.
 Over the years, many of the 73-year-old media billionaire’s biggest deals, such as buying the Atlanta Braves, have helped his companies to cut their tax bills.
 In the past two years, he has also taken advantage of an Irish tax break to buy prime real estate in central Dublin.
 It’s as though a shareholder sold his stock and then used the proceeds to buy stock in the new company.
 He has also spent a combined 130 million euros ($163 million) to buy three of Dublin’s most central hotels: the Westin, the Trinity Capital Hotel and the Hilton Dublin, according to CBRE Global Research and Consulting.
 In early 2012, Ireland introduced a capital gains tax holiday for investors buying Irish real estate who hold onto it for seven years.
 In an interview last year, Malone talked about his motivations for buying the castle.
 Banks can buy shares in a maximum of two financial institutions, with a limit of 5 percent for any stake that has voting rights, the central bank said today.
 Only banks with bad-debt ratios of less than 3 percent can buy stakes in other credit institutions, according to the regulation.
 China may cut banks’ reserve requirements and interest rates before the end of this year as the government enters a “crisis-prevention” mode to avoid an economic hard-landing, helping to improve housing affordability to homebuyers, Mizuho Securities Co’s Hong Kong-based analyst Alan Jin wrote in a report today.
 market will go toward convergence just like all the other markets, there’s no reason it should be an exception” EE has started offering TV set-top boxes to go with its broadband service, which it’s able to provide by buying capacity from BT Group Plc’s fixed-line network.
 Orange agreed in September to buy Spanish broadband provider Jazztel Plc to offer the packages.
 households buy at least some of their telecommunications services together, up from 29 percent in 2005, when Telefonica agreed to buy O2, according to data from regulator Ofcom.
 While BT already struck a mobile partnership with EE, buying a network would give it more flexibility on pricing and make it a more formidable competitor.
 One way to do that is by bundling phone, Internet and TV into one package, and that means providers need to buy whichever of the three they don’t have.
 BT jumped 37 percent yesterday in London trading after the company said it was in “highly preliminary” talks about buying a wireless operator.
 My main concern is Europe, but then again, Draghi seems headed towards quantitative easing and if necessary, he will do more” Corporate Earnings BNP’s European “Love-Panic” sentiment gauge fell to minus 3565, signaling the equity market is in buy territory, and implying gains of as much as 20 percent over the next six months, according to Martial Godet, a strategist at BNP Paribas.
 The ECB began buying covered bonds last month as part of a strategy to revive prices, boost lending and spur growth.
 Despite those warnings, investors worldwide have made about $1 trillion buying and selling US.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV, which last redesigned the 300 in 2011 as a halo car for a resurgent brand, will show the latest model in Los Angeles today in a bid to lure buyers from General Motors Co.
 Success will be determined by keeping discounts low and by winning buyers from competitors With large sedans, “you just don’t get that much more for your money,” he said.
 Incidental Powers In the same 2012 ruling, Wheeler wrote that he didn’t buy a government assertion that authority for demanding equity came from the “incidental powers” section of the Federal Reserve Act, which deals with unspecified actions needed “to carry on the business of banking” “For purposes of the government’s motion to dismiss,” the New York Fed’s incidental powers “did not authorize it” to condition an emergency loan “on AIG’s issuance of stock,” Wheeler wrote.
 was in talks to buy it.
 is in talks to buy the studio.
 In a short sale, investors sell borrowed shares, and profit when a stock falls by buying cheaper shares that are returned to the lender.
 are pushing management to be more aggressive with cost cuts and to buy back stock if the chemical maker can sell an Alberta oil terminal, people familiar with the activists’ positions said.
 As for the proceeds, a “share buyback is certainly one of the options that we recognize is available to us,” he said.
 Tony Griffin, a partner in Toronto-based West Face, said on the same conference call that a share buyback was “our strong preference” In addition, he said Canexus’s general and administrative costs of about C$40 million a year are “exceedingly high” FrontFour, a Greenwich, Connecticut-based fund, met last month with Wonnacott, who has been CEO since July, one of the people said.
 Canexus may be pressured to take a lower price because prospective buyers know it’s keen to sell, he said.
 The upgrade by HSBC means there are now as many analysts with a buy or equivalent recommendation on Tesco as there are that have a sell rating.
 Congress passed a sweeping patent law in 2011 and courts have ruled against companies whose sole business is to buy up patents and try to collect royalties on them.
 gains traction, Chinese manufacturing is slowing and the European Central Bank is buying bonds to spark expansion.
 is the second-biggest copper buyer, followed by Germany.
 “It looks as though Saudi is playing out a price war strategy to crowd out other high-cost producers in order to maintain their market share of oil exports” Forwards One-year Saudi Riyal forward contracts weakened, almost tripling the premium demanded by buyers of the kingdom’s currency to 7550 points over the spot rate of 37517 per dollar.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Securian Financial Group Inc, the insurer formed in 1880, agreed to buy a majority stake in Asset Allocation & Management Co.
 “AAM has a strong reputation in the insurance asset-management market and a diversified base of clients” Insurers have been buying asset managers to add fee revenue from third-party clients.
 agreed this month to buy Conning Holdings Corp, which focuses on insurance clients.
 It announced agreements in 2011 to buy two units from Munich Re and a life insurance business from Bank of America Corp.
 Chief Executive Officer Mark Fields has said that efficiency is the most important feature for buyers of the Dearborn, Michigan-based company’s pickups.
 “You have to wonder what the overall gain is going to be in the end” By cutting 700 pounds Ford is able to lower the truck’s center of gravity and give a better driving dynamic and make other improvements that will also appeal to buyers, said Doug Scott, Ford’s truck marketing manager.
 That could mean pressure on Zoetis for a sale, restructuring or increased dividends and share buybacks.
 Zoetis’s plan would allow shareholders to buy preferred stock at a discount if one investor takes a stake of 15 percent or more, the company said yesterday in a statement.
 Activist Plans Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 “Investors are thinking ‘not again,’ with negative news coming out one after another,” said Nobuyuki Fujimoto, a senior market analyst at SBI Securities Co, a Japanese online brokerage.
 mobile-phone carrier, was represented by Sullivan & Cromwell LLP in its deal to buy closely held Iusacell, the third-largest wireless operator in Mexico, from billionaire Ricardo Salinas.
 The acquisition will take place after Salinas closes a deal to buy the 50 percent of Iusacell owned by Grupo Televisa SAB, AT&T said in a statement.
 Gregory, previously a partner at Proskauer Rose LLP, focuses on structuring employment agreements, equity compensation, performance incentives, deferred compensation, change-in-control protections, management participation in buyouts and new ventures, and severance and separation arrangements.
 Bruce Keller, a lawyer for ABC who said he was speaking for all the broadcasters, told Lane today that the companies were concerned about whether a potential buyer of Aereo’s assets could be made “free and clear” of links to the litigation.
 Allergan has been seeking its own deals, which might make it too big for Valeant to buy.
 The bids are holding back gains in the Shanghai Composite Index as investors avoid buying stocks that already trade to keep their cash available, said West China Securities Co.
 The impact of IPOs on China’s stock-market performance isn’t strong enough to guide investors’ buying and selling decisions, said Fraser Howie, a director at Newedge Singapore and the co-author of “Red Capitalism: The Fragile Financial Foundation of China’s Extraordinary Rise” Government policy changes or economic data may outweigh the IPO effect, he said.
 “Selling and buying stocks during IPO subscription periods has become the rule,” said Zheshang Securities’s Wang.
 The BOE and Fed have stopped buying assets.
 In the 2013 interview to Bloomberg TV India, he had said the Group was considering buying a fertilizer plant in the US.
 That’s the real impact that all of these bottlenecks have on a company and corporations” The group may look to buy some assets being sold by Holcim Ltd.
 Modern Settings LLC, a jeweler that buys precious metals and derivatives set on their prices, claims the companies “were privy to and shared confidential, non-public information about client purchase and sale orders that allowed them to glean information about the direction” of prices.
 Modern Settings needs a judge’s approval before it can represent other buyers of the metals.
 “Record production levels confirm contractors are making good operational progress” Genel today announced a deal with Iraq’s Kurdistan to develop Miran and Bina Bawi gas fields and agreed to buy OMV AV’s stake in Bina Bawi for $150 million as Turkey said the country plans to build a pipeline to import the fuel.
 We look at the best companies in both exchanges” Until the Hong Kong-Shanghai stock link starts, a Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as a QFII, or Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as an RQFII, is needed for foreign asset managers to buy A-shares.
 Once the license is obtained, the investor also needs to submit an application to China’s State Administration of Foreign Exchange for a specific dollar amount of investment quota that they can use to buy mainland stocks.
 “Today the problem that people have for China is that when they want to buy, you buy what’s available in Hong Kong, it’s either old economy largely and things that have had their growth peak,” he said.
 Sale Abandoned Rio Tinto, which has completed asset sales worth $25 billion in the past two years according to data compiled by Bloomberg, last year abandoned plans to divest the diamonds unit after failing find a buyer and deciding not to pursue an initial public offering of the unit.
 In addition to their Dow director fees, Third Point is paying Miller and Milchovich $250,000 each plus a further $250,000 to buy Dow shares when they join the board, Third Point said in a Nov.
 The company is raising its dividend to a record, making additional share buybacks and is in the process of selling as much as $85 billion of low-margin assets.
 It also got an additional $773 million in loans to buy out its partner on the property, Fortress Investment Group LLC, according to documents for investors in a bond offering linked to the complex.
 said buyers have been found for about 60 percent of the 310 units at the initial phase of the Metropolis, the first ground-up condominium project in downtown Los Angeles since the Ritz-Carlton Residences were completed more than four years ago.
 India, which has border disputes with China and Pakistan, is the world’s biggest arms buyer.
 Valeant has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The two sides also disagreed over whether Valeant and Pershing Square had taken substantial steps toward making a tender offer to Allergan’s shareholders, as opposed to preparing for a negotiated merger with Allergan, as early as February when PS Fund 1 started buying Allergan shares.
 “They’re buying cars not just because their car broke down, but because they might want something new and flashy, which signifies that they aren’t being completely risk-averse” Sales rose five years in a row twice since 1927, according to data compiled by researcher Autodata Corp.
 Deliveries will wind down as recent buyers pay down leases and loans, he said.
 “Certainly we’ve seen a lot of demand growth, and automakers have matched production to what people are willing to buy,” she said.
 “If you have a job, you’re more likely to buy a car.
 “Consumers are seeing that it’s marginally more expensive to buy a new car, and it’s hard to beat that new-car smell if it doesn’t come at a hefty premium,” Gutierrez said.
 Combined with the raises, that means “I’ll actually be able to buy a little something this year” for the holidays, Carpenter said.
 “Our customers are shopping more frequently and buying more on each trip,” Chief Executive Officer Bob Sasser said on a Nov.
 They are buying a wide spectrum of items, including basic necessities and more discretionary items, he said.
 The securities have the same credit risk as sovereign debt that Israel sells in global capital markets and pay a premium because buyers can’t sell them.
 “Officially the need is that we keep it for a rainy day when no bank in the world will give us money, and then only our brethren Jews will buy bonds.
 While Israel has grown to be a $291 billion economy with a better debt-to-domestic-production ratio than the US, it’s still expanding the borrowing program to record levels and finding buyers that include more than 80 US.
 Engage Diaspora “It’s an attractive return, more attractive than many other fixed-income opportunities,” said Thomas DiNapoli, comptroller of New York’s $180 billion state pension fund, which has been buying the bonds since the late 1990s.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Japanese investors are buying Asian assets like never before as Prime Minister Shinzo Abe’s policies make the yen a lucrative means to fund bets on regional growth.
 The fund, which plans to add more Japanese stocks and reduce local bonds, must be ready to buy more shares should Abe’s policies succeed, Tokihiko Shimizu, director general of GPIF’s research department, said in an interview yesterday.
 Alibaba, with 307 million active buyers as of September, is luring more sellers to its e-commerce sites by providing advertising tools that analyze user preferences.
 in New York, who recommends buying Alibaba stock.
 with a buy rating on the stock.
 Even so, the company is still down 39 percent this year since the Chancellor Exchequer George Osborne scrapped rules in his 2014 budget that pushed retirees to buy an annuity.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore developers struggling to sell apartments in their home market are buying property overseas, turning the island-state into the largest foreign investor from the region this year.
 Additional taxes for foreigners buying residential property were raised to 15 percent in 2013 from 10 percent, on top of the basic buyer’s stamp duty rate of about 3 percent.
 The country’s sovereign wealth fund, GIC Pte, isn’t allowed to invest in Singapore property and has instead been a major buyer of overseas real estate.
 Ho Bee, which has invested in office towers in London and is developing homes in Melbourne and Gold Coast in Australia, is scouting for more buying opportunities in Sydney and London, Woon said.
 OUE Ltd, owner of Singapore’s Mandarin Gallery shopping mall, agreed to buy US.
 Companies including Edita Food Industries SAE, a snacks maker part-owned by London-based buyout firm Actis LLP, and Etisalat Misr SAE, the Egyptian unit of Emirates Telecommunications Corp.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Uday Kotak’s bank surged to a record in Mumbai stock trading after it agreed to buy ING Vysya Bank Ltd.
 The deal implies a price of 790 rupees per ING Vysya share, the buyer said.
 “East African investors, where their markets have become expensive, are looking to places like Ghana where you’ve had a currency crisis and potential value being created in the market and buying opportunities” Ghanaian shares advanced, with lenders including HFC Bank Ltd.
 said it would buy out Baker Hughes Inc.
 Last week, Technip SA of France proposed to buy CGG SA.
 oil and gas exploration company, today agreed on terms to buy Salamander Energy Plc.
 “If Congress cannot agree on a smooth, more certain path forward, I urge you, Director Watt, to engage the Treasury Department in talks to end the conservatorship” Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy mortgages from lenders and package them into securities, have been under US.
 For KKR’s fourth Europe buyout fund, investors will receive all the profits from asset sales until a minimum rate, the hurdle, is met, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 The investment hurdle, which is common to most buyout funds and typically set at about 8 percent, is designed to compensate backers for the longer holding period a private-equity investment requires compared with other asset classes.
 While leveraged-buyout firms such as Permira Advisers LLP and CVC Capital Partners Ltd.
 While no previous KKR European vehicle has the hurdle, the firm has added it to other buyout funds including KKR North America Fund XI LP, which raised $9 billion in 2012, said a person with knowledge of the matter.
 KKR, using its own balance sheet, is already buying stakes in companies that will eventually be offered to investors in the new fund, according to the people.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Deere & Co, the world’s largest farm-equipment maker, forecast lower-than-expected earnings for fiscal 2015 as a slump in crop prices means farmers are buying fewer of the company’s most profitable machines.
 Until recently, North American farmers were buying bigger and more sophisticated machines, buoyed by surging corn and soybean prices.
 agreed to pay $680 million to buy Prosensa Holding NV to add a potential treatment for Duchenne muscular dystrophy to its rare-diseases portfolio.
 Pfizer posted the worst underperformance among the buyers analyzed.
 agreed to buy Platinum Underwriters Holdings Ltd.
 The buyer will pay 75 million of its shares and about $116 billion in cash, according to the statement.
 ‘Feeding Frenzy’ Potential buyers “will see no way of getting their growth or actually keeping themselves from shrinking, or margins deteriorating, and they see this as their only option,” Greenberg said on an Oct.
 Hedge-fund investors including Dan Loeb and David Einhorn have pushed into reinsurance in recent years to help gain access to premiums that they can use to buy securities.
 Hamilton Insurance Group Ltd, the reinsurer backed by hedge-fund firm Two Sigma Investments LLC, struck a deal last month to buy units from Fairfax Financial Holdings Ltd.
 in July terminated its offer to buy Aspen Insurance Holdings Ltd.
 RenaissanceRe’s senior management team will remain in place, and the combined company will keep the buyer’s name and headquarters, according to the statement.
 Annual cost savings tied to the deal are expected to be about $30 million, the buyer said in a presentation.
 Chicago, New York The deal also helps RenaissanceRe expand in the US, where Platinum has 86 employees and the buyer has 8, excluding the Weather Predict operation.
 Draghi explicitly cited government bond-buying as a policy tool in Brussels on Nov.
 An explicit announcement that the central bank is prepared to buy sovereign bonds is likely at the ECB’s Dec.
 “I do think it’s inevitable,” said Christopher Grisanti, co-founder of Grisanti Capital Management, referring to government bond buying.
 About $6 billion was wiped off the UK’s insurance industry’s market value in March after Chancellor of Exchequer George Osborne’s budget scrapped rules that pushed Britain’s retirees to buy an annuity.
 13 (Bloomberg) -- DP World Ltd, the operator of ports from China to Peru, agreed to buy an industrial parks company for $26 billion in a deal that may help Dubai World pay debt five years after its near default roiled global markets.
 Shares of DP World closed 27 percent higher in Dubai after the company said in an e-mailed statement it agreed to buy Economic Zones World FZE, which operates the Jebel Ali Free Zone in the emirate.
 “So we pre-empted any such move and made a compelling case to Dubai World” for the buyout, he said.
 LNB recently asked for first-round bids and could select a buyer in about a month, the people said.
 said last month it agreed to buy Integrity Bancshares Inc.
 “A lot of stocks are presenting very impressive buying opportunities for long-term investors,” Ayodeji Ebo, the head of research at Afrinvest West Africa Ltd.
 Share prices for companies including FBN Holdings Plc and Guaranty Trust Bank Plc are not reflective of company earnings and investors should “buy into dips,” he said.
 Graham Ryding, analyst at Toronto-Dominion Bank, downgraded his stock rating to hold from buy today.
 It implemented a new round of stimulus to ward off deflation by buying covered bonds last month and is scheduled to meet again on Nov.
 To copy Minsheng’s plan, state banks would need to boost their valuations or buy shares on the open market to issue to employees, according to CICC’s Huang.
 Voya has agreed to buy $175 million of its stock, according to the statement.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- APM Terminals BV, the port operator owned by AP Moeller-Maersk A/S, wants to buy more ports in Turkey, a market where container volumes are growing twice as fast as the economy.
 Because Ukraine wasn’t able to buy gas from the EU and store it during the summer months when gas is cheaper, it lost about $800 million in potential savings, he said.
 In addition to hiring Gross, the firm recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 offered to buy United Envirotech Ltd.
 Following the completion of the offer, Citic and KKR will buy from S$50 million to S$150 million of shares in United Envirotech.
 One loonie buys 8902 US.
 Federal Reserve ended a bond-buying program as scheduled last month and is now debating when to raise interest rates for the first time since 2006 as the world’s largest economy gathers momentum.
 Both the S&P 500 and the Dow closed at all-time highs last week amid optimism the Bank of Japan’s stimulus will fill some of the gap left by the end of Federal Reserve bond buying.
 of America Holdings will buy Covance Inc, four law firms were involved.
 Justice Department said in an antitrust complaint filed yesterday in federal court in Manhattan that CineMedia responded to an increase in Screenvision’s market share by buying its only real competitor.
 Nautilus can either extend the charter or buy the vessel after that.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Howard Lutnick’s BGC Partners Inc, the interdealer broker that made a hostile bid to buy GFI Group Inc.
 CME Group Inc, owner of the world’s biggest futures market, said in July it would buy GFI for $580 million to expand its reach into European energy trading.
 “Some are returning cash to shareholders, some are saying the yields are very low, we’re going to have some use for it” Borrowing costs are falling as traders and investors speculate the European Central Bank will buy corporate bonds as part of its asset-purchase program to revive the region’s economy.
 That leaves less cash for dividends, which Vale has been reducing since a record $12 billion in 2011, including a $3 billion share buyback, to this year’s $42 billion.
 “The market is not so heated, therefore the conditions to negotiate with contracted suppliers is more favorable to the buyers” Vale cut investments to $823 billion in the first nine months of 2014, 21 percent less than in the same period last year, it said Oct.
 Less than 26 percent of analysts recommend buying the company’s American depositary receipts, the fewest since at least late 1999, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In addition to hiring Gross, Janus recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 We were sort of a cable company without the protections” Kanojia said he considered selling the company or its intellectual property before deciding to file for bankruptcy, but buyers were deterred by the unresolved litigation.
 investor conference in New York, said the investment pause didn’t include commitments for more broadband made as part of his company’s bid for regulatory permission to buy DirecTV.
 The company, which took on $10 billion in debt to buy Guidant, wrote down $27 billion tied to the deal in 2008.
 Bidding War Boston Scientific eventually won the bidding war, buying Guidant for $275 billion, with Guidant paying J&J a $705 million termination fee.
 agreed to buy Internet provider Neotel Pty Ltd.
 “The fall in prices has predictably slowed selling activity at origin, while roasters take the opportunity to buy and continue to watch weather forecasts,” Volcafe said, referring to rainfall Brazil needs for the 2015-16 crop to blossom.
 Investors in most mutual funds can buy or sell shares once a day, typically after markets close, and only directly with the fund.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 “Because of the scalebacks, institutions will be underweight and there is likely to be solid buying tomorrow as they top up their holdings” The sale price values Medibank at 229 times estimated earnings for the year ending June 2015, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Greene King Plc agreed to buy Spirit Pub Co.
 7 (Bloomberg) -- Hedge fund manager Dan Loeb increased bets on the least creditworthy homebuyers as he adjusted the mortgage-related holdings that accounted for half of investment profits this year at Third Point Reinsurance Ltd.
 and Deutsche Bank AG managed the sale and proceeds will be used for share buybacks and dividends as well as other business purposes, according to a company regulatory filing today.
 Investor Base “Apple has already issued a lot in the dollar bond market to fund large share buybacks,” said Jon Brager, a London-based senior credit analyst at Hermes Investment Management, which manages $45 billion in assets.
 The company, which had authorized a $90 billion share buyback program, has repurchased $679 billion of shares as of Sept.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- BCE Inc, Canada’s largest telecommunications company, agreed to buy Glentel Inc.
 Glentel also runs 147 outlets in Australia and the Philippines after buying the Australian assets in 2012.
 The company will offer iTunes gift cards to shoppers who buy certain products and Apple will make a donation to the Global Fund to fight AIDS.
 after some investors asked the companies to buy back the shares they held, the two companies said in statements today.
 According to regulations in South Korea, a company can call off a merger should buyback requests reach a level that could increase its financial burden.
 Samsung Heavy had to buy back 9235 billion won of stock from shareholders opposed to the merger, according to a regulatory filing today.
 1 they could call off the plan should the buyback reach more than 950 billion won and 410 billion won, respectively.
 Samsung Heavy is buying back 12 million of its own shares from the market in efforts to “enhance shareholder value,” the company said Oct.
 Acquisition Strategy “We buy things to enhance what IBM can become,” he said.
 (600584), China’s biggest chip tester, entered into an agreement with Temasek Holdings Pte about buying control of unprofitable Singaporean competitor Stats ChipPac Ltd.
 JCET will begin 30-day exclusive talks to buy the state investment company’s 84 percent stake in Stats ChipPac, said one of the people, who asked not to be identified discussing private information.
 Both the junior and senior creditors have assailed Caesars’ directors, including David Bonderman, co-founder of buyout firm TPG Capital, and Apollo Global Management LLC’s Marc Rowan.
 TPG and Apollo took Caesars private in a $30 billion leveraged buyout in 2008 that loaded the gambling company with more debt than it can handle.
 That wealth was supposed to buy the island independence from Denmark.
 An additional 23 percent of Sears’s space is in “questionable” locations, with somewhat better buying power, according to Suzanne Mulvee, CoStar’s director of research in Boston.
 has structured a deal in which he buys businesses in exchange for stock that has appreciated.
 (RCAP) terminated anagreement to buy Cole Capital from American Realty CapitalProperties Inc.
 While more than half of analysts still have buy ratings, at least nine of the 21 covering the stock cut forecasts after the casino operator this month reported a 50 percent plunge in quarterly profit.
 A 12 percent rally in the stock since the start of a share buyback on Nov.
 “It’s good that Genting is returning cash to shareholders but the scale of the buyback is too small to have a meaningful impact,” Richard Huang, an analyst at CLSA in Hong Kong, said by phone on Nov.
 The downside for Genting appears limited as the share buyback provides support for the stock in the short term, according to Macquarie Funds Management.
 Through yesterday, the company spent S$638 million ($49 million) buying back 586 million shares, the latest regulatory filings show.
 House Wins “The buyback does provide a perceived backstop for the stock,” Sam Le Cornu, senior portfolio manager at Macquarie Funds, said by phone on Nov.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Russians, who for years endured some of the highest prices for Apple Inc’s iPhone, can buy the latest model for less than what shoppers pay elsewhere in Europe.
 “The days of buying Apple gadgets for friends when I visit New York are over” Russian prices still don’t beat the US, where the iPhone 6 without a carrier contract starts at about $650 before taxes.
 Petersburg, where people could travel just 100 kilometers (62 miles) across the Finnish border and buy anything ranging from clothes to gadgets.
 Those coming to Russia to shop include entrepreneurs from ex-Soviet republics, who used to travel to other European countries or Hong Kong to buy iPhones and then resell them in their own countries, according to Eldar Murtazin, an analyst at Mobile Research Group in Moscow.
 Local Demand Non-Russians working in the country are also opting to buy iPhones locally, whereas previously they bought them when visiting their homelands, said Alexander Malis, chief executive officer of Euroset, a handset retailer co-owned by mobile-phone operators OAO MegaFon and VimpelCom Ltd.
 Merchants on Tmall are encouraged to offer pre-orders this year to ease Internet traffic on Singles’ Day and also guarantee their ability to buy goods, said Brian Lee, who oversees distribution in China of Elle handbags and purses.
 Yields on 10-year Treasuries have dropped to 235 percent from 3 percent in December 2013, defying analyst predictions for the opposite to happen as the Fed ended its monthly bond-buying program.
 “There’s a huge risk that consumers will buy what they would have bought anyway, just for less,” Bubb said.
 “Discussion of the house will fade away bit by bit” Televisa House Rivera, 45, said she agreed in 2012 to buy the house built for her for 54 million pesos ($4 million) over eight years with a 9 percent interest rate.
 Larger investors can only buy once trading starts.
 “Local and regional institutions will be the number one buyers as they were kept away from the IPO process,” said Yazan Abdeen, lead fund manager at Jeddah-based Sedco Capital.
 is in talks to buy the “Shrek” studio.
 DreamWorks Animation, which has previously looked for a buyer, expanded its TV business and acquired Awesomeness TV, an online video network, while forming a partnership in China that includes live entertainment.
 “As long as central banks are pushing stocks, there is really a big support beneath this move” German equities have climbed 16 percent since their low last month amid optimism that exporters will benefit from a weaker euro as the European Central Bank looks into broadening its asset-buying program.
 7 that it wants talks on possible cooperation after buying the stake and that it doesn’t plan to add to the holding.
 “Fugro is the most protected company on the Amsterdam stock exchange, as it has several lines of defense, including a poison-pill structure,” Andre Mulder, an Amsterdam-based analyst at Kepler Cheuvreux with a buy recommendation on the stock, said in a report to investors.
 “The value-add or value proposition you bring to the enterprise has to be significantly better than the savings you get from putting it on Amazon’s cloud,” said Fidacaro, who rates the stock a buy.
 The world’s largest maker of farm equipment forecast 2015 profit that trailed estimates as farmers buy fewer high-horsepower tractors and combines after crop prices fell.
 Aramex would never buy planes for an in-house delivery fleet since a jump in wide-body orders at carriers led by Dubai-based Emirates and Qatar Airways Ltd.
 climbed last week to the highest level since December 2007 as Americans grew more upbeat about the state of the economy, their financial well-being and the buying climate.
 It “offers hope to retailers heading into the holidays” Today’s sentiment report showed the buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to purchase goods and services, increased to 351, the highest since November 2007, before the last recession began, from 328 the prior period.
 Declining gas prices and improving sentiment about personal finances and the buying climate may explain why Cracker Barrel Old Country Store, Inc.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Ophir Energy Plc confirmed its interest in acquiring Salamander Energy Plc, which said last week it was in talks with two possible buyers.
 organic food line that it agreed to buy for $820 million in September.
 Rieder and Miller made the right calls on how the Federal Reserve’s tapering of its bond buying program would affect the mortgage market.
 They predicted that even as the Fed cut its mortgage bond buying, the issuance of mortgages was low enough to prevent a buildup of excess MBS supply.
 Investors should “sell what the Fed has been buying because they won’t be buying them when taper ends in October,” Gross wrote on March 7.
 Still, they are looking for bargains when they buy, with 74 percent of those surveyed by Deloitte saying they would be influenced by a coupon or promotional offer, the same proportion as last year.
 Nationstar has been expanding by buying mortgage servicing rights.
 25 (Bloomberg) -- Stressed asset ratios at Indian banks are set to reach the highest in more than a decade as lenders find fewer buyers for their soured debt after a new rule tripled the cost for asset reconstruction companies.
 5, ARCs must triple the amount of their own money they use when buying soured debt to at least 15 percent of the price.
 Reduced interest among ARCs to buy bad loans is threatening to curb a pick-up in credit growth amid a decline in bank non-performing assets and signs of a recovery in the $19 trillion Indian economy under Prime Minister Narendra Modi.
 The sale of bad loans to reconstruction companies in the second quarter was abysmal” 2002 Law Asset reconstruction companies buy soured debt and its collateral from lenders and work to recover it by reorganizing the business and assets.
 He began buying oil and gas producers in the region in 1997, uniting them into Irkutsk Oil Co, Russia’s 10th-largest oil producer.
 in what turned out to be a $42 billion buyout by Vista Equity Partners, an investor said in a lawsuit.
 About 20 percent of parents plan to buy “Frozen” gifts for their daughters, the Washington-based trade group found in its annual study.
 25-Year Contracts Brazil will buy a record 5 million metric tons of LNG this year as the worst drought in decades is reducing output from dams, according to estimates from London-based consultants Energy Aspects Ltd.
 Bolognesi has signed 25-year contracts to buy LNG from countries in the Atlantic basin, Rutzen said by phone.
 “This is the first time Brazil is buying gas in long-term contracts,” Marco Tavares, chairman of Rio de Janeiro-based consultants Gas Energy, said by phone today.
 A property slump and slowdown in investment growth put China, the biggest buyer, on course for the weakest full-year growth since 1990.
 The San Francisco-based company is also known for turning down Steve Jobs, Apple’s late CEO, when he offered to buy Dropbox in late 2009.
 has agreed to buy towers across Nigeria and Brazil for more than $22 billion, furthering the US.
 Three days earlier, American Tower agreed to buy 6,480 transmission sites in Brazil for about $12 billion.
 Crown Castle paid $48 billion to buy or lease 9,700 AT&T Inc.
 Plastic, Metal After joining Hewlett-Packard, Weisler put those skills to work on winning a contract to supply 15 million PCs to a buyer in India.
 The industrial side of the business has attracted interest from both private-equity firms and possible strategic buyers, though the sale process is in the very early stages and there is no guarantee a deal will get done, said the people.
 “The region’s housing stock would have to be digested internally because foreign investors tend to avoid buying property with currency risk” The Nov.
 Potential Fallout While investors are still buying assets in Catalonia, some are beginning to weigh the potential fallout resulting from a decision to break away from the rest of Spain, said Jeff Greensmith, founder of Tarragona-based property brokerage Fincasdirectcom.
 “Clients do ask what are the chances of Catalonia becoming independent,” said Greensmith, whose firm specializes in sales of Catalan homes to foreign buyers.
 Goldman Sachs Group Inc-backed Cell Site Solutions Cessaode Infraestruturas SA and American Tower were among potentialbuyers, people familiar with the matter said in May.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- The Bank of Japan’s record bond buying is crowding out individual buyers, narrowing the investor base for the world’s second-largest bond market.
 The government last month canceled sales of sovereign notes maturing in 2016 through financial companies to households because buyers would have to pay more in broker fees than they would get in interest, according to the Ministry of Finance.
 “The BOJ’s massive JGB buying is hampering efforts to increase sales to individual investors,” said Toru Suehiro, a market economist in Tokyo at Mizuho Securities Co, one of the 23 primary dealers obliged to bid at government bond auctions.
 The Ministry of Finance, by contrast, needs to spur demand from a broad range of buyers as 10972 trillion yen of debt come due this fiscal year, bigger than Indonesia’s economic output.
 “Institutional investors can still make money elsewhere even if yields on some of their bills they hold fall below zero, but for individuals, it doesn’t make sense to buy and hold two-year notes and lose money” Bank Deposits Interest on deposits at Bank of Tokyo Mitsubishi UFJ Ltd, a unit of Japan’s biggest banking group, has been held at about 002 percent since September 2010, according to its Website.
 “It is just difficult to buy now and think, ‘My goodness me there is a fantastic upside’” Exports Sputter The nation is also facing weaker demand from overseas.
 By contrast, foreigners have been buying in the Philippines and Indonesia.
 ECMC will review all programs at the schools it’s buying and eliminate those that underperform, giving students options that include refunds.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank published the legal act for purchases of asset-backed securities, setting it up to start buying the debt as soon as tomorrow.
 That’s in line with comments from Executive Board member Yves Mersch, who has said the ECB will start buying ABS this week.
 By underwriting the share sale, banks agree to purchase any stock that investors don’t buy.
 The automaker realized it needed to aim higher when it noticed 20 percent of the buyers of the Sport edition traded in a luxury car and almost all the buyers of that version ordered it fully loaded, according to Matt Zuehlk, the marketing manager for the new platinum version.
 American car buyers are embracing SUVs again as the average price of a gallon of gasoline in the US.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Tetraphase Pharmaceuticals Inc, a maker of antibiotics to treat serious infections, is exploring a sale after attracting interest from potential buyers, people familiar with the matter said.
 Roche-Intermune The largest such deal this year is Roche’s agreement to buy InterMune Inc, an unprofitable company that’s developing a treatment for a rare lung disease, for more than $8 billion in cash.
 agreed to buy Idenix Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 The Hong Kong and Shanghai bourses have finished work on a trading connection that will enable foreigners to directly buy more mainland shares.
 The potash spot price in Brazil may climb to $400 per ton in the first quarter from $380 as the country buys the granular form of potash that Solikamsk-2 mostly produced, Yuminov said.
 Shanghai-based Fosun International Ltd, which is bidding to take control of Club Mediterranee SA, obtained a seven-year 550 million euro ($683 million) loan in April to help buy the insurance unit of Portuguese lender Caixa Geral de Depositos SA.
 agreed in April to buy Biomet Inc.
 “When GTAT’s management expressed obvious concerns to Apple regarding the deal terms during the contract negotiations, Apple responded that similar terms are required for other Apple suppliers and that GTAT should ‘Put on your big boy pants and accept the agreement’” Apple originally offered to buy 2,600 sapphire growing furnaces, which would have been the largest order for the supplier, the executive said.
 explorer, this month said it was interested in buying Salamander, saying their combined business would have a strong balance sheet and enhanced operating capability in Africa and Southeast Asia.
 OAO Lukoil led a 08 percent jump in the Micex Index as BCS Financial started coverage of the oil company with a buy rating.
 Home Partners, formerly called Hyperion Homes Inc, has been buying “in the best neighborhoods and they were buying more and more houses and needed more capital,” Ranieri said.
 Purchase Option The company offers tenants an opportunity to select a house they’d like to own and rent it for as long as five years before exercising their right to buy, giving them time to repair their credit or save for a down payment.
 Five single-family landlords have sold shares in initial public offerings and there have been more than 11 bond-market securitizations totaling about $6 billion announced in the past 12 months, allowing landlords to recoup much of the cash they spent buying and renovating homes, and giving them an opportunity to earn higher returns on the capital still invested.
 Institutional investors are defined as companies that buy at least 10 rental properties in a calendar year, according to the Irvine, California-based real estate information company.
 DP World Ltd, which trades on Nasdaq Dubai, a separate gauge, rose to a six-week high, after the company, which operates ports from China to Peru, agreed to buy Dubai’s industrial parks operator Economic Zones World FZE and said it plans to delist from the London Stock Exchange.
 The company also authorized a $150 million stock buyback.
 The share buybacks are “a testimony to our confidence and the strength of the future cash generation of our business” King, based in Dublin, rose 4 percent to $1372.
 The company, founded in 2001, lets customers buy tickets for government-authorized lotteries and bet on sports events through its website.
 rewarded investors with a profit of about $254 billion for agreeing to buy the record $49 billion of bonds it sold in September 2013 as the price of the securities surged.
 The Alibaba debt sale was “priced to move, but it certainly wasn’t like the Verizon deal,” Scott Colyer, chief executive officer of Monument, Colorado-based Advisors Asset Management Inc, which oversees more than $15 billion and didn’t buy yesterday’s offering.
 “There’s not enough yield for us” Founded in Chairman Jack Ma’s apartment, the company’s main online marketplaces include Taobao, which links individual buyers and sellers, and Tmallcom, which connects retailers and consumers.
 Arjuna Capital and a group called As You Sow filed a shareholder proposal with Exxon that calls on the Irving, Texas-based company to shift cash bound for carbon-intensive oil projects into bigger dividend payouts and share buybacks.
 “Exxon should return capital to shareholders rather than gamble with investor resources” Exxon paid out $114 billion in dividends during the past four quarters and spent $13 billion on buybacks, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Prudential Plc is buying Chinese state-owned industrial companies on bets that government steps to boost their efficiency will pay off.
 Eastspring’s Wong said he looks at specific stocks instead of buying the sector broadly, and declined to name his picks.
 may include mainland shares in its global indexes after the start of the program, triggering passive buying by index funds, Wong said.
 venture agreed to buy a Manhattan office tower from Blackstone Group LP for about $225 billion, extending a surge of demand for prime US.
 Canada has been the biggest foreign buyer of American commercial properties since 2010, Real Capital data show.
 “A bad year and people still say, ‘the year is pretty much over, things will be better next year’” Or maybe people just return those ugly Christmas sweaters for cash and buy stocks.
 “There are people who write malware, people who distribute malware, and people who buy malware for as little as a couple of hundred dollars,” said Helmbrecht, who was president of the German Federal Office for Information Security from 2003 through 2009.
 They’re increasingly just acting as agents between buyers and sellers, matching up investors with one another trade by trade.
 Refinery cost overruns that are under investigation in Brazil may alter the value pegged to some of the units, UBS analysts Lilyanna Yang and Carlos Herrera wrote in a note to clients where they downgraded the company to the equivalent of hold from buy.
 Investorsbalked at buying debt that was paying less interest than theapproximately 11 percent yield on the company’s most juniornotes.
 Of the 73 lots offered, 58 found buyers.
 Eight lots, including the Giacometti and the Modigliani sculptures, had guarantees, in which the auction house or a third party agrees to buy the artwork at a fixed price before the sale.
 Picasso’s almost monochromatic oil painting of a woman in religious contemplation, “La Communiante Avec Missel,” valued at $12 million to $18 million, failed to find a buyer.
 “While the BOJ is buying time, the government should be doing two things: promoting the growth strategy and fiscal consolidation,” said Masaaki Kanno, chief Japan economist at JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The easiest way to gain exposure to peripheral euro-region markets in the short term is to buy Italian debt, which benefits from greater liquidity, she said.
 The ECB will consider buying debt proportional to the size of each euro member’s economy, Vice President Vitor Constancio said this week.
 “Given Italy’s relatively low deficit, the ECB would buy large parts of its outstanding debt stock,” said Florian Weber, an analyst at Credit Suisse Securities in London.
 Abil first issued preference shares in 2005 in a private placement aimed at enabling black investors to buy a stake in the bank to make up for economic exclusion during apartheid.
 The bank was one of five gold and three silver members that participated in setting London fixings, benchmark rates used by mining companies, jewelers and central banks to buy, sell and value the metals.
 Largest Employer He stands out because he’s not among the Moscow-based oligarchs who made their fortunes by using government ties to buy state oil refineries and metals plants at bargain prices in the 1990s.
 Most consumers in China are buying a car for the first time, offering opportunities for newer entrants like Nissan Motor Co’s Infiniti and Ford Motor Co’s Lincoln to gain market share from more established nameplates.
 There’s already a crowded field: Apple agreed to pay $3 billion to buy headphones and streaming-music service Beats Electronics LLC in May.
 The dividend, its credit rating and select investments had priority over buybacks, he said.
 Over the past decade, BHP had returned a total of $64 billion to shareholders through dividends and buybacks, the company said in August.
 Baker Hughes Inc, which Halliburton has agreed to buy, dropped 89 percent.
 The costs that don’t buy very much extra stability should be avoided.
 Nykredit Markets recommended yesterday that investors buy the bonds.
 “The company continues to need to sell assets to return its capital to a balanced level” Nine analysts have buy recommendations on the stock, while three say hold and four sell, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “We’ve seen the Chinese buying a lot from the Middle East and that’s really let rates cook,” Erik Stavseth, an analyst at Arctic Securities ASA in Oslo whose recommendations on shippers returned 15 percent in the past year, said by phone Nov.
 The rupee touched a nine-month low, stoking concerns the weakness will makes imports expensive for a nation that buys 80 percent of its oil from abroad.
 “The strategy is basically to find proprietary deals that Falcone and his team can buy on attractive terms and then move them into this public market vehicle,” said Bradd Kern, a portfolio manager at Armored Wolf LLC, which oversees about $650 million including HC2 shares.
 Leucadia, which also owns investment bank Jefferies Group LLC, in March more than doubled its stake in Harbinger Group stock to about 20 percent, buying shares from Falcone’s Harbinger Capital at $11 apiece.
 Fivefold Increase India’s subsidy bill rose fivefold under Prime Minister Manmohan Singh as he implemented policies to buy farm produce at guaranteed prices, boost rural wages and distribute cheap food.
 “What I get is not enough to look after my family,” Yadav said of why he buys the cheap kerosene.
 rose in Johannesburg as South Africa’s biggest aluminum-product maker said it’s part of a group that will buy BHP Billiton Ltd’s casthouse at the Bayside smelter, which had been earmarked for closing.
 Consumers rushed to buy weapons after shootings in Newtown, Connecticut, and Aurora, Colorado, fueled speculation that federal restrictions would increase.
 “Some people might prefer to see them concentrating on core markets and improving their profitability there rather than expanding into further new countries” After agreeing to buy the consumer-finance arm of Spanish retailer El Corte Ingles in 2013, Santander earlier this year moved to set up partnerships in 11 countries with Banque PSA Finance, the French car group’s lending arm.
 Santander said in September it had agreed to buy Canadian car-financing company Carfinco Financial Group Inc.
 Santander also agreed in June to buy GE Capital’s Scandinavian consumer finance arm for about 700 million euros.
 agreed to buy a 75-megawatt wind farm in Nebraska.
 raised its recommendation on the stock to the equivalent of buy from hold.
 Nutresa agreed to buy Aldage Inc, the company that controls El Corral, in an 830 billion pesos ($384 million) deal, according to the filing.
 The yield premium investors demand to buy Takata’s seven-year bond sold in March rose to a record high of 350 basis points on Nov.
 The agency said in a statement that its decision was prompted by concerns about “additional product failure and uncertainty about future trades with automakers” Watching Bonds “There are a lot of hedge funds who are interested in buying Takata bonds, and they are just waiting for further drop in the bond prices,” said Taketoshi Tsuchiya, a senior executive at Mizuho Securities Co.
 Any selling after a ratings downgrade would trigger hedge funds to buy, “because the hedge funds don’t believe Takata will ever file for bankruptcy,” Tsuchiya said.
 Investors are demanding a 43 percent rate to buy Takata’s bonds, the most on any bond sold in the country in the last two years.
 is buying a Texas wind farm from affiliated Pattern Energy Group LP for $1238 million.
 Six of 23 analysts recommend investors buy the stock, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Singapore Air will raise its stake in the budget airline to about 55 percent by converting some securities into shares and then buy as much S$140 million of additional stock in a rights offering.
 surged 13 percent after the transportation-services provider announced a buyback.
 “Investors are buying real-estate stocks because they see a delay of another tax increase as a plus,” said Tsuyoshi Nomaguchi, managing director of investment strategy at Daiwa Securities Group Inc.
 “The delay will boost spending, and the hope is that more individuals will buy property, which is often a person’s biggest-ever investment” Ebola Drug Fujifilm jumped 44 percent to 4,0075 yen as the company expects a trial of its Avigan drug in Guinea for Ebola treatment to be completed next month.
 Seino surged 13 percent to 1,056 yen after saying it will buy back as much as 3 percent of its shares.
 raised the company’s rating to buy from neutral.
 “That would give you a pretty good guide as to some of the thinking -- slipping some acquisitions, maybe buying one less of a major ship than you would otherwise,” for example.
 “To get that kind of money difference,” McCord said, “you have to touch a lot of areas” The Pentagon would cut 17 of the 343 F-35 fighters it planned to buy from Lockheed Martin Corp.
 13 to redeem a warrant that would have allowed him to buy shares at about a third of the market price, according to a regulatory filing today.
 Those have sparked megamergers, such as Comcast Corp’s plan to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 CBS’s plan to let consumers buy a monthly Web subscription won’t be good for pay-TV distributors “because customers have a choice to get it somewhere else,” Ergen said.
 advised clients to buy the Russian oil producer’s stock, saying the “huge discount” to its biggest competitors isn’t justified.
 BCS, the biggest equity trader in Moscow by volume, started coverage of Lukoil with a buy recommendation.
 The stock has 17 buys and two holds, making it the highest-rated oil company among 15 global peers, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 1 that it plans to buy back as much as 15 billion euros of its stock over the next three years.
 led declines on the Asian benchmark gauge after reports that South Korean buyout fund Hahn & Co.
 That contrasts with the Federal Reserve, which has ended its bond-buying program as the US.
 Mainland investors today used just 13 percent of their 105 billion yuan ($17 billion) daily limit to buy shares listed in Hong Kong today, while 54 percent of the 13 billion daily quota to buy shares in Shanghai was utilized, data compiled by Bloomberg showed.
 The purchases by Slim and OeIAG, which will buy almost 63 million of the new shares, will maintain the two main investors’ combined holding.
 One priority is to buy direct competitors where it already operates, Telekom Austria said today.
 Earlier this year, Telekom Austria agreed to buy Macedonian fixed-line operator Blizoo.
 Before the EU investigation, Spanish companies had been on a buying spree, with Telefonica purchasing UK.
 mobile-phone operator O2 Plc and Iberdrola SA buying Scottish Power Plc.
 It said the Spanish measures unfairly rewarded companies for buying stakes in foreign competitors.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- BGC Partners Inc, the interdealer broker seeking to buy GFI Group Inc, said it has resolved a UK.
 Comcast Deal Comcast is seeking FCC approval to buy No.
 Amedeo acquired its second A380 ahead of the slated delivery from 2016 of 20 aircraft that it’s buying outright but has yet to place with an operator.
 Lapidus said he aims to make an announcement this year on an airline customer for some of the A380s he is buying, though declined to say how many planes would be involved.
 Hurd, a former managing director at buyout firm Madison Dearborn Partners LLC, started Chicago-based BlueSpruce last year and has $375 million in assets, according to the Invest for Kids conference website.
 This week’s note and bond offerings are the first of coupon-bearing debt since Fed policy makers ended a program of monthly bond-buying under the quantitative-easing stimulus strategy on Oct.
 More than half the economists in a Bloomberg survey expect the ECB to buy sovereign debt if it boosts stimulus, even as the central bank’s Governing Council is divided on the issue.
 24 the ECB will face legal obstacles to buying government bonds.
 may suffer a significant blow if the Supreme Court takes away subsidies that some Americans get to buy health insurance under the Affordable Care Act.
 The court said yesterday that it would rule on whether people in at least 34 states will be allowed to receive subsidies to buy insurance under the law, which has helped cut the number of uninsured showing up at hospitals.
 Economist Edward Yardeni calls them Selfies, who are free to spend selfishly because they’re not saving for college, paying off a mortgage or buying clothes for their kids.
 to Kraft Foods targeted traditional families traveling predictable life stages, from buying homes to having kids to retiring.
 Marketers focused mostly on mom, who controlled the household budget and decided what her family would buy.
 As a result, they aren’t buying big-ticket items like lawn mowers, washing machines and SUVs.
 Singlehood means buying outdoor gear at Patagonia or a jacket at Nordstrom Inc, rather than searching around for the best deal.
 Stocks fell in both cities as buyers left 76 percent of quotas unfilled in the first five days of the trading connect.
 Interest from potential new buyers had increased “massively” in recent days, O’Connell said.
 currency are hanging on to it because keeping the cash is more attractive than trading for leones and buying Treasury bills, Dodoo said.
 have said they’re unable to buy as many shares as they want because of the caps.
 Potential partners have also been identified in the education industry and the Nairobi-based company is buying land for an agriculture business, he said.
 The laser deployment is “a worthwhile experiment” because “it’ll help us feel out the operational limitations” such as power constraints, Frank Kendall, the Pentagon’s top weapons buyer said at a Bloomberg Government breakfast in April.
 of America Holdings agreed to buy Covance Inc.
 It has about 400 orders from 16 buyers for the 168-seat C919, aiming to complete the full assembly by August 2015 and the first test flight by the end of next year, Yu Zemin, deputy general manager of Comac Shanghai Aircraft Manufacturing Co, said at a conference in Shanghai in September.
 Potential tenants or buyers should ask whether a suicide or homicide took place because there’s no legal definition of a “haunted property,” the agency said in an e-mailed response.
 First-time homebuyers are also drawn to these cheaper properties, Midland’s Po said.
 “The local institutional investors are net buyers at the moment,” said Onyema.
 “They’re buying and their way of looking at it is that the prices we’re seeing today are not justified by the fundamentals” The Nigeria Stock Exchange All Share Index reversed a loss to close 07 percent higher at 34,11584 in Lagos, the commercial capital, as 34 shares increased, 11 fell and 150 were unchanged.
 It agreed in May to buy Merck & Co’s over-the-counter drug business for $142 billion, and Dekkers also has expressed interest in acquisitions in veterinary medicines.
 Such investments could lead to pressure on Zoetis for a sale, restructuring or increased dividends and share buybacks.
 22 (Bloomberg) -- Aviva Plc said it’s in talks to buy Friends Life Group Ltd.
 Sales of individual annuities have slumped after the government scrapped rules forcing retirees to buy the product with their pension savings.
 Cowdery is backing the sale to Aviva, which will allow him to complete his original strategy of acquiring and merging ailing life insurers and cutting costs before finding a buyer.
 While errors have always captivated investors, scrutiny has increased in the past decade as exchanges became more automated and the pace of buying and selling started being measured in millionths of a second.
 released research reports on Atara today, with Jefferies recommending investors buy the Nasdaq-listed shares.
 Surging demand sent the premium to own the Deutsche Bank ETF over its underlying assets to a record last week and is forcing the fund to restrict new share creations as assets approach a $549 million government-imposed quota for buying onshore securities.
 17, the first day of the link, triggering a halt in buy orders for the rest of the day.
 Asset Cap As inflows surge, Deutsche Bank’s ETF, with a 336 billion yuan quota capping the amount of onshore assets it can buy, is fast approaching its limit.
 ETF managers who buy China’s domestic securities need a Renminbi Qualified Foreign Institutional Investor license, known as an RQFII.
 Discount to Premium Even though the fund can’t expand beyond the government quota, “investors keep buying, and they have to try and balance that,” Tim Mulholland, a managing partner at China-America Capital Co, said in telephone interview yesterday.
 owner of casinos, is struggling to cope with a slow recovery in gambling spending nationally and the debt it took on in a 2008 leveraged buyout.
 There’s often a liquor mandate, compelling a customer who wants to reserve a table or cabana to buy anywhere from several hundred to several thousand dollars of booze -- deposits required.
 Potential buyers were required to make their bids by Nov.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s Embraer SA is shifting its jet-sales strategy in China by targeting startup regional airlines amid resistance from the country’s largest carriers to buying small aircraft.
 agreed to buy 10 E190-E2 planes.
 agreed to buy the Beares brand for 40 million rand on Oct.
 One priority is to buy direct competitors where it already operates, Telekom Austria has said.
 Shoppers plan to do 44 percent of their gift buying on the Web, the highest percentage ever, the NRF said last month.
 To secure deliveries, buyers have been paying record premiums.
 aluminum buyers and weakened their ability to hedge their price risks, affecting aluminum users in the defense, transportation, beverage, and construction sectors” Goldman Statement Goldman said in a statement that “there has not been a shortage of aluminum and prices have fallen substantially since 2008,” and said that more than 75 percent of the aluminum held in storage is not subject to any queue.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Hungary’s central bank is setting up an asset manager to buy non-performing commercial real estate loans from lenders to speed up portfolio cleaning and support growth by boosting credit.
 The central bank’s asset manager plans to start buying bad commercial real estate loans in the first half of 2015 at below book value.
 The port is Vale’s latest initiative to erode the geographic disadvantage it has compared with Australian competitors, which have lower shipping costs due to their proximity to Asian buyers.
 While Valemax vessels don’t yet have full access to ports in China, the world’s biggest buyer, Vale today raised the prospect of eventual entry.
 That could enable Vale to charge a higher premium for customers who do take the higher-grade ore, including buyers in Japan and Korea, he said.
 Hedged funds buy stocks, bonds or other assets in another country and then, using forward contracts, take a short position in the local currency when it’s forecast to weaken versus the dollar.
 “But now, monetary policy -- the thing that is catalyzing the stocks in these markets to go higher -- is also putting pressure on the currencies, making hedging essential” RiverFront started buying Japanese hedged ETFs early in 2012, in anticipation of a stronger stock market and weaker yen, Jones said.
 That figure includes an estimated $34 million in costs related to the data breach it disclosed in September as well as the benefit of the company’s $7 billion in year-to-date and planned share buybacks.
 Price appreciation, however, is moderating as more properties are listed for sale and buyer demand slows, the group said.
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also rose less than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateau heading into the end of 2014.
 Existing-home sales also are an important indicator for Home Depot because buyers often spend to update fixtures and appliances.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date, and non-deliverable contracts are settled in dollars.
 “There was a little snow coming down and it motivated people to buy more coats” Lundgren, who visited the Macy’s flagship store in New York last night, said there was a diverse and international crowd of shoppers that exceeded last year’s number of 15,000.
 will add a bag-check fee for fliers buying the cheapest tickets, ending its status as a holdout in the US.
 Global Business Alliance Boots loaded up on debt in a 111 billion pound leveraged buyout before the credit crisis in a deal arranged by KKR & Co.
 Andrew Lewis, chief executive officer, created insurer Global Alliance in 2001 before selling its operations to various buyers including Barclays Africa Group Plc in 2011.
 “However, we have to wait for the reaction from Brasilia on this case” It’s important that SBM be allowed to submit tenders for the large offshore fields operated by Petrobras, said Mulder, who has a “buy” rating on the stock.
 While he spent 68 billion euros ($85 billion) this year to buy Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy business and oil-and-gas equipment maker Dresser-Rand Inc, analysts say the performance of Siemens’s energy business was still disappointing in the fourth quarter.
 Execution Time As some competitors reduce spending plans for 2015, Encana plans to ramp up activity as it doubles the number of rigs targeting oil in Texas’s Permian basin, where it closed a $593 billion deal to buy Athlon Energy Inc.
 ‘Terrible Time’ Encana announced a deal to buy Fort Worth, Texas-based Athlon for $5850 a share in late September, a “reasonable price” according to RBC, and oil steepened its decline by another $20 a barrel over the next seven weeks.
 “Losing 30 percent of your cash flow overnight is definitely going to impact you” Deep Panuke While asset purchases and sales are no longer a focus for Encana, there may be opportunities for it to buy parcels of land to expand in regions it’s trying to grow, Suttles said.
 It’s not clear there’s a buyer for Encana’s Deep Panuke development offshore Canada’s East Coast, one asset that’s not a natural fit for an onshore continental producer, he said.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Shopping for a car isn’t easy, even for Porsche 911 buyers.
 sales that exceeded analysts’ estimates as buyers emboldened by falling gasoline prices flocked to sport-utility vehicles, the companies announced today.
 DineEquity already announced an increased dividend and share buybacks.
 For a company whose restaurants are already on many American street corners, it now needs to buy the concept that shows up across the street in coming years.
 To me, that’s the direction that this company should take if they’re going to make another move” Pizza Pie DineEquity could consider buying a craft-your-own pizza chain that operates near its headquarters in Southern California, Saleh of Telsey said.
 -- isn’t looking for a buyer, though it would review any offers at the right price.
 “The counties just do not have the resources to send someone around collecting chicken fees” Grant Brooke, a director at Neo Kenya Ltd, a company that buys and supplies fruit, said on Nov.
 Wallin told investors last month that Hannover Re would increase payouts via special dividends or share buybacks if it decides to return capital.
 Diamond has done this before” Tisch’s company in 2009 struck deals to buy two rigs from bankrupt units of PetroMena ASA for a combined total of about $950 million.
 Alibaba provides marketplaces for buyers and sellers, as well as services that help them conduct their businesses.
 Its main marketplaces include Taobao, which links individual buyers and sellers, and Tmallcom, which connects retailers and consumers.
 Its main marketplaces include Taobao, which links individual buyers and sellers, and Tmallcom, which connects retailers and consumers.
 Verizon attracted buyers for as much as $100 billion before its record $49 billion offering in September 2013, people with knowledge of the deal said.
 “Clearly there is a very strong trend” More Buying The retail federation is projecting holiday sales to rise 41 percent this year, more than last year’s 31 percent gain, as rising employment, improved consumer confidence and lower gasoline prices lead to more buying.
 A separate report by the Conference Board yesterday showed an unexpected decline from October, which was a seven-year high, while a gauge of consumers’ willingness to buy appliances rose to its highest level since at least 2010 and purchase intentions for televisions were at a two-year high.
 BT used the rights to help start its sports channels, which are free to customers who buy broadband service.
 “If the euro zone does do a bit better next year, it’s largely because of external factors - - it’s got its problems” The ECB in Frankfurt has already unleashed a barrage of stimulus, including a negative deposit rate, long-term loans, and asset buying.
 It has now been buying them for more than three weeks.
 Government Bonds Draghi said last week that more unconventional measures are being prepared in the event they’re needed, stoking expectations that the ECB will buy government bonds before long.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP agreed to buy GE Japan Corp’s residential-property business for more than 190 billion yen ($161 billion) to expand its apartment holdings in Japan.
 International buyers have been flocking to Japan’s residential market after Prime Minister Shinzo Abe took office in 2012 with a pledge to end the deflation that’s depressed real estate prices.
 The yen has declined 14 percent in the past four months against the dollar, making properties less expensive for overseas buyers.
 Overseas buyers can secure the return with low interest rates” The acquisition size is about 45 percent of the portfolio of Japan’s biggest residential REIT, Advance Residence Investment Corp, which has 4231 billion yen of assets under management.
 Blackstone also agreed to buy apartment blocks in Madrid after Spanish home prices tumbled.
 capped its biggest three-day drop since October 2011 as buy orders for Shanghai shares through the equity connect slowed to a trickle.
 The gauge climbed 52 percent from its October low through yesterday after the Bank of Japan unexpectedly added to monetary easing and the nation’s $11 trillion pension fund said it would buy more shares.
 “There remain a number of headwinds and sporting results are the main driver,” Gavin Kelleher, an analyst at Dublin-based Goodbody Stockbrokers, who has a buy rating on the stock, wrote in a note to clients.
 The crop he fought for is now legal -- and has buyers.
 Bronner’s Magic Soap and Nutiva, an organic-foods company, agreed to buy their products.
 Valeant has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 The two sides also disagreed over whether Valeant and Pershing Square had taken substantial steps toward making a tender offer to Allergan’s shareholders, as opposed to preparing for a negotiated merger with Allergan, as early as February when PS Fund 1 started buying Allergan shares.
 12 interview on Bloomberg Television’s “Market Makers” Consumers are also willing to buy more expensive items.
 exceeded analysts’ estimates as buyers emboldened by falling gasoline prices flocked to sport-utility vehicles.
 “It doesn’t matter if the shopper buys in your store -- if they get the right brand experience and then buy online, high-five to you” High Rents Billabong shares rose 08 percent to close at 655 Australian cents in Sydney trading, hitting their highest level since Nov.
 The move highlights Samsung’s ability to make speedy decisions at its biggest business even as Chairman Lee Kun Hee remains hospitalized, a contrast to Sony’s struggle to revive the phone unit since buying out Ericsson AB’s share in 2012.
 Oceanwide will offer to buy all of Harbour Ring’s shares for 5973 Hong Kong cents each, according to a joint filing to Hong Kong’s stock exchange yesterday.
 In February, the company bowed to Elliott’s pressure for cost cuts and share buybacks, unveiling plans to return at least $3 billion to shareholders and to reduce $160 million in expenses.
 7 and touched a six-year high after the Bank of Japan boosted stimulus and the nation’s pension fund said it will buy more shares.
 Emirates last week raised 11 billion dirhams ($299 million) in a club finance lease funding package to buy two 777-300ERs.
 “My hairline survived, but just barely” At Apple the next summer, “I finally decided, hey, this is the environment I’m going to find myself in for a long time to come, so I better learn” He biked to Target to buy some clippers, and still uses them.
 DiLucchio said in a telephone interview yesterday that the “goals of a law firm and the goals of a general counsel will never be totally aligned” “Just like when you go to buy a car, you and your car dealer will never be aligned,” he said.
 The firm already has a client base, including energy-related buyout funds, in the region.
 The measure, which would face a presidential veto, would make it easier for employers to shift more workers to part-time status and avoid buying insurance or paying fines under a provision of the law taking effect at the end of the year.
 soared 91 percent after the provider of hospital administration services announced a share buyback plan.
 Nichii Gakkan soared 91 percent to 902 yen after saying it plans to buy back as much as 122 percent of shares for 6 billion yen.
 slid 64 percent to 1,807 yen after its rating was cut to neutral from buy by Mizuho Securities Co.
 to hold from buy, even though he said the US.
 15 as companies beat analysts’ earnings estimates at the fastest pace in four years and reports indicated the economy may weather the end of Federal Reserve bond buying.
 Shares will climb as wider price swings create buying opportunities, according to Emanuel.
 phone company has been eyeing options for growth and is in preliminary talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the joint venture owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG.
 So she started buying back shares, divesting less profitable businesses, cutting jobs, and pushing IBM to develop businesses around big data analytics, cloud computing and mobile technology.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- About $119 million of municipal debt for a power plant serving the shuttered Revel Casino in Atlantic City may be approaching default after Brookfield Property Partners LP dropped a plan to buy the resort.
 Revel Contract Toronto-based Brookfield, which won court approval to buy the resort for $110 million last month, withdrew last week because it couldn’t cut electricity payments, according to two people with knowledge of the matter who weren’t authorized to speak publicly and asked not to be identified.
 Revel had a contract to buy power and other utility services for about $3 million a month from ACR, a joint venture between South Jersey Industries Inc.
 Discounts in Germany, the region’s biggest vehicle market, and record-low borrowing costs encouraged car buying even as an economic slowdown prompted the European Union to cut gross domestic product forecasts for the countries using the euro.
 General Motors Co’s Opel and Vauxhall nameplates sold 11 percent more cars in the region as the Mokka compact SUV and Adam small car drew buyers.
 Mainland investors today used just 15 percent of their 105 billion yuan ($17 billion) daily limit to buy shares listed in Hong Kong today, while 22 percent of the 13 billion daily quota to buy shares in Shanghai was utilized, data compiled by Bloomberg showed.
 Christopher Flowers’s leveraged-buyout firm, wanted to acquire the entire company for “a couple of dollars a share,” a proposal Willumstad said he didn’t take seriously.
 A possible deal with Fishman, chairman and CEO of Travelers, to buy AIG’s personal lines of insurance businesses for $7 billion foundered because they were too financially entangled with other company properties, Willumstad said.
 Dave Goss of London’s Vape Emporium, a source of e-cigarettes, told consumers to buy equipment from trusted manufacturers and to check boxes carefully to make sure their purchases are authentic, according to the Guardian.
 “You’d be crazy to buy the bonds given the current market” In a country that is headquarters to more than half the world’s gold companies, producers such as Barrick and Kinross Gold Corp.
 Barrick took on debt to buy Equinox Minerals Ltd.
 Foreigners are barred from barred from directly buying and selling domestic assets.
 The securities have the same credit risk as sovereign debt that Israel sells in global capital markets and pay a premium because buyers can’t sell them.
 “Officially the need is that we keep it for a rainy day when no bank in the world will give us money, and then only our brethren Jews will buy bonds.
 While Israel has grown to be a $291 billion economy with a better debt-to-domestic-production ratio than the US, it’s still expanding the borrowing program to record levels and finding buyers that include more than 80 US.
 Engage Diaspora “It’s an attractive return, more attractive than many other fixed-income opportunities,” said Thomas DiNapoli, comptroller of New York’s $180 billion state pension fund, which has been buying the bonds since the late 1990s.
 Operating profitability and net earnings per share should improve this year, buoyed by the buying back of L’Oreal shares from Nestle SA, Agon said.
 “The retail investors’ reaction to the MSCI decision is positive and we are seeing some buying on the back of it,” Ahmed Shehada, head of advisory and institutions at NBAD Securities LLC in Abu Dhabi, said by phone.
 Most of the 2013 investment was used to help Emirates Airline buy planes from Airbus Group NV.
 For developers and borrowers, choosing between bank loans or export credit finance involves balancing repayment times with interest rates and considering the cost of materials they would have to buy from the country providing the credit, Crasson said.
 “An item could be more expensive in Europe than in China, for example, but the client would have to buy it from Europe to get lower interest rates or a longer repayment period thanks to the European funding.
 South Africa will seek potential buyers for an equity stake in SAA as part of a recovery plan, Minister for Public Enterprises Lynne Brown said Oct.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Zoetis Inc, the animal health company activist investors are pressuring to boost shareholder returns, issued a 2015 financial forecast below analyst expectations after saying earlier today it will buy back $500 million in shares.
 That could include selling itself, buybacks or dividends, or something else.
 The buyback announced today amounts to 23 percent of Zoetis’s $222 billion market value.
 The buybacks can be done on the open market, or through “privately negotiated transactions,” Zoetis said.
 Yesterday, the Florham Park, New Jersey-based company announced a deal to buy animal health assets from Abbott Laboratories for $255 million.
 Zoetis plans to keep doing deals to buy assets, the company has said, and on Nov.
 It specializes in what’s called programmatic advertising, which helps automate the buying of ads.
 This means that they have less ability to opportunistically buy bonds when some fund has to liquidate big positions.
 Gulf of Mexico, plans to buy producing assets to bolster earnings.
 who has a buy rating on Tesla.
 In addition, the company, which posted a $75 million net loss, cut its full-year sales forecast to 33,000 cars from 35,000, again citing the inability to make as many cars as people want to buy.
 Draghi has said the institution could buy sovereign debt to boost its balance sheet.
 Madrid-based Telefonica initiated consolidation in Brazil’s telecommunications market earlier this year by agreeing to buy Vivendi SA’s broadband unit GVT for about 7 billion euros ($9 billion).
 He has the equivalent of a buy rating on Home Depot and said today’s share decline may be due to investors locking in profits after the stock’s recent gains.
 That figure includes an estimated $34 million in costs related to the data breach it disclosed in September as well as the benefit of the company’s $7 billion in year-to-date and planned share buybacks.
 Price appreciation, however, is moderating as more properties are listed for sale and buyer demand slows, the group said.
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also rose less than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateau heading into the end of 2014.
 Existing-home sales also are an important indicator for Home Depot because buyers often spend to update fixtures and appliances.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Fugro NV’s chief executive officer and finance chief have made a paper profit of almost 30 percent just two days after buying shares in the Dutch deepwater-oilfield surveyor.
 raised its recommendation to buy from neutral and added it to its pan-Europe Conviction Buy List, citing the “recent sharp” decline in the shares.
 “The strategy is basically to find proprietary deals that Falcone and his team can buy on attractive terms and then move them into this public market vehicle,” said Bradd Kern, a portfolio manager at Armored Wolf LLC, which oversees about $650 million including HC2 shares.
 Leucadia, which also owns investment bank Jefferies Group LLC, in March more than doubled its stake in Harbinger Group stock to about 20 percent, buying shares from Falcone’s Harbinger Capital at $11 apiece.
 is buying the Beares brand from Ellerine, valued at 90 million rand ($8 million) for 63 stores, while Coricraft Group Pty Ltd.
 and Orbitz Worldwide LLC sued to prevent the travel website Skiplaggedcom from helping consumers buy what the companies call improper “hidden city” plane tickets that undercut their sales.
 UBS recommends buying Primark shares and has a 12-month target price of 3,300 pence on the shares.
 Austrian and French 10-year borrowing costs also dropped to the least on record as the comments boosted speculation that the ECB will add buying sovereign debt to its stimulus program, or quantitative easing.
 It will probably work through the currency but monetary policy by itself can just buy time” He spoke in an interview on Bloomberg Television’s “Countdown” with Mark Barton, Manus Cranny and Anna Edwards.
 16 amid speculation the ECB will buy assets as it seeks to boost consumer-price growth and prevent another recession in Europe’s 18-state currency bloc.
 “All Liberty companies follow the same game plan: generate cash flow, buy back shares and sell in a tax efficient manner” Weitz, founder of $58 billion Weitz Investment Management Inc, said at the Invest for Kids Conference in Chicago today.
 rose the most in five years after the Canadian producer of private-label soft drinks agreed to buy DSS Group Inc.
 Receivers have started to look for potential buyers.
 Funds such as London-based X2 Resources, co-founded by former Xstrata Plc Chief Executive Officer Mick Davis, are logical buyers, according to Elliott.
 Some funds can wait years before profiting from an investment and may be able to buy the assets “relatively cheaply,” he said.
 “There will be buyers but they’re going to have deeper pockets and longer timeframes.
 “Most of the buyers of high yield small deals in Singapore dollars have been high net worth individuals,” Vishal Goenka, the Singapore-based head of local currency credit trading for Asia at Deutsche Bank AG, said in an interview.
 Unlike traditional jewelery, which is frequently purchased by men for their wives or girlfriends, the T collection is designed for women to buy it for themselves.
 TVN will continue to buy back shares next year and plans to pay out about 50 percent of its 2015 net income as dividend, it said in the statement.
 The company will buy back 225 million zloty to 250 million zloty of shares as part of a 500-million zloty plan approved by shareholders in April.
 TVN has already bought 100 million zloty of shares under the program and announced a further 150 million-zloty buyback this month.
 Ponta’s lead has endured even as his allies came under the spotlight of a graft probe into former officials involved in buying $105 million of Microsoft Office licenses for schools.
 The amendments include giving the state the right to a free 20 percent stake in all new energy ventures and to buy an unspecified additional share at an agreed price.
 Further Decline “Homebuyers are waiting and watching because they think prices will decline further,” said Alan Cheong, a Singapore-based director at broker Savills Plc said.
 “Prices will languish into next year as developers have no confidence to raise prices with sentiment so low” The government said the share of homebuyers taking up multiple mortgages has slid to 13 percent of new housing loans in the second quarter from 30 percent in 2011.
 Five analysts, including Kolbert, recommend buying the stock, while one says hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Meggitt Plc added the most since July after saying it will begin a share buyback.
 Traders are paying a 655 percentage-point premium for options to grant the right to sell the ruble against the dollar during the next three months over those that give the right to buy the currency, according to risk-reversal data compiled by Bloomberg.
 cut the stock to hold from buy.
 iPhone Price Until yesterday, Apple too had refrained from putting up prices, meaning that the Russian price for an iPhone had been Europe’s lowest at about $700, prompting tourists from other countries to buy iPhones in Moscow.
 “What will happen? Would food, clothes or electronics get more expensive? Nobody is adjusting our salary for this” January Increases? Margarita Zobnina, a Moscow school professor who spends about 2,400 rubles a month on imported contact lenses, said she decided to buy a year of stock as she expects prices to rise by 30 percent because of the ruble’s devaluation.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Kellogg Co, the American producer of breakfast cereals and Pop Tarts, made a $127 million-offer to buy Egyptian confectionery maker Bisco Misr, outbidding competitor Abraaj Group.
 Dubai-based investment company Abraaj is offering to buy Bisco for 7391 pounds a share, valuing the company at $119 million.
 The casino company was taken private for $307 billion in 2008 by Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in one of the biggest leveraged buyouts in history.
 “Consolidation is one of the options companies can consider to retain or strengthen their competitiveness,” Japanese Bankers Association Chairman Nobuyuki Hirano said at a news briefing this week.
 28, a stream of tour buyers, many speaking German, Italian and French, lined up on Pier 6, on the East River a dozen blocks from the Brooklyn Bridge.
 The company buys almost all its ore and coal needs from outside suppliers.
 Garry, 63, led a 317 million-euro ($397 million) management buyout of the firm in 2006 from Bank of Ireland Plc.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Nigerian stocks rallied the most in the world this week, advancing for five straight days, as local buyers took advantage of lower prices following the index’s slump to an 18-month low.
 The lower stock prices proved to be buying opportunities for domestic investors, according to Ikechukwu Iheanacho, an analyst in Lagos at Chapel Hill Denham Securities Ltd.
 Encouraged by Apple’s decision to buy the factory and signs that the economy was turning around, Shelley Nikolich’s family decided to expand their pizzeria in July, buying a downtown building and renovating it for more than 60 seats.
 As management buys time by renting space to temporary shops selling Christmas stuff, employees fret that if the holiday shopping season goes badly, more stores will close.
 None!” The man charged with saving Steeplegate -- or at least keeping it afloat until a buyer emerges -- is Thomas Lavigne.
 “They need more stores,” said Ann Paquin, a 37-year-old mom who had come from nearby Pembroke to buy soccer shoes for one of her four kids.
 The longer people stick around, theoretically, the more they buy.
 “With good economic performance and positive stories in the labor markets, we maintain a firm-footed position in how we engage risk markets” Central Banks Europe’s equity benchmark gained 31 percent this month, as Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank may broaden its asset-buying program to include the purchase of government bonds, while central banks in Japan and China stepped up measures to support their economies.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said yesterday the bank is open to buying a wide variety of assets for further easing.
 12 announcement that it agreed to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc, is focusing attention on underperforming lenders.
 “The other thing is clearly the insider buying” First Niagara rose 27 cents to $808, ending the week up 85 percent.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Marsh & McLennan Cos, the largest insurance broker by market value, agreed to buy SCM Strategic Capital Management AG as its Mercer unit expands in alternative investments.
 An investor-turned-activist is seeking talks with management about RealPage’s strategic direction after the Financial Times reported it rejected a buyout bid from Vista Equity Partners.
 With recent stumbles including a third straight quarterly loss, now may be a good time to find a buyer that could run the business better.
 “That, plus the opportunity for margin expansion, is what gets potential buyers excited” Kornitzer manages the Buffalo Funds, which oversee assets including shares of RealPage.
 RealPage might benefit from a buyer that recognizes those growth opportunities and knows how to take advantage of them, said Richard of Kornitzer.
 “A private-equity buyer would see value in the name.
 Strategic Deal For Vista, buying RealPage would almost double its share of the market for the financial software that landlords use to manage everything from inventory to the general ledger, Houston said.
 Other private-equity firms may be interested in buying RealPage to create a property-management platform of their own, Patrick Walravens, a San Francisco-based analyst at JMP, wrote in a report last week.
 Zillow, which agreed earlier this year to buy Trulia Inc, already has a partnership deal with RealPage that allows the two companies to share apartment listings and some services.
 Insurers gained the most among the Topix’s 33 industry groups, led by Tokio Marine Holdings Inc, which jumped 41 percent after saying it will buy back shares and raising its profit outlook.
 17 low after the central bank added to quantitative easing, the $11 trillion pension fund pledged to buy more shares and amid speculation Abe wouldn’t go through with the tax increase.
 The company said it will also buy back up to 26 percent of its shares.
 The weekly Consumer Comfort Index, which also accounts for views of the buying-climate and personal finances, was little changed at 382.
 At the same time, limited wage growth is reining optimism about finances and whether it’s a good time to buy as the holiday-shopping season gets under way.
 The buying-climate measure, which asks whether this is a good time to make purchases, declined to 319 last week from 327, while the gauge of personal finances was little changed at 539 compared with 541 the prior period, a two-month high.
 EON saddled itself with debt after buying power plants in Spain, Italy and France for more than 11 billion euros from an Acciona SA-led group in 2007.
 An investor group led by Macquarie also agreed to buy Louisiana electricity supplier Cleco Corp.
 The company’s President Nobuyuki Hirano said yesterday that extra monetary easing announced by the Bank of Japan last month will probably continue to squeeze loan margins.
 rose 14 percent as the retailer plans to buy back shares.
 Rona, a Canadian home improvement retailer, rose 14 percent to C$1385 after disclosing a plan to buy back as much as 10 percent of its shares and to open new stores next year.
 Saudi Arabia is removing barriers to one of the world’s most restricted financial markets next year, where foreigners are barred from directly buying and selling domestic assets.
 The House passed a bill earlier this year that modifies the Volcker rule to allow banks more freedom to trade collateralized loan obligations, highly leveraged financing that funds most corporate buyouts.
 ‘Peak’ Conditions With higher chicken prices and lower feed costs, the industry has been “operating under the most advantageous conditions possible,” Francesco Pellegrino, a New York-based analyst for Sidoti & Co LLC, who recommends buying Sanderson Farms shares, said in a telephone interview yesterday.
 who recommends buying the shares, said by phone from Minneapolis.
 in New York who recommends investors buy shares of Radware.
 “The first thing you want to do to stop the target attacks is be able to see them, and one of the ways you do that is take the fog of war away by removing the DoS attack” Sixty percent of analysts covering Radware recommend buying the stock, up from 50 percent a year ago.
 Alibaba buys rights from studios that control films and TV content to show them online for a fee, often by territory.
 Canadian Natural has 24 buy and two sell recommendations from analysts.
 plans to buy the 65 percent of Acucap Properties Ltd.
 Phone carrier Oi SA rose after Altice SA offered 7 billion euros ($88 billion) to buy its Portuguese telecommunications assets.
 government after agreeing to buy HBOS, which ran up bigger loan losses than any other UK.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Evonik Industries AG may find it’s tough to be a buyer in a seller’s market.
 “It’s a good time for the sellers, but it’s not a good time for the buyers,” Peter Spengler, a Frankfurt-based analyst at DZ Bank, said in a phone interview.
 In the last five years, buyers paid a median profit multiple of 88 for chemical companies in deals larger than $1 billion, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “They’re buying when they have cash and they definitely right now have cash.
 in Liverpool, England, cut the shares to a hold recommendation from a buy, in a note sent to clients today.
 29 it would buy the roofing and solar-panel mounting company Shanghai All-Zip Roofing System Group for about 330 million yuan ($54 million).
 Last week, China Aircraft Leasing Group Holdings Ltd, the first Asian lessor to sell shares publicly, pledged to buy 100 Airbus aircraft valued at $10 billion.
 In August, BOC Aviation Pte, a unit of Bank of China Ltd, said it was buying $88 billion of Boeing jets, the Singapore-based lessor’s biggest order ever.
 The lessor may consider buying A330neo planes at a later point, SMBC Aviation Chief Executive Officer Peter Barrett told reporters in Farnborough, England, in July.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Mondelez International Inc, the maker of Oreo cookies and Ritz crackers, agreed to buy a majority stake in Vietnam’s Kinh Do Corp’s snack business for $370 million, bolstering its presence in emerging markets.
 The transaction gives Mondelez 80 percent of Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam-based Kinh Do’s snack unit and the option to buy the rest after 12 months, the companies said in a statement.
 Mondelez is buying into a business whose top-selling biscuits, soft cakes and seasonal moon cakes help bring in $175 million in annual sales.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- US-based high-frequency traders can buy and sell Australian equity futures two thousandths of a second faster after ASX Ltd.
 There will be a time where share buybacks or dividends will be a way to return capital to shareholders, but that’s not today” Allergan shares climbed less than 1 percent to $19740 at the close in New York, above Valeant’s current cash-and-stock offer of about $180.
 Valeant has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 Actavis has been the most active buyer of drug companies since January 2011, making more than $36 billion of purchases, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 will close the Milford Haven refinery in Wales after a sale to Klesch Group collapsed, ending a four-year search for a buyer and resulting in “significant” redundancies, the US.
 The Geneva-based company agreed to buy the Welsh refinery in July, hoping to have it producing fuels within weeks of the deal being finalized.
 governments to intervene to secure an alternative buyer.
 “SolarCity will be spending aggressively on sales and marketing to build out its portfolio,” The company provides residential and commercial solar systems, typically at little to no upfront cost to customers who sign long-term contracts to buy the output.
 - Draghi opens door to buying government bonds as stimulus tool.
 Halliburton Co, the second-biggest oil-service company, is buying the third-largest, Baker Hughes Inc.
 Seadrill’s board also authorized a share-buyback program of as much as 10 percent of outstanding shares over the next 12 months.
 Hispania has reached an agreement with creditors to buy 50 percent of the loan for 313 million euros as long as the takeover bid is successful.
 who recommends buying the shares,said by phone from Minneapolis.
 in New York who recommends investors buy shares ofRadware.
 “The first thing you want to do to stopthe target attacks is be able to see them, and one of the waysyou do that is take the fog of war away by removing the DoSattack” Sixty percent of analysts covering Radware recommend buyingthe stock, up from 50 percent a year ago.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Abengoa SA, the largest developer of solar-thermal power plants, agreed to buy out its partner BrightSource Energy Inc.
 It was taken private for $307 billion in 2008 by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in one of the largest leveraged buyouts in history.
 In the letter today, Greenlight said it is buying a stake in storage computer-maker EMC Corp.
 In a short sale, an investor sells borrowed shares to bet on a decline, hoping to buy them back cheaper and pocket the difference.
 Deutsche Bank AG yesterday started covering the company with a buy rating, while brokerage Allaria Ledesma & Cia.
 The changes announced today by the government-owned finance firms specify when lenders would be asked to buy back flawed loans that were issued based on inaccurate data or misrepresentations of borrowers’ qualifications.
 President Barack Obama’s administration is pushing to unlock tight credit after banks were forced to buy back billions of dollars of loans issued before mortgage markets collapsed.
 Resistance by banks has kept first-time homebuyers and others with weaker credit out of the real-estate market.
 “With this clarity, lenders should have greater confidence in lending to Fannie Mae’s full credit standards and making mortgages available to more borrowers” Under the new rules, which are retroactive to January 2013, lenders won’t be asked to repurchase loans with data inaccuracies or misrepresentations of buyers’ qualifications unless the flaws are significant and apply to multiple loans.
 Evidence of fraud could also trigger a buyback request.
 conservatorship since 2008, buy mortgages and package them into bonds on which they guarantee principal and interest payments.
 Keppel Infrastructure will also buy from Keppel Energy Pte a 51 percent stake in Keppel Merlimau Cogen Pte, which owns a 1,300 megawatt combined-cycle gas turbine power generation facility on Jurong Island, according to the statement.
 “It’s not a secret that at the right price we could get more fixed assets,” Colao said when he was asked about his interest in buying Italian broadband company Fastweb SpA.
 “Italy is one of the countries we’re looking at” Vodafone is interested in buying the business from its owner Swisscom AG, a person familiar with the matter said last month.
 RCS Capital Corp, a Schorsch company that called off a deal this week to buy American Realty’s Cole Capital unit, rose 32 percent to $1132.
 “Larger-cap tech stocks have become a place that investors are going to as a source for dividends and buybacks, and in some cases, safety” Apple Shares Apple Inc, the Cupertino, California-based iPhone maker, retains its rank as the world’s biggest company.
 Geveran on Friday bought 256 million shares in Norwegian Property for about 256 million kroner ($38 million) and will offer to buy the rest within four weeks, the company said in a statement today.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- MCG Capital Corp’s announcement that it will buy back shares and possibly liquidate its loans to smaller companies isn’t an indication of the market’s ills, according to Keefe, Bruyette & Woods analyst Troy Ward.
 By issuing the veto threat now instead of in December,Obama can buy time for Congress to create a new proposal thatwould be more acceptable to him or call his bluff and try topass it over his objections.
 Sale documents set a minimum floor of that amount to protect individual buyers.
 “We conduct frequent surveillance of trading in the municipal bond market and will penalize abuses that threaten retail investors” Protecting Individuals Minimum denominations help restrict trading of high-risk securities to investors who are capable of making sizable purchases and are more prepared to bear the higher risk than individual buyers, the SEC said in a statement.
 “The value-add or value proposition you bring to the enterprise has to be significantly better than the savings you get from putting it on Amazon’s cloud,” said Fidacaro, who rates the stock a buy.
 In November 2013, the company said it had lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make sapphire, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 The stock, which has five buy, seven hold and three sell recommendations from analysts, fell 09 percent to C$5503 yesterday in Toronto.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank stepped up buying of covered bonds in an attempt to boost consumer prices and rekindle growth in the euro-area economy.
 “There’s legitimate doubt that the ECB is willing or able to pay what it takes to pump up the balance sheet” More than 60 percent of the respondents in Bloomberg’s October monthly survey said Draghi’s plan to steer the balance sheet toward early-2012 levels is set to fall short and a growing number predict he’ll resort to government-bond buying.
 Primary Market While buying in the week ended Oct.
 “Institutions that participate in this lending activity, without implementing strong risk management processes consistent with the 2013 guidance, will be subject to criticism by the appropriate agency” The agencies have been especially focused on riskier leveraged lending, which is often used to finance corporate buyouts.
 Shanghai stock buying through the Hong Kong exchange link slowed for a third day.
 and Carlyle, have found investment opportunities in smaller companies as valuations for leveraged buyouts remain high.
 upgraded Barclays Plc to buy from neutral, citing that the Bank of England’s decision to set lower-than-expected minimum regulatory level means the lender is less likely to raise capital.
 Goldman Sachs also cut its recommendation on HSBC Holdings Plc to neutral from buy as the bank struggles to control costs amid tighter regulation.
 Potential buyers for Holcim and Lafarge assets include private-equity-led groups including Blackstone Group LP with Cinven Ltd.
 stock gauges are trading at record highs as data indicates the economy is withstanding a global slowdown as well as the end of the Federal Reserve’s bond-buying program.
 Last month SoftBank agreed to invest in Legendary Entertainment, producer of the “Godzilla” film, and buy DramaFever Corp, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers Future merger and acquisitions for SoftBank will focus on Asian Internet companies with the company to aim for stakes of 30 percent to 40 percent, Son said.
 Cooper said the outlook for Imperial Tobacco has been boosted by an agreement this year to buy tobacco assets and the electronic cigarette brand Blu in conjunction with the merger of Reynolds American Inc.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG’s supervisory board approved the sale of the company’s hearing-aids business to Swedish buyout firm EQT Partners AB and will announce the sale today, according to people familiar with the matter.
 Kaeser is concentrating on the energy business as he seeks to catch up with the profitability of General Electric Co, which has agreed to buy France’s Alstom SA to expand its own energy offering.
 The Swedish buyout firm bid for Nobel Biocare Holding AG, the Swiss maker of dental implants, before losing out to Danaher Corp.
 agreed to buy the South African clothes-retail business of Naartjie, boosting its childrenswear offering with a second acquisition in as many months.
 Chief Financial Officer Anthony Noto yesterday publiclytweeted about a plan he has to buy a company, including how hewanted to help make the deal happen at a meeting in mid-December.
 “I still think we should buy them,” Noto tweeted.
 economy is strong enough to get the Fed to raise interest rates next year, and that’s reason to avoid buying.
 31, “it’s the early days” of a market without buying by the central bank, said Ray Remy, head of fixed income in New York at Daiwa Capital Markets America Inc, one of 22 primary dealers that are obligated to bid in US.
 dollar amid bets the Fed will raise interest rates next year for the first time since 2006 while policy makers in Japan and Europe embrace bond-buying programs to pump money into their slumping economies.
 But each buys programs from national suppliers of video service and broadband.
 private in a $249 billion buyout, Chief Executive Officer Michael Dell and private equity firm Silver Lake Management LLC have made a paper gain of at least 90 percent on their investment, two people with knowledge of the matter said.
 That’s almost two times the $56 billion that Silver Lake and the company founder invested in the leveraged buyout.
 The return adds up to an early victory for Dell and Silver Lake, which undertook the buyout to turn the company around without public scrutiny after it failed to quickly adapt to the mobile and cloud-computing era.
 29, 2013, with opponents including billionaire investor Carl Icahn charging that Dell and Silver Lake were paying too low a price for the buyout.
 Icahn waged a battle to derail the deal, pushing the buyers to ultimately sweeten their price.
 That’s up from $3 billion at the time of the buyout, said one of the people.
 “If time can buy them good performance in even fewer markets, that still makes sense” Foxconn Talks Xiaomi doesn’t own any manufacturing capacity of its own and relies on contract manufacturers, including Foxconn’s FIH Mobile Ltd.
 17 low through last week after the Bank of Japan unexpectedly added to monetary easing, the nation’s $11 trillion pension fund said it would buy more local shares and reports appeared in local media that Abe wouldn’t go through with the levy.
 “Opportunistic Chinese steel mill restocking is not occurring at low prices and highlights how difficult near-term steel conditions must be on the ground” Slowing steel-demand growth in China, which buys about 67 percent of seaborne ore, and surging low-cost supplies from BHP Billiton Ltd.
 The increase was fueled by the virus, which shrank the domestic herd and reduced the number of hogs slaughtered this year by 52 percent, boosting costs for meat buyers including Noodles & Co.
 At the same time, there has been an increase in hams weighing 23 pounds to 27 pounds, which is too big for most consumers interested in buying half a ham.
 While Hart said that he and his grandfather won’t stop buying and preparing the meat for the holidays, he’s bracing for more price increases -- of as much as 50 percent for the raw meat.
 Alibaba provides marketplaces for buyers and sellers, as well as services that help them conduct their businesses.
 Its main marketplaces include Taobao, which links individual buyers and sellers, and Tmallcom, which connects retailers and consumers.
 Oil Link Not only will unchanged OPEC production help India and Japan, which buys all of its oil from overseas, it will also lower prices of natural gas imports for these two countries.
 Samsung Electronics surged 53 percent in Seoul on a share buyback plan and China’s Shanghai Composite Index climbed to a three-year high.
 In September, foreigners were net buyers of Thai stocks for a third straight month.
 The firm is planning to raise a 5 billion-euro ($62 billion) fund focused on leveraged buyouts, according to people familiar with the plans.
 Raising Cash Over the last two decades, EQT has raised about 22 billion euros, primarily for buyouts, while more recently diversifying into infrastructure, growth capital and debt.
 During the first nine months of this year, as crude dropped below $100 a barrel, the company devoted $33 million a day to dividends and share buybacks, unchanged from a year earlier when crude averaged $10849 a barrel.
 Investors willing to buy Takata’s bond can earn 43 percent, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Overseas buyers are prepared to pay even higher prices for Japanese real estate than domestic purchasers because of the weakening yen, Mochizuki said.
 Demonstrators in Hong Kong, where wealthy Chinese buy watches and jewelry to avoid mainland China’s luxury taxes, blocked streets and caused shops to close in September and October.
 The country buys about 67 percent of global seaborne ore cargoes.
 Justice Department claims in its antitrust complaint filed today in Manhattan federal court that CineMedia responded to an increase in Screenvision’s market share by buying its only real competitor.
 He maintained his buy rating on the stock.
 The bank may buy companies or hire teams of private bankers in Switzerland, Asia, UK.
 Intesa, based in Milan, isn’t seeking to buy Fininvest’s stake in Mediolanum SpA, Messina said, adding that the bank wants “to buy something which we want to control” The lender may look at companies in Italy with more than 20 billion euros ($25 billion) of assets under management, he said.
 The bank would be interested in buying Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc’s Coutts private bank if the entire business, including the brand, were put up for sale, Messina said, adding that he doesn’t rule out a purchase of Coutts’s international arm.
 initially offered to buy the UK.
 drugmaker, indicating the company can create value without a buyout, Chief Executive Officer Pascal Soriot said.
 Petrobras has relied on overseas bond buyers for more financing than any company in emerging markets in the past three years, raising $445 billion since 2011.
 And if you don’t have the technology, you have to buy it.
 If you have to buy it, you’re always late” He declined to provide examples of what a TAG Heuer smartwatch could offer.
 Demand for ore in China, the biggest buyer, may expand 3 percent this year and next year, Claudio Alves, global director of ferrous marketing and sales at the world’s largest producer, said at a port-inauguration ceremony in Malaysia today, and in comments to a Bloomberg reporter.
 Rivera said she agreed in early 2012 to buy the house for54 million pesos ($39 million) over eight years with a 9percent interest rate.
 The S&P 500 has rebounded 95 percent from a six-month low in October amid better-than-estimated corporate results and signs the economy is weathering a global slowdown and the end of the Federal Reserve’s bond-buying program.
 Twenty-five rate it buy, and two advise holding the shares.
 The company last year assessed interest among potential Chinese partners in buying a minority stake in Natalka, people familiar with the matter said in July.
 “There is a good opportunity at the bottom of the cycle to buy high quality businesses that will then later benefit from being part of our group and the inevitable economic uptake,” Jefferies said.
 “It’s not going to be plain sailing but a main plus is it’s going to give Sky more buying power when it comes to sports rights and the extent to which they’ll be used across the market” Sky Europe, as the combination is known in the industry, will be the continent’s biggest pay-TV provider with 20 million customers in five countries, including Ireland and Austria.
 Christopher Flowers’s leveraged-buyout firm, wanted to acquire the entire company for “a couple of dollars a share,” a proposal Willumstad said he didn’t take seriously.
 A possible deal with Fishman, chairman and CEO of Travelers, to buy AIG’s personal lines of insurance businesses for $7 billion foundered because they were too financially entangled with other company properties, Willumstad said.
 ‘Quite Low’ Policy makers reiterated they would keep rates low for a “considerable time” after concluding the bond-buying.
 The ECB began buying asset-backed securities yesterday, a spokesman said.
 The purchase by Royalty Pharma, which buys revenue streams from drugs, was financed with cash and a $27 billion loan from Bank of America Corp, New York-based Royalty said today in a statement.
 “There appears to be low confidence in the South African economy at the moment and customers seem hesitant, delaying buying decisions,” Bidvest said today in a statement.
 Allianz will buy 90 percent of the Nicetoile mall in the city of Nice, while Hammerson Plc will acquire the rest and manage the property, Paris-based Unibail said in a statement yesterday.
 Ethos Private Equity Ltd, the buyer, will pay cash in a deal expected to be concluded in the second quarter of the current fiscal year.
 ‘Binding Arrangement’ While Zesco doesn’t want to sell electricity for a lower price than it buys it for from independent producers, First Quantum doesn’t want to pay more than other mining companies, according to Chitundu.
 The Ontario Power Authority has agreed to buy electricity from the wind farm under a 20-year contract.
 fell to the lowest level in more than a year in Hong Kong trading after the company agreed to buy a HK$24 billion ($310 million) stake in Huishang Bank Corp.
 The operator of physical stores and an e-commerce site selling home appliances agreed to buy 6325 million of Huishang Bank’s Hong Kong-listed shares at HK$380 each, 12 percent more than the last closing price, Beijing-based Gome said yesterday.
 “But it’s much harder to buy the third deal, fourth deal, fifth deal if you’re already underwater on your first purchases” Rental Demand American Homes 4 Rent, the second-largest landlord, sold $5284 million of notes yesterday with a weighted average coupon of 4395 percent versus 4418 percent for a similar issue in September, the company said in a statement.
 Private-equity firms, hedge funds and other institutional investors have spent about $25 billion to buy more than 150,000 single-family homes since 2012, seeking to benefit from low property prices and rising demand for rentals, according to New York-based Keefe Bruyette & Woods Inc.
 Different bond buyers could emerge as the underlying loan balances get smaller, said Randy Reiff, FirstKey Lending’s chief executive officer.
 “If I can go out and buy the Invitation Homes or Colony or American Homes 4 Rent deal, why do I want to buy the multiborrower deal? It’s taking a somewhat complicated unproven story and adding another layer of complexity on to it” Demand for rentals has increased with the US.
 Invitation Homes, which has issued four sets of bonds totaling $29 billion, says it hasn’t struggled to find buyers.
 Anup Agarwal, head of structured products for Western Asset Management Co, said he will refrain from buying the securities until the deals have a longer track record and it becomes easier to trade the debt.
 Prices in the United Nationsmarket last month dropped to a record as demand from EU buyersis set to reach a limit set by lawmakers.
 The Istanbul-based group is borrowing almost 90 percent of the cash needed to buy the company from Blackstone Group LP and PAI Partners SAS, compared with an earlier plan to use loans for 40 percent and the remainder from its own reserves.
 The decision stems from the 2012 buyout of Kenneth Cole Productions Inc.
 The ruling in many ways parallels a similar Delaware case involving Ronald Perelman’s $250 million going-private buyout of his M&F Worldwide Corp.
 The BOJ is doing its best to help, unexpectedly expanding its bond-buying program on Oct.
 13, the highest level for the measure known as the NT Ratio this year, amid foreign buying of Japanese stocks.
 Central-bank buying also favors the Nikkei 225: more than half the BOJ’s ETF purchases will go into funds tracking the gauge, according to Tokai Tokyo Securities Co.
 The BOJ last month made funds tracking the newer measure eligible for its ETF buying.
 Assets including Treasury’s wineries and bottling plants “could be in someone else’s hands” In an industry where winemakers cherish their links to the land so closely that some have occupied the same sites for centuries, that’s a radical proposition, according to Phil Reedman, an independent wine consultant who spent nine years buying new world vintages for Tesco Plc.
 To restore profits, he’s been selling discount wine fridges to encourage drinkers to buy more bottles and clear retailers’ stock; increasing marketing spending 50 percent; and stripping Treasury’s brand list down to a core of 10 to 15 labels.
 It’s not completely unprecedented: most winemakers buy a portion of their grape juice from independent growers, even when they have their own vineyards.
 Italy’s largest carrier is considering buying a controlling stake in fiber-optic operator Metroweb and this holding may be valued at about 300 million euros, people familiar with the matter have said.
 “Smaller supplies may tweak some new buying interest from both domestic and foreign end-users” Reserves on Aug.
 Prices last month reached the lowest since 2009, reducing costs for buyers including Tyson Foods Inc.
 Dividend Payout The company, which will give an interim payout of 75 yen a share, plans to raise dividends in a stable and sustainable manner, Executive Vice President Nobuyori Kodaira said at a briefing in Tokyo today.
 Spain’s Telefonica SA, owner of the Vivo brand in Brazil, in August agreed to buy local broadband provider GVT for about $9 billion.
 sales that exceeded analysts’ estimates as buyers emboldened by falling gasoline prices flocked to sport-utility vehicles.
 “Utility vehicles, especially small and mid-size, are the story once again, as consumers are buying more and willing to pay more for these models,” Alec Gutierrez, an analyst for Kelley Blue Book, said in an e-mailed statement “With gas prices at a three-year low and with consumer confidence at a seven-year high, this trend should continue” Strong Month Fiat Chrysler, which began trading Oct.
 “The outlooks are not so strong, and securities are not so low that you should buy aggressively or without mindfulness of the risks” US.
 The duo plan to invest as much as $1 billion to buy soured loans and troubled assets in the world’s second-largest economy, a person told Bloomberg News then.
 doesn’t need to buy assets from America Movil SAB to be successful in Mexico after agreeing to acquire a rival mobile-phone operator in the country, according to Chief Executive Officer Randall Stephenson.
 AT&T was among the potential suitors contacted about buying those assets, according to people familiar with the matter.
 “If we cannot find a good way to invest in ways that we feel comfortable with then we will look for” ways to return capital to shareholders in either the form of a higher-than-normal dividend, a special dividend, or a share buyback.
 The orders may help Shanghai-based Comac’s C919 get more acceptance among Chinese buyers, whose pledges have helped mask a shortage of overseas orders.
 The GE lessor signed a letter of intent to buy as many as 10 C919s at the Zhuhai Airshow in 2010.
 This is the third time in a year that Berkshire has structured a deal in which it buys businesses in exchange for stock that has appreciated.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Seplat Petroleum Development Co, a Nigerian oil producer that raised about $500 million in a share sale this year, is looking to buy natural-gas assets to take advantage of higher prices in Africa’s biggest economy.
 Pfizer said yesterday it will buy the rights to a cancer treatment being developed by Merck KGaA, based in Darmstadt, Germany, for $850 million, with fees growing by $2 billion if the drug meets certain goals.
 The central bank ended its bond-buying program last month amid an improving labor market.
 “This has had a marked impact on the relative performance of Toyota against Hyundai” He recommends selling the South Korean currency to buy dollars.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Brazilian consumers, squeezed by stagnant growth and a weaker currency, are buying fewer foreign goods.
 Danone is also discussing a sale of its medical-nutrition business with potential suitors, including Fresenius SE and several buyout firms, people with knowledge of the process said.
 who recommends buying Best Buy stock.
 “We want the company properly de-leveraged, with a strong balance sheet and ample liquidity in hand,” Kron said, adding that Alstom may buy back some bonds before they mature “if it makes sense” Alstom rose as much as 28 percent to 2865 euros, the highest intraday price since June 23, and was trading up 17 percent at 2:02 pm.
 It plans to grant foreigners, who are barred from directly buying and selling domestic assets, access to the $522 billion market next year.
 By 2015, every restaurantand gate seat in United’s Terminal C will have an iPad, lettingtravelers get flight updates, browse the web, buy food and makeretail purchases with a 15-minute delivery guarantee.
 For travelers hungry for a different kind of distraction,e-purchasing at every seat allows customers to buy magazines,small electronics and neck pillows without moving an inch.
 Atthe United terminal, passengers will also be able to buymerchandise from OTG-operated stores and duty free, featuresthat aren’t available at LaGuardia or JFK.
 The benchmark gauge rallied 25 percent last week, for its second consecutive weekly gain, as companies released results, and the Bank of Japan increased its stimulus while Japan’s public pension fund said it will buy more foreign stocks.
 Dividend Plans Genel also agreed to buy OMV AV’s 36 percent stake in Bina Bawi for $150 million, paying $20 million at the completion of the deal and the rest when gas output, due from 2018, begins.
 The share-price gains caused losses for short sellers who have been divesting stock they don’t own in anticipation of buying it back cheaper.
 Foreign Buying Singapore’s efforts to prevent a property bubble, which started in 2009 and include stricter lending criteria and higher taxes on foreign buyers, have contributed to overseas purchases of residential real-estate dropping to 87 percent of total transactions last quarter from 18 percent in the same period three years ago, according to data from the Urban Redevelopment Authority.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Olam International Ltd, a commodity trader controlled by Singapore’s state investment company, said it’s in talks to buy or sell assets after the stock exchange questioned a gain in its shares.
 said in June it will buy a controlling stake in Olam’s Australian grain unit, while the Tokyo-based trading house’s Sanyo Foods Co.
 as a partner in Gabon after the Indian company announced it would not proceed with buying a 251 percent stake in the ammonia-urea fertilizer project, the Singapore trader said in March.
 Investors balked at buying debt that paid less interest than the approximately 11 percent yield on the company’s most junior notes at the time.
 economy is able to weather a global slowdown even as the Federal Reserve winds down its bond-buying program.
 is in talks to buy the studio.
 added 13 percent as it agreed to buy the Duracell battery business from Procter & Gamble Co.
 is in talks to buy the company in a deal that would combine two of the largest and oldest names in the energy business as plunging oil prices send the industry into a downturn.
 Nordea Bank AB, which helped arrange the sale and had been urging clients to buy OW Bunker shares since Oct.
 “Good gas production and sales would make it a much more attractive proposition for interested buyers,” Nelson said in Sydney.
 While some investors rely on economic data for cues about whether to buy or sell, “oil has the upper hand for now” Oil Debate Saudi Arabia is cutting prices, the US.
 The debate is whether falling oil prices are good for economic growth or not, because it makes stuff like gas cheaper for consumers to buy.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Petroleos de Venezuela SA continues to show Citgo Petroleum Corp’s assets to prospective buyers even after the government said it canceled plans to sell the company, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Potential buyers include Valero Energy Inc, Marathon Petroleum Corp, Chevron Corp, HollyFrontier Corp, PBF Energy Inc.
 Jennings said on an earnings call today that the company hasn’t yet found any acquisitions where it could “add value” Citgo said in a July 29 filing that PDVSA was looking for a buyer and a week later PDVSA’s president said the company was worth “much more” than $10 billion.
 That makes CME responsible for monitoring some of the world’s busiest markets, where traders can buy and sell futures contracts tied to oil, stock benchmarks like the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index, and interest rates.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Brazil’s second-wealthiest man is buying London’s Gherkin skyscraper, adding to a procession of cash-rich investors seeking to obtain office properties in the British capital.
 Last month, Safra Group and Brazil’s Cutrale Group agreed to buy banana producer Chiquita Brands International Inc.
 Ten-year bond yields from France to Italy dropped today amid speculation the European Central Bank will buy sovereign debt to stimulate the euro-area economy.
 “There’s nothing else to buy” Current seven-year note yields fell two basis points to 194 percent at 11:34 am.
 “They already know that Norway is important in terms of energy supplies, but it could strengthen that understanding” State-owned Cnooc and its Canadian subsidiary, Nexen Inc, are looking into buying seismic data from Norway covering an area of the Barents Sea, according to a Sept.
 mobile-phone carrier, agreed to buy Grupo Iusacell SA from billionaire Ricardo Salinas for $25 billion to expand further into Latin America.
 The acquisition will take place after Salinas closes a deal to buy the 50 percent of Iusacell owned by Grupo Televisa SAB, AT&T said yesterday in a statement.
 The May agreement to buy DirecTV -- a deal that’s still awaiting regulatory approval -- marked AT&T’s first push outside the US.
 “Sometimes opportunities come up and we make decisions and act accordingly” AT&T was among the companies that America Movil contacted about buying $175 billion of Mexican wireless and landline businesses, people with knowledge of the matter said in September.
 America Movil has said the buyer needs to be new to the Mexican market to create more competition.
 The funds are the biggest buyers of leveraged loans, which are used to finance buyouts.
 In April, Vivendi SA snubbed Bouygues’s offer to buy SFR, France’s second-largest phone operator, agreeing instead to sell it to Altice SA in a deal valued at more than 17 billion euros.
 The company will benefit from a share buyback of up to 4 billion euros by French manufacturer Alstom SA, in which Bouygues has 29 percent.
 The buyback is due to take place after the planned sale of most of Alstom’s energy assets to General Electric Co.
 Bouygues will get more than 1 billion euros from the buyback, the CFO said.
 “Somebody’s ‘strong patent rights are spurring innovation’ is someone else’s ‘strong patents are causing litigation’” Big Payday Driving much of the change is a desire to make it less lucrative for companies that buy up patents on the cheap and then file suits in hopes of a big payday.
 While Emirates, the largest buyer of the superjumbo, is outfitting its first 90 double-deckers with turbines from the GE-Pratt Engine Alliance, it hasn’t specified a choice for the extra aircraft announced at the 2013 Dubai Air Show.
 Securing Emirates as a customer for the Trent 900 A380 engine would be a major coup for Rolls, with the Gulf carrier by far the most prolific buyer of the largest passenger plane.
 The government debt agency will offer to buy securities due in October 2015, February 2016 and October 2016 in exchange for the same nominal amount of bonds due in 2021 and 2023.
 BT said this week it is in talks to buy Telefonica SA’s O2unit or another mobile-phone company to expand its wirelessoffering in the UK.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- A Chinese company offered 434 billion kroner ($640 million) to buy REC Solar ASA, one of the last makers of solar panels in Western hands, a move that may help circumvent trade disputes in the US.
 The board was mandated to sell and started looking for buyers from the start of the spinoff, Chairman Ole Enger said today in an interview in Oslo.
 jumped 53 percent in Seoul after saying it will buy back shares valued at 219 trillion won ($2 billion).
 In April, it announced plans to target first-time buyers through its Express Homes line with prices starting at $120,000, a contrast with other public builders that have shifted their focus to move-up buyers with better finances.
 Horton a buy and expects earnings of 51 cents a share tomorrow.
 Even as the company slashed its holdings, usually by letting options expire, it maintained a foothold in most of its markets, then resumed building and buying ahead of competitors, said Jason Canin, an Orlando-area land broker for 22 years.
 “When it comes to finished lots, they are the most aggressive buyer in this market” Auld led three recent acquisitions of smaller builders to expand DR.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Lexington Partners Inc, one of the largest firms focused on buying private-equity stakes, agreed to acquire investments valued at about $1 billion from Mizuho Financial Group Inc, three people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Lexington will purchase all of the Tokyo-based lender’s stakes in the buyout funds for an undisclosed price, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 New York-based Lexington also agreed to provide as much as $250 million for new buyout investments, two people said.
 The bank has continued to commit capital to buyout funds this year through a structure allowed under the new regulations, one of the people said.
 “It’s disappointing,” said Alex Koagne, a Paris-based analyst at Natixis SA who recommends buying Societe Generale shares.
 will buy back a combined 670 billion won ($616 million) of stock after their purchase of a Seoul property for three times the assessed price spurred a sell-off.
 Hyundai, South Korea’s largest automaker, will buy back 22 million common shares and 652,019 preferred shares, while affiliate Kia will buy back 405 million common shares, both at yesterday’s closing prices, according to separate regulatory filings by the companies today.
 The buybacks will be completed by Feb.
 Telefonica, Europe’s largest investor in Latin American telecommunications, agreed in September in buy Vivendi SA’s Brazilian broadband unit GVT for about $9 billion.
 Since receiving compensation in May from Argentina for the nationalization of YPF SA in 2012, Repsol has been seeking to buy companies or assets in developed countries including the US.
 hoping to buy items such as a bag and a basketball-style top.
 For those who weren’t able to buy online from H&M, products such as the wet-suit black dress were available on e-Bay at more than twice their suggested retail price.
 The company also said today that it lost an arbitration claim against a former buyer of iron ore from Bloom Lake.
 She will consider buying more positions in energy shares after markets return to more stable levels.
 Horton has increased buyer incentives to boost sales.
 Hohn, 48, is known for his activist investing, buying stakes in companies and pressuring management to make changes that might drive up the share price.
 Banks will also help identify potential buyers for the stake, a second person said, also asking not to be identified.
 recommended investors buy shares of the bank.
 Lenders said have said potential buyers would lower their bids out of uncertainty whether they could close the sale on the terms struck now.
 Auction prices now could also be high if potential buyers save on taxes or aim to build their electricity business in Texas, he told the judge.
 “If NextEra buys Oncor today or in the conclusion of this sale process, do you suppose NextEra thinks that Oncor will be worth more or less a year from now?” he asked Keglevic.
 Investors buying bad loans from the region’s banks will also want to securitize the assets, he said.
 The central bank will buy the notes as part of a plan to expand its balance sheet by as much as 1 trillion euros.
 BBVA, Spain’s second-biggest bank, will buy 149 percent of Turkiye Garanti Bankasi AS from sellers including billionaire Ferit Sahenk and his company Dogus Holding AS, the bank said yesterday.
 shrugged off talk of a haircut to become this year’s biggest buyer of debt issued by Austria’s failed lender, Hypo Alpe-Adria-Bank International AG.
 It has a similar investment strategy to Pimco’s $36 billion Enhanced Short Maturity fund, but appears more inclined to buy riskier debt, Nadig said.
 In other words, buyers want safety, but not so much safety that they don’t earn anything.
 The remainder could be distributed to shareholders via a share buyback.
 Users of Disney Movies Anywhere, the film studio’s cloud-based movie ownership service, will be able to buy movies from Wal-Mart Stores Inc.
 15 amid better-than-estimated corporate results and economic data indicating the economy is strong enough to overcome any effects from a global slowdown and the end of Federal Reserve bond buying.
 downgraded the shares to market perform, or hold, from outperform, or buy.
 Share Buyback The company will also review its capital structure and may buyback stock to stem a recent drop in its share price, Alireza said.
 X2 is evaluating “a lot of different opportunities” in an attractive market for buyers, he said.
 “Keep buying China,” said Douglas Morton, head of Asia research at equity brokerage Aviate Global.
 That’s the biggest buy-rating blunder by analysts covering the 55 largest Chinese companies traded in New York.
 The company “will have difficulty monetizing, will always have the concern over government censorship hanging over them and will have slowing growth, all bad for stock price performance” Riedel was one of three analysts who had sell ratings on Sina last November, when 25 recommended buying and four advised investors to hold the shares.
 While their bullish calls on Sina were wrong, investors who followed the analysts’ recommendations to buy Baidu Inc.
 Cynthia Meng at Jefferies pointed out that she changed her rating to hold from buy in January, citing increased competition and tighter government oversight.
 “We’re all left to guess where it will ultimately go,” said Baugh, who has had a buy recommendation on the stock since its IPO and raised his price target to $70 on Nov.
 Five of six analysts covering Caesarstone recommend buying the stock, with an average price target for the next 12 months of $66.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- BT Group Plc, seeking to buy a UK.
 households buy at least some of their telecommunications services together, up from 29 percent in 2005.
 The company followed up by announcing it would buy an undisclosed stake in Youku Tudou Inc, China’s most popular online-video site.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- BB&T Corp, North Carolina’s second-largest lender, agreed to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc.
 agreed to buy OneWest Bank from parent IMB Holdco LLC for $34 billion.
 The Winston-Salem, North Carolina-based firm said in September it planned to buy Bank of Kentucky Financial Corp.
 The concern is that after six years of near-zero interest rates from the Federal Reserve and a largely one-way trade into bonds, a reversal of that demand will cause debt values to plunge as there won’t be many willing and available buyers on the other side.
 The Fed ended its bond-buying program last month while European and Japanese central banks are adding to their easy-money policies.
 “We believe that a buyout of the minority KDG shareholders, even at a significant premium to the current stock price, would be highly value-accretive for Vodafone” Vodafone shares fell 09 percent to 20515 pence in London trading at 8:51 am.
 28 (Bloomberg) -- Shandong Gold Mining Co, China’s third-largest producer by value, surged by its daily limit after it revived a plan to buy and develop reserves worth 505 billion yuan ($822 million).
 It’s the second attempt by the Jinan, Shandong-based miner to buy the assets after it scrapped a similar plan on Dec.
 economy can withstand a global slowdown as the Federal Reserve ended its bond-buying program.
 Chinese individuals who buy Hong Kong equities through the link get a three-year exemption, while mainland companies using the connect will be charged tax, the Ministry of Finance said in a statement today, clarifying its rules three days before the program’s debut.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Xiaomi Corp, China’s largest smartphone vendor, will buy a stake in Youku Tudou Inc.
 Providing a better view of the diamond unit, acquired from the billionaire Oppenheimer family in 2012, may help convince investors that buying Anglo shares is the best way to gain exposure to a commodity that’s gained about 75 percent in the past five years, outperforming any of the other major products the company mines.
 The introduction of online trading, where dealers can buy and sell parcels of gems worth millions online, is providing real-time pricing data, and represents a challenge to the old, more secretive ways of doing business, while banks that lend to the industry are demanding a more corporate approach from diamond traders and manufacturers.
 Since appointing Philippe Mellier, De Beers’s first outsider, as CEO in 2011, the company has been more aggressive in pricing and sought a more corporate approach from many of the family-run businesses that buy from them.
 Earlier this year, the company announced the biggest change to the way it sells diamonds in more than a decade, requiring more rigorous auditing of buyers’ accounts as it seeks to direct gems to the most financially sound purchasers.
 While buyers from mainland China still dominate Hong Kong sales, Christie’s is casting a wider net in search of affluent collectors from elsewhere in Asia with the modern and contemporary art offerings from Nov.
 “Chinese buyers are more low key these days, with China’s official austerity a factor,” said Jehan Chu, a Hong Kong-based art adviser who runs Vermillion Art Collections.
 I would not touch oil and gas stocks as it’s far too risky now” Europe’s equity benchmark gained 31 percent this month, as Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank may broaden its asset-buying program to include the purchase of government bonds, while central banks in Japan and China stepped up measures to support their economies.
 Deutsche Lufthansa AG gained 49 percent as UBS Group AG recommended buying the shares.
 cut its rating on Europe’s biggest producer of refined copper to neutral from buy.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Worldwide spending on medicines will reach almost $13 trillion by 2018, as new treatments for hepatitis C and cancer come to market and as people around the globe use rising incomes to buy pharmaceuticals.
 The analyst, who recommends buying the stock, predicts margins will begin to expand again next year.
 Management at Southern Copper, which had the most insider buying in the US.
 Larrea’s buying “helped to support the stock” as copper prices slid 11 percent this year, according to Garrett Nelson, an analyst at BB&T Capital Markets in Richmond, Virginia.
 “The buyback, whether at corporate level or ownership level, reinstalls investor faith in the shares” Grupo Mexico referred requests for comment from Larrea to Southern Copper.
 Southern Copper’s buybacks indicate the company expects prices to rebound, as more than 75 percent of revenue is generated by copper sales, BB&T’s Nelson said.
 Larrea’s Southern Copper purchases might be an attempt to convince the market the stock is cheap and encourage buying, Rohr said.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Shares of larger oil companies are worth buying even if crude fails to rebound any time soon from a second-half slump, according to Savita Subramanian, head of US.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to engage management and the board when they disclose their holdings in a filing with the US.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Lenders from London to Qatar are hunting for African banks to buy.
 Nigeria’s Asset Management Corp, set up in 2010 to buy bad loans from lenders amid a banking crisis that began in 2009, sold Mainstreet Bank Ltd.
 Investors pressing for interest include hedge funds that buy discounted debt from distressed companies and fight for a higher return in bankruptcy.
 He said the ECB will buy assets for at least two years and study further stimulus.
 reported October sales that exceeded analysts’ estimates as buyers emboldened by falling gasoline prices flocked to sport-utility vehicles.
 Bewkes has said that his growth plan for an independent Time Warner will create more value than Rupert Murdoch’s $85-a-share buyout offer, which was rejected and then withdrawn in August.
 “The results were better than we expected,” said Tuna Amobi, an equity analyst at S&P Capital IQ who recommends buying Time Warner shares.
 From a buyer’s perspective, prices in Asia have improved, Perth-based Woodside said in August, as large oil and gas producers have shifted their focus to unlocking shale gas and oil reserves in North America.
 “It seems to be more of a buyer’s market” The Energy Department’s statistical arm said yesterday US.
 The purchase followed PTTEP and PT Pertamina’s deal last year to buy Hess’s Indonesian assets for $13 billion.
 It may take time in some cases for deals to be completed and the expectations of buyers and sellers to align, UBS’ Burns said.
 are expanding as buyers seek more tank cars to move surging oil shipments and get ahead of a US.
 With rail traffic rising at 45 percent this year through September and railroads adding cars to improve service, orders should remain strong, said Stifel’s Baudendistel, who has a buy recommendation on Trinity and a hold on Greenbrier and American Railcar.
 The acquisition would be the second multibillion-dollar deal this year for Drahi, after the Franco-Israeli businessman also agreed to buy French wireless carrier SFR for about $23 billion.
 Throughout the 1990s, Drahi bought and sold cable companies, deals that eventually led to the creation of Numericable, alongside buyout firm Cinven Group Ltd.
 The changes may reduce the number of preferred shares that may be issued to General Retail Holdings LP, the Standard General affiliate that agreed to buy one of RadioShack’s loans last month, by as much as 10 percent, the Fort Worth, Texas based company said today in a filing.
 It then sold the same amount of rupee-denominated bonds onshore, and had the offshore unit buy the debt.
 CapitaLand has realigned its business to focus on its core markets of Singapore and China after buying the rest of its mall unit to consolidate and boost returns.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Burger King Worldwide Inc, which is buying coffee chain Tim Hortons Inc, posted quarterly sales in the US.
 On Deck On Deck, which disclosed its IPO prospectus last month, has also reached out to potential buyers -- including traditional lenders, said people with knowledge of the matter.
 “There’s been a generally positive reaction to earnings, and rates and oil are stabilizing, but the buy ticket is a much more cautious one,” Tom Wright, the New York-based director of equities at JMP Securities LLC, said by phone.
 Any new action would follow measures including interest-rate cuts, long-term bank loans and covered-bond purchases, with buying of asset-backed securities said to have started today.
 Draghi has also declined to rule out buying government bonds.
 Bouygues SA advanced 39 percent to 2997 euros after Altice SA’s chief executive officer said it would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom after completing its acquisition of local mobile-phone company SFR.
 The oil explorer active in Africa agreed to buy London-based producer Salamander Energy Plc in an all-stock offer.
 The buyout firm also co-owns Australian petrochemicals and plastics maker Qenos Ltd, alongside China National Chemical Corp, according to Qenos’s website.
 A property slump and slowdown in investment growth has set China, the biggest buyer, on course for the weakest full-year growth since 1990.
 It’s been “very difficult” to quantify how China Resources is being affected by the austerity campaign as “we don’t know who are buying these products and what percentage of sales are related to this,” he said.
 The work paid off today when France’s Publicis Groupe SA, the third-largest advertising company, announced it’s buying Boston-based Sapient for $37 billion, paying a 44 percent premium to the stock’s Oct.
 It failed to find a buyer for its 73 percent stake in a Brazilian plant.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Dow Chemical Co, under pressure from activist investor Third Point LLC to improve its performance, raised its dividend back to pre-financial crisis levels and announced another tranche of share buybacks.
 The latest $5 billion of stock repurchases brings its total buyback program to $95 billion, Dow said.
 31, when the Bank of Japan expanded stimulus and the nation’s pension fund said it will buy more shares.
 31 it would raise its target for annual purchases of Japanese government bonds to 80 trillion yen, while tripling buying of real-estate investment trusts.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Pandora A/S Chief Executive Officer Allan Leighton says expansion of the jeweler’s online business will help it capitalize on a common male failing: gift buying.
 While the proportion of men is typically 35 percent to 40 percent of total purchases, it can be as much as 70 percent online in gift-buying season, he said.
 Most men “are hopeless at buying gifts,” he said.
 “We actually get a bit embarrassed going into jewelry stores” Pandora is focusing on delivery times, after-service and wrapping to make it easy for men seeking gifts for their significant other, according to the CEO, who used the company’s online service today to buy a birthday present for his partner.
 There was talk in August 2012 that LabCorp may be a buyout candidate.
 is bettingthat the Chinese authorities will let investors buy exchange-traded funds over the new link between Hong Kong and Shanghai.
 Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd’s chiefexecutive officer, Charles Li, has said that China’s capital-markets regulators may widen the range of assets permitted totrade over the link, opening the way for mainland investors tobuy Hong Kong-listed ETFs that track Nasdaq’s indexes.
 Hong Kong investors are limited to daily purchases of 13billion yuan ($21 billion), while mainland traders can buy asmuch as 105 billion yuan.
 To contact Bloomberg News staff for this story:Eduard Gismatullin in Hong Kong at egismatullin@bloombergnet Photographer: Brent Lewin/Bloomberg Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd’s chief executive officer, Charles Li, has said that China’s capital-markets regulators may widen the range of assets permitted to trade over the link, opening the way for mainland investors to buy Hong Kong-listed ETFs that track Nasdaq’s indexes.
 Read More Close Open Photographer: Brent Lewin/Bloomberg Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd’s chief executive officer, Charles Li, has said that China’s capital-markets regulators may widen the range of assets permitted to trade over the link, opening the way for mainland investors to buy Hong Kong-listed ETFs that track Nasdaq’s indexes.
 In 2003, O’Kelly led an executive buyout of NCB, which was sold to Investec Plc in 2012.
 “I was bumming couches from friends so I wouldn’t have to buy gas for the extra trip,” he said yesterday.
 The Nordic Association of Electricity Traders says the drop will intensify when a ban on banks guaranteeing deals begins in 16 months, cutting volume by half and boosting costs for buying and selling fivefold.
 Traders buy and sell securities linked to delivery of power anytime from now to 10 years away.
 Instead, Arizona residents got “false representations and omissions” that lulled them into buying more GM cars that lost value as they were recalled, he said.
 By buying the currency for less and then pushing up the rate at which he would offer it to the client, he could make a bigger profit.
 The others agreed to transfer their buy orders to him and offload any positions that ran counter to his strategy to maximize his chances of success, the FCA said.
 Over the 33 seconds around 1:15 pm, the Citigroup dealer made several transactions, buying 374 million euros for more than the best rate to push up the fix.
 “It’s important to note that the buy side has been very involved in the development of the protocol,” Steven Kennedy, an ISDA spokesman, said in a statement today.
 Bonus Amounts “If the objective is to try to retain senior people from leaving to go to the buy side, the structure is similar to what goes on in asset-management land, but the absolute dollar numbers are going to be smaller,” Weinstein said.
 The firm ended up buying their stakes.
 Bridge Street 2011 funds were involved in a buyout that year by Goldman Sachs and Warburg Pincus LLC of Endurance International Group Holdings Inc, one of the world’s largest website-hosting companies.
 Global Collapse The $330 billion worldwide market for auction-rate securities collapsed during the 2008 credit crunch as potential buyers vanished.
 “Investors are buying call options as they expect markets to rally further,” Alex Mathews, head of research at Geojit BNP Paribas Financial Services Ltd, said in a phone interview from Kerala in southern India.
 SolAmerica Energy LLC, an Atlanta-based developer, is building the projects and Southern Co’s Georgia Power unit has agreed to buy the electricity, Guelph, Ontario-based Canadian Solar said today in a statement.
 Foreign investors using the unprecedented access under the Shanghai-Hong Kong connect to buy yuan-denominated A-shares will be “temporarily” exempt from capital-gains tax starting Nov.
 Chinese individuals who buy Hong Kong equities through the link get a three-year exemption, while mainland companies using the link will be charged tax.
 If you want to play that game early, then you buy an ETF and you are front-running” Money managers who had previously wanted to avoid China’s tax regime could get exposure to the country by purchasing shares of mainland companies in Hong Kong, which has no capital gains tax.
 The exchanges agreed in April to allow a net 235 billion yuan ($38 billion) of daily cross-border purchases, opening up the mainland market further to foreigners while giving wealthy Chinese investors a route to buy Hong Kong stocks.
 “Banks are still buying as they deal with regulatory issues, and the US.
 is still the cheapest front end and long end in the Group of Seven area, which brings in foreign buyers” Relative Attractiveness Treasuries headed for a second winning month as China cut interest rates and central banks in Europe and Japan pumped money into their slumping economies, raising concern policy makers are bracing for a global slowdown and increasing the relative attractiveness of higher-yielding US.
 The spread between Treasury 10-year yields and Group of Seven counterparts reached 88 basis points, the widest since September, as yields fell amid speculation the European Central Bank will embark on additional bond buying.
 Among stocks that moved on corporate news, Bouygues SA climbed 44 percent after Altice SA’s chief executive officer said the company would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- After the breakup of a joint marketing venture and subsequent plunge in potash prices wiped out all of OAO Uralkali’s buy ratings last year, analysts are turning bullish again as the weakening ruble and a rebound in demand boosts the Russian producer’s profit outlook.
 Six analysts rate Uralkali a buy, while 13 recommend holding the stock and three advise selling, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The market still underestimates the potential for gains in the stock” Ruble’s Plunge Petropavlovskiy, whose recommendations on Uralkali have produced the best returns over the past year among the analysts who cover it, raised the stock to buy from hold on Oct.
 Uralkali lost all its buy recommendations after the producer broke up the trading venture with Belarus in July 2013 and said it would operate at full capacity to regain market share, triggering a price war in the $20 billion global potash market.
 Pagano Jr, said in a statement that buying AERCO complements its commercial market portfolio and “will allow us to expand our product breadth” Riverside bought AERCO in 2007.
 That’s where you’ll find Steven Chan Soon Fatt, who buys everything from old newspapers to scrap metal that he resells to local factories.
 The drop explains why factories that buy scrap metal are paying less to sellers like Chan, who has had to chop his own price for copper wire from more than S$10 a kilogram.
 9 it’s selling its Kensington Group Plc mortgage business for 180 million pounds after buying it for 283 million pounds in 2007, just before the financial crisis.
 Some mills in the largest buyer were ordered to suspend or reduce output before the summit of leaders at the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation forum in Beijing as the authorities sought to improve local air quality.
 Air Pollution “Measures to cut air pollution in Hebei have kept buying of feedstocks to a minimum,” Australia & New Zealand Banking Group Ltd.
 China, which buys about 67 percent of seaborne ore, is importing record amounts at a time when growth is slowing.
 “There is no question that Iron Mountain should want to buy Recall,” James Santo, a special situations trader at Aviate Global LLP in Sydney, said by phone.
 It could buy Recall and strip out sales, marketing and back-office costs to increase profit at the combined company, said David Fraser, an analyst at Shaw Stockbroking Ltd.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- As home prices in Italy fall for the seventh year, buyers have stopped waiting for the bottom.
 Homebuyers are taking advantage of the lowest mortgage costs since 2011 even as the economy contracts and prices continue to fall.
 The recovery in home buying this year is much weaker than previous rebounds in 1976, 1985 and 1997, Nomisma said in a report this month.
 who has a buy rating on Sotheby’s, wrote in a report yesterday that the change “could close the gap between the strong Sotheby’s brand and the output of the Sotheby’s business” The news about Ruprecht comes after a record November auction season for Sotheby’s.
 26 (Bloomberg) -- Britain’s biggest mortgage lenders face weakening earnings growth as potential homebuyers pull back before next year’s general election, regulators tighten financing and the economy slows.
 Europe Slows Demand for homes is falling as more stringent lending criteria make it harder for buyers to get mortgages.
 These include curbs on how much banks can lend relative to a borrower’s income, and requirements that banks refuse loans to homebuyers who fail a stress test that assumes an immediate 3 percentage-point increase in the benchmark interest rate.
 The central bank will start buying asset-backed securities this week as part of stimulus plans that already include covered-bond purchases, long-term loans to banks and record-low interest rates.
 The exchange operator agreed to buy the company from Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.
 claims that they overstated fuel economy on the window stickers car buyers see at showrooms.
 The company will buy back $300 million more in stock this year than originally planned, Chief Financial Officer Robert Hull said on the call.
 Price appreciation, however, is moderating as more properties are listed for sale and buyer demand slows, the group said.
 The number of contracts to buy existing homes also rose less than forecast in September, signaling demand may plateau heading into the end of 2014.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Ace Ltd, the Swiss insurer with operations in more than 50 nations, authorized $15 billion of share buybacks to take place in 2015.
 Fans of the web series “High Maintenance” will be able to watch it in eight languages, including French, German, Spanish and Italian, and buy it using euros.
 In February, the company bowed to Elliott’s pressure for cost cuts and share buybacks, unveiling plans to return at least $3 billion to shareholders and to reduce $160 million in expenses.
 The nonbanks have been rapidly expanding by buying mortgage servicing rights, or MSRs, from banks.
 They probably will buy the rights to collect payments on another $750 billion of mortgages in the next two to three years as banks prepare for new regulations that will make it more costly to own the assets, said Douglas Harter, an analyst at Credit Suisse AG.
 will buy electricity to power a data center in the Netherlands from a 62-megawatt wind farm being built in the country by Eneco Holding NV.
 Internet company signed a 10-year contract to buy the entire output of the farm to power a 600 million-euro ($750 million) data center it’s developing in Eemshaven, it said today in a posting on its Europe blog.
 In April, it agreed to buy 407 megawatts of wind power from Warren Buffett’s MidAmerican Energy Holdings Co.
 An option is a contract that grants the right to buy or sell an asset at a set price.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- Sona Petroleum Bhd, a company with no assets or track record, won approval from the Malaysian Securities Commission to buy a stake in two Thai oil and gas blocks, a person with knowledge of the matter said.
 Sona, which raised 550 million ringgit ($164 million) in an initial public offering last year, agreed in June to buy 40 percent of London-based Salamander Energy Plc’s assets in the Gulf of Thailand for $281 million.
 Ophir said in an exchange filing today Salamander accepted its all-stock offer to buy the company.
 Sona is trying to buy a stake in the Bualuang oilfield, which has been operating since 2008 and is expected to produce an average of 11,000 to 14,000 barrels of oil daily this year, according to Salamander’s website.
 That’s stoked local prices even as global rates fell, and some buyers are turning to imports.
 Spring, which intends to hold an initial share sale this year, doesn’t plan to buy more aircraft for the leasing operation and will rely on the airline’s order book for now, Tian said.
 said yesterday it agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 35 planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviation-services unit to enter the aircraft-leasing business.
 to buy an additional 15 aircraft for $7335 million.
 The company bid in August to buy a portfolio of planes from Terra Firma Capital Partners Ltd’s Awas arm to build up the leasing business.
 The carrier plans to buy a maximum of nine Airbus Group NV A320 aircraft and three A320 simulators, according to its preliminary IPO prospectus.
 Last month SoftBank agreed to invest in Legendary Entertainment, producer of the “Godzilla” film, and buy DramaFever Corp, which offers Korean TV programs online for English-language viewers Future merger and acquisitions for SoftBank will focus on Asian Internet companies with the company to aim for stakes of 30 percent to 40 percent, Son said today.
 The Canadian company has said it’s seeking to buy Allergan to expand its portfolio and become one of the world’s largest drugmakers.
 Ackman has said that he welcomes a review by the Securities and Exchange Commission of Pershing Square’s tactics and that it did nothing wrong -- acting as a co-buyer, alongside Valeant.
 While the central bank is already expanding its range of asset purchases, it has yet to commit to broad-based bond buying, or quantitative easing.
 Customers who buy multiple services from a single carrier are more loyal and generate greater revenue.
 India last month decided to buy Israeli anti-tank guided missiles and launchers, shunning a rival US.
 It’s one of the many signals of a more assertive India and one that takes terrorism very seriously” India, the world’s largest weapons buyer, has bought 41 billion rupees ($662 million) of Israeli arms since Modi took power six months ago.
 A month later, it approved a 32-billion-rupee deal to buy 8,356 Spike anti-tank guided missiles and 321 launchers built by Rafael Advanced Defense Systems Ltd.
 Javelin “will not negatively impact our relationship with India or other possible military sales” to the country, the Pentagon’s top weapons buyer, Frank Kendall, said in an e-mail.
 Vornado, which didn’t disclose the buyer, expects the sale to close in the fourth quarter.
 In addition to hiring Gross, the firm recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 “The key element to what Constancio said is everything will go according to the ECB’s capital key, so basically buying lots of bunds,” said Marc Ostwald, a strategist at ADM Investor Services International Ltd.
 On the other hand, with yields where they are there is hardly going to be a rush of buyers” Germany’s 10-year yield was little changed at 074 percent at 4:52 pm.
 The ECB will consider buying sovereign bonds in proportion to the size of each euro member’s economy, according to Constancio.
 “If not, we will have to consider buying other assets, including sovereign bonds in the secondary market, the bulkier and more liquid market of securities available.
 It would be a pure monetary-policy decision, buying accordingly to our capital key, within our mandate and our legal competence” The so-called key is the ratio for each member-nation that reflects its share of ECB capital, based on the size of both its population and economy.
 Now, the Federal Reserve is preparing to raise rates and junk-bond buyers are getting jittery.
 Fortress, which is in exclusive talks with the Milan-based bank to buy UniCredit Credit Management Bank SpA along with 25 billion euros ($31 billion) in soured loans, is working out legal details of the deal, said two people who asked not to be identified because the matter isn’t public.
 Prelios, the Italian asset manager that has teamed up with Fortress on the transaction, has an option to buy 25 percent of the new company’s equity from Fortress when the deal goes through and may sell the stake to a third party, one of the people said.
 Fortress has joined Anacap Financial Partners LLP and other global private-equity firms that are negotiating to buy at least 7 billion euros of Italian bad debt, according to data from PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP.
 “We may see the market run out of steam at the moment, but a pullback will be a buying opportunity” Futures on the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index gained 01 percent after the underlying measure declined 01 percent yesterday.
 As part of the transaction, Coca-Cola will buy SABMiller’s Appletiser brands on a global basis and gain rights to another 19 non-alcoholic drinks in Africa and Latin America for about $260 million in cash.
 Efficiency is the most important feature to pickup buyers, Fields said on Bloomberg Television.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- Billionaire Kumar Mangalam Birla said he is open to buying overseas cement factories in a deal similar to his $58 billion acquisition of aluminum maker Novelis Inc.
 “There is no desperation to buy international or Indian assets.
 UltraTech agreed last year to buy Jaiprakash Associates Ltd’s cement factory in Gujarat state for an enterprise value of 38 billion rupees ($620 million).
 The buyout helped Hindalco more than triple sales by March 2008 and enter automotive sheets business in Europe and the US.
 Since then world oil prices have climbed 10-fold and that coupled with a growing middle class buying more cars and motorbikes pushed Indonesia to become a net fuel importer, sending the subsidy bill skyrocketing and contributing to a persistent current-account deficit.
 The month-long parliament session will prove a key test for Modi’s reform agenda as he seeks to lift the cap on foreign investment in insurance, pass a new goods and services tax and make it easier to buy land.
 Guggenheim Securities LLC, a company hired by Pasadena, Texas-based Kior, has solicited more than 165 potential buyers and the company will continue to market its assets for sale, according to documents filed in US.
 Founded in March 2011, Starboard usually targets small-cap companies in an activist strategy developed by Smith and Mark Mitchell since 2002 and Peter Feld since 2005 -- buying stakes in companies they call undervalued and pushing executives and directors for changes such as unit spinoffs and asset sales.
 Activist investors tend to buy at least 5 percent of a company’s stock and flag their intention to actively engage corporate executives and directors by disclosing their holding in a 13D filing with the SEC.
 The ECB has cut its benchmark rate to a record-low 005 percent and began buying covered bonds to boost inflation and rekindle growth.
 agreed to buy OneWest Bank from parent IMB Holdco LLC for $34 billion.
 The Winston-Salem, North Carolina-based firm said in September it planned to buy Bank of Kentucky Financial Corp.
 and may seek to buy more.
 That company agreed in September to buy Glimcher Realty Trust for about $2 billion to create a diversified retail property owner.
 Frigid weather may spur John Kinsey to buy shares in gas producers after five years largely on the sidelines of North America’s gas market, which has featured depressed prices thanks to vast supplies from shale.
 Mason Hawkins, founder of Southeastern Asset Management Inc, recommended investors buy Level 3 Communications, Inc, the money management firm’s largest US.
 “Steve was so secretive and controlling that Patricia was only allowed to contact his secretary to request monthly transfers of money for their joint checking account so she could pay the family bills and buy groceries,” she said in court papers.
 Algorithmic-driven trading already accounts for the majority of spot trades, the buying and selling of currency for immediate delivery, a trend that has cost a growing number of traders their jobs in recent years.
 It predicts about 81 percent of spot trading -- the buying and selling of currency for immediate delivery -- will be electronic by 2018.
 While debt has traditionally been brokered through conversations or in e-mails, an increasing proportion is moving to computer platforms as the biggest and smallest firms grow less willing to commit their own money to buying big blocks of debt from investors.
 They may have a job, but it’s not a great job, and it doesn’t give them enough income to go out and buy a home” The housing market has been supported by borrowing costs near historic lows.
 Of the smaller suppliers, those that aren’t focused on niche markets or aligned closely to a long-established client may be vulnerable without the economies of scale in buying raw materials such as sand and soda ash, Bouts said.
 China Market Essilor is looking to buy small businesses in Asia, Africa and Middle East that sell sunglasses, manufacture lenses and have online operations, Sagnieres said on a conference call on Oct.
 In China, Essilor will buy and partner with small retailers to increase sales beyond the cities of Beijing, Shanghai and Guangzhou, Sagnieres said on the sidelines of an advisory board meeting at the China Europe International Business School.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- Hungary is in talks to buy lenders from foreign owners and expand domestic control of the banking industry to at least 60 percent, Prime Minister Viktor Orban said today.
 Hungary has already exceeded its aim of having more than half of the banking sector in local hands after buying MKB Bank Zrt.
 The government is buying banks temporarily to increase domestic ownership and it will attempt to sell the stakes to local investors via the stock exchange or other means, he said.
 AT&T is already buying DirecTV, a move that aligns it with one of Slim’s fiercest Mexican rivals, Grupo Televisa SAB.
 AT&T was among potential buyers contacted about America Movil’s assets, a deal that would further pit the partners of 24 years against each other.
 AT&T is gaining 86 million subscribers by buying closely held Iusacell from billionaire Ricardo Salinas.
 AT&T was among the companies that America Movil reached out to about buying $175 billion of Mexican assets, people with knowledge of the matter said in September.
 America Movil has said the buyer needs to be new to the Mexican market to create more competition.
 The question is whether regulators would be amenable to AT&T being the buyer of America Movil’s assets.
 DirecTV, which AT&T is still waiting on regulatory approval to buy, has a 41 percent stake in Sky Mexico.
 Weatherford International would be a logical buyer for all of the likely assets to be sold, Hallead said.
 National Oilwell Varco could be a buyer for the drill bits and drilling fluids areas, he said.
 is another possible buyer of some segments expected to be sold, said Praveen Narra, an analyst for Raymond James & Associates Inc.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- The buyer of United Biscuits Holdings Ltd.
 Istanbul-based Yildiz, which also has investments in finance, will pay close to 21 billion pounds to buy the UK-based biscuit company from Blackstone Group LP and PAI Partners SAS, the person said, asking not to be identified because the information is confidential.
 European premiums that buyers pay for faster delivery rose more than 15 percent.
 That issuance, and the resulting frenzy to buy the debt, drew scrutiny from US.
 He rates the shares a buy.
 He recommends clients buy the shares.
 Delta Lloyd eventually plans to move to a full cash dividend and buy back shares to eliminate dilution from stock payouts.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- A merger of Fiat Chrysler Automobiles NV and Volkswagen AG would create a well-balanced global automaker that would be highly profitable, John Krafcik, president of auto-buying website TrueCar Inc, said yesterday.
 TrueCar, which is based in Santa Monica, California, and helps customers find a fair price for vehicles they buy and sell through dealers in its network, had its initial public offering in May.
 This is Black Hole Friday (except it’s Tuesday), where everything within the giant maw of the rapacious buying bot that we’ve become gets sucked in along with a couple of coupons and free shipping.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Plains All American Pipeline LP agreed to buy Occidental Petroleum Corp’s 50 percent stake in a conduit that brings crude oil from the Permian Basin in West Texas to Gulf Coast refiners for $108 billion.
 Magellan Midstream Partners LP, which owns the other half of the joint venture, will buy Occidental’s stake in a 40-mile southern portion of the pipeline for $75 million in a related transaction announced today.
 Occidental said in July it was seeking a buyer for its 35 percent stake in the general partner that controls Plains.
 Processing tomatoes are different from the kind consumers buy in grocery stores for home consumption.
 “It may still take a little more pain before Randgold makes acquisitions” Bristow said the company would be willing to repeat the Moto model by buying with a partner, meaning it could look at assets that cost as much as $14 billion.
 Apple’s release in September of new large-screen iPhones has eaten into the market that Samsung pioneered, while Xiaomi won over budget buyers with feature-packed devices using Google Inc’s Android operating system.
 The Frankfurt-based ECB is already buying covered bonds and asset-backed securities as it expects to bring its balance sheet back to the level it had at the beginning of 2012.
 “However, should it become necessary to further address risks of too prolonged a period of low inflation, the Governing Council is unanimous in its commitment to using additional unconventional instruments within its mandate” Still, Bundesbank President Jens Weidmann, a long-running opponent to buying government bonds, today highlighted the positive consequence of low oil prices.
 Ultimately all of the financial gains of exploiting properties at the heart of the Eagle Ford oil play flowed to subsequent buyers, who either produced the oilfields for their own benefit, or flipped the drilling rights at much higher prices to other companies.
 The oil trader is in the process of buying Australia’s top bakery firm Goodman Fielder Ltd.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Altice SA, the cable holding company owned by billionaire Patrick Drahi, said it’s the “most natural buyer” for Bouygues SA’s telecommunications unit in France.
 Altice, which holds a stake in France’s largest cable provider Numericable Group, would be open to discussing a deal to buy all of Bouygues Telecom after completing its $23 billion acquisition of local mobile-phone company SFR from Vivendi SA on Nov.
 Altice has argued that buying SFR makes sense because of cost savings from merging the two companies’ networks and brands.
 “We view ourselves as the most natural buyer” for Bouygues Telecom.
 He said the adviser has been handling inbound inquiries for both investment partners and potential buyers of Onion.
 “I want to reiterate that anything that’s transpired was not related to any operating basis at our firm or any performance of any product” RCS last week ended a deal with American Realty Capital Properties to buy Cole Capital, a private-capital management business.
 agreed to buy the Duracell battery business from Procter & Gamble Co.
 Two people with the matter previously said that Summit had appointed Arma as an adviser and Acturis was attracting interest from other private-equity firms and corporate buyers.
 Dow said separately it’s raising its dividend 14percent and planning an additional $5 billion in share buybacks.
 about a possible order after pledging to buy 100 Airbus Group NV airliners valued at $102 billion to support expansion in its home region and beyond.
 The proposal, which is the product of eight weeks of talks between the casino operator and its creditors, would help tame a $229 billion debt burden taken on six years ago in one of the biggest leveraged buyouts ever.
 Six-month swaps on the debt are trading at 635 percentage points upfront, meaning buyers would pay $635 million to insure $10 million of debt for six months, while five-year swaps are trading at 789 points, according to data provider CMA Inc.
 Buffett could build out his battery holdings by buying Energizer’s business too, taking advantage of its brand recognition and appeal to value-conscious shoppers, said Deborah Aitken of Bloomberg Intelligence.
 Caesars has struggled since a 2008 leveraged buyout to cope with a slow recovery in gambling nationwide and borrowings that exceed $24 billion.
 Sainsbury has the right to buy back the issue after three years if its shares rise to 30 percent or more above the conversion price for a pre-set period, according to the statement.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Diageo Plc, the world’s largest distiller, said it doesn’t plan to revive talks with the Beckmann family to buy the Cuervo tequila brand as it gains control of Tequila Don Julio.
 The ECB will buy assets for at least two years to boost its balance sheet by as much as 1 trillion euros ($12 trillion), he said.
 The firm expects to make investments that don’t fit within the mandate of Carlyle’s sixth main buyout fund, which raised $13 billion last year, said three people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be named because the information is private.
 The fund would charge lower fees than the firm’s traditional buyout offering, they said.
 Carlyle, the world’s second-biggest manager of alternative investments, is joining competitors in planning a new type of buyout vehicle with smaller fees and an extended term, reflecting the growing influence of clients in crafting investment offerings that benefit them.
 Today you should probably expect 15 to 17 percent for a good buyout fund” Returns Decline The median return for buyout funds that started investing after 2002 has been below 20 percent, according to Preqin Ltd, a research firm based in London.
 Blackstone’s highest-returning buyout funds are those that started investing in 2002 and 1993.
 The fees would be lower than those levied for a typical buyout fund, the person said.
 Lower Fees The firm would gather the money while also raising its next buyout fund, which is targeting about $16 billion.
 The firm’s latest buyout fund charges as much as a 15 percent management, depending on an the amount clients invest, and a 20 percent carried interest, according to a marketing document, a copy of which was obtained by Bloomberg News.
 When buyout funds exit companies, investors are forced to find a place to invest those distributions, which could end up in a lower-yielding asset.
 Adama, which was taken private by ChemChina in 2011 after it purchased a majority stake from Koor Industries Ltd, was marketing itself to investors amid a slump in grain prices that has sapped farmers’ appetite to buy the herbicides and fungicides that are the core of the company’s sales.
 fell the most in 15 months after the biggest developer of solar farms reported lower third-quarter profit and said it wouldn’t form a separate unit to buy its power plants.
 Stock buying through the exchange link picked up today.
 If they are foreign firms, there are no local buyers who have the capital to take on such large projects at the moment” Since coming to power in 2002, Turkey’s governing AK Party has reinvigorated development projects in the largely Kurdish southeast that began in the 1970s.
 Albina has sidestepped Argentina’s debt crisis by buying debt securities that are shielded from the US.
 The “Twitter Offers” feature is the second major product to help people shop through tweets, following the release of a “buy” button earlier this year.
 Consumers already use Twitter to discuss what they want to buy and testing these features will help decide the right products to make money off that behavior, said Nathan Hubbard, head of e-commerce for the San Francisco-based company.
 The clearinghouse becomes the counterparty to the seller of a contract and the buyer, meaning CME isn’t exposed to prices moving up or down, he added.
 BBVA, Spain’s second-biggest bank, said it’s seeking to buy as much as 149 percent of Garanti from Turkish billionaire Ferit Sahenk’s Dogus Holding AS.
 bond buyers are headed for quick profits after the e-commerce company’s $8 billion of debt traded above offering prices in the unofficial gray market.
 “There’s big global demand for this deal,” said Duch, whose firm oversees about $12 billion and has orders to buy the new offering.
 Technip SA, also French, this week proposed buying the seismic surveyor for 830 euros a share, almost 50 percent higher than CGG’s average price in the previous 20 trading sessions.
 agreed to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 Siemens AG is buying Dresser-Rand Group Inc.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- The flood of buy orders for Shanghai shares through the Hong Kong exchange link has slowed to a trickle two days after the program’s debut.
 Hong Kong stock buying slowed 68 percent from yesterday to 253 million yuan.
 to call the program a “Ghost Train,” a reference to the so-called Through Train plan to let mainland investors buy Hong Kong shares in 2007.
 “Investors won’t enter the markets to buy shares at such levels now” While the link has “huge” potential, one concern that may be curbing participation is a requirement for international investors to deliver stocks to a broker before markets open if they plan to sell in Shanghai, said Nick Ronalds, the managing director for equities at the Asia Securities Industry & Financial Markets Association.
 Shares rose amid speculation the central bank may reduce interest rates as lower energy costs cool inflation in a nation that buys almost 80 percent of its oil from abroad.
 24 (Bloomberg) -- BT Group Plc is in talks to buy Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or another mobile-phone company to expand its wireless offering in the UK.
 While policy makers at their October meeting concluded a bond-purchase program designed to hold down long-term borrowing costs and spur growth, they retained a pledge to keep interest rates low for a “considerable time” after the end of the buying.
 “Eligible buyers tend to get front-run by the institutions that are already in position to take advantage” The Shanghai index trades at 92 times estimated 12-month earnings, the highest since June 2013, while the H-shares measure has a multiple of 68 after losing 08 percent this year.
 Telecommunications companies are introducing bundled services because customers who buy more than one product spend more and stick around longer.
 14 (Bloomberg) -- The European Central Bank plans to take as many as five days to approve purchases of asset-backed securities when it starts buying the debt, according to two people familiar with the matter.
 The timeframe applies to larger transactions, while smaller purchases will be signed off in about 24 hours, said the people, who were briefed on the ECB’s asset-buying program and who asked not to be identified because the information is private.
 “They will be sensitive on the pricing of ABS and will be looking to buy at cheaper levels rather than just being a price taker of whatever is available” ECB President Mario Draghi has put ABS at the center of his plans to stimulate the euro-area economy because the securities allow the transfer of risk from banks to investors, which may encourage lenders to offer more credit to companies.
 The central bank will buy the securities as part of a plan to expand its balance sheet by as much as 1 trillion euros.
 Executive Board member Benoit Coeure said yesterday that the Governing Council has agreed on the parameters for buying ABS, and board member Yves Mersch said on Nov.
 10 that policy makers will be ready to buy ABS as of next week.
 Policy makers used the October gathering to approve the legal framework for buying covered bonds.
 Before the ECB buys ABS, the structure of the securities will be reviewed to ensure they meet minimum quality criteria set by the central bank, and the price will be assessed.
 The analysts covering Antero love the stock, giving it a consensus recommendation score of 428 on a scale that awards five points to the equivalent of a buy rating and one point to a sell.
 As Wall Street strategists advise that the tightly correlated returns of recent years are breaking down and the art of picking individual stocks is due for a comeback, companies loved by both analysts and short sellers seem like a perfect place to start shopping for shares to buy or sell.
 sold $950 million of bonds funding the software maker’s buyout by Vista Equity Partners at a discount after the price on a loan also backing the deal was lowered to attract investors.
 and Jefferies Group LLC, is being offered at 95 cents on the dollar, after failing to attract buyers at 985 cents to 99 cents, a separate person said Nov.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- London Stock Exchange Group Plc plans to add daily trading breaks as part of a strategy to woo the largest buy and sell orders.
 By only displaying to the market the total number of shares available to buy and sell, the bourse will enable big asset managers and pension funds to transact large blocks of shares without giving away their intentions, Brian Schwieger, said in a phone interview.
 Saudi Arabia, the world’s biggest crude exporter, ispreparing to open its $526 billion stock exchange to foreigninvestors next year, spurring investor interest in the nationForeign investors can’t buy Saudi-listed shares directly, andinstead access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 The cost of offering to buy or sell 100 shares will fall to 7 cents.
 “It creates an incentive, unfortunately, for people to do wash trades, in other words buy and sell without holding any risk,” Sprecher said on a conference call with analysts after releasing ICE’s earnings.
 Exchanges started paying electronic trading firms to provide standing orders to buy and sell securities at the much smaller increments.
 21 (Bloomberg) -- Cliffs Natural Resources Inc’s proposed note sale and offer to buy back some of its debt will bolster the largest US.
 for 200 million rand and Lewis agreed to buy the Beares brand for 40 million rand on Oct.
 “They are going to keep buying our debt.
 Foreign buyers have snapped up a number of Sydney five-star hotels in the past 18 months as the city’s occupancy rate heads for the highest since at least 2000.
 is seeking at least A$400 million from the sale of its Sydney center hotel, and has appointed JLL to find a buyer, people with knowledge of the matter said this week.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Japanese shares soared for a second day, with the Topix index closing at a six-year high, after the yen tumbled as the Bank of Japan boosted stimulus and the nation’s pension fund said it will buy more shares.
 “There is a risk in not holding Japanese shares, and those that sold them off will have to buy them back” Macquarie Securities Ltd.
 31 it raised its target for annual purchases of Japanese government bonds to 80 trillion yen ($706 billion), while tripling buying of real estate investment trusts.
 Federal Reserve winds down bond-buying.
 The company, which introduced the Hostess Cupcake in 1919 and Twinkies in 1930, emerged from the first bankruptcy in 2009 as a private company controlled by buyout firm Ripplewood Holdings LLC and lenders.
 2013 Liquidation The 2013 liquidation, which came after Hostess faced a workers strike that starved the company of sales during its bankruptcy, left its buyers free of union contracts and more than $1 billion in debt.
 Potential buyers of the snack-cakes brands include Mexico’s Grupo Bimbo SAB and Flowers Foods Inc, both of which acquired other parts of the Hostess business in 2013 and were interested in the snack-cakes as well, the people said.
 Grupo Bimbo won an auction to buy the Beefsteak bread brand, beating an initial bid by Flowers with a $319 million offer.
 We can’t yet say there are sophisticated networks at the international level, but they are working on their construction” Police are collaborating with other authorities domestically to determine export routes and verify evidence that suggests some legal mining companies with concessions in Colombia may be buying the illegal gold, Chaparro said Gold reached a four-year low earlier this month as expectations of higher interest rates next year helped the dollar rally.
 He points out that since the end of 1990, a strategy of buying the top 10 performing groups of the 130 sub-industries in the S&P 500 in the previous year has produced a compounded annual return of 152 percent compared with the S&P 500’s 95 percent.
 Wold, who recommends investors buy shares of Santa Monica, California-based Lions Gate, estimates the film will generate $425 million in ticket sales in its entire US.
 “We expect Mockingjay Part 1 to reinforce the vitality of the ‘Hunger Games’ franchise,” said Amobi, who recommends buying Lions Gate.
 20 (Bloomberg) -- Technip SA, Europe’s largest oil-and gas-services company, proposed buying CGG SA for about 147 billion euros ($18 billion) in a cash offer rejected by the seismic surveyor.
 The company lined up $578 million in prepayment loans from Apple to buy equipment to make the material, which wasn’t included in the latest version of the iPhone.
 “The last two years, utility fuel buyers have been sitting on the sidelines because they’ve been very worried that Japan’s 100 million-pound inventory will be released into the market,” said Alexander Molyneux, the chairman of Azarga Uranium Corp, a miner that expects to start output at its Dewey Burdock project in the US.
 “We continue to have investments in Russia and, if it wasn’t for the sanctions, we would probably be buying stocks in Russia in view of their attractive valuations,” Mark Mobius, who overseas about $40 billion as chairman of Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said by e-mail on Oct.
 It plans to grant foreigners, who are barred from directly buying and sellingdomestic assets, access to the $522 billion market next year.
 Investors are validating a strategy set in 2010, when Chief Executive Officer Gary Kelly agreed to buy AirTran Holdings Inc.
 The airline, which once eschewed congested airports in large cities, now serves some of the nation’s busiest after buying landing rights at New York’s LaGuardia and New Jersey’s Newark Liberty International.
 27 (Bloomberg) -- Lee Jae Yong is putting his stamp on Samsung Group after his father’s hospitalization with $8 billion in proposed deals, including a stock buyback.
 The buyback was announced after the market closed yesterday.
 Samsung Electronics, the world’s biggest maker of televisions and memory chips, will buy back 165 million common shares and 250,000 preferred stock for an estimated 22 trillion won, according to a regulatory filing yesterday.
 The increase is more than four times the estimated size of the buyback.
 The buyer, Hanwha Group, has been making explosives for more than six decades.
 and Samsung Engineering Co, though that was scrapped last week after shareholders claimed buyback rights.
 The program, designed to remedy a shortage of affordable housing, has provided hundreds of thousands of payments to Chileans who didn’t own property to buy homes.
 Larrain Vial Activos managers have seized the opportunity by giving $83 million in guaranteed loans to these first-time buyers in Chile.
 MYV Mutuos Hipotecarios allows borrowers to buy units anywhere in Chile developed by its approved construction companies.
 Securities and ExchangeCommission approached the company for information in a probe oflending to car buyers with spotty credit, the company said Oct31 in a regulatory filing.
 (CF),Canada’s largest non-bank brokerage, plans to buy a UK.
 The company is looking to buy a “bolt-on” wealth-management operation in the UK.
 Activists often agitate for changes at companies including a sale, raised buybacks or dividends, or expense cuts.
 Zoetis yesterday announced a $500 million share buyback and issued adjusted earnings guidance below what analysts had forecast.
 The main gauge for American equities plunged as much as 98 percent on an intraday basis amid concern global growth was slowing as the Fed was ending its bond-buying program.
 to buy new narrow-body planes amid a fleet makeover to reduce its reliance on unprofitable regional jets, people familiar with the matter said.
 The planemaker has struggled to find buyers for the CSeries, whose commercial debut is now set for 2015’s second half after missing a planned 2013 target.
 That agreement set a formula that lets United buy four 76-seaters -- such as Embraer E-175s -- for every five larger mainline planes it acquires, up to a total of 223 regional aircraft.
 Almost half of respondents in a NRF survey said they planned to buy video games, books, CDs or DVDs.
 are seeing thebenefits of the steadily improving economy as a strengtheninglabor market and gains in sentiment underpin consumer spendingThe outlook for growth supports the Fed’s recent decision tocomplete its bond-buying program, and central bankers continueto monitor economic progress while deciding when to raiseinterest rates for the first time in the recovery.
 plans to buy Maravest Group for 450 million rand ($41 million) to add low-fee private schools around Johannesburg and Pretoria to its offering of independent education services in South Africa.
 Instead, the world’s second-largest advertising group is searching for smaller targets it can buy.
 “They are not just buying shares that are not available domestically” Poor Record Some mainland investors were also turned off cross-border investing by the poor track record of Chinese money managers who buy foreign shares through the Qualified Domestic Institutional Investor program, according to Shenyin & Wanguo Securities Co.
 local time, triggering a halt in buy orders for the rest of the day.
 Dual-listed shares valued at a discount in Hong Kong were also among yesterday’s losers, after surging in recent months in anticipation of Chinese buying through the link.
 “The market is cheap and universally hated, investors are buying in hopes it will rise” Investors pulled $1773 million out of Russia-dedicated equity funds in the week through Nov.
 Sandell is pushing JDS to seek a buyer for its optical component and commercial laser unit and has submitted a shareholder proposal formally asking the board to evaluate additional strategic options.
 Beginning today, investors will be able to buy and sell futures on the Chicago Board Options Exchange’s 10-Year US.
 The events sometimes featured contests where attendees would identify stocks to buy and others they expected to underperform.
 Goodbody Stockbrokers may reduce its full-year operating-profit growth estimate on DCC by 3 percentage points to 12 percent, David O’Brien, a Dublin-based analyst with a buy recommendation on the stock, said today in a report.
 to find a buyer for the Hilton Sydney Hotel, said the people, who asked not to be named as the process is private.
 While the central bank is already expanding its range of asset purchases, it has yet to commit to broad-based bond buying, or quantitative easing.
 Until now, Britain’s telecoms market has been unusual in Europe because most companies do not yet provide the full range of telecoms services -- Internet, mobile, television and home phone -- preferring instead to buy in services that they don’t have from competitors.
 It’s also considering buying Blinkbox, a video-on-demand service owned by Tesco Plc, according to a person familiar with the situation.
 Supporters of the one-year pilot program, including lawmakers in Congress, say it will encourage market makers to buy and sell shares by making each transaction potentially more profitable.
 Opponents including Fidelity Investments say investors will have to pay more to buy and sell shares of small companies.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said last week that buying government bonds, or quantitative easing, may be a policy tool for expanding stimulus.
 in Toronto who is considering buying the Canbriam debt.
 18 (Bloomberg) -- Solar Power Inc, a renewable-energy developer backed by China’s LDK Solar Co, agreed to buy a 22-megawatt project in Japan.
 Halliburton, the second-biggest oilfield services provider, agreed to buy No.
 “There are no sellers, only buyers.
 There’s a lot of money that continues to buy Treasuries regardless of what’s going on, so it’s going to have a bid” Capital Goods Orders for non-military US.
 He has a buy recommendation on the stock.
 As a unit of a larger content buyer, Maxdome has a cost advantage over its peers, he said.
 Wegner declined to comment on reports that cable billionaire John Malone’s Liberty Global Plc may buy a 50 percent stake in Maxdome.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Dubai’s stocks advanced the most in a week amid optimism regional markets will benefit from the Bank of Japan’s revised stimulus as the Federal Reserve winds down its unprecedented bond buying program.
 on forming a $26 billion fund and Morgan Stanley’s $17 billion Asia buyout fund.
 Five analysts surveyed by Bloomberg recommend investors buy the stock and eight rated it “hold” No one suggested the shares be sold.
 As futures head for the first two-year slump in more than a decade, buyers for physical metal are emerging.
 “The fact that Russia is buying more gold instead of diversifying into another currency or buying more dollars is a big positive,” Frank Lesh, a trader at FuturePath Trading LLC in Chicago, said in a telephone interview.
 The central bank might consider buying sovereign debt, gold, exchange-traded funds or real estate to counter a longer period of low inflation, said Yves Mersch, an executive board member.
 19 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore tumbled to the lowest in more than five years as declining home prices in China added to concern a slowdown in the top buyer will deepen, exacerbating a glut.
 Put aside the obstacles to bond-buying seen by German officials and a case can be made with economics alone that the policy would do little to provide a fresh source of strength for the region beyond weakening its currency.
 The ECB therefore always has an incentive to wait and hope things work out” Draghi has declined to rule out buying government bonds.
 “Unconventional measures might entail the purchase of a variety of assets, one of which is sovereign bonds” Too Long Any new measures would follow a flurry of activity since June that has included interest-rate cuts, long-term bank loans, and covered-bond purchases, with buying of asset-backed securities due to start as soon as today.
 10-year debt were close to 4 percent before bond-buying started in those countries.
 Chief European Economist David Mackie predicts buying sovereign debt would help asset prices, confidence, currency and inflation expectations.
 Arbitragers are buying millions of online ads and reselling them for a profit in the blink of an eye.
 Here’s how it works: Advertisers buy Internet spots in ad exchanges, where space is sold to the highest bidder.
 “I see a lot of guys who buy from one exchange and they sell to another exchange,” he said.
 “Some buy from an exchange and sell it right back to that very same exchange” Edelman, who sends out Web crawlers to detect click fraud and other schemes, picks up reselling activity in the results.
 The two traders, who asked to remain anonymous for fear of getting kicked off ad exchanges, say they’re agents of market efficiency, getting ads to the buyers who want them most.
 When you open a web page, information such as age, sex, location and search history are zapped to buyers vying for your attention.
 Some agencies are poorly connected to exchanges and can’t respond to a first auction in time, allowing middlemen to buy and flip within the same market, they said.
 Traders are having a noticeable effect on prices, said Jim Caruso, head of product strategy at Varick Media Management, the online campaign buyer for MDC Partners Inc.
 “But there’s enough of it that if you start to do a deep analysis of this type of thing you can pick up on these trends and work around them” Media buyers are beginning to notice the arbitrage and take steps to avoid it, according to Marcus Pratt, head of technology at Mediasmith Inc.
 Traders buying and reselling at a higher rate “could be distorting the markets and removing the efficiency that we’re supposed to see through real-time bidding,” he said.
 Pratt said he noticed that his firm was buying Aboutcom Inc.
 To get out while the going is good, the pair is diversifying, with a staff of seven employees on the West Coast who are developing tools that help buyers navigate the murky world of online advertising.
 While the downturn has “absolutely” created a buyers’ market, increased deal activity is also positive for Akastor ASA, the investment company that emerged from the Aker Solutions split and is mandated to create value for shareholders through deals, Eriksen said.
 The company plans to grow in the area and may be interested in buying “younger assets” in the central North Sea, Durrant said without elaborating.
 “I don’t see another buyer out there, especially when pumping is likely to decline next year,” Luke Lemoine, an analyst at Capital One Southcoast in New Orleans, said in a phone interview today.
 “Still, it’s possible that JT will stop buying tobacco from domestic farmers if it’s fully privatized.
 Credit Boom Tightened lending won’t help banks in the short term because there’s typically a lag between the end of a credit boom and the formation of bad loans, according to Ilker Yoney, chief operating officer of Istanbul-based LBT Varlik Yonetim AS, a former unit of Lehman Brothers Holdings Inc, which buys and sells bad debt.
 Taxpayer Bailout Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy mortgages and packagethem into bonds backed by a government guarantee, were seized byregulators in 2008 as losses on defaulted loans pushed themtoward insolvency.
 In September, it agreed to buy Concur Technologies Inc, a maker of software that helps companies manage expense reports, for $74 billion and SAP has made smaller deals this year.
 will buy it for about $76 per share.
 Verizon slid 14 percent as Citigroup analyst Michael Rollins cut his rating on the company to neutral from buy.
 China started the program in 2011, allowing investors holding the currency overseas to buy domestic bonds, stocks and money-market instruments.
 has agreed to buy 35 million tons of LNG a year for two decades from Houston-based Cheniere Energy Inc’s Sabine Pass terminal in western Cameron Parish, Louisiana.
 As a result, the Russian price for an iPhone has been Europe’s lowest at about $700, prompting tourists from other countries to buy iPhones in Moscow.
 “First Solar needs to compete more in the 50- to 100-megawatt range and develop outside the US” Zino has a buy rating on the shares.
 29 -- this week pulled out of a deal to buy American Realty Capital Properties’s Cole Capital private-capital management unit.
 It also bought nontraded REITs that were started by AR Capital, buying American Realty Capital Trust III for more than $2 billion in cash and stock, and American Realty Capital Trust IV in a deal valued at $31 billion when it was announced.
 No broker in any firm wants to see their nose bloodied in the press” Larry Cohen, owner of Scottsdale, Arizona-based The REIT Advisor, which matches sellers of non-traded REITs with buyers, said he has been getting contacted by owners of AR Capital REIT shares since the accounting news broke.
 That’s roughly what it’d take for a deal to benefit shareholders of potential buyer Hasbro Inc.
 In April 2013, the opening of derivatives trading was delayed for three hours because of a computer breakdown, forcing investors to use a rival exchange operator in Osaka to buy and sell Japanese index contracts.
(Bloomberg) -- Leon Black’s Apollo Global Management LLC is nearing a buyout of PetSmart Inc, the retailer with a market value of $772 billion, people with knowledge of the matter said, in what would be the largest leveraged deal for a US.
 New York-based Apollo is in late-stage talks to buy PetSmart for about $8 billion following an auction process that has been underway for weeks, said one of the people, who asked not to be identified because the talks are confidential.
 In the US, the value of private-equity buyouts tumbled to about $65 billion so far in 2014, from $100 billion in 2013, the data show.
 While the retailer could take on debt to buy back shares, a bigger payout could come from a merger with rival Petco Animal Supplies Inc.
 or a buyout by a private-equity firm, Credit Suisse Group AG has said.
 Private Equity Black said this month that Apollo doesn’t plan to expand its private-equity business, which uses debt and equity to buy companies and sell them later.
 The New York Post earlier reported that Apollo was close to buying PetSmart and may have beaten KKR & Co.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Ever since the days of castor oil laxatives and mercury syphilis tablets, pharmacists and patients have had a tacit understanding: whatever you buy, the information is confidential.
 pharmacy records with online accounts to target ads to people based on their health conditions and the prescription drugs they buy.
 “Marketers are treating our health data as if we were buying a pair of pants or a book,” said Jeff Chester, executive director of the Center for Digital Democracy, a privacy group in Washington.
 is one of the biggest -- have amassed hundreds of millions of prescription records, buying them from drug benefit managers such as Express Scripts Holding Co.
 The company relies on matchbacks to secure ad buys from drugmakers above $250,000, he said.
 Investors must consider risks while putting money into stocks, the CSRC warned earlier this month after a buying spree drove daily stock trading turnover above 1 trillion yuan ($161 billion) for the first time.
 Commodity Demand “It’s a buyer’s market,” Mordi said in an e-mailed response to questions Nov.
 That’s evidence, Blitz said, that consumers are not only spending their extra dollars on dinners out, but also buying things like electronics, furniture, clothing and sporting goods.
 and San Shan Ltd, will buy the 75 percent three-year bonds at a conversion price of HK$103, Hong Kong-based United PV said today in a statement.
 Proceeds of the sale will be used to buy the unnamed 300-megawatt solar power plant.
 Military Buying Defense Minister Stepan Poltorak’s spokeswoman, Viktoria Kushnir, told reporters yesterday that military authorities are buying new equipment and restoring old materiel.
 Chipping In With the unexpected war taxing the military over the past 10 months, thousands of Ukrainians have chipped in cash to buy socks and gloves, boots and helmets so soldiers can continue to fight on the field.
 14 a plea for help to buy and deliver white fleece head covers to soldiers.
 Village Help During one foray into a village to buy food -- not provided by the unit -- an old woman offered his uniformed companion a sweater, asking, “‘How do you guys fight a war wearing stuff like that?’” he said.
 The soldiers pulled together whatever money they had in cash, borrowed from families and withdrew money on debit cards to buy tools and spare parts such as filters and fan belts.
 It was after that trip that he established a fund called Peace and Order, raising millions of hryvnia from citizens and business associates to buy bulletproof vests, helmets, socks and underwear.
 The Hong Kong-listed fund is lagging behind as its decade-long strategy of using derivatives proves more expensive for investors than buying shares directly.
 The CSOP fund, which buys mainland shares directly, has maintained a net asset value within 2 percentage points of its benchmark index this year, less than half the gap for BlackRock’s fund.
 The money manager is also using the Shanghai-Hong Kong link, which allows international investors to place buy orders for a net 13 billion yuan of Shanghai shares each day, with an aggregate quota of 300 billion yuan, according to Jack Wang, the company’s managing director in Hong Kong.
 A tanker pulled forward so she could inch inher 72-foot rig and ease down the 135 feet to the ground to buydinner before hitting the sack in her jeans and long-sleevedpink T-shirt.
 The private equity firm struck three deals in two days, cementing its status as the busiest buyout firm this year.
 Carlyle, with Warburg Pincus, reached an agreement on Monday to buy Canadian credit rating company DBRS Ltd; said yesterday it would acquire Italian elevator maker Sematic Group; and agreed to buy a stake in Asia Satellite Telecommunications Holdings Ltd.
 Carlyle started its buying on Jan.
 Carve-Outs In the two months that followed the Ortho Clinical agreement, Carlyle struck a $32 billion deal for Illinois Tool Works Inc’s industrial-packaging unit and a $19 billion agreement to buy Tyco International Ltd’s fire and security business in South Korea.
 “We actually see the strategic buyers and strategic sellers picking up activity as they are re-balancing portfolios, selling the things they don’t like,” Glenn Youngkin, Carlyle’s co-president, said at a conference last month.
 “The kinds of companies we’re putting in our portfolios today are health-care businesses, carve-outs where we feel like we can actually drive real efficiencies, technology-driven businesses and businesses that do not have a lot of capital expenditures” In July, Carlyle agreed to buy Acosta Sales & Marketing Co, the largest US.
 Dry Powder Carlyle’s success in buyouts is reflected in its funds, which have produced 19 percent annual returns after fees since 1994.
 Leveraged buyouts, which declined this year as private equity firms balked at soaring valuations, have picked up.
 BC Partners agreed this month to buy PetSmart Inc.
 “Lots of buyout firms raised capital over the past two years,” said David Fann, the chief executive officer of TorreyCove Capital Partners, which advises investors in private equity.
 spurred a third day of gains for a gauge of capital goods after the government yesterday issued an ordinance, or executive order, making it easier for companies to buy land.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Materis Paint, the French paintmaker owned by buyout firm Wendel SA, is starting to see the benefit from a savings program and is regaining market share as it battles with competitors including PPG Industries Inc.
 The company, with headquarters in Hong Kong and Singapore, is seeking a buyer as competition with regional phone companies intensifies.
 “This fits really well with that kind of thing” Citic Telecom International Holdings Ltd, a unit of China’s largest state-owned investment firm, had previously weighed buying Pacnet, people with knowledge of the matter said in June.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Headwinds faced by billionaire Uday Kotak after his $24 billion deal to buy ING Groep NV’s local unit show how workers’ unions may deter potential mergers and acquisitions among Indian lenders.
 Ukraine needs the cash, part of a $17 billion loan program, to repay debt, buy heating fuel for winter and stem the hryvnia’s slump of about 46 percent this year.
 More than 90 percent of respondents in a Bloomberg monthly survey predicted the European Central Bank will begin large-scale buying of government bonds next year, up from 57 percent last month, in order to spur growth.
 Deere & Co, the world’s largest farm-equipment maker, in November forecast lower-than-expected earnings for fiscal 2015 as a slump in crop prices means farmers are buying fewer of its most profitable machines.
 Blackstone, the world’s biggest private-equity property investor, has accelerated investments in Asia this year, including buying GE Japan Corp’s residential business and entering the retiree housing market in Australia.
 firm agreed to invest A$150 million ($123 million) in National Lifestyle Villages Pty, which develops manufactured retirement communities in Australia, and also agreed to buy GE’s residential business in Japan for more than 190 billion yen ($16 billion).
 Qatar Airways received the first A350 today at a ceremony delayed from last week by what Al Baker said were issues with the quality of buyer-furnished equipment, or customization specified by the airline.
 This is not the yearly priority” Airbus is instead determined to persuade more airlines to buy the existing version of the A380, with a a Neo variant sporting new engines likely only “later on” and a stretch model adding more seats possible in the “very long term” Production Challenge Bregier said his chief challenge is to ramp up production of the A350 as fast as possible, with no new delivery slots available before 2021.
 Treasury market makes it harder for investors to buy and sell bonds when news events cause prices to move, according to the Bank of Canada.
 That means automated trading narrows the difference between prices to buy and sell bonds.
 Most of the assets went to two buyers for $145 million.
 The buyers were the Atlanta Development Authority and Friendship Baptist Church.
 The money invested was used to buy stakes in private companies, meaning it’s locked up for years until the businesses are sold.
 Investors are willing to pay as much as 100 percent of the value of a buyout fund, up from a low of 40 percent in the first half of 2009, according to Cogent Partners, a Dallas-based investment bank that advises on the sale of private-equity stakes.
 And they’re among more than a dozen suitable buyers that Wei highlighted this week.
 Securities and Exchange Commission this week didn’t provide details about Avanir’s sale process or whether it received interest from other buyers.
 unexpectedly dropped plans to buy the company.
 “We started buying the stock when it was around $4 or $5.
 17 that they had agreed to buy First Wind Holdings Inc.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- The drop in Italy’s 10-year bonds that followed a Standard & Poor’s downgrade of the nation lasted less than a morning amid speculation the European Central Bank will start buying sovereign debt as soon as next month.
 “Any selloff on the back of a ratings move is generally seen to be a buying opportunity given the constructive outlook for liquidity.
 Ukraine needs the cash, part of a $17 billion loan program, to repay debt, buy heating fuel for winter and stem the hryvnia’s slump of about 46 percent this year.
 and billionaire Ted Turner’s renewable energy company agreed to buy a First Solar Inc.
 The new polls could usher in Syriza, an anti-austerityparty that seeks to renegotiate the nation’s debt, threateningthe stability of Europe’s currency union and the start of theEuropean Central Bank’s bond-buying program.
 ‘Fallow Capital’ The buyer expects the deal to increase earnings per share and operating shareholders’ equity, CEO Dominic Frederico said in a separate statement.
 A stake in South African Airways, the loss-making national carrier, may be one of the first on the block, with Etihad Airways PJSC given the option of buying a minority interest.
 Weg is evaluating two options -- forming a joint venture with an international manufacturer or buying solar technology for its own manufacturing site, said Umberto Gobbato, director of the Jaragua do Sul-based company’s automation unit.
 While commodities may be trading at five-year lows, the heads of three top miners BHP Billiton Ltd, Vale SA and Rio Tinto Group last week all backed China, the world’s second-biggest economy, to keep buying increasing amounts of their products deep into the next decade.
 Bank of Montreal said it plans to buy back as many as 15 million shares, or about 23 percent of its outstanding stock, between next February and January 2016.
 The European Central Bank has cut its benchmark rate to a record-low 005 percent and began buying covered bonds, those backed by cash flows from loans, to boost inflation and rekindle economic growth.
 “We do not want free electricity; we want to buy” ‘Balancing Act’ In the biggest deal ever from an overseas investor, Bengaluru-based GMR Group said Sept.
 Because the ultimate market success of Zerbaxa and other drugs isn’t clear, other buyers may be wary of topping Merck’s offer, Irina Rivkind Koffler, a New York-based analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald, wrote in a report.
 “When all uncertainties about new duty-free shops are resolved and the company reports strong fourth-quarter earnings, the stock will rebound strongly” Short sellers may buy back shares to unwind their bets as the firm’s profit beats market expectations, Lee wrote in a Nov.
 “Investors will begin to buy the stock at a comfortable level after the big retreat from the August peak” Shilla, run by Samsung Chairman Lee Kun Hee’s daughter Lee Boo Jin, said in e-mailed reply to questions from Bloomberg News that it will “aggressively” pursue operating rights at Incheon in the auction.
 The yuan has strengthened more than 4 percent against the won this year, increasing the buying power of Chinese tourists in Korea.
 “We view the recent correction as a potential buying opportunity with more attractive valuations,” said David Stevens, Melbourne-based chief investment officer of Contango Asset Management Ltd.
 Premiums, which the buyers pay over the London Metal Exchange prices for spot delivery, rose after output cuts by smelters including United Co.
 She said buyers may still wind up paying the full price for their devices after the present levy is removed, as manufacturers might not pass the savings on to consumers, according to MusicWeek.
 A negative yield means investors buying the securities will get less back than they paid when the debt matures.
 “But if there is, this is going to spook off any potential buyer” because they’d “be totally freaked out about being brought into” the court case.
 People familiar with the sales campaign said Citgo’s representatives were approaching buyers as recently as November.
 “We’re going to see lots of recalls because cars have gotten so complex and there’s so much sharing of parts by all automakers” The flood of recalls hasn’t deterred buyers this year.
(Bloomberg) -- The last time Camden, New Jersey, had a shot at rebirth, neighborhood stability was less of a priority than drawing tourists to a bigger aquarium and buying a new scoreboard for the minor-league baseball stadium.
 30, aiding efforts to reward investors, and the company also can still repurchase more than $10 billion of stock under its buyback plan.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Blackstone Group LP, the world’s biggest manager of alternative assets, is offering a break on management fees to encourage investors to commit early to its latest buyout fund that is seeking $15 billion.
 Largest Pool That amount would make it the largest leveraged-buyout pool being currently marketed, said the people.
 TPG Capital is looking to gather as much as $10 billion for its seventh buyout fund, said two investors in August.
 Blackstone had invested a little more than half the last buyout fund as of the end of September.
 are also seeking more permanent capital from investors, which involve lower fees and less leverage than a traditional buyout offering.
 in Rye, New York, who recommends investors buy Janus shares.
 “It’s not going to diminish our customers interest in buying a new F-150,” Doug Scott, Ford truck group marketing manager, said in a Dec.
 1 unmet need is, no matter what the fuel price was, it was always better fuel economy” Yet truck buyers’ top priorities -- needs that have been and must be met -- are capability and durability, said Lenard.
 Limited Availability Ford is debuting the ad campaign before many dealers have received their first new truck because the College Football Playoff was such a good fit with the interests of F-150 buyers, Scott said.
 “We question whether consumers will pay the price for this content with $2-$3 gas,” Rod Lache, an analyst at Deutsche Bank in New York, wrote in a note explaining the reduction of the rating from buy.
 “The public market is still rational when they’re buying these IPOs, while in some cases private-market investors are irrational,” said Leslie Pfrang of Class V Group, which advises startups on going public.
 Qatar Investment Authority and Brookfield Property Partners LP yesterday offered to buy Songbird Estates Plc, which controls the Canary Wharf financial district.
 Qatar yesterday agreed to buy as much as 9 percent of Brookfield via $18 billion in exchangeable preferred equity shares.
 Brookfield owns 22 percent of Canary Wharf Group after attempting to buy the company in 2004.
 Better Capital PCC Ltd, the private equity firm founded by Moulton, said today that the “directors very much regretted the impact on the employees of City Link receiving such bad news on Christmas Day” In the same statement, the firm said after buying City Link for 1 pound last year it had made a 40 million pound investment in the form of “secured capital loans”, in order to “protect its interests” in the event of administration.
 drugmaker, agreed this week to buy Cubist for $84 billion, a vindication for the smaller company, which toiled for two decades on an area largely neglected by the rest of the industry.
 13, Fannie Mae will allow the lower down payments for first-time homebuyers and permit refinancing borrowers to reduce equity to 3 percent to cover closing costs, the company said today in a statement.
 Freddie Mac will begin a program in March giving breaks to lower-income buyers and first-time borrowers who get housing counseling.
 Watt encouraged the move as part of a broader effort to spur lending to minorities, young adults and first-time buyers.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy more than half of new home loans and package them into bonds, currently allow down payments as low as 5 percent.
 Only borrowers buying or refinancing a single-family primary residence will be eligible.
 Freddie Mac’s program will be limited to people who’ve never owned a home, those with moderate incomes or buyers in under-served areas.
 rose the most in nine months after activist investor Bill Ackman said the world’s largest restaurant chain could be managed better, fueling speculation that he’ll buy a stake and push for changes.
 in a $4 billion leveraged buyout in 2010, Burger King has sold off all but a handful of its company-owned restaurants to reduce costs.
 is down, it begs the question: What’s going on there?” Russo, who recommends buying McDonald’s shares, said that while it’s difficult to know whether Ackman is taking a stake, his comments will spark speculation that he is.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- M&T Bank Corp’s planned takeover of Hudson City Bancorp Inc, announced in 2012, has been extended again amid a Federal Reserve review of money-laundering controls at the would-be buyer.
 Other buyers awaiting regulatory approval for deals include CIT Group Inc.
 CIT, the business lender run by John Thain, announced in July that it would buy OneWest Bank, the regional lender backed by billionaires John Paulson and George Soros, for $34 billion.
 12 that it agreed to buy Susquehanna Bancshares Inc.
 That suggests some buyers are taking a chance that crude prices will recover from five-year lows and lift producers.
 “If you think that’s the way it is, and you’re trying to catch lightning in a bottle, buying an ETF might be an easier way to do this than picking individual stocks” After a sustained run-up for the Canadian equity market through the first half of the year, volatility has returned to the resource-heavy S&P/TSX Composite Index with the benchmark slumping 11 percent from an all-time high in September.
 “If you do want to buy the energy sector, it’s always good to layer in your trades” Daniel Straus, an ETF analyst at National Bank Financial in Toronto, said investors may see the broader energy ETF as a more attractive option after being burned by individual holdings.
 refining surge is lifting tanker rates to the highest in at least three years as demand accelerates for vessels carrying the processed fuels to buyers in Latin America and the Caribbean.
 That’s cheap enough for DeutscheBank AG, which upgraded the shares to a buy last week.
 Two-thirds (MBLY) of the 12 research firms thatrate the stock have buy recommendations.
 energy company by market value after buying out three publicly traded affiliates in deals valued at $503 billion that closed last month.
 Enron Roots Kinder stunned the industry in August when he said Kinder Morgan would buy out its partnerships to cut capital costs.
 Kinder formed his pipeline business in 1997 after buying conduits from Enron Corp, where he had been president for six years.
 “It simply buys more time for Congress to forge a long-term agreement on these specific items –- some of which should not be extended in the future –- and, more importantly, on fundamental tax reform” In the Senate, Wyden has complained that the measure excludes tax breaks for the health care of laid-off workers and the purchase of plug-in electric motorcycles.
 is buying back an affiliate it set up last year in a deal that will help the casino operator pursue a plan to restructure $184 billion of debt in bankruptcy court.
 “By announcing this now, they are giving more credit support to the new structure” Caesars has been negotiating with creditors for three months after struggling to meet its obligations since being taken private in a $307 billion leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital almost seven years ago.
 The deal, struck before the credit crisis unfolded, was part of a buyout boom fueled by cheap debt that spawned super-sized takeovers.
 In addition, Caesars Acquisition’s initial investors were told Caesars Entertainment could buy their stock back in November 2016 at a price giving them a 105 percent annual return, which works out to be about $1150 per share, Frohnhoefer said.
 5 cut its rating on Kaisa to sell from buy and trimmed its price target to HK$201 from HK$331, saying there are few answers as to how the government and company will proceed with the blocked projects.
 Asia’s largest economy, which buys 67 percent of seaborne supplies, is set for its weakest full-year expansion since 1990.
 The bid to buy Rio de Janeiro-based Tim, which is 67 percent owned by Telecom Italia SpA, would be made by Grupo BTG Pactual acting as a financial vehicle, the people said, asking not to be identified because the discussions are private.
 Oi agreed to sell its Portuguese assets this week, paving the way for it to buy part of Tim.
 Portugal Sale Billionaire Patrick Drahi’s Altice SA agreed this week to buy Oi’s Portuguese assets for 74 billion euros, unraveling Oi’s merger with Portugal Telecom.
 Stocks of buyout firms with exposure to energy have slumped, and bond prices suggest some closely held oil producers may struggle to pay for their debt.
 and SandRidge Energy Inc, each of which is backed by a buyout firm as its largest shareholder, fell by an average of 50 percent in US.
 With a change in the stance of OPEC from one of price protection to the protecting of market share, we’re in excess for at least the next 12 months” Samson’s Bonds The bonds of some closely held buyout-backed companies are falling as well.
 and its partners acquired Samson in December 2011 for $72 billion, the most ever paid in a leveraged buyout of an energy producer, including $41 billion of equity.
 Large buyout firms are emphasizing the opportunities that lower oil can ultimately create, rather than any immediate damage.
 If you have a lot of untapped money to invest, “it’s a great time to buy,” he said, adding that Washington-based Carlyle has about $7 billion to spend in energy.
 “We knew great buying opportunities wouldn’t arrive until a negative ‘igniter’ caused the tide to go out, exposing the debt’s weaknesses,” Marks wrote.
 Many buyers are deterred by concerns that home prices will decline again, Chairman Bob Toll said on today’s conference call.
 The ruble is on pace for its first weekly gain in a month as policy makers pushed exporters to sell foreign currency revenue and lowered ruble liquidity, cutting off some investors from the local currency needed to buy dollars.
 As part of the plan, Harbinger will retain a 4445 percent interest and will have the option to buy 3 percent of the new LightSquared.
 and Melody Capital Advisors LLC that would reorganize the company as a whole; and one backed by lenders to a proposed unit called Lightsquared LP that would sell those assets to a buyer owned by Dish Network Corp.
 The European Central Bank will start large-scale buying of government bonds next year, more then 90 percent of respondents in Bloomberg’s monthly survey predicted.
 Russians were the most prolific foreign buyers of high-end property in central London from 2010 through 2012, according to broker Knight Frank, and Russian firms such as VTB Group and OAO Gazprom built large presences in the city.
 Cooler weather, meanwhile, is inspiring shoppers to buy coats and boots -- a boon for Gap Inc’s Old Navy and PVH Corp.
 Swiss Banks Italy’s Intesa Sanpaolo SpA would be interested in buying Coutts if the entire business, including its UK.
 slipped 43 percent after its president said it plans to aggressively buy brands.
 Shiseido President Masahiko Uotani said the company will buy brands aggressively, and will also close 28 of its smaller brands.
(Bloomberg) -- When Brazilian beef producer JBS SA tried buying US-based National Beef Packing Co.
 states filed suit against the Sao Paulo-based company, alleging the buyout of National Beef, the fourth-largest packer in the US, would threaten competitive pricing by creating an oligopoly led by JBS, Tyson Foods Inc.
 The country’s development bank, BNDES, approved 287 million reais in loans for Batista ahead of his buyout of Swift & Co’s Argentina operations in 2005.
 JBS acquired dairy company Vigor in 2009 as part of its buyout of Grupo Bertin SA.
 He said last month that buying sovereign bonds, known as quantitative easing, could be a policy tool.
 The ECB settled 368 million euros of asset-backed securities purchases in its first week of buying, the Frankfurt-based central bank said Dec.
 “You can’t get the balance sheet up unless you buy” government debt, he said.
 Chief Executive Officer Fred Smith said tie-ups at West Coast ports have depleted some retail inventories, causing some holiday shoppers to buy gift cards instead of merchandise.
 Momentum alone is reason to own stocks because each time the index rises, it means more fund managers fall behind and need to buy so they can catch up, a phenomenon sometimes referred to as chasing beta, according to Lee.
 “That is going to make investors who have been sitting on the sidelines and thinking they’ve missed out on the rally to finally put more money into equities” While the Federal Reserve has ended its asset-buying program, central banks from Asia to Europe are adding stimulus.
(Bloomberg) -- Iron ore sank to the lowest level in more than five years as signs of a slowdown in China’s economy deepened concerns that demand for the steelmaking raw material will weaken from the largest buyer, increasing a global surplus.
 “Weakness in the property sector and the ongoing transition from resource-intensive growth is expected to constrain Chinese steel demand” China, which buys 67 percent of global seaborne supply, is on track to record its weakest annual growth since 1990.
 The other plaintiff leading the case didn’t buy an iPod during the period covered by the lawsuit, leading Apple to seek dismissal of the case.
 Cue acknowledged yesterday he was dismayed to learn about a RealNetworks service that would let consumers buy songs to play on the iPod.
 Attorneys representing buyers of iPods claim Apple modified iTunes software so music downloaded with RealNetworks software couldn’t be played.
 The remaining named plaintiff no longer has a right, or standing, to sue given that she didn’t buy an iPod during the period covered by the lawsuit, Bill Isaacson, Apple’s attorney, said in court papers.
 German homebuyers borrowed 168 billion euros ($209billion) in the first 10 months of 2014, a 04 decrease from ayear earlier, according to Bundesbank data.
 Homebuyers are paying off more oftheir principal than they have in the past and fixing theirinterest rates for longer, according to data compiled by DrKlein & Co.
(Bloomberg) -- Each month, William Piorun has to choose between paying his mortgage or buying medicine that keeps his pituitary-gland tumor in check.
 Iamgold will get $500 million in cash next month after the pending sale of a Canadian mine and could use the money to help pay for a purchase or to develop a project it buys with shares.
 The company’s cash position will make it more attractive as a buyer or partner, Letwin said.
 “We had seen investors selling China ADRs and buying the common shares for a few weeks now.
 “In times like these and with a volatile index, everyone wants to buy a hedge,” said Carsten Hilck, who oversees about $4 billion at Union Investment Privatfonds GmbH in Frankfurt.
(Bloomberg) -- Yields on government-backed mortgage securities narrowed to the least relative to benchmark debt in more than two years, cushioning the blow of a slump in Treasuries for home buyers.
 Spreads are narrowing because a rise in overall yields is bringing in new buyers reluctant to invest in the debt below certain thresholds, according to Credit Suisse Group AG strategist Mahesh Swaminathan.
 The securities lost 14 percent last year amid anticipation of the central bank ending its bond buying, their first annual losses since 1994.
 suffered a blow after the Irish firm rejected a bid from the Chinese company to buy a majority stake.
 24 submitted a bid to buy a 51 percent stake in Avolon and was planning to pay in cash, the state-owned Chinese company said in a statement to the stock exchange today.
 The financing arm of Chinese aircraftmaker AVIC disclosed in August it’s in talks to buy Dublin-based Avolon.
 AVIC Capital said in 2011 that it was interested in buying overseas lessors as it expands its fleet to meet rising domestic travel demand.
 “This is a great time to buy,” Rubenstein said at Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s financial-services conference in New York.
 Springleaf is viewed as the frontrunner for OneMain, the people said, because the potential cost savings it’ll achieve in a merger mean it can offer a higher price than a buyout fund, they said.
 Springleaf can also fund OneMain’s loans more profitably than a buyout firm, given its access to the debt markets, they said.
 Representatives for the buyout firms also declined to comment.
 Exploring both options simultaneously, in what’s known as a dual-track process, is a way to pressure potential buyers to act before a target becomes public.
 Grayken founded Dallas-based Lone Star in 1995, carving out a profitable niche buying distressed loans from troubled banks in Asia, Europe and North America and selling them at a profit.
 The accounting flaws were found in August, five months after the e-commerce company founded by billionaire Jack Ma announced plans to buy a 60 percent stake in the film company to gain rights to TV dramas and English Premier League soccer.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Iron ore shipments to China from Australia’s Port Hedland declined to the lowest level in seven months as the world’s biggest buyer ordered some mills to curb output to cut pollution before a global summit in November.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- European stocks fell after Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank will gauge the need for further stimulus early next year, quelling speculation the lender would start buying sovereign bonds soon.
 That means the prospect of any additional return through a buyback is “very low,” he said.
 “We started this year with very high hopes of big shareholder returns, big share buybacks,” said Jeff Largey, a mining analyst at Macquarie in London.
 19, when it disappointed investors by not announcing a widely anticipated buyback.
 Rio will probably announce a special dividend or a small share buyback next year after cutting spending and indicating they’re comfortable with increasing debt, JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 takeover rules from making a new bid for Rio until April, announced a $1 billion share buyback in August.
 Rio could increase its dividend 15 percent and fund a $450 million buyback without increasing net debt, Jefferies LLC mining analyst Chris LaFemina wrote in a Dec.
 He expects Rio to take on debt to announce a $2 billion buyback in February followed by a larger share repurchase a year later.
 The recent buying spree has come as a boon to the Russian car market, which has been hit hard by the country’s economic woes.
 And cars are a good buy.
 “The sale process is in the second phase with potential buyers preparing binding bids” Hungary’s OTP Bank Nyrt, which placed the best offer to acquire Nova KBM, last month halved its bid to 150 million euros, Dnevnik newspaper reported Nov.
 Those may include purchases of corporate or agency bonds, or full-blown quantitative easing by buying government debt.
 Stimulus Jigsaw Programs to buy covered bonds and asset-backed securities started in recent weeks, and the next piece of the stimulus jigsaw is a second round of long-term loans to banks linked to their real-economy lending.
 Without broad-based buying of government bonds, the ECB will only be able to boost its balance sheet to 26 trillion euros at most by the end of next year, said Andrew Bosomworth, a money manager at Pacific Investment Management Co.
 Her comments came after Governing Council member Jens Weidmann, who heads Germany’s Bundesbank, said he sees “high legal hurdles” for the buying of government debt.
 Vertellus Specialty Materials LLC will buy Dow’s business that makes sodium borohydride, a substance used in purification and the removal of color and odor from organic chemicals, Midland, Michigan-based Dow said today in a statement.
 “Consumers are doing their best to get themselves out of buying petroleum products,” Verleger said.
(Bloomberg) -- Olam International Ltd, the commodity trader controlled by Singapore’s state investment firm, agreed to buy Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s cocoa business for $13 billion to become a top-three processor of the bean.
 While the trader already has the world’s largest bean sourcing network, the addition of ADM’s unit will give Olam processing capacity, allowing it to sell directly to buyers including Nestle SA and Hershey Co.
 Woertz said in April this year that the company had had extensive negotiations with a potential buyer for the sale of its global cocoa and chocolate business and couldn’t reach an agreement that met the company’s objectives.
 Etihad, one of three Middle Eastern carriers transforming the airline industry with vast fleets of wide-body planes, could buy a minority holding, acting SAA Chief Executive Officer Nico Bezuidenhout said today.
 The government sold 20 percent of SAA in 1999 to Swissair, which pioneered the concept of an alliance anchored via minority stakes, only to buy the shares back in 2002 when the European carrier went bankrupt.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Total SA may delay some spending on North Sea projects over the next two years, as well as possibly buying or selling assets in the area, after oil prices slumped.
 The deal has drastically reduced Kinder Morgan’s borrowing costs, and unified the pipeline empire under a single stock ticker that can be used as currency to buy rivals.
(Bloomberg) -- CommerceHub, a provider of online retailing software and services, is buying Mercent Corp, a consulting firm that helps retailers improve online sales.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Lubrizol, the chemical-additives business at Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, agreed to buy two units from Weatherford International Plc for at least $750 million after the seller was squeezed by lower oil prices.
 The acquisition helps Lubrizol expand into additives used in hydraulic fracturing, or fracking, and other oil and gas field operations, the buyer said in the statement.
 to buy Baker Hughes Inc.
 27 as Mario Draghi said the European Central Bank may broaden its asset-buying program and central banks in Japan and China stepped up measures to support their economies.
 Gagfah SA jumped 13 percent as Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE agreed to buy the German property company.
 A380 Cap Etihad has no plans to buy more Airbus Group NV A380s beyond the 10 on order, Hogan said at the unveiling of the carrier’s first superjumbo in Abu Dhabi, alongside the first of 71 Boeing Co.
 The operating unit with $184 billion of debt from its 2008 buyout will end 2014 with $8451 million of readily available funds, JPMorgan analysts led by Susan Berliner wrote in a note today.
 Fitch Ratings said last week that oil’s plunge may be an opportunity for Asia’s national oil companies to buy assets more cheaply.
 “The high-yield market has been hot, but is cooling now and as such covenants that have been looser are seeing some pushback from investors” Yields on speculative-grade bonds are rising to levels last seen more than a year ago as buyers flee the debt, making it more difficult for riskier companies to borrow.
 “The key drivers for value creation in the market are mergers that create economies of scale” Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE, Germany’s biggest residential landlord, offered to buy competitor Gagfah SA in a 39 billion-euro deal announced on Dec.
 Draghi has explicitly mentioned buying sovereign bonds, a suggestion that has met with opposition among German policy makers.
(Bloomberg) -- Inflation is moribund and bond buyers love it.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Investors should buy Assured Guaranty Ltd.
 Assured Guaranty “could put fallow capital in its insurance subsidiaries to work, generating more surplus and excess capital” Radian is seeking a buyer for its bond unit as the Philadelphia-based company narrows its focus and prepares for proposed private mortgage insurance eligibility requirements, or PMIERs.
 Emily Riley, a spokeswoman for the insurer, declined to comment on potential buyers or timing of the sale.
 for “nearly” $600 million, the buyer said.
 marks the first time P&G has sold a brand to a Chinese buyer, Beijing-based CDH said in an e-mailed statement yesterday.
 Borrowing costs still hovering near record lows may help draw more buyers into the market.
 Payroll gains on track for their best year since 1999 also are bolstering potential home buyers.
 Repsol agreed to buy Calgary, Canada-based Talisman for $83 billion as it seeks to boost crude reserves and production.
 Investors from outside the six-nation Gulf Cooperation Council aren’t allowed to buy shares directly and have to access the market through equity swaps and exchange-traded funds.
 homebuyers will pay 12 percent tax on every pound they spend above 15 million pounds when they purchase a home under Osborne’s reforms.
 He predicted that 98 percent of homebuyers will pay less under the new system.
 Directors Assailed Both junior and senior creditors have assailed Caesars’ directors, including David Bonderman, co-founder of buyout firm TPG Capital, and Apollo Global Management LLC’s Marc Rowan.
 TPG and Apollo took Caesars private in a $30 billion leveraged buyout in 2008 that loaded the gambling company with more debt than it can handle.
 The measures buy the budget airline “breathing time” and don’t count as a bailout, Chief Operating Officer Sanjiv Kapoor said by phone.
 He spent 74 billion rupees buying a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010 at 4725 rupees per share and has invested a further 56 billion rupees, SpiceJet has said.
 Ukraine needs the cash, part of a $17 billion loan program, to repay debt, buy heating fuel for winter and stem the hryvnia’s slump of about 46 percent this year.
 Loews has been buying and building hotels in a push to broaden its customer base, expanding the number of properties to 21 from 18 when Whetsell began as CEO in 2012, Tisch said.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Oaktree Capital Group LLC, the world’s biggest distressed-debt investor, is buying bonds of energy companies as oil prices plunge, co-Chairman Howard Marks said.
 “That kind of pattern is consistent with a bull market where you have an underlying upward trend because of earnings growth, underlying momentum and then some setbacks” Bull Market American equities have almost tripled during the 5 1/2 year bull market driven by the central bank’s three rounds of bond buying to stimulate the economy and borrowing costs near zero.
 Boeing and CVS announced stock buyback plans.
 17, gives foreign money managers greater access to Shanghai-traded equities and offers mainland investors a route to buy Hong Kong shares.
 agreed last month to buy the rights to the vaccine and work with Ames, Iowa-based NewLink to develop it.
 Also today, the GAVI Alliance, the biggest provider of money for vaccines sent to developing countries, said it will commit as much as $390 million to buy Ebola shots and support their use in an effort to stop the West Africa outbreak.
 Oculus is staffing up and buying companies as the race for early control of the virtual-reality industry heats up.
 After Watt said that the two companies would back mortgages with 3 percent down, Fannie Mae yesterday announced that the loans will be confined mostly to first-time buyers Freddie Mac’s will be restricted primarily to borrowers with modest incomes.
 Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac, which buy more than half of new home loans and package them into bonds, currently allow down payments as low as 5 percent.
 Freddie Mac will begin in March to buy 3-percent down mortgages to borrowers with below-median earnings.
 If they are also first-time buyers, they must get housing counseling to qualify.
 Watt last month announced that lenders won’t be asked to repurchase loans with inaccurate data or misrepresentations of buyers’ qualifications unless the flaws are significant and apply to multiple loans, or unless there’s clear evidence of fraud.
 First-time buyers have comprised about 40 percent of all home sales on average since 1981.
 While 3 percent down loans will appeal to buyers who haven’t saved enough money for a larger deposit, borrowers will probably still need to have a high FICO credit score.
 The agency has been raising its up-front fees and annual premiums in an effort to shore up its finances, making it an expensive option for the entry-level buyers it serves.
 Dish Statement “It’s like we’re about to close on a house and the realtor is trying to make us buy a new car as well,” Warren Schlichting, Dish’s senior vice president of programming, said in the statement.
 Many of the same investors who negotiated the pact sued the same trustees in June, saying they failed to invoke their rights to force the sellers to buy back faulty mortgages or act against servicers, causing billions of dollars in losses.
 The company may also be able to buy new drilling rigs at a “significant discount,” and there may be companies available for sale at a low prices, he said.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- For Indian gold buyers looking for bargains ahead of the main wedding season, the scrapping of curbs on imports last week couldn’t have come at a better time.
 The end of the regulation, which limited buying since its introduction in July last year, will reduce smuggling and return domestic demand to normal levels of about 800 metric tons to 900 tons annually, the Indian Bullion and Jewellers Association Ltd.
 “The government has understood that the Indian mentality is that when you restrict something, we tend to buy more and more,” said Kothari, who is also the vice president of the Indian Bullion and Jewellers Association.
 “We’re seeing bargain hunting by investors of all stripes” OPEC’s three largest members, Saudi Arabia, Iraq and Kuwait, are offering oil to Asian buyers at the deepest discounts in at least 6 years.
 Generators started buying in recent months to cover requirements for 2017 and 2018, he said.
 website for real-estate agents and prospective home buyers, suffers from a “pervasive culture of degrading women,” according to the complaint in federal court in Santa Ana, California.
 In January it agreed to buy servicing rights on $39 billion of loans from Wells Fargo & Co.
 At least three energy-related companies, including C&J Energy Services Inc, postponed deals this month as lenders demand more yield to buy risky debt.
 The notes’ indentures require the company to buy them back at 101 cents if a so-called change-of-control provision is triggered.
 Trafigura paid $8853 million to buy back shares from the senior managers and more than 600 employees that own the company, according to its annual report.
 Permira’s gradual reduction of the majority stake it acquired in 2007 has crimped speculation that it would seek a buyer for the fashion house.
 A private-equity unit of JPMorgan and Ajay Singh, who quit as a director of the airline in 2010, plan to buy the entire stake held by majority shareholder Kalanithi Maran, said the official with direct knowledge of Singh’s plans.
 He paid 74 billion rupees to buy a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010, and invested a further 56 billion rupees, according to the airline.
 Without a buyer for the carbon, the economics made no sense, CEO Dawn Farrell said.
 were among the companies that considered buying Starz and didn’t make bids because they thought it was overvalued, said the people, who asked not to be named because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Potential buyers considered Starz’s valuation too high because of uncertainty around the company’s future programming, two of the people said.
 Future Fears Without Disney films and amid potential consolidation among pay-TV providers, buyers feared declining affiliate fee revenue for Starz, the people said.
 The network hired LionTree Advisors LLC earlier this year to seek potential buyers, people with knowledge of the matter said in September.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Airbus Group NV raised the prospect of discontinuing its A380 superjumbo as soon as 2018, the first admission that it may have misjudged the market for the double-decker after failing to find a single airline buyer this year.
 Its only buyer was a leasing company that has yet to line up a single carrier to take any of the 20 planes it ordered.
(Bloomberg) -- Prices paid by American consumers dropped in November by the most in almost six years, providing a boost to buying power that will propel economic growth.
 Before that, it bought most of its cars from automakers that agreed to buy them back at a set age and price.
 Now it mostly buys cars outright and later sells them at market prices.
 Russia could also keep using its hard currency to buy rubles on the open market, in hopes of stabilizing the exchange rate.
 had accepted the buyout applications of 57 union employees and almost 30 non-union workers, the New York Times unit of the Newspaper Guild of New York said in a statement on its website.
 As it tries to cope with a shift to a more digital newsroom, the publication had said there would be forced cuts if about 100 jobs couldn’t be eliminated through buyouts.
 That depended, in part, on the salaries of those who applied for the buyouts by the Dec.
 reporter Edward Wyatt and financial correspondent Floyd Norris were among the high-profile list of employees to opt for the buyouts.
 ECB President Mario Draghi said last month that buying euro-area sovereign debt, or quantitative easing, could be a policy tool.
 9, 2013, paid its first dividend since 1980 and announced a $1 billion share buyback plan.
 “A bot can look like a sports fan, someone with a six-figure income, someone interested in buying a car, or a grandparent looking for holiday gifts for grandchildren” For the study, researchers put software into the actual ads of 36 members of the advertising association between Aug.
 “Bots don’t buy anything” Some marketers may slow their shift of advertising dollars to online services from more traditional formats over concerns about fraud, said Richard Joyce, an analyst with Forrester Research Inc.
 Websites also should monitor where traffic comes from, consider reducing the number of ads they buy that can be viewed by older versions of browsers and boost spending on security measures, according to the report.
 agreed to buy asset manager IndexIQ, pushing into exchange-traded funds and adding offerings for retail investors who want to copy hedge-fund approaches.
 The purchase of Rye Brook, New York-based IndexIQ adds $15 billion in assets under management, according to a statement today from the buyer.
 Those products each have less than $100 million, and Patti said that they may benefit from the marketing of the buyer, which is the biggest US.
 “The next thing that the market is watching very closely is the likelihood of the ECB to be actively buying sovereign bonds” The euro has fallen 11 percent in the second half of this year as ECB President Mario Draghi signaled the central bank may expand stimulus to include buying sovereign bonds after inflation slowed to the weakest in five years.
 “We’re not seeing this as a buying opportunity at all,” David Wickham, director of frontier and emerging-market equity at HSBC Global Asset Management, which has $850 million in frontier market shares, said by phone from London Dec.
 The company may buy back as much as $375 billion of its stock after completing a current $35 billion repurchase program, the Purchase, New York-based firm said today in a statement.
 is giving up trading physical precious metals less than a year after the commodity house started a business dedicated to buying and selling gold.
 The lower stock prices are opportunities for domestic buyers, according to Abiola Rasaq, a research analyst at Lagos-based Associated Discount House Ltd.
 “The bargain hunting is done largely by the local investors who see opportunities to buy into these stocks,” he said by phone today.
 “It’s a different type of financial harm if I can’t close on buying a house because of identity theft than if I can’t buy a bunch of Tiffany jewelry,” Handel said in a phone interview.
 Dubai residents also can buy Christmas trees, shop for gifts at Christmas markets and order traditional Christmas dinner.
 Zhao, the Shanghai resident, plans to buy her parents presents this year, even though they don’t observe the holiday.
 rose 14 percent after buying a solar power plant from Canadian Solar Inc.
 bonds -- such as Morgan Stanley analysts who today recommended buying the securities -- the debt has suffered losses in the past five months as concern mounts that dropping energy costs will leave speculative shale drillers unable to meet their obligations.
 The exchange operator said in June, when it agreed to buy Frank Russell for $27 billion, that it would conduct a “comprehensive review” of the unit, which manages about $275 billion in assets.
 LSE has been approached by more than 30 potential buyers, including banks, asset managers, and private-equity firms, this person said.
 will buy back Microsoft Corp’s stake in its struggling Nook business, which posted a loss that pulled down the US.
 “This has been a very complicated deal and unraveling it requires multiple steps,” John Tinker, an analyst at Maxim Group in New York who recommends buying the stock, said today in an interview.
 Regulators are concerned that speculative buying by Australians of homes to rent is creating an unbalanced housing market.
 “If we didn’t have the auction, distributors would be forced to buy energy in the spot market, which is currently very volatile,” said Frederico Rodrigues, superintendent of Brazil’s energy regulator Aneel.
 ‘Favorable Prices’ “Today’s auction allowed distributors to buy energy at more favorable prices,” Savoia, said in an e-mail.
 Jacques Gabillon, head of Goldman Sachs’s global commodities principal investments group, said at a Senate hearing at the time that the firm had received interest in Metro from potential buyers in Europe, Russia and China.
 Covance directors originally sought to hire Goldman Sachs to help it market the company after getting an offer from an unidentified company, but the New York firm was already representing a firm Covance was considering buying, according to the suit.
 Lucrative Fee Despite the potential conflict, Covance’s board hired Goldman Sachs to help evaluate buyout offers, according to the suit.
 Canada Pension initially considered buying parts of Talisman and is now also looking at a bid for the whole company after a drop in its share price, one of the people said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 They have a buy rating on Greentown.
 drivers were more likely than Porsche owners -- or anyone else -- to say they’d buy their cars again in this year’s edition of the closely watched Consumer Reports buyer survey.
 Sports Cars The next three most satisfying vehicles in the Consumer Reports Survey, after the Model S, were sports cars: General Motors Co’s Chevrolet Corvette Stingray, with a 95 percent satisfaction rating, and Volkswagen AG’s Porsche Cayman and Boxster, which tied for third with 91 percent of buyers saying they’d purchase them again.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- APA Group agreed to buy a pipeline supplying BG Group Plc’s Australian liquefied natural gas project for about $5 billion, adding to a system that already carries half the nation’s gas.
 “This is a great time to buy,” Rubenstein said today atGoldman Sachs Group Inc’s financial-services conference in NewYork.
 Oaktree Capital Group LLC (OAK), the world’s biggest distressed-debt investor, is buying bonds of energy companies as oil pricesplunge, co-Chairman Howard Marks said yesterday at theconference.
 The premium offered by Iron Mountain represents less than 5 percent of the total value that would be created for the buyer, Recall said.
 “We are buying more in China because we think this is the beginning of a longer-term bull run,” Mobius, who oversees about $40 billion as the executive chairman of Templeton Emerging Markets Group, said in a phone interview yesterday from Thailand.
 9, Mobius says increased volatility is creating opportunities to buy mispriced shares.
 Mobius said he’s been buying Chinese stocks “across the board,” including oil-related companies, on expectations that crude prices will recover from five-year lows.
 agreed to buy Allianz SE’s Fireman’s Fund unit serving wealthy clients to expand insurance of luxury homes, yachts and art collections as the seller narrows its focus in the US.
 ‘Premier Provider’ The deal will help the buyer expand in US.
 “We’re already very well established, and it makes logical sense to integrate” The benefit in taking over the unit is “buying the customer base and the opportunity to put them onto your platform and add a little bit of scale,” Mark Dwelle, an analyst at RBC Capital Markets, said before the deal was announced.
 isn’t weaning itself off foreign oil anytime soon and that Gulf Coast refineries will be the buyers, not Asia.
(Bloomberg) -- China, poised to become the world’s biggest buyer of new planes, also wants to build a graveyard for old aircraft.
 An attempt in 2002 to restore the 1930s-era Maybach marque as a stand-alone brand was halted a decade later after the cars failed to attract buyers.
 Mercedes is using the Maybach to target buyers of BMW’s Rolls-Royce nameplate and Volkswagen’s Bentley marque.
 to a hacker after it released a software program for buying songs that would run on the iPod.
 The attorneys said they discovered that one of the two consumers leading the class-action case on behalf of eight million iPod buyers didn’t buy her device within the time period covered by the lawsuit.
 Rio Tinto accused Vale of passing confidential information it obtained during discussions the two companies had about Vale buying a stake in the Guinea property to Steinmetz and BSGR.
 The deal can only go through after the EU approves the buyer or buyers for these assets.
 They said they “continue to actively pursue negotiations for the sale of these assets with potential buyers”‘ Major Milestone “Europe is the most important area for this merger in terms of potential regulatory issues and, post deal, a major source of synergies,” said Ian Osburn, an analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald in London.
(Bloomberg) -- Repsol SA, Spain’s largest energy company, agreed to buy Talisman Energy Inc.
 Canada Pension Plan Investment Board was weighing a bid for Talisman, people with knowledge of the matter said yesterday, after initially considering buying parts of the company.
 Those assessments are often used to determine payments in long-term contracts between commodity buyers and sellers.
 “We think our oil-buying strategies have been correct” Turkish Air has expanded its global reach, serving 264 destinations, the most worldwide.
(Bloomberg) -- Talanx AG offered to buy all shares of Chilean insurer Inversiones Magallanes SA for about 180 million euros ($221 million) as Germany’s third-biggest insurer continues to expand in South America.
 The German company reached an agreement to buy the stake of the majority shareholder of Inversiones Magallanes, it said in a statement today.
 The reductions will mostly come from merchandising and marketing divisions, after buying functions were consolidated into the Shenzhen headquarters to improve quality and food safety, Ray Bracy, a spokesman for Bentonville, Arkansas-based Wal-Mart in China said by phone today.
 “Why would you have 28 buyers in 28 different cities buying bottled water?” Bracy said.
 The two former employees who sued yesterday, one a Virginia resident who worked at Sony from to 2004 to 2007 and the other a California woman who worked at Sony from 2000 to 2002, say they have had to buy identity-theft protection and have spent as much as 50 hours safeguarding themselves against any possible harm from the stolen information.
 “It’s a different type of financial harm if I can’t close on buying a house because of identity theft than if I can’t buy a bunch of Tiffany jewelry,” Handel said in a phone interview.
 So, if one buys that that defines some kind of propensity, and it’s possible December is a strong month for stocks, then what’s going on here is that whatever forces have tended to drive stocks up in December are back in play” Market psychology or something, right? Nagi added that the turnaround this week came “on the strength of an undeniably well managed Fed message.
 Teva will spend $1 billion to $12 billion on share buybacks during the year.
 Teva’s trying to protect a drug that generated $43 billion in sales last year to buy more time to shift patients to the longer-acting version.
 The CEO transition could increase the chances of stock buybacks or asset sales, including the possible divestiture of the Sikorsky helicopter unit, Harned said today in a report.
(Bloomberg) -- Public Service Enterprise Group Inc’s solar unit agreed to buy a 129-megawatt energy facility in Maryland from Juwi Solar Inc.
 The team is completing a three-unit building on 47th Road and plans to build a 54-condo tower about three blocks away, encouraged by a growing pool of potential buyers.
 ‘Financially Sound’ Developers make more per square foot on condos than on rentals, so escalating land prices will make building for buyers “the only financially sound move” for anyone entering the market now, according to Elizabeth Lusskin, president of the partnership.
 “When you’re building condos in a market where people don’t live, you have to convince people first to live there, and then, to buy in your building,” he said.
 ‘Unabashedly, Yes’ Rockrose, which has been buying land in Long Island City for more than two decades, is pouring the foundation for a 975-apartment tower on Hunter Street and partially demolishing a former Eagle Electric Manufacturing Co.
 When asked if Rockrose would consider condos on the site, Elghanayan said, “Totally, unabashedly, yes” The company’s last condo offering in Long Island City reached the market in September 2008 and took years to sell as buyer credit dried up and purchases stalled in the real estate slump.
 They faced a choice between building “a reasonable rental or a very-profitable condo,” and concluded that the area’s current renters would embrace the opportunity to buy, said Tien Vominh, a principal at Long Island City-based Ascent.
 Builders buying land today in Long Island City are increasingly setting the groundwork for condos, inquiring how to make future projects compliant with Fannie Mae guidelines for mortgage lending, said Orest Tomaselli, CEO of National Condo Advisors, which consults with developers on such matters.
 “The magic is there, but I’m not sure people will see it because it looks so simple and easy” Apple is looking to fuel iPad sales, which have been sagging, by wooing new business buyers, while the alliance may aid IBM’s effort to catch up in mobile after watching other technology companies -- including Apple -- seize upon the growing popularity of smartphones and tablets.
 Total global sales of tablets to businesses, institutions and governments are projected to surge to 101 million units in 2018 from 19 million in 2013, as market share of those buyers increases to 27 percent from 79 percent, according to IHS Technology.
 Apple is also developing a bigger iPad with a 129-inch screen to be introduced next year, people familiar with the plans have said, a move that could increase the tablet’s appeal to business buyers.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Haitong Securities Co, China’s second-largest brokerage by market value, will buy the investment banking unit of Portugal’s Novo Banco SA for 379 million euros ($467 million) to expand outside its home market.
 The buyer was Atlanta-based Cousins Properties, which has been investing in Texas in a bet on growth in the state.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Highbridge Capital Management executives are in talks to buy the firm from JPMorgan Chase & Co, according to Institutional Investor.
 Managers of Highbridge, a hedge-fund firm led by Chief Executive Officer Scott Kapnick, have been discussing a management buyout with New York-based JPMorgan for at least six months, the magazine reported on its website, citing people with knowledge of the matter whom it didn’t name.
 Highbridge managers would need financing and may seek a third party to invest in a buyout, Institutional Investor reported.
 “Batten down the hatches for legal argument over whether a widget entrepreneur’s fortune, an astute company buyout or a fast hedge fund hundred million are ‘exceptional’ contributions” Zoe Watt, a spokeswoman for Jamie Cooper-Hohn, said she wouldn’t comment on the ruling.
 The decision calls into question “whether England, with London the so-called divorce capital of the world, will remain the jurisdiction of choice for the non-earning partner” The 48-year-old fund manager is known for his activist investing, buying stakes in companies and pressuring management to make changes that might drive up the share price.
The rapid decline in global oilprices is setting the stage for a long dance between buyers andsellers in Canada’s energy industry.
 “There’s going to be lots for sale and not a lot ofbuyers,” Feltin said by phone from Calgary.
 Gallery Owner Gagosian Avoids Perelman’s ‘Popeye’ Suit Art gallery owner Larry Gagosian won dismissal of a lawsuit accusing him of tricking billionaire Ronald Perelman into buying a $4 million Jeff Koons sculpture called “Popeye” Perelman, ranked 54th in the Bloomberg Billionaires Index with a net worth of $152 billion, alleged that Gagosian “took advantage of his position of trust” as a longtime friend to induce him to buy the granite sculpture of the cartoon character, according to court filings.
 Gagosian sued Perelman the same day, accusing him of reneging on an agreement to buy two pieces of art for more than $23 million and offering less money and other works in exchange.
 Santander Consumer is one of the largest originators of subprime car loans in the US, helping car buyers with poor credit get financing through dealerships.
 At the same time, the buyout is appealing to Santander which wants to shore up its position in the North American auto lending market, the people said.
 Santander Brasil The deal Santander is weighing for Santander Consumer could resemble an offer in October to buy up to a quarter of its Brazilian unit, another subsidiary with a lackluster stock price, one of the people said.
 The group of buyout funds which bought 25 percent during the crisis --- including Warburg Pincus and KKR & Co.
(Bloomberg) -- UltraTech Cement Ltd, controlled by billionaire Kumar Mangalam Birla, rose the most in more than two months in Mumbai after agreeing to buy two of Jaiprakash Associates Ltd’s cement plants in central India at an enterprise value of 54 billion rupees ($851 million).
 In September 2013, UltraTech had agreed to buy a Jaiprakash cement plant in the western state of Gujarat with 48 million tons of capacity for 38 billion rupees including debt.
 Imsgard, who has a buy rating on Carlsberg, said the recommendation comes with “extraordinary risks” due to Russia.
 Reuters reported earlier this month that Washington-based Carlyle and Warburg of New York were in talks to buy DBRS.
 food and largest buyer of its soybeans and cotton, is seen to be relaxing curbs on corn imports as the government pushes forward with a campaign to gain public acceptance of genetically modified organisms and seeks to expand food supplies.
 Chinese buyers bought as much as 900,000 metric tons of a corn-based feedstock known as dried distillers grains from the US.
 Largest Buyer China is the largest buyer of DDGS from the US, with monthly imports averaging more than 600,000 tons from April to August, according to Shi.
 “Will China become the largest corn buyer as it did the soybeans?” Meng said.
 analyst who reversed a five-year stance against Citigroup after Corbat took over and now recommends buying the shares.
 During the past 12 months, Citigroup stepped up trading, buying units from Credit Suisse Group AG and Deutsche Bank AG.
 Citigroup also surprised some banks by buying blocks of stock at higher prices than competitors, putting itself at greater risk of losses, and it increased the notional amount of derivatives outstanding to $648 trillion on Sept.
 Oil Prepayments Even prior to sanctions, Rosneft’s main instrument for repaying loans to buy TNK-BP, the BP Plc venture that was Russia’s third-biggest oil producer, has been advance payments for oil supplies.
 While the buyers weren’t named, the sale coincided with a central bank announcement that it will hold an unprecedented auction of 700 billion rubles of three-year funding on Dec.
 Morgan Stanley Sechin, who denied speculation last week that the company had been selling rubles to buy dollars, said today that the company may get state support from the National Wellbeing Fund.
 A deal to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil trading business won’t burden its finances.
 Neither the buyers nor the sellers were identified by San Francisco-based Kabam, which received no proceeds, according to a statement.
 Attitudes about the buying climate were little changed near its highest level since April 2007.
 The company agreed this week to buy Archer-Daniels-Midland Co’s cocoa business for $13 billion to become a top-three processor of beans.
 Riley & Co, who rates the stock a buy.
 for about $640 million in cash, helping marketers that want to buy video ads on PCs and devices.
 Starting this week, the company is offering that price when customers buy the 16-gigabyte model and sign up for two-year contracts from AT&T Inc, Verizon Wireless or Sprint Corp, according to the company.
 “Gift buying no longer happens on just one day or in just one way,” Scott McCall, Wal-Mart’s senior vice president of toys and seasonal merchandising, said in the statement.
 and OP-Pohjola Group will each buy a 1125 percent stake in the project.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Namibia said it will consider raising the capacity of a water desalination plant it offered to buy from Areva SA once the transaction is completed.
 Namibia would consider “an expansion of the plant’s capacity” after buying it, Abraham Nehemia, deputy permanent secretary in the Ministry of Agriculture, Water and Forestry, said in a telephone interview yesterday from the capital, Windhoek.
 Negotiations with the government, which has offered to buy the plant, are under way and would probably be wrapped up in 2015, Mbako said.
 CP Group agreed to buy Itochu stock as part of the tie-up while the Japanese company said it will purchase a 25 percent stake in CP Group’s Hong Kong-listed unit.
 CP Group bought a 1 percent stake in Citic for HK$336 billion ($433 million) at the time, joining sovereign wealth funds and Chinese companies in buying shares of Citic as it raised funds to pay for the acquisition and restore its public float.
 “Now is a good time to issue as the window is gradually closing before the Christmas break” Paris-based Publicis, which agreed to buy Sapient for $37 billion last month, said the acquisition will help boost revenue by 2 percentage points above the industry average each year from 2016, according to a statement Dec.
 fell 34 percent after the carrier’s rating was lowered to neutral from buy at UBS AG.
 Deliveries to American buyers have climbed 15 percent so far in 2014 and have already beat the record of 158,061 cars sold last year.
 GE has owned Bank BPH since it agreed in 2007 to buy the business from UniCredit SpA to take advantage of economic growth in eastern Europe.
 “Companies can cut costs significantly after they merge if a buyer has infrastructure and an acquisition has a portfolio of drugs,” said Krensavage.
 It only buys properties located less than an hour by public transport from midtown Manhattan, he said.
 The New York-based firm purchased foreclosed single-family houses to rent out, and has spent more than $8 billion buying and renovating properties to become the biggest single-family rental-home landlord in the US.
 Brooklyn and Manhattan are two of the three least affordable housing markets in the US, according to RealtyTrac Inc, as prices surge on investor and foreign buyer demand.
 Rents are climbing as many residents remain unable to buy properties, and banks’ reluctance to fund purchases of fixer-uppers offers institutions a niche that’s inaccessible to individual buyers.
 As the fund buys more rundown homes, the construction phase of renovations now takes as long as 32 weeks, from 6 weeks two years ago, Dixon said in the interview.
 The Aussie buys about 83 US.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Novo Banco SA, the bank that emerged from the collapse of Banco Espirito Santo SA, reported a key measure of financial strength that exceeds regulatory requirements, offering an insight into its accounts as it seeks a buyer.
 Santander, BPI Novo Banco’s coverage ratio, one of the highest in Europe, will give buyers a good deal of comfort, Paul Smillie, an analyst at Threadneedle Asset Management, said in e-mailed comments.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Delia’s Inc, the struggling clothing chain that caters to teenage girls, filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection and will liquidate all merchandise after failing to find a buyer.
 slid 22 percent, the biggest decline since October, after Bank of America analyst Justin Post cut his rating on the stock to neutral from buy.
 Apollo doesn’t plan to expand its private equity business, which uses debt and equity to buy companies and sell them years later.
 Shares of Sika fell as much as 21 percent in Zurich trading as analysts said the chances of a buyout may be diminished and a clash with Saint-Gobain’s management could destabilize the company.
 Even so, 65 percent of the Sony analysts tracked by Bloomberg continue to have buy ratings on the stock and have an average 12-month share-price estimate of 2,804 yen.
 “Although the Sony Pictures Entertainment leak was a big scandal in the news, from a financial performance perspective it is not that significant,” said Hideki Yasuda, an analyst at Ace Research Institute who has the equivalent of a buy recommendation on the stock.
 “Clearly it shows improved execution and finally a little bit of visibility on combating some of the inflation we’ve seen in the drug market” He rates the shares buy.
(Bloomberg) -- OAO Rosneft said its deal to buy Morgan Stanley’s oil-merchanting business ended after failing to win regulatory approval.
 The scrapped deal leaves Morgan Stanley seeking other buyers for a business it has vowed to sell to boost returns and assuage regulators who are reviewing banks’ ownership of physical commodities units.
 Mark Lake, a Morgan Stanley spokesman, declined to name other potential buyers.
 There are also one buy and six hold recommendations, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 CSC had contacted private-equity firms including Blackstone Group LP and Bain Capital to gauge their interest in a leveraged buyout, people with knowledge of the matter said in September.
 Lawrie had been trying to convince potential suitors that the company’s turnaround is halfway done and that buyers could benefit as the reorganization continues, one of the people said at the time.
 This is at least the third time since 2005 that CSC has fielded interest from possible buyers.
 Even though at least two out of three analysts have rated Barclays a buy since the start of the year, the shares have tumbled 14 percent since January, erasing about 6 billion pounds ($93 billion) in market value.
 The lender has been analysts’ most-favored British bank this year, with the proportion recommending buy never falling below 62 percent, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Today, 72 percent of the 35 analysts who track the bank recommend buying the stock, compared with 47 percent for Lloyds Banking Group Plc, 38 percent for HSBC Holdings Plc, 34 percent for Standard Chartered Plc and 10 percent for Royal Bank of Scotland Group Plc.
 “If you buy shares, you expect it to do well, not badly, so by its very nature we’re disappointed,” said David Moss, head of European equities at F&C Asset Management Plc in London who helps to oversee 834 billion pounds, including Barclays shares.
 There are lots of litigation issues out there, and that’s why you get to buy it at a really good price” Deutsche Bank is also struggling to revive profit at its corporate banking and securities unit.
 Forty-four percent of analysts recommend buying the Frankfurt-based lender, compared with 18 percent who advise sell, even as its shares have plummeted 25 percent this year.
 Export-Import Bank this year halted a study into funding the plans to ship gas from Yamal, or End of Earth in the native Nenets tongue, to buyers around the world as President Barack Obama’s administration imposed sanctions on Russia.
 The action by the bank, which offers credit assistance to companies buying the nation’s goods and services, effectively blocked the project from borrowing in the US.
 Walgreen agreed to buy the 55 percent of Boots it doesn’t already own for $153 billion in August and elected to forgo the tax-avoidance strategy of moving its legal residence abroad.
 Rising Prices Rising prices since 2012 in Brooklyn and 2013 in Manhattan have pushed buyers into cheaper neighborhoods with historic brownstones in need of renovations.
 Rental Income “It’s not just that rents are high -- it’s the consensus that they won’t be cooling over the next couple of years as New York City employment rises rapidly and credit remains unusually tight for homebuyers,” said Miller, a Bloomberg View contributor.
 “They can help them move the house, by showing a vision to the homebuyer” Home Equity Borrowers are choosing construction loans over home equity lines of credit because those rates can rise, said Mancusi.
 Glaxo is selling its cancer drugs to Novartis for as much as $16 billion and buying most of the Swiss company’s vaccines business for $71 billion, and the two are forming a joint venture in consumer health.
 If the offer is rejected by the shareholders, the shares will probably slide “to reflect, once again, the messy capital structure,” Miranda Cockburn, an analyst at Oriel Securities in London with a buy rating on Songbird, said in a research note.
 Keitel says a weakening of the euro amid ECB bond buying and an improving economy will boost shares of German companies in 2015.
 The DAX fell to a one-year low in October after President Mario Draghi stopped short of spelling out for how long the ECB might buy assets to head off deflation.
 Supreme Court The FTC, which filed the landmark case that reached the Supreme Court, has said the disputed accords, also known as reverse payments, cost drug buyers as much as $35 billion a year, a figure the drug industry contests.
 Douglas Baldridge, said the drug buyer groups were living in “a fantasy world” during the trial, arguing no company could have produced generic Nexium sooner because none of the generics makers have FDA approval.
 The buyers failed to show they were actually harmed by the deal between the companies, relying instead upon “strained opinions of experts who each proffer a version of what could have or would have happened in a hypothetical world that has no connection to the evidence,” Ranbaxy said in a court filing.
 Hedge Fund Employees Carl Goldsmith and Scott Klein struck a deal to buy Post Advisory’s hedge fund business from Principal, and added asset management contracts in early 2009.
 boosted its dividend and share buyback capacity as the owner of the second-largest credit rater is poised to post record sales.
 Moody’s raised its quarterly dividend by 21 percent to 34 cents a share and increased its stock buybacks by $1 billion, the New York-based company said today in a statement.
 Moody’s expects to start buying back shares once it completes its previous program, which had $1 billion of authority remaining as of Sept.
 Instead, they generate capital companies use to repay debt, fund additional drilling, pay out dividends and buy back shares, he said.
 consumers are still buying most holiday gifts at brick-and-mortar stores, according to Manhattan Associates Inc.
 RZB, which is unlisted and owned by regional cooperative banks, is seeking buyers for Tier 2 bonds due in 10 years, which it can buy back after five years, according to a term sheet seen by Bloomberg News.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Delia’s Inc, the struggling clothing chain that caters to teenage girls, said it will file for Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection and liquidate all merchandise after efforts to raise financing or find a buyer foundered.
 Since the bull market began in 2009, the Dow has risen 176 percent, propelled by better-than-estimated corporate results and three rounds of Fed bond buying.
 The drugmaker could “easily” buy $10 billion over the next year “without issues,” Yee wrote.
 Agilent’s position in the market for tools that analyze chemical mixtures is difficult to replicate and competitors that want to be in the industry would be better off buying their way in, said BTIG LLC.
 He puts Agilent’s fair value at $45 to $50 a share, and said any buyer would probably have to pay a premium to that.
 “Generally, buying someone with that pre-existing market position is a better strategy,” Leone said.
 Currency Directive Today’s move higher in the ruble was due to either state companies or the Finance Ministry buying rubles, according to Vladimir Miklashevsky, a strategist at Danske Bank A/S in Helsinki.
 Potential buyers including Time Warner Inc, Providence Equity Partners LLC, and Discovery Communications Inc.
 Foxtel was looking at buying a small piece of Ten, the Australian newspaper quoted Murdoch as saying at News Corp’s annual shareholder meeting last month.
 Canada Pension initially considered buying parts of Talisman and is now looking at a bid for the whole company after a drop in its share price, one of the people said.
 “The drop has opened some phenomenal buying opportunities in the region,” Amer Khan, the Dubai-based senior executive officer at Shuaa Asset Management, said by phone today.
 is considering buying a stake in Halla Visteon Climate Control Corp.
(Bloomberg) -- Barclays Plc agreed to buy a 50 percent stake in a Spain-based insurance business from CNP Assurances for 453 million euros ($555 million).
 TransCanada, the nation’s second-largest pipeline operator, agreed to buy 30 megawatts of Canadian Solar projects in October for about C$182 million, increasing its total investments in solar power in Ontario to almost C$400 million.
 “Leisure tourism will likely drive the growth of travel companies in the coming years as people have more dispensable income in their kitty” He expects the growth in inbound travelers to outpace increase in outbound travelers and recommends buying Cox & Kings stock, with a one-year price target of 411 rupees.
 He recommends buying the stock with a 12-month target of 560 rupees.
 Changing Hands After buying it in 1923, Lloyds Bank Ltd.
 6 (Bloomberg) -- Investors must consider risks while putting money into stocks, China’s securities regulator warned yesterday after a buying spree drove daily trading turnover to above 1 trillion yuan ($163 billion) for the first time.
(Bloomberg) -- Leveraged buyouts may be back in vogue.
 Financial buyers are showing a renewed interest in publicly traded companies such as PetSmart, which drew bids from at least three buyout firms.
 “Lots of buyout firms raised capital over the past two years,” said David Fann, chief executive officer of TorreyCove Capital Partners, which advises investors in private equity.
 That time was marked by transactions such as the record $45 billion buyout of TXU Corp.
 Activity has been restrained by soaring equity valuations and greater competition from strategic buyers, who are typically able to offer more for a target because of the cost and revenue benefits that come from combining two like businesses.
 “In general we see corporates being a bit more active,” said Marco De Benedetti, managing director and co-head of Europe buyouts group at Carlyle Group.
 Of the 64 public companies that announced buyouts by financial firms, 75 percent of those deals were worth less than $1 billion, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 “The pace of activity has been very, very strong -- not so much in terms of the bigger deals,” Mel Cherney, a partner at law firm Kaye Scholer in New York who has represented private-equity buyers, said in a phone interview.
 Companies with enterprise values of less than $6 billion are in the “sweet spot” for buyout candidates, said Fann of TorreyCove.
 Abercrombie, a $19 billion chain, is also in the midst of a management shakeup that may provide an entry for a buyer.
 “Much more will happen in 2015 -- it’s not a blip in the radar,” said Peter Lehrman, CEO of Axial Networks Inc, an online network for professionals buying and selling private companies.
 phone monopoly, entered talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the wireless carrier co-owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG, two of the people said.
 After agreeing to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 77 billion euros ($96 billion) last year, it acquired Grupo Corporativo Ono SA of Spain.
 Colao, when asked in September whether Liberty Global would be a good fit for the wireless carrier, said he would consider buying it “for the right price” Representatives for Vodafone and Liberty declined to comment.
 Still, Liberty Global’s co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said last month regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone tried to buy its German business.
 By buying EE or O2, BT would add wireless services and a large customer base to complement its existing broadband and TV.
 “We don’t see many dollar-buying orders from importers either” South Korea’s government bonds gained, with the yield on the benchmark 10-year notes dropping three basis points, or 003 percentage point, to 267 percent, Korea Exchange Prices show.
 Three Rivers, based in Austin, Texas, was formed in 2009 and is backed by energy buyout firm Riverstone Holdings LLC.
 agreed to buy The Pantry Inc.
 “Importantly, the agreement specifically creates a financial incentive for Macmillan to deliver lower prices for readers” E-Book Dominance The publishing industry has been grappling with shifting business models as fewer consumers buy print books and instead turn to digital versions.
 Some of the world’s biggest investors are flocking to Ireland, buying unwanted real estate assets as the country recovers from western Europe’s biggest housing crash.
 “We knew great buying opportunities wouldn’t arrive until a negative ‘igniter’ caused the tide to go out, exposing the debt’s weaknesses.
 They include lower revenue for oil producers such as Saudi Arabia and Russia, higher earnings for airline companies whose fuel costs fall, more disposable income for buyers of consumer goods and retail products, and more demand for large automobiles.
 “This cycle of easy issuance followed by defrocking has been behind the three debt crises that delivered the best buying opportunities in our 26 years in distressed debt,” Marks wrote in the letter.
 Talisman rallied 48 percent as Repsol SA agreed to buy the oil-and-gas explorer for $83 billion.
 Repsol SA, Spain’s largest energy company, agreed to buy the company for $83 billion, ending a months-long search for acquisitions to help boost crude reserves and production.
 Even with prices down 65 percent from a record in 2011, top buyer China pays $67 for the steel-making ore today.
 Some drillers have relied on debt to buy drilling rights and rent rigs, doubling energy bonds’ share of the high-yield market to 17 percent since 2008, according to an Oct.
 SunEdison, a solar developer based in Maryland Heights, Missouri, last month agreed to buy wind energy developer First Wind Holdings Inc.
 “We licensepatents, buy patents.
 Xiaomi may need to buy or license portfolios from othercompanies, said Kiranjeet Kaur, a Singapore-based analyst atInternational Data Corp.
 “It just buys time” Sears fell 44 percent to $3275 at the close in New York.
 Gold retreated earlier today before rebounding in London after Swiss voters rejected a move to force its central bank to buy more of the precious metal.
 The gauge rose 84 percent this year as the Federal Reserve ended a bond-buying program and signaled that interest rates may rise next year as the world’s largest economy improves.
 The fund will buy out small investors and will delist the company on Dec.
 Airlines that buy more fuel at spot prices, such as Qantas Airways Ltd.
 “So you can give it any reason, and the market will just come off a bit before the investors who buy on dips reappear again” Fujifilm gained 04 percent to 3,783 yen.
 “They’re in a way buying time to get out of this situation” Yet this week has shown that a AAA rated nation with public debt that’s about half the average in the European Union needs more than a political crisis to roil its markets.
 While securities from other periphery countries declined, the selloffs were limited as European Central Bank policy makers debate buying government debt.
 “It’s just a matter of time before the ECB have to start buying government bonds.
 “The Kremlin’s call on exporters to buy rubles was apparently very well heard and accepted,” Slava Smolyaninov, chief strategist at UralSib Financial Corp.
 Investors are buying European commercial properties to boost returns amid record-low interest rates in fixed income markets.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Siemens AG Chief Executive Officer Joe Kaeser said his 68 billion-euro ($84 billion) outlay to buy companies that help extract and distribute fossil fuels wasn’t ill-timed even as the oil price slumped to its lowest in five years.
 “Who got rich from gold? Those discovering the gold or those supplying the shovels?” Siemens agreed to buy Rolls-Royce Holdings Plc’s energy assets in May and Dresser-Rand in September.
(Bloomberg) -- Atos agreed to buy Xerox Corp’s information-technology outsourcing business for $105 billion, almost tripling the French computer-services provider’s business in the US.
 The unit Atos is buying from Xerox will have 2014 sales of about $15 billion and has about 9,800 employees in 45 countries.
 The Norwalk, Connecticut-based company said it plans to use some of the $850 million in initial proceeds to boost share buybacks and acquisition spending.
 will seek to raise tens of billions of yen next year for its first fund, which will buy stakes in smaller private and listed Japanese firms, he said in a Dec.
 TeliaSonera deal to buy Tele2 AB’s Norwegian business for $687 million faces opposition from the country’s competition watchdog, which said the sale may harm competition.
 TDC paid 138 billion kroner in October to buy Norwegian cable company Get AS.
 after a rating downgrade, Canso always tries to buy when it thinks the rest of the market is getting something wrong.
 And then there’s the price tag: $41,350 can easily buy dozens of two-wheelers.
 So far, buyers aren’t quite lining up for the car, which is a rarity on Berlin’s streets even a year after its German debut.
 While spokeswoman Emma Begley said BMW is “very happy” with demand and even increased production earlier this year, it started a rent-to-own offer last month to encourage buyers.
 That money can then be applied to buying the vehicle.
 The question that every potential buyer has to face is whether to take the plunge as the infrastructure catches up.
 One Canadian dollar buys 8808 US.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Nakumatt Holdings Ltd, East Africa’s biggest retail chain by outlets, expects a “strategic” investor to buy a stake by mid-2015 as it looks to expand in the region, the head of strategy and operations said.
 In October, the utility holding company bought a project in California from First Solar, with the panel maker agreeing to buy back a minority stake.
 Turkey currently applies capital-gains taxes only to so-called “flippers,” people or companies who buy a property and then sell it within five years.
 Avid Modjtabai, head of consumer lending at WellsFargo, said that the bank is not seeking to transfer the loansto a new buyer.
 “There’s notthe rush to buy we saw last year” To contact the reporter on this story:Kathleen M.
 “The transaction is fully financed and the decision made to temporarily delay the term loan B process in no way impacts our ability to finance or complete the deal” Bond Deal C&J said in June it agreed to buy Nabors’s completion and production services business in the US.
 The rates attracted floods of solar applications, so much so that utilities who are required to buy the power for their transmission grids say they are being overwhelmed.
 “The Russian ruble was the main trigger” for the rupiah’s losses, Bolung said, adding that it was an “over-reaction by some people” Bank Indonesia is intervening today to stabilize the rupiah and is also buying government bonds in the secondary market, Deputy Governor Perry Warjiyo told reporters at a press conference in Jakarta.
 exchange-traded funds that buy emerging-market stocks and bonds last week, the biggest outflow since January.
 Wanda is interested in buying control of Lions Gate, though the studio, run from Santa Monica, California, is only willing to sell a minority stake, Wanda Chairman Wang Jianlin said yesterday in an interview.
 customers are rich enough to buy luxury cars whatever the cost of a tank of gasoline.
 “People who are buying Tesla today don’t really care if gas is cheap or expensive.
 They want it because it’s a status symbol or for the performance or they are very eco-conscious and just don’t want to consume fossil fuels, regardless of what they pay for the fossil fuels” The seven-day selloff should be seen as an opportunity to buy the stock at a discount, said Ben Kallo, an analyst with Robert W.
 “With the low oil prices, people will think ‘I can buy a normal car, it’s more beneficial that way,’” Ole Hui, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Mizuho Securities Asia Ltd, said by phone.
 The company said it expects next year to sell 50,000 of the Model S, named last week as top luxury car in satisfaction in the Consumer Reports annual buyers survey.
 “We think the weakness provides a buying opportunity,” Kallo said in the note.
 “That could create a problem for Tesla once it gets out of the vehicle segments that cater to the very wealthy and get down to the people who might normally buy a compact sedan like a Honda Civic.
 Kallo said buyers of electric vehicles are attracted by the ability to ignore the ups and downs of gas prices.
(Bloomberg) -- Line Corp, the mobile-messaging application owned by South Korean search portal Naver Corp, said it agreed to buy Microsoft Corp’s MixRadio streaming service as it seeks to speed up user growth.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore’s GIC Pte agreed to buy IndCor Properties Inc.
 Most of the buyers have been Nigerian-owned companies, such as Seplat Petroleum Plc, First Hydrocarbon Ltd, Shoreline Natural Resources Ltd.
 The buyers of the mining operation didn’t purchase some of the equipment James River said is worth about $7 million.
 Spain’s Repsol SA, early today agreed to buy the Canadian producer for $83 billion.
 Repsol is the most likely to be successful among potential buyers that have emerged including Canada Pension, because Talisman’s assets fit within Repsol’s existing operations, Cox said.
 “There are inherent synergies for Repsol that wouldn’t exist for what appear to be the other buyers at the table,” Cox said.
 The pound was supported against the euro after the European Central Bank’s Benoit Coeure signaled in an interview published in the Wall Street Journal that officials may begin buying government bonds next year to boost the region’s economy.
 is buying a minority stake in Uber Technologies Inc, giving the car-booking company a boost as it expands in China, according to a person familiar with the matter.
 is in late-stage talks to buy builder John Holland from Leighton Holdings Ltd.
 A manufacturing gauge for China, the biggest buyer of South African raw materials, fell to an eight-month low in November.
 The company buys jet fuel at an average price in the current and preceding month, the CFO said, creating a lag when Air-France KLM may reap a windfall from the rapidly falling oil price, which has tumbled to the lowest level in more than five years.
 Using the same prices from September, a fund could have sold $10 million of protection through March while buying the same amount through December 2015, gaining as much as $74 million if the company defaulted after March 20 but before Dec.
 Did the machines start a buying binge after a simple, successful search for “considerable time?” It’s possible, according to Paul Tetlock, an associate professor at Columbia Business School, who has researched how stocks react to news stories.
 “It’s thematically consistent with the reach for yield from overseas buyers” US.
 Treasuries were also supported by buying for month-end extensions of duration, which calculates how much prices change when yields rise or fall.
 Aggregate Index, typically buy longer-term Treasuries as a month ends to align the interest-rate sensitivity of their holdings with the gauges.
 30 to buy a majority stake in Nevs and finance the company’s operating costs until the deal is complete early next year, the Trollhaettan, Sweden-based company said in a statement today.
 The company buys jet fuel atan average price in the current and preceding month, the CFOsaid, creating a lag when Air-France KLM may reap a windfallfrom the rapidly falling oil price, which has tumbled to thelowest level in more than five years.
 with a possible offer to buy the Lloyd’s of London company for about 25 billion pounds ($39 billion).
 agreed last month to buy Platinum Underwriters Holdings Ltd.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 Six of the 11 analysts who cover the Hod Hasharon, Israel-based company still recommend buying the shares, and on average have a 12-month price target of $1381, 61 percent higher than Friday’s close of $856, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 “The market’s viewing Allot very inefficiently,’ Matthew Robison, an analyst at Wunderlich who has a buy rating on the shares and a $16 price target, said by phone from San Francisco Dec.
 who has also kept her buy rating and $16 price target on the stock.
 analysts led by Tal Liani cut their rating on Allot to the equivalent of sell from buy on Dec.
 RCS earlier this month agreed to pay ACRP $60 million to settle a lawsuit over a canceled deal to buy the REIT’s Cole Capital unit.
 “That he’s buying at the current level at least signals commitment,” Robert Andre Jensen, an analyst at SpareBank 1 Markets, said in an e-mail.
 Fredriksen’s purchased shares on the same day a class-action lawsuit was filed against Seadrill in New York by Robbins Geller Rudman & Dowd LLP on behalf of buyers of American Depositary Receipts, alleging the company has misled investors about the strength of its business and prospects.
 Co-Operative Bank was forced to raise an extra 400 million pounds ($623 million) after plugging a capital shortfall of 15 billion pounds, which was uncovered after its failed attempt to buy branches from Lloyds Banking Group Plc.
 2, recommending investors buy the company’s 2375 percent bond maturing in 2015.
(Bloomberg) -- Sparx Group Co, a Japanese asset manager, plans to set up a real estate investment trust that buys and manages hospitals, senior homes and research centers as the country’s REIT market prospers.
 “We aim for an early listing” The Tokyo Stock Exchange REIT Index is close to the highest level in seven years, helped by the Bank of Japan’s REIT buying program that started in 2010.
 insurer revealed plans to buy Friends Life Group Plc for 56 billion pounds ($88 billion).
 Aviva this week agreed to buy Friends Life for 394 pence apiece in an all-stock transaction, set to be the UK.
 The West Des Moines, Iowa-based buyer, which was founded in 1893, is counting on more demand as farm production expands to meet the needs of a growing population.
 HCC agreed in September to buy Producers Ag Insurance Group, which is larger than the Deere unit by sales, for $110 million.
 The company said in July it was seeking buyers for some of those products, with annual sales of about 1 billion pounds ($16 billion).
 “It’s an overreaction and the result is it’s oversold” With valuations at a decade low, oil executives such as Rochford and Chesapeake Energy Corp’s Archie Dunham are driving the biggest wave of insider buying since 2012, data compiled by the Washington Service and Bloomberg show.
 “Most of these execs that are buying have been in the industry as long as I have, so they know how supply and demand works and they’re buying quality stocks,” Dunham, the chairman of Chesapeake Energy who is turning 76 this month, said by phone.
 “It’s just a matter of time to get supply balanced with demand” Lone Loser The number of insiders buying has increased 64 percent from a year ago and more than doubled from the average during the first 10 months of 2014, according to data compiled by Bloomberg and Bethesda, Maryland-based Washington Service.
 Executives from those companies are buyers as well.
 “You can sell your shares for any number of reasons, but you only buy for one reason: because you think your stock is undervalued,” Terry Morris, a senior equity manager who helps oversee about $28 billion at Wyomissing, Pennsylvania-based National Penn Investors Trust Co, said in a phone interview.
 “It’s a good sign if insiders are starting to step up and buy.
 “We found mortgages which we believe are more appealing than the mortgages you can buy in the US,” said Carlos Vara, a shareholder and former chairman of Mexico City-based Concentradora Hipotecaria SAPI, which manages FHipo.
 Best Returns FHipo has an exclusivity agreement with Infonavit and will be the only nonbank buyer of Total mortgages until at least late 2015 -- locking out other REITs.
 “As much as the salary grows with the minimum wage, in reality what this does is create greater buying power” Parra’s Payments Vara said that inflation-linked mortgages are unlikely to dry up because they allow for more borrowing than loans with fixed principals.
 The proposals include 190 billion rupees for submarines, a 158 billion-rupee purchase of artillery -- the first acquisition of large-caliber guns since the 1980s -- and a 32 billion-rupee deal to buy 8,356 Spike anti-tank guided missiles and 321 launchers from Rafael Advanced Defense Systems Ltd.
(Bloomberg) -- French billionaire Xavier Niel is to buy carrier Orange Switzerland for 28 billion Swiss francs ($29 billion), as he turns his attention back to Europe after a failed bid for T-Mobile US Inc.
 Niel’s NJJ Capital, a subsidiary of his private investment fund Kima Ventures, will buy the business from a group of funds advised by Apax Partners, according to a statement.
 Haitong Securities, China’s second-largest brokerage by market value, surged 12 percent in Hong Kong on talks its unit is in discussions to buy Banco Espirito Santo de Investimento SA, according to a Hong Kong exchange filing yesterday.
 Sixty-four percent of those tracked by Bloomberg recommend investors buy the shares.
 Bondholder Negotiations Once it wins the bondholders’ buy-in, Caesars would seek support from other senior creditors, the people said.
 Caesars, saddled with debt from its $307 billion leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008, has struggled to repay its borrowings.
 To satisfy the new requirements, companies could hoard profits by delaying dividend increases and stock buybacks.
 is among investors considering buying oil stocks after a supply glut drove crude to its lowest since 2009 and spurred a rout in shares of energy producers.
 “We would rather buy commodity stocks when oil prices are low like right now, rather than chasing momentum” Crude slid about 30 percent this year in the worst price collapse since 2008 as US.
 “It’s a finite resource and not recyclable like copper or gold, so for us it’s one of the commodities where we are more confident of buying on these very strong pullbacks” West Texas Intermediate futures rebounded 43 percent yesterday before resuming their march lower today, sliding 07 percent to $6849 a barrel as of 2:36 pm.
 Concern that China is slowing, with the biggest buyer set for the weakest expansion in almost a quarter century, exacerbated the rout.
 Oil executives have been snapping up shares in an insider-buying spree, betting that stocks including Transocean Ltd, Chesapeake Energy Corp.
 To Patrick Moonen of ING Investment Management, that doesn’t mean it’s a reason to buy.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Cliffs Natural Resources Inc’s bonds fell to a low after the company canceled an offer to buy back some of its notes and delayed a refinancing plan amid higher borrowing costs.
 iron-ore producer announced last month it would sell at least $11 billion of new debt to fund the buyback of as much as $600 million of debentures maturing from 2018 to 2021.
 PetSmart was advised by Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz, and BC Partners relied on Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP in the biggest leveraged buyout for a US.
 Longview is part of the group buying the company.
 The ETF buys companies with the highest revenues from exports, and then uses forward contracts to take a short position in the euro.
 He says stocks most linked to economic growth will continue to perform better, and a cheaper valuation for European shares isn’t a reason to buy them.
 said earlier this month it will buy the John Holland unit of Leighton Holdings Ltd, Australia’s biggest builder.
 The retailer reiterated its commitment to buying smaller rival Family Dollar Stores Inc.
 He recommends buying the shares.
 “This will be a year to get the electricity sector back on track” The worst drought in decades has forced utilities to buy more expensive energy on the spot market, selling that power at a loss because of government-capped retail prices.
 Malaysia Air will be taken private as part of the revival plan, with Khazanah buying out smaller investors for 138 billion ringgit ($398 million).
 The ruble’s rout, sparked by falling oil prices and sanctions imposed on businesses including OAO Sberbank, prompted Russians to began buying luxury goods from Porsche sports cars to Tiffany rings to preserve the value of their savings.
 In November, Dronina decided to buy an apartment in Shchyolkovo, a town near Moscow, and got approval for a mortgage with a maximum rate of 1375 percent from Sberbank.
 Consumers can find it at Google Play, YouTube Videos and other websites at a price of $599 to rent or $1499 to buy.
 “BP has developed buyer’s remorse and wants out of the agreement it entered into,” lawyers for the businesses argued.
 analyst Douglas Anmuth cut his 12-month price-target on Google today to $600 from $670, while maintaining an overweight rating, the equivalent of buy.
 added 18 percent after boosting a stock buyback plan to $12 billion and raising its quarterly dividend by 25 percent.
 jumped 27 percent to $9231, the highest ever, after announcing a buyback plan of as much as $10 billion and increasing its dividend by 27 percent.
(Bloomberg) -- The Indian government issued an executive order to make it easier for companies to buy land and eventually replace a law that has hindered manufacturing and constrained economic growth.
 23 allowing the Deposit Insurance Agency to buy stakes in banks before they face bankruptcy proceedings to keep the system stable.
 Cargo also secured an option to buy the remaining stake from Minezit in 2017-2021 for a minimum price of 40 million euros minus any dividends paid by AWT to Minezit.
 “About 30 percent of the company’s capex is the equipment it has to buy from abroad with dollars.
(Bloomberg) -- BP Plc is in talks to buy a direct stake in an East Siberian oil producer from OAO Rosneft, the Russian oil producer facing US.
 The gauge has lost 12 percent from this year’s high reached in September as the Federal Reserve ended bond buying and speculation grew that interest rates will rise next year.
(Bloomberg) -- Iron ore climbed for a fourth day, the longest run of advances since July, on speculation the Chinese government will take measures to bolster growth, spurring demand in the world’s biggest buyer.
 He has also tried to buy claims at a discount until the US.
 and Cuba could lead to an increase in prices for premium cigars if more Americans are able to buy them to smoke, the head of Imperial Tobacco Group Plc’s Spanish unit said.
 The premium offered by Iron Mountain represents less than 5 percent of the total value that would be created for the buyer, Recall said.
 “We are also seeing some year-end buying by foreign investors looking to shore up their net asset values” The Sensex last week posted its third weekly drop of December, and is set for the worst monthly performance since February 2013, amid concern a fall in oil prices and Russia’s currency crisis could cool demand for developing-nation assets.
 The underwriters have the right to buy an additional 13 million shares as well as an extra $375 million of the convertible bonds.
 Exor SpA, the holding company of Italy’s Agnelli family that controls Fiat Chrysler, reiterated yesterday that it plans to buy convertible securities to maintain its 31 percent stake in the carmaker.
 The biggest bull market since the 1990s technology bubble was fueled as the Fed executed three rounds of bond buying to stimulate the economy and held interest rates near zero since December 2008.
 Shares of Dell, the largest PC maker 10 years ago, had tumbled by two-thirds before founder Michael Dell and Silver Lake Management took it private in a $249 billion leveraged buyout in 2013.
 Sentiment has reversed since October, with options to buy European shares costing the most in more than four years relative to bearish puts, data compiled by Bloomberg show.
 Investors who had avoided peripheral markets such as Portugal, Italy, Greece and Spain are ready to resume buying on prospects Draghi will enact more stimulus, according to Lars Kreckel at Legal & General Investment Management.
 ECB Vice President Vitor Constancio echoed President Draghi last week, saying that the central bank will consider buying sovereign debt if existing stimulus proves insufficient.
 The majority of economists surveyed by Bloomberg News predict the ECB will eventually buy government bonds.
 Investors are waiting to see what Walgreen does next after in August it agreed to buy the 55 percent of European health and beauty chain Alliance Boots GmbH that it didn’t already own for $153 billion.
 waste-management company, agreed to buy a unit of Tervita Corp.
 structured notes tied to the Euro Stoxx 50 Index have soared this year as investors buy fewer securities linked to the Standard & Poor’s 500 Index.
 The Lauderdale-by-the-Sea, Florida-based investment adviser, which has $60 million in assets under management, has been buying notes linked to the Euro Stoxx 50 in part because of the greater variation in share prices, Balcom said.
 “The ECB will go further, they suggested it at their December meeting, so this means we get more asset buying, probably of sovereign debt,” said Piet Lammens, head of research at KBC Bank NV in Brussels, referring to the European Central Bank.
 A negative yield means investors buying the securities will get less back than they paid when the debt matures.
 Even with ECB pursuing stimulus measures for the region’s economy, “there’s still a lack of buyers” The ACEA’s figures comprise statistics from the 28 European Union countries, excluding Malta, as well as Switzerland, Norway and Iceland.
 The namesake brand of Renault SA, based in the Paris suburb of Boulogne-Billancourt, sold 11 percent more cars in Europe as a new version of the Clio hatchback and the Captur urban crossover won buyers.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer agreed in June to buy most of the assets for 124 billion euros ($152 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever, and the purchase should close next year.
 Anglo is seeking buyers for four labor-intensive platinum mines in South Africa and three copper mines and a smelter in Chile.
 Analysts are recommending buying the shares as the weaker shekel helps lift earnings at the Ra’Anana, Israel-based company, which gets about 60 percent of its revenue from the US.
 “The shekel’s weakness is going to help their profitability somewhat,” Ori Licht, head of research at Israel Brokerage & Investments with a buy rating on shares, said by phone on Dec.
 “They’ve gone through several sets of management and I’m still trying to get an idea of where they are going,” Brian Ruttenbur, an equity analyst at CRT Capital Group LLC who downgraded the shares to fairly valued from buy earlier this year, said by phone on Dec.
 Nine of 14 analysts have the equivalent of a buy rating on Nice’s ADRs, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Regulatory Delay Potential buyers may also be holding off because the US.
 Actavis instead agreed to buy Allergan for $66 billion on Nov.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Singapore developers struggling to sell apartments in their home market are buying property overseas, turning the island-state into the largest foreign investor from the region this year.
 Additional taxes for foreigners buying residential property were raised to 15 percent in 2013 from 10 percent, on top of the basic buyer’s stamp duty rate of about 3 percent.
 The country’s sovereign wealth fund, GIC Pte, isn’t allowed to invest in Singapore property and has instead been a major buyer of overseas real estate.
 Ho Bee, which has invested in office towers in London and is developing homes in Melbourne and Gold Coast in Australia, is scouting for more buying opportunities in Sydney and London, Woon said.
 OUE Ltd, owner of Singapore’s Mandarin Gallery shopping mall, agreed to buy US.
 Rather than directly matching one client’s buy order with another’s request to sell, the systems aggregate all requests from the banks’ clients to create prices that are displayed to customers.
 While the fall in benchmark Brent to five-year lows has rocked economies from Russia to Venezuela, the world’s biggest commodity trading houses, which buy and sell about a third or world’s oil from the Swiss city, are relishing the return to a bear market.
 Mark Reuss, GM executive vice president for global product development, said in an interview at the award presentation that Chevrolet is already getting some buyers who are trading in from other brands and that the Detroit-based company is taking aim at customers in California, where Toyota and Nissan, with its Frontier mid-sized pickup, have a strong presence.
 Toyota isn’t worried about losing too many buyers to the GM brand, Carter said.
 “We see more cross-shopping with Ford” For both companies, the risk is that some buyers will choose the Colorado or Tacoma instead of their Chevy Silverado or Toyota Tundra large pickups.
 Starboard, a hedge fund led by Jeffrey Smith, has a record of buying stakes in companies and pushing them to combine.
 In September, Credit Suisse Group AG’s Gary Balter said Staples should buy Office Depot.
 is in talks to buy four properties from Blackstone Group LP and other owners to defer tax payments from its $195 billion sale of New York’s Waldorf Astoria hotel, according to two people with knowledge of the talks.
 Hilton, majority-owned by Blackstone, is looking to buy resorts and high-end urban hotels with proceeds from the sale of the Waldorf on New York’s Park Avenue to China’s Anbang Insurance Group Co, Hilton Chief Executive Officer Christopher Nassetta said on a third-quarter conference call with analysts in October.
 Baird & Co, said last month of buyer demand for resort hotels.
 Another key provision is that companies involved with the projects will be allowed to keep gas revenue in bank accounts outside Mozambique, using a local account only to pay taxes, buying goods and services in the country, and paying local workers.
 If Three decides to make an acquisition, that would mean the “one-buyer situation” won’t persist, Beyazian said.
 BT has been expanding its own TV offers, bidding against Rupert Murdoch’s Sky Plc for the most popular soccer matches and buying out ESPN’s channel in the UK last year.
 NQ Mobile is still down 80 percent since October 2013, when Muddy Waters LLC, the research firm founded by Block, said that the company misrepresented cash balances and was a “massive fraud” Under the plan approved by its board, NQ Mobile may complete the buyback over the next 12 months with its existing cash balance.
 “Given how low NQ’s share price is after the big slump last week, the $80 million would mean a buyback of a pretty sizable percent of the outstanding shares based on market value,” Sachin Shah, a special situations and merger-arbitrage strategist at New York-based Albert Fried & Co, said by phone.
 “For short sellers they have to buy shares to cover their positions.
 - Repsol agrees to buy Talisman Energy for $83 billion.
 Credit Suisse, which has a buy recommendation on the stock, boosted the target price on the stock to 98 pesos from 71 pesos.
 The euro weakened on speculation the European Central Bank will begin buying government bonds in 2015.
 In April, the board will consider renewals of its dividend and share buybacks, Delta said.
 17 that they had agreed to buy First Wind Holdings Inc.
 A full absorption by Saint-Gobain that would recognize Sika’s growth would be another possibility to reverse the value loss, the company said, adding that Sika’s board and management is “receptive to other proposals” Citing conflicts of interests and the lack of upside for minority shareholders, Sika’s management has threatened to quit after Saint-Gobain agreed to buy a 161 percent stake owned by the Burkard family that will give the French building-materials supplier 524 percent of voting rights.
 reported fiscal fourth-quarter revenue that topped estimates as the software maker pushes deeper into delivering programs via the Web to expand its business, an effort bolstered by a deal to buy stock-photography provider Fotolia LLC for about $800 million.
 Treasury market makes it harder for investors to buy and sell bonds when news events cause prices to move, according to the Bank of Canada.
 That means automated trading narrows the difference between prices to buy and sell bonds.
 Spoofers make money by feigning interest in buying or selling at a certain price, creating the illusion of demand in an attempt to make other traders move the market.
 The spoofer cancels the original order and buys or sells at the new price to make a profit.
 Jefferies struck a deal in 2011 to buy Bache’s Global Commodities Group from life insurer Prudential Financial Inc.
 “There’s been more sell pressure rather than buy pressure,” Hoffman said.
 rose 43 percent after a group led by BC Partners agreed to buy it for $83 billion.
 It extended gains in late trading after saying it would boost its share buyback program and increase its dividend.
 (BHP) will sell oil from Texas to foreignbuyers without first getting the approval of the CommerceDepartment to do so, according to a person familiar with thecompany’s plans.
 The bank “has other channels, like continuing to buy dollars,” to counter deflation without the risk of aggravating the housing bubble, Klein said.
 Securities firms promised to impose so-called Chinese walls between divisions so investment bankers couldn’t push analysts to recommend that investors buy their corporate clients’ shares.
 It succeeded as companies spent about $27 billion a day on buybacks through the third quarter, on pace for the second most on record, according to data from Birinyi Associates Inc.
 “Investors and traders over the last number of years have been conditioned to buy on the dip,” said Quincy Krosby, a market strategist based in Newark, New Jersey, at Prudential Financial Inc, which oversees $1 trillion in assets.
 “It helps to backstop the market when you know companies are out there executing on their buyback plans,” David Lafferty, who helps oversee $894 billion as the chief market strategist for Natixis Global Asset Management in Boston, said in a phone interview.
 “It’s a pretty positive signaling mechanism to management that they still have faith in their own shares” Record Highs The S&P 500 Buyback Index, made up of the 100 stocks with the highest buyback ratio, climbed for a sixth straight year, adding 16 percent.
 “There’s somewhat of a perfect storm to buy the dip this year,” Skip Aylesworth, a portfolio manager at Hennessy Funds in Boston, where he helps oversee about $5 billion, said by phone.
 “That really didn’t work out like they wanted it,” said Ulle Woerner, an analyst at Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg, who rates BASF buy.
 activist fund is in discussions with several overseas investors about buying shares in the supermarket chain.
 investor interested in buying a holding in the grocer, the Sunday Telegraph reported, without citing anyone.
 Crystal Amber is seeking to convince other activist investors to buy Sainsbury shares as it isn’t in a position to force any major changes on its own, the Sunday Telegraph said.
 Grom maintained his buy rating on the shares.
 The planned sale of civil-engineering assets was announced in May, and Bilfinger is still seeking a buyer for its Polish construction operations.
 Aviva Chief Executive Officer Mark Wilson struck a deal this month to buy UK.
 Brazil’s Rules Investors “seem to be applying a high probability that this dispute could become ’hostile,’” with the major holders eventually buying out the minority shareholders to gain voting power, Leonardo Correa and Caio Ribeiro, analysts at BTG, wrote in a research note this week.
 unit and hedge fund Marshall Wace LLP are among the other buyers.
 As tumbling crude prices erode cash flow, Watson and the board of directors probably will curtail spending on share buybacks before they touch dividend payouts or the drilling budget, a team of analysts led by Paul Sankey at Wolfe Research LLC said in a Dec.
 Walgreen agreed to buy the 55 percent of Boots it doesn’talready own for $153 billion in August and elected to forgo thetax-avoidance strategy of moving its legal residence abroad09:00 in New York.
 That leaves less cash for dividends, which Vale has been reducing since a record $12 billion in 2011, including a $3 billion share buyback, to this year’s $42 billion.
 “The market is not so heated, therefore the conditions to negotiate with contracted suppliers is more favorable to the buyers” Vale cut investments to $823 billion in the first nine months of 2014, 21 percent less than in the same period last year, it said Oct.
 Less than 26 percent of analysts recommend buying the company’s American depositary receipts, the fewest since at least late 1999, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 In-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers, more than twice the 14 percent who care most about horsepower and handling, according to a survey last year from the Accenture consulting firm.
 Katara Hospitality, owned by Qatar’s sovereign-wealth fund, is in talks to buy “iconic” hotels in London and Rome as it seeks to more than double its properties by 2030, Chief Operating Officer Christopher RJ.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- The UK’s wealthiest homebuyers face a jump in transaction tax while almost everyone else will pay less after Chancellor of the Exchequer George Osborne revamped a system that he says punishes low- and middle-income families.
 homebuyer will save 4,500 pounds ($7,000) on a new home and 98 percent will pay less under a revised system of levies known as stamp duty, the chancellor said.
 “In recent years, the burden of stamp duty has increased on low- and middle-income families trying to buy a new home, as prices have risen” Foxtons Drops Foxtons Group Plc, a property broker focused on London, fell as much as 63 percent after Osborne’s announcement.
 The number of purchases by first-time buyers has fallen 123 percent in the three months through October, LSL Property Services Plc said last week.
 in its deal to buy Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 shareholders from voting on Dollar Tree Inc’s $85 billion buyout bid until the discount chain’s executives fully explore Dollar General Corp’s competing offer.
 1 A380 buyer Emirates, at the weekend in Dubai, and that they discussed a Neo variant for the A380.
 The economy in China, which buys 67 percent of seaborne supply, is on track to record its weakest annual growth since 1990.
(Bloomberg) -- Providence Equity Partners is in talks to buy Clarion Events, organizer of the London International Horse Show, for about 250 million pounds ($391 million), people with knowledge of the matter said.
 Private-equity firms have been increasingly focusing on smaller deals as competition and pricing for large leveraged buyouts remains high.
 As of September, buyouts of European companies with annual sales between $10 million to $1 billion accounted for 92 percent of the market, the highest level since at least 2005, according to Seattle-based PitchBook Data Inc.
 this year, as a rising stock market and low interest rates make it difficult to lure buyers.
 “Unfortunately, when rates are hovering at historic lows and equities are near historic highs, the reverse convertible interest falls off” Some investors also never buy the products at all because of the potential for losing principal if the stock falls.
 in performance gear, and it failed to capture the imagination of young buyers with sport-inspired streetwear.
 who has a buy rating on the stock.
 His mother tried to buy canned tomatoes from a wholesaler, who waved her off, saying he only sold to other vendors and that she could buy what she needed at a shop down the street.
 As sales grew, within a few months he was able to bypass wholesalers to buy directly from their suppliers -- and start turning a profit, he says.
 Probably some companies are also buying dollars ahead of year end” Rate Surprise Russia’s central bank unexpectedly raised the benchmark rate to 17 percent from 105 percent yesterday, its biggest move yet to shore up the ruble and defuse the currency crisis threatening the country’s stricken economy.
 “We have to keep in mind that we’ve seen eight consecutive sessions of excessive selling and even at today’s prices the market is relatively cheap and a great buying opportunity” The Tadawul’s 14-day RSI jumped to 422 today from 14 on Dec.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- The GAVI Alliance, the biggest provider of money for vaccines sent to developing countries, will commit as much as $390 million to buy Ebola shots and support their use in an effort to stop the deadly outbreak in West Africa.
 They also reject allegations that Josh Comstock, C&J’s chief executive, misled directors into believing the deal was an acquisition of Nabors’s fracking-services unit, rather than a buyout of C&J by its rival.
 Bank of America Merrill Lynch analyst Ying Huang downgraded his recommendation to underperform from buy, and lowered the price target to $87 from $130.
 In 2011, he curbed its ability to foreclose on homeowners as a condition to getting approval to buy another company, then installed a monitor there after a surprise audit in 2012 found Ocwen hadn’t complied with the terms.
 ‘Fairy Dust’ In a successful short sale, the borrower lines up a buyer and submits the documents to the mortgage servicer.
 With a buyer lined up, he said in an interview last month that he sees no hurdles to a sale but one: Ocwen.
 Ocwen requires homeowners, even if they have buyers lined up, to also list it on an auction website, Hubzu -- a relationship Lawsky is also probing.
 He also lowered his recommendation on the technology industry to the equivalent of hold from the equivalent of buy.
 RBS identified small businesses as distressed so it couldcharge them advisory fees and buy their assets at reducedprices, according to a November 2013 report by Lawrence Tomlinson, a government adviser.
 The Chicago-based real estate investment trust, which in June acquired Blackstone Group LP’s stake in the luxury Hotel del Coronado near San Diego, is seeking to buy additional resorts in areas such as California and southern Florida, he said.
 Resort purchases probably will increase next year as buyers are drawn by higher group spending and a lack of new construction, according to David Loeb, an analyst at Milwaukee-based Robert W.
 ‘Full Recovery’ “A lot of buyers focused on urban hotels in the last couple of years, but are now looking into resorts,” Loeb said.
 19 said it will buy the Westin Beach Resort & Spa in Fort Lauderdale, Florida, for $149 million.
 The passenger numbers flowing through the airport may also present an opportunity for investors looking to play Ireland’s revival, according to Philip O’Sullivan, an analyst in Dublin at Investec Plc, which recommends buying DAA’s 2018 bond.
 Europe’s wireless and fixed-line providers are combining to boost customer loyalty and monthly bills as consumers increasingly buy different services from a single provider.
 The German carrier is open to buying Orange’s BT shares in the future to increase its stake and allow a full exit by the French partner, said the people, who asked not to be named because the deliberations are confidential.
 Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital took Caesars private in a $307 billion leveraged buyout in 2008 that saddled the gambling company with more obligations than it could handle.
(Bloomberg) -- British Airways owner IAG SA said an offer to buy Aer Lingus Group Plc that would have consolidated its dominance at London’s Heathrow airport was turned down.
 Charging Stations Merkel’s cabinet announced plans in September to offer electric-car buyers special privileges, backing a bill that would enable municipalities to offer drivers of battery-powered cars, fuel cell vehicles and some plug-in hybrids free parking and the right to use bus lanes.
 The shares have jumped 54 percent this year, bolstered by speculation that the company will find a buyer for some or all of the company.
 consumers aren’t buying such bundles.
 households buy the four services together, according to regulator Ofcom’s August report.
 The Spanish company’s $13 billion deal to buy the Canadian producer was the cheapest among the five largest oil and natural gas purchases on the continent this year, including debt.
 While Repsol avoided the crash in oil, it’s also buying a company that can’t generate as much cash as it could four months ago, Meats said.
 Problems Arise “The problem may appear in our building accessories segment, where we have rather smaller Russian buyers,” Michal Malina, the head of Grupa Kety’s investors relations, said by phone Dec.
 Plastic, Metal After joining Hewlett-Packard, Weisler put those skills to work on winning a contract to supply 15 million PCs to a buyer in India.
 Consumer spending ispoised to expand in 2015 as stronger employment and lowergasoline prices boost household buying power.
 “They seeconsumers spending more money, and investors are buying ETFsinstead of trying to cherry-pick individual stocks in consumerdiscretionary.
 The largest-ever bankruptcy in the energy industry, which came seven years after the company set a record as the biggest leveraged buyout, will keep bankruptcy lawyers at firms such as Morrison & Foerster LLP and Richards, Layton & Finger PA busy in the coming months as the company aims for a relatively quick exit from Chapter 11.
 Lawsuit News Cubist Patent Loss Shouldn’t Have Adverse Effect on Merck Deal Merck & Co’s deal to buy Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 pulled out of a deal to buy a stake in Israel’s offshore Leviathan field amid unclear regulatory policy.
 European Union rules that come into force in 2017 will cap much trading activity on dark venues -- where buy and sell orders are not disclosed.
 LSE will hold a midday auction from next year in an attempt to woo large buy and sell orders.
 agreed to buy one of his holdings, Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 Both funds beat 97 percent of the competition over the past five years Merck agreed to buy Lexington, Massachusetts-based Cubist to add products to help fight the growing threat of drug-resistant bacteria.
 Yildiz Holding AS, maker of Godiva chocolates, agreed to buy United Biscuits Plc for $33 billion last month, to increase the countries it operates in to 100.
 Oyak Group, a military pension fund manager with interests in carmaking and cement production, aims to buy some of the assets of divestments from the merger of Holcim Ltd.
 Ukraine needs the cash, part of a $17 billion loan program, to repay other debt, buy heating fuel for winter and stem the hryvnia’s 46 percent slump this year.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Anglo American Plc, seeking to shrink its platinum business in South Africa, shortlisted about 10 potential buyers for its Union mine and aims to sell it for about $300 million in the first half of next year, according to people familiar with the plans.
 Anglo American Platinum Ltd, Anglo’s Johannesburg-based unit, hasn’t yet received any bids from potential buyers, which include Sibanye Gold Ltd.
 It will sell shares in the operations in an initial public offering if it fails to find buyers, the company said on July 21.
 spun off three aging South African mines in 2013, is a possible buyer of unwanted assets, CEO Neal Froneman said in July.
 That’s very different from committing yourself as a buyer and making an offer” Rene Rautenbach, a spokesman for Johannesburg-based Northam, and Anglo American declined to comment.
 14 as stocks gained and hedge fund managers including Jody LaNasa, founder of Serengeti Asset Management LP, recommended buying shares of the investment firm.
 With inflation slowing and the Bank of Israel lending rate at a record low, investors will continue to buy Israeli assets, he wrote in a report.
 He proposed to widen the deficit to 34 percent of gross domestic product and cut taxes for first-time homebuyers.
 European Central Bank President Mario Draghi said policy makers will reassess the region’s stimulus program next quarter, damping speculation officials were poised to start buying sovereign debt, a strategy known as quantitative easing.
 “Draghi’s going to have to start doing some bond-buying if they want to get out of malaise they’re in,” Karyn Cavanaugh, the New York-based senior market strategist at Voya Investment Management LLC, said by phone.
 I think it’ll eventually be good news and QE will have to happen” January Proposal The S&P pared a drop of as much as 06 percent and the Dow Jones Industrial Average ended the day down just 01 percent after Bloomberg News reported that the ECB’s Governing Council expected to be considering a proposal for a broad-based asset-buying program, including sovereign debt, in January.
 Since June, the ECB has cut key rates twice, offered cheap loans to banks to spur lending and started buying covered bonds and asset-backed securities.
 Saudi Arabia’s state-run oil company will offer the deepest discounts for its benchmark crude to Asian buyers in at least 14 years.
 to buy back the company’s stake in its Nook business.
 Rare Music She said that after buying her Nano in 2006, she couldn’t always find the “rare music” she enjoys, including tango and Hungarian, for sale on iTunes.
 As a result, she had to buy CDs of the music and copy it onto her laptop before syncing with her Nano, she said.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- A buyout group including KKR & Co.
 Maran spent 74 billion rupees ($117 million) buying a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010 at 4725 rupees per share.
 Including debt, the buyout group is paying about 93 times PetSmart’s earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation, and amortization in the 12 months through Nov.
 That compares with a median of 89 times historic Ebitda paid in 24 buyouts of US.
 PetSmart made a good buyout candidate because of its high free-cash-flow yield -- a measure of how much cash from operations the business generates relative to its share price, analysts have said.
 That helped Jana make a case in July for PetSmart being a buyout target, especially given the attractive financing market.
 Measures on the economy and buying climate also climbed to the strongest levels in seven years.
 The comfort gauge of attitudes about the buying climate increased to 373 last week, its best reading since August 2007, from 351, indicating households may feel more secure about shopping freely this gifting season.
 The New York-based companies -- who share a chairman, Nicholas Schorsch -- had been at odds after RCS last month pulled out of a roughly $700 million deal to buy ARCP’s Cole Capital unit.
 Those investments are marketed to individual buyers and depend heavily on the sponsor’s reputation.
 Bankruptcy Judge Robert Gerber in Manhattan let GM exit bankruptcy using government money to buy its predecessor’s best assets.
 9, 2013, paid its first dividend since 1980 and announced a $1 billion share buyback plan -- soothing creditors who ended up with stakes in the new airline when it left bankruptcy via the merger.
 Broadening Ambitions Alibaba, co-founded in 1999 by Chairman Jack Ma in his apartment with $60,000, runs marketplaces including Taobao, which links individual buyers and sellers, and Tmallcom, which connects retailers and consumers.
 Outright Purchase Alibaba may consider buying a manufacturer outright after it has exhausted other options, said Gil Luria, an analyst at Los Angeles-based Wedbush Securities Inc.
 “If all else fails, Alibaba may consider buying a handset manufacturer,” Luria said.
 A whole warrant entitles the holder to buy one share at an exercise price of $110 for five years.
 “We’re seeing large flows pushing around the major currencies less on fundamentals and more on liquidity and risk aversion” The franc weakened against all of its 16 major peers as the Zurich-based SNB introduced a negative deposit rate for the first time since the 1970s, saying it was prepared to buy unlimited foreign currency to shield the 120-per-euro cap and take further measures if needed.
 Pressure on the cap has bolstered speculation the ECB will start a large-scale sovereign-bond buying program, a measure that may weaken the euro against its peers.
 Because the ultimate market success of Zerbaxa and other drugs isn’t clear, other buyers may be wary of topping Merck’s offer, Irina Rivkind Koffler, a New York-based analyst at Cantor Fitzgerald, wrote in a report.
 Bad Year Talisman’s stock has plunged 65 percent this year as oil slumped and the company failed to find the buyers needed to make inroads in an asset-divestiture plan designed to shore up its balance sheet.
 Better Prospects Part of Repsol’s hangup had been its struggle to line up buyers for the Talisman assets it wasn’t interested in owning, people have said, asking not to be identified discussing private information.
 “We’re getting to a level where a transaction makes more sense from a valuation perspective, from a buyer’s standpoint,” Feltin of Macquarie said.
 If it can’t find a buyer for the whole company at a reasonable price, Talisman may turn to larger asset sales.
 Doing nothing may not sit well with its suffering shareholders, and just provides more openings for buyers.
 agreed to buy the UK.
 RPX Acquires Rock Star Patents Assets to License Defensively RPX Corp, the San Francisco-based defensive patent licensing entity, said it acquired a portfolio of 4,000 patent assets from Rockstar Consortium LLC, a group of companies set up to buy intellectual property from defunct Canadian phonemaker Nortel Networks Corp.
 Disney announced a deal to buy Marvel Entertainment in 2009.
 “I didn’t even know they were in the real estate business,” Tony James, Blackstone’s 63-year-old president, said on a July call with analysts after buying London office buildings from its competitor.
 Expansion Stumbles Carlyle’s property stumbles reflect broader difficulties at the $203 billion firm in diversifying earnings beyond leveraged buyouts, an ambition of 65-year-old co-founder David Rubenstein since the 1990s.
 after Warren Buffett’s Berkshire Hathaway Inc, plowing more of the firm’s own money into investments ranging from buyouts to lending.
 Carlyle’s continued reliance on buyouts in part reflects its success in private equity.
 I’d say Blackstone got a jump on a strategy to innovate beyond buyouts” Poor Timing That didn’t have to be the case.
 Peterson in 1985 as a buyout and advisory firm with a $400,000 balance sheet, was first to diversify, with a unit allocating money to hedge funds in 1990 and a real estate group two years later.
 “That makes it much easier for them to do truly different types of deals that smaller-bucket funds just can’t do” New Urgency Carlyle’s efforts to build its non-buyout businesses took on added urgency in the past five years, according to the people, as clients increasingly asked for more offerings.
 It’s also been driven by the firm’s 2012 IPO, as stockholders value a stable, diverse stream of fee-related earnings more than payouts produced by leveraged buyouts in unpredictable cycles.
 10 (Bloomberg) -- Glencore Plc, the mining company that proposed a merger with Rio Tinto Group this year, is weighing whether to continue buying back its shares in 2015 against other potential opportunities including acquisitions.
 “We are in as good a position as any to look at what we do in terms of continuation of buyback programs come 2015,” Chief Financial Officer Steven Kalmin told analysts and investors today at a presentation in London.
 A $1 billion share buyback announced in August is 65 percent complete and a decision on continuing to buy back shares will be made around next March when the current program ends, Kalmin said.
 “We are not going to hoard cash for the sake of hoarding cash or we’re not going to buy something for the sake of having a bigger company,” Glasenberg said.
 ‘Wasting Assets’ Insurers usually buy highly rated bonds to back policies.
 The billionaire has long favored buying stocks for the insurance companies at his Berkshire Hathaway Inc.
 The group’s gauge of prospective buyer traffic held at 45 last month, while the index of current single-family home sales decreased to 61 from 62.
 It is certainly a bit frustrating and confusing” More job growth and a pickup in wages will give Americans the means to buy.
 The buyers, Advent International and Avista Capital Partners, and the seller agreed to end the deal, the Brussels-based company said in a statement late yesterday.
 The deal follows Amazon’s announcement in August that it had agreed to pay $970 million to buy Twitch Interactive Inc, an online forum that lets users discuss gaming and watch others while they play.
 “Value investing at one time was all about buying low and selling high,” Cinnamond, manager of the $724 million Aston/River Road Independent Value Fund in Louisville, Kentucky, said in a Dec.
 “But now a lot of my buy-side colleagues have avoided making those tough decisions of owning what’s down and instead just buying what’s up.
 The FTC, which filed the case that reached the Supreme Court, has said the disputed accords, also known as reverse payments, cost drug buyers as much as $35 billion a year, a figure the industry contests.
(Bloomberg) -- Russian stocks rallied the most since 2009 as government steps to bolster the ruble emboldened investors to buy shares of OAO Megafon and steelmakers, taking advantage of the RTS Index’s cheapest valuations in five years.
 After a surprise interest-rate increase failed to arrest the ruble’s slide and sent Russian assets into freefall yesterday, the Finance Ministry joined the central bank in trying to defend the currency by buying rubles today.
 His rise at the company dates to the drugstore chain’s decision to buy a 45 percent stake in Alliance Boots in 2012, an agreement that gave Pessina 76 percent of Walgreen stock.
 drugstore chain by sales, said in August that it would buy the rest of Bern, Switzerland-based Alliance Boots for $153 billion.
 The drugstore company’s decision not to move its legal address abroad as part of the acquisition in a tax-saving move called an inversion, plus a smaller-than-expected $3 billion share buyback has riled investors.
 UBS Group AG says regulators could limit the use of credit in buying stocks.
 The explosive growth in securities lending and margin financing isn’t sustainable” Leveraged Bets The securities regulator this month cautioned investors on buying shares and started inspecting some brokerages’ margin finance businesses.
 The amount of credit extended to investors to buy stocks climbed to 1 trillion yuan ($161 billion) as of Dec.
 “It’s important for Italy if you consider there will be at least 500 jets in Europe in the next 15 years that will need maintenance and upgrades for another 40 years or so” The decision is “an acknowledgment of Italy’s technological capability and of the fact that, rather than just being buyers, we can be industrial partners,” Pinotti told reporters in Rome.
 ICE spent $150 million buying Singapore Mercantile Exchange Pte and its clearing house this year after Hong Kong Exchanges & Clearing Ltd.
 Anglo is already seeking buyers for four platinum mines in South Africa, and three copper mines and a smelter in Chile.
 “Large corporations will start to increase payouts or buy back shares starting from next year.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- At $15 billion, a plan by three Brazilian mobile-phone companies to buy and split a major rival, Tim Participacoes SA, is set to meet resistance from its owner.
 The French media group agreed in September to sell its Brazilian broadband unit GVT to Telefonica for about $9 billion after the buyer boosted its offer in a bidding war with Telecom Italia.
 Portuguese Pact Oi agreed to sell its Portuguese assets this week for more than $9 billion, proceeds it can use to buy part of Tim.
 “We’re taking positions in general partnerships,” Kravis said today at Goldman Sachs Group Inc’s financial-services conference in New York, responding to a question about whether New York-based KKR would buy back stock.
 KKR agreed in July to buy a 25 percent stake in Houston-based BlackGold, which makes credit investments in energy-related companies and assets.
 “I would imagine that over the next three, six, nine months there are others that we end up taking positions in” The firm, founded in 1976 by Kravis, Roberts and Jerome Kohlberg, has diversified its business beyond leveraged buyouts over the past decade, expanding operations in credit, capital markets and real estate.
 Carlyle Group LP has added new businesses with $95 billion in assets over the past five years in part by buying stakes in hedge fund firms and other investment groups.
 It’s “completely unlikely to have any impact” The market wasn’t buying it either.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Hedge fund manager and teddy bear collector Paul Greenwood was sentenced to 10 years in prison after pleading guilty to swindling investors out of $554 million dollars, some of which he used to buy the stuffed toys.
 BOJ Governor Haruhiko Kuroda’s board bolstered bond buying on Oct.
 May recommended buying Facebook shares and boosted his price target for the stock to $91 from $86.
 The global picture has too many moving parts” The drop in VIX options positions may just be traders giving up on timing bets for spikes in volatility through buying calls as they become short-lived and difficult to anticipate, Breier said.
 Kering SA, which also owns Gucci, contacted potential buyers earlier this year to gauge interest, said the people, who asked not to be identified because talks are private.
 ‘Forever Faster’ The search for a buyer of Puma comes in the same year that Kering Chairman Francois-Henri Pinault said he was convinced the company should have a sports and lifestyle division.
 10, saying he’ll buy 10 tickets.
 These include suspending dividends and share buybacks, delaying construction of new rigs already ordered and deferring costly five-year maintenance checkups wherever possible.
 The best year for initial public offerings since 2007 and an abundance of cash-rich buyers, including buyout funds looking for targets, could also incentivize conglomerates to give up on business units that no longer meet expectations.
 For-profit college operator Gaec Anima Educacao SA increased after agreeing to buy Whitney do Brasil Holding Ltda.
 29 that it agreed to buy the 50 percent it doesn’t own in the South Stream development venture from Italian, French and German partners.
(Bloomberg) -- A Carlyle Group fund agreed to buy General Electric Co’s stake in Asia Satellite Telecommunications Holdings Ltd.
 for as much as HK$375 billion ($483 million) and then make a buyout offer.
 The deal comes after two failed buyout offers for AsiaSat.
 In 2012, a holder with enough votes to defeat a proposal by a management-backed trust blocked the buyout.
 Carlyle, through units, will buy GE’s 50 percent voting interest and 495 economic stake in Bowenvale Ltd, a joint venture with China’s government-backed Citic, according to the AsiaSat filing.
 Carlyle will seek to use compulsory acquisition rights under Hong Kong’s Takeovers Code to buy all the outstanding AsiaSat shares in the event that holders accept its offer for at least 90 million shares, AsiaSat said.
(Bloomberg) -- Advent International Corp, the Boston-based private-equity firm, and the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development agreed to buy Austria’s Hypo Group Alpe Adria, one of the largest banks in the former Yugoslavia.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Haitong Securities Co, China’s second-largest brokerage by market value, surged to a record in Hong Kong stock trading on talks to buy Portuguese investment bank Banco Espirito Santo de Investimento SA.
 The new rules seek to have most swaps guaranteed at clearinghouses, which accept collateral from buyers and sellers in order to reduce the risk in the trades.
 Such an outcome could put at risk the European Union’s common currency and the start of the European Central Bank’s bond-buying plan.
 In a short sale, traders sell borrowed stock in bets that the price will fall and buy it back at a lower price later, pocketing the difference.
 Sinovel’s bondholders in September rejected a plan to allow its Jiangsu unit to use as much as 700 million yuan to buy back some of its 2016 bonds.
 To safeguard against infringements, vendors are required to make deposits with Alibaba to ensure their products are genuine, allowing buyers and sellers to rate each other and helping consumers get refunds.
 Fifteen of 18 analysts rate the stock buy, giving it the second-highest consensus recommendation, the data show.
 said it was in “initial contact” with Germany’s largest utility EON SE to buy its Italian coal electricity assets for about 150 million euros ($185 million).
 TD Securities analyst Scott Penner increased his rating on the shares to a buy rating from a hold rating, with a price target of C$13.
 Sistema had been investigated for buying assets valued at as much as $7 billion for only $2 billion, Putin said.
 Sistema spent $26 billion buying its Bashneft stake over about four years, including a final $2 billion to gain control in 2009.
 A private-equity unit of JPMorgan and Ajay Singh, who quit as a director of the airline in 2010, plans to buy the entire stake held by majority shareholder Kalanithi Maran, said the official with direct knowledge of Singh’s plans.
 in its deal to buy California-based Avanir Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 “Kroton’s fundamentals justify the excellent moment for the company’s shares,” said Luiz Fernando Azevedo, an analyst at Bradesco Corretora who rates the stocks the equivalent of a buy.
 Of the 21 analysts who rate the stock, 17 have a buy rating and three say hold, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The majority of economists surveyed by Bloomberg News predict the ECB will eventually buy government bonds to help spur growth in the region.
(Bloomberg) -- OAO Gazprom, the world’s biggest natural-gas exporter, agreed to buy the 50 percent it doesn’t own in South Stream Transport BV from Italy’s Eni SpA, Electricite de France SA and the Wintershall unit of Germany’s BASF SE.
 He spent 74 billion rupees buying a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010 at 4725 rupees per share and has invested a further 56 billion rupees, SpiceJet has said.
 is offering to buy the shares it doesn’t own in Brookfield Incorporacoes for 160 reais each, it said in a Dec.
 “Developers are actively selling new residential units to generate cash” Sentiment has improved and buyers have returned to the market after Hong Kong’s recent pro-democracy protests, Wong said.
 At least one buyout firm considered a deal before walking away over concerns about his leadership, a person familiar with the matter said in 2012.
 For buyers wanting to take another look, the stock is just as cheap now.
 It’s been mentioned by retail analysts as a top leveraged-buyout candidate in recent years because the business generates cash, has a valuable brand and needs some sprucing up -- hallmarks of LBO targets.
 Even when the stock was higher earlier this year, Abercrombie offered financial buyers the best internal rate of return -- at 21 percent -- among more than 20 specialty retailers, according to a hypothetical LBO analysis in June by Randal Konik, an analyst for Jefferies Group LLC.
 “There is a big theme of operators buying technology -- mobile operators buying fixed technology and vice versa,” said Guy Peddy, an analyst at Macquarie Group Ltd.
 At the same time, a faster pace of hiring and a pickup in wages are prompting Americans to take advantage of low borrowing costs to buy cars.
 That may make it harder for low-income and first-time buyers to enter the market, even with mortgage rates at the lowest levels since May 2013.
 “I think the buyers are still a little bit skittish, and we’re working through this recovery, but as we’ve said, it’s going to be a bit bumpy” Fed policy makers are closely monitoring economic data as they debate when to raise their benchmark interest rates following the worst recession in the post-World War II era.
 Sustained labor-market improvement, pent-up demand and a growing population will also lure buyers into the market in the coming year, Stephen Stanley, chief economist at Amherst Pierpont Securities LLC in Stamford, Connecticut, wrote in a note to clients yesterday.
 Dominion Resources Inc’s North Carolina Power unit agreed to buy electricity from the solar plant under a 15-year contract.
 Their shares have rallied at least 96 percent over the past month on a jump in share trading and the increased use of leverage to buy stocks.
 have said they’re unable to buy as many shares as they want because of the caps.
 The buyer and seller still need a dealer to execute the trade.
 and Development Bank of Japan Inc, SMBC has agreed to buy a majority share in Solar Power Kitakyushu Corp, a unit of Sumitomo Corp.
 The fund plans to buy shares in other solar power companies located in Japan from Sumitomo, according to the statement.
 8 it has been approached by a number of parties including Repsol about “various transactions” Repsol, which is seeking to deploy about $10 billion in cash via acquisitions outside its home market, dropped a plan to buy all of Talisman in August after conducting due diligence on the company, people with knowledge of the matter said at the time.
 Deterred by high valuations in the past, global oil firms have held off for years on buying companies that specialize in shale drilling.
 Talisman, which has operations spanning six continents, has struggled in the past to find buyers for assets from Southeast Asia to Texas as it seeks higher prices than acquirers are willing to pay, people familiar with past efforts have said.
 life insurer, has been buying offices with Norway’s sovereign-wealth fund.
 Lache, who downgraded the shares to hold from buy, also said automakers face “regulatory cost burdens” in part to achieve average fuel economy of 545 miles per gallon in the US.
 stocks have tripled during the 5 1/2-year bull market, driven by the Fed’s three rounds of bond buying and borrowing costs near zero to stimulate the economy.
 London-based SABMiller failed in September in trying to buy Heineken NV, a deal that would have helped shield itself from getting bought.
 The company pledged to buy back bonds at market prices and provide more consistent financial reporting after the selloff, and has met with more than 700 investors in recent weeks to win back confidence, Sanchez Ortega said.
 “Congress has come together over the years to make improvements in pay, benefits and health care for the men and women of the military; to reform the way in which we buy the weapons they use to carry out their missions,” Democratic Senator Carl Levin of Michigan, the retiring chairman of the Senate Armed Services Committee, said in a farewell speech on the floor today.
 The Pentagon asked Congress for the money to buy 100 Tomahawks, which played a high-profile role in the military intervention in Libya.
 While the Pentagon didn’t seek money for the planes, Navy officials told Congress that buying more Growlers topped their wish list for items that didn’t make the budget request.
 propulsion system by 2019 and prohibit the secretary of defense from buying launch services using Russian rocket engines other than those already under contract as of February 1, 2014.
 Before that, he served under Gates as the military’s top weapons buyer.
 Two European Central Bank officials familiar with deliberations said policy makers will consider a proposal to buy sovereign debt at its next meeting.
 “Because most governments selling allowances have a vested interest in higher prices, it will happen,” Louis Redshaw, a former head of carbon at Barclays Plc and founder of Redshaw Advisors Ltd, which buys and sells permits on behalf of factories, said Dec.
 Woodside Petroleum Ltd, Australia’s second-biggest oil and gas producer, scrapped an agreement to buy a quarter of Leviathan for as much as $26 billion in May.
 Jefferies LLC is underwriting the offering and will have an option to buy 450,000 extra shares, according to a filing yesterday.
 The 2005 leveraged buyout of United was criticized by fans for loading the team with debt.
 Owning gas is cheaper for customers than buying a financial contract to protect against price fluctuations.
 agreed to buy California-based Avanir Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 “And every time we do have a significant back-up, overseas investors come in and buy the market” Treasuries fell yesterday after a gauge of manufacturing was higher than economists forecast.
 The State Administration of Foreign Exchange in May 2013 ordered banks to adjust currency positions so that foreign-exchange loans were kept at a certain proportion of deposits, pushing lenders to buy more dollars at a time when the yuan was strengthening.
 Developing-country stocks have fallen 13 percent from this year’s high in September as the Federal Reserve ended bond buying and speculation grew that US.
 “There’s a very strong commitment behind that today” Amazon Threat Eric Schmidt, Google’s executive chairman and former chief executive officer, has said that Seattle-based Amazon is Google’s biggest competitor in search because many consumers visit the e-commerce service first when they want to buy items.
 “People are more and more comfortable buying online, and much of the purchasing is delivered,” Hubbard said.
(Bloomberg) -- The Indian government issued an executive order to make it easier for companies to buy land and eventually replace a law that has hindered manufacturing and constrained economic growth.
 Wright sees as many as 20 potential buyers for light oil properties in Saskatchewan that Lightstream will seek to sell when oil prices rebound, he said.
 The dividend announcement comes less than a month after the electronics maker said it will buy back 219 trillion won ($2 billion) of stock as the Lee family that controls Samsung Group restructures South Korea’s biggest conglomerate.
 30, aiding efforts to reward investors, and the Fairfield, Connecticut-based company also can still repurchase more than $10 billion of stock under its buyback plan.
 agreed to buy closely held logistics firm Genco, a specialist in handling product returns, as e-commerce operations expand at the operator of the world’s largest cargo airline.
 The availability of credit is allowing buyers to bid more for assets.
 The fund made a large buy order shortly before the close of trading on Sept.
 The lender said it may buy back as many as 15 million shares, or about 23 percent of its outstanding stock, between next February and January 2016.
 Attitudes about buying vehicles are the most favorable since 2005, according to the Thomson Reuters/University of Michigan Surveys of Consumers.
 While unable to quantify the number of visitors to the showroom, Hartman said it was busy enough that an off-duty police officer was required to direct traffic to the store and a ticketing system was necessary to organize prospective buyers.
 This year, the deals began as much as 10 days before Black Friday, and the “epic selling season” will continue through December, said John Krafcik, president of auto-buying website TrueCar Inc.
 Falling prices at the pump are helping increasingly confident Americans justify buying more expensive sport-utility vehicles, crossover-utility vehicles or trucks.
 Big Purchase “Now is a good time to buy a car and confidence is high,” said Jessica Caldwell, a senior analyst at Edmundscom.
 That isn’t stopping the 33-year-old from borrowing again to buy a new car next year.
 “Life is short, and I want to enjoy it,” said Din, who works in the finance department of Bumrungrad International Hospital in Bangkok, and has racked up more than 200,000 baht ($6,100) in debt from buying clothes, shoes and decorating his apartment.
 Din, who plans to buy a Mazda3 sedan with a new bank loan, isn’t concerned, either.
 Selling debt through banks and brokers could improve efficiency on the market, though it may not be enough to bring in buyers, said Sampson Akligoh, managing director of Accra-based InvestCorp Ltd, a money manager that started operations in August.
 Buying Climate A gauge of the buying climate, which shows whether now is a good time to purchase goods and services, climbed to the highest since August 2007, while the measure of personal finances, the strongest of the three components, was little changed.
 The Paulson Recovery Fund has declined 14 percent this year and a version of the event-driven strategy that can buy new share issues such as Alibaba Group Holding Ltd.
 The movie, theme park and TV company has increased returns to shareholders in recent years, with faster dividend growth and stock buybacks.
 12 (Bloomberg) -- India wants to buy more rough diamonds directly from mining companies as the world’s biggest polisher of the gems seeks to bypass traditional dealers.
 And, it mostly comes indirectly through places like Antwerp and Dubai” By buying directly from mines, Indian importers can cut costs by as much as 10 percent, according to Vipul Shah, chairman of the Gems & Jewellery Export Promotion Council.
 The South Asian nation has signed three long-term agreements to buy from OAO Alrosa, the world’s biggest producer by volume, in addition to nine existing deals, according to Andrey Polyakov, vice president of the Russian company.
 De Beers, the diamond producer owned by Anglo American Plc, currently sells diamonds through sightholders, a group of clients who conform with the company’s criteria in order to be permitted to buy the diamonds.
 “More affluent Indian and Chinese consumers are buying jewelry as economies grow” Alrosa expects more than $5 billion of diamond sales in 2014, while production of rough diamonds is set to rise to 382 million carats in 2015 from 361 million carats this year, the company said in an e-mailed statement.
 Zimmer Holdings Inc’s agreement to buy Biomet Inc.
 “It doesn’t matter if the shopper buys in your store -- if they get the right brand experience and then buy online, high-five to you” High Rents Billabong shares rose 08 percent to close at 655 Australian cents in Sydney trading, hitting their highest level since Nov.
 “We wanted to enter the freehold market with a completed project, where buyers can see and touch the homes they are buying before they buy,” Al Qassim said.
 This year it agreed to buy Lumina Copper Corp.
 Earlier this year, Thoma Bravo was one of several buyout firms including Silver Lake Management LLC and KKR & Co.
(Bloomberg) -- Technip SA, Europe’s largest oil engineer, plans to expand the range of service it offers energy companies after a bid to buy French seismic surveyor CGG SA failed.
 Portugal Expansion Altice won antitrust approval in October to buy French wireless carrier SFR for $23 billion, with a plan to combine the phone company with cable provider Numericable Group, and in June agreed to buy smaller carrier Virgin Mobile in France.
 You’re able to buy coffee throughout next year today, if you want to” To contact the reporters on this story: Marvin G.
(Bloomberg) -- Malaysia’s second-biggest pension fund is reducing cash holdings and buying more of the nation’s bonds and stocks, said Chief Executive Officer Wan Kamaruzaman Wan Ahmad, adding that he sees little risk in emerging markets.
 Kumpulan Wang Persaraan (Diperbadankan) has been a net buyer of the securities during this month’s selloff in developing nations, Wan Kamaruzaman said in an interview.
 Oi, which agreed this month to sell its Portuguese assets to Altice SA, wants to buy Tim through a financial vehicle and keep 25 percent of the company, with the rest being split between Telefonica and America Movil SAB’s Claro, people familiar with the matter have said.
 “That means it may be a good time to buy for a long-term investor, who expects a rebound in oil prices and believes the market turmoil will encourage authorities to find a solution to the Ukraine crisis” Gilyazitdinov says he is considering buying Lukoil and OAO Novatek, as well as Russian steel producers and telecommunications companies.
 Home Buyers Strike A “buyers’ strike” as an oversupply of homes collides with falling demand is at the top of David Loevinger’s risk list.
 “Home buyers could pull back, causing prices to fall further” That in turn may cause developers to slow investment, complicating policy efforts to alleviate a slump, he said.
 “If investors really believe that prices are going down, allowing them to leverage up or buy more of an asset won’t have much impact,” he says.
 He spent 74 billion rupees buying a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010 at 4725 rupees per share and has invested a further 56 billion rupees, SpiceJet has said.
(Bloomberg) -- UltraTech Cement Ltd, controlled by Indian billionaire Kumar Mangalam Birla, will buy two of Jaiprakash Associates Ltd’s cement plants at an enterprise value of 54 billion rupees ($853 million).
 In September, 2013, UltraTech had agreed to buy a Jaiprakash cement plant in the western Gujarat state with 48 million tons of capacity for 38 billion rupees including debt.
 Draghi has said unconventional measures may include buying sovereign bonds.
 While China has been the top Asian buyer in New York, investors from Korea and Southeast Asia are poised for more deals as the relatively shallow real estate markets in their home countries become saturated, according to Amato.
 Rather than buying equity interests in buildings, TIAA-CREF and KTCU are seeking to invest in mortgages backed by office towers, retail properties, warehouses and apartments in major US.
 China Buyers Asian buyers have been a major force behind climbing real estate values in New York City.
 China’s Anbang Insurance Group in October agreed to buy the Waldorf Astoria, the 83-year-old Art Deco building occupying an entire block in midtown Manhattan.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Qatar Investment Authority and Brookfield Property Partners LP increased their bid for London Canary Wharf owner Songbird Estates Plc, and the Qatar fund agreed to buy as much as 9 percent of Brookfield.
 Merck & Co’s $84 billion agreement to buy Cubist and its stable of antibiotics was a vindication for the smaller company, which toiled for two decades on medicine to fight a new generation of bugs even as major drugmakers fled to more profitable areas, like heart disease and cancer.
 homes went through foreclosure since 2007, mortgage lending tightened and younger families postponed buying because they can’t afford or prefer not to own property.
 Home Prices Home prices will rise more slowly than rents because fewer investors are competing to buy a smaller supply of discount-priced foreclosures, while the inventory of non-distressed properties is growing as prospective home sellers gain equity with appreciating prices, Olsen said.
 average as some tenants, even in pricey Manhattan, became buyers or balked at paying landlords more.
 As Scandinavia’s biggest lenders, including Nordea Bank AB and Danske Bank A/S, turn to additional Tier 1 debt to help build their capital buffers, investors can also opt to buy the notes from community banks at a much higher coupon.
 Haelg and Chief Executive Officer Jan Jenisch are leading a rebellion by management, which has threatened to quit if French building-materials supplier Saint-Gobain succeeds in buying the family’s stake for 275 billion Swiss francs ($28 billion).
 2 (Bloomberg) -- At least 85 New York Times employees applied for voluntary buyouts by yesterday’s deadline, falling short of the number the newspaper publisher said was needed to avoid firings, according to a union representative.
 At least 31 guild members have been approved for the buyouts so far, he said.
 has said there will be forced cuts if about 100 jobs can’t be eliminated through buyouts, as digital businesses have struggled to make up for declines in print.
 Glickson said the number of job cuts could fluctuate based on the salaries of those who applied for buyouts.
 He estimated that 15 to 25 people may be fired based on the projected shortfall, the likelihood of the company denying some buyout requests and the probability that some employees will rescind their applications.
 Eileen Murphy, a spokeswoman for Times Co, declined to comment, saying the buyout process hadn’t concluded.
 Several high-profile Times journalists said on Twitter yesterday that they applied for the buyout, including Washington correspondent Edward Wyatt.
 1 when the buyouts were first announced.
 “I think opportunistic investors will look to buy the dips and play potential scenarios, but our gut feel is Greece is going to be quarantined from rest of Europe this time” Weekly Decline Greece’s 10-year yield rose six basis points, or 006 percentage point, to 915 percent at 4:30 pm.
 Draghi Pledge That would be the latest bond-market supportive measure from the ECB, which has already cut interest rates to records, introduced a series of targeted loans and started buying covered bonds and asset-backed securities as it looks to make good on Draghi’s July 26, 2012 pledge to do “whatever it takes” to preserve the currency union.
 North American crude’s 44 percent drop this year may put a temporary chill on the energy patch in early 2015, though some heavily leveraged companies may be forced to sell at current prices, and some well-capitalized buyers may be opportunistic, said Tim Kitchen, Barclays Calgary-based head of Canadian investment banking.
 Mining Slump “It’s going to take a while for buyers and sellers to converge on price just because this has been such a dramatic fall off in valuation,” he said.
 “The bid for yield caused a lack of discrimination across credits and sectors and people were buying whatever was available,” UBS AG credit strategist Matthew Mish said in a telephone interview from New York.
 Charney, 45, is working with private-equity firm Irving Place Capital on a deal to buy American Apparel that would involve the executive returning to American Apparel in some capacity, a person with knowledge of the matter said earlier.
 Buyer interest for Madrid-based Parques Reunidos comes after the buyout firm previously considered an initial public offering.
 Kimco will buy Blackstone’s two-thirds interest in the properties, which total 56 million square feet (520,200 square meters) and are in New York, Virginia, Texas, Florida, California and Maryland, the real estate investment trust said today in a statement.
 Blackstone Group LP said it could collect as much as $20 million annually from investors and companies in its next buyout fund, for services such as health care consulting and bulk purchasing.
 “Most investors will request more robust disclosure surrounding fees being paid by portfolio companies to private equity funds” Buying Companies Private equity firms buy companies using a combination of investor capital and debt, with the goal of selling them or taking them public for a profit.
 Buyout firms also charge the businesses for buying, selling and monitoring them, though firms have increasingly passed on these expenses to investors in the funds by reducing the management fee.
 Many buyout firms, including KKR & Co, TPG and Blackstone, use consultants to help improve companies they own.
 Buy Calls Analyst buy ratings on KT&G as a percentage of total recommendations have fallen to 514 percent, the lowest since November 2005, while sell calls now account for 86 percent, according to analysts tracked by Bloomberg.
 used a warrant to buy 84 million shares of Restaurant Brands International Inc, the parent company for the Burger King and Tim Hortons fast-food chains.
 The contract allowed Berkshire to buy about 175 percent of the fully diluted common shares of Restaurant Brands.
 Buffett teamed up with the buyout firm to take over ketchup maker HJ.
 There will be opportunities for investors to buy energy stocks at “fire-sale prices,” Pelletier said.
 The fund, known as ADIA, agreed to buy the equivalent of 49 percent of Citigroup in 2007, before share issuances during the financial crisis eroded the value of its holdings.
 Robust Portfolio “A closer look at the asset mix reveals a strategy less focused on unconventional drilling than initially expected,” said Leggate, who has a buy rating on the stock.
 Prospective buyers from the UAE, China and France are seeking a total of 57 to 62 elephants, some of which could be sent to private zoos.
 Banks underwriting the funding have the right to buy an additional 13 million shares as well as an extra $375 million of the convertibles.
 Agnelli family holding company Exor SpA, which controls FCA, agreed to buy $886 million of the convertible bonds to preserve its approximately 30 percent stake in FCA, according to the statement.
 Scant inventory and slow return of first-time buyers after the worst recession in the post-World War II era are working to counteract ultra-low mortgage rates, the agents’ group said.
 Little Supply The drop in inventory may also mean prospective home buyers just don’t have enough of a selection and are staying away until there is more supply, he said.
 He also said that the stock market’s swoon in early October could have scared some prospective buyers the following month, and that bad weather probably didn’t play a role in the slowdown.
 Housing has struggled to accelerate this year even amid low mortgage rates as rising property values and strict lending standards cause some young or lower-income buyers to stay out.
 First-time buyers accounted for 31 percent of all purchases in November, today’s report showed.
 While that’s the highest share in two years, it remains short of the 40 percent that the group has said is more typical and means those buyers are coming back only “slowly,” Yun said.
 “Unless there is a meaningful pickup in household incomes in 2015, expect continued weakness in sales as the average home buyer is squeezed,” Sophia Kearney-Lederman, an economic analyst at FTN Financial in New York, said in a research note.
 Mortgage Rates Mortgage rate stability will play an important role in convincing some prospective buyers to take the plunge, especially as Fed officials debate when to raise their benchmark interest rates for the first time since 2006.
 Conversely, an impending rate rise may encourage some buyers to pre-emptively jump into the market.
(Bloomberg) -- China Citic Bank Corp, a unit of the nation’s largest state-owned investment firm, agreed to buy Banco Bilbao Vizcaya Argentaria SA’s holding in a financial-holding unit for HK$816 billion ($105 billion).
 Turkish Purchase BBVA, which plans to remain in China and owns shares in Citic Bank, is seeking to replenish capital after buying a stake in Turkey’s lender Turkiye Garanti Bankasi AS.
 Executives from Metro and Karstadt’s owner, the Austrian property developer Rene Benko, discussed Benko buying Kaufhof earlier this year, according to two people familiar with the matter, who asked not to be identified as talks were private.
 “They need to adapt and become a little like a mall and give customers other reasons to visit them than just buying clothes,” Barclays’ Chaviaras said.
 Revival Attempt Maran has invested about 13 billion rupees ($210 million) in the airline so far, including the 74 billion rupees that he spent buying a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010 at 4725 rupees per share, according to SpiceJet.
 If the ISDA committee were to rule that a credit event took place, buyers of the swaps would be paid the face amount of the contract, minus the value of the underlying debt.
(Bloomberg) -- Los Angeles will buy 7,000 body cameras for police officers to guard against misconduct and false allegations, Mayor Eric Garcetti said.
 “The time to act is now” Garcetti said he’ll add money in next year’s budget to buy 7,000 cameras, enough to equip all Los Angeles police officers, by July 2016.
 Wholesale-milk futures are down 37 percent from a record 11 weeks ago, reducing costs for buyers including Dean Foods Inc.
 The Pentagon asked Congress for the money to buy 100 Tomahawks, which played a high-profile role in the military intervention in Libya.
 While the Pentagon didn’t seek money for the planes, Navy officials told Congress that buying more Growlers topped their wish list for items that didn’t make the budget request.
 propulsion system by 2019 and prohibit the secretary of defense from buying launch services using Russian rocket engines other than those already under contract as of February 1, 2014.
 “The money flying in is just further evidence that investors are buying into this story that this is a good place to be” Inflows Investors have poured money into corporate investment-grade funds for 24 straight weeks, with inflows of $880 million for the week ending Nov.
 Low interest rates and investor demand for dividends and stock buybacks have prompted Intel, International Business Machines Corp, Cisco, EMC, Microsoft Corp, Hewlett-Packard Co.
 taxes to use that money for buybacks or dividends.
 I disagree with the speed that they’re getting there” Some investors would rather the technology industry raise funds for acquisitions and investments in new products or manufacturing than use debt to buy back shares, said Kim Forrest, a fund manager at Fort Pitt Capital Group Inc.
 “At the end of the day you’re not buying a balance sheet, you’re buying a company” Representatives from Microsoft, Oracle and Hewlett-Packard declined to comment on the companies’ debt strategies.
 Sure they can service it, but they’ve been adding debt in order to buy back shares,” said Mike Shinnick, a fund manager at Wasatch Advisors Inc.
 Hungary agreed to buy money-losing MKB in July for 55 million euros ($68 million) from BayernLB as part of Prime Minister Viktor Orban’s agenda to boost domestic ownership in the country’s banking industry to above 50 percent.
 The government is looking to buy more banking assets after two acquisitions this year, Orban said in a Dec.
 climbed 31 percent after Goldman Sachs upgraded the shares to buy from neutral, saying Europe’s largest mobile operator will benefit from deal activity in the sector.
 Economic growth in China, the biggest buyer of ore from Southeast Asia and the largest nickel user, is slowing to the weakest since 1990.
 “Ore is in demand and there are many aggressive buyers,” said Defensor.
 The rupiah fell to the lowest level since the Asian financial crisis in 1998 as an increase in dollar buying by local companies before the year-end coincided with a rout in the sovereign-bond market.
 On the other hand, you’ve had real risk emerge and portfolio managers can no longer work on cruise control” Merger Spreads This is how merger arbitrage is supposed to work: Company A announces that it’s buying Company B.
 ended talks to buy T-Mobile US Inc, and Twenty-First Century Fox Inc.
 Iron Slump The price of iron ore, Australia’s biggest export, has plummeted about 49 percent this year and investors are concerned about an economic slowdown in China, the world’s biggest buyer of the commodity and Australia’s largest trading partner.
 phone monopoly, entered talks to buy either Telefonica SA’s O2 unit or EE, the wireless carrier co-owned by Orange SA and Deutsche Telekom AG, two of the people said.
 After agreeing to buy Germany’s Kabel Deutschland Holding AG for 77 billion euros ($96 billion) last year, it acquired Grupo Corporativo Ono SA of Spain.
 Vodafone’s Chief Executive Officer Vittorio Colao, when asked in September whether Liberty Global would be a good fit for the wireless carrier, said he would consider buying it “for the right price” Representatives for Vodafone and Liberty declined to comment.
 Still, Liberty Global’s co-Chief Financial Officer Charles Bracken said last month regulators would probably give their permission if Vodafone tried to buy its German business.
 By buying EE or O2, BT would add wireless services and a large customer base to complement its existing broadband and TV.
 Because users can register for bitcoin wallets without disclosing their identity, they can buy and sell stuff without the government looking over their shoulder.
 The agreement, announced in May, for Sunac to buy HK$63 billion ($812 million) of shares from Greentown founder Song Weiping, his wife and the company’s chief executive officer has faltered as Song said last month the two companies “don’t blend” and that he was wrong to sell the stake.
 “The weak yen and lower oil are a plus for the nation’s companies, and many of them will probably revise forecasts upwards when they announce quarterly results next month” GPIF, BOJ The gains in Japanese shares this year can largely be attributed to the increase in domestic equity holdings by the country’s public pension fund and buying of exchange-traded funds by the central bank, Mizuho’s Aoki said.
 Sweetheart Loans Hui testified he spent as much as HK$8 million buying properties, handbags and watches for a mistress, a young woman from Shanghai.
 In the years before 2008, when average growth in eastern Europe topped 5 percent, banks lured homebuyers from Poland to Croatia with mortgages denominated in euros and Swiss francs, often at less than half the local-currency rates.
 “Russians prefer to save part of their money buying additional real estate as what they consider as a way to hedge against foreign exchange ruble devaluation,” Alexander Morozov, the bank’s chief financial officer, told analysts on a call on November 26.
 sued a company it accuses of using its name to scam customers into buying hundreds of dollars in support services to fix nonexistent bugs, then stealing personal information or installing malicious software.
 Forwards are agreements to buy or sell assets at a set price and date.
 “Firms that are able to get ahead of a change in the environment promptly and to adapt to the economy in an expanding equilibrium will become the winners of the competition and enjoy prosperity in the new era” The remarks underscore Kuroda’s bid to get companies to buy into efforts by the central bank and Abe administration to shake Japan out of two decades of stagnation.
 31 to expand already-unprecedented monetary stimulus, which gives the BOJ leeway to buy from the market every new bond issued by the finance ministry.
 Vodafone Group Plc, the largest European mobile operator, is interested in buying the unit, a person familiar with the matter said in October.
 Vodafone Chief Executive Officer Vittorio Colao has been buying broadband providers across Europe to expand in bundled mobile and fixed-line services.
 While the Italian unit’s earnings climbed 10 percent in the first nine months of this year, Schaeppi said that if he had the choice to buy a company like Fastweb now he wouldn’t do it.
 Energy Stocks Westport Innovations Inc, which makes natural gas engines and components, sank 12 percent to C$462 after Jefferies LLC analyst Laurence Alexander lowered the stock’s rating to hold from buy.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Business has suddenly picked up at Shelly Levine’s Jerusalem real estate agency: The crumbling of Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu’s government has killed a proposed tax break that had homebuyers biding their time.
 2, wanted to scrap the 18 percent value-added tax for eligible first-time homebuyers.
 “We’ve had four or five families come in already today because they realize that the game is over, and now it’s time to buy,” said Levine, whose Tivuch Shelly agency is marketing a 69-unit project in the Har Homa neighborhood.
 Ran Levy, an electronics engineer, said he had put off plans to buy a home in the northern city of Haifa while he waited for parliament to approve the zero-VAT program.
 Home prices declined from mid-July through mid-September, the last reported period, as buyers waited for the plan to go through.
 BT Group Plc yesterday agreed to enter exclusive talks to buy EE for almost $20 billion, favoring the wireless provider over Telefonica’s O2 unit.
 The derivatives pay the buyer face value in exchange for the underlying securities or the cash equivalent should a borrower fail to adhere to its debt agreement and an increase signals deterioration in perceptions of credit quality.
 media company Hearst Corp, is buying the stake.
 The new polls could usher in Syriza, an anti-austerity party that seeks to renegotiate the nation’s debt, threatening the stability of Europe’s currency union and the start of the European Central Bank’s bond-buying program.
 jumped the most on record in Hong Kong on talks to buy Portugal’s Banco Espirito Santo de Investimento SA.
 They would have to burn it onto a compact disc in an unencrypted format and then load the music back onto their music players -- or buy the music all over again, he said.
 Apple has argued that Noll’s theory is “implausible,” saying in a court filing that RealNetworks, which isn’t a party in the case, was a minor player and there’s no evidence consumers were locked into buying an iPod.
 Potential customers who had downloaded music from RealNetworks would be disinclined to buy iPods, he said.
 The judge said information that emerged at trial convinced her that plaintiff Marianna Rosen, a South Orange, New Jersey, resident who bought iPods for herself and her son in 2008 using a credit card issued by the law firm of her then-husband, wasn’t an adequate representative of the class of iPod buyers covered by the case.
 Even so, the recovery may come too late to be much help to the euro area, leaving the European Central Bank considering buying government bonds to stave off region-wide deflation.
 ‘Window Dressing’ “With window dressing this month, fund managers are buying, pushing up the index and making their portfolio value look a bit better so the money flow is still coming to the market,” said Simon Lam, research director at Christfund Securities Ltd.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Lululemon Athletica Inc, the yogawear maker that ended a dispute with its founder earlier this year, posted third-quarter profit that topped analysts’ estimates and raised its full-year forecast as shoppers buy more workout clothing for everyday use.
 “That’s what they need to be doing” “Product execution right now is much improved,” said Andreeva, who has the equivalent of a buy rating on the shares.
 As part of the deal, Wilson agreed to forgo pursuing a buyout of the company for at least a year and sell half of his stake to private-equity firm Advent International Corp.
 “You can buy a 10-year TIP with inflation expecations of 15 percent,” he said.
 Rather than attract overseas buyers, it’s repelling them.
 It sold its North American locations in 2004 to Children’s Place Retail Stores Inc, before buying them back four years later.
 Stores now have theaters showing Disney cartoons and castles with mirrors inside where kids can try on attire such as the blue Queen Elsa dress from “Frozen” “Everyone’s buying everything,” Chapek said of the “Frozen” products.
 venture -- currently favors buying O2 from Telefonica because a single, eager seller makes it an easier deal to negotiate, the people said, asking not to be identified because the talks are confidential.
 Will Wait “Investors may not rush in with money to buy now as the ordinances are temporary measures,” Megha Vazkar, head of institutional dealing with Mumbai-based Maximus Securities Ltd, said by phone today.
 Unsuccessful Lawsuit Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac buy more than half of the new mortgages in the US.
 The auto-parts maker, which has explored the possibility of splitting in two, is focusing on connected cars as in-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers, according to an Accenture study.
(Bloomberg) -- Investors are buying US.
 Correction Warning The People’s Daily said on its micro-blog yesterday that some investors aren’t acting rationally, citing examples of people selling properties to buy stocks.
 in London, the slump has made buying opportunities out of stocks like Shell.
 The new rules seek to have most swaps guaranteed at clearinghouses, which accept collateral from buyers and sellers in order to reduce the risk in the trades.
 European Union rules that come into force in 2017 will cap much trading activity on dark venues -- where buy and sell orders are not disclosed.
 Taiwanese Imports Before the recent string of deals, Chinese buyers had made just two semiconductor acquisitions that topped $500 million, according to data compiled by Bloomberg going back to 1994.
 “The hospital capital spending environment has been challenging,” Mike Matson, an analyst with Needham who’s kept a buy rating on the stock since he started covering it in June, said by phone Dec.
 Six out of seven recommend buying the shares, which will rally 56 percent in the next 12 months to $1875, according to the average of estimates compiled by Bloomberg.
 Mazor’s sales are still too unpredictable to recommend buying the shares, according to Gregory Chodaczek, an analyst with Sterne Agee & Leach Inc.
 Halliburton Co, the second-biggest oilfield services provider, agreed to buy No.
 Buyers’ Market The downturn has “absolutely” created a buyers’ market, Eriksen said.
 Investors can buy debts fractionally in increments of $25 - - the favored method for people seeking to diversify holdings across a swath of borrowers.
 A growing number, including at least one investment fund run by New York-based BlackRock, are choosing a more passive strategy, buying loans that meet preset criteria.
 Failing to sort borrowers correctly could lead buyers “to rescind their affected investments or decide not to invest,” the firm wrote.
 Worst Case Don Davis, president of Prime Meridian Capital Management, started a fund in April 2012 that buys loans using an algorithm.
 Soon after it buys a loan, employees seek to validate information borrowers provided, asking questions like: “If the person’s a janitor, do we think they’re actually making $200,000?” So far, that’s been enough.
 That prompted tourists from other countries to buy iPhones in Moscow.
 Japan Post plans to use funds raised through the sales of the banking and insurance arms to buy a portion of its own shares held by the government to boost its corporate and stock value, according to the statement.
(Bloomberg) -- If consumers can be persuaded to buy new sweaters, jackets, and pants every month, can’t they be persuaded to do the same with bedroom linens and bath towels? Spanish retailer Inditex SA -- which operates more than 2,050 Zara stores in 88 countries, and is the world’s largest retailer -- is extending a fast-fashion sensibility to home goods.
 The home accessories emporiums, located in city centers and on main shopping streets, cater to urban dwellers and workers who can pop in, browse the merchandise, and buy something on a lunch break.
 The deal, struck before the credit crisis unfolded, was part of a buyout boom fueled by cheap debt that spawned super-sized takeovers.
 Several of those buyout targets struggled to repay their borrowings, including Energy Future Holdings Corp, which went bankrupt in April.
 TSB could look to buy smaller banks as a way to increase its reach because it has excess capital, said Ian Gordon, an analyst at Investec in London.
 “That’s on the basis it’s easier to buy something small than it is to buy something big” Fiona Cornes, a spokeswoman for Shawbrook Bank, said the bank is “focusing on our controlled yet prudent growth,” declining to comment specifically on possible deals.
 No Reason “I can see no news that would give any reason to buy oil at the moment,” Christopher Bellew, senior broker at Jefferies International Ltd.
 17 low, buoyed by the BOJ’s easing and the $11 trillion pension fund’s decision to buy more local shares.
 The extra yield, or spread, investors demand to buy Venezuelan debt fell 424 percentage points yesterday, according to JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 15 that Venezuela’s bonds are still a buy, since the country has the ability to keep making debt payments.
 The company has also been aggressive in putting its capital to use, including raising the dividend and buying Sumitomo Electric Industries Ltd’s 25 percent stake in a joint venture for $865 million.
(Bloomberg) -- Manulife Financial Corp, Canada’s largest life insurer, agreed to buy New York Life Insurance Co’s retirement plan services business in a deal that will boost assets under administration by about $50 billion.
 In September, he struck a deal to buy Standard Life Plc’s Canadian business for about C$4 billion ($34 billion).
 Ten-year yields advanced from their lowest close in 18 months as policy makers consider whether to retain a pledge to keep rates low for a “considerable time” after they ended monthly bond-buying in October.
 Treasuries fell to a 20-month low in October, as yuan appreciation of 04 percent against the dollar indicated less of an impetus to buy the government securities.
 There have been more purchases of Shanghai stocks by global investors, or northbound flows, than by mainland investors buying Hong Kong shares.
 The turnaround is testament to a market in which volatilityis fueled by fluctuations in oil prices and attempts by banksand brokerages to offload stocks to pay back some borrowed moneythat was used to buy them, according to Abu Dhabi-based Nabil Rantisi, managing director of Mena Corp.
 “This rebound could very well be the bestbuying opportunity we will see for the next few years” The emirates 14-day relative strength indicator climbed to468 today.
 agreed to buy Charter Brokerage from Arsenal Capital Partners as Chairman Warren Buffett extends bets in energy as oil prices tumble.
 1 that it agreed to buy two units from Weatherford International Plc for at least $750 million after the seller was squeezed by lower oil prices.
 “Another reason is that they give diversification for Nordic customers” The cost to buy protection on Tesco’s bonds has more than doubled this year, soaring 1107 basis points to 184 basis points on Dec.
 who has a buy rating on the stock.
(Bloomberg) -- Wealthy Russian homebuyers are vanishing from London after driving a wave of foreign investment that lifted property prices to records.
 The number of Russians registered through Christie’s International Real Estate to buy homes in the city dropped by 70 percent in a year, said Giles Hannah, the broker’s senior vice president.
 A drop in Russian buyers is hitting a London luxury-property market already buffeted by economic uncertainty in the UK.
 Buyers ‘Eliminated’ Russian buyers have been “eliminated virtually overnight,” Andrew Langton, chairman of luxury-property broker Aylesford International Estate Agents, said by phone.
 “Those that are still here have money out of Russia and won’t be taking it back in a hurry” Russians were the biggest buyers of London’s luxury homes between January and July 2013, according to Knight Frank LLP.
 Money Worries “You’ll also see a reduction in those trying to buy yachts and smaller items because they’re nervous about their money,” Hannah said.
 Changes to the UK’s stamp-duty sales tax mean buyers of a 5-million-pound home would pay a levy of 513,750 pounds, an increase of almost 164,000 pounds, according to government data.
 “The heyday of the Russian buyer was probably two years ago and it’s been declining ever since, although there was a bit of buying as a result of the Ukraine crisis,” said Robert Bartlett, chief executive officer of broker Chestertons.
 The Denver-based firm hired Gross from Pacific Investment Management Co, manager of the world’s biggest bond fund, and recently agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products, the fastest-growing part of the fund industry.
 “The pound still seems to be something which in fundamental terms could be a buy,” said Stuart Bennett, head of Group of 10 currency strategy at Banco Santander SA in London.
 ECB officials announce their latest monetary policy decision the same day, with President Mario Draghi having said last month that buying euro-area sovereign debt, or quantitative easing, could be a policy tool.
 Deutsche Bank AG cut its recommendation to hold from buy on Dec.
 “Right now, if you buy a property in Turkey, if you hold on to it for five years and if you sell it with 10,000 times profit, you don’t pay any tax -- zero tax,” Simsek said.
 Under the new plan, “even if you hold it for a year, or a thousand years, you’ll still get taxed on capital gains” Turkey currently applies capital gains taxes only to so-called “flippers,” people or companies who buy a property and sell it within five years.
 The clients are getting a chance to buy a six-year bond in Uber that will convert into equity at a 20 percent to 30 percent discount to the company’s valuation at the time of an initial public offering, said people with knowledge of the matter, who asked not to be identified because the details are private.
 UBS cut electronic-payment processor Qiwi Plc to the equivalent of hold from buy and lowered its price target by 41 percent a month after the company said its 2014 profit could surge as much as 70 percent.
 She also cut Mailru Group Ltd, which operates the country’s most popular social network, to hold from buy.
 The bank cut OAO Lenta Ltd, Russia’s third-biggest retailer by market value, X5 Retail Group NV, which is 22 percent owned by the billionaire Mikhail Fridman, Dixy Group and O’Key Group SA to hold from buy.
 sank 5 percent after the drugmaker agreed to buy California-based Avanir Pharmaceuticals Inc.
 projects have caught up to Canadian rivals that received export approvals to start lining up buyers earlier and are now passing them by.
 Asian utilities will probably buy Canadian LNG even with its higher cost to diversify supplies, he said.
 Investors typically start buying contracts when the reading is below 30.
 buyers by 30 cents and marked up shipments to Europe by 10 cents, the list obtained by Bloomberg News showed.
 Atlas Mara agreed to buy Gaborone, Botswana-based BancABC, for as much as $265 million in April in the company’s first African acquisition.
 The investment firm is buying African financial-services companies to benefit from the continent’s growth.
(Bloomberg) -- Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc’s main lending arm agreed to buy Citigroup Inc’s Japanese consumer-banking business to expand services for wealthy individuals in the country.
 Japan’s currency gained versus all but three of its 31 major peers as the Bank of Japan said it will increase the length of maturity of government bonds it buys.
 “More than continued improvement in the US, it’s a case of Europe and other regions stumbling” The yen gained after the BOJ said in a statement it will buy at least 125 trillion yen of debt due in more than 10 years per month, up from a minimum target of 650 billion yen.
 “That at least is what the Saudis are counting on, and to us it appears a reasonable bet” Hall’s strategy in the past has often been to buy so-called long-dated oil contracts for delivery years into the future.
 In 1981, the firm was large enough to buy the investment bank Salomon Brothers.
 analysts led by William Katz raised their rating on the stock to buy from neutral, the equivalent of hold.
 After the accounting disclosure, RCS canceled a deal it had with ARCP to buy its Cole Capital business, which also sponsors nontraded REITs.
 KKR’s Cognita Schools last month bought part of a Rio de Janeiro school, two years after buying an institution in Sao Paulo, where the most expensive schools charge more than $27,700 a year.
 “The quality of Brazil’s public schools is terrible, so that’s the top priority for families making a little more money,” said Marco Gregori, a former for-profit college executive who’s seeking $23 million for a fund called Eduinvest to buy private elementary and high schools.
 The school, which charges annual tuition of $43,400 at its New York campus, is backed by $75 million in financing from its founders and two buyout firms, LLR Partners Inc.
 Gregori owns two schools and wants to buy eight more before taking the company public.
 and New Zealand’s sovereign wealth fund will buy retirement village operator RetireAustralia Ltd.
 Activist investors will increasingly buy stakes in German companies and pressure management for strategic changes, Albersmeier said.
 3M also raised the low end of the range for its share buyback, a program spanning the years from 2013 to 2017, to $20 billion from $17 billion.
 3M has been aggressive in its capital deployment, including buying Sumitomo Electric Industries Ltd’s 25 percent stake in a joint venture for $865 million.
 3M has stepped up spending for a growth plan outlined in December 2013, which included raising the dividend 35 percent and expanding its stock buyback plan to as much as $22 billion through 2017.
 The CHART OF THE DAY is based on the New York-based strategist’s suggested trades: buying the shares of regional banks and selling borrowed shares of investment banks at the same time.
 Another trade idea would be to buy shares of retailers and similar companies that target lower-income consumers, Hartnett wrote.
 agreed to pay $189 billion to buy 45 planes from companies including General Electric Co’s aviation services unit to enter the aircraft leasing business.
 The Macau Monetary Authority ordered jewelry stores and pawnshops operating on casino floors to remove their UnionPay card terminals, making it harder for bettors to buy expensive items that they exchange for cash to gamble with.
 Potential Buyers Dollar General, which operates 11,700 locations, is talking to potential buyers of the stores it would need to sell if it acquires Family Dollar, a person familiar with the situation said.
 This month, Line agreed to buy Microsoft Corp’s MixRadio streaming service for an undisclosed amount as it seeks to speed user growth.
 His company, known for buying out old apartment buildings with multiple owners for redevelopment, declined to comment on individual projects.
 In one example, about a dozen developers showed interest in buying development space from the Wadsworth Avenue Baptist Church in northern Manhattan.
 The buyback replaces a $10 billion program put in place last year, which had $48 billion left unspent.
 Bank of America lowered its recommendation on the stock to neutral from buy, citing a “challenging” year ahead for Russian banks.
 The company said it would buy Supan SA, Ecuador’s largest bread maker, on July 15.
 Six analysts recommend buying the stock, 10 recommend holding it and three have a sell rating, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Ochoa at Interacciones raised his recommendation to buy from hold on Sept.
 The outcome showed “that pensions are likely to enjoy better treatment than debt in California Chapter 9 cases” Rafael Costas, co-director of Franklin Templeton Fixed Income Group’s muni department, said in a blog post in June that the company will no longer buy California certificates of participation.
 Delia’s Inc, a clothing chain that caters to teenage girls, filed for Chapel 11 bankruptcy protection and will cut 51 jobs at its corporate headquarters after failing to find a buyer.
 Buying Growth Deutsche Annington has grown by buying rival companies and property portfolios.
 Trading on a country’s benchmark index tends to boost a company’s liquidity because fund managers who invest in a variety of industries tend to only buy shares in a the largest companies.
 The buyer also said it expects to save about 84 million in costs over the next two years.
 Buying Spree Companies are set to buy about 15 billion euros of German apartments in 2014, including Deutsche Annington’s 39 billion-euro acquisition of Gagfah, almost matching the 2013 record of 158 billion euros, according to data compiled by Jones Lang LaSalle Inc.
 The start of a new plant in Papua New Guinea increased global supplies as slowing demand in Asia, the world’s biggest buying region, made prices more volatile.
 Glencore in Baar, Switzerland, also began buying and selling the fuel in 2013 as Noble, Asia’s biggest commodity trader by sales, restarted trading from London this year to benefit from rising supplies.
 Supplying LNG to buyers that typically haven’t been able to sign long-term contracts presents an opportunity for traders, Hallouche said.
 “The new opportunities will come from buyers who are more price sensitive than before, buyers who have been unable to buy LNG in the past on a long-term basis,” he said.
 plans to buy back as much as $10 billion of stock and pay out more cash to shareholders as the biggest US.
 The share buyback will occur over a multiyear period, the Woonsocket, Rhode Island-based company said in a statement today before a briefing for analysts and investors.
 He rates it at a buy with a $14 price outlook.
 Chazen, who now plans to exit after the 2016 annual meeting, has sought buyers for assets in North America, the Middle East and North Africa as he seeks to focus on fewer areas of profitable growth.
 Algeria supplied 47 billion cubic meters to overseas buyers in 2013, according to Sonatrach.
 “They are just like, ’Why am I buying Spanish credit, when I’ve got this nice triple-A over here?’” Keeble said, referring to Treasuries.
 The Huffington Post has sold the entire first year of advertising space for the Indian edition to GroupM, a media buying agency, Huffington said.
 One positive aspect is that the recent turmoil in financial markets has pushed down interest rates, which combined with a strengthening job market, means homebuying will be within reach for more Americans next year.
 The housing recovery has progressed in fits and starts this year, with historically low mortgage rates and the strongest job gains since 1999 slowly luring buyers into the market.
 13, Fannie Mae is allowing lower down payments for first-time buyers and permitting borrowers who are refinancing to reduce equity to 3 percent to cover closing costs.
 “Ultimately, demographics are in our favor, and consumers should buy homes at an increased rate in the future.
 Fueled by cheap debt, buyers like Actavis Plc and Merck & Co.
 The selling companies, which use the revenues of established products to fund research and development, may assign more value to them than buyers such as private-equity firms, said Emmanuel Papadakis, an analyst at MainFirst Bank AG in London.
 “Private-equity firms and trade buyers are still very interested in these assets” said Nigel Jones, a partner at Linklaters in London who specializes in health care.
 Potential buyers found it difficult to value the portfolio given the diversity of treatments being offered, said a person with knowledge of the sale, asking not to be named as the process is private.
 If the planned sales are to succeed, buyers and sellers alike may need to reassess their strategies.
(Bloomberg) -- Royal Philips NV agreed to buy Volcano Corp.
 Hearst, which owns 15 daily and 34 weekly newspapers as well as 29 television stations, is increasing its interest to 80 percent after buying its first stake in the company in March 2006, the closely held company said today in a statement.
 VAB increased lending to account for depreciation on foreign-currency loans and couldn’t pay the coupon on its dollar bonds because of central bank restrictions on buying foreign currency, Bakhmatyuk said.
 OAO Rosneft rallied 25 percent after it repaid $7 billion in debt and said it’s generating enough dollars to meet the obligations taken on to buy TNK-BP last year and become the world’s largest traded oil producer.
 Spanish energy company Repsol said today it agreed to buy Calgary-based Talisman for $8 a share, valuing Icahn’s stake at $6085 million.
 Boosting Reserves Repsol, Spain’s largest energy company, said today it agreed to buy Talisman, ending a months-long search for acquisitions to help boost crude reserves and production.
 Other Suitors Talisman had discussions with several other potential buyers in the past six months and troubles with its North Sea operations were a hindrance in each case, Kvisle said.
 “I think he hopes it buys a lot of trust,” said Bob Mann, head of aviation consultant RW.
 This will end up buying a lot in a working relationship” The carrier, which expects to report record profits this year, earlier said it wants attendant pay to be similar to that at rivals Delta Air Lines Inc.
 Cleveland-based Cliffs this month canceled an offer to buy back some of its bonds and delayed a refinancing plan, citing difficult market conditions.
 The firm buys securities that mostly aren’t followed by Wall Street analysts.
 Bond buyers are now demanding significantly higher premiums across the globe to own debt of the most oil-dependent borrowers.
 “A network outage won’t prevent people from buying the PS4.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer agreed in June to buy most of the assets for 124 billion euros ($152 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever, and the purchase should close next year.
 Following the strategy told investors when to buy or sell nine ETFs, the SEC said.
 Indonesia’s rupiah extended its longest rising streak in 10 months on speculation some investors are buying local-currency debt to take advantage of recent declines.
(Bloomberg) -- CRH Plc, an Irish building-materials company, agreed to sell clay and concrete businesses to Boston-based buyout firm Bain Capital LLC for 414 million pounds ($651 million).
 The Dublin-based company has previously signaled it may consider buying some cement assets being sold by Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd, which are trying to complete a $40 billion merger.
 sued a company it accuses of using its name to scam customers into buying hundreds of dollars in support services to fix nonexistent bugs, then stealing personal information or installing malicious software.
 James Hambrick, chief executive officer of Berkshire’s Lubrizol unit, said yesterday that he was buying two businesses from Weatherford International Plc for as much as $825 million and would combine them with existing operations to form an oilfield-services segment.
 “We are buyers at every dip,” Daljeet Kohli, head of research at IndiaNivesh Securities Pvt, told Bloomberg TV India.
 exchange-traded funds that buy emerging-market stocks and bonds last week, the biggest outflow since January, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 The ECB could require central banks in countries such as Greece or Portugal to set aside extra money or provisions to cover potential losses from any bond-buying, reflecting the riskiness of their debt, Reuters reported today, citing unidentified officials.
 The company is going to be “aggressive with share repurchase,” buying back as much as $3 billion of stock, Hayes said.
 While there are limitations on its use of overseas cash, United Technologies could take on debt to facilitate a buyback, Joseph Nadol, a JPMorgan Chase & Co.
 The new CEO “articulated a desire to clearly examine the assumptions of the company’s operating units,” Howard Rubel, an analyst at Jefferies LLC who recommends buying the shares, said in a note today.
 CME said in July it would buy GFI for $580 million to expand its reach into European energy trading.
 A token payment by SpiceJet toward past fuel dues has helped buy time even as oil companies demand more.
 The focus has returned to the carrier’s more than two-year search for fresh investment after two people familiar with the matter said Ajay Singh, a former majority shareholder of SpiceJet, is considering buying a stake in the company.
 He spent 74 billion rupees buying a stake from Wilbur Ross in 2010 at 4725 rupees per share and has invested a further 56 billion rupees, SpiceJet has said.
 2 (Bloomberg) -- Aviva Plc, Britain’s second-largest insurer by market value, agreed to buy Friends Life Group Ltd.
 “The acquisition validates our buy on Aviva confirming its cash and growth premise,” Mark Cathcart, an analyst at Jefferies International Ltd.
 Cowdery Pay Friends Life, led by Andy Briggs, had been hurt after the British government scrapped rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity, threatening a key source of domestic profit growth.
 The company has three buy ratings, nine holds and one sell recommendation, according to Bloomberg data.
 Resolution, which was designed to buy up ailing insurers, later scrapped that strategy and renamed itself after Friends Provident, one of its operating businesses.
 Baratta, whose group manages leveraged buyout and energy funds, said Blackstone’s risk to falling prices is minimal.
 Its largest buyout this year was the $54 billion takeover of industrial-products maker Gates Global Inc.
 “Half the deals we’ve done this year have been this buy-and-build model” Blackstone, led by billionaire Steve Schwarzman, is the largest manager of alternative assets, overseeing $284 billion in private equity holdings, real estate, credit assets and hedge funds.
 “Discretionary traders did not see value in buying and holding sovereign bonds in the US, UK.
 customers are rich enough to keep buying luxury cars whatever the cost of a tank of gasoline.
 “People who are buying Tesla today don’t really care if gas is cheap or expensive.
 They want it because it’s a status symbol or for the performance or they are very eco-conscious and just don’t want to consume fossil fuels, regardless of what they pay for the fossil fuels” The seven-day selloff should be seen as an opportunity to buy the stock at a discount, said Ben Kallo, an analyst with Robert W.
 “With the low oil prices, people will think ‘I can buy a normal car, it’s more beneficial that way,’” Ole Hui, a Hong Kong-based analyst at Mizuho Securities Asia Ltd, said by phone.
 The company said it expects next year to sell 50,000 of the Model S, named last week as top luxury car in satisfaction in the Consumer Reports annual buyers survey.
 “We think the weakness provides a buying opportunity,” Kallo said in the note.
 “That could create a problem for Tesla once it gets out of the vehicle segments that cater to the very wealthy and get down to the people who might normally buy a compact sedan like a Honda Civic.
 Kallo said buyers of electric vehicles are attracted by the ability to ignore the ups and downs of gas prices.
 agreed to buy the Aliso Viejo, California-based drugmaker for about $354 billion to gain treatments for neurological conditions.
(Bloomberg) -- The back-up bidder for Revel AC Inc, now having the right to buy the shuttered Atlantic City, New Jersey, casino, wants the bankruptcy judge to cut the $954 million purchase price by $84 million in view of alleged improprieties in the auction process.
 Revel decided to proceed with a sale to Polo North after Brookfield Property Partners LP terminated a contract to buy the property for $110 million.
 When the bankruptcy court in Camden, New Jersey, approved the sale to Brookfield, the judge anointed Straub as the backup bidder to buy the project at his last offer of $945 million if the higher sale fell through, which it did.
 Sears Methodist Goes to Auction on Four Facilities in January Sears Methodist Retirement System Inc, a nonprofit operator of senior living facilities in Texas, received approval of bid procedures governing the sale of four facilities where buyers are under contract.
(Bloomberg) -- Volvo Car Group is shifting its focus from auto shows, where carmakers vie for influential eyeballs in an atmosphere of glamor and glitz, to market more directly to buyers instead.
 Avoiding Hassle “We know from research that more and more of our customers are ready to buy online,” Visser says.
 “The reason why they are willing to buy is not to get a cheaper price, but to avoid the hassle around negotiating the deal” Chinese billionaire Li Shufu’s Zhejiang Geely Holding Group Co.
 will no longer trade publicly after merging with closely held Sabine Oil & Gas LLC because it views the transaction as a “back door listing” The new company isn’t suitable for the exchange because it was created by an unlisted entity buying a publicly traded venture, NYSE said in a statement on its website today.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Global regulators set tougher capital rules on asset-backed debt, even as the European Central Bank is buying the securities in an attempt to revive the region’s market.
 When buyers asked stores to change prices, they had 24 hours to comply -- often scrambling to swap out labels on 1,000 or more products, according to one former operations executive for Wal-Mart China.
 At around 8 pm, when sales were slow, store-level managers responsible for various product categories would call wholesalers and “ask them to come down and buy” items in bulk, said Huang, a union representative who has been involved in legal efforts to get more severance for the laid-off Changde workers.
 Dove Chocolate More recently, company purchasing managers would ask their product buyers each month whether they’d arranged enough bulk sales, one regional buyer said.
 The buyers would sell large quantities of products such as Dove chocolates, chewing gum and toilet paper to smaller wholesalers and mom-and-pop stores, the Wal-Mart buyer said.
 ’’It certainly would create a distortion of the income statement’’ Orders Rise To make up for the losses and low-margins earned on bulk sales, Wal-Mart product buyers looked to suppliers for help in the form of fees including cash rebates, according to Lin’s review and three former and current employees.
 Jefferies struck a deal in 2011 to buy Bache’s Global Commodities Group from life insurer Prudential Financial Inc.
 “Foreigners are buying high beta instruments like index options and futures,” Manoj Vayalar, assistant vice president of derivatives at Religare Securities Ltd, said in a phone interview, referring to securities that are more volatile than the broader market.
 He’s one of only five people who know the recipe for the marzipan that shoppers buy this time of year in high-end stores around the world.
 She’s only interested in stock charts: if the pattern looks right, she buys.
 The money manager at Manulife Asset Management, who helps oversee about $269 billion and plans to invest in mainland shares through the bourse link that started last month, says he has a team of analysts that interviews company managers, analyzes supply chains and models earnings prospects before deciding to buy a stock.
 International investors have used about 28 percent of the daily quotas of net buy orders allowed through the program, according to data compiled by Bloomberg.
 Bonds have surged this year after the ECB introduced negative deposit rates, started buying asset-backed securities and covered bonds and offered longer-term loans to banks to boost price growth.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- NextEra Energy Inc, North America’s largest generator of wind and solar power, agreed to buy the Hawaiian electricity company that has been losing customers to renewable sources for $263 billion in cash and stock.
 Under the proposed transaction, Hanwha SolaOne will issue 7402 million American depositary shares to buy Q Cells.
 The buyer, known for spunky spokeswoman Flo, is seeking to compete with rivals that sell auto and home policies together.
 Among stocks moving on corporate news, CGG SA sank 29 percent after Technip SA said it walked away from a bid to buy the French seismic surveyor.
 “That is an unregulated product you can buy at Home Depot that leaves the old business model with no place to hide” JB.
 Still, the Edison Electric Institute, a trade group representing America’s investor-owned utilities, recently announced that its members will help to encourage electric vehicle use by spending $50 million annually to buy plug-in service trucks and invest in car-charging technology.
 is offering its solar and storage systems to buyers of electric cars from Audi AG and rebates for solar-panels to Ford Motor Co.
 The Chinese companies aren’t the only ones in the industry seeking economies of scale: Earlier this year Siemens, Europe’s largest engineering company, unsuccessfully tried to combine its train operations with Alstom’s transport business as part of an asset swap to buy the French company’s energy assets.
 Investors are willingto pay as much as 100 percent of the value of a buyout fund, upfrom a low of 40 percent in the first half of 2009, according toCogent Partners, a Dallas-based investment bank that advises onthe sale of private-equity stakes.
 A total of 18 cornerstone investors agreed to buy about $133 billion of stock, according to CGN Power’s prospectus.
 “We’ve collected input from the investing community ranging from the buyside, issuers, market-makers and sellside and believe it is prudent to use these insights to build consensus to help solve some of the complex issues facing our industry” A year ago, Intercontinental Exchange bought the NYSE’s parent company, and Sprecher has ever since promoted ending the status quo in the $23 trillion US.
 “With foreign investors buying that amount of bond futures, it’s hard to take a sell position on bonds,” said Yum Sang Hoon, a Seoul-based bond broker at Bookook Securities Co.
 annuity seller this year, has been divesting pieces of the radio and television operation it acquired by buying rival Jefferson-Pilot Corp.
 After buying Lincoln Financial Media, Entercom will have more than 130 stations in 26 markets, the company said.
 and Air Canada to buy from underperform, saying airline shares don’t fully reflect oil prices remaining low longer.
 were changed to buy from neutral.
 The analyst reduced Delta to neutral from buy, and Alaska Air Group Inc.
 to underperform from buy, while raising his stock target price for each of those carriers.
 Money-market rates dropped after cash locked up to buy new shares returned to the banking system.
 “With IPO-related funds returning to the market and the fiscal funds transfer, liquidity risk in the next couple days is small” Brokerages have led Chinese stocks to a world-beating rally over the past month amid speculation a surge in trading and increased use of leverage to buy stocks will boost earnings.
 said Nelson Peltz’s Trian Fund Management got approval to buy as much as 13 percent of the firm’s outstanding shares after the activist investor stepped down from the board.
 Trian, which owns 113 percent of the Baltimore-based firm’s shares, asked the board to extend regulatory waivers so it could buy more, calling the stock “undervalued,” according to a filing today with the US.
 Stimulus Effect The Fed’s three rounds of bond buying were a gift to small companies in the capital-intensive energy industry that needed cheap borrowing costs to thrive, according to Chris Lafakis, a senior economist at Moody’s Analytics in West Chester, Pennsylvania.
 “It seems that the struggles in the supply chain have also affected sales, so people have been going to Bang & Olufsen stores and not been able to buy what they came for because it wasn’t on the shelf” The board and management are starting “a review to identify strategic and structural options to increase scale and further reduce complexity,” Bang & Olufsen said.
 A negative yield means investors buying the securities will get less back than they paid when the debt matures.
 Aluminum prices have risen about 10 percent this year with European premiums that buyers pay for faster delivery almost doubling as the market outside China turned to deficit for the first time since 2008.
 Rogers in September joined the board of OAO Phosagro, a phosphate fertilizer-maker that has gained 83 percent this year, after buying some of the company’s shares.
 “China is fast emerging with mega deals such as Alibaba and it seems some investors even sold their bonds to buy the mega issues.
 Gulf Coast, would need to sell for several dollars less than Brent, the global marker, to attract foreign buyers to charter ships and send it abroad, York said.
 Concern that anti-austerity party Syriza will win snap elections next month roiled stocks in Athens, as such an outcome risks the European Union’s common currency and the start of the European Central Bank’s bond-buying plan.
 Some of Japan’s biggest construction companies buy plywood from Borneo, where rainforest is being logged inside a national park and on land set aside for native tribes, the UK-based group said in a report today.
 A deal would extend Mercuria’s rapid growth that has seen the Cyprus-based firm with major trading operations in Geneva buy JPMorgan Chase & Co’s physical commodity unit for $800 million.
 Several investors expressed interest in buying all or part of OW Bunker, Danish newspaper Borsen reported Nov.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Evotec AG rose the most in almost 2 1/2 years after the German drug-development company entered talks to buy French pharmaceutical maker Sanofi’s research operations in Toulouse.
 “From the intelligence we get from our customers that are buying the crude, I don’t think the bottom is going to drop out” of the business, Chief Operating Officer Keith Creel said yesterday in an interview in Toronto.
 Oi, which agreed to sell its Portuguese assets to Altice SA last week, wants to buy Tim through a financial vehicle and keep 25 percent of the company, with the rest being split between Telefonica SA and America Movil SAB, people familiar with the matter said last week.
 Rival BT Group Plc’s talks to buy one of Britain’s two biggest wireless carriers only adds to his urgency.
 The acquisition would be the second multibillion-dollar deal this year for Drahi, after the Franco-Israeli businessman also agreed to buy French wireless carrier SFR for about $23 billion.
 Throughout the 1990s, Drahi bought and sold cable companies, deals that eventually led to the creation of Numericable, alongside buyout firm Cinven Group Ltd.
 Creditor Positions Many bond buyers also own credit derivatives as protection against losses or as a way to double down on a company’s creditworthiness.
 The contracts pay the buyer face value if a borrower fails to meet its obligations, less the value of the defaulted debt.
 “We will probably buy Hindalco shares at current levels” Special Court Judge Bharat Parashar also asked the Central Bureau of Investigation, or CBI, the nation’s top investigating agency, to record the statement of former Indian Prime Minister Manmohan Singh, who was then coal minister.
 The buyer said today that it will integrate the operation, which caters to wealthy individuals, into Ace Private Risk Services.
 1991: Allianz, based in Munich, buys Fireman’s Fund for more than $3 billion in cash to expand in the US.
 BT sees the advantage of buying 02 from Madrid-based Telefonica because a single, eager seller makes it an easier deal to negotiate, other people familiar with the matter said.
 Activist investors often apply pressure for a sale, restructuring or increased dividends and share buybacks.
 JPMorgan Asset Management is buying into the 105-megawatt Palouse wind farm in Washington and the 150-megawatt Route 66 project in Texas, Boston-based First Wind said today in a statement.
 We’re not buying at the lowest level but it’s still a bargain” All 19 industry groups in the Stoxx 600 rose today, with banks rallying 29 percent, led by Banco Santander SA and BNP Paribas SA.
 Swisscom AG fell 79 percent after French billionaire Xavier Niel’s private holding company agreed to buy Orange Switzerland.
 China buys 35 percent of Australia’s outbound shipments, with iron ore the leading export and coal second.
 There’s no “specific route that a board must follow when fulfilling its fiduciary duties, and an independent board is entitled to use its business judgment to decide to enter into a strategic transaction that promises great benefit, even when it creates certain risks” The court overturned a lower court ruling that temporarily blocked the shareholder vote and required C&J to look for other buyers despite the “no-shop” clause contained in its agreement with Nabors.
 Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz said in a memorandum that the ruling showed, first, “that a board of directors has wide latitude to craft a sales process, including to choose a single-bidder strategy; and, second, that the Delaware courts, even if they find that a board erred in decision-making, cannot rewrite the merger contract in a way that reduces the buyer’s rights” Jeroen Van Kwawegen, an attorney for the pension fund challenging the deal, said he’ll press ahead with his suit.
 lawmakers debate whether to free up more than the tiny amount of oil output currently eligible for export, buyers from Asia are moving in.
 They are now limited to buying a product called condensate, an ultra-light oil that accounts for about 8 percent of US.
 shale formations, federal policy makers are facing increasing pressure to ease the restriction and Asian buyers are circling.
 “They’re facing greater headwinds from the economy and markets than they had hoped for when making their plans back in 2012,” Michael Seufert, an analyst with Norddeutsche Landesbank who recommends investors buy the shares, said by phone from Hanover, Germany.
 Al Thani, who is now the company’s biggest investor, anchored that share sale by buying an initial 175 billion euros of stock in May.
 The rights offer was Deutsche Bank’s largest since raising about 10 billion euros in 2010 to buy Deutsche Postbank AG.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- India’s antitrust regulator cleared Sun Pharmaceutical Industries Ltd’s $53 billion proposal to buy Ranbaxy Laboratories Ltd.
 “That really didn’t work out like they wanted it,” saidUlle Woerner, an analyst at Landesbank Baden-Wuerttemberg, whorates the stock buy.
(Bloomberg) -- Kennedy Wilson Europe Real Estate Plc agreed to buy 180 UK.
 Arqaam Capital started coverage of Dubai Parks & Resorts with a “buy” rating and a 149-dirham price estimate, analysts Mohammad Kamal and Mohamad Haidar wrote in a note to report yesterday.
 According to court papers, military members typically buy these patches to wear on other garments, in an unofficial context, “to express a sense of personal identity” In its complaint, Mil-Spec said Santa Monica, California-based Activision’s use of the “angry monkey” patch in the game constitutes trademark infringement.
 will announce an agreement to buy Citigroup Inc’s Japanese consumer-banking business as soon as next week, people with knowledge of the matter said.
 firm earlier gave Sumitomo Mitsui the right of first refusal to buy the business.
 The Beijing-based company is interested in buying control of Lions Gate, the $47 billion studio behind “The Hunger Games” films, although its owners have only been willing to sell a minority stake, Wang said in an interview.
 It is also in advanced talks to buy a Chinese Internet finance company, he said without naming the target.
 A decline in oil prices since June has hurt energy holdings of private equity firms, while also presenting an investment opportunity to buy at cheap prices.
 But at these prices, there are some pockets of value in specific companies” Atos advanced 62 percent after agreeing to buy Xerox Corp’s information-technology outsourcing business for $105 billion, almost tripling the French computer-services provider’s business in the US.
 agreed to buy the Crown Building on Manhattan’s Fifth Avenue in partnership with New York landlord Jeffrey Sutton to build its presence in the world’s most-expensive retail district, two people with knowledge of the negotiations said.
 Today’s offer will fuel the debate among policy makers over whether current stimulus is enough, or if they need to start buying assets such as government bonds.
 Draghi said last week that the ECB is “getting more control” by buying assets directly.
 Steinhoff sold 182 billion rand of stock in August and three months later South Africa’s biggest furniture company agreed to buy Pepkor Holdings (Pty) Ltd.
 is buying the 63-store Beares brand, for 90 million rand ($78 million), while Coricraft Group Pty Ltd.
 Instead, AT&T has committed more than $50 billion to buying Mexican wireless carrier Grupo Iusacell SA and DirecTV, which has a stake in satellite-TV service Sky Mexico.
 AT&T may be Slim’s best hope for a buyer as the Dallas-based company is trying to bundle wireless, TV and broadband services south of the US.
 The catch is that the Iusacell business AT&T is buying benefits as long as America Movil faces penalties.
 “AT&T is in no rush to buy America Movil’s assets in the short term,” Gregorio Tomassi, an analyst at Banco Itau BBA, said in a phone interview from Mexico City.
 7 reduces the appetite of other foreign buyers to enter the market and improves AT&T’s negotiating power with America Movil, Tomassi said.
 announced plans to buy Time Warner Cable Inc.
 It then agreed to buy Iusacell, Mexico’s third-largest wireless carrier, for an equity value of $18 billion.
 Balance Sheet AT&T has the means to buy America Movil’s assets and extend its reach further in Mexico.
 “I don’t think there are a lot of players that are in a position to buy the America Movil assets, so I don’t think AT&T has much competition,” Novosel said in a phone interview.
 The brokerage also upgraded China Galaxy to buy.
 Alstom will also buy GE’s rail-signalling unit for $800 million.
 The French company, which will focus on train operations, has said it plans to use as much as 4 billion euros to buy back shares, and another 1 billion euros to 2 billion euros to reimburse bonds early following the GE deal.
 Alstom’s net debt will be close to zero after the share buyback, Kron said today.
 “When some small things change, the upside in Turkey can be quite staggering” BlackRock, alongside Wells Fargo & Co, was among buyers in Turkey’s biggest initial public offering this year, snapping up almost 10 percent of available shares in insurer AvivaSA Emeklilik & Hayat AS.
 “There will be a product surplus that can be exported to any market” Potential buyers have already expressed interest in the Colombian fuels that will be able to compete “very easily” with US.
 28 that it agreed to buy 35 Airbus Group NV A320neos and is leasing another 28 of the narrow-body aircraft to complement its fleet for domestic long-haul flights.
 of using “the tactics and ethics of a hacker” with a program allowing consumers to buy music, circumvent Apple’s digital rights software and play it on iPods.
 Apple called this theory “implausible,” saying in a court filing that RealNetworks, which isn’t a party in the case, was a minor player and there’s no evidence consumers were locked into buying an iPod.
 Even worse, the script writes over the erased hard drives with a random pattern of ones and zeros, making data so difficult to recover that it is more cost-effective to buy new machines and toss the hacked ones in the trash.
 That also crimped FedEx’s yield, or the amount of revenue for each package, according to Hatfield, who rates FedEx as a strong buy.
 Of 25 analysts covering Vipshop, 20 rate it a buy and just one recommends selling.
 co-founder Bill Gross in September and agreed to buy VelocityShares LLC to expand in exchange-traded products.
 It began investing in Kabel Deutschland after Vodafone agreed to buy the company in July last year.
 Baroka Tribal Mining (Pty) Ltd, a community-owned company, made the offer and is also seeking to buy Amplats’ 225 percent indirect stake in Atlatsa Resources Ltd, its joint venture partner, Reuters reported, citing a bid document.
 hedge fund manager, agreed to buy US.
 The firm, which managed $723 billion at the end of September, said last week it will buy fund-of-hedge fund assets from Merrill Lynch Alternative Investments, after previous acquisitions of US.
 In 2004, a suggestion by Josep-Lluis Carod-Rovira, a separatist leader, that Catalans shouldn’t support a bid by Madrid to host the Olympic Games helped spark a revolt by cava drinkers in other parts of Spain who switched to buying bottles from other regions such as Extremadura or Valencia.
 said it will buy back the company’s stake in its Nook business.
 “Draghi’s going to have to start doing some bond-buying if they want to get out of the malaise they’re in,” Karyn Cavanaugh, the New York-based senior market strategist at Voya Investment Management LLC, said by phone.
 Barnes & Noble said today it will buy back Microsoft’s stake in its struggling Nook business, which posted a loss that pulled down the US.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Japan’s central bank is in such a hurry to buy exchange-traded funds that it broke a four-year habit yesterday.
 31 tripled the pace of its planned buying to 3 trillion yen a year.
 already scrapped an agreement in June to buy a stake in Leviathan, citing concerns over the regulatory atmosphere in Israel.
 AbbVie walked away from buying Shire in October, paying a $164 billion breakup fee, after changes in US.
 as it buys most of the energy business of French rival Alstom SA.
 Sumitomo Mitsui Financial Group Inc, the country’s second-largest lender by market value, rose 07 percent after agreeing to buy Citigroup Inc’s Japanese consumer-banking business.
 A unit of the lender will buy the Citigroup business to expand services for wealthy individuals in the country.
 He also got a warrant to buy common stock of 175 percent of the combined business, or about 84 million shares, at a penny a piece, according to a filing that month.
 The billionaire Berkshire chairman teamed up the buyout firm to take over ketchup maker HJ.
 “We advise buying January 8,200 puts and selling 8,000 puts” The Nifty is poised for its first decline in eight months in December after slumping oil prices and Russia’s currency crisis prompted foreigners to pull $1 billion from local equities in nine days through Dec.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Covered bonds are paying so little and are so hard to get hold of after the European Central Bank started buying them that one of the $14 trillion market’s biggest investors is reducing its holdings.
 MEAG Munich Ergo Asset Management GmbH, which manages more than 50 billion euros ($62 billion) of covered bonds, will buy assets including government debt instead, said Philipp Waldstein, a board member.
 The ECB has become “the big investor” and “is becoming our main competitor,” he said The ECB started buying the securities in October as part of measures designed to flood the euro area with liquidity and persuade banks to increase lending.
 The covered-bond purchase program is its third in six years and has prompted buyers of the notes from Union Investment Institutional GmbH and Erste Asset Management to scale back holdings.
(Bloomberg) -- The naira fell to a record low as oil held near $60 a barrel and traders rushed to buy dollars before the central bank’s final foreign-exchange auction of 2014.
 The US-owned companies buy mortgages backed by private insurance and package them into securities.
 Now that Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac are about to start buying loans with down payments as low as 3 percent, they will provide more competition for FHA, Cosgrove said.
 agreed to buy Savola Group’s packaging unit for 910 million riyals ($242 million) in a rare example of a deal between two listed companies in the country.
 buyout firm TPG Capital are nearing a deal to buy a majority stake in Saudi Arabian fast-food chain Kudu, two people familiar with the matter said in August.
 The gauge has rallied 12 percent from an October low as President Mario Draghi said the ECB may broaden its asset-buying program to include government bonds, while central banks in Japan and China boosted stimulus measures.
 More than half the economists in a Bloomberg survey expect the central bank to buy government bonds if it expands its stimulus program.
 rose 24 percent after Aviva Plc agreed to buy it for about 56 billion pounds ($88 billion) in stock.
 In exchange for floating yields as high as 5 percentage points above benchmark rates in the latest offering last month, buyers put up cash that would be used partially to cover losses if defaults rise high enough on mortgages packaged into other securities guaranteed by the companies.
 Fannie Mae spokeswoman Callie Dosberg said that the Washington-based company has found new buyers for the securities with each of its deals.
 Demand for the risk-sharing debt is also being constrained by a limited buyer pool.
 The jumbo competes with Airbus Group NV’s double-decker A380, another plane that has struggled to find buyers.
 He steered the firm into buying exceptionally large blocks of stock from a bank or pension fund and selling it in whole or pieces to other institutional investors.
 Such block trading required daring, because the firm would own the shares for a time while looking for buyers.
 Not Salomon, who summarized his attitude with three words: “We’ll buy anything” In one example cited by Time magazine in 1970, the firm’s partner in charge of block trading, Jay H.
 Within an hour, the firm had sold all the shares at a profit -- while earning $300,000 in brokerage fees from buyers and sellers.
 Puregold’s rebates on purchases and a program that offers to improve the stores of its top buyers with signage have attracted low-income shoppers and owners of so called sari-sari stores, neighborhood shops that retail fast-moving consumer goods from sodas, sardines, cigarettes, sugar to soap.
 Clearinghouses such as LCH Clearnet Group Ltd, majority owned by the London Stock Exchange Group Plc, and Deutsche Boerse AG’s Eurex Clearing operate as central counterparties for every buy and sell order associated with the platforms.
 The former CEO’s comment appears to expand on remarks he made earlier yesterday at Microsoft’s annual shareholders’ meeting, where he was overheard by a Reuters reporter telling an acquaintance that Chief Financial Officer Amy Hood’s response to an audience member’s question on share buybacks “sucked” Hood, who was promoted to the position by Ballmer last year, was answering a query about the price at which Microsoft wouldn’t buy back its own stock.
 Ballmer was CEO when Microsoft began buying back shares a decade ago, and faced demands from investors until his exit to return money from the company’s growing cash pile to shareholders.
 to step up dividends and buybacks.
(Bloomberg) -- Air China Ltd, the largest Chinese carrier, will buy a mix of 60 current 737s and the new Max model of the jet from Boeing Co.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- Hungary will buy GE Capital’s Budapest Bank, the country’s eighth-largest bank in terms of assets, in the latest move by Prime Minister Viktor Orban to boost domestic control over the financial industry.
 Corvinus Nemzetkozi Befektetesi Zrt, a unit of state-owned development bank MFB, will be the buyer, with MFB providing a loan for the transaction.
 wind farm in Iowa after buying the second phase in January.
 Now investors are left to decide whether energy companies are actually going to start defaulting, sending ripples through stock markets that have been remarkably resilient, or if the recent selloff is an overreaction that’ll create buying opportunities.
 Foreign buyers are “attracted by higher yields” in Treasuries.
 Banks have been net buyers of Treasuries and other agency debt for 14 straight months, equaling the longest streak of gains since June 2003.
(Bloomberg) -- A committee of dealers and investment firms was asked to rule whether buyers of derivatives protecting against a Caesars Entertainment Corp.
 “California has prohibited its energy companies from buying or importing coal power, and the state’s funds should match that” Biggest Divestor The measure, if passed by lawmakers and signed into law by Governor Jerry Brown, would make Calpers the largest pension to end investment in coal.
 The central bank buying has increased confidence and lowered borrowing costs for Japanese REITs, which accounted for about 27 percent of this year’s commercial transactions, according to Jones Lang LaSalle.
 The company is exploring sales and joint ventures of existing assets to help finance the acquisition, and doesn’t expect to sell any of the assets it’s buying from Blackstone, he said.
 The 21st Century Business Herald reported earlier that CNR will delist after CSR buys out its shares via a secondary offering.
 “It would heighten the need for consolidation among the western manufacturers” Europe’s biggest engineering company Siemens this year unsuccessfully tried to combine its ailing train operations with Alstom’s transport business as part of an asset swap to buy the French company’s energy assets.
 construction markets, making building materials more attractive to private equity buyers.
 Lone Star has targeted unwanted building-products businesses, buying a gypsum-wallboard maker from France’s Lafarge SA last year.
 “This is well ahead of expectations on price and close to what the chief executive officer talked about before he entered an official sale process,” London-based Berenberg analyst Robert Muir, who recommends buying HeidelbergCement shares, said by e-mail, adding that the price represents about 14 times the division’s earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization.
(Bloomberg) -- Indonesia’s rupiah tumbled to the lowest level since the Asian financial crisis as an uptick in dollar buying by local companies before the year-end coincided with a rout in the sovereign bond market.
(Bloomberg) -- A committee of bond dealers and investment firms will rule on whether buyers of derivatives protecting against a default by Caesars Entertainment Corp.
 If the ISDA committee were to rule that a credit event took place, buyers of the swaps would be paid the face amount of the contract, minus the value of the underlying debt.
 A bill that would give banks more freedom to trade collateralized loan obligations, leveraged financing that funds most corporate buyouts, wasn’t taken up by the Senate after passing the House earlier this year.
 5 (Bloomberg) -- Solar Power Inc, a renewable-energy developer backed by China’s LDK Solar Co, agreed to buy a 99-megawatt project in New Jersey for an undisclosed sum.
 The company is buying Beaver Run Solar Farm in Lafayette from Shotmeyer Solar LLC, which also agreed to lease land for the power plant, Roseville, California-based Solar Power said in a statement today.
 The state-controlled company, which buys about 60 percent of natural gas from Russia’s Gazprom OAO through a fixed-tariff contract, is competing with cheaper imports from Germany as European prices fell 21 percent this year.
 PGNiG is also under pressure from regulators to sell more fuel through an exchange rather than in bilateral deals with buyers.
 In October, PGNiG agreed to buy stakes from Total SA in three fields already producing oil and in one that’s being developed, bringing a 60 percent production increase outside Poland.
 Morgan Stanley says stop buying.
 The New York bank lowered the shares to a neutral rating from the equivalent of a buy.
 who has a buy rating on the stock.
 The ETF, whichwon’t buy shares of firms in which governments have a more than20 percent stake, launches under the ticker XSOE today.
 in Houston, who rates the shares the equivalent of a buy and owns none, said by phone.
 stocks have tripled during the 5 1/2-year bull market, driven by the Fed’s three rounds of bond buying and borrowing costs near zero to stimulate the economy.
 The casino operator is buying back an affiliate it set up last year in a deal that will help it restructure $184 billion of debt.
 Makowsky built the property, with views that sweep from downtown Los Angeles to the Pacific Ocean, without having a buyer lined up.
 is a safe area for international buyers to invest in real estate,” Forster Jones said in a telephone interview.
 Eighteen anchor investors agreed to buy about $133 billion of stock before the sale, according to CGN Power’s prospectus.
 “Russia’s political turmoil may give Strauss the ability to buy new assets at attractive prices,” Golan said.
 11 (Bloomberg) -- Kemper Corp, the insurer formerly known as Unitrin, agreed to buy Alliance United Group to add sales of auto coverage in California, the biggest US.
 The buyer plans to contribute as much as $75 million of capital to support the business after the completion of the deal, which is expected in the first half of next year.
 Gary Balter, an analyst at Credit Suisse Group AG (CSGN), said inSeptember that Staples should buy Office Depot and that the dealmay produce $14 billion in savings.
 Starboard has a record of buying stakes in companies andpushing for mergers.
 Apollo, which agreed in September to buy insurer Tranquilidade from Novo Banco, plans to submit an indication of interest for the whole bank, according to a person briefed on the matter who asked not to be identified because the plans aren’t public.
 private-equity and hedge funds that raised money in the wake of the 2008 financial crisis to buy distressed assets in Europe.
 Cue acknowledged yesterday he was dismayed to learn about a RealNetworks service that would let consumers buy songs to play on the iPod.
 Attorneys representing buyers of iPods from 2006 to 2009 claim Apple modified iTunes software so music downloaded with RealNetworks software couldn’t be played.
 The program allows overseas investors without qualified foreign institutional investors status to buy as much as 13 billion yuan of stocks listed in Shanghai each day.
 23 whether to send the film for it to arrive on time for showings on Christmas Day, the Wall Street Journal reported, citing a film buyer.
 Kuka itself has been expanding its offering with a series of deals over the past 12 months, buying a majority stake in Reis Robotics last year, taking over France’s Alema Automation in March and announcing plans yesterday to obtain the 20 percent of Swiss pharmacy automation specialist Swisslog that it doesn’t already own.
 9 (Bloomberg) -- Patrick Drahi’s cable company agreed to buy Oi SA’s Portuguese phone assets for 74 billion euros ($91 billion), expanding the billionaire’s telecommunications empire in Europe.
 Throughout the 1990s, Drahi bought and sold cable companies, deals that eventually led to the creation of Numericable Group, alongside buyout firm Cinven Group Ltd.
 In the UK, BT Group Plc is in talks to buy Telefonica’s O2 unit or Deutsche Telekom AG and Orange SA’s EE to expand its wireless offering and complement its broadband network, the largest in the country.
 Ernst, who has a hold rating on the stock, also downplays the potential loss to Sony, because of insurance and the fact that people who watch pirated movies wouldn’t otherwise be buying tickets or DVDs.
 last month said it will spend as much as 100 billion yen buying back shares and raised its planned full-year dividend.
 “But in a few years, there may be a time when we combine a dividend increase with a share buyback” if capital piles up.
 “Nothing is solved in Greece, the Russian government is considering new export taxes, the OPEC confirmed yesterday that they didn’t want to change their minds in terms of production” Speculation that the European Central Bank will start buying government bonds sent the Stoxx 600 up 13 percent from this year’s low in October through an almost seven-year high on Dec.
 The auto-parts maker, which has also been exploring the possibility of splitting in two, is focusing on connected cars as in-vehicle technology is the top selling point for 39 percent of car buyers, according to an Accenture study.
 is sweetening frequent-flier awards for passengers buying the most-expensive tickets to fend off loyalty program changes made by its competitors.
 During next year, AAdvantage or Dividend Miles program members who buy first- or business-class tickets will earn rewards based on the fare purchased, in addition to normal awards for distance flown and the member’s elite status level, the airline said today.
(Bloomberg) -- Investors are buying the most German commercial property in seven years and taking on riskier loans to finance the acquisitions.
 job growth spurs demand for office, retail and apartment properties faster than Americans can buy new houses.
 Most of that money will be in assets outside the homebuilding sector that are less sensitive to mortgage availability or growing consumer preferences to rent rather than buy property, according to Jack Chandler, global head of real estate at BlackRock.
 The homebuilding industry’s troubles date back a decade, when loose mortgage underwriting sparked a construction and land-buying spree that decimated the industry when credit dried up.
 Many are still renting rather than buying houses.
 The share of homes sold to first-time buyers hit its lowest level since 1987, the National Association of Realtors reported in November, as factors such as soaring student debt and delayed marriages depressed purchases by younger buyers.
 Home prices, which plunged 35 percent below their peak from July 2006 to March 2012, have since climbed about 30 percent, putting them out of reach of many first-time buyers.
 “One of the challenges now is the conventional apartment business is just so good, it’s hard to get a real estate-dedicated investor to say, ‘I’m going to move away from apartment REITs and buy single-family rental guys,’” Paolone said.
 24 at Google Play and other websites at a price of $599 to rent or $1499 to buy, in addition to limited release in independent theaters.
 “We’ll play it until people stop buying tickets” In other Christmas releases, Walt Disney Co.
 exchange-traded funds that buy developing nation stocks and bonds last week, the biggest outflow since January, as oil declined and concern grew the US.
 It also advised some Asian buyers of US.
 on its $16 billion buyout last year, joined the firm in 1999.
 agreed to buy Cubist Pharmaceuticals Inc.
(Bloomberg) -- InterContinental Hotels Group Plc, owner of the Holiday Inn and Crowne Plaza brands, agreed to buy Kimpton Hotels & Restaurants for $430 million, gaining a boutique chain with high-end properties in cities across the US.
 By buying an established brand name like Kimpton, with many properties under management, IHG can cut its expansion by years” Morgans, W The boutique segment was pioneered by Ian Schrager and Steve Rubell in the US, starting with their Morgans New York hotel in 1984.
 Kimpton, which runs properties with features such as floor-to-ceiling bookcases and lush velvet drapes in guest suites, was in talks with several possible buyers, according to Solomons.
 His end-of-year report included overhauling stamp duty to benefit all but the wealthiest homebuyers, increasing levies on banks and multinational companies, raising the annual charge on non-domiciled individuals living in the UK.
 homebuyer will save 4,500 pounds and 98 percent will pay less, Osborne said.
 Only buyers of homes that cost more than 937,000 pounds will see their tax bill go up.
 While a timeline for such a move is as yet unclear, it would allow Sherritt to buy American mining equipment, sell nickel and cobalt in the US.
 “That said, the very big funds are global these days and can look at all currencies” Carillion, which in August ended its attempts to form the UK’s largest builder by buying Balfour Beatty Plc, said it will use the proceeds from the bond sale to repay revolving bank loans and fund recent acquisitions, as well as for general corporate purposes.
 2, and accelerated after the company’s stock was cut to sell from buy at Sberbank CIB on Dec.
 Total late-stage delinquencies are now at the highest rate since the fourth quarter of 2010, though they appear to have held at that level in November, said the analyst, who changed her rating to a hold from a buy today.
 That’s cheap enough for Deutsche Bank AG, which upgraded the shares to a buy last week.
 Two-thirds of the 12 research firms that rate the stock have buy recommendations.
 leveraged-loan prices dropped to a more than two-year low as investors extended a record streak of withdrawals from funds that buy the debt.
 mutual and exchange-traded funds that buy leveraged loans in the week ended Dec.
 “We expect the Nifty to trend to 8,600, buoyed by strong year-end buying by funds.
 climbed 12 percent to C$2241, a two-week high, after agreeing to buy New York Life Insurance Co’s retirement plan services business in a deal that will boost the insurer’s assets under administration by about $50 billion.
 The 2014 average ratio was little changed from last year’s levels as demand remained strong from global buyers.
 4 (Bloomberg) -- NextEra Energy Inc, North America’s largest generator of wind and solar power, agreed to buy Hawaii’s biggest electricity provider in a bet it can reduce the nation’s highest rates by using more renewable energy.
 NextEra, the nation’s largest buyer of natural gas, can also help Hawaii import cleaner burning liquefied natural gas to generate power, said Hawaiian Electric Chairman and CEO Constance Lau in a conference call with investors.
 He’s also seeking buyers for three copper mines and a smelter in Chile.
(Bloomberg) -- CRH Plc, an Irish building-materials company, agreed to sell clay and concrete businesses to Boston-based buyout firm Bain Capital LLC for 414 million pounds ($651 million).
 The Dublin-based company has previously signaled it may consider buying some cement assets being sold by Lafarge SA and Holcim Ltd, which are trying to complete a $40 billion merger.
 The casino company has been struggling to meet its obligations since being taken private in a $307 billion leveraged buyout by Apollo Global Management LLC and TPG Capital in 2008.
 Apollo and TPG’s takeover of Caesars, arranged just as the credit crisis unfolded, was part of a buyout boom fueled by cheap debt that spawned super-sized takeovers.
 Glaxo is in the process of selling its oncology business to Novartis, buying most of Novartis’s vaccines unit and forming a joint venture for consumer health.
 The buyout firm has interviewed potential advisers in recent weeks with a view to selling the Bonn-based company in the first half of next year, said the people, who asked not to be identified because they weren’t authorized to speak publicly.
 Terra Firma agreed to buy a majority stake in Tank & Rast for about 1 billion euros in 2004.
 The London-based buyout firm sold half its interest to RREEF Infrastructure Management Ltd.
 Woodside has been seeking acquisitions after its $27 billion plan to buy back shares from Royal Dutch Shell Plc was blocked by investors.
 Joint Consent “This seemed to be a very good project long term,” said Gheit, who rates Apache the equivalent of buy and doesn’t own shares.
(Bloomberg) -- Anadolu Endustri Holding AS, the owner of stakes in Turkey’s biggest brewer and Coca-Cola Co’s local business, agreed to buy 4025 percent of Migros Ticaret AS in a transaction that values the second-biggest Turkish retailer at 64 billion liras ($27 billion).
 Foxtons Group Plc snapped a three-day losing streak after Osborne imposed changes to the stamp duty transaction tax on home buyers.
 voters with a revamp of the tax on buying houses and higher levies on multinational companies and banks, while conceding government borrowing will be more than forecast.
 16 by pushing exporters to bring money back into the country and by creating a credit crunch that cut off some investors from the local currency needed to buy dollars.
 Lawmakers rushed legislation through the lower house of parliament the next day, allowing the Deposit Insurance Agency to buy stakes in banks before they face bankruptcy proceedings.
 agreed to buy a power-transmissions business from Emerson Electric Co.
 Emerson said it would use the proceeds from the sale to buy back shares in fiscal 2015.
 Morgan Stanley considered buying New Century before its bankruptcy as it searched for mortgages that could be packaged into securities.
 “We are their biggest lender and biggest buyer of loans for over 3 years running” Craig Phillips, then a Morgan Stanley executive, said in a November 2004 email that New Century is “extremely open to our advice and involvement in all elements of their operation” One Morgan Stanley due diligence officer, Pamela Barrow, appeared to make light of distressed homebuyers, saying in an e-mail “we should call all their mommas.
 Young Renters “Younger households continue to favor renting over buying,” said Stephen Stanley, chief economist at Amherst Pierpont Securities LLC in Stamford, Connecticut.
 Tight mortgage-lending standards, a barrier to more purchases by first-time buyers, will ease, 18 of 24 respondents said.
 Sales and construction of new housing will remain below the long-term average, even as the economy adds jobs and more of the population born since the early 1980s enter their homebuying years, according to the survey.
 The higher prices reflect a market shift toward move-up buyers and retiring baby boom buyers who have better finances than first-time shoppers.
 “Builders will turn their attention to the bottom half of the market, as millennial buyers begin to buy entry-level homes en masse after years of delays,” he said.
 “Home-value appreciation will cool off to more sustainable levels, and buyers and sellers alike will benefit from a smoother, more balanced market” While the forecasts are mostly positive, this year showed the market doesn’t move in a straight line.
 shareholders from voting on Dollar Tree Inc’s $85 billion buyout bid until the discount chain’s executives fully explore Dollar General Corp’s competing offer.
 Family Dollar directors are improperly refusing to negotiate with Dollar General executives about the Goodlettsville, Tennessee-based retailer’s $80-a-share bid to buy the second-largest US.
 “We want you to enjoin the vote until directors avail themselves of their right to exchange” information with Dollar General about a potential buyout, Donald Enright, a lawyer for disgruntled Family Dollar investors, argued at a hearing in Wilmington.
 Maplecroft’s database, risk calculator, and mapping technologies are used by multinational financial firms, governments and non-governmental organizations, the Jersey City, New Jersey-based buyer said today in a statement.
 The company agreed in January to buy EagleView Technology for $650 million to add an image library of US.
 Cowdery, who personally owns a 39 million-pound stake in Friends Life, said he “absolutely” plans to hold Aviva shares after the company yesterday agreed to buy Friends in a 56 billion-pound all-stock takeover.
 Cowdery said he and the partners from Resolution Group, his insurance buyout firm, had planned to meet with Friends Life Chief Executive Officer Andy Briggs on Jan.
 Briggs was hired to integrate the three units after it scrapped its buyout strategy to focus on growth plus cash, a strategy favored by insurers including Aviva.
 8 (Bloomberg) -- Capital Power Corp, which owns more than 26 gigawatts of generating capacity in North America, agreed to buy Element Power US to increase its renewable energy portfolio in the US.
 Sumitomo Mitsui will buy the operations for about 40 billion yen, people with knowledge of the matter said this month.
 are among more than a dozen companies seeking to buy a majority stake in Poland’s second-largest television network, TVN SA, TVN Chief Executive Officer Markus Tellenbach said.
 The Polish company plans to shortlist bidders next week and the owners, Vivendi SA and ITI Group, may “identify” the buyer in the first quarter next year, Tellenbach said at a Warsaw news conference today.
 In October, TVN majority owners said they were considering a sale of their controlling stake in the broadcaster after being contacted by potential buyers.
 insurer by assets, announced a $1 billion buyback program, the second since the financial crisis.
 MetLife announced in June a plan to repurchase $1 billion of shares, its first buyback since 2008.
 “We are delivering fairness for savers” Osborne overhauled pensions and savings regulation in his March budget by removing rules that pushed retirees to buy an annuity and increased the tax-free allowance on ISAs to 15,000 pounds ($23,565) a year from 11,520 pounds.
 Investors should buy financial stocks amid prospects the central bank will cut requirement ratios twice next year, Chen Li, China strategist at UBS Group AG, said in an interview yesterday.
 “A transformed Publicis will allow us to streamline costs and increase our profitability” The company, which in May abandoned a $35 billion merger with Omnicom that would have created the world’s largest ad company, last month agreed to buy Sapient for $37 billion.
 I’ve no sympathy for them” Known across Britain for discount pints, buy-one-get-one-free spirits and a bargain mixed grill, Wetherspoon is becoming the first UK.
 Three of 15 analysts tracked by Bloomberg recommend buying the stock.
 “Every time a company talks about turning a business around by completely changing what it’s doing, it’s a tough buy for investors,” Vastchenok said.
 “Steps must be promptly taken to rationalize the company’s portfolio of businesses, enhance organic growth, make effective use of the company’s excess liquidity, and improve Omnova’s executive compensation and corporate governance practices” The firm also urged increased buybacks and expanding Omnova’s sales force.
 Thai Union, which owns Bumble Bee’s competitor Chicken of the Sea, entered a binding agreement to buy all of the San Diego-based company’s shares from Lion Capital LLP, Bumble Bee said in a statement.
 “The ECB is certainly helping, but it’s also because the nature of the Greek problem has changed” ECB Stimulus Data today showed Spanish consumer prices declined the most in more than five years this month, bolstering speculation on additional ECB measures, including buying government bonds.
 Amazon, which has added grocery deliveries and Sunday deliveries in recent years, is working to lock in customers to buy things online that they need immediately rather than rushing to the store.
 in bull-market mode, it is hard to convince investors to buy emerging markets,” Leopold Quell, a co-fund manager at Raiffeisen Capital Management in Vienna, said by e-mail.
 Arqaam Capital started coverage of Dubai Parks & Resortswith a “buy” rating and a 149-dirham price estimate, analystsMohammad Kamal and Mohamad Haidar wrote in a note to reportyesterday.
 Investors typically start buying contracts when the reading is below 30.
 The asset manager said it will also renew its share buyback program when the current one expires in February.
 offered to buy all the Hong Kong-listed shares of Hunan Nonferrous Metals Corp.
 offered to buy the Hong Kong unit’s shares at HK$420 each, representing a 69 percent premium to the last closing price, the two companies said in a statement.
 Hunan Nonferrous Metals Holding, which now owns 574 percent of Changsha, China-based Hunan Nonferrous Metals Corp, will absorb and delist the unit after completing the buyout, according to the statement.
 3 (Bloomberg) -- Banks may have gotten safer since the 2008 credit crisis, but risk is migrating to bond buyers.
 Meanwhile, plunging oil hasn’t been as much of a deterrent for European junk-bond buyers because energy-company securities account for a smaller percentage of the market over there.
 Second, bond buyers have also been less enamored of the US.
 They like the idea of the ECB initiating a bond-buying program, which analysts expect to begin next year and would probably push investors deeper down the credit spectrum searching for yield.
 Bond buyers are now betting on a redux in Europe.
 Toronto-based Brookfield Property Partners LP won court approval to buy the now-shuttered resort for $110 million in October, beating out Polo North.
 With Christmas just days away, retailers are counting on the visits to drum up gift purchases and impulse buys.
 Hidden cameras take candid pictures that parents can buy.
 Russian property buyers have almost disappeared, stopped by the currency’s decline and international sanctions that make moving money abroad more difficult.
 Banks refused to allow the buyer to open an account in Dubai, forcing him to cancel the offer.
 Russians were the sixth-biggest group of foreign homebuyers in Dubai in the year through Nov.
 Even though demand from places such as China and West Africa has been growing, it won’t make up for the loss of Russian buyers, he said.
 They buy luxury goods, which are significantly cheaper in the UAE.
 He also lowered his recommendation on the technology industry to the equivalent of hold from the equivalent of buy.
 “When, like John, you’ve been through so many cycles with so many clients and you continue to be right in your advice, you develop a deep set of clients where you’re one of the very first calls,” said Patrick Healy, deputy CEO of buyout firm Hellman & Friedman.
 That business arranges lending for corporate buyouts.
 The Fairfield, Connecticut-based manufacturer reached an agreement in June to buy most of Alstom’s energy assets for 124 billion euros ($156 billion), GE’s biggest acquisition ever.
 Until now, Britain’s telecoms market has been unusual in Europe because most companies do not yet provide the full range of telecoms services -- Internet, mobile, television and home phone -- preferring instead to buy in services that they don’t have from competitors.
 It’s also considering buying Blinkbox, a video-on-demand service owned by Tesco Plc, according to a person familiar with the situation.
 The Bank of Japan is buying record amounts of bonds issued by a government that’s already burdened by the world’s heaviest public debt load.
 1 (Bloomberg) -- Deutsche Annington Immobilien SE offered to buy competitor Gagfah SA in a 39 billion-euro ($49-billion) deal that would be Germany’s biggest-ever real estate acquisition.
 APA Group -- Australia’s largest gas pipeline owner -- agreed to buy the pipeline, which supplies BG’s liquefied natural gas project in the country.
 “A network outage won’t prevent people from buying the PS4.
 BMY paid for the stock with a short-term loan and immediately after buying the stock, it sold the shares to a different BMY entity.
 BT said yesterday it’s in exclusive talks to buy EE, which is jointly owned by Deutsche Telekom AG and Orange SA.
 Openreach Criticism Most of the other operators use BT’s Openreach network: Vodafone, TalkTalk Telecom Group Plc, EE and Hutchison Whampoa Ltd’s Three all buy regulated wholesale access to the infrastructure to resell to customers.
 “Share prices may not have corrected enough in the short term yet” Mailru, controlled by billionaire Alisher Usmanov, was lowered to neutral from buy after UBS factored in the currency’s depreciation since its last review and increased its Russia risk-free rate.
 UBS also cut Russian search-engine operator Yandex NV and electronic-payment processor Qiwi Plc to neutral from buy, saying that the ruble-denominated pace of growth in the Internet sector won’t be enough to compensate for the currency’s 26 percent decline this quarter.
 Such an outcome could put at risk the European Union’s common currency and the start of the European Central Bank’s bond-buying plan.
 The FTSE 100 lost 04 percent yesterday after George Osborne, chancellor of the exchequer, pledged in his Autumn Statement a revamp of the tax on buying houses and higher levies on multinational companies.
 Goldman Sachs clients are getting a chance to buy a six-year bond in the mobile car-booking company that will convertinto equity at a 20 percent to 30 percent discount to Uber’svaluation at the time of an initial public offering, said thepeople, who asked not to be identified because the details areprivate.
 First Solar acquired an equity stake in the community solar developer Clean Energy Collective and will get two seats on its board, according to a statement today that didn’t say how large a stake it’s buying, or the price.
 Birinyi was one of the first analysts to recommend buying after global markets bottomed in March 2009 and has stuck with the recommendation as the S&P 500 tripled.
 Consumer Spending Consumer spending is poised to grow in 2015 as stronger employment and lower gasoline prices boost household buying power, one reason why the Fed will probably raise interest rates next year.
 The current advance has entered the last category, exuberance, characterized by the return of individual investors and less discriminate buying.
(Bloomberg) -- Mercedes-Benz raised the price of its CLA entry-level coupe by more than 5 percent to $31,500, ending a marketing tool that helped draw new buyers to the luxury brand.
 The spot featured actor Willem Dafoe as the devil and delivered the message that drivers could buy a Mercedes-Benz for less than $30,000 without having to sell their soul.
 Mercedes-Benz has said that about 75 percent of CLA buyers are new to the brand, and the lower prices draw people to the showrooms.
 The software maker reported sales that topped estimates and agreed to buy stock-photography provider Fotolia LLC for about $800 million.
 “Everybody’s best-selling projects are those catering to elder buyers,” John Burns, a housing consultant based in Irvine, California, said in an interview.
 Record Prices Builders have increasingly shifted away from starter homes and are appealing to wealthier buyers, with the median price of a new US.
 and PulteGroup, whose Del Webb business is the largest targeted to older buyers, are depending on the segment’s continued growth.
 “The active-adult market, in our case served through Del Webb, is extremely well-positioned to take advantage of a giant population of buyers that are only getting bigger, combined with them feeling better about the housing market,” PulteGroup Chief Executive Officer Richard Dugas said in an interview.
 Homebuilders are waiting for the millennial generation to increase buying, a boom that could take years to materialize as student debt, tight credit and delayed child-bearing depress their housing purchases.
 The market has been “bumpy” as buyers remain skittish, Toll Brothers Inc.
 Wealthier Buyers The share of first-time buyers this year dropped to the lowest level since 1987, the National Association of Realtors reported last month.
 Millennials are more of a price-focused buyer” Builders are growing mostly by catering to move-up buyers - - or empty nesters who are downsizing.
 In addition to Florida, communities targeting older buyers are popping up around college campuses and urban centers such as Baltimore, Philadelphia and Chicago, Richardson said.
 Minto plans to buy 1,600 acres (650 hectares) in the Daytona Beach area next year, building on the success of the 2,400-acre Isles of Collier Preserve in Naples, which has sold 120 units at an average price of about $650,000 since opening in February, Belmont said.
 “The demographics, certainly for the buyer profile that we target, makes it a game that goes into some extra innings” The Jays, who paid cash for their 2,700-square-foot house in southwest Florida, are also considering buying a summer property in the Denver area.
 Speed anybody can buy.
 Flush with cash, online retailers are fighting a vicious price war to gain buyers, said Ritesh Chandra, an executive director at Mumbai-based investment bank Avendus Capital Pvt.
 Amid uncertainty over the regulation it faces, the insurer had refrained from buybacks, before repurchasing about $1 billion of shares this year and then authorizing a $1 billion buyback last week.
 unit agreed to buy two Chinese solar developers to expand project-operating business.
 over a buyout of the US.
 Apollo originally offered to buy the US.
 Apollo’s claims that “labor disruptions” scuttled the deal were a pretext and the Indian company suffered from buyer’s remorse.
 leveraged buyout of the year.
 Calgary-based Talisman rose 18 percent to C$597 at the close in Toronto, giving it a market value of C$619 billion ($531 billion), after Spain’s Repsol SA was said to be nearing a bid to buy the company.
 The market today is quite expensive from a valuation standpoint, so if a correction occurred we would probably accelerate the investment” Power Deal In addition to the PetSmart deal, the Caisse also announced an agreement to buy 15 percent of AES Corp’s IPALCO Enterprises unit for $244 million.
